BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.60.040 and 2004 c 25 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, the department
((shall)) must issue a sales and use tax deferral certificate for state
and local sales and use taxes due under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and
82.14 RCW on each eligible investment project that is located in an
eligible area as defined in RCW 82.60.020.
(2) The department must issue a certificate under subsection (1) of
this section to defer:
(a) One hundred percent of sales and use taxes due under chapters
82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW, only if the construction of all qualified
buildings within the eligible investment project has received a
platinum rating under the United States' green building council's
leadership in energy and environmental design 2009 new construction and
major renovation rating system, as determined by the department of
commerce;
(b) Seventy-five percent of sales and use taxes due under chapters
82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW, only if the construction of all qualified
buildings within the eligible investment project has received at least
a gold rating under the United States' green building council's
leadership in energy and environmental design 2009 new construction and
major renovation rating system, as determined by the department of
commerce;
(c) Fifty percent of sales and use taxes due under chapters 82.08,
82.12, and 82.14 RCW, only if the construction of all qualified
buildings within the eligible investment project has received at least
a silver rating under the United States' green building council's
leadership in energy and environmental design 2009 new construction and
major renovation rating system, as determined by the department of
commerce; and
(d) Twenty-five percent of sales and use taxes due under chapters
82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW, if the construction of all qualified
buildings within the eligible investment project has not received at
least a silver rating under the United States' green building council's
leadership in energy and environmental design 2009 new construction and
major renovation rating system, as determined by the department of
commerce.
(3) The department ((shall)) must keep a running total of all
deferrals granted under this chapter during each fiscal biennium.
(((3))) (4) This section expires July 1, ((2010)) 2012.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.60.030 and 1994 sp.s. c 1 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Application for deferral of taxes under this chapter must be
made before initiation of the construction of the investment project or
acquisition of equipment or machinery. The application ((shall)) must
be made to the department in a form and manner prescribed by the
department. The application ((shall)) must contain information
regarding the location of the investment project, the applicant's
average employment in the state for the prior year, estimated or actual
new employment related to the project, estimated or actual wages of
employees related to the project, estimated or actual costs, time
schedules for completion and operation, and other information required
by the department. The department ((shall)) must rule on the
application within sixty days.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2012.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.63.030 and 2008 c 15 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Except as provided in subsection (2))) Subject to the
conditions of this section, the department ((shall)) must issue a sales
and use tax deferral certificate for state and local sales and use
taxes due under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW on each eligible
investment project.
(2) The department must issue a certificate under subsection (1) of
this section to defer:
(a) One hundred percent of sales and use taxes due under chapters
82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW, only if the construction of all qualified
buildings within the eligible investment project has received a
platinum rating under the United States' green building council's
leadership in energy and environmental design 2009 new construction and
major renovation rating system, as determined by the department of
commerce;
(b) Seventy-five percent of sales and use taxes due under chapters
82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW, only if the construction of all qualified
buildings within the eligible investment project has received at least
a gold rating under the United States' green building council's
leadership in energy and environmental design 2009 new construction and
major renovation rating system, as determined by the department of
commerce;
(c) Fifty percent of sales and use taxes due under chapters 82.08,
82.12, and 82.14 RCW, only if the construction of all qualified
buildings within the eligible investment project has received at least
a silver rating under the United States' green building council's
leadership in energy and environmental design 2009 new construction and
major renovation rating system, as determined by the department of
commerce; and
(d) Twenty-five percent of sales and use taxes due under chapters
82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW, if the construction of all qualified
buildings within the eligible investment project has not received at
least a silver rating under the United States' green building council's
leadership in energy and environmental design 2009 new construction and
major renovation rating system, as determined by the department of
commerce.
(3) No certificate may be issued for an investment project that has
already received a deferral under chapter 82.60 RCW or this chapter,
except that an investment project for qualified research and
development that has already received a deferral may also receive an
additional deferral certificate for adapting the investment project for
use in pilot scale manufacturing.
(((3))) (4) This section ((shall)) expires January 1, 2015.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.74.030 and 2006 c 354 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, the department
((shall)) must issue a sales and use tax deferral certificate for state
and local sales and use taxes imposed or authorized under chapters
82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW on each eligible investment project if the
investment project is undertaken for the purpose of fresh fruit and
vegetable processing, dairy product manufacturing, seafood product
manufacturing, cold storage warehousing, or research and development.
(2) The department must issue a certificate under subsection (1) of
this section to defer:
(a) One hundred percent of sales and use taxes due under chapters
82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW, only if the construction of all qualified
buildings within the eligible investment project has received a
platinum rating under the United States' green building council's
leadership in energy and environmental design 2009 new construction and
major renovation rating system, as determined by the department of
commerce;
(b) Seventy-five percent of sales and use taxes due under chapters
82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW, only if the construction of all qualified
buildings within the eligible investment project has received at least
a gold rating under the United States' green building council's
leadership in energy and environmental design 2009 new construction and
major renovation rating system, as determined by the department of
commerce;
(c) Fifty percent of sales and use taxes due under chapters 82.08,
82.12, and 82.14 RCW, only if the construction of all qualified
buildings within the eligible investment project has received at least
a silver rating under the United States' green building council's
leadership in energy and environmental design 2009 new construction and
major renovation rating system, as determined by the department of
commerce; and
(d) Twenty-five percent of sales and use taxes due under chapters
82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW, if the construction of all qualified
buildings within the eligible investment project has not received at
least a silver rating under the United States' green building council's
leadership in energy and environmental design 2009 new construction and
major renovation rating system, as determined by the department of
commerce.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2012.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.75.030 and 2006 c 178 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, the department
((shall)) must issue a sales and use tax deferral certificate for state
and local sales and use taxes due under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and
82.14 RCW for each eligible investment project.
(2) The department must issue a certificate under subsection (1) of
this section to defer:
(a) One hundred percent of sales and use taxes due under chapters
82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW, only if the construction of all qualified
buildings within the eligible investment project has received a
platinum rating under the United States' green building council's
leadership in energy and environmental design 2009 new construction and
major renovation rating system, as determined by the department of
commerce;
(b) Seventy-five percent of sales and use taxes due under chapters
82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW, only if the construction of all qualified
buildings within the eligible investment project has received at least
a gold rating under the United States' green building council's
leadership in energy and environmental design 2009 new construction and
major renovation rating system, as determined by the department of
commerce;
(c) Fifty percent of sales and use taxes due under chapters 82.08,
82.12, and 82.14 RCW, only if the construction of all qualified
buildings within the eligible investment project has received at least
a silver rating under the United States' green building council's
leadership in energy and environmental design 2009 new construction and
major renovation rating system, as determined by the department of
commerce; and
(d) Twenty-five percent of sales and use taxes due under chapters
82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW, if the construction of all qualified
buildings within the eligible investment project has not received at
least a silver rating under the United States' green building council's
leadership in energy and environmental design 2009 new construction and
major renovation rating system, as determined by the department of
commerce.
(3) No certificate may be issued for an investment project that has
already received a deferral under chapter 82.60 or 82.63 RCW or this
chapter.
(((3))) (4) The department ((shall)) must keep a running total of
all deferrals granted under this chapter during each fiscal biennium.
(((4))) (5) This section expires January 1, 2017.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.82.030 and 2008 c 15 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the conditions of this section, the department must
issue a sales and use tax deferral certificate for state and local
sales and use taxes due under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW on
each eligible investment project meeting the requirements of this
chapter.
(2) The department must issue a certificate under subsection (1) of
this section to defer:
(a) One hundred percent of sales and use taxes due under chapters
82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW, only if the construction of all qualified
buildings within the eligible investment project has received a
platinum rating under the United States' green building council's
leadership in energy and environmental design 2009 new construction and
major renovation rating system, as determined by the department of
commerce;
(b) Seventy-five percent of sales and use taxes due under chapters
82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW, only if the construction of all qualified
buildings within the eligible investment project has received at least
a gold rating under the United States' green building council's
leadership in energy and environmental design 2009 new construction and
major renovation rating system, as determined by the department of
commerce;
(c) Fifty percent of sales and use taxes due under chapters 82.08,
82.12, and 82.14 RCW, only if the construction of all qualified
buildings within the eligible investment project has received at least
a silver rating under the United States' green building council's
leadership in energy and environmental design 2009 new construction and
major renovation rating system, as determined by the department of
commerce; and
(d) Twenty-five percent of sales and use taxes due under chapters
82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW, if the construction of all qualified
buildings within the eligible investment project has not received at
least silver rating under the United States' green building council's
leadership in energy and environmental design 2009 new construction and
major renovation rating system, as determined by the department of
commerce.
(3) No certificate may be issued for an investment project that has
already received a deferral under chapter 82.60 or 82.63 RCW or this
chapter, except that an investment project for qualified research and
development that has already received a deferral may also receive an
additional deferral certificate for adapting the investment project for
use in pilot scale manufacturing.
(((3))) (4) The department must keep a running total of all
deferrals granted under this chapter during each fiscal biennium.
(((4))) (5) The number of eligible investment projects for which
the benefits of this chapter will be allowed is limited to two per
biennium. The department must approve deferral certificates for
completed applications on a first in-time basis. During any biennium,
only one deferral certificate may be issued per community empowerment
zone.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 RCW 82.60.050 (Expiration of RCW 82.60.030
and 82.60.040) and 2004 c 25 s 6, 1994 sp.s. c 1 s 7, 1993 sp.s. c 25
s 404, 1988 c 41 s 5, & 1985 c 232 s 10 are each repealed.

--- END ---