BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.60.020 and 2006 c 142 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under
this chapter.
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(3) "Eligible area" means a rural county as defined in RCW
82.14.370.
(4)(a) "Eligible investment project" means an investment project in
an eligible area as defined in subsection (3) of this section.
(b) The lessor or owner of a qualified building is not eligible for
a deferral unless:
(i) The underlying ownership of the buildings, machinery, and
equipment vests exclusively in the same person; or
(ii)(A) The lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic
benefit of the deferral to the lessee;
(B) The lessee that receives the economic benefit of the deferral
agrees in writing with the department to complete the annual survey
required under RCW 82.60.070; and
(C) The economic benefit of the deferral passed to the lessee is no
less than the amount of tax deferred by the lessor and is evidenced by
written documentation of any type of payment, credit, or other
financial arrangement between the lessor or owner of the qualified
building and the lessee.
(c) "Eligible investment project" does not include any portion of
an investment project undertaken by a light and power business as
defined in RCW 82.16.010(((5))), other than that portion of a
cogeneration project that is used to generate power for consumption
within the manufacturing site of which the cogeneration project is an
integral part, or investment projects which have already received
deferrals under this chapter.
(5) "High performance building standard" means a standard
determined by the department of commerce to be equal to at least the
gold rating of the United States' green building council's leadership
in energy and environmental design 2009 new construction and major
renovation rating system.
(6) "Investment project" means an investment in qualified buildings
or qualified machinery and equipment, including labor and services
rendered in the planning, installation, and construction of the
project.
(((6))) (7) "Manufacturing" means the same as defined in RCW
82.04.120. "Manufacturing" also includes computer programming, the
production of computer software, and other computer-related services,
the activities performed by research and development laboratories and
commercial testing laboratories, and the conditioning of vegetable
seeds.
(((7))) (8) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.
(((8))) (9) "Qualified buildings" means construction of new
structures consistent with a high performance building standard, and
expansion or renovation, consistent with a high performance building
standard, of existing structures for the purpose of increasing floor
space or production capacity used for manufacturing and research and
development activities, including plant offices and warehouses or other
facilities for the storage of raw material or finished goods if such
facilities are an essential or an integral part of a factory, mill,
plant, or laboratory used for manufacturing or research and
development. If a building is used partly for manufacturing or
research and development and partly for other purposes, the applicable
tax deferral shall be determined by apportionment of the costs of
construction under rules adopted by the department.
(((9))) (10) "Qualified employment position" means a permanent
full-time employee employed in the eligible investment project during
the entire tax year. The term "entire tax year" means a full-time
position that is filled for a period of twelve consecutive months. The
term "full-time" means at least thirty-five hours a week, four hundred
fifty-five hours a quarter, or one thousand eight hundred twenty hours
a year.
(((10))) (11) "Qualified machinery and equipment" means all new
industrial and research fixtures, equipment, and support facilities
that are an integral and necessary part of a manufacturing or research
and development operation. "Qualified machinery and equipment"
includes: Computers; software; data processing equipment; laboratory
equipment; manufacturing components such as belts, pulleys, shafts, and
moving parts; molds, tools, and dies; operating structures; and all
equipment used to control or operate the machinery.
(((11))) (12) "Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral
under this chapter.
(((12))) (13) "Research and development" means the development,
refinement, testing, marketing, and commercialization of a product,
service, or process before commercial sales have begun. As used in
this subsection, "commercial sales" excludes sales of prototypes or
sales for market testing if the total gross receipts from such sales of
the product, service, or process do not exceed one million dollars.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.60.030 and 1994 sp.s. c 1 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Application for deferral of taxes under this chapter must be
made before initiation of the construction of the investment project or
acquisition of equipment or machinery. The application ((shall)) must
be made to the department in a form and manner prescribed by the
department. The application shall contain information regarding the
location of the investment project, the applicant's average employment
in the state for the prior year, estimated or actual new employment
related to the project, estimated or actual wages of employees related
to the project, estimated or actual costs, time schedules for
completion and operation, and other information required by the
department. The department ((shall)) must rule on the application
within sixty days.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2012.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.60.040 and 2004 c 25 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department ((shall)) must issue a sales and use tax
deferral certificate for state and local sales and use taxes due under
chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW on each eligible investment
project that is located in an eligible area as defined in RCW
82.60.020.
(2) The department ((shall)) must keep a running total of all
deferrals granted under this chapter during each fiscal biennium.
(3) This section expires July 1, ((2010)) 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RCW 82.60.050 (Expiration of RCW 82.60.030
and 82.60.040) and 2004 c 25 s 6, 1994 sp.s. c 1 s 7, 1993 sp.s. c 25
s 404, 1988 c 41 s 5, & 1985 c 232 s 10 are each repealed.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.63.010 and 2009 c 268 s 2 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Advanced computing" means technologies used in the designing
and developing of computing hardware and software, including
innovations in designing the full spectrum of hardware from hand-held
calculators to super computers, and peripheral equipment.
(2) "Advanced materials" means materials with engineered properties
created through the development of specialized processing and synthesis
technology, including ceramics, high value-added metals, electronic
materials, composites, polymers, and biomaterials.
(3) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under
this chapter.
(4) "Biotechnology" means the application of technologies, such as
recombinant DNA techniques, biochemistry, molecular and cellular
biology, genetics and genetic engineering, cell fusion techniques, and
new bioprocesses, using living organisms, or parts of organisms, to
produce or modify products, to improve plants or animals, to develop
microorganisms for specific uses, to identify targets for small
molecule pharmaceutical development, or to transform biological systems
into useful processes and products or to develop microorganisms for
specific uses.
(5) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(6) "Electronic device technology" means technologies involving
microelectronics; semiconductors; electronic equipment and
instrumentation; radio frequency, microwave, and millimeter
electronics; optical and optic-electrical devices; and data and digital
communications and imaging devices.
(7) "Eligible investment project" means an investment project which
either initiates a new operation, or expands or diversifies a current
operation by expanding, renovating, or equipping an existing facility.
The lessor or owner of the qualified building is not eligible for a
deferral unless:
(a) The underlying ownership of the buildings, machinery, and
equipment vests exclusively in the same person; or
(b)(i) The lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic
benefit of the deferral to the lessee;
(ii) The lessee that receives the economic benefit of the deferral
agrees in writing with the department to complete the annual survey
required under RCW 82.63.020(2); and
(iii) The economic benefit of the deferral passed to the lessee is
no less than the amount of tax deferred by the lessor and is evidenced
by written documentation of any type of payment, credit, or other
financial arrangement between the lessor or owner of the qualified
building and the lessee.
(8) "Environmental technology" means assessment and prevention of
threats or damage to human health or the environment, environmental
cleanup, and the development of alternative energy sources.
(9)(a) "Initiation of construction" means the date that a building
permit is issued under the building code adopted under RCW 19.27.031
for:
(i) Construction of the qualified building, if the underlying
ownership of the building vests exclusively with the person receiving
the economic benefit of the deferral;
(ii) Construction of the qualified building, if the economic
benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in
subsection (7) of this section; or
(iii) Tenant improvements for a qualified building, if the economic
benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in
subsection (7) of this section.
(b) "Initiation of construction" does not include soil testing,
site clearing and grading, site preparation, or any other related
activities that are initiated before the issuance of a building permit
for the construction of the foundation of the building.
(c) If the investment project is a phased project, "initiation of
construction" shall apply separately to each phase.
(10) "Investment project" means an investment in qualified
buildings or qualified machinery and equipment, including labor and
services rendered in the planning, installation, and construction or
improvement of the project.
(11) "Multiple qualified buildings" means qualified buildings
leased to the same person when such structures: (a) Are located within
a five-mile radius; and (b) the initiation of construction of each
building begins within a sixty-month period.
(12) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030 and includes
state universities as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.
(13) "Pilot scale manufacturing" means design, construction, and
testing of preproduction prototypes and models in the fields of
biotechnology, advanced computing, electronic device technology,
advanced materials, and environmental technology other than for
commercial sale. As used in this subsection, "commercial sale"
excludes sales of prototypes or sales for market testing if the total
gross receipts from such sales of the product, service, or process do
not exceed one million dollars.
(14) "Qualified buildings" means construction of new structures
consistent with a high performance building standard as defined in RCW
82.60.020, and expansion or renovation, consistent with a high
performance building standard as defined in RCW 82.60.020, of existing
structures for the purpose of increasing floor space or production
capacity used for pilot scale manufacturing or qualified research and
development, including plant offices and other facilities that are an
essential or an integral part of a structure used for pilot scale
manufacturing or qualified research and development. If a building or
buildings are used partly for pilot scale manufacturing or qualified
research and development, and partly for other purposes, the applicable
tax deferral shall be determined by apportionment of the costs of
construction under rules adopted by the department. Such rules may
include provisions for determining the amount of the deferral based on
apportionment of costs of construction of an investment project
consisting of a building or multiple buildings, where qualified
research and development or pilot scale manufacturing activities are
shifted within a building or from one building to another building.
(15) "Qualified machinery and equipment" means fixtures, equipment,
and support facilities that are an integral and necessary part of a
pilot scale manufacturing or qualified research and development
operation. "Qualified machinery and equipment" includes: Computers;
software; data processing equipment; laboratory equipment,
instrumentation, and other devices used in a process of experimentation
to develop a new or improved pilot model, plant process, product,
formula, invention, or similar property; manufacturing components such
as belts, pulleys, shafts, and moving parts; molds, tools, and dies;
vats, tanks, and fermenters; operating structures; and all other
equipment used to control, monitor, or operate the machinery. For
purposes of this chapter, qualified machinery and equipment must be
either new to the taxing jurisdiction of the state or new to the
certificate holder, except that used machinery and equipment may be
treated as qualified machinery and equipment if the certificate holder
either brings the machinery and equipment into Washington or makes a
retail purchase of the machinery and equipment in Washington or
elsewhere.
(16) "Qualified research and development" means research and
development performed within this state in the fields of advanced
computing, advanced materials, biotechnology, electronic device
technology, and environmental technology.
(17) "Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral under this
chapter.
(18) "Research and development" means activities performed to
discover technological information, and technical and nonroutine
activities concerned with translating technological information into
new or improved products, processes, techniques, formulas, inventions,
or software. The term includes exploration of a new use for an
existing drug, device, or biological product if the new use requires
separate licensing by the federal food and drug administration under
chapter 21, C.F.R., as amended. The term does not include adaptation
or duplication of existing products where the products are not
substantially improved by application of the technology, nor does the
term include surveys and studies, social science and humanities
research, market research or testing, quality control, sale promotion
and service, computer software developed for internal use, and research
in areas such as improved style, taste, and seasonal design.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.74.010 and 2006 c 354 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under
this chapter.
(2) "Cold storage warehouse" means a storage warehouse owned or
operated by a wholesaler or third-party warehouser as those terms are
defined in RCW 82.08.820 to store fresh and/or frozen perishable fruits
or vegetables, dairy products, seafood products, or any combination
thereof, at a desired temperature to maintain the quality of the
product for orderly marketing.
(3) "Dairy product" means dairy products that as of September 20,
2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135,
including by-products from the manufacturing of the dairy products such
as whey and casein.
(4) "Dairy product manufacturing" means manufacturing, as defined
in RCW 82.04.120, of dairy products.
(5) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(6) "Eligible investment project" means an investment in qualified
buildings or qualified machinery and equipment, including labor and
services rendered in the planning, installation, and construction of
the project. The lessor or owner of a qualified building is not
eligible for a deferral unless (a) the underlying ownership of the
buildings, machinery, and equipment vests exclusively in the same
person; or (b)(i) the lessor by written contract agrees to pass the
economic benefit of the deferral to the lessee in the form of reduced
rent payments, and (ii) the lessee that receives the economic benefit
of the deferral agrees in writing with the department to complete the
annual survey under RCW 82.74.040. The economic benefit of the
deferral to the lessee may be evidenced by any type of payment, credit,
or any other financial arrangement between the lessor or owner of the
qualified building and the lessee.
(7) "Fresh fruit and vegetable processing" means manufacturing as
defined in RCW 82.04.120 which consists of the canning, preserving,
freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits and/or vegetables.
(8)(a) "Initiation of construction" means the date that a building
permit is issued under the building code adopted under RCW 19.27.031
for:
(i) Construction of the qualified building, if the underlying
ownership of the building vests exclusively with the person receiving
the economic benefit of the deferral;
(ii) Construction of the qualified building, if the economic
benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in
subsection (6) of this section; or
(iii) Tenant improvements for a qualified building, if the economic
benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in
subsection (6) of this section.
(b) "Initiation of construction" does not include soil testing,
site clearing and grading, site preparation, or any other related
activities that are initiated before the issuance of a building permit
for the construction of the foundation of the building.
(c) If the investment project is a phased project, "initiation of
construction" applies separately to each phase.
(9) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.
(10) "Qualified buildings" means construction of new structures
consistent with a high performance building standard as defined in RCW
82.60.020, and expansion or renovation, consistent with a high
performance building standard as defined in RCW 82.60.020, of existing
structures for the purpose of increasing floor space or production
capacity used for fresh fruit and vegetable processing, dairy product
manufacturing, seafood product manufacturing, cold storage warehousing,
and research and development activities, including plant offices and
warehouses or other facilities for the storage of raw material or
finished goods if such facilities are an essential or an integral part
of a factory, plant, or laboratory used for fresh fruit and vegetable
processing, dairy product manufacturing, seafood product manufacturing,
cold storage warehousing, or research and development. If a building
is used partly for fresh fruit and vegetable processing, dairy product
manufacturing, seafood product manufacturing, cold storage warehousing,
or research and development and partly for other purposes, the
applicable tax deferral shall be determined by apportionment of the
costs of construction under rules adopted by the department.
(11) "Qualified machinery and equipment" means all industrial and
research fixtures, equipment, and support facilities that are an
integral and necessary part of a fresh fruit and vegetable processing,
dairy product manufacturing, seafood product manufacturing, cold
storage ((warehouse)) warehousing, or research and development
operation. "Qualified machinery and equipment" includes: Computers;
software; data processing equipment; laboratory equipment;
manufacturing components such as belts, pulleys, shafts, and moving
parts; molds, tools, and dies; operating structures; and all equipment
used to control or operate the machinery.
(12) "Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral under this
chapter.
(13) "Research and development" means the development, refinement,
testing, marketing, and commercialization of a product, service, or
process related to fresh fruit and vegetable processing, dairy product
manufacturing, seafood product manufacturing, or cold storage
warehousing before commercial sales have begun. As used in this
subsection, "commercial sales" excludes sales of prototypes or sales
for market testing if the total gross receipts from such sales of the
product, service, or process do not exceed one million dollars.
(14) "Seafood product" means any edible marine fish and shellfish
that remains in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state.
(15) "Seafood product manufacturing" means the manufacturing, as
defined in RCW 82.04.120, of seafood products.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.75.010 and 2009 c 549 s 1033 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under
this chapter.
(2) "Biotechnology" means a technology based on the science of
biology, microbiology, molecular biology, cellular biology,
biochemistry, or biophysics, or any combination of these, and includes,
but is not limited to, recombinant DNA techniques, genetics and genetic
engineering, cell fusion techniques, and new bioprocesses, using living
organisms, or parts of organisms.
(3) "Biotechnology product" means any virus, therapeutic serum,
antibody, protein, toxin, antitoxin, vaccine, blood, blood component or
derivative, allergenic product, or analogous product produced through
the application of biotechnology that is used in the prevention,
treatment, or cure of diseases or injuries to humans.
(4) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(5)(a) "Eligible investment project" means an investment in
qualified buildings or qualified machinery and equipment, including
labor and services rendered in the planning, installation, and
construction of the project.
(b) The lessor or owner of a qualified building is not eligible for
a deferral unless:
(i) The underlying ownership of the buildings, machinery, and
equipment vests exclusively in the same person; or
(ii)(A) The lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic
benefit of the deferral to the lessee;
(B) The lessee that receives the economic benefit of the deferral
agrees in writing with the department to complete the annual survey
required under RCW 82.32.645; and
(C) The economic benefit of the deferral passed to the lessee is no
less than the amount of tax deferred by the lessor and is evidenced by
written documentation of any type of payment, credit, or other
financial arrangement between the lessor or owner of the qualified
building and the lessee.
(6)(a) "Initiation of construction" means the date that a building
permit is issued under the building code adopted under RCW 19.27.031
for:
(i) Construction of the qualified building, if the underlying
ownership of the building vests exclusively with the person receiving
the economic benefit of the deferral;
(ii) Construction of the qualified building, if the economic
benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in
subsection (5)(b)(ii)(A) of this section; or
(iii) Tenant improvements for a qualified building, if the economic
benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in
subsection (5)(b)(ii)(A) of this section.
(b) "Initiation of construction" does not include soil testing,
site clearing and grading, site preparation, or any other related
activities that are initiated before the issuance of a building permit
for the construction of the foundation of the building.
(c) If the investment project is a phased project, "initiation of
construction" shall apply separately to each phase.
(7) "Manufacturing" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.120.
(8) "Medical device" means an instrument, apparatus, implement,
machine, contrivance, implant, in vitro reagent, or other similar or
related article, including any component, part, or accessory, that is
designed or developed and:
(a) Recognized in the national formulary, or the United States
pharmacopeia, or any supplement to them;
(b) Intended for use in the diagnosis of disease, or in the cure,
mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease or other conditions in
human beings or other animals; or
(c) Intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of
human beings or other animals, and which does not achieve any of its
primary intended purposes through chemical action within or on the body
of human beings or other animals and which is not dependent upon being
metabolized for the achievement of any of its principal intended
purposes.
(9) "Person" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.030.
(10) "Qualified buildings" means construction of new structures
consistent with a high performance building standard as defined in RCW
82.60.020, and expansion or renovation, consistent with a high
performance building standard as defined in RCW 82.60.020, of existing
structures for the purpose of increasing floor space or production
capacity used for biotechnology product manufacturing or medical device
manufacturing activities, including plant offices, commercial
laboratories for process development, quality assurance and quality
control, and warehouses or other facilities for the storage of raw
material or finished goods if the facilities are an essential or an
integral part of a factory, plant, or laboratory used for biotechnology
product manufacturing or medical device manufacturing. If a building
is used partly for biotechnology product manufacturing or medical
device manufacturing and partly for other purposes, the applicable tax
deferral shall be determined by apportionment of the costs of
construction under rules adopted by the department.
(11) "Qualified machinery and equipment" means all new industrial
and research fixtures, equipment, and support facilities that are an
integral and necessary part of a biotechnology product manufacturing or
medical device manufacturing operation. "Qualified machinery and
equipment" includes: Computers; software; data processing equipment;
laboratory equipment; manufacturing components such as belts, pulleys,
shafts, and moving parts; molds, tools, and dies; operating structures;
and all equipment used to control or operate the machinery.
(12) "Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral under this
chapter.

Sec. 8 RCW 82.82.010 and 2008 c 15 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under
this chapter.
(2) "Corporate headquarters" means a facility or facilities where
corporate staff employees are physically employed, and where the
majority of the company's management services are handled either on a
regional or a national basis. Company management services may include:
Accounts receivable and payable, accounting, data processing,
distribution management, employee benefit plan, financial and
securities accounting, information technology, insurance, legal,
merchandising, payroll, personnel, purchasing procurement, planning,
reporting and compliance, research and development, tax, treasury, or
other headquarters-related services. "Corporate headquarters" does not
include a facility or facilities used for manufacturing, wholesaling,
or warehousing.
(3) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(4) "Eligible area" means a designated community empowerment zone
approved under RCW 43.31C.020.
(5)(a) "Eligible investment project" means an investment project in
a qualified building or buildings in an eligible area, as defined in
subsection (4) of this section, which will have employment at the
qualified building or buildings of at least three hundred employees in
qualified employment positions, each of whom must earn for the year
reported at least the average annual wage for the state for that year
as determined by the employment security department.
(b) The lessor or owner of a qualified building or buildings is not
eligible for a deferral unless:
(i) The underlying ownership of the building or buildings vests
exclusively in the same person; or
(ii)(A) The lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic
benefit of the deferral to the lessee;
(B) The lessee that receives the economic benefit of the deferral
agrees in writing with the department to complete the annual survey
required under RCW 82.82.020; and
(C) The economic benefit of the deferral passed to the lessee is no
less than the amount of tax deferred by the lessor and is evidenced by
written documentation of any type of payment, credit, or other
financial arrangement between the lessor or owner of the qualified
building and the lessee.
(6) "Investment project" means a capital investment of at least
thirty million dollars in a qualified building or buildings including
tangible personal property and fixtures that will be incorporated as an
ingredient or component of such buildings during the course of their
construction, and including labor and services rendered in the
planning, installation, and construction of the project.
(7) "Manufacture" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
82.04.120.
(8) "Operationally complete" means a date no later than one year
from the date the project is issued an occupancy permit by the local
permit issuing authority.
(9) "Person" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.030.
(10) "Qualified building or buildings" means construction of a new
structure or structures consistent with a high performance building
standard as defined in RCW 82.60.020, or expansion of an existing
structure or structures, consistent with a high performance building
standard as defined in RCW 82.60.020, to be used for corporate
headquarters. If a building is used partly for corporate headquarters
and partly for other purposes, the applicable tax deferral is
determined by apportionment of the costs of construction under rules
adopted by the department.
(11) "Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time
employee employed in the eligible investment project during the entire
tax year. The term "entire tax year" means a full-time position that
is filled for a period of twelve consecutive months. The term "full-time" means at least thirty-five hours a week, four hundred fifty-five
hours a quarter, or one thousand eight hundred twenty hours a year.
(12) "Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral under this
chapter.
(13) "Warehouse" means a building or structure, or any part
thereof, in which goods, wares, or merchandise are received for storage
for compensation.
(14) "Wholesale sale" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
82.04.060.

--- END ---