BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.29.025 and 2009 c 493 s 2 and 2009 c 3 s 14 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) For contributions assessed for rate years 2005 through 2009,
the contribution rate for each employer subject to contributions under
RCW 50.24.010 shall be the sum of the array calculation factor rate and
the graduated social cost factor rate determined under this subsection,
and the solvency surcharge determined under RCW 50.29.041, if any.
(a) The array calculation factor rate shall be determined as
follows:
(i) An array shall be prepared, listing all qualified employers in
ascending order of their benefit ratios. The array shall show for each
qualified employer: (A) Identification number; (B) benefit ratio; and
(C) taxable payrolls for the four consecutive calendar quarters
immediately preceding the computation date and reported to the
employment security department by the cut-off date.
(ii) Each employer in the array shall be assigned to one of forty
rate classes according to his or her benefit ratio as follows, and,
except as provided in RCW 50.29.026, the array calculation factor rate
for each employer in the array shall be the rate specified in the rate
class to which the employer has been assigned:

Benefit Ratio Rate
Class Rate
(percent)

At least Less than

0.000001 1 0.00

0.000001 0.001250 2 0.13

0.001250 0.002500 3 0.25

0.002500 0.003750 4 0.38

0.003750 0.005000 5 0.50

0.005000 0.006250 6 0.63

0.006250 0.007500 7 0.75

0.007500 0.008750 8 0.88

0.008750 0.010000 9 1.00

0.010000 0.011250 10 1.15

0.011250 0.012500 11 1.30

0.012500 0.013750 12 1.45

0.013750 0.015000 13 1.60

0.015000 0.016250 14 1.75

0.016250 0.017500 15 1.90

0.017500 0.018750 16 2.05

0.018750 0.020000 17 2.20

0.020000 0.021250 18 2.35

0.021250 0.022500 19 2.50

0.022500 0.023750 20 2.65

0.023750 0.025000 21 2.80

0.025000 0.026250 22 2.95

0.026250 0.027500 23 3.10

0.027500 0.028750 24 3.25

0.028750 0.030000 25 3.40

0.030000 0.031250 26 3.55

0.031250 0.032500 27 3.70

0.032500 0.033750 28 3.85

0.033750 0.035000 29 4.00

0.035000 0.036250 30 4.15

0.036250 0.037500 31 4.30

0.037500 0.040000 32 4.45

0.040000 0.042500 33 4.60

0.042500 0.045000 34 4.75

0.045000 0.047500 35 4.90

0.047500 0.050000 36 5.05

0.050000 0.052500 37 5.20

0.052500 0.055000 38 5.30

0.055000 0.057500 39 5.35

0.057500 40 5.40

(b) The graduated social cost factor rate shall be determined as
follows:
(i)(A) Except as provided in (b)(i)(B) and (C) of this subsection,
the commissioner shall calculate the flat social cost factor for a rate
year by dividing the total social cost by the total taxable payroll.
The division shall be carried to the second decimal place with the
remaining fraction disregarded unless it amounts to five hundredths or
more, in which case the second decimal place shall be rounded to the
next higher digit. The flat social cost factor shall be expressed as
a percentage.
(B) If, on the cut-off date, the balance in the unemployment
compensation fund is determined by the commissioner to be an amount
that will provide more than ten months of unemployment benefits, the
commissioner shall calculate the flat social cost factor for the rate
year immediately following the cut-off date by reducing the total
social cost by the dollar amount that represents the number of months
for which the balance in the unemployment compensation fund on the cut-off date will provide benefits above ten months and dividing the result
by the total taxable payroll. However, the calculation under this
subsection (1)(b)(i)(B) for a rate year may not result in a flat social
cost factor that is more than four-tenths lower than the calculation
under (b)(i)(A) of this subsection for that rate year.
For the purposes of this subsection, the commissioner shall
determine the number of months of unemployment benefits in the
unemployment compensation fund using the benefit cost rate for the
average of the three highest calendar benefit cost rates in the twenty
consecutive completed calendar years immediately preceding the cut-off
date or a period of consecutive calendar years immediately preceding
the cut-off date that includes three recessions, if longer.
(C) The minimum flat social cost factor calculated under this
subsection (1)(b) shall be six-tenths of one percent, except that if
the balance in the unemployment compensation fund is determined by the
commissioner to be an amount that will provide:
(I) At least twelve months but less than fourteen months of
unemployment benefits, the minimum shall be five-tenths of one percent;
or
(II) At least fourteen months of unemployment benefits, the minimum
shall be five-tenths of one percent, except that, for employers in rate
class 1, the minimum shall be forty-five hundredths of one percent.
(ii)(A) Except as provided in (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection, the
graduated social cost factor rate for each employer in the array is the
flat social cost factor multiplied by the percentage specified as
follows for the rate class to which the employer has been assigned in
(a)(ii) of this subsection, except that the sum of an employer's array
calculation factor rate and the graduated social cost factor rate may
not exceed six and five-tenths percent or, for employers whose North
American industry classification system code is within "111," "112,"
"1141," "115," "3114," "3117," "42448," or "49312," may not exceed six
percent through rate year 2007 and may not exceed five and seven-tenths
percent for rate years 2008 and 2009:
(I) Rate class 1 - 78 percent;
(II) Rate class 2 - 82 percent;
(III) Rate class 3 - 86 percent;
(IV) Rate class 4 - 90 percent;
(V) Rate class 5 - 94 percent;
(VI) Rate class 6 - 98 percent;
(VII) Rate class 7 - 102 percent;
(VIII) Rate class 8 - 106 percent;
(IX) Rate class 9 - 110 percent;
(X) Rate class 10 - 114 percent;
(XI) Rate class 11 - 118 percent; and
(XII) Rate classes 12 through 40 - 120 percent.
(B) For contributions assessed beginning July 1, 2005, through
December 31, 2007, for employers whose North American industry
classification system code is "111," "112," "1141," "115," "3114,"
"3117," "42448," or "49312," the graduated social cost factor rate is
zero.
(iii) For the purposes of this section:
(A) "Total social cost" means the amount calculated by subtracting
the array calculation factor contributions paid by all employers with
respect to the four consecutive calendar quarters immediately preceding
the computation date and paid to the employment security department by
the cut-off date from the total unemployment benefits paid to claimants
in the same four consecutive calendar quarters. To calculate the flat
social cost factor for rate year 2005, the commissioner shall calculate
the total social cost using the array calculation factor contributions
that would have been required to be paid by all employers in the
calculation period if (a) of this subsection had been in effect for the
relevant period. ((To calculate the flat social cost factor for rate
years 2010 and 2011, the forty-five dollar increase paid as part of an
individual's weekly benefit amount as provided in RCW 50.20.1201 shall
not be considered for purposes of calculating the total unemployment
benefits paid to claimants in the four consecutive calendar quarters
immediately preceding the computation date.))
(B) "Total taxable payroll" means the total amount of wages subject
to tax, as determined under RCW 50.24.010, for all employers in the
four consecutive calendar quarters immediately preceding the
computation date and reported to the employment security department by
the cut-off date.
(c) For employers who do not meet the definition of "qualified
employer" by reason of failure to pay contributions when due:
(i) The array calculation factor rate shall be two-tenths higher
than that in rate class 40, except employers who have an approved
agency-deferred payment contract by September 30th of the previous rate
year. If any employer with an approved agency-deferred payment
contract fails to make any one of the succeeding deferred payments or
fails to submit any succeeding tax report and payment in a timely
manner, the employer's tax rate shall immediately revert to an array
calculation factor rate two-tenths higher than that in rate class 40;
and
(ii) The social cost factor rate shall be the social cost factor
rate assigned to rate class 40 under (b)(ii) of this subsection.
(d) For all other employers not qualified to be in the array:
(i) For rate years 2005, 2006, and 2007:
(A) The array calculation factor rate shall be a rate equal to the
average industry array calculation factor rate as determined by the
commissioner, plus fifteen percent of that amount; however, the rate
may not be less than one percent or more than the array calculation
factor rate in rate class 40; and
(B) The social cost factor rate shall be a rate equal to the
average industry social cost factor rate as determined by the
commissioner, plus fifteen percent of that amount, but not more than
the social cost factor rate assigned to rate class 40 under (b)(ii) of
this subsection.
(ii) For contributions assessed for rate years 2008 and 2009:
(A) The array calculation factor rate shall be a rate equal to the
average industry array calculation factor rate as determined by the
commissioner, multiplied by the history factor, but not less than one
percent or more than the array calculation factor rate in rate class
40;
(B) The social cost factor rate shall be a rate equal to the
average industry social cost factor rate as determined by the
commissioner, multiplied by the history factor, but not more than the
social cost factor rate assigned to rate class 40 under (b)(ii) of this
subsection; and
(C) The history factor shall be based on the total amounts of
benefits charged and contributions paid in the three fiscal years
ending prior to the computation date by employers not qualified to be
in the array, other than employers in (c) of this subsection, who were
first subject to contributions in the calendar year ending three years
prior to the computation date. The commissioner shall calculate the
history ratio by dividing the total amount of benefits charged by the
total amount of contributions paid in this three-year period by these
employers. The division shall be carried to the second decimal place
with the remaining fraction disregarded unless it amounts to five
one-hundredths or more, in which case the second decimal place shall be
rounded to the next higher digit. The commissioner shall determine the
history factor according to the history ratio as follows:

History
Ratio History
Factor
(percent)

At least Less than

(I) .95 90

(II) .95 1.05 100

(III) 1.05 115

(2) For contributions assessed in rate year 2010 and thereafter,
the contribution rate for each employer subject to contributions under
RCW 50.24.010 shall be the sum of the array calculation factor rate and
the graduated social cost factor rate determined under this subsection,
and the solvency surcharge determined under RCW 50.29.041, if any.
(a) The array calculation factor rate shall be determined as
follows:
(i) An array shall be prepared, listing all qualified employers in
ascending order of their benefit ratios. The array shall show for each
qualified employer: (A) Identification number; (B) benefit ratio; and
(C) taxable payrolls for the four consecutive calendar quarters
immediately preceding the computation date and reported to the
employment security department by the cut-off date.
(ii) Each employer in the array shall be assigned to one of forty
rate classes according to his or her benefit ratio as follows, and,
except as provided in RCW 50.29.026, the array calculation factor rate
for each employer in the array shall be the rate specified in the rate
class to which the employer has been assigned:

Benefit Ratio Rate
Class Rate
(percent)

At least Less than

0.000001 1 0.00

0.000001 0.001250 2 0.11

0.001250 0.002500 3 0.22

0.002500 0.003750 4 0.33

0.003750 0.005000 5 0.43

0.005000 0.006250 6 0.54

0.006250 0.007500 7 0.65

0.007500 0.008750 8 0.76

0.008750 0.010000 9 0.88

0.010000 0.011250 10 1.01

0.011250 0.012500 11 1.14

0.012500 0.013750 12 1.28

0.013750 0.015000 13 1.41

0.015000 0.016250 14 1.54

0.016250 0.017500 15 1.67

0.017500 0.018750 16 1.80

0.018750 0.020000 17 1.94

0.020000 0.021250 18 2.07

0.021250 0.022500 19 2.20

0.022500 0.023750 20 2.38

0.023750 0.025000 21 2.50

0.025000 0.026250 22 2.63

0.026250 0.027500 23 2.75

0.027500 0.028750 24 2.88

0.028750 0.030000 25 3.00

0.030000 0.031250 26 3.13

0.031250 0.032500 27 3.25

0.032500 0.033750 28 3.38

0.033750 0.035000 29 3.50

0.035000 0.036250 30 3.63

0.036250 0.037500 31 3.75

0.037500 0.040000 32 4.00

0.040000 0.042500 33 4.25

0.042500 0.045000 34 4.50

0.045000 0.047500 35 4.75

0.047500 0.050000 36 5.00

0.050000 0.052500 37 5.15

0.052500 0.055000 38 5.25

0.055000 0.057500 39 5.30

0.057500 40 5.40

(b) The graduated social cost factor rate shall be determined as
follows:
(i)(A) Except as provided in (b)(i)(B) ((and)), (C), and (D) of
this subsection, the commissioner shall calculate the flat social cost
factor for a rate year by dividing the total social cost by the total
taxable payroll. The division shall be carried to the second decimal
place with the remaining fraction disregarded unless it amounts to five
hundredths or more, in which case the second decimal place shall be
rounded to the next higher digit. The flat social cost factor shall be
expressed as a percentage.
(B) If, on the cut-off date, the balance in the unemployment
compensation fund is determined by the commissioner to be an amount
that will provide more than ten months of unemployment benefits, the
commissioner shall calculate the flat social cost factor for the rate
year immediately following the cut-off date by reducing the total
social cost by the dollar amount that represents the number of months
for which the balance in the unemployment compensation fund on the cut-off date will provide benefits above ten months and dividing the result
by the total taxable payroll. However, the calculation under this
subsection (2)(b)(i)(B) for a rate year may not result in a flat social
cost factor that is more than four-tenths lower than the calculation
under (b)(i)(A) of this subsection for that rate year.
For the purposes of this subsection, the commissioner shall
determine the number of months of unemployment benefits in the
unemployment compensation fund using the benefit cost rate for the
average of the three highest calendar benefit cost rates in the twenty
consecutive completed calendar years immediately preceding the cut-off
date or a period of consecutive calendar years immediately preceding
the cut-off date that includes three recessions, if longer.
(C) The minimum flat social cost factor calculated under this
subsection (2)(b) shall be six-tenths of one percent, except that if
the balance in the unemployment compensation fund is determined by the
commissioner to be an amount that will provide:
(I) At least ten months but less than eleven months of unemployment
benefits, the minimum shall be five-tenths of one percent; or
(II) At least eleven months but less than twelve months of
unemployment benefits, the minimum shall be forty-five hundredths of
one percent; or
(III) At least twelve months but less than thirteen months of
unemployment benefits, the minimum shall be four-tenths of one percent;
or
(IV) At least thirteen months but less than fifteen months of
unemployment benefits, the minimum shall be thirty-five hundredths of
one percent; or
(V) At least fifteen months but less than seventeen months of
unemployment benefits, the minimum shall be twenty-five hundredths of
one percent; or
(VI) At least seventeen months but less than eighteen months of
unemployment benefits, the minimum shall be fifteen hundredths of one
percent; or
(VII) At least eighteen months of unemployment benefits, the
minimum shall be fifteen hundredths of one percent through rate year
2011 and shall be zero thereafter.
(D) For rate years 2011 and 2012, the commissioner shall exclude
from the total social cost calculation the total amount deducted in the
2010 rate year from all employers pursuant to (b)(iv) of this
subsection.
(ii) The graduated social cost factor rate for each employer in the
array is the flat social cost factor multiplied by the percentage
specified as follows for the rate class to which the employer has been
assigned in (a)(ii) of this subsection, except that the sum of an
employer's array calculation factor rate and the graduated social cost
factor rate may not exceed six percent or, for employers whose North
American industry classification system code is within "111," "112,"
"1141," "115," "3114," "3117," "42448," or "49312," may not exceed five
and four-tenths percent:
(A) Rate class 1 - 78 percent;
(B) Rate class 2 - 82 percent;
(C) Rate class 3 - 86 percent;
(D) Rate class 4 - 90 percent;
(E) Rate class 5 - 94 percent;
(F) Rate class 6 - 98 percent;
(G) Rate class 7 - 102 percent;
(H) Rate class 8 - 106 percent;
(I) Rate class 9 - 110 percent;
(J) Rate class 10 - 114 percent;
(K) Rate class 11 - 118 percent; and
(L) Rate classes 12 through 40 - 120 percent.
(iii) For the purposes of this section:
(A) "Total social cost" means the amount calculated by subtracting
the array calculation factor contributions paid by all employers with
respect to the four consecutive calendar quarters immediately preceding
the computation date and paid to the employment security department by
the cut-off date from the total unemployment benefits paid to claimants
in the same four consecutive calendar quarters. To calculate the flat
social cost factor for rate years 2010 and 2011, the forty-five dollar
increase paid as part of an individual's weekly benefit amount as
provided in RCW 50.20.1201 shall not be considered for purposes of
calculating the total unemployment benefits paid to claimants in the
four consecutive calendar quarters immediately preceding the
computation date.
(B) "Total taxable payroll" means the total amount of wages subject
to tax, as determined under RCW 50.24.010, for all employers in the
four consecutive calendar quarters immediately preceding the
computation date and reported to the employment security department by
the cut-off date.
(iv) For tax rate year 2010 collections, an amount equal to one-tenth of one percent of the graduated social cost factor rate of each
employer shall be deducted from the rate payment of the employer, if
the graduated social cost factor rate equals or exceeds one-tenth of
one percent, and that amount shall be deposited in the separate and
identifiable account in the administrative contingency fund in RCW
50.24.014(1)(a) for the purposes set forth in section 3 of this act.
(c) For employers who do not meet the definition of "qualified
employer" by reason of failure to pay contributions when due:
(i) The array calculation factor rate shall be two-tenths higher
than that in rate class 40, except employers who have an approved
agency-deferred payment contract by September 30th of the previous rate
year. If any employer with an approved agency-deferred payment
contract fails to make any one of the succeeding deferred payments or
fails to submit any succeeding tax report and payment in a timely
manner, the employer's tax rate shall immediately revert to an array
calculation factor rate two-tenths higher than that in rate class 40;
and
(ii) The social cost factor rate shall be the social cost factor
rate assigned to rate class 40 under (b)(ii) of this subsection. For
tax rate year 2010 collections, an amount equal to one-tenth of one
percent of the graduated social cost factor rate of each employer shall
be deducted from the rate payment of the employer, if the graduated
social cost factor rate equals or exceeds one-tenth of one percent, and
that amount shall be deposited in the separate and identifiable account
in the administrative contingency fund in RCW 50.24.014(1)(a) for the
purposes set forth in section 3 of this act.
(d) For all other employers not qualified to be in the array:
(i) The array calculation factor rate shall be a rate equal to the
average industry array calculation factor rate as determined by the
commissioner, multiplied by the history factor, but not less than one
percent or more than the array calculation factor rate in rate class
40;
(ii) The social cost factor rate shall be a rate equal to the
average industry social cost factor rate as determined by the
commissioner, multiplied by the history factor, but not more than the
social cost factor rate assigned to rate class 40 under (b)(ii) of this
subsection. For tax rate year 2010 collections, an amount equal to
one-tenth of one percent of the graduated social cost factor rate of
each employer shall be deducted from the rate payment of the employer,
if the graduated social cost factor rate equals or exceeds one-tenth of
one percent, and that amount shall be deposited in the separate and
identifiable account in the administrative contingency fund in RCW
50.24.014(1)(a) for the purposes set forth in section 3 of this act;
and
(iii) The history factor shall be based on the total amounts of
benefits charged and contributions paid in the three fiscal years
ending prior to the computation date by employers not qualified to be
in the array, other than employers in (c) of this subsection, who were
first subject to contributions in the calendar year ending three years
prior to the computation date. The commissioner shall calculate the
history ratio by dividing the total amount of benefits charged by the
total amount of contributions paid in this three-year period by these
employers. The division shall be carried to the second decimal place
with the remaining fraction disregarded unless it amounts to five
one-hundredths or more, in which case the second decimal place shall be
rounded to the next higher digit. The commissioner shall determine the
history factor according to the history ratio as follows:

History
Ratio History
Factor
(percent)

At least Less than

(A) .95 90

(B) .95 1.05 100

(C) 1.05 115

(3) Assignment of employers by the commissioner to industrial
classification, for purposes of this section, shall be in accordance
with established classification practices found in the North American
industry classification system code.

Sec. 2 RCW 50.24.014 and 2009 c 566 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A separate and identifiable account to provide for the
financing of special programs to assist the unemployed is established
in the administrative contingency fund. All money in this account
shall be expended solely for the purposes of this title and for no
other purposes whatsoever. Contributions to this account shall accrue
and become payable by each employer, except employers as described in
RCW 50.44.010 and 50.44.030 who have properly elected to make payments
in lieu of contributions, taxable local government employers as
described in RCW 50.44.035, and those employers who are required to
make payments in lieu of contributions, at a basic rate of two one-hundredths of one percent. The amount of wages subject to tax shall be
determined under RCW 50.24.010. Using the amount deposited for the
purposes of section 3 of this act, the account may also be used for the
administration and provision of workforce training grants under section
3 of this act until the funds from the deposit are expended or no later
than June 30, 2012. These funds shall not replace or supplant any
existing enrollments, programs, support services, or funding sources.
(b) A separate and identifiable account is established in the
administrative contingency fund for financing the employment security
department's administrative costs under RCW 50.22.150 and 50.22.155 and
the costs under RCW 50.22.150(11) and 50.22.155(14). All money in this
account shall be expended solely for the purposes of this title and for
no other purposes whatsoever. Contributions to this account shall
accrue and become payable by each employer, except employers as
described in RCW 50.44.010 and 50.44.030 who have properly elected to
make payments in lieu of contributions, taxable local government
employers as described in RCW 50.44.035, those employers who are
required to make payments in lieu of contributions, those employers
((described under)) not qualified to be in the array under RCW
50.29.025(((1)(f)(ii))) for reasons other than the failure to pay
contributions, and those qualified employers assigned rate class 20 or
rate class 40, as applicable, under RCW 50.29.025, at a basic rate of
one one-hundredth of one percent. The amount of wages subject to tax
shall be determined under RCW 50.24.010. Any amount of contributions
payable under this subsection (1)(b) that exceeds the amount that would
have been collected at a rate of four one-thousandths of one percent
must be deposited in the account created in (a) of this subsection.
(2)(a) Contributions under this section shall become due and be
paid by each employer under rules as the commissioner may prescribe,
and shall not be deducted, in whole or in part, from the remuneration
of individuals in the employ of the employer. Any deduction in
violation of this section is unlawful.
(b) In the payment of any contributions under this section, a
fractional part of a cent shall be disregarded unless it amounts to
one-half cent or more, in which case it shall be increased to one cent.
(3) If the commissioner determines that federal funding has been
increased to provide financing for the services specified in chapter
50.62 RCW, the commissioner shall direct that collection of
contributions under this section be terminated on the following January
1st.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 50.22 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to availability of funds appropriated or provided for
this specific purpose, workforce training grants are available to
eligible colleges to serve individuals who are eligible for or have
exhausted entitlement to unemployment compensation benefits and are
enrolled in a high demand training program.
(2) The state board for community and technical colleges shall
identify high demand training programs that are consistent with
workforce training priorities and based upon the comprehensive plan for
workforce training developed by the workforce training and education
coordinating board.
(3) The employment security department shall disburse funds for
workforce training grants to the state board for community and
technical colleges. The state board for community and technical
colleges shall review proposals submitted by eligible colleges and
award grants through a competitive process. Preference shall be given
to proposals emphasizing health care, aerospace, forestry industry, and
energy efficiency.
(4) Workforce training grants can be used for the following
purposes for individuals eligible under subsection (1) of this section:
Expenses related to educational and career counseling services,
training plan development, and referral to appropriate training
programs in high demand occupations; increased capacity at community
and technical colleges to make training programs in high demand
occupations available; financial aid for eligible students enrolled at
an institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 or an
educational institution as defined in RCW 28C.04.410; and job
development and referral services.
(5) Workforce training grants cannot be used to replace or supplant
any existing enrollments, programs, support services, or funding
sources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---