BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
INTENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 INTENT. (1) The legislature has adopted
planning goals through the growth management act, chapter 36.70A RCW,
to conserve productive forest and agricultural lands and discourage
incompatible uses, to encourage development in urban areas where
adequate public facilities and services exist or can be provided
efficiently, and to reduce sprawl, and in RCW 36.70A.090 has encouraged
the use of innovative land use management techniques, including the
transfer of development rights, to meet these planning goals.
(2) The legislature also has recognized in RCW 43.362.005 that
creation of a regional transfer of development rights marketplace in
central Puget Sound will assist in conserving rural, agricultural, and
forest land.
(3) The legislature finds that a regional transfer of development
rights marketplace is most urgently needed for conserving a subset of
these lands: Agricultural and forest land of long-term commercial
significance in the central Puget Sound where a rapid and increasing
loss of such lands is occurring. Transferring the development rights
from these lands of statewide importance to receiving cities in the
central Puget Sound will help keep them in farming and forestry.
Targeting a state program on conservation of agricultural and forest
land of long-term commercial significance, and not on rural lands in
general, will increase the likelihood that enough development rights
from these lands will be absorbed by receiving cities to secure the
conservation of sufficient acres of agricultural and forest land to
maintain a viable industry of farming and forestry in the central Puget
Sound. Counties and cities are encouraged to use all of the mechanisms
available to them under the growth management act and zoning laws to
conserve other rural lands, such as land whose conservation meets other
state and regionally adopted priorities.
(4) The legislature finds that such a central Puget Sound
marketplace will also encourage compact development while preventing
sprawl, thereby advancing state goals regarding climate change and
protection of Puget Sound. Transferring growth from agricultural and
forest land of long-term commercial significance will reduce costs to
the counties that otherwise would be responsible for the provision of
infrastructure and other services to development on these lands.
Transferring growth to urban areas where public facilities and services
exist or can be provided efficiently and cost-effectively will ensure
vibrant, economically viable communities. Directing growth to
communities where people can live close to where they work or have
access to transportation choices will reduce vehicle miles traveled,
reducing fuel consumption and emissions that contribute to climate
change. Directing growth to these communities will also help reduce
the impacts of storm water runoff to Puget Sound by reducing impervious
surfaces in watershed uplands.
(5) The legislature further finds that, to be successful, a
regional transfer of development rights marketplace in the central
Puget Sound specifically focused on agricultural and forest land of
long-term commercial significance must be accompanied by adequate
funding for development of public facilities and services within the
cities willing to accept these transferable development rights.
(6) Accordingly, the legislature finds that it is in the public
interest to invest in a regional transfer of development rights
marketplace in the central Puget Sound specifically focused on
agricultural and forest land of long-term commercial significance. The
legislature recognizes that the state as a whole benefits from
investment in public infrastructure that facilitates the transfer of
development from agricultural and forest lands of long-term commercial
significance into urban areas. Public infrastructure investment
stimulates business activity and helps create jobs, stimulates the
redevelopment of brown fields and blighted areas in urban areas, lowers
the cost of housing, and promotes efficient land use. The legislature
finds that these activities generate revenue for the state and that it
is in the public interest to invest in these projects through a credit
against the state sales and use tax to those local governments that can
demonstrate the expected returns to the state.

PART II
DEFINITIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Allocation rate" means the number of development rights per
parcel that a sending area landowner can sell for a given parcel under
the zoning in effect upon the effective date of this act.
(2) "Annual state contribution limit" means five million dollars
statewide per fiscal year.
(3) "Assessed value" means the valuation of taxable real property
as placed on the last completed assessment roll.
(4) "By-right permitting" means that project applications for
permits that use transferable development rights would be subject to
administrative review. Administrative review allows a local planning
official to approve a project without noticed public hearings.
(5) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(6) "Eligible county" means any county that borders Puget Sound,
that has a population of six hundred thousand or more, and that has an
established program for transfer of development rights.
(7) "Employment" means total employment in a county or city, as
applicable, estimated by the state office of financial management.
(8) "Exchange rate" means the development bonus or increment of
development beyond what base zoning allows that is assigned to a
development right for use in a receiving area.
(9) "Fiscal year" means the twelve-month period beginning July 1st
and ending the following June 30th.
(10) "Local conservation finance area" means the geographic area
identified by a sponsoring city, from which local sales and use tax
increments are estimated and property tax allocation revenues are
derived for local conservation area financing.
(11) "Local conservation area financing" means the use of revenues
from local public sources and from the local option sales and use tax
authorized in section 1001 of this act, in each case dedicated to pay
the principal and interest on bonds authorized under section 1101 of
this act or to pay public improvement costs within the local
conservation finance area.
(12) "Local government" means any incorporated city within an
eligible county.
(13) "Local property tax allocation revenue" means those tax
revenues derived from the receipt of regular property taxes levied on
the property tax allocation revenue value and used for local
conservation area financing.
(14) "Local sales and use tax increment" means the estimated annual
increase in local sales and use taxes as determined by the local
government in the calendar years following the approval of the local
conservation finance area by the department from taxable activity
within the local conservation finance area.
(15) "Local sales and use taxes" means local revenues derived from
the imposition of sales and use taxes authorized in RCW 82.14.030.
(16) "Ordinance" means any appropriate method of taking legislative
action by a local government or taxing district.
(17) "Participating local government" means any local government
and any eligible county having a local conservation finance area within
its geographic boundaries that has taken action as provided in section
801 of this act to allow the use of all or some of its local sales and
use tax increment or other revenues from local public sources dedicated
for local conservation area financing.
(18) "Participating taxing district" means a taxing district having
a local conservation finance area within its geographic boundaries.
(19) "Population" means the population of a city or county, as
applicable, estimated by the state office of financial management.
(20) "Property tax allocation revenue base value" means the
assessed value of real property located within a local conservation
finance area, less the property tax allocation revenue value.
(21)(a)(i) "Property tax allocation revenue value" means that
portion of any increase in the assessed value of real property in a
local conservation finance area equal to the sponsoring city ratio and
resulting from:
(A) The placement of new construction, improvements to property, or
both, on the assessment roll, where the new construction and
improvements are initiated after the local conservation finance area is
approved by the department;
(B) The cost of new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements, when the cost is treated as new
construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW as provided in RCW
84.14.020, and the new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements are initiated after the local conservation
finance area is approved by the department;
(C) The cost of rehabilitation of historic property, when the cost
is treated as new construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW as
provided in RCW 84.26.070, and the rehabilitation is initiated after
the local conservation finance area is approved by the department.
(ii) Increases in the assessed value of real property in a local
conservation finance area resulting from (a)(i)(A) through (C) of this
subsection are included in the property tax allocation revenue value in
the initial year. These same amounts are also included in the property
tax allocation revenue value in subsequent years unless the property
becomes exempt from property taxation.
(b) "Property tax allocation revenue value" includes that portion
equal to the sponsoring city ratio of any increase in the assessed
value of:
(i) New construction consisting of an entire building in the years
following the initial year, unless the building becomes exempt from
property taxation; and
(ii) Property developed using transferable development rights, as
defined in this section, unless the property becomes exempt from
property taxation.
(c) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, "property tax
allocation revenue value" does not include any increase in the assessed
value of real property after the initial year.
(d) There is no property tax allocation revenue value if the
assessed value of real property in a local conservation finance area
has not increased as a result of any of the reasons specified in
(a)(i)(A) through (C) of this subsection.
(e) For purposes of this subsection (21), "initial year" means:
(i) For new construction and improvements to property added to the
assessment roll, the year during which the new construction and
improvements are initially placed on the assessment roll;
(ii) For the cost of new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements, when the cost is treated as new
construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW, the year when the cost
is treated as new construction for purposes of levying taxes for
collection in the following year; and
(iii) For the cost of rehabilitation of historic property, when the
cost is treated as new construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW,
the year when such cost is treated as new construction for purposes of
levying taxes for collection in the following year.
(22) "Public improvement costs" means the costs of:
(a) Design, planning, acquisition, including land acquisition, site
preparation including land clearing, construction, reconstruction,
rehabilitation, improvement, and installation of public improvements;
(b) Demolishing, relocating, maintaining, and operating property
pending construction of public improvements;
(c) Relocating utilities as a result of public improvements;
(d) Financing public improvements, including capitalized interest
during construction and for up to six months following completion of
construction, legal and other professional services, taxes, insurance,
principal of and interest on bonds issued to finance public
improvements, and any necessary reserves for bonds issued to finance
public improvements; and
(e) Administrative expenses and feasibility studies reasonably
necessary and related to these costs, including related costs that may
have been incurred before adoption of the ordinance authorizing the
public improvements and the use of local conservation area financing to
fund the costs of the public improvements.
(23) "Public improvements" means:
(a) Infrastructure improvements within the local conservation
finance area that include:
(i) Street, road, bridge, and rail construction and maintenance;
(ii) Water and sewer system construction and improvements;
(iii) Sidewalks, streetlights, landscaping, and streetscaping;
(iv) Parking, terminal, and dock facilities;
(v) Park and ride facilities of a transit authority;
(vi) Park facilities, recreational areas, and environmental
remediation;
(vii) Storm water and drainage management systems;
(viii) Electric, gas, fiber, and other utility infrastructures; and
(b) Expenditures for facilities and improvements that support
affordable housing as defined in RCW 43.63A.510;
(ii) Providing maintenance and security for common or public areas
in the local conservation finance area; or
(iii) Historic preservation activities authorized under RCW
35.21.395.
(24) "Real property" has the same meaning as in RCW 84.04.090 and
also includes any privately owned improvements located on publicly
owned land that are subject to property taxation.
(25) "Receiving areas" are those lands within and designated by a
receiving city in which transferable development rights from sending
areas may be used.
(26) "Receiving city" means any incorporated city with population
plus employment equal to twenty-two thousand five hundred or greater
within an eligible county.
(27) "Receiving city allocated share" means the total number of
transferable development rights from agricultural and forest land of
long-term commercial significance within the eligible counties
allocated to a receiving city under section 304(1) of this act, as
updated under section 304(2) of this act.
(28) "Regular property taxes" means regular property taxes as
defined in RCW 84.04.140, except: (a) Regular property taxes levied by
public utility districts specifically for the purpose of making
required payments of principal and interest on general indebtedness;
(b) regular property taxes levied by the state for the support of
common schools under RCW 84.52.065; and (c) regular property taxes
authorized by RCW 84.55.050 that are limited to a specific purpose.
"Regular property taxes" do not include excess property tax levies that
are exempt from the aggregate limits for junior and senior taxing
districts as provided in RCW 84.52.043.
(29)(a) "Revenues from local public sources" means:
(i) The local sales and use tax amounts received as a result of
interlocal agreement, local sales and use tax amounts from
participating local governments based on its local sales and use tax
increment, and local property tax allocation revenues, which are
dedicated by a sponsoring city, participating local governments, and
participating taxing districts, to pay principal of and interest on
bonds issued under section 1101 of this act or to pay public
improvement costs within the local conservation finance area; and
(ii) Any other local revenues, except as provided in (b) of this
subsection, including revenues derived from federal and private
sources, which are dedicated to pay principal of and interest on bonds
issued under section 1101 of this act or to pay public improvement
costs within the local conservation finance area.
(b) Revenues from local public sources do not include any local
funds derived from state grants, state loans, or any other state moneys
including any local sales and use taxes credited against the state
sales and use taxes imposed under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW.
(30) "Sending areas" means those lands within an eligible county
that meet conservation criteria as described in section 301 of this
act.
(31) "Sponsoring city" means a receiving city that accepts all or
a portion of its receiving city allocated share, adopts a plan for
development of adequate infrastructure within receiving areas in
accordance with section 401 of this act, adopts a program in accordance
with section 402 of this act for transfer of development rights, and
creates one or more local conservation finance areas, all as specified
in section 304(3) of this act.
(32) "Sponsoring city allocated share" means the total number of
transferable development rights from agricultural and forest land of
long-term commercial significance within the eligible counties
allocated to the sponsoring city under section 304(1) of this act, as
updated under section 304(2) of this act, plus the total number of
transferable development rights transferred to the sponsoring city from
another receiving city under section 304(4) of this act.
(33) "Sponsoring city ratio" means the sponsoring city specified
portion divided by the sponsoring city allocated share multiplied by
three-fourths; provided that no sponsoring city ratio shall apply until
the sponsoring city has issued permits for properties within one or
more local conservation finance areas that, on an aggregate basis, use
development rights representing at least twenty-five percent of the
sponsoring city specified portion. The sponsoring city ratio may be
increased from time to time to reflect increases in the sponsoring city
specified portion by the sponsoring city under section 401 of this act;
provided that no increase in the sponsoring city ratio may apply until
the sponsoring city has issued permits for properties within one or
more local conservation finance areas that, on an aggregate basis, use
development rights representing at least twenty-five percent of the
increased sponsoring city specified portion.
(34) "Sponsoring city specified portion" means all or the portion
of a sponsoring city allocated share to be accommodated within one or
more local conservation finance areas, as set forth in the sponsoring
city's plan for development of adequate infrastructure within receiving
areas under section 401 of this act, as may be amended as provided in
section 401 of this act.
(35) "State contribution" means the lesser of:
(a) Five hundred thousand dollars;
(b) The project award amount approved by the department based on
the sponsoring city specified portion; or
(c) The total amount of revenues from local public sources
dedicated in the preceding calendar year to pay principal of and
interest on bonds issued under section 1101 of this act or to pay
public improvement costs within the local conservation finance area.
Revenues from local public sources dedicated in the preceding calendar
year that are in excess of the project award may be carried forward and
used in later years for the purpose of this subsection (35)(c).
(36) "State property tax increment" means the estimated amount of
annual tax revenues estimated to be received by the state from the
imposition of property taxes levied by the state for the support of
common schools under RCW 84.52.065 on the property tax allocation
revenue value, as determined by the sponsoring city in an application
under section 901 of this act and updated periodically as required in
section 902 of this act.
(37) "State sales and use tax increment" means the estimated amount
of annual increase in state sales and use taxes to be received by the
state from taxable activity within the local conservation finance area
in the years following the approval of the local conservation finance
area by the department as determined by the sponsoring city in an
application under section 901 of this act and updated periodically as
required in section 902 of this act.
(38) "State sales and use taxes" means state retail sales and use
taxes under RCW 82.08.020(1) and 82.12.020 at the rate provided in RCW
82.08.020(1), less the amount of tax distributions from all local
retail sales and use taxes, other than the local sales and use taxes
authorized by section 1001 of this act for the applicable local
conservation finance area, imposed on the same taxable events that are
credited against the state retail sales and use taxes under RCW
82.08.020(1) and 82.12.020.
(39) "Taxing district" means any city, county, or port that levies
or has levied for it regular property taxes upon real property located
within a proposed or approved local conservation finance area.
(40) "Transfer of development rights" includes methods for
protecting land from development by voluntarily removing the
development rights from a sending area and transferring them to one or
more receiving areas for the purpose of increasing development density
or intensity in the receiving area.
(41) "Transferable development rights" means a right to develop one
or more residential units in a sending area that can be sold and
transferred for use consistent with an exchange rate for development in
a designated receiving area consistent with this act.

PART III
SENDING AREAS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 DESIGNATION OF SENDING AREAS--INCLUSION OF
AGRICULTURAL AND FOREST LAND OF LONG-TERM COMMERCIAL SIGNIFICANCE. An
eligible county must designate all agricultural and forest land of
long-term commercial significance within its jurisdiction as sending
areas for conservation under the eligible county's program for transfer
of development rights. The development rights from all such
agricultural and forest land of long-term commercial significance
within the eligible counties must be available for transfer to
receiving cities under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 DEVELOPMENT RIGHTS FROM AGRICULTURAL AND
FOREST LAND OF LONG-TERM COMMERCIAL SIGNIFICANCE. (1) The number of
development rights from agricultural and forest land of long-term
commercial significance under land use or zoning classifications in
effect as of the effective date of this act that a sending site within
a sending area is eligible to send to a receiving site under this act
must be determined by the eligible county under its program for
transfer of development rights as of the effective date of this act.
(2) The number of development rights includes the development
rights from agricultural and forest lands of long-term commercial
significance that have been previously issued by the eligible county as
transferable development rights but that have not as yet been
transferred to a receiving area under the eligible county's program for
transfer of development rights as of the effective date of this act.
(3) The number of development rights do not include development
rights from agricultural and forest lands of long-term commercial
significance that have previously been removed or extinguished, such as
through an existing conservation easement, except where the development
rights have been specifically issued by the eligible county as
transferable development rights as of the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 DETERMINATION OF TOTAL NUMBER OF
DEVELOPMENT RIGHTS FOR AGRICULTURAL AND FOREST LAND OF LONG-TERM
COMMERCIAL SIGNIFICANCE. (1) On or before September 1, 2010, each
eligible county must report to the Puget Sound regional council the
total number of development rights from agricultural and forest land of
long-term commercial significance within the eligible county that may
be available for allocation to receiving cities under this act, as
determined under section 302 of this act.
(2) On or before September 1, 2017, and September 1, 2024, each
eligible county must report to the Puget Sound regional council an
updated total number of development rights from agricultural and forest
land of long-term commercial significance within the eligible county
under land use or zoning classifications in effect as of the effective
date of this act that still may be available for allocation to
receiving cities under this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 ALLOCATION AMONG LOCAL GOVERNMENTS OF
DEVELOPMENT RIGHTS FROM AGRICULTURAL AND FOREST LAND OF LONG-TERM
COMMERCIAL SIGNIFICANCE. (1) The department of commerce must work with
the Puget Sound regional council to allocate among receiving cities the
total number of development rights reported by eligible counties under
section 303 of this act. Each receiving city allocated share must be
determined by the Puget Sound regional council, in consultation with
eligible counties and receiving cities, based on factors such as actual
and projected population growth.
(2) The department of commerce, working with the Puget Sound
regional council, must report to each receiving city its receiving city
allocated share on or before March 1, 2011, and must provide updated
receiving city allocated shares to each receiving city on or before
March 1, 2018, and March 1, 2025.
(3) A receiving city may become a sponsoring city by accepting all
or a portion of its receiving city allocated share, and adopting a plan
in accordance with section 401 of this act for development of adequate
infrastructure within one or more receiving areas, or portions thereof,
within the receiving city sufficient to accommodate its sponsoring city
specified portion, adopting a program in accordance with section 402 of
this act for transfer of the development rights into the receiving area
or receiving areas, and adopting one or more local conservation finance
areas within the limitations in section 603 of this act and in
accordance with sections 601 and 602 of this act to pay for the public
improvements.
(4) A receiving city may, by interlocal agreement, transfer all or
a portion of its receiving city allocated share to a sponsoring city.
The transferred portion of the receiving city allocated share must be
included in the sponsoring city allocated share for the purposes of
sections 701 and 901 of this act.

PART IV
RECEIVING AREAS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 DEVELOPMENT PLAN FOR ADEQUATE
INFRASTRUCTURE. (1) Before adopting an ordinance creating one or more
local conservation finance areas under section 602 of this act, a
sponsoring city must adopt a plan for development of adequate
infrastructure within one or more receiving areas, or portions thereof,
within one or more local conservation finance areas sufficient to
accommodate, on an aggregate basis, all of the sponsoring city
allocated share or a specified portion equal to or greater than twenty
percent of the sponsoring city allocated share, in each case over a
specified time period not to exceed ten years following creation of the
local conservation finance area or areas.
(2) The plan must be developed in consultation with taxing
districts within the local conservation finance areas to be created, be
consistent with the transfer of development rights policies or
development regulations adopted by the sponsoring city under section
402 of this act, specify the public improvements to be financed using
local conservation area financing under section 601 of this act,
estimate the number of development rights that will be used within the
local conservation finance areas to be created, and estimate the cost
of the public improvements.
(3) A plan adopted under this section may be revised by the
sponsoring city, in consultation with the taxing districts within the
local conservation finance areas, to increase the sponsoring city
specified portion or to account for updated receiving city allocated
shares pursuant to section 304(2) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 PROGRAM FOR TRANSFER OF DEVELOPMENT RIGHTS
INTO RECEIVING AREAS--REQUIREMENTS. (1) Before adopting an ordinance
creating one or more local conservation finance areas under section 601
of this act, a sponsoring city must adopt transfer of development
rights policies or implement development regulations that:
(a) Comply with chapter 36.70A RCW;
(b) Designate one or more receiving areas;
(c) Adopt permitting or environmental review incentives for
developers to participate consistent with subsection (2) of this
section;
(d) Adopt an exchange rate;
(e) Are not based upon downzone(s) within one or more receiving
areas solely to create a market for the transferable development
rights; and
(f) Require that the sale of a development right from agricultural
or forest land of long-term commercial significance be evidenced by its
current or prior removal or extinguishment from the sending site, such
as through a conservation easement on the sending site.
(2) Developer incentives should be designed to:
(a) Accommodate the densities or intensities reasonably likely to
result from absorption of the sponsoring city specified portion
identified in the plan under section 401 of this act;
(b) Include streamlined permitting strategies such as by-right
permitting;
(c) Include streamlined environmental review strategies such as
development and substantial environmental review of a subarea plan for
a receiving area that benefits projects that use transferable
development rights, adoption of a categorical exemption for infill
under RCW 43.21C.229 for a receiving area, and adoption of a planned
action under RCW 43.21C.031 for the receiving area; and
(d) Each sponsoring city may determine, at its option, what
developer incentives to adopt within its jurisdiction.
(3) Exchange rates should be designed to:
(a) Create a marketplace in which development rights are priced at
a level at which sending site landowners are willing to sell and
receiving site developers are willing to buy development rights;
(b) Accommodate the densities or intensities reasonably likely to
result from absorption of the sponsoring city specified portion
identified in the plan under section 401 of this act;
(c) Allow for translation to commodities other than residential
density, such as building height, commercial floor area, parking ratio,
impervious surface, parkland and open space, setbacks, floor area
ratio, and carbon offsets;
(d) Allow for exemptions from other land use or building
requirements; and
(e) Be flexible, allowing modification on a project-by-project
basis.
(4) A sponsoring city must designate all agricultural and forest
land of long-term commercial significance within the eligible counties
as available sending areas for conservation from which it may receive
transferable development rights to be used in its designated receiving
area(s).
(5) A sponsoring city, in accordance with its existing
comprehensive planning and development regulation authority under
chapter 36.70A RCW, and in accordance with section 1201 of this act,
may elect to adopt an optional comprehensive plan element and optional
development regulations that apply within one or more receiving areas
that are, or that are intended to become local conservation finance
areas under this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 DEVELOPMENT RIGHTS AVAILABLE FOR TRANSFER
TO RECEIVING CITIES. Only development rights from agricultural and
forest land of long-term commercial significance within the eligible
counties, as determined under section 302 of this act and reported
under section 303 of this act, may be available for transfer to
receiving cities in accordance with this act.

PART V
TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE AND QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE
PERFORMANCE MEASURES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE. Subject to the
availability of funds appropriated for this specific purpose or other
source of funding made available for this specific purpose, the
department of commerce must provide the technical assistance described
in RCW 43.362.030(4) to implement the regional transfer of development
rights program under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE PERFORMANCE
MEASURES--REPORTING--POSTING ON WEB SITE. The department of commerce
must develop quantitative and qualitative performance measures for
monitoring the regional transfer of development rights program under
this chapter. The performance measures may address conservation of
agricultural and forest land of long-term commercial significance
within the eligible counties and creation of compact communities within
the receiving cities, as well as other measures identified by the
department. The department of commerce may require eligible counties
and sponsoring cities to report on these performance measures
biannually. The department of commerce must compile any performance
measure information that has been reported by the eligible counties and
sponsoring cities and post it on its web site.

PART VI
ESTABLISHMENT OF LOCAL CONSERVATION FINANCE AREAS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 CONDITIONS. A sponsoring city may finance
public improvements using local conservation area financing subject to
the following conditions:
(1) The sponsoring city has adopted an ordinance designating one or
more local conservation finance areas within its boundaries and
specified the public improvements proposed to be financed in whole or
in part with the use of local conservation area financing;
(2) The public improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in
part using local conservation area financing are expected to encourage
private development within the applicable local conservation finance
area, to increase the fair market value of real property within the
applicable local conservation finance area, and are identified in the
plan under section 401 of this act;
(3) The sponsoring city:
(a) Has entered into a contract with a private developer that owns
or has an option to purchase transferable development rights; or
(b) Has received a letter of intent from a private developer that
owns or has an option to purchase transferable development rights,
which contract or letter of intent relates to the developer's plans for
the development of private improvements within the applicable local
conservation finance area;
(4) The sponsoring city may not use local conservation area
financing to finance the costs associated with the financing, design,
acquisition, construction, equipping, operating, maintaining,
remodeling, repairing, and reequipping of public facilities funded with
taxes collected under RCW 82.14.048 or 82.14.390;
(5) The governing body of the sponsoring city must make findings
that local conservation area financing:
(a) Will not be used for the purpose of relocating a business from
outside the local conservation finance area, but within this state,
into the local conservation finance area unless convincing evidence is
provided that the firm being relocated would otherwise leave the state;
(b) Will improve the viability of existing business entities within
the local conservation finance area; and
(c) Will be used exclusively in areas within the jurisdiction of
the sponsoring city deemed in need of either economic development or
redevelopment, or both, and absent the financing available under this
act the proposed economic development or redevelopment would more than
likely not occur; and
(6) The governing body of the sponsoring city finds that the public
improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in part using local
conservation area financing are reasonably likely to:
(a) Increase private investment within the local conservation
finance area;
(b) Increase employment within the local conservation finance area;
(c) Result in the use within the local conservation finance areas
of the sponsoring city specified portion identified in the plan under
section 401 of this act; and
(d) Generate, over the period of time that the local sales and use
tax will be imposed under section 1001 of this act, increases in state
and local property, sales, and use tax revenues that are equal to or
greater than the respective state and local contributions made under
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 CREATING A LOCAL CONSERVATION FINANCE
AREA. (1) Before adopting an ordinance creating one or more local
conservation finance areas, a sponsoring city must:
(a) Provide notice to all taxing districts and local governments
with geographic boundaries within the proposed local conservation
finance areas of the sponsoring city's intent to create one or more
local conservation finance areas. Notice must be provided in writing
to the governing body of the taxing districts and local governments at
least one hundred twenty days in advance of the public hearing as
required by (b) of this subsection. The notice must include at least
the following information:
(i) The name of the proposed local conservation finance areas;
(ii) The date for the public hearing as required by (b) of this
subsection;
(iii) The earliest anticipated date when the sponsoring city will
take action to adopt the proposed local conservation finance areas;
(iv) Whether the sponsoring city expects to issue bonds pursuant to
section 1101 of this act and, if so, the estimated principal amount of
the bonds; and
(v) The name of a contact person with the phone number of the
sponsoring city and mailing address where a copy of an ordinance
adopted under section 604 or 605 of this act may be sent; and
(b) Hold a public hearing on the proposed financing of the public
improvements in whole or in part with local conservation area
financing. Notice of the public hearing must be published in a
newspaper of general circulation within the proposed local conservation
finance areas at least ten days before the public hearing and posted in
at least six conspicuous public places located in each proposed local
conservation finance area. Notices must describe the contemplated
public improvements, estimate the costs of the public improvements,
describe the portion of the costs of the public improvements to be
borne by local conservation area financing, describe any other sources
of revenue to finance the public improvements, describe the boundaries
of the proposed local conservation finance areas, and estimate the
period during which local conservation area financing is contemplated
to be used. The public hearing may be held by either the governing
body of the sponsoring city, or a committee of the governing body that
includes at least a majority of the whole governing body.
(2) To create one or more local conservation finance areas, a
sponsoring city must adopt an ordinance that:
(a) Includes within each local conservation finance area all or a
portion of one or more receiving areas for transferable development
rights;
(b) Describes the public improvements proposed to be made in each
local conservation finance area;
(c) Describes the boundaries of each local conservation finance
area, subject to the limitations in section 603 of this act;
(d) Estimates the cost of the proposed public improvements and the
portion of these costs to be financed by local conservation area
financing;
(e) Estimates the time during which local property tax allocation
revenues, and other revenues from local public sources, such as amounts
of local sales and use taxes from participating local governments, are
to be used for local conservation area financing;
(f) Provides the date when the use of local property tax allocation
revenues will commence;
(g) Provides the anticipated rate of sales and use tax under
section 1001 of this act that the local government will impose if
awarded a state contribution under this act; and
(h) Provides the anticipated date when the sales and use tax in
section 1001 of this act will be imposed.
(3) The sponsoring city must deliver a certified copy of the
adopted ordinance to the county treasurer, the governing body of each
participating taxing authority and participating taxing district within
which the local conservation finance area is located, and the
department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 LIMITATIONS ON LOCAL CONSERVATION FINANCE
AREAS. The designation of any local conservation finance area is
subject to the following limitations:
(1) A local conservation finance area is limited to contiguous
tracts, lots, pieces, or parcels of land without the creation of
islands of property not included in the local conservation finance
area;
(2) The boundaries may not be drawn to purposely exclude parcels
where economic growth is unlikely to occur;
(3) The public improvements paid with local conservation area
financing must be located in the local conservation finance area;
(4) All local conservation finance areas created by a sponsoring
city cannot, in the aggregate, comprise an area containing more than
twenty-five percent of the total assessed value of the taxable real
property within the boundaries of the sponsoring city at the time the
local conservation finance areas are created;
(5) The boundaries of each local conservation finance area may not
be changed for the time period that local property tax allocation
revenues, local sales and use taxes of participating local governments,
and the local sales and use tax under section 1001 of this act are used
to pay the principal of and interest on bonds issued under section 1101
of this act or public improvement costs within the local conservation
finance area, as provided under this chapter;
(6) Each local conservation finance area must be geographically
restricted to the location of the public improvement and adjacent
locations that the sponsoring city finds to have a high likelihood of
receiving direct positive business and economic impacts due to the
public improvement, such as an urban center, areas designated for
transit-oriented development, a neighborhood, or a block; and
(7) All local conservation finance areas created by the sponsoring
city must comprise, in the aggregate, an area that the sponsoring city
determines (a) is sufficient to accommodate the sponsoring city
specified portion, and (b) is no larger than reasonably necessary to
accommodate the sponsoring city specified portion, within the context
of the overall development planned for such area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 PARTICIPATING TAXING DISTRICTS. Taxing
districts must allow the use of all of their local property tax
allocation revenues for local conservation area financing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605 OPTING IN OR OUT AS A PARTICIPATING LOCAL
GOVERNMENT. (1) A local government or eligible county that has not
opted out of the local conservation financing area pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section must enter into an interlocal agreement
as provided in chapter 39.34 RCW to participate in local conservation
area financing with the sponsoring city.
(2)(a) If a local government or an eligible county that imposes a
sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030 does not want to participate in
the local conservation area financing of public improvements in a local
conservation finance area, its governing body must adopt an ordinance
and notify the sponsoring city that the local government or eligible
county will not be a participating local government.
(b) The local government or eligible county must provide a copy of
the adopted ordinance and the notice to the sponsoring city creating
the local conservation finance area before the anticipated date that
the sponsoring city proposes to adopt an ordinance creating the local
conservation finance area as provided in the notice required by section
602 of this act.

PART VII
LOCAL CONSERVATION AREA FINANCING
USE OF LOCAL PROPERTY TAX ALLOCATION REVENUES TO PAY FOR
THE COST OF PUBLIC IMPROVEMENTS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 LOCAL PROPERTY TAX ALLOCATION REVENUES.
(1) Commencing in the second calendar year following the date on which
the sponsoring city certifies to the county treasurer that a sponsoring
city ratio applies, the county treasurer must distribute receipts from
regular taxes imposed on real property located in the local
conservation finance area as follows:
(a) Each participating taxing district and the sponsoring city must
receive that portion of its regular property taxes produced by the rate
of tax levied by or for the taxing district on the property tax
allocation revenue base value for that local conservation area
financing project in the taxing district; and
(b) The sponsoring city must receive an additional portion of the
regular property taxes levied by it and by or for each participating
taxing district upon the property tax allocation revenue value within
the local conservation finance area. However, if there is no property
tax allocation revenue value, the sponsoring city may not receive any
additional regular property taxes under this subsection (1)(b). The
sponsoring city may agree to receive less than the full amount of the
additional portion of regular property taxes under this subsection
(1)(b) as long as bond debt service, reserve, and other bond covenant
requirements are satisfied, in which case the balance of these tax
receipts must be allocated to the participating taxing districts that
levied regular property taxes, or have regular property taxes levied
for them, in the local conservation finance area for collection that
year in proportion to their regular tax levy rates for collection that
year. The sponsoring city may request that the county treasurer
transfer this additional portion of the property taxes to its
designated agent. The sponsoring city must notify the county treasurer
of any increase in the sponsoring city ratio at least one hundred
eighty days prior to the first full calendar year for which the
increased sponsoring city ratio will be used to calculate the property
tax allocation revenue value. The portion of the tax receipts
distributed to the sponsoring city or its agent under this subsection
(1) (b) may only be expended to finance public improvement costs
associated with the public improvements financed in whole or in part by
local conservation area financing.
(2) The county assessor must determine the property tax allocation
revenue value and property tax allocation revenue base value. This
section does not authorize revaluations of real property by the
assessor for property taxation that are not made in accordance with the
assessor's revaluation plan under chapter 84.41 RCW or under other
authorized revaluation procedures.
(3) The distribution of local property tax allocation revenue to
the sponsoring city must cease when local property tax allocation
revenues are no longer obligated to pay the costs of the public
improvements. Any excess local property tax allocation revenues, and
earnings on the revenues, remaining at the time the distribution of
local property tax allocation revenue terminates, must be returned to
the county treasurer and distributed to the participating taxing
districts that imposed regular property taxes, or had regular property
taxes imposed for it, in the local conservation finance area for
collection that year, in proportion to the rates of their regular
property tax levies for collection that year.
(4) The allocation to the local conservation finance area of that
portion of the sponsoring city's and each participating taxing
district's regular property taxes levied upon the property tax
allocation revenue value within that local conservation finance area is
declared to be a public purpose of and benefit to the sponsoring city
and each participating taxing district.
(5) The distribution of local property tax allocation revenues
under this section may not affect or be deemed to affect the rate of
taxes levied by or within any sponsoring city and participating taxing
district or the consistency of any such levies with the uniformity
requirement of Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution.

Sec. 702 RCW 84.55.010 and 2006 c 184 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as provided in this chapter, the levy for a taxing district
in any year ((shall)) must be set so that the regular property taxes
payable in the following year ((shall)) may not exceed the limit factor
multiplied by the amount of regular property taxes lawfully levied for
((such)) the district in the highest of the three most recent years in
which ((such)) the taxes were levied for ((such)) the district plus an
additional dollar amount calculated by multiplying the increase in
assessed value in that district resulting from new construction,
increases in assessed value due to construction of electric generation
wind turbine facilities classified as personal property, improvements
to property, and any increase in the assessed value of state-assessed
property or property within any local conservation finance area, as
defined in section 201 of this act, in each case by the regular
property tax levy rate of that district for the preceding year.

PART VIII
LOCAL CONSERVATION AREA FINANCING
USE OF LOCAL SALES AND USE TAX INCREMENTS TO PAY FOR
THE COST OF PUBLIC IMPROVEMENTS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 LOCAL SALES AND USE TAX INCREMENTS. (1)
A participating local government may use annually local sales and use
tax amounts equal to some or all of its local sales and use tax
increments to finance public improvements in the local conservation
finance area. The amounts of local sales and use tax dedicated by a
participating local government must begin and cease on the dates
specified in an interlocal agreement authorized in chapter 39.34 RCW.
Sponsoring cities and participating local governments are authorized to
allocate some or all of their local sales and use tax increment to the
sponsoring city as provided by section 605 of this act.
(2) The department, upon request, must assist sponsoring cities in
estimating sales and use tax revenues from estimated taxable activity
in the proposed or adopted local conservation finance area. The
sponsoring city must provide the department with accurate information
describing the geographical boundaries of the local conservation
finance area in an electronic format or in a manner as otherwise
prescribed by the department.

PART IX
LOCAL CONSERVATION AREA FINANCING--STATE CONTRIBUTION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 APPLICATION PROCESS--DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
APPROVAL. (1) Prior to applying to the department to receive a state
contribution for one or more local conservation finance areas, a
sponsoring city must develop a plan in accordance with section 401 of
this act and adopt the local conservation finance areas within the
limitations in section 603 of this act and in accordance with sections
601 and 602 of this act.
(2)(a) As a condition to imposing a sales and use tax under section
1001 of this act, a sponsoring city must apply to the department and be
approved for a project award amount. The application must be in a form
and manner prescribed by the department and include, but not be limited
to:
(i) Information establishing that over the period of time that the
local sales and use tax will be imposed under section 1001 of this act,
increases in state and local property, sales, and use tax revenues as
a result of public improvements in the local conservation finance area
will be equal to or greater than the respective state and local
contributions made under this chapter;
(ii) Information demonstrating that the sponsoring city will meet
the requirements necessary to receive the full amount of state
contribution it is requesting on an annual basis;
(iii) The amount of state contribution it is requesting;
(iv) The anticipated effective date for imposing the tax under
section 1001 of this act;
(v) The estimated number of years that the tax will be imposed;
(vi) The anticipated rate of tax to be imposed under section 1001
of this act should the sponsoring city be approved for a project award;
and
(vii) The anticipated date when any bonds under section 1101 of
this act will be issued.
(b) The department must make available electronic forms to be used
for this purpose. As part of the application, each applicant must
provide to the department a copy of the plan for development of
adequate infrastructure within receiving areas developed under section
401 of this act, a copy of the adopted ordinance creating one or more
local conservation finance areas as required in section 601 of this
act, and copies of any adopted interlocal agreements from participating
local governments.
(3)(a) Project awards will be made to sponsoring cities that submit
an application within a sixty-day application period designated by the
department and whose application includes a plan developed under
section 401 of this act that the department determines can reasonably
be expected to result in use of the sponsoring city specified portion
within the time period set forth therein.
(b) The total of all project awards may not exceed the annual state
contribution limit.
(c) If the level of available state contribution is less than the
amount requested by applicants meeting the requirements set forth in
(a) of this subsection, the amount of each project award will be
adjusted so that the annual state contribution is allocated on a pro
rata basis among all applicants meeting the requirements set forth in
(a) of this subsection based on their then respective sponsoring city
specified portions.
(d) If the annual contribution limit is increased or if project
award amounts are recaptured under subsection (6) of this section,
applications will be accepted again during a sixty-day application
period beginning sixty days after the effective date of the increase or
recapture of project award amounts. The increased annual contribution
limit or recaptured project awards will be allocated on a pro rata
basis among all applicants meeting the requirements set forth in (a) of
this subsection based on their then respective sponsoring city
specified portions, taking into account any previous allocation of
state contribution to the sponsoring city.
(4) The department must notify the sponsoring city of approval or
denial of a project award within sixty days of the department's receipt
of the sponsoring city's application. Determination of a project award
by the department is final. Notification must include the earliest
date when the tax authorized under section 1001 of this act may be
imposed, subject to conditions in chapter 82.14 RCW. The project award
notification must specify the rate requested in the application and any
adjustments to the rate that would need to be made based on the project
award.
(5) The department must begin accepting applications September 1,
2011.
(6) If a sponsoring city receiving a project award in 2011 has not
imposed a tax authorized under section 1001 of this act by September 1,
2018, the project award to such sponsoring city will be recaptured and
become available for reallocation to sponsoring cities pursuant to
subsection (3)(d) of this section. If a sponsoring city receiving a
project award in 2018 has not imposed a tax authorized under section
1001 of this act by September 1, 2025, the project award to such
sponsoring city will be recaptured and become available for
reallocation to sponsoring cities pursuant to subsection (3)(d) of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
REPORTING REQUIREMENTS. (1) A sponsoring city receiving a project
award under section 901 of this act must provide a report to the
department by March 1st of each year beginning March 1st after the
project award has been approved. The report must contain the following
information:
(a) The amounts of local property tax allocation revenues received
in the preceding calendar year broken down by sponsoring city and
participating taxing district;
(b) The amount of state property tax allocation revenues estimated
to have been received by the state in the preceding calendar year;
(c) Revenue from local public sources dedicated by any
participating local government to pay the principal of or interest on
bonds issued under section 1101 of this act or to pay public
improvement costs within the local conservation finance area in the
preceding calendar year;
(d) The anticipated date when any bonds under section 1101 of this
act are expected to be retired;
(e) The names of any businesses locating within the local
conservation finance area as a result of the public improvements
undertaken by the sponsoring city and financed in whole or in part with
local conservation area financing;
(f) An estimate of the cumulative number of permanent jobs created
in the local conservation finance area as a result of the public
improvements undertaken by the sponsoring city and financed in whole or
in part with local conservation area financing;
(g) An estimate of the average wages and benefits received by all
employees of businesses locating within the local conservation finance
area as a result of the public improvements undertaken by the
sponsoring city and financed in whole or in part with local
conservation area financing;
(h) A list of public improvements financed by bonds issued under
section 1101 of this act and the date on which the bonds are
anticipated to be retired;
(i) At least once every three years, updated estimates of the
amounts of state and local sales and use tax increments estimated to
have been received since the approval by the department of the project
award under section 901 of this act;
(j) The number of permits using transferable development rights
issued by the sponsoring city; and
(k) Any other information required by the department to enable the
department to fulfill its duties under this chapter and section 901 of
this act.
(2) The department must make a report available to the public and
the legislature by June 1st of each year. The report must include a
summary of the information provided to the department by sponsoring
cities under subsection (1) of this section.

PART X
LOCAL SALES AND USE TAX CREDITED AGAINST THE
STATE SALES AND USE TAXES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001 LOCAL SALES AND USE TAX. (1) Any
sponsoring city that has been approved for a project award under
section 901 of this act may impose a sales and use tax under the
authority of this section in accordance with the terms of this chapter.
Except as provided in this section, the tax is in addition to other
taxes authorized by law and must be collected from those persons who
are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the taxing jurisdiction of the
city or county.
(2) The tax authorized under subsection (1) of this section is
credited against the state taxes imposed under RCW 82.08.020(1) and
82.12.020 at the rate provided in RCW 82.08.020(1). The department
must perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the sponsoring
city at no cost to the sponsoring city. The taxes must be distributed
to the sponsoring city as provided in RCW 82.14.060.
(3) The rate of tax imposed by a sponsoring city may not exceed the
lesser of:
(a) The rate provided in RCW 82.08.020(1), less:
(i) The aggregate rates of all other local sales and use taxes
imposed by any taxing authority on the same taxable events;
(ii) The aggregate rates of all taxes under RCW 82.14.465 and
82.14.475 and this section that are authorized but have not yet been
imposed on the same taxable events by a sponsoring city that has been
approved to receive a state contribution by the department or the
community economic revitalization board under chapter 39.100, 39.102,
or 39.104 RCW; and
(iii) The percentage amount of distributions required under RCW
82.08.020(5) multiplied by the rate of state taxes imposed under RCW
82.08.020(1); and
(b) The rate, as determined by the sponsoring city in consultation
with the department, reasonably necessary to receive the project award
under section 901 of this act over ten months. This rate may be
increased, as determined by the sponsoring city in consultation with
the department, to reflect an increased project award under section
901(3)(d) of this act. If a sponsoring city specified portion has not
increased since the prior project award, the rate for that sponsoring
city may be increased to reflect the increased project award,
commencing on the first day of the next succeeding calendar quarter.
If a sponsoring city specified portion has increased under section 401
of this act since the prior project award, the rate for that sponsoring
city may be increased to reflect the increased project award,
commencing on the first day of the calendar quarter following the date
on which the sponsoring city certifies to the department that it has
issued permits for properties within one or more local conservation
finance areas that, on an aggregate basis, use development rights
representing at least fifty percent of the sponsoring city specified
portion that was the basis for the increased project award.
(4) The department, upon request, must assist a sponsoring city in
establishing its tax rate in accordance with subsection (3) of this
section. Once the rate of tax is established, it may not be increased
except as set forth in subsection (3) of this section.
(5)(a) No tax may be imposed under the authority of this section
before:
(i) The date on which the sponsoring city certifies to the
department that it has issued permits for properties within one or more
local conservation finance areas that, on an aggregate basis, use
development rights representing at least fifty percent of the
sponsoring city specified portion that was the basis for the project
award; and
(ii) July 1st of the second calendar year following the year in
which the department approved the application made under section 901 of
this act.
(b) The tax imposed under this section expires the earlier of the
date that any bonds issued under the authority of section 1101 of this
act are retired or twenty-five years after the tax is first imposed.
(6) An ordinance or resolution adopted by the legislative authority
of the sponsoring city imposing a tax under this section must provide
that:
(a) The tax will first be imposed on the first day of a fiscal
year;
(b) The cumulative amount of tax received by the sponsoring city,
in any fiscal year, may not exceed the amount approved by the
department under subsection (9) of this section;
(c) The department must cease distributing the tax for the
remainder of any fiscal year in which either:
(i) The amount of tax received by the sponsoring city equals the
amount of distributions approved by the department for the fiscal year
under subsection (9) of this section; or
(ii) The amount of revenue from taxes imposed under this section by
all sponsoring cities equals the annual state contribution limit;
(d) The tax will be distributed again, should it cease to be
distributed for any of the reasons provided in (c) of this subsection,
at the beginning of the next fiscal year, subject to the restrictions
in this section; and
(e) The state is entitled to any revenue generated by the tax in
excess of the amounts specified in (c) of this subsection.
(7) The department must determine the amount of tax receipts
distributed to each sponsoring city imposing a sales and use tax under
the authority of this section and must advise a sponsoring city when
tax distributions for the fiscal year equal the amount determined by
the department in subsection (9) of this section. Determinations by
the department of the amount of tax distributions attributable to a
sponsoring city are not appealable. The department must remit any tax
receipts in excess of the amounts specified in subsection (6)(c) of
this section to the state treasurer who must deposit the money in the
general fund.
(8) If a sponsoring city fails to comply with section 902 of this
act, no tax may be distributed in the subsequent fiscal year until such
time as the sponsoring city complies and the department calculates the
state contribution amount according to subsection (9) of this section
for the fiscal year.
(9)(a) For each fiscal year that a sponsoring city imposes the tax
under the authority of this section, the department must approve the
amount of taxes that may be distributed to the sponsoring city. The
amount approved by the department under this subsection is the lesser
of:
(i) The state contribution;
(ii) The amount of project award granted by the department as
provided in section 901 of this act; or
(iii) The total amount of revenues from local public sources
dedicated in the preceding calendar year, as reported in the required
annual report under section 902 of this act. Revenues from local
public sources dedicated in the preceding calendar year that are in
excess of the project award may be carried forward and used in later
years for the purpose of this subsection.
(b) A sponsoring city may not receive, in any fiscal year, more
revenues from taxes imposed under the authority of this section than
the amount approved annually by the department.
(10) The amount of tax distributions received from taxes imposed
under the authority of this section by all sponsoring cities is limited
annually to not more than the amount of annual state contribution
limit.
(11) For purposes of this section, the following definitions, and
not the definitions in section 201 of this act for the same terms,
apply:
(a) "Local sales and use taxes" means sales and use taxes imposed
by cities, counties, public facilities districts, and other local
governments under the authority of this chapter, chapter 67.28 or 67.40
RCW, or any other chapter, and that are credited against the state
sales and use taxes.
(b) "State sales and use taxes" means the taxes imposed in RCW
82.08.020(1) and 82.12.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1002 USE OF SALES AND USE TAX FUNDS. Money
collected from the taxes imposed under section 1001 of this act may be
used only for the purpose of paying the principal of or interest on
bonds issued under section 1101 of this act or for paying costs of
public improvements.

PART XI
BOND AUTHORIZATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1101 ISSUANCE OF BONDS. (1) A sponsoring city
that has created a local conservation finance area may issue bonds to
finance public improvements. The bonds may be issued as general
obligation bonds pursuant to chapter 39.46 RCW or as revenue bonds
pursuant to chapter 35.41 RCW. Bonds issued under this section may be
issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.
(2) Bonds issued under subsection (1) of this section as general
obligation bonds may be payable from the full faith and credit of the
sponsoring city, income, revenues, fees, and rents from the public
improvements, and other funds legally available for payment of costs of
the public improvements or debt service on the general obligations.
(3) Bonds issued under subsection (1) of this section as revenue
bonds may be issued to fund revenue-generating public improvements that
are located within a local conservation finance area. Revenue bonds
issued pursuant to this subsection are not an indebtedness of the
sponsoring city issuing the bonds, and the interest and principal on
the bonds are only payable from the revenues lawfully pledged therefor
and from the special fund and any reserves created pursuant to chapter
35.41 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1102 USE OF REVENUE FOR BOND REPAYMENT. A
sponsoring city that issues bonds under section 1101 of this act to
finance public improvements may pledge for the payment of such bonds
all or part of any local property tax allocation revenues derived from
the public improvements. However, any local property tax allocation
revenues consisting of taxes imposed by the sponsoring city may be
pledged only to pay the principal of and interest on general obligation
bonds and not revenue bonds. The sponsoring city may also pledge all
or part of any revenues derived from taxes imposed under section 1001
of this act and held in connection with the public improvements to pay
principal of and interest on general obligation or revenue bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1103 LIMITATION OF BONDS ISSUED. The bonds
issued by a sponsoring city under section 1101 of this act to finance
public improvements do not constitute an obligation of the state of
Washington, either general or special.

PART XII
GROWTH MANAGEMENT ACT
COMPREHENSIVE PLAN OPTIONAL ELEMENTS
Sec. 1201 RCW 36.70A.080 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 8 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A comprehensive plan may include additional elements, items, or
studies dealing with other subjects relating to the physical
development within its jurisdiction, including, but not limited to:
(a) Conservation;
(b) Solar energy; and
(c) Recreation.
(2) A comprehensive plan may include, where appropriate, subarea
plans, each of which is consistent with the comprehensive plan.
(3)(a) Cities that qualify as a receiving city may adopt a
comprehensive plan element and associated development regulations that
apply within receiving areas that have been or will be designated as
local conservation finance areas under chapter 39.--- RCW (the new
chapter created in section 1403 of this act).
(b) For purposes of this subsection (3), the terms "receiving
city," "receiving areas," and "local conservation finance areas" have
the same meaning as in section 201 of this act.

PART XIII
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1301 ADMINISTRATION BY THE DEPARTMENT. The
department may adopt any rules under chapter 34.05 RCW it considers
necessary for the administration of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1302 SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid,
the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1303 Sections 101 through 701, 801, 901, 1001
through 1103, and 1301 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 39
RCW.

--- END ---