BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that it is
confusing for individuals to receive annual premium changes midyear
while annual deductible periods are on a calendar year basis. It is
the intent of the legislature that individuals purchasing insurance
have the opportunity to understand what they are purchasing, and that
annual premium changes and annual deductible periods coincide where
possible to ensure individuals have the fewest possible changes in
their health plans.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.44.022 and 2006 c 100 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except for health benefit plans covered under RCW 48.44.021,
premium rates for health benefit plans for individuals shall be subject
to the following provisions:
(a) The health care service contractor shall develop its rates
based on an adjusted community rate and may only vary the adjusted
community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age;
(iv) Tenure discounts; and
(v) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Individuals under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The health care service contractor shall be permitted to
develop separate rates for individuals age sixty-five or older for
coverage for which medicare is the primary payer and coverage for which
medicare is not the primary payer. Both rates shall be subject to the
requirements of this subsection.
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the family composition;
(ii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the
individual; or
(iii) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. This
subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as
provided in RCW 48.43.015.
(h) A tenure discount for continuous enrollment in the health plan
of two years or more may be offered, not to exceed ten percent.
(2) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall
pool the medical experience of all individuals purchasing coverage,
except individuals purchasing coverage under RCW 48.44.021, and shall
not be required to be pooled with the medical experience of health
benefit plans offered to small employers under RCW 48.44.023.
(3) As used in this section and RCW 48.44.023 "health benefit
plan," "small employer," "adjusted community rates," and "wellness
activities" mean the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.
(4) For all health benefit plans issued or renewed on or after
January 1, 2013, the annual premium change must begin in January for
the calendar year so that the annual deductible and premiums align.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.46.063 and 2006 c 100 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Premiums for health benefit plans for individuals who purchase
the plan as a member of a purchasing pool:
(a) Consisting of five hundred or more individuals affiliated with
a particular industry;
(b) To whom care management services are provided as a benefit of
pool membership; and
(c) Which allows contributions from more than one employer to be
used towards the purchase of an individual's health benefit plan;
shall be calculated using the adjusted community rating method that
spreads financial risk across the entire purchasing pool of which the
individual is a member. Such rates are subject to the following
provisions:
(i) The health maintenance organization shall develop its rates
based on an adjusted community rate and may only vary the adjusted
community rate for:
(A) Geographic area;
(B) Family size;
(C) Age;
(D) Tenure discounts; and
(E) Wellness activities.
(ii) The adjustment for age in (c)(i)(C) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Individuals under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(iii) The health maintenance organization shall be permitted to
develop separate rates for individuals age sixty-five or older for
coverage for which medicare is the primary payer, and coverage for
which medicare is not the primary payer. Both rates are subject to the
requirements of this subsection.
(iv) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(v) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs.
(vi) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(A) Changes to the family composition;
(B) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the individual;
or
(C) Changes in government requirements affecting the health benefit
plan.
(vii) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. This
subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as
provided in RCW 48.43.015.
(viii) A tenure discount for continuous enrollment in the health
plan of two years or more may be offered, not to exceed ten percent.
(2) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall
not be required to be pooled with the medical experience of health
benefit plans offered to small employers under RCW 48.46.066.
(3) As used in this section and RCW 48.46.066, "health benefit
plan," "adjusted community rates," "small employer," and "wellness
activities" mean the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.
(4) For all health benefit plans issued or renewed on or after
January 1, 2013, the annual premium change must begin in January for
the calendar year so that the annual deductible and premiums align.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.20.028 and 2006 c 100 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Premiums for health benefit plans for individuals shall be
calculated using the adjusted community rating method that spreads
financial risk across the carrier's entire individual product
population, except the individual product population covered under RCW
48.20.029. All such rates shall conform to the following:
(a) The insurer shall develop its rates based on an adjusted
community rate and may only vary the adjusted community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age;
(iv) Tenure discounts; and
(v) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Individuals under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The insurer shall be permitted to develop separate rates for
individuals age sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is
the primary payer and coverage for which medicare is not the primary
payer. Both rates shall be subject to the requirements of this
subsection.
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs not to exceed twenty percent.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the family composition;
(ii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the
individual; or
(iii) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. This
subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as
provided in RCW 48.43.015.
(h) A tenure discount for continuous enrollment in the health plan
of two years or more may be offered, not to exceed ten percent.
(2) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall
pool the medical experience of all individuals purchasing coverage,
except individuals purchasing coverage under RCW 48.20.029, and shall
not be required to be pooled with the medical experience of health
benefit plans offered to small employers under RCW 48.21.045.
(3) As used in this section, "health benefit plan," "adjusted
community rate," and "wellness activities" mean the same as defined in
RCW 48.43.005.
(4) This section shall not apply to premiums for health benefit
plans covered under RCW 48.20.029.
(5) For all health benefit plans issued or renewed on or after
January 1, 2013, the annual premium change must begin in January for
the calendar year so that the annual deductible and premiums align.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The insurance commissioner may adopt rules
to implement this act.

--- END ---