BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 68.50.105 and 2007 c 439 s 1 and 2007 c 156 s 23 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Reports and records of autopsies or post mortems shall be
confidential, except that the following persons may examine and obtain
copies of any such report or record: The personal representative of
the decedent as defined in RCW 11.02.005, any family member, the
attending physician or advanced registered nurse practitioner, the
prosecuting attorney or law enforcement agencies having jurisdiction,
public health officials, ((or to)) the department of labor and
industries in cases in which it has an interest under RCW 68.50.103, or
the secretary of the department of social and health services or his or
her designee in cases being reviewed under RCW 74.13.640.
The coroner, the medical examiner, or the attending physician
shall, upon request, meet with the family of the decedent to discuss
the findings of the autopsy or post mortem. For the purposes of this
section, the term "family" means the surviving spouse, state registered
domestic partner, or any child, parent, grandparent, grandchild,
brother, or sister of the decedent, or any person who was guardian of
the decedent at the time of death.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.13.640 and 2009 c 520 s 91 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The department shall conduct a child fatality review in the
event of ((an unexpected death)) a fatality suspected to be caused by
child abuse or neglect of ((a)) any minor ((in the state)) who is in
the care of the department or supervising agency or receiving services
described in chapter 74.13 RCW ((from the department or a supervising
agency)) or who has been in the care of the department or supervising
agency or received services described in chapter 74.13 RCW ((from the
department or a supervising agency)) within one year preceding the
minor's death.
(((2))) (b) The department shall consult with the office of the
family and children's ombudsman to determine if a child fatality review
should be conducted in any case in which it cannot be determined
whether the child's death is the result of suspected child abuse or
neglect.
(c) The department shall ensure that the fatality review team is
made up of individuals who had no previous involvement in the case and
whose professional expertise is pertinent to the dynamics of the case.
(d) Upon conclusion of a child fatality review required pursuant to
((subsection (1) of)) this section, the department shall within one
hundred eighty days following the fatality issue a report on the
results of the review, unless an extension has been granted by the
governor. Reports shall be distributed to the appropriate committees
of the legislature, and the department shall create a public web site
where all child fatality review reports required under this section
shall be posted and maintained. A child fatality review completed
pursuant to this section shall be subject to public disclosure and
posted on the public web site, except that confidential information may
be redacted by the department consistent with the requirements of RCW
74.13.500 through 74.13.525, RCW 13.50.100, chapter 42.56 RCW, and
other applicable state and federal laws.
(((3))) (e) The department shall develop and implement procedures
to carry out the requirements of ((subsections (1) and (2) of)) this
section.
(((4) In the event a child fatality is the result of apparent abuse
or neglect by the child's parent or caregiver, the department shall
ensure that the fatality review team is comprised of individuals who
had no previous involvement in the case and whose professional
expertise is pertinent to the dynamics of the case.
(5))) (2) In the event of a near((-)) fatality of a child who is in
the care of or receiving services described in this chapter from the
department or supervising agency or who has been in the care of or
received services described in this chapter from the department or
supervising agency within one year preceding the near((-)) fatality,
the department shall promptly notify the office of the family and
children's ombudsman. The department may conduct a review of the near
fatality at its discretion or at the request of the office of the
family and children's ombudsman.
(3) In any review of a child fatality or near fatality in which the
child was placed with or received services from a supervising agency
pursuant to a contract with the department, the department and the
fatality review team shall have access to all records and files
regarding the child or otherwise relevant to the review that have been
produced or retained by the supervising agency.
(4)(a) A child fatality or near fatality case review completed
pursuant to this section shall be subject to discovery in a civil or
administrative proceeding, but shall not be admitted into evidence or
otherwise used in a civil or administrative proceeding except pursuant
to this section.
(b) A department employee responsible for conducting a child
fatality or near fatality review or member of a child fatality or near
fatality review team may not be examined in a civil or administrative
proceeding regarding (i) the work of the child fatality or near
fatality review team, (ii) the incident under review, (iii) his or her
statements, deliberations, thoughts, analyses, or impressions relating
to the work of the child fatality or near fatality review team or the
incident under review, or (iv) the statements, deliberations, thoughts,
analyses, or impressions of any other member of the child fatality or
near fatality review, or any person who provided information to the
child fatality or near fatality review team, relating to the work of
the child fatality or near fatality review or the incident under
review.
(c) Documents prepared by or for a child fatality or near fatality
review are inadmissible and may not be used in a civil or
administrative proceeding except that any document that exists before
its use or consideration in a child fatality or near fatality review,
or that is created independently of such review, does not become
inadmissible merely because it is reviewed or used by in a child
fatality or near fatality review. A person is not unavailable as a
witness merely because the person has been interviewed by or has
provided a statement for a child fatality or near fatality review, but,
if called as a witness, a person may not be examined regarding the
person's interactions with the child fatality or near fatality review,
including without limitation whether the person was interviewed during
such review, the questions that were asked in the child fatality or
near fatality review, and the answers that the person provided during
for such review. This section shall not be construed as restricting
the person from testifying fully in any proceeding regarding his or her
knowledge of the incident under review.
(d) The restrictions set forth in this section shall not apply in
a licensing or disciplinary proceeding arising from an agency's effort
to revoke or suspend the license of any licensed professional based in
whole or in part upon allegations of wrongdoing in connection with the
minor's death or near fatality reviewed by the child fatality or near
fatality review.

--- END ---