BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.60.010 and 1985 c 232 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that there are several areas in the state
that are characterized by very high levels of unemployment and poverty.
The ((legislative [legislature])) legislature further finds that
economic stagnation is the primary cause of this high unemployment rate
and poverty; that new state policies are necessary in order to promote
economic stimulation and new employment opportunities in these
distressed areas; and that policies providing incentives for economic
growth in these distressed areas are essential. For these reasons, the
legislature ((hereby)) reestablishes a tax deferral program to be
effective solely in distressed ((areas and under circumstances where
the deferred tax payments are for investments or costs that result in
the creation of a specified number of jobs)) counties. The legislature
declares that this limited program serves the vital public purpose of
creating employment opportunities and reducing poverty in the
distressed ((areas)) counties of the state.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.60.020 and 2006 c 142 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under
this chapter.
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(3) "Eligible area" means ((a)):
(a) Through June 30, 2010, a rural county as defined in RCW
82.14.370; and
(b) Beginning July 1, 2010, a qualifying county.
(4)(a) "Eligible investment project" means an investment project
that is located, as of the date the application required by RCW
82.60.030 is received by the department, in an eligible area as defined
in subsection (3) of this section.
(b) ((The lessor or owner of a qualified building is not eligible
for a deferral unless:
(i) The underlying ownership of the buildings, machinery, and
equipment vests exclusively in the same person; or
(ii)(A) The lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic
benefit of the deferral to the lessee;
(B) The lessee that receives the economic benefit of the deferral
agrees in writing with the department to complete the annual survey
required under RCW 82.60.070; and
(C) The economic benefit of the deferral passed to the lessee is no
less than the amount of tax deferred by the lessor and is evidenced by
written documentation of any type of payment, credit, or other
financial arrangement between the lessor or owner of the qualified
building and the lessee.
(c))) "Eligible investment project" does not include any portion of
an investment project undertaken by a light and power business as
defined in RCW 82.16.010(((5))) (4), other than that portion of a
cogeneration project that is used to generate power for consumption
within the manufacturing site of which the cogeneration project is an
integral part, or investment projects ((which)) that have already
received deferrals under this chapter.
(5) "Initiation of construction" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.63.010.
(6) "Investment project" means an investment in qualified buildings
or qualified machinery and equipment, including labor and services
rendered in the planning, installation, and construction of the
project.
(((6))) (7) "Manufacturing" means the same as defined in RCW
82.04.120. "Manufacturing" also includes computer programming, the
production of computer software, and other computer-related services,
the activities performed by research and development laboratories and
commercial testing laboratories, and the conditioning of vegetable
seeds.
(((7))) (8) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.
(((8))) (9) "Qualified buildings" means construction of new
structures, and expansion or renovation of existing structures for the
purpose of increasing floor space or production capacity used for
manufacturing and research and development activities, including plant
offices and warehouses or other facilities for the storage of raw
material or finished goods if such facilities are an essential or an
integral part of a factory, mill, plant, or laboratory used for
manufacturing or research and development. If a building is used
partly for manufacturing or research and development and partly for
other purposes, the applicable tax deferral shall be determined by
apportionment of the costs of construction under rules adopted by the
department.
(((9))) (10) "Qualified employment position" means a permanent
full-time employee employed in the eligible investment project during
the entire tax year. The term "entire tax year" means a full-time
position that is filled for a period of twelve consecutive months. The
term "full-time" means at least thirty-five hours a week, four hundred
fifty-five hours a quarter, or one thousand eight hundred twenty hours
a year.
(((10))) (11) "Qualified machinery and equipment" means all new
industrial and research fixtures, equipment, and support facilities
that are an integral and necessary part of a manufacturing or research
and development operation. "Qualified machinery and equipment"
includes: Computers; software; data processing equipment; laboratory
equipment; manufacturing components such as belts, pulleys, shafts, and
moving parts; molds, tools, and dies; operating structures; and all
equipment used to control or operate the machinery.
(((11))) (12) "Qualifying county" means a county that has an
unemployment rate, as determined by the employment security department,
which is at least twenty percent above the state average for the three
calendar years immediately preceding the year in which the list of
distressed counties is established or updated, as the case may be, as
provided in section 3 of this act.
(13) "Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral under this
chapter.
(((12))) (14) "Research and development" means the development,
refinement, testing, marketing, and commercialization of a product,
service, or process before commercial sales have begun. As used in
this subsection, "commercial sales" excludes sales of prototypes or
sales for market testing if the total gross receipts from such sales of
the product, service, or process do not exceed one million dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.60 RCW
to read as follows:
The department, with the assistance of the employment security
department, must establish a list of qualifying counties effective July
1, 2010. The list of qualifying counties is effective for a twenty-four month period and must be updated by July 1st of the year that is
two calendar years after the list was established or last updated, as
the case may be.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.60 RCW
to read as follows:
The lessor or owner of a qualified building is not eligible for a
deferral unless:
(1) The underlying ownership of the buildings, machinery, and
equipment vests exclusively in the same person; or
(2)(a) The lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic
benefit of the deferral to the lessee;
(b) The lessee that receives the economic benefit of the deferral
agrees in writing with the department to complete the annual survey
required under RCW 82.60.070; and
(c) The economic benefit of the deferral passed to the lessee is no
less than the amount of tax deferred by the lessor and is evidenced by
written documentation of any type of payment, credit, or other
financial arrangement between the lessor or owner of the qualified
building and the lessee.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.60.030 and 1994 sp.s. c 1 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Application for deferral of taxes under this chapter must be
made before initiation of the construction of the investment project or
acquisition of equipment or machinery. The application ((shall)) must
be made to the department in a form and manner prescribed by the
department. The application ((shall)) must contain information
regarding the location of the investment project, the applicant's
average employment in the state for the prior year, estimated or actual
new employment related to the project, estimated or actual wages of
employees related to the project, estimated or actual costs, time
schedules for completion and operation, and other information required
by the department. The department ((shall)) must rule on the
application within sixty days.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2020.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.60.040 and 2004 c 25 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department ((shall)) must issue a sales and use tax
deferral certificate for state and local sales and use taxes due under
chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW on each eligible investment
project ((that is located in an eligible area as defined in RCW
82.60.020)).
(2) The department ((shall)) must keep a running total of all
deferrals granted under this chapter during each fiscal biennium.
(3) This section expires July 1, ((2010)) 2020.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.60.060 and 2000 c 106 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The recipient ((shall)) must begin paying the deferred taxes in
the third year after the date certified by the department as the date
on which the ((construction)) investment project has been operationally
completed. The first payment will be due on December 31st of the third
calendar year after such certified date, with subsequent annual
payments due on December 31st of the following four years with amounts
of payment scheduled as follows:

Repayment Year % of Deferred Tax Repaid

1 10%

2 15%

3 20%

4 25%

5 30%

(2) The department may authorize an accelerated repayment schedule
upon request of the recipient.
(3) Interest ((shall)) may not be charged on any taxes deferred
under this chapter for the period of deferral, although all other
penalties and interest applicable to delinquent excise taxes may be
assessed and imposed for delinquent payments under this chapter. The
debt for deferred taxes will not be extinguished by insolvency or other
failure of the recipient. Transfer of ownership does not terminate the
deferral. The deferral is transferred, subject to the successor
meeting the eligibility requirements of this chapter, for the remaining
periods of the deferral.

Sec. 8 RCW 82.60.070 and 2004 c 25 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness
are important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources the
legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(b) Each recipient of a deferral granted under this chapter after
June 30, 1994, ((shall)) must complete an annual survey. If the
economic benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in
((RCW 82.60.020(4))) section 4 of this act, the lessee ((shall agree
to)) must complete the annual survey and the applicant is not required
to complete the annual survey. The survey is due by March 31st of the
year following the calendar year in which the investment project is
certified by the department as having been operationally complete and
the seven succeeding calendar years. The survey shall include the
amount of tax deferred, the number of new products or research projects
by general classification, and the number of trademarks, patents, and
copyrights associated with activities at the investment project. The
survey ((shall)) must also include the following information for
employment positions in Washington:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(c) As part of the survey, the department may request additional
information necessary to measure the results of, or determine
eligibility for, the deferral program, to be submitted at the same time
as the survey.
(d) All information collected under this subsection, except the
amount of the tax deferral taken, is deemed taxpayer information under
RCW 82.32.330 and is not disclosable. Information on the amount of tax
deferral taken is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW
82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.
(e) The department ((shall)) must use the information from this
section to prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No
fewer than three taxpayers ((shall)) may be included in any category.
The department shall report these statistics to the legislature each
year by September 1st.
(f) The department ((shall)) must also use the information to study
the tax deferral program authorized under this chapter. The department
((shall)) must report to the legislature by December 1, ((2009)) 2019.
The report ((shall)) must measure the effect of the program on job
creation, the number of jobs created for residents of eligible areas,
company growth, the introduction of new products, the diversification
of the state's economy, growth in research and development investment,
the movement of firms or the consolidation of firms' operations into
the state, and such other factors as the department selects.
(2)(a) Except as provided in section 9 of this act, if, on the
basis of a survey under this section or other information, the
department finds that an investment project is not eligible for tax
deferral under this chapter, the amount of deferred taxes outstanding
for the project ((shall)), according to the repayment schedule in RCW
82.60.060, will be immediately due. For purposes of this subsection
(2)(a), the repayment schedule in RCW 82.60.060 is tolled during the
period of time that a taxpayer is receiving relief from repayment of
deferred taxes under section 9 of this act.
(b) If a recipient of the deferral fails to complete the annual
survey required under subsection (1) of this section by the date due,
twelve and one-half percent of the deferred tax ((shall)) will be
immediately due. If the economic benefits of the deferral are passed
to a lessee as provided in ((RCW 82.60.020(4))) section 4 of this act,
the lessee ((shall be)) is responsible for payment to the extent the
lessee has received the economic benefit.
(3) Notwithstanding any other subsection of this section, deferred
taxes need not be repaid on machinery and equipment for lumber and wood
products industries, and sales of or charges made for labor and
services, of the type which qualifies for exemption under RCW
82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 to the extent the taxes have not been repaid
before July 1, 1995.
(4) Notwithstanding any other subsection of this section, deferred
taxes on the following need not be repaid:
(a) Machinery and equipment, and sales of or charges made for labor
and services, which at the time of purchase would have qualified for
exemption under RCW 82.08.02565; and
(b) Machinery and equipment which at the time of first use would
have qualified for exemption under RCW 82.12.02565.

Sec. 9 RCW 82.32.600 and 2009 c 461 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Persons required to file annual surveys or annual reports under
RCW 82.04.4452, 82.32.5351, 82.32.545, 82.32.610, 82.32.630, 82.82.020,
82.32.632, 82.60.070, or 82.74.040 must electronically file with the
department all surveys, reports, returns, and any other forms or
information the department requires in an electronic format as provided
or approved by the department. As used in this section, "returns" has
the same meaning as "return" in RCW 82.32.050.
(2) Any survey, report, return, or any other form or information
required to be filed in an electronic format under subsection (1) of
this section is not filed until received by the department in an
electronic format.
(3) The department may waive the electronic filing requirement in
subsection (1) of this section for good cause shown.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 82.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the conditions in this section, a person is not
liable for the amount of deferred taxes outstanding for an investment
project when the person temporarily ceases to use its qualified
buildings and qualified machinery and equipment for manufacturing or
research and development activities for a period not to exceed twenty-four months from the date that the department sent its assessment for
the amount of outstanding deferred taxes to the taxpayer.
(2) The relief from repayment of deferred taxes under this section
does not apply unless the number of qualified employment positions
maintained at the investment project after manufacturing or research
and development activities are temporarily ceased is at least ten
percent of the number of qualified employment positions employed at the
investment project at the time the deferral was approved by the
department. If a person has been approved for more than one deferral
under this chapter, relief from repayment of deferred taxes under this
section does not apply unless the number of qualified employment
positions maintained at the investment project after manufacturing or
research and development activities are temporarily ceased is at least
ten percent of the highest number of qualified employment positions at
the investment project at the time any of the deferrals were approved
by the department. If, at any time during the twenty-four month period
after the department has sent the taxpayer an assessment for
outstanding deferred taxes resulting from the person temporarily
ceasing to use its qualified buildings and qualified machinery and
equipment for manufacturing or research and development activities, the
number of qualified employment positions falls below the ten percent
threshold in this subsection, the amount of deferred taxes outstanding
for the project is immediately due.
(3) The lessor of an investment project for which a deferral has
been granted under this chapter who has passed the economic benefits of
the deferral to the lessee is not eligible for relief from the payment
of deferred taxes under this section.
(4) A person seeking relief from the payment of deferred taxes
under this section must apply to the department in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The application required under this
subsection must be received by the department within thirty days of the
date that the department sent its assessment for outstanding deferred
taxes resulting from the person temporarily ceasing to use its
qualified buildings and qualified machinery and equipment for
manufacturing or research and development activities. The department
must approve applications that meet the requirements in this section
for relief from the payment of deferred taxes.
(5) A person is entitled to relief under this section only once.
(6) A person whose application for relief from the payment of
deferred taxes has been approved under this section must continue to
file an annual survey as required under RCW 82.60.070(1) or any
successor statute. In addition, the person must file, in a form and
manner prescribed by the department, a report on the status of the
business and the outlook for commencing manufacturing or research and
development activities.

Sec. 11 RCW 82.60.100 and 1987 c 49 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Applications, reports, and any other information received by the
department under this chapter ((shall)), except applications not
approved by the department, are not ((be)) confidential and ((shall
be)) are subject to disclosure.

Sec. 12 RCW 82.62.010 and 2007 c 485 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax credit under this
chapter.
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(3) "Eligible area" means ((an area)) a "rural county" as defined
in RCW ((82.60.020)) 82.14.370.
(4)(a) "Eligible business project" means manufacturing or research
and development activities which are conducted by an applicant in an
eligible area at a specific facility, provided the applicant's average
qualified employment positions at the specific facility will be at
least fifteen percent greater in the four consecutive full calendar
quarters after the calendar quarter during which the first qualified
employment position is filled than the applicant's average qualified
employment positions at the same facility in the four consecutive full
calendar quarters immediately preceding the calendar quarter during
which the first qualified employment position is filled.
(b) "Eligible business project" does not include any portion of a
business project undertaken by a light and power business as defined in
RCW 82.16.010(((5))) (4) or that portion of a business project creating
qualified full-time employment positions outside an eligible area.
(5) "First qualified employment position" means the first qualified
employment position filled for which a credit under this chapter is
sought.
(6) "Manufacturing" means the same as defined in RCW 82.04.120.
"Manufacturing" also includes computer programming, the production of
computer software, and other computer-related services, and the
activities performed by research and development laboratories and
commercial testing laboratories.
(7) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.
(8)(a)(i) "Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time employee employed in the eligible business project during four
consecutive full calendar quarters.
(ii) For seasonal employers, "qualified employment position" also
includes the equivalent of a full-time employee in work hours for four
consecutive full calendar quarters.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "full time" means a normal
work week of at least thirty-five hours.
(c) Once a permanent, full-time employee has been employed, a
position does not cease to be a qualified employment position solely
due to periods in which the position goes vacant, as long as:
(i) The cumulative period of any vacancies in that position is not
more than one hundred twenty days in the four-quarter period; and
(ii) During a vacancy, the employer is training or actively
recruiting a replacement permanent, full-time employee for the
position.
(9) "Recipient" means a person receiving tax credits under this
chapter.
(10) "Research and development" means the development, refinement,
testing, marketing, and commercialization of a product, service, or
process before commercial sales have begun. As used in this
subsection, "commercial sales" excludes sales of prototypes or sales
for market testing if the total gross receipts from such sales of the
product, service, or process do not exceed one million dollars.
(11) "Seasonal employee" means an employee of a seasonal employer
who works on a seasonal basis. For the purposes of this subsection and
subsection (12) of this section, "seasonal basis" means a continuous
employment period of less than twelve consecutive months.
(12) "Seasonal employer" means a person who regularly hires more
than fifty percent of its employees to work on a seasonal basis.

Sec. 13 RCW 82.60.049 and 2004 c 25 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Eligible area" also means a designated community empowerment
zone approved under RCW 43.31C.020 ((or a county containing a community
empowerment zone)).
(b) "Eligible investment project" also means an investment project
in an eligible area as defined in this section.
(2) In addition to the provisions of RCW 82.60.040, the department
shall issue a sales and use tax deferral certificate for state and
local sales and use taxes due under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14
RCW, on each eligible investment project that is located in an eligible
area, if the applicant establishes that at the time the project is
operationally complete:
(a) The applicant will hire at least one qualified employment
position for each seven hundred fifty thousand dollars of investment
for which a deferral is requested; and
(b) The positions will be filled by persons who at the time of hire
are residents of the community empowerment zone. As used in this
subsection, "resident" means the person makes his or her home in the
community empowerment zone. A mailing address alone is insufficient to
establish that a person is a resident for the purposes of this section.
The persons must be hired after the date the application is filed with
the department.
(3) All other provisions and eligibility requirements of this
chapter apply to applicants eligible under this section.
(4) The qualified employment position must be filled by the end of
the calendar year following the year in which the project is certified
as operationally complete. If a person does not meet the requirements
for qualified employment positions by the end of the second calendar
year following the year in which the project is certified as
operationally complete, all deferred taxes are immediately due.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 RCW 82.60.900 and 82.60.901 are each
decodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 82.60.050 (Expiration of RCW 82.60.030 and 82.60.040) and
2004 c 25 s 6, 1994 sp.s. c 1 s 7, 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 404, 1988 c 41 s
5, & 1985 c 232 s 10; and
(2) RCW 82.60.110 (Competing projects -- Impact study) and 1998 c 245
s 169 & 1994 sp.s. c 1 s 8.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Sections 1, 2, 4 through 7, and 10 through
15 of this act take effect July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Sections 8 and 9 of this act take effect
July 1, 2010, if the legislature does not enact Substitute House Bill
No. 1597 by July 1, 2010.

--- END ---