BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.56.025 and 2003 c 12 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The interest and penalties for delinquencies on property taxes
((shall)) must be waived by the county treasurer if the notice for
these taxes due, as provided in RCW 84.56.050, was not sent to a
taxpayer due to error by the county. Where waiver of interest and
penalties has occurred, the full amount of interest and penalties
((shall)) must be reinstated if the taxpayer fails to pay the
delinquent taxes within thirty days of receiving notice that the taxes
are due. Each county treasurer ((shall)) must, subject to guidelines
prepared by the department of revenue, establish administrative
procedures to determine if taxpayers are eligible for this waiver.
(2) In addition to the waiver under subsection (1) of this section,
the interest and penalties for delinquencies on property taxes
((shall)) must be waived by the county treasurer under the following
circumstances:
(a) The taxpayer fails to make one payment under RCW 84.56.020 by
the due date on the taxpayer's personal residence because of hardship
caused by the death of the taxpayer's spouse if the taxpayer notifies
the county treasurer of the hardship within sixty days of the tax due
date; or
(b) The taxpayer fails to make one payment under RCW 84.56.020 by
the due date on the taxpayer's parent's or stepparent's personal
residence because of hardship caused by the death of the taxpayer's
parent or stepparent if the taxpayer notifies the county treasurer of
the hardship within sixty days of the tax due date.
(3) Before allowing a hardship waiver under subsection (2) of this
section, the county treasurer may require a copy of the death
certificate along with an affidavit signed by the taxpayer.
(4) In addition to the waiver under subsections (1) and (2) of this
section, the interest and penalties for delinquencies on the second-half of property taxes due and payable may be waived by the county
treasurer under the following circumstances:
(a) The total amount of tax or special assessments payable by one
person is fifty dollars or more and one-half of such tax be paid after
the thirtieth day of April but before the thirty-first day of October;
and
(b) The remainder of such tax be timely paid on or before the
thirty-first day of October following; and
(c) The taxpayer has made timely payment for a period of five years
immediately preceding the tax due and payable in the year for which the
waiver is being requested.

--- END ---