BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that many families
experience challenges and transitions with legal ramifications that
often necessitate court involvement. Frequently, these legal matters
are manifested in juvenile offender, child in need of supervision,
at-risk youth, child protective, domestic relations, domestic violence,
third-party custody proceedings and other matters that require the
presence of individuals and family members at court proceedings. Many
persons whose attendance is required at these court proceedings are
responsible for the care of young children. For many such individuals,
child care issues can distract from, if not present obstacles or even
barriers to, effective and complete participation in ongoing court
proceedings. The legislature therefore determines that the creation of
family friendly court child care programs would be beneficial to and in
the best interests of the citizens of the state of Washington. The
legislature further finds that the goal of such programs shall be to
provide quality child care in or near courthouses to the children of
individuals and families whose presence is required at court-related
proceedings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 2.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the availability of funding, the family friendly
court grant program is created. The purpose of the program is to
provide quality in-court child care services to the children of
individuals who are attending court proceedings or related matters.
For purposes of this chapter, "in-court child care" means child care
services provided in the courthouse or courthouse complex or in close
proximity to the courthouse.
(2) The administrator for the courts shall develop and administer
the program subject to the requirements in section 3 of this act. As
part of administering the program, the administrator for the courts
shall define appropriate outcome measures, collect data, and gather
information from courts receiving grants.
(3) In addition to grants received from the administrator for the
courts under this section, superior courts implementing family friendly
court programs under this act are authorized to accept any funds,
grants, gifts, or donations from any private or public source for the
purpose of implementing this act. No grant or donation shall be
accepted if the conditions attached to the grant or donation require
the expenditure of those moneys in a manner contrary to law.
(4) Funds received by the superior court for the family friendly
court program must be used to supplement, not supplant, any other
local, state, or federal funds for the court.
(5) Upon receipt of any funds for the purpose of this act, the
superior court shall submit to the administrator for the courts a
spending plan detailing the use of the funds for in-court child care.
At the end of the fiscal year, the superior court shall submit to the
administrator for the courts a financial report comparing the spending
plan to actual expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 2.56 RCW
to read as follows:
A superior court may apply for grants from the family friendly
court grant program by submitting an application with the administrator
for the courts. To be eligible to receive grant funds, a superior
court must agree to be responsible for:
(1) Recruiting and hiring qualified and skilled child care
providers and ensuring that all child care licensing requirements in
chapter 43.215 RCW are met;
(2) Conducting the necessary criminal history checks;
(3) Selecting and establishing a safe physical location for the in-court child care;
(4) Implementing a method of evaluating the effectiveness of the
program and assessing the impact of the child care services provided
through the program; and
(5) Reporting annually to the administrator for the courts
concerning the results of the superior court's evaluation of the family
friendly court grant program as well as an accounting of fiscal
contributions received and expenditures made by the superior court for
the implementation, administration, and maintenance of the program and
such other information that the administrator for the courts may
require.

--- END ---