BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds efforts to maintain
and enhance populations of migratory waterfowl, particularly snow
geese, have been quite successful and provide enhanced hunting
opportunities, increased opportunities for watchable wildlife
enthusiasts and the public, economic stimulus to local communities from
resulting tourism, and enjoyment by local residents. The legislature
finds that there have been many positive contributions from increasing
numbers of migratory waterfowl to residents of the state and also to
residents of other countries that share the yearly migratory routes of
these birds.
The legislature also recognizes that there are disproportionate
negative impacts in the form of damage to crops, such as fall planted
wheat and perennial forages, that occur when a large number of birds
concentrate and stay on a limited number of acres growing such green
over-winter crops. Further, that if uncompensated damage associated
with growing green over-wintering crops becomes sufficiently severe,
farmers will have insufficient economic reason to grow these crops,
which will further reduce available food and adversely affect the
migratory waterfowl population.
The legislature finds that proactive management strategies such as
the quality snow goose hunting program contained in chapter 232-28 WAC,
and the mutually beneficial program to reimburse costs incurred by
agricultural landowners to plant winter cover crops specifically to
provide feed for over-wintering migratory waterfowl, have helped to
mitigate the economic impact of crop damage to farmers and sustain
waterfowl populations, but that instances of significant crop damage
continue to occur.
The purpose of this act is to encourage proactive management
strategies for migratory waterfowl that will promote their continued
health and abundance while reducing the impacts to individual farmers,
and to provide compensation for loss of crops from migratory waterfowl
if these alternative proactive management strategies are ineffective.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.36.100 and 2009 c 333 s 55 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as limited by RCW 77.36.070 and 77.36.080, the
department shall offer to distribute money appropriated to pay claims
to the owner of commercial crops for damage caused by wild deer ((or)),
elk, or migratory waterfowl, or to the owners of commercial livestock
that has been killed by bears, wolves, or cougars, or injured by bears,
wolves, or cougars to such a degree that the market value of the
commercial livestock has been diminished. Payments for claims for
damage to commercial livestock or damage to commercial crops caused by
migratory waterfowl are not subject to the limitations of RCW 77.36.070
and 77.36.080, but may not exceed the total amount specifically
appropriated therefor.
(b) Owners of commercial crops or commercial livestock are only
eligible for a claim under this subsection if:
(i) The owner satisfies the definition of "eligible farmer" in RCW
82.08.855;
(ii) The conditions of RCW 77.36.110 have been satisfied; and
(iii) The damage caused to the commercial crop or commercial
livestock satisfies the criteria for damage established by the
commission under this subsection.
(c) The commission shall adopt and maintain by rule criteria that
clarifies the damage to commercial crops and commercial livestock
qualifying for compensation under this subsection. An owner of a
commercial crop or commercial livestock must satisfy the criteria prior
to receiving compensation under this subsection. The criteria for
damage adopted under this subsection must include, but not be limited
to, a required minimum economic loss to the owner of the commercial
crop or commercial livestock, which may not be set at a value of less
than five hundred dollars.
(2)(a) The department may offer to provide noncash compensation
only to offset wildlife interactions to a person who applies to the
department for compensation for damage to property other than
commercial crops or commercial livestock that is the result of a
mammalian or avian species of wildlife on a case-specific basis if the
conditions of RCW 77.36.110 have been satisfied and if the damage
satisfies the criteria for damage established by the commission under
this subsection.
(b) The commission shall adopt and maintain by rule criteria for
damage to property other than a commercial crop or commercial livestock
that is damaged by wildlife and may be eligible for compensation under
this subsection, including criteria for filing a claim for compensation
under this subsection.
(3)(a) To prevent or offset wildlife interactions, the department
may offer materials or services to a person who applies to the
department for assistance in providing mitigating actions designed to
reduce wildlife interactions if the actions are designed to address
damage that satisfies the criteria for damage established by the
commission under this subsection.
(b) The commission shall adopt and maintain by rule criteria for
mitigating actions designed to address wildlife interactions that may
be eligible for materials and services under this section, including
criteria for submitting an application under this section.
(4) An owner who files a claim under this section may appeal the
decision of the department pursuant to rules adopted by the commission
if the claim:
(a) Is denied; or
(b) Is disputed by the owner and the owner disagrees with the
amount of compensation determined by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 77.36 RCW
to read as follows:
The migratory waterfowl crop damage compensation account is created
in the state treasury. All voluntary donations, grants, and other
moneys provided to compensate the owners of commercial crops for damage
caused by migratory waterfowl must be deposited in the account. Moneys
in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures
from the account may be used only to compensate the owners of
commercial crops for damage caused by migratory waterfowl.

Sec. 4 RCW 67.28.1815 and 2008 c 264 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 67.28.180, all revenue from taxes imposed
under this chapter shall be credited to a special fund in the treasury
of the municipality imposing such tax and used solely for the purpose
of paying all or any part of the cost of tourism promotion, acquisition
of tourism-related facilities, or operation of tourism-related
facilities. After the effective date of this act, revenue from taxes
imposed under this chapter may be used to compensate landowners for
commercial crop damage caused by wildlife where such commercial crops
promote tourism by providing wildlife habitat. Municipalities may,
under chapter 39.34 RCW, agree to the utilization of revenue from taxes
imposed under this chapter for the purposes of funding a
multijurisdictional tourism-related facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1,
2010.

--- END ---