BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes the
obligation to ensure the well-being of persons with developmental
disabilities who are transferred between residential habilitation
centers, or discharged from a residential habilitation center to a
placement in the community. The legislature intends that the rights,
health, and safety of all such individuals shall be secure, and that
adequate support and services to meet the needs of these individuals
shall be provided. The quality and sufficiency of support and services
shall be monitored and assured, and progress and outcomes shall be
reported to the legislature.
(2) The legislature further intends that no individual may be moved
from an institutional to a community setting until sufficient services
and support arrangements are authorized and funded to assure the
individual's health, safety, personal well-being, and continued growth
and development in a stable home in the community.

Sec. 2 RCW 71A.10.050 and 1989 c 175 s 138 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An applicant or recipient or former recipient of a
developmental disabilities service under this title from the department
of social and health services has the right to appeal the following
department actions:
(a) A denial of an application for eligibility under RCW
71A.16.040;
(b) An unreasonable delay in acting on an application for
eligibility, for a service, or for an alternative service under RCW
71A.18.040;
(c) A denial, reduction, or termination of a service;
(d) A claim that the person owes a debt to the state for an
overpayment;
(e) A disagreement with an action of the secretary under RCW
71A.10.060 or 71A.10.070;
(f) A decision to return a resident of ((an [a])) a habilitation
center to the community; and
(g) A decision to change a person's placement from one category of
residential services to a different category of residential services.
The adjudicative proceeding is governed by the Administrative
Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) This subsection applies only to an adjudicative proceeding in
which the department action appealed is a decision to return a resident
of a habilitation center to the community. The resident or his or her
representative may appeal on the basis of whether the specific
placement decision is in the best interests of the resident. When the
resident or his or her representative files an application for an
adjudicative proceeding under this section the department has the
burden of proving that the specific placement decision is in the best
interests of the resident. There is a presumption that receiving
services in the most integrated setting is in the best interest of the
resident, if the secretary demonstrates that the services in the most
integrated setting meet the resident's individual needs.
(3) When the department takes any action described in subsection
(1) of this section it shall give notice as provided by RCW 71A.10.060.
The notice must include a statement advising the recipient of the right
to an adjudicative proceeding and the time limits for filing an
application for an adjudicative proceeding. Notice of a decision to
return a resident of a habilitation center to the community under RCW
71A.20.080 must also include a statement advising the recipient of the
right to file a petition for judicial review of an adverse adjudicative
order as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 71A.16.010 and 1998 c 216 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) It is the intention of the legislature in this chapter to
establish a single point of referral for persons with developmental
disabilities and their families so that they may have a place of entry
and continuing contact for services authorized under this title to
persons with developmental disabilities. Eligible persons with
developmental disabilities, whether they live in the community or
residential habilitation centers, should have the opportunity to choose
where they live from available options, which must include a funded
placement in the most integrated setting appropriate to the needs of
the qualified individual.
(((2) Until June 30, 2003, and subject to subsection (3) of this
section, if there is a vacancy in a residential habilitation center,
the department shall offer admittance to the center to any eligible
adult, or eligible adolescent on an exceptional case-by-case basis,
with developmental disabilities if his or her assessed needs require
the funded level of resources that are provided by the center.
(3) The department shall not offer a person admittance to a
residential habilitation center under subsection (2) of this section
unless the department also offers the person appropriate community
support services listed in RCW 71A.12.040.
(4) Community support services offered under subsection (3) of this
section may only be offered using funds specifically designated for
this purpose in the state operating budget. When these funds are
exhausted, the department may not offer admittance to a residential
habilitation center, or community support services under this section.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to create an
entitlement to state services for persons with developmental
disabilities.
(6) Subsections (2) through (6) of this section expire June 30,
2003.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 71A.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All residents of residential habilitation centers must be
offered placement on the appropriate home and community-based waiver in
order to meet the resident's assessed needs, and must thereafter be
provided with services that meet his or her needs and maintain his or
her welfare, health, and safety. The resident must have access to
these services for as long as the resident or his or her guardian
consents to their provision.
(2) The secretary shall establish a procedure for informing
residents of residential habilitation centers, and their guardian or
legal representatives, of the options for community placement, which
must include at least the following provisions:
(a) Information on options for community placement must be
presented at the time of admission, and continue through regular and
frequent in-person visits and interviews with individuals who receive
community-based services, their family members, and those who provide
them support.
(b) The procedure must include an offer of a funded community
placement, at least semiannually, that is tailored to meet the needs of
the resident.
(c) The offer of placement must be available within a reasonable
time, and include the opportunity to meet the provider and visit the
location of the placement. At least one placement option offered each
year must be a placement with a provider that, pursuant to department
rule or contract, cannot refuse admission, and cannot eject a
participant once accepted except when an alternative placement is
identified that is agreed to by the resident, guardian, or other legal
representative.
(d) The department shall document what steps were taken by the
guardian or legal representative, family, department, and others to
ascertain the preferences of the resident regarding placement. If a
guardian or other legal representative opposes community placement, the
department must make a specific inquiry regarding the reasons for the
objection and address each of the concerns with particularity. The
department must document all concerns expressed by the resident, his or
her family, and guardian or other legal representative regarding the
placement or the services offered and the responses offered by the
department to these concerns.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 71A.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All residents must have a plan for discharge to the community,
developed with the participation of the resident, guardian or legal
representative, family members and friends, residential habilitation
center staff, and staff from the central office of the division of
developmental disabilities with the authority to authorize services to
support community placement. The discharge plan must be developed
within thirty days of admission. The plan must include frequent,
ongoing activities in the community that will assist the resident and
his or her guardian, legal representative, and family in learning about
opportunities for support in the community. The discharge plan must be
the basis for the transition plan developed when a decision is made to
move to the community.
(2) The department shall ensure that an individualized transition
plan is developed with each resident prior to moving to the community,
with the full participation of the resident, his or her guardian or
other legal representative, family, residential habilitation center
staff, and community provider. This plan must ensure that in addition
to a residential placement that meets the individuals' needs, all
necessary ancillary services are authorized and funded at the time of
the move, including medical, dental, and pharmaceutical services,
behavioral and mental health support, employment or other day support,
and transportation or other support necessary to assist family and
friends in maintaining regular contact.

Sec. 6 RCW 71A.16.040 and 1989 c 175 s 141 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) On receipt of an application for services submitted under RCW
71A.16.030, the secretary in a timely manner shall make a written
determination as to whether the applicant is eligible for services
provided under this title for persons with developmental disabilities.
(2) The secretary shall give notice of the secretary's
determination on eligibility to the person who submitted the
application and to the applicant, if the applicant is a person other
than the person who submitted the application for services. The notice
shall also include a statement advising the recipient of the right to
an adjudicative proceeding under RCW 71A.10.050 and the right to
judicial review of the secretary's final decision.
(3) The secretary may establish rules for redetermination of
eligibility for services under this title.
(4) Persons who have been determined eligible for services prior to
discharge from a residential habilitation center shall continue to be
eligible for services thereafter, and shall subsequently be entitled to
all services for which they have an assessed need.

Sec. 7 RCW 71A.20.080 and 1989 c 175 s 143 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Whenever in the judgment of the secretary, the treatment and
training of any resident of a residential habilitation center has
progressed to the point that it is deemed advisable to return such
resident to the community, the secretary may grant placement on such
terms and conditions as the secretary may deem advisable after
consultation in the manner provided in RCW 71A.10.070. The secretary
shall give written notice of the decision to return a resident to the
community as provided in RCW 71A.10.060. The notice must include a
statement advising the recipient of the right to an adjudicative
proceeding under RCW 71A.10.050 and the time limits for filing an
application for an adjudicative proceeding. The notice must also
include a statement advising the recipient of the right to judicial
review of an adverse adjudicative order as provided in chapter 34.05
RCW.
(2) A placement decision shall not be implemented at any level
during any period during which an appeal can be taken or while an
appeal is pending and undecided, unless authorized by court order so
long as the appeal is being diligently pursued.
((The department of social and health services shall periodically
evaluate at reasonable intervals the adjustment of the resident to the
specific placement to determine whether the resident should be
continued in the placement or returned to the institution or given a
different placement.))
(3) The department shall establish and implement a written
procedure to be used to monitor the adjustment of each resident who
leaves a residential habilitation center. The department shall consult
with the developmental disabilities council, disability rights
Washington, University of Washington center for human development and
disability, residential habilitation center and field services staff,
community providers of residential services, and families and advocates
of persons with disabilities in developing and implementing this
procedure. Monitoring must include regular and frequent in-person
visits and interviews with former residents and guardians and family
members and friends of the former residents. The monitoring must be
conducted by a team that includes family members, guardians, and others
who are not department employees. The department shall respond
promptly and effectively to address needs and concerns identified in
the monitoring process. In addition to monitoring each resident's
progress and outcomes, the procedure must be integrated into the
department's quality assurance process. The monitoring of resident
adjustment must continue at least through December 31, 2020.
(4) The department shall provide the legislature with an annual
report that provides cumulative data and analysis and recommendations.
The report must provide data and analysis on at least the following:
(a) Resident and guardian levels of satisfaction with placement;
(b) Sufficiency and quality of services;
(c) Stability of placement and providers;
(d) Safety and health outcomes, including hospitalizations and
mortality;
(e) Incidents;
(f) Employment and day activities;
(g) Community involvement; and
(h) Accessibility of former residents to family, friends, and
guardians.

--- END ---