BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.110.020 and 2006 c 274 s 3 and 2006 c 36 s 17 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Administrator" means the person who is responsible for the
administration of the service contracts, the service contracts plan, or
the protection product guarantees.
(2) "Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner of this state.
(3) "Consumer" means an individual who buys any tangible personal
property that is primarily for personal, family, or household use.
(4) "Incidental costs" means expenses specified in the guarantee
incurred by the protection product guarantee holder related to damages
to other property caused by the failure of the protection product to
perform as provided in the guarantee. "Incidental costs" may include,
without limitation, insurance policy deductibles, rental vehicle
charges, the difference between the actual value of the stolen vehicle
at the time of theft and the cost of a replacement vehicle, sales
taxes, registration fees, transaction fees, and mechanical inspection
fees. Incidental costs may be paid under the provisions of the
protection product guarantee in either a fixed amount specified in the
protection product guarantee or sales agreement, or by the use of a
formula itemizing specific incidental costs incurred by the protection
product guarantee holder to be paid.
(5) "Protection product" means any product offered or sold with a
guarantee to repair or replace another product or pay incidental costs
upon the failure of the product to perform pursuant to the terms of the
protection product guarantee.
(6) "Protection product guarantee" means a written agreement by a
protection product guarantee provider to repair or replace another
product or pay incidental costs upon the failure of the protection
product to perform pursuant to the terms of the protection product
guarantee.
(7) "Protection product guarantee provider" means a person who is
contractually obligated to the protection product guarantee holder
under the terms of the protection product guarantee. Protection
product guarantee provider does not include an authorized insurer
providing a reimbursement insurance policy.
(8) "Protection product guarantee holder" means a person who is the
purchaser or permitted transferee of a protection product guarantee.
(9) "Protection product seller" means the person who sells the
protection product to the consumer.
(10) "Maintenance agreement" means a contract of limited duration
that provides for scheduled maintenance only.
(11) "Motor vehicle" means any vehicle subject to registration
under chapter 46.16 RCW.
(12) "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation,
incorporated or unincorporated association, joint stock company,
reciprocal insurer, syndicate, or any similar entity or combination of
entities acting in concert.
(13) "Premium" means the consideration paid to an insurer for a
reimbursement insurance policy.
(14) "Provider fee" means the consideration paid by a consumer for
a service contract.
(15) "Reimbursement insurance policy" means a policy of insurance
that is issued to a service contract provider or a protection product
guarantee provider to provide reimbursement to the service contract
provider or the protection product guarantee provider or to pay on
behalf of the service contract provider or the protection product
guarantee provider all contractual obligations incurred by the service
contract provider or the protection product guarantee provider under
the terms of the insured service contracts or protection product
guarantees issued or sold by the service contract provider or the
protection product guarantee provider.
(16)(a) "Service contract" means a contract or agreement for
consideration over and above the lease or purchase price of the
property for a specific duration to perform the repair, replacement, or
maintenance of property or the indemnification for repair, replacement,
or maintenance for operational or structural failure due to a defect in
materials or workmanship, or normal wear and tear. Service contracts
may provide for the repair, replacement, or maintenance of property for
damage resulting from power surges and accidental damage from handling,
with or without additional provision for incidental payment of
indemnity under limited circumstances, including towing, rental,
emergency road services, or other expenses relating to the failure of
the product or of a component part thereof.
(b) "Service contract" also includes a contract or agreement sold
for separately stated consideration for a specific duration to perform
the repair or replacement of tires and/or wheels damaged as a result of
coming into contact with road hazards including but not limited to
potholes, rocks, wood debris, metal parts, glass, plastic, curbs, or
composite scraps. However, a contract or agreement meeting the
definition under this subsection (16)(b) in which the party obligated
to perform is either a tire or wheel manufacturer or a motor vehicle
manufacturer is exempt from the requirements of this chapter.
(17) "Service contract holder" or "contract holder" means a person
who is the purchaser or holder of a service contract.
(18) "Service contract provider" means a person who is
contractually obligated to the service contract holder under the terms
of the service contract.
(19) "Service contract seller" means the person who sells the
service contract to the consumer.
(20) "Warranty" means a warranty made solely by the manufacturer,
importer, or seller of property or services without consideration; that
is not negotiated or separated from the sale of the product and is
incidental to the sale of the product; and that guarantees indemnity
for defective parts, mechanical or electrical breakdown, labor, or
other remedial measures, such as repair or replacement of the property
or repetition of services.
(21) "Home heating fuel service contract" means a contract or
agreement for a separately stated consideration for a specific duration
to perform the repair, replacement, or maintenance of a home heating
fuel supply system including the fuel tank and all visible pipes, caps,
lines, and associated parts or the indemnification for repair,
replacement, or maintenance for operational or structural failure due
to a defect in materials or workmanship, or normal wear and tear.

--- END ---