BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "cost of instruction" means
the average instructional support in state funds and operating fees per
full-time equivalent undergraduate, at each respective institution of
higher education for the prior academic year, as disclosed by the
higher education coordinating board under RCW 28B.76.300.
(2) Credits earned through advanced placement programs shall not be
applied to the total accumulated for the purposes of this section.
(3) For resident undergraduate students who have accumulated more
than one hundred twenty-five percent of the number of credits required
to complete their respective baccalaureate degree at a state
university, regional university, or The Evergreen State College,
tuition fees shall equal a sum not less than the cost of instruction.
(4) For nonresident undergraduate students who have accumulated
more than one hundred twenty-five percent of the number of credits
required to complete their respective baccalaureate degree at a state
university, regional university, or The Evergreen State College,
tuition fees shall equal a sum not less than twice the cost of
instruction.
(5) It is presumed that increased tuition fees will apply to all
students described in subsections (3) and (4) of this section unless
the student presents to his or her registrar evidence that one or more
of the following conditions apply:
(a) The student is a dislocated worker as defined in RCW 50.04.075
or a person engaging in a job training program under the purview of the
work force training and education coordinating board;
(b) The student participates in the border county higher education
opportunity project under RCW 28B.76.685;
(c) The student is a certificated teacher pursuing continuing
education credits according to certification requirements; or
(d) The student has not been enrolled in an institution of higher
education during the preceding five years.
(6) Students who believe they are under extraordinary or unforeseen
academic or personal circumstances or were unable to complete their
baccalaureate degree program within the number of credits specified due
to institutional constraints may petition the higher education
coordinating board for a special waiver from the tuition provisions of
subsections (3) and (4) of this section. The board shall create a
process through which student petitions may be fairly processed, heard,
and determined. The process shall include a one hundred dollar
administrative fee. The entire amount of the fee shall be refunded for
those students who make a successful petition.
(7) For students unable to enroll in a class required for the
student's major due to the sequencing of courses, if the student
enrolls in the class the next time it is offered, the institution of
higher education must waive the tuition and fees for that class.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Guaranteed tuition rate" means the full-time tuition rate paid
by resident undergraduate students that in fall 2011 or later are
enrolled for the first time as new students or transfer students at a
state university, regional university, or The Evergreen State College.
The guaranteed tuition rate shall be held constant for each new student
or transfer student for a period of time described in subsection (2) of
this section.
(b) "New students" means resident undergraduate students enrolled
at a state university, regional university, or The Evergreen State
College for the first time in fall 2011 or later and who have not
previously earned academic credits at an institution of higher
education except as students jointly enrolled in a Washington high
school and an institution of higher education or through advanced
placement credit.
(c) "Transfer students" means resident undergraduate students
enrolled at a state university, regional university, or The Evergreen
State College in fall 2011 or later who were previously enrolled at
another institution of higher education and have earned academic
credits.
(2)(a) The governing board of each state university, regional
university, and The Evergreen State College shall annually approve
guaranteed tuition rates.
(b) New students shall be charged the approved guaranteed tuition
rate, which shall be fixed for a period of four continuous academic
years.
(c) The guaranteed tuition rate for transfer students is the rate
in existence at the time the student enrolls in the institution of
higher education to which the student is transferring. This rate is
guaranteed for four academic years, beginning when the student first
enrolls at an institution of higher education, not from the time of
transferring.
(d) The guaranteed tuition rate may be extended for a period not
exceeding one academic year, at the respective governing boards'
discretion, for students enrolled in programs that require more than
four academic years to complete.
(e) A student eligible to receive the guaranteed tuition rate who
is called to active military duty shall receive an extension of the
guarantee equal to the time of active military service.
(f) The guaranteed tuition rate for new and transfer students
expires at the end of the periods described in this section. Students
whose initial guaranteed tuition rate expires shall thereafter pay the
guaranteed tuition rate established for the current academic year by
the institution's governing board, if section 1 of this act does not
apply.
(g) Each institution of higher education shall establish a process
to allow students to appeal their eligibility for the guaranteed
tuition rate based upon extenuating circumstances. Each institution of
higher education shall have the final decision on any appeal.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.15.067 and 2009 c 574 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this
chapter.
(2) Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year ((and ending with the
2012-13 academic year)), reductions or increases in full-time tuition
fees for resident undergraduates at a community or technical college
shall be as provided in the omnibus appropriations act.
(3)(a) Beginning with the ((2003-04)) 2011-12 academic year ((and
ending with the 2012-13 academic year)), the governing boards of the
state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State
College, and the state board for community and technical colleges may
reduce or increase full-time tuition fees for all students other than
resident undergraduates at community and technical colleges, including
summer school students and students in other self-supporting degree
programs. Percentage increases in full-time tuition fees may exceed
the fiscal growth factor. Reductions or increases may be made for all
or portions of an institution's programs, campuses, courses, or
students.
(((b) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic
year, the governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College shall consult with
existing student associations or organizations with student
undergraduate and graduate representatives regarding the impacts of
potential tuition increases. Governing boards shall be required to
provide data regarding the percentage of students receiving financial
aid, the sources of aid, and the percentage of total costs of
attendance paid for by aid.
(c) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year,
each college in the state board for community and technical college
system shall consult with existing student associations or
organizations with undergraduate student representation regarding the
impacts of potential tuition increases. Colleges shall provide data
regarding the percentage of students receiving financial aid, the
sources of aid, and the percentage of total costs of attendance paid
for by aid.
(4) Academic year tuition for full-time students at the state's
institutions of higher education beginning with 2015-16, other than
summer term, shall be as charged during the 2014-15 academic year
unless different rates are adopted by the legislature.
(5))) (4) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not
apply to high school students enrolling in participating institutions
of higher education under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400.
(((6) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not
apply to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical
college under RCW 28C.04.610.
(7))) (5) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not
apply to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical
college participating in the pilot program under RCW 28B.50.534 for the
purpose of obtaining a high school diploma.
(((8))) (6) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09, the
University of Washington shall use an amount equivalent to ten percent
of all revenues received as a result of law school tuition increases
beginning in academic year 2000-01 through academic year 2008-09 to
assist needy low and middle-income resident law students.
(((9))) (7) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09,
institutions of higher education shall use an amount equivalent to ten
percent of all revenues received as a result of graduate academic
school tuition increases beginning in academic year 2003-04 through
academic year 2008-09 to assist needy low and middle-income resident
graduate academic students.
(((10))) (8) Any tuition increases above seven percent shall fund
costs of instruction, library and student services, utilities and
maintenance, other costs related to instruction as well as
institutional financial aid. Through 2010-11, any funding reductions
to instruction, library and student services, utilities and maintenance
and other costs related to instruction shall be proportionally less
than other program areas including administration.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.15.100 and 2003 c 232 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community colleges
shall charge to and collect from each of the students registering at
the particular institution for any quarter or semester such tuition
fees and services and activities fees, and other fees as such board
shall in its discretion determine. The total of all fees shall be
rounded to the nearest whole dollar amount: PROVIDED, That such
tuition fees shall be established in accordance with sections 1 and 2
of this act and RCW 28B.15.067.
(2) Part-time students shall be charged tuition and services and
activities fees proportionate to full-time student rates established
for residents and nonresidents: PROVIDED, That except for students
registered at community colleges, students registered for fewer than
two credit hours shall be charged tuition and services and activities
fees at the rate established for two credit hours: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That, subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, residents of Idaho
or Oregon who are enrolled in community college district number twenty
for six or fewer credits during any quarter or semester may be exempted
from payment of all or a portion of the nonresident tuition fees
differential upon a declaration by the higher education coordinating
board that it finds Washington residents from the community college
district are afforded substantially equivalent treatment by such other
states.
(3) Full-time students registered for more than eighteen credit
hours shall be charged an additional operating fee for each credit hour
in excess of eighteen hours at the applicable established per credit
hour tuition fee rate for part-time students: PROVIDED, That, subject
to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state
universities and the community colleges may exempt all or a portion of
the additional charge, for students who are registered exclusively in
first professional programs in medicine, dental medicine, veterinary
medicine, doctor of pharmacy, or law, or who are registered exclusively
in required courses in vocational preparatory programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28B.92 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, a state university,
regional university, or The Evergreen State College shall waive full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduate students as follows:
(a) Students whose family incomes are at or below fifty percent of
the state's median family income shall receive a waiver equal to one
hundred percent of full-time tuition fees;
(b) Students whose family incomes are greater than fifty percent
and less than seventy-five percent of the state's median family income
shall receive a waiver equal to seventy-five percent of full-time
tuition fees;
(c) Students whose family incomes are at or exceed seventy-five
percent and are less than one hundred percent of the state's median
family income shall receive a waiver equal to fifty percent of full-time tuition fees; and
(d) Students whose family incomes are at or exceed one hundred one
percent and are less than one hundred twenty-five percent of the
state's median family income shall receive a waiver equal to twenty-five percent of full-time tuition fees.
(2)(a) If an institution's full-time tuition fees for resident
undergraduate students exceed five percent of the state's median family
income for a family of four, then subsection (1)(a) of this section
applies.
(b) If an institution's full-time tuition fees for resident
undergraduate students exceed ten percent of the state's median family
income for a family of four, then subsection (1)(b) of this section
also applies.
(c) If an institution's full-time tuition fees for resident
undergraduate students exceed fifteen percent of the state's median
family income for a family of four, then subsection (1)(c) of this
section also applies.
(d) If an institution's full-time tuition fees for resident
undergraduate students exceed twenty percent of the state's median
family income for a family of four, then subsection (1)(d) of this
section also applies.
(3) The waivers required in subsection (1) of this section shall be
reduced by the amount of any state need grant and other financial aid
awards.
(4) Waivers shall be made under this section only to the extent
that the student has not exceeded the credits identified in section 1
of this act.
(5) This section applies beginning with the 2011-12 academic year.

Sec. 6 RCW 28B.15.031 and 2003 c 232 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The term "operating fees" as used in this chapter shall include the
fees, other than building fees, charged all students registering at the
state's colleges and universities but shall not include fees for short
courses, self-supporting degree credit programs and courses, marine
station work, experimental station work, correspondence or extension
courses, and individual instruction and student deposits or rentals,
disciplinary and library fines, which colleges and universities shall
have the right to impose, laboratory, gymnasium, health, technology and
student activity fees, or fees, charges, rentals, and other income
derived from any or all revenue producing lands, buildings and
facilities of the colleges or universities heretofore or hereafter
acquired, constructed or installed, including but not limited to income
from rooms, dormitories, dining rooms, hospitals, infirmaries, housing
or student activity buildings, vehicular parking facilities, land, or
the appurtenances thereon, or such other special fees as may be
established by any college or university board of trustees or regents
from time to time. All moneys received as operating fees at any
institution of higher education shall be deposited in a local account
containing only operating fees revenue and related interest((:
PROVIDED, That a minimum of three and one-half percent of operating
fees shall be retained by the institutions for the purposes of RCW
28B.15.820)). Local tuition operating fee accounts shall ((not)) be
subject to appropriation by the legislature ((or)) and to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.

--- END ---