BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes one of its
foremost duties is the prioritization and wise use of taxpayer funds.
The legislature concludes that the placement of art at a correctional
facility is not a priority over other state programs such as education
and public safety, and further expenditures on such activities
constitute a misuse and waste of taxpayer funds. To prevent such
misuse of taxpayer dollars, the legislature hereby intends to prohibit
the expenditure of public funds on placement of works of art in the
special commitment center on McNeil Island, secure community transition
facilities and other halfway houses operated by the department of
social and health services to house persons subject to the community
protection act of 1990, and facilities operated by the department of
corrections.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.17.200 and 2005 c 36 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
All state agencies including all state departments, boards,
councils, commissions, and quasi public corporations shall allocate, as
a nondeductible item, out of any moneys appropriated for the original
construction of any public building, an amount of one-half of one
percent of the appropriation to be expended by the Washington state
arts commission for the acquisition of works of art; however, no moneys
shall be expended on, nor allocated for, the acquisition or placement
of works of art in the special commitment center on McNeil Island,
secure community transition facilities and other halfway houses
operated by the department of social and health services to house
persons subject to the community protection act of 1990, or any
facility operated by the department of corrections. The works of art
may be placed on public lands, integral to or attached to a public
building or structure, detached within or outside a public building or
structure, part of a portable exhibition or collection, part of a
temporary exhibition, or loaned or exhibited in other public
facilities. In addition to the cost of the works of art, the one-half
of one percent of the appropriation as provided herein shall be used to
provide for the administration of the visual arts program, including
conservation of the state art collection, by the Washington state arts
commission and all costs for installation of the works of art. For the
purpose of this section building shall not include highway construction
sheds, warehouses or other buildings of a temporary nature.

--- END ---