BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature intends to include the
program for highly capable students as part of the definition of basic
education effective September 1, 2011. Before the program is
implemented as a basic education program, work must be done to
establish standards, guidelines, and definitions for what constitutes
a basic education program for highly capable students who excel
intellectually, academically, and artistically and the appropriate
funding structure for such a program.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
convene a technical working group with representatives who have
significant expertise in the education of highly capable and gifted
students. The working group may convene advisory subgroups on specific
topics as necessary to assure participation and input from a broad
array of diverse stakeholders. The working group must consult with and
seek input from nationally recognized experts; researchers and
academics on the unique educational, emotional, and social needs of
highly capable students and how to identify such students;
representatives of national organizations and associations for
educators of or advocates for highly capable students; school district
representatives who are educators, counselors, and classified school
employees involved with highly capable programs; parents of students
who have been identified as highly capable; representatives from the
federally recognized tribes; and representatives of cultural,
linguistic, and racial minority groups and the community of persons
with disabilities.
(3) The working group shall make recommendations to the quality
education council and to appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2010. The recommendations shall minimize
overrepresentation and underrepresentation of any particular
demographic or socioeconomic group relative to the presence of this
group in the overall student population, and shall include the
following:
(a) Standardized state-level identification procedures, standards,
criteria, and benchmarks, including a definition or definitions of a
highly capable student. Students who are both highly capable and are
students of color, are poor, or have a disability must be addressed;
(b) Appropriate programs and services that have been shown by
research and practice to be effective with highly capable students but
maintain options and flexibility for school districts, where possible;
(c) Program administration, management, and reporting requirements
for school districts;
(d) Appropriate educator qualifications, certification
requirements, and professional development and support for educators
and other staff who are involved in programs for highly capable
students;
(e) Self-evaluation models to be used by school districts to
determine the effectiveness of the program and services provided by the
school district for highly capable programs;
(f) An appropriate state-level funding structure; and
(g) Other topics deemed to be relevant by the working group.
(4) The recommendations shall take into consideration that access
to the program for highly capable students is not an individual
entitlement for any particular student.
(5) This section expires August 1, 2011.

--- END ---