BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.175.035 and 2007 c 408 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall:
(a) Identify criteria for grants and evaluate proposals for funding
in consultation with the workforce training and education coordinating
board;
(b) Develop and monitor requirements for grant recipients to:
(i) Identify students who both fail the ((Washington)) statewide
assessments ((of student learning)) and drop out of school;
(ii) Identify their own strengths and gaps in services provided to
youth;
(iii) Set their own local goals for program outcomes;
(iv) Use research-based and emerging best practices that lead to
positive outcomes in implementing the building bridges program; and
(v) Coordinate an outreach campaign to bring public and private
organizations together and to provide information about the building
bridges program to the local community;
(c) In setting the requirements under (b) of this subsection,
encourage creativity and provide for flexibility in implementing the
local building bridges program;
(d) Identify and disseminate successful practices;
(e) Develop requirements for grant recipients to collect and report
data, including, but not limited to:
(i) The number of and demographics of students served including,
but not limited to, information regarding a student's race and
ethnicity, a student's household income, a student's housing status,
whether a student is a foster youth or youth involved in the juvenile
justice system, whether a student is disabled, and the primary language
spoken at a student's home;
(ii) ((Washington)) Statewide assessments ((of student learning))
scores;
(iii) Dropout rates;
(iv) On-time graduation rates;
(v) Extended graduation rates;
(vi) Credentials obtained;
(vii) Absenteeism rates;
(viii) Truancy rates; and
(ix) Credit retrieval;
(f) Contract with a third party to evaluate the infrastructure and
implementation of the partnership including the leveraging of outside
resources that relate to the goal of the partnership. The third-party
contractor shall also evaluate the performance and effectiveness of the
partnerships relative to the type of entity, as identified in RCW
28A.175.045, serving as the lead agency for the partnership; and
(g) Report to the legislature by December 1, 2008.
(2) In performing its duties under this section, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction is encouraged to consult with the
work group identified in RCW 28A.175.075.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.305.130 and 2009 c 548 s 502 are each amended to
read as follows:
The purpose of the state board of education is to provide advocacy
and strategic oversight of public education; implement a standards-based accountability framework that creates a unified system of
increasing levels of support for schools in order to improve student
academic achievement; provide leadership in the creation of a system
that personalizes education for each student and respects diverse
cultures, abilities, and learning styles; and promote achievement of
the goals of RCW 28A.150.210. In addition to any other powers and
duties as provided by law, the state board of education shall:
(1) Hold regularly scheduled meetings at such time and place within
the state as the board shall determine and may hold such special
meetings as may be deemed necessary for the transaction of public
business;
(2) Form committees as necessary to effectively and efficiently
conduct the work of the board;
(3) Seek advice from the public and interested parties regarding
the work of the board;
(4) For purposes of statewide accountability:
(a) Adopt and revise performance improvement goals in reading,
writing, science, and mathematics, by subject and grade level, once
assessments in these subjects are required statewide; academic and
technical skills, as appropriate, in secondary career and technical
education programs; and student attendance, as the board deems
appropriate to improve student learning. The goals shall be consistent
with student privacy protection provisions of RCW 28A.655.090(7) and
shall not conflict with requirements contained in Title I of the
federal elementary and secondary education act of 1965, or the
requirements of the Carl D. Perkins vocational education act of 1998,
each as amended. The goals may be established for all students,
economically disadvantaged students, limited English proficient
students, students with disabilities, and students from
disproportionately academically underachieving racial and ethnic
backgrounds. The board may establish school and school district goals
addressing high school graduation rates and dropout reduction goals for
students in grades seven through twelve. The board shall adopt the
goals by rule. However, before each goal is implemented, the board
shall present the goal to the education committees of the house of
representatives and the senate for the committees' review and comment
in a time frame that will permit the legislature to take statutory
action on the goal if such action is deemed warranted by the
legislature;
(b) Identify the scores students must achieve in order to meet the
standard on the ((Washington)) statewide assessments ((of student
learning)) and, for high school students, to obtain a certificate of
academic achievement. The board shall also determine student scores
that identify levels of student performance below and beyond the
standard. The board shall consider the incorporation of the standard
error of measurement into the decision regarding the award of the
certificates. The board shall set such performance standards and
levels in consultation with the superintendent of public instruction
and after consideration of any recommendations that may be developed by
any advisory committees that may be established for this purpose. The
initial performance standards and any changes recommended by the board
in the performance standards for the tenth grade assessment shall be
presented to the education committees of the house of representatives
and the senate by November 30th of the school year in which the changes
will take place to permit the legislature to take statutory action
before the changes are implemented if such action is deemed warranted
by the legislature. The legislature shall be advised of the initial
performance standards and any changes made to the elementary level
performance standards and the middle school level performance
standards;
(c) Annually review the assessment reporting system to ensure
fairness, accuracy, timeliness, and equity of opportunity, especially
with regard to schools with special circumstances and unique
populations of students, and a recommendation to the superintendent of
public instruction of any improvements needed to the system; and
(d) Include in the biennial report required under RCW 28A.305.035,
information on the progress that has been made in achieving goals
adopted by the board;
(5) Accredit, subject to such accreditation standards and
procedures as may be established by the state board of education, all
private schools that apply for accreditation, and approve, subject to
the provisions of RCW 28A.195.010, private schools carrying out a
program for any or all of the grades kindergarten through twelve:
PROVIDED, That no private school may be approved that operates a
kindergarten program only: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no private schools
shall be placed upon the list of accredited schools so long as secret
societies are knowingly allowed to exist among its students by school
officials;
(6) Articulate with the institutions of higher education, workforce
representatives, and early learning policymakers and providers to
coordinate and unify the work of the public school system;
(7) Hire an executive director and an administrative assistant to
reside in the office of the superintendent of public instruction for
administrative purposes. Any other personnel of the board shall be
appointed as provided by RCW 28A.300.020. The board may delegate to
the executive director by resolution such duties as deemed necessary to
efficiently carry on the business of the board including, but not
limited to, the authority to employ necessary personnel and the
authority to enter into, amend, and terminate contracts on behalf of
the board. The executive director, administrative assistant, and all
but one of the other personnel of the board are exempt from civil
service, together with other staff as now or hereafter designated as
exempt in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW; and
(8) Adopt a seal that shall be kept in the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.305.141 and 2009 c 543 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to waivers authorized under RCW 28A.305.140 and
28A.655.180, the state board of education may grant waivers from the
requirement for a one hundred eighty-day school year under RCW
28A.150.220 and 28A.150.250 to school districts that propose to operate
one or more schools on a flexible calendar for purposes of economy and
efficiency as provided in this section. The requirement under RCW
28A.150.220 that school districts offer an annual average instructional
hour offering of at least one thousand hours shall not be waived.
(2) A school district seeking a waiver under this section must
submit an application that includes:
(a) A proposed calendar for the school day and school year that
demonstrates how the instructional hour requirement will be maintained;
(b) An explanation and estimate of the economies and efficiencies
to be gained from compressing the instructional hours into fewer than
one hundred eighty days;
(c) An explanation of how monetary savings from the proposal will
be redirected to support student learning;
(d) A summary of comments received at one or more public hearings
on the proposal and how concerns will be addressed;
(e) An explanation of the impact on students who rely upon free
((and)) or reduced-price school child nutrition services and the impact
on the ability of the child nutrition program to operate an
economically independent program;
(f) An explanation of the impact on the ability to recruit and
retain employees in education support positions;
(g) An explanation of the impact on students whose parents work
during the missed school day; and
(h) Other information that the state board of education may request
to assure that the proposed flexible calendar will not adversely affect
student learning.
(3) The state board of education shall adopt criteria to evaluate
waiver requests. No more than five districts may be granted waivers.
Waivers may be granted for up to three years. After each school year,
the state board of education shall analyze empirical evidence to
determine whether the reduction is affecting student learning. If the
state board of education determines that student learning is adversely
affected, the school district shall discontinue the flexible calendar
as soon as possible but not later than the beginning of the next school
year after the determination has been made. All waivers expire August
31, 2014.
(a) Two of the five waivers granted under this subsection shall be
granted to school districts with student populations of less than one
hundred fifty students.
(b) Three of the five waivers granted under this subsection shall
be granted to school districts with student populations of between one
hundred fifty-one and five hundred students.
(4) The state board of education shall examine the waivers granted
under this section and make a recommendation to the education
committees of the legislature by December 15, 2013, regarding whether
the waiver program should be continued, modified, or allowed to
terminate. This recommendation should focus on whether the program
resulted in improved student learning as demonstrated by empirical
evidence. Such evidence includes, but is not limited to: Improved
scores on the ((Washington)) statewide assessments ((of student
learning)), results of the dynamic indicators of basic early literacy
skills, student grades, and attendance.
(5) This section expires August 31, 2014.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.320.190 and 2009 c 578 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The extended learning opportunities program is created for
eligible eleventh and twelfth grade students who are not on track to
meet local or state graduation requirements as well as eighth grade
students who need additional assistance in order to have the
opportunity for a successful entry into high school. The program shall
provide early notification of graduation status and information on
education opportunities including preapprenticeship programs that are
available.
(2) Under the extended learning opportunities program and to the
extent funds are available for that purpose, districts shall make
available to students in grade twelve who have failed to meet one or
more local or state graduation requirements the option of continuing
enrollment in the school district in accordance with RCW 28A.225.160.
Districts are authorized to use basic education program funding to
provide instruction to eligible students under RCW 28A.150.220(((3)))
(5).
(3) Under the extended learning opportunities program,
instructional services for eligible students can occur during the
regular school day, evenings, on weekends, or at a time and location
deemed appropriate by the school district, including the educational
service district, in order to meet the needs of these students.
Instructional services provided under this section do not include
services offered at private schools. Instructional services can
include, but are not limited to, the following:
(a) Individual or small group instruction;
(b) Instruction in English language arts and/or mathematics that
eligible students need to pass all or part of the ((Washington))
statewide assessment ((of student learning));
(c) Attendance in a public high school or public alternative school
classes or at a skill center;
(d) Inclusion in remediation programs, including summer school;
(e) Language development instruction for English language learners;
(f) Online curriculum and instructional support, including programs
for credit retrieval and ((Washington)) statewide assessment ((of
student learning)) preparatory classes; and
(g) Reading improvement specialists available at the educational
service districts to serve eighth, eleventh, and twelfth grade
educators through professional development in accordance with RCW
28A.415.350. The reading improvement specialist may also provide
direct services to eligible students and those students electing to
continue a fifth year in a high school program who are still struggling
with basic reading skills.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.600.405 and 2007 c 355 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section and RCW 28B.50.534, "eligible
student" means a student who has completed all state and local high
school graduation requirements except the certificate of academic
achievement under RCW 28A.655.061 or the certificate of individual
achievement under RCW 28A.155.045, who is less than age twenty-one as
of September 1st of the academic year the student enrolls at a
community and technical college under this section, and who meets the
following criteria:
(a) Receives a level 2 (basic) score on the reading and writing
content areas of the high school ((Washington)) statewide assessment
((of student learning));
(b) Has not successfully met state standards on a retake of the
assessment or an alternative assessment;
(c) Has participated in assessment remediation; and
(d) Receives a recommendation to enroll in courses or a program of
study made available under RCW 28B.50.534 from his or her high school
principal.
(2) An eligible student may enroll in courses or a program of study
made available by a community or technical college participating in the
pilot program created under RCW 28B.50.534 for the purpose of obtaining
a high school diploma.
(3) For eligible students in courses or programs delivered directly
by the community or technical college participating in the pilot
program under RCW 28B.50.534 and only for enrollment in courses that
lead to a high school diploma, the superintendent of public instruction
shall transmit to the colleges participating in the pilot program an
amount per each full-time equivalent college student at statewide
uniform rates. The amount shall be the sum of (a), (b), (c), and (d)
of this subsection, as applicable.
(a) The superintendent shall separately calculate and allocate
moneys appropriated for basic education under RCW 28A.150.260 for
purposes of making payments under this section. The calculations and
allocations shall be based upon the estimated statewide annual average
per full-time equivalent high school student allocations under RCW
28A.150.260, excluding small high school enhancements, and applicable
rules adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(b) The superintendent shall allocate an amount equal to the per
funded student state allocation for the learning assistance program
under chapter 28A.165 RCW for each full-time equivalent college student
or a pro rata amount for less than full-time enrollment.
(c) The superintendent shall allocate an amount equal to the per
full-time equivalent student allocation for the student achievement
program under RCW 28A.505.210 for each full-time equivalent college
student or a pro rata amount for less than full-time enrollment.
(d) For eligible students who meet eligibility criteria for the
state transitional bilingual instruction program under chapter 28A.180
RCW, the superintendent shall allocate an amount equal to the per
student state allocation for the transitional bilingual instruction
program or a pro rata amount for less than full-time enrollment.
(4) The superintendent may adopt rules establishing enrollment
reporting, recordkeeping, and accounting requirements necessary to
ensure accountability for the use of basic education, learning
assistance, and transitional bilingual program funds under this section
for the pilot program created under RCW 28B.50.534.
(5) All school districts in the geographic area of the two
community and technical colleges selected pursuant to section 8,
chapter 355, Laws of 2007 to participate in the pilot program shall
provide information about the high school completion option under RCW
28B.50.534 to students in grades ten, eleven, and twelve and the
parents or guardians of those students.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.655.061 and 2009 c 524 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The high school assessment system shall include but need not be
limited to the ((Washington)) statewide assessment ((of student
learning)), opportunities for a student to retake the content areas of
the assessment in which the student was not successful, and if approved
by the legislature pursuant to subsection (10) of this section, one or
more objective alternative assessments for a student to demonstrate
achievement of state academic standards. The objective alternative
assessments for each content area shall be comparable in rigor to the
skills and knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the
((Washington)) statewide assessment ((of student learning)) for each
content area.
(2) Subject to the conditions in this section, a certificate of
academic achievement shall be obtained by most students at about the
age of sixteen, and is evidence that the students have successfully met
the state standard in the content areas included in the certificate.
With the exception of students satisfying the provisions of RCW
28A.155.045 or 28A.655.0611, acquisition of the certificate is required
for graduation from a public high school but is not the only
requirement for graduation.
(3) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008, with the exception
of students satisfying the provisions of RCW 28A.155.045, a student who
meets the state standards on the reading, writing, and mathematics
content areas of the high school ((Washington)) statewide assessment
((of student learning)) shall earn a certificate of academic
achievement. If a student does not successfully meet the state
standards in one or more content areas required for the certificate of
academic achievement, then the student may retake the assessment in the
content area up to four times at no cost to the student. If the
student successfully meets the state standards on a retake of the
assessment then the student shall earn a certificate of academic
achievement. Once objective alternative assessments are authorized
pursuant to subsection (10) of this section, a student may use the
objective alternative assessments to demonstrate that the student
successfully meets the state standards for that content area if the
student has taken the ((Washington)) statewide assessment ((of student
learning)) at least once. If the student successfully meets the state
standards on the objective alternative assessments then the student
shall earn a certificate of academic achievement.
(4) Beginning no later than with the graduating class of 2013, a
student must meet the state standards in science in addition to the
other content areas required under subsection (3) of this section on
the ((Washington)) statewide assessment ((of student learning)) or the
objective alternative assessments in order to earn a certificate of
academic achievement. The state board of education may adopt a rule
that implements the requirements of this subsection (4) beginning with
a graduating class before the graduating class of 2013, if the state
board of education adopts the rule by September 1st of the freshman
school year of the graduating class to which the requirements of this
subsection (4) apply. The state board of education's authority under
this subsection (4) does not alter the requirement that any change in
performance standards for the tenth grade assessment must comply with
RCW 28A.305.130.
(5) The state board of education may not require the acquisition of
the certificate of academic achievement for students in home-based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW, for students enrolled in private
schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or for students satisfying the
provisions of RCW 28A.155.045.
(6) A student may retain and use the highest result from each
successfully completed content area of the high school assessment.
(7) School districts must make available to students the following
options:
(a) To retake the ((Washington)) statewide assessment ((of student
learning)) up to four times in the content areas in which the student
did not meet the state standards if the student is enrolled in a public
school; or
(b) To retake the ((Washington)) statewide assessment ((of student
learning)) up to four times in the content areas in which the student
did not meet the state standards if the student is enrolled in a high
school completion program at a community or technical college. The
superintendent of public instruction and the state board for community
and technical colleges shall jointly identify means by which students
in these programs can be assessed.
(8) Students who achieve the standard in a content area of the high
school assessment but who wish to improve their results shall pay for
retaking the assessment, using a uniform cost determined by the
superintendent of public instruction.
(9) Opportunities to retake the assessment at least twice a year
shall be available to each school district.
(10)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall develop options for implementing objective alternative
assessments, which may include an appeals process for students' scores,
for students to demonstrate achievement of the state academic
standards. The objective alternative assessments shall be comparable
in rigor to the skills and knowledge that the student must demonstrate
on the ((Washington)) statewide assessments ((of student learning)) and
be objective in its determination of student achievement of the state
standards. Before any objective alternative assessments in addition to
those authorized in RCW 28A.655.065 or (b) of this subsection are used
by a student to demonstrate that the student has met the state
standards in a content area required to obtain a certificate, the
legislature shall formally approve the use of any objective alternative
assessments through the omnibus appropriations act or by statute or
concurrent resolution.
(b)(i) A student's score on the mathematics, reading or English, or
writing portion of the SAT or the ACT may be used as an objective
alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating that a
student has met or exceeded the state standards for the certificate of
academic achievement. The state board of education shall identify the
scores students must achieve on the relevant portion of the SAT or ACT
to meet or exceed the state standard in the relevant content area on
the ((Washington)) statewide assessment ((of student learning)). The
state board of education shall identify the first scores by December 1,
2007. After the first scores are established, the state board may
increase but not decrease the scores required for students to meet or
exceed the state standards.
(ii) Until August 31, 2008, a student's score on the mathematics
portion of the PSAT may be used as an objective alternative assessment
under this section for demonstrating that a student has met or exceeded
the state standard for the certificate of academic achievement. The
state board of education shall identify the score students must achieve
on the mathematics portion of the PSAT to meet or exceed the state
standard in that content area on the ((Washington)) statewide
assessment ((of student learning)).
(iii) A student who scores at least a three on the grading scale of
one to five for selected AP examinations may use the score as an
objective alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating
that a student has met or exceeded state standards for the certificate
of academic achievement. A score of three on the AP examinations in
calculus or statistics may be used as an alternative assessment for the
mathematics portion of the ((Washington)) statewide assessment ((of
student learning)). A score of three on the AP examinations in English
language and composition may be used as an alternative assessment for
the writing portion of the ((Washington)) statewide assessment ((of
student learning)). A score of three on the AP examinations in English
literature and composition, macroeconomics, microeconomics, psychology,
United States history, world history, United States government and
politics, or comparative government and politics may be used as an
alternative assessment for the reading portion of the ((Washington))
statewide assessment ((of student learning)).
(11) By December 15, 2004, the house of representatives and senate
education committees shall obtain information and conclusions from
recognized, independent, national assessment experts regarding the
validity and reliability of the high school ((Washington)) statewide
assessment ((of student learning)) for making individual student high
school graduation determinations.
(12) To help assure continued progress in academic achievement as
a foundation for high school graduation and to assure that students are
on track for high school graduation, each school district shall prepare
plans for and notify students and their parents or legal guardians as
provided in this subsection (12).
(a) Student learning plans are required for eighth through twelfth
grade students who were not successful on any or all of the content
areas of the ((Washington)) statewide assessments ((for student
learning)) during the previous school year or who may not be on track
to graduate due to credit deficiencies or absences. The parent or
legal guardian shall be notified about the information in the student
learning plan, preferably through a parent conference and at least
annually. To the extent feasible, schools serving English language
learner students and their parents shall translate the plan into the
primary language of the family. The plan shall include the following
information as applicable:
(i) The student's results on the ((Washington)) statewide
assessments ((of student learning));
(ii) If the student is in the transitional bilingual program, the
score on his or her Washington language proficiency test II;
(iii) Any credit deficiencies;
(iv) The student's attendance rates over the previous two years;
(v) The student's progress toward meeting state and local
graduation requirements;
(vi) The courses, competencies, and other steps needed to be taken
by the student to meet state academic standards and stay on track for
graduation;
(vii) Remediation strategies and alternative education options
available to students, including informing students of the option to
continue to receive instructional services after grade twelve or until
the age of twenty-one;
(viii) The alternative assessment options available to students
under this section and RCW 28A.655.065;
(ix) School district programs, high school courses, and career and
technical education options available for students to meet graduation
requirements; and
(x) Available programs offered through skill centers or community
and technical colleges, including the college high school diploma
options under RCW 28B.50.535.
(b) All fifth grade students who were not successful in one or more
of the content areas of the fourth grade ((Washington)) statewide
assessment ((of student learning)) shall have a student learning plan.
(i) The parent or guardian of the student shall be notified,
preferably through a parent conference, of the student's results on the
((Washington)) statewide assessment ((of student learning)), actions
the school intends to take to improve the student's skills in any
content area in which the student was unsuccessful, and provide
strategies to help them improve their student's skills.
(ii) Progress made on the student plan shall be reported to the
student's parents or guardian at least annually and adjustments to the
plan made as necessary.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.655.0611 and 2009 c 17 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008 and through no
later than the graduating class of 2012, students may graduate from
high school without earning a certificate of academic achievement or a
certificate of individual achievement if they:
(a) Have not successfully met the mathematics standard on the high
school ((Washington)) statewide assessment ((of student learning)), an
approved objective alternative assessment, or an alternate assessment
developed for eligible special education students;
(b) Have successfully met the state standard in the other content
areas required for a certificate under RCW 28A.655.061 or 28A.155.045;
(c) Have met all other state and school district graduation
requirements; and
(d)(i) For the graduating class of 2008, successfully earn one high
school mathematics credit or career and technical course equivalent,
including courses offered at skill centers, after the student's
eleventh grade year intended to increase the student's mathematics
proficiency toward meeting or exceeding the mathematics standards
assessed on the high school ((Washington)) statewide assessment ((of
student learning)); and
(ii) For the remaining graduating classes under this section,
successfully earn two mathematics credits or career and technical
course equivalent, including courses offered at skill centers, after
the student's tenth grade year intended to increase the student's
mathematics proficiency toward meeting or exceeding the mathematics
standards assessed on the high school ((Washington)) statewide
assessment ((of student learning)).
(2) The state board of education may adopt a rule that ends the
application of this section with a graduating class before the
graduating class of 2012, if the state board of education adopts the
rule by September 1st of the freshman school year of the graduating
class to which the provisions of this section no longer apply. The
state board of education's authority under this section does not alter
the requirement that any change in performance standards for the tenth
grade assessment must comply with RCW 28A.305.130.
(3) This section expires August 31, 2013.

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.655.065 and 2009 c 556 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature has made a commitment to rigorous academic
standards for receipt of a high school diploma. The primary way that
students will demonstrate that they meet the standards in reading,
writing, mathematics, and science is through the ((Washington))
statewide assessments ((of student learning)). Only objective
assessments that are comparable in rigor to the state assessment are
authorized as an alternative assessment. Before seeking an alternative
assessment, the legislature expects students to make a genuine effort
to meet state standards, through regular and consistent attendance at
school and participation in extended learning and other assistance
programs.
(2) Under RCW 28A.655.061, beginning in the 2006-07 school year,
the superintendent of public instruction shall implement objective
alternative assessment methods as provided in this section for students
to demonstrate achievement of the state standards in content areas in
which the student has not yet met the standard on the high school
((Washington)) statewide assessment ((of student learning)). A student
may access an alternative if the student meets applicable eligibility
criteria in RCW 28A.655.061 and this section and other eligibility
criteria established by the superintendent of public instruction,
including but not limited to attendance criteria and participation in
the remediation or supplemental instruction contained in the student
learning plan developed under RCW 28A.655.061. A school district may
waive attendance and/or remediation criteria for special, unavoidable
circumstances.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "applicant" means a student
seeking to use one of the alternative assessment methods in this
section.
(4) One alternative assessment method shall be a combination of the
applicant's grades in applicable courses and the applicant's highest
score on the high school ((Washington)) statewide assessment ((of
student learning)), as provided in this subsection. A student is
eligible to apply for the alternative assessment method under this
subsection (4) if the student has a cumulative grade point average of
at least 3.2 on a four point grading scale. The superintendent of
public instruction shall determine which high school courses are
applicable to the alternative assessment method and shall issue
guidelines to school districts.
(a) Using guidelines prepared by the superintendent of public
instruction, a school district shall identify the group of students in
the same school as the applicant who took the same high school courses
as the applicant in the applicable content area. From the group of
students identified in this manner, the district shall select the
comparison cohort that shall be those students who met or slightly
exceeded the state standard on the ((Washington)) statewide assessment
((of student learning)).
(b) The district shall compare the applicant's grades in high
school courses in the applicable content area to the grades of students
in the comparison cohort for the same high school courses. If the
applicant's grades are equal to or above the mean grades of the
comparison cohort, the applicant shall be deemed to have met the state
standard on the alternative assessment.
(c) An applicant may not use the alternative assessment under this
subsection (4) if there are fewer than six students in the comparison
cohort.
(5) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop an
alternative assessment method that shall be an evaluation of a
collection of work samples prepared and submitted by the applicant.
Effective September 1, 2009, collection of work samples may be
submitted only in content areas where meeting the state standard on the
high school statewide assessment is required for purposes of
graduation.
(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop
guidelines for the types and number of work samples in each content
area that may be submitted as a collection of evidence that the
applicant has met the state standard in that content area. Work
samples may be collected from academic, career and technical, or
remedial courses and may include performance tasks as well as written
products. The superintendent shall submit the guidelines for approval
by the state board of education.
(b) The superintendent shall develop protocols for submission of
the collection of work samples that include affidavits from the
applicant's teachers and school district that the samples are the work
of the applicant and a requirement that a portion of the samples be
prepared under the direct supervision of a classroom teacher. The
superintendent shall submit the protocols for approval by the state
board of education.
(c) The superintendent shall develop uniform scoring criteria for
evaluating the collection of work samples and submit the scoring
criteria for approval by the state board of education. Collections
shall be scored at the state level or regionally by a panel of
educators selected and trained by the superintendent to ensure
objectivity, reliability, and rigor in the evaluation. An educator may
not score work samples submitted by applicants from the educator's
school district. If the panel awards an applicant's collection of work
samples the minimum required score, the applicant shall be deemed to
have met the state standard on the alternative assessment.
(d) Using an open and public process that includes consultation
with district superintendents, school principals, and other educators,
the state board of education shall consider the guidelines, protocols,
scoring criteria, and other information regarding the collection of
work samples submitted by the superintendent of public instruction.
The collection of work samples may be implemented as an alternative
assessment after the state board of education has approved the
guidelines, protocols, and scoring criteria and determined that the
collection of work samples: (i) Will meet professionally accepted
standards for a valid and reliable measure of the grade level
expectations and the essential academic learning requirements; and (ii)
is comparable to or exceeds the rigor of the skills and knowledge that
a student must demonstrate on the ((Washington)) statewide assessment
((of student learning)) in the applicable content area. The state
board shall make an approval decision and determination no later than
December 1, 2006, and thereafter may increase the required rigor of the
collection of work samples.
(e) By September of 2006, the superintendent of public instruction
shall develop informational materials for parents, teachers, and
students regarding the collection of work samples and the status of its
development as an alternative assessment method. The materials shall
provide specific guidance regarding the type and number of work samples
likely to be required, include examples of work that meets the state
learning standards, and describe the scoring criteria and process for
the collection. The materials shall also encourage students in the
graduating class of 2008 to begin creating a collection if they believe
they may seek to use the collection once it is implemented as an
alternative assessment.
(6)(a) For students enrolled in a career and technical education
program approved under RCW 28A.700.030, the superintendent of public
instruction shall develop additional guidelines for collections of work
samples that are tailored to different career and technical programs.
The additional guidelines shall:
(i) Provide multiple examples of work samples that are related to
the particular career and technical program;
(ii) Permit work samples based on completed activities or projects
where demonstration of academic knowledge is inferred; and
(iii) Provide multiple examples of work samples drawn from career
and technical courses.
(b) The purpose of the additional guidelines is to provide a clear
pathway toward a certificate of academic achievement for career and
technical students by showing them applied and relevant opportunities
to demonstrate their knowledge and skills, and to provide guidance to
teachers in integrating academic and career and technical instruction
and assessment and assisting career and technical students in compiling
a collection. The superintendent of public instruction shall develop
and disseminate additional guidelines for no fewer than ten career and
technical education programs representing a variety of program
offerings by no later than September 1, 2008. Guidelines for ten
additional programs shall be developed and disseminated no later than
June 1, 2009.
(c) The superintendent shall consult with community and technical
colleges, employers, the workforce training and education coordinating
board, apprenticeship programs, and other regional and national experts
in career and technical education to create appropriate guidelines and
examples of work samples and other evidence of a career and technical
student's knowledge and skills on the state academic standards.
(7) The superintendent of public instruction shall study the
feasibility of using existing mathematics assessments in languages
other than English as an additional alternative assessment option. The
study shall include an estimation of the cost of translating the tenth
grade mathematics assessment into other languages and scoring the
assessments should they be implemented.
(8) The superintendent of public instruction shall implement:
(a) By June 1, 2006, a process for students to appeal the score
they received on the high school assessments; and
(b) By January 1, 2007, guidelines and appeal processes for waiving
specific requirements in RCW 28A.655.061 pertaining to the certificate
of academic achievement and to the certificate of individual
achievement for students who: (i) Transfer to a Washington public
school in their junior or senior year with the intent of obtaining a
public high school diploma, or (ii) have special, unavoidable
circumstances.
(9) The state board of education shall examine opportunities for
additional alternative assessments, including the possible use of one
or more standardized norm-referenced student achievement tests and the
possible use of the reading, writing, or mathematics portions of the
ACT ASSET and ACT COMPASS test instruments as objective alternative
assessments for demonstrating that a student has met the state
standards for the certificate of academic achievement. The state board
shall submit its findings and recommendations to the education
committees of the legislature by January 10, 2008.
(10) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to
implement this section.

Sec. 9 RCW 28A.655.066 and 2009 c 310 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) In consultation with the state board of education, the
superintendent of public instruction shall develop statewide end-of-course assessments for high school mathematics that measure student
achievement of the state mathematics standards. The superintendent
shall take steps to ensure that the language of the assessments is
responsive to a diverse student population. The assessments shall be
implemented statewide in the 2010-11 school year.
(b) The superintendent shall develop end-of-course assessments for
the first year of high school mathematics that include the standards
common to algebra I and integrated mathematics I and for the second
year of high school mathematics that include the standards common to
geometry and integrated mathematics II. The assessments under this
subsection (1)(b) shall be used to demonstrate that a student meets the
state standard on the mathematics content area of the high school
((Washington)) statewide assessment ((of student learning)) for
purposes of RCW 28A.655.061.
(c) The superintendent of public instruction shall also develop
subtests for the end-of-course assessments that measure standards for
the first two years of high school mathematics that are unique to
algebra I, integrated mathematics I, geometry, and integrated
mathematics II. The results of the subtests shall be reported at the
student, teacher, school, and district level.
(2) For the graduating classes of 2013 and 2014 and for purposes of
the certificate of academic achievement under RCW 28A.655.061, a
student may use: (a) Results from the end-of-course assessment for the
first year of high school mathematics plus the results from the end-of-course assessment for the second year of high school mathematics; or
(b) results from the comprehensive mathematics assessment to
demonstrate that a student meets the state standard on the mathematics
content area of the high school ((Washington)) statewide assessment
((of student learning)).
(3) Beginning with the graduating class of 2015 and for purposes of
the certificate of academic achievement under RCW 28A.655.061, the
mathematics content area of the ((Washington)) statewide assessment
((of student learning)) shall be assessed using the end-of-course
assessment for the first year of high school mathematics plus the end-of-course assessment for the second year of high school mathematics.
All of the objective alternative assessments available to students
under RCW 28A.655.061 and 28A.655.065 shall be available to any student
who has taken the sequence of end-of-course assessments once but does
not meet the state mathematics standard on the sequence of end-of-course assessments.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall report at least
annually or more often if necessary to keep the education committees of
the legislature informed on each step of the development and
implementation process under this section.

Sec. 10 RCW 28A.655.070 and 2008 c 163 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop
essential academic learning requirements that identify the knowledge
and skills all public school students need to know and be able to do
based on the student learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210, develop student
assessments, and implement the accountability recommendations and
requests regarding assistance, rewards, and recognition of the state
board of education.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall:
(a) Periodically revise the essential academic learning
requirements, as needed, based on the student learning goals in RCW
28A.150.210. Goals one and two shall be considered primary. To the
maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall integrate goal four
and the knowledge and skill areas in the other goals in the essential
academic learning requirements; and
(b) Review and prioritize the essential academic learning
requirements and identify, with clear and concise descriptions, the
grade level content expectations to be assessed on the ((Washington))
statewide assessments ((of student learning)) and used for state or
federal accountability purposes. The review, prioritization, and
identification shall result in more focus and targeting with an
emphasis on depth over breadth in the number of grade level content
expectations assessed at each grade level. Grade level content
expectations shall be articulated over the grades as a sequence of
expectations and performances that are logical, build with increasing
depth after foundational knowledge and skills are acquired, and
reflect, where appropriate, the sequential nature of the discipline.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction, within seven
working days, shall post on its web site any grade level content
expectations provided to an assessment vendor for use in constructing
the ((Washington)) statewide assessments ((of student learning)).
(3)(a) In consultation with the state board of education, the
superintendent of public instruction shall maintain and continue to
develop and revise a statewide academic assessment system in the
content areas of reading, writing, mathematics, and science for use in
the elementary, middle, and high school years designed to determine if
each student has mastered the essential academic learning requirements
identified in subsection (1) of this section. School districts shall
administer the assessments under guidelines adopted by the
superintendent of public instruction. The academic assessment system
may include a variety of assessment methods, including criterion-referenced and performance-based measures.
(b) Effective with the 2009 administration of the ((Washington))
statewide assessments ((of student learning)), the superintendent shall
redesign the assessment in the content areas of reading, mathematics,
and science in all grades except high school by shortening test
administration and reducing the number of short answer and extended
response questions.
(4) If the superintendent proposes any modification to the
essential academic learning requirements or the statewide assessments,
then the superintendent shall, upon request, provide opportunities for
the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate
to review the assessments and proposed modifications to the essential
academic learning requirements before the modifications are adopted.
(5) The assessment system shall be designed so that the results
under the assessment system are used by educators as tools to evaluate
instructional practices, and to initiate appropriate educational
support for students who have not mastered the essential academic
learning requirements at the appropriate periods in the student's
educational development.
(6) By September 2007, the results for reading and mathematics
shall be reported in a format that will allow parents and teachers to
determine the academic gain a student has acquired in those content
areas from one school year to the next.
(7) To assist parents and teachers in their efforts to provide
educational support to individual students, the superintendent of
public instruction shall provide as much individual student performance
information as possible within the constraints of the assessment
system's item bank. The superintendent shall also provide to school
districts:
(a) Information on classroom-based and other assessments that may
provide additional achievement information for individual students; and
(b) A collection of diagnostic tools that educators may use to
evaluate the academic status of individual students. The tools shall
be designed to be inexpensive, easily administered, and quickly and
easily scored, with results provided in a format that may be easily
shared with parents and students.
(8) To the maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall
integrate knowledge and skill areas in development of the assessments.
(9) Assessments for goals three and four of RCW 28A.150.210 shall
be integrated in the essential academic learning requirements and
assessments for goals one and two.
(10) The superintendent shall develop assessments that are directly
related to the essential academic learning requirements, and are not
biased toward persons with different learning styles, racial or ethnic
backgrounds, or on the basis of gender.
(11) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the
unique needs of special education students when developing the
assessments under this section.
(12) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the
unique needs of highly capable students when developing the assessments
under this section.
(13) The superintendent shall post on the superintendent's web site
lists of resources and model assessments in social studies, the arts,
and health and fitness.

Sec. 11 RCW 28A.655.090 and 2008 c 165 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By September 10, 1998, and by September 10th each year
thereafter, the superintendent of public instruction shall report to
schools, school districts, and the legislature on the results of the
((Washington)) statewide assessments ((of student learning)) and state-mandated norm-referenced standardized tests.
(2) The reports shall include the assessment results by school and
school district, and include changes over time. For the ((Washington))
statewide assessments ((of student learning)), results shall be
reported as follows:
(a) The percentage of students meeting the standards;
(b) The percentage of students performing at each level of the
assessment;
(c) Disaggregation of results by at least the following subgroups
of students: White, Black, Hispanic, American Indian/Alaskan Native,
Asian, Pacific Islander/Hawaiian Native, low income, transitional
bilingual, migrant, special education, and, beginning with the 2009-10
school year, students covered by section 504 of the federal
rehabilitation act of 1973, as amended (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794); and
(d) A learning improvement index that shows changes in student
performance within the different levels of student learning reported on
the ((Washington)) statewide assessments ((of student learning)).
(3) The reports shall contain data regarding the different
characteristics of schools, such as poverty levels, percent of English
as a second language students, dropout rates, attendance, percent of
students in special education, and student mobility so that districts
and schools can learn from the improvement efforts of other schools and
districts with similar characteristics.
(4) The reports shall contain student scores on mandated tests by
comparable Washington schools of similar characteristics.
(5) The reports shall contain information on public school choice
options available to students, including vocational education.
(6) The reports shall be posted on the superintendent of public
instruction's internet web site.
(7) To protect the privacy of students, the results of schools and
districts that test fewer than ten students in a grade level shall not
be reported. In addition, in order to ensure that results are reported
accurately, the superintendent of public instruction shall maintain the
confidentiality of statewide data files until the superintendent
determines that the data are complete and accurate.
(8) The superintendent of public instruction shall monitor the
percentage and number of special education and limited English-proficient students exempted from taking the assessments by schools and
school districts to ensure the exemptions are in compliance with
exemption guidelines.

Sec. 12 RCW 28A.655.140 and 1999 c 388 s 403 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In order to increase the availability and quality of technical
assistance statewide, the superintendent of public instruction, subject
to available funding, may employ school improvement coordinators and
school improvement specialists to provide assistance to schools and
districts. The improvement specialists shall serve on a rotating basis
and shall not be permanent employees.
(2) The types of assistance provided by the improvement
coordinators and specialists may include, but need not be limited to:
(a) Assistance to schools to use student performance data and
develop improvement plans based on those data;
(b) Consultation with schools and districts concerning their
performance on the ((Washington)) statewide assessments ((of student
learning)) and other assessments;
(c) Consultation concerning curricula that aligns with the
essential academic learning requirements and the ((Washington))
statewide assessments ((of student learning)) and that meets the needs
of diverse learners;
(d) Assistance in the identification and implementation of
research-based instructional practices;
(e) Staff training that emphasizes effective instructional
strategies and classroom-based assessment;
(f) Assistance in developing and implementing family and community
involvement programs; and
(g) Other assistance to schools and school districts intended to
improve student learning.

Sec. 13 RCW 28A.655.185 and 2005 c 495 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature, through the creation of
the apple award, to honor and reward students in Washington's public
elementary schools who have shown significant improvement in their
school's results on the ((Washington)) statewide assessments ((of
student learning)).
(2) The apple award program is created to honor and reward public
elementary schools that have the greatest combined average increase in
the percentage of students meeting the fourth grade reading,
mathematics, and writing standards on the ((Washington)) statewide
assessment ((of student learning)) each school year. The program shall
be administered by the state board of education.
(3) Within the amounts appropriated for this purpose, each school
that receives an apple award shall be provided with a twenty-five
thousand dollar grant to be used for capital construction purposes that
have been selected by students in the school and approved by the
district's school directors. The funds may be used exclusively for
capital construction projects on school property or on other public
property in the community, city, or county in which the school is
located.

Sec. 14 RCW 28A.655.200 and 2009 c 539 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature intends to permit school districts to offer
norm-referenced assessments, make diagnostic tools available to school
districts, and provide funding for diagnostic assessments to enhance
student learning at all grade levels and provide early intervention
before the high school ((Washington)) statewide assessment ((of student
learning)).
(2) In addition to the diagnostic assessments provided under this
section, school districts may, at their own expense, administer norm-referenced assessments to students.
(3) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
post on its web site for voluntary use by school districts, a guide of
diagnostic assessments. The assessments in the guide, to the extent
possible, shall include the characteristics listed in subsection (4) of
this section.
(4) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
purpose, beginning September 1, 2007, the office of the superintendent
of public instruction shall make diagnostic assessments in reading,
writing, mathematics, and science in elementary, middle, and high
school grades available to school districts. Subject to funds
appropriated for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall also provide funding to school districts for
administration of diagnostic assessments to help improve student
learning, identify academic weaknesses, enhance student planning and
guidance, and develop targeted instructional strategies to assist
students before the high school ((Washington)) statewide assessment
((of student learning)). To the greatest extent possible, the
assessments shall be:
(a) Aligned to the state's grade level expectations;
(b) Individualized to each student's performance level;
(c) Administered efficiently to provide results either immediately
or within two weeks;
(d) Capable of measuring individual student growth over time and
allowing student progress to be compared to other students across the
country;
(e) Readily available to parents; and
(f) Cost-effective.
(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
offer training at statewide and regional staff development activities
in:
(a) The interpretation of diagnostic assessments; and
(b) Application of instructional strategies that will increase
student learning based on diagnostic assessment data.

Sec. 15 RCW 28B.50.534 and 2007 c 355 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A pilot program is created for two community or technical
colleges to make available courses or a program of study, on the
college campus, designed to enable students under the age of twenty-one
who have completed all state and local high school graduation
requirements except the certificate of academic achievement or
certificate of individual achievement to complete their high school
education and obtain a high school diploma.
(a) The colleges participating in the pilot program in this section
may make courses or programs under this section available by entering
into contracts with local school districts to deliver the courses or
programs. Colleges participating in the pilot program that offer
courses or programs under contract shall be reimbursed for each
enrolled eligible student as provided in the contract, and the high
school diploma shall be issued by the local school district;
(b) Colleges participating in the pilot program may deliver courses
or programs under this section directly. Colleges that deliver courses
or programs directly shall be reimbursed for each enrolled eligible
student as provided in RCW 28A.600.405, and the high school diploma
shall be issued by the college;
(c) Colleges participating in the pilot program may make courses or
programs under this section available through a combination of
contracts with local school districts, collaboration with educational
service districts, and direct service delivery. Colleges participating
in the pilot program may also make courses or programs under this
section available for students at locations in addition to the college
campus; or
(d) Colleges participating in the pilot program may enter into
regional partnerships to carry out the provisions of this subsection
(1).
(2) Regardless of the service delivery method chosen, colleges
participating in the pilot program shall ensure that all eligible
students located in school districts within their college district as
defined in RCW 28B.50.040 have an opportunity to enroll in a course or
program under this section.
(3) Colleges participating in the pilot program shall not require
students enrolled under this section to pay tuition or services and
activities fees; however this waiver of tuition and services and
activities fees shall be in effect only for those courses that lead to
a high school diploma.
(4) Nothing in this section or RCW 28A.600.405 precludes a
community or technical college from offering courses or a program of
study for students other than eligible students as defined by RCW
28A.600.405 to obtain a high school diploma, nor is this section or RCW
28A.600.405 intended to restrict diploma completion programs offered by
school districts or educational service districts. Community and
technical colleges and school districts are encouraged to consult with
educational service districts in the development and delivery of
programs and courses required under this section.
(5) Community and technical colleges participating in the pilot
program shall not be required to administer the ((Washington))
statewide assessment ((of student learning)).

Sec. 16 RCW 28B.105.010 and 2007 c 214 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The GET ready for math and science scholarship program is
established. The purpose of the program is to provide scholarships to
students who achieve level four on the mathematics or science portions
of the tenth grade ((Washington)) statewide assessment ((of student
learning)) or achieve a score in the math section of the SAT or the
math section of the ACT that is above the ninety-fifth percentile,
major in a mathematics, science, or related field in college, and
commit to working in mathematics, science, or a related field for at
least three years in Washington following completion of their
bachelor's degree. The program shall be administered by the nonprofit
organization selected as the private partner in the public-private
partnership.
(2) The total annual amount of each GET ready for math and science
scholarship may vary, but shall not exceed the annual cost of resident
undergraduate tuition fees and mandatory fees at the University of
Washington. An eligible recipient may receive a GET ready for math and
science scholarship for up to one hundred eighty quarter credits, or
the semester equivalent, or for up to five years, whichever comes
first.
(3) Scholarships shall be awarded only to the extent that state
funds and private matching funds are available for that purpose in the
GET ready for math and science (([scholarship])) scholarship account
established in RCW 28B.105.110.

Sec. 17 RCW 28B.105.030 and 2007 c 214 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An eligible student is a student who:
(a) Is eligible for resident tuition and fee rates as defined in
RCW 28B.15.012;
(b) Achieved level four on the mathematics or science portion of
the tenth grade ((Washington)) statewide assessment ((of student
learning)) or achieved a score in the math section of the SAT or the
math section of the ACT that is above the ninety-fifth percentile;
(c) Has a family income at or below one hundred twenty-five percent
of the state median family income at the time the student applies for
a GET ready for math and science scholarship and for up to the two
previous years;
(d) Has declared an intention to complete a qualified program or
qualified major or has entered a qualified program or declared a
qualified major at an institution of higher education;
(e) Has declared an intention to work in a mathematics, science, or
related field in Washington for at least three years immediately
following completion of a bachelor's degree or higher degree.
(2) An eligible recipient is an eligible student who:
(a) Has been awarded a scholarship in accordance with the selection
criteria and process established by the board and the program
administrator;
(b) Enrolls at an institution of higher education within one year
of graduating from high school;
(c) Maintains satisfactory academic progress, as defined by the
institution of higher education where the student is enrolled;
(d) Takes at least one college-level mathematics or science course
each term since enrolling in an institution of higher education; and
(e) Enters a qualified program or qualified major no later than the
end of the first term in which the student has junior level standing.

Sec. 18 RCW 28B.105.060 and 2007 c 214 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall:
(1) Notify elementary, middle, junior high, high school, and school
district staff and administrators, and the children's administration of
the department of social and health services about the GET ready for
math and science scholarship program using methods in place for
communicating with schools and school districts; and
(2) Provide data showing the race, ethnicity, income, and other
available demographic information of students who achieve level four of
the math and science ((Washington)) statewide assessment ((of student
learning)) in the tenth grade((.)); compare those data with comparable
information on the tenth grade student population as a whole((.)); and
submit a report with the analysis to the committees responsible for
education and higher education in the legislature on December 1st of
even-numbered years.

Sec. 19 RCW 28B.105.080 and 2007 c 214 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
School districts shall:
(1) Notify parents, teachers, counselors, and principals about the
GET ready for math and science scholarship program through existing
channels. Notification methods may include, but are not limited to,
regular school district and building communications, online scholarship
bulletins and announcements, notices posted on school walls and
bulletin boards, information available in each counselor's office, and
school or district scholarship information sessions;
(2) Provide each student who achieves level four on the mathematics
or science high school ((Washington)) statewide assessment ((of student
learning)) with information regarding the scholarship program and how
to contact the program administrator.

--- END ---