BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.140.010 and 2005 c 339 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Appraisal" means the act or process of estimating value; an
estimate of value; or of or pertaining to appraising and related
functions.
(2) "Appraisal report" means any communication, written or oral, of
an appraisal, review, or consulting service in accordance with the
standards of professional conduct or practice, adopted by the director,
that is transmitted to the client upon completion of an assignment.
(3) "Appraisal assignment" means an engagement for which an
appraiser is employed or retained to act, or would be perceived by
third parties or the public as acting, as a disinterested third party
in rendering an unbiased analysis, opinion, or conclusion relating to
the value of specified interests in, or aspects of, identified real
estate. The term "appraisal assignment" may apply to valuation work
and analysis work.
(4) "Brokers price opinion" means an oral or written report of
property value that is prepared by a real estate broker or salesperson
licensed under chapter 18.85 RCW.
(5) "Client" means any party for whom an appraiser performs a
service.
(6) "Commission" means the real estate appraiser commission of the
state of Washington.
(7) "Comparative market analysis" means a brokers price opinion.
(8) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(9) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing.
(10) "Expert review appraiser" means a state-certified or state-licensed real estate appraiser chosen by the director for the purpose
of providing appraisal review assistance to the director.
(11) "Federal department" means an executive department of the
United States of America specifically concerned with housing finance
issues, such as the department of housing and urban development, the
department of veterans affairs, or their legal federal successors.
(12) "Federal financial institutions regulatory agency" means the
board of governors of the federal reserve system, the federal deposit
insurance corporation, the office of the comptroller of the currency,
the office of thrift supervision, the national credit union
administration, their successors and/or such other agencies as may be
named in future amendments to 12 U.S.C. Sec. 3350(6).
(13) "Federal secondary mortgage marketing agency" means the
federal national mortgage association, the government national mortgage
association, the federal home loan mortgage corporation, their
successors and/or such other similarly functioning housing finance
agencies as may be federally chartered in the future.
(14) "Federally related transaction" means any real estate-related
financial transaction that the federal financial institutions
regulatory agency or the resolution trust corporation engages in,
contracts for, or regulates; and that requires the services of an
appraiser.
(15) "Financial institution" means any person doing business under
the laws of this state or the United States relating to banks, bank
holding companies, savings banks, trust companies, savings and loan
associations, credit unions, consumer loan companies, and the
affiliates, subsidiaries, and service corporations thereof.
(16) "Green building" means a residential or commercial structure
that has been certified as being built or renovated in accordance with
the requirements of a widely accepted, professionally developed
standard that addresses some or all of the following areas:
Sustainable site development; water conservation; energy efficiency;
use of renewable energy sources; sustainable, recycled, or locally or
regionally produced materials and resources; indoor air quality; and
waste reduction.
(17) "Mortgage broker" for the purpose of this chapter means a
mortgage broker licensed under chapter 19.146 RCW, any mortgage broker
approved and subject to audit by the federal national mortgage
association, the government national mortgage association, or the
federal home loan mortgage corporation as provided in RCW 19.146.020,
any mortgage broker approved by the United States secretary of housing
and urban development for participation in any mortgage insurance under
the national housing act, 12 U.S.C. Sec. 1201, and the affiliates,
subsidiaries, and service corporations thereof.
(((17))) (18) "Real estate" means an identified parcel or tract of
land, including improvements, if any.
(((18))) (19) "Real estate-related financial transaction" means any
transaction involving:
(a) The sale, lease, purchase, investment in, or exchange of real
property, including interests in property, or the financing thereof;
(b) The refinancing of real property or interests in real property;
and
(c) The use of real property or interests in property as security
for a loan or investment, including mortgage-backed securities.
(((19))) (20) "Real property" means one or more defined interests,
benefits, or rights inherent in the ownership of real estate.
(((20))) (21) "Review" means the act or process of critically
studying an appraisal report prepared by another.
(((21))) (22) "Specialized appraisal services" means all appraisal
services that do not fall within the definition of appraisal
assignment. The term "specialized appraisal service" may apply to
valuation work and to analysis work. Regardless of the intention of
the client or employer, if the appraiser would be perceived by third
parties or the public as acting as a disinterested third party in
rendering an unbiased analysis, opinion, or conclusion, the work is
classified as an appraisal assignment and not a specialized appraisal
service.
(((22))) (23) "State-certified general real estate appraiser" means
a person certified by the director to develop and communicate real
estate appraisals of all types of property. A state-certified general
real estate appraiser may designate or identify an appraisal rendered
by him or her as a "certified appraisal."
(((23))) (24) "State-certified residential real estate appraiser"
means a person certified by the director to develop and communicate
real estate appraisals of all types of residential property of one to
four units without regard to transaction value or complexity and
nonresidential property having a transaction value as specified in
rules adopted by the director. A state certified residential real
estate appraiser may designate or identify an appraisal rendered by him
or her as a "certified appraisal."
(((24))) (25) "State-licensed real estate appraiser" means a person
licensed by the director to develop and communicate real estate
appraisals of noncomplex one to four residential units and complex one
to four residential units and nonresidential property having
transaction values as specified in rules adopted by the director.
(((25))) (26) "State-registered appraiser trainee," "trainee," or
"trainee real estate appraiser" means a person registered by the
director under RCW 18.140.280 to develop and communicate real estate
appraisals under the immediate and personal direction of a state-certified real estate appraiser. Appraisals are limited to those types
of properties that the supervisory appraiser is permitted by their
current credential, and that the supervisory appraiser is competent and
qualified to appraise. By signing the appraisal report, or being
identified in the certification or addenda as having lent significant
professional assistance, the state-registered appraiser trainee accepts
total and complete individual responsibility for all content, analyses,
and conclusions in the report.
(((26))) (27) "Supervisory appraiser" means a person holding a
currently valid certificate issued by the director as a state-certified
real estate appraiser providing direct supervision to another state-
certified, state-licensed, or state-registered appraiser trainee. The
supervisory appraiser must be in good standing in each jurisdiction
that he or she is credentialed. The supervisory appraiser must sign
all appraisal reports. By signing the appraisal report, the
supervisory appraiser accepts full responsibility for all content,
analyses, and conclusions in the report.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.140 RCW
to read as follows:
No state-certified or state-licensed real estate appraiser may
appraise a residential or commercial green building unless the
certificate or license holder has presented evidence satisfactory to
the director of successful completion of a state-accredited course on
the appraisal of the applicable type of green building.

--- END ---