BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 INTENT. The legislature finds that a
fiscally sound industrial insurance system that assures necessary and
proper medical care for persons injured at work is integral to the
health and economic well-being of workers and the economic welfare of
the state. The legislature further finds that reforms are needed to
assure the best worker outcomes, including return to work.
Improvements are also needed to assure the most efficient and fair
system. The legislature intends to make the workers' compensation
system more cost-effective by authorizing voluntary medical provider
networks and voluntary settlement agreements and by assuring that the
workers' compensation system will only be responsible for costs due to
workplace injuries.

MEDICAL PROVIDER NETWORKS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Association" means an association meeting the criteria under
section 3(5) of this act.
(2) "Continuity of care" means the continued provision of treatment
under this title by another provider within the network in the event
the worker's network provider is no longer able to treat the worker.
(3) "Network" or "medical provider network" means a comprehensive
panel of health care providers and facilities that provide appropriate
remedial treatment, care, and attendance to injured workers.
(4) "Network sponsor" means: (a) The department and a self-insured
employer, when the department or self-insured employer has established
or contracted with a medical provider network; and (b) an association,
when the association has contracted with a medical provider network.
"Network sponsor" includes agents of the department, self-insured
employer, and association.
(5) "Service area" means the geographic area approved by the
department within which a self-insurer or association is authorized to
use a medical provider network.
(6) "Utilization control" means a systematic process of
implementing measures that assure overall management and cost
containment of services delivered, including compliance with practice
parameters and protocols of treatment.
(7) "Utilization review" means the assessment of an injured
worker's medical care to assure that it is proper and necessary and of
good quality. This assessment typically considers the appropriateness
of the place of care, level of care, and the duration, frequency, or
quantity of services provided in relation to the accepted condition
being treated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 AUTHORIZATION FOR MEDICAL PROVIDER NETWORKS.
(1) The department or a self-insured employer may establish or contract
with a medical provider network to provide medical care to injured
workers. An association may contract with a medical provider network
approved for a self-insured employer or sponsored by the department to
provide medical care to injured workers employed by some or all
association members. A network must meet standards established in this
section.
(2) Medical treatment within a network must be available and
accessible as follows:
(a) The network must include an adequate number and type of
providers to treat common injuries and occupational diseases
experienced by workers based on the type of occupation or industry in
which the employer is engaged and the geographic area where the workers
work;
(b) The network must include physicians primarily engaged in the
treatment of occupational injuries and must encourage the integration
of occupational and nonoccupational providers;
(c) The number of providers must be sufficient to provide timely
delivery of all required medical services and to be able to make
appropriate referrals for all required medical services; and
(d) To the extent feasible, all medical treatment must be readily
accessible to all injured workers. Services must be provided in a
timely manner with respect to geographic area, hours of operation, and
after-hours care. The network must consider the needs of rural areas,
specifically those in which health facilities are located at least
thirty miles apart.
(3) A self-insured employer or an association must file a plan of
operation for a network for approval with the department in a format
prescribed by the department. The department must maintain a plan for
any network established by or under contract with the department. A
plan must include:
(a) Evidence that all covered services are available and
accessible;
(b) A description, including address and phone number, of the
providers, including primary care physicians, specialty care
physicians, hospitals, and other providers;
(c) A description of coverage for emergency and urgently needed
care provided within and outside the service area;
(d) A description of limitations on referrals;
(e) A description of the dispute resolution procedure;
(f) A description of the quality assurance program under section 8
of this act;
(g) A statement or map providing a clear description of the service
area;
(h) The network's formal organizational structure; and
(i) The written criteria for selection, retention, and removal of
providers.
(4) If the department or self-insured employer establishes a
medical provider network, the department or self-insured employer, as
the case may be, has the exclusive right to determine the provider
members of the network. Nothing in this chapter creates any right for
a health care provider to contract with a network established by or
under contract with the department, a self-insured employer, or an
association.
(5) An association must meet the following criteria to contract
with a medical provider network:
(a) The association must have been in existence for at least four
years;
(b) The association must exist primarily for a purpose other than
that of obtaining or offering insurance coverage or insurance-related
services;
(c) All employers in the network must be members of the
association;
(d) At least fifty percent of the employers who contract with the
association for network membership must have been members of the
association for one year prior to the association contracting with a
network;
(e) All employers in the association who contract with the
association for network membership must have an industrial insurance
account in good standing with the department; and
(f) The association must maintain an annual membership in the
network of at least twenty-five members.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 APPROVAL OF NETWORK. A self-insured
employer and an association must submit a medical provider network plan
of operation to the director for approval. The director must approve
a network plan meeting the requirements of section 3 of this act. If
the director does not act within sixty days of submission of the plan,
the network is deemed approved. If the director does not approve the
plan, the director must state the reasons for disapproval in writing
and transmit the decision to the self-insured employer or association.
The self-insured employer or association may submit a new application
or request a reevaluation by the director. The director must respond
to a request for reevaluation within forty-five days of the request.
If the director sustains the decision to disapprove the medical
provider network plan, the director must issue an order disapproving
the plan. The self-insured employer or association may appeal the
decision to disapprove the plan to the board of industrial insurance
appeals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 WORKER OPTION/PROVIDER SELECTION. (1) If
the department or employer uses a medical provider network, a worker
must select and obtain treatment under this title from a provider
within the network unless the worker elects to receive treatment from
his or her own primary care provider.
(2) A worker may elect to receive initial treatment under this
title from his or her own primary care provider if:
(a) The employer provides nonoccupational health benefit plan
coverage through a health carrier as defined in RCW 48.43.005 or
through a self-insured health benefit plan;
(b) The primary care provider has previously directed the medical
treatment of the worker, and retains the worker's medical records,
including his or her medical history;
(c) The primary care provider agrees to be designated under this
section and agrees to follow the guidelines adopted by the network and
other provisions of this title and rules adopted by the department; and
(d) The worker has designated in writing to the employer before the
date of injury the name of the worker's primary care provider.
(3) If a worker who designates his or her own primary care provider
requires treatment not available from his or her own primary care
provider or the primary care provider refers the worker to another
provider, the worker must select a provider from the network.
Selection of a network provider must be based on the provider's
specialty or recognized expertise in treating the particular injury.
(4) If the worker's primary care provider designated under this
section is not available to treat the worker's injury because of
scheduled or unanticipated periods of unavailability, the worker may be
treated by a provider who is normally assigned to cover that designated
provider's patients until the designated provider is available.
(5) If a worker disputes either the diagnosis made or the treatment
prescribed by a provider within the network, the worker may seek the
opinion of another provider within the network. All transfers of care
must be preapproved by the network sponsor.
(6) A network must maintain a written continuity of care policy.
The department and an employer using a network must notify injured
workers of the policy, including information on the process to request
a review under the policy. Upon request, the department or employer
must provide a written copy of the policy to an injured worker. This
subsection does not require the department or employer to provide for
completion of treatment by a provider whose contract with the network
has been terminated or not renewed for reasons relating to medical
discipline under Title 18 RCW, fraud, or other criminal activity.
(7) For purposes of this section, "primary care provider" means a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW or an advanced
registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW
providing medical services predominantly for nonoccupational illnesses
and injuries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 TRANSFER OF CARE. (1) A network sponsor may
transfer an injured worker whose occupational injury occurred prior to
the effective date of network coverage from a nonnetwork provider to a
network provider by providing notice under subsection (3) of this
section.
(2) A network sponsor must agree to continued care from the
nonnetwork provider when the provider is treating an acute condition
that has a duration of fewer than ninety days, a serious chronic
condition for up to one year from the date of notice under subsection
(3) of this section, or a terminal illness where there is a high
probability of death within one year from the date of notice under
subsection (3) of this section; or when surgery or other procedures
have been authorized by the self-insured employer or department as part
of a documented course of treatment and has been recommended and
documented by the provider to occur within one hundred eighty days from
the effective date for the network coverage.
(3) If a network sponsor transfers the worker's medical treatment
to a network provider, the network sponsor must send a certified letter
to the worker and a copy of the letter to the worker's current treating
provider or providers.
(4) Except for section 5(2) (a) and (d) of this act, a worker who
has been notified of a transfer may elect to designate his or her
current provider or providers in accordance with section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 CERTIFICATION OF PROVIDERS. (1) A provider
providing care under contract with a medical provider network
established by the department or a self-insured employer must be
certified by the network sponsor. A provider providing care under
contract with a medical provider network that has contracted with the
department, self-insured employer, or association must be certified by
the network. Certification must include documentation that the
provider has read and is familiar with relevant portions of this title,
impairment guides, practice parameters, protocols of treatment, and
rules which govern the provision of remedial treatment, care, and
attendance under this chapter.
(2) A network must enter written confidential agreements with
providers describing specific responsibilities. Provider compensation
may not be structured to achieve a goal of reducing, delaying, or
denying medical treatment or restricting access to medical treatment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 TREATMENT GUIDELINES. (1) Medical treatment
that is reasonably required to be proper and necessary for the injured
worker from the effects of his or her injury is treatment that is based
upon the guidelines adopted by the director or self-insured network
sponsor. For all injuries not covered by the director's treatment and
diagnostic guidelines and rules, authorized treatment must be in
accordance with other evidence-based medical treatment guidelines that
are recognized generally by the national medical community. The
guidelines must be designed to assist providers by offering an
analytical framework for the evaluation and treatment of injured
workers and must reflect practices that are evidence and scientifically
based, nationally recognized, and peer reviewed. The guidelines shall
constitute care in accordance with RCW 51.36.010 for all injured
workers diagnosed with industrial injuries under this chapter.
(2) In the event of a dispute, there is a rebuttable presumption
affecting the burden of proof that treatment decisions made in
accordance with the director's treatment and diagnostic guidelines and
rules, and nationally recognized guidelines adopted by the director or
self-insured network sponsor, constitute proper and necessary care.
The presumption may be rebutted by a showing of a preponderance of
scientific medical evidence establishing that a variance from the
guidelines is required for proper and necessary treatment.
(3) A medical provider network must maintain a quality assurance
program which assures that the health care services provided to workers
shall be rendered under reasonable standards of quality of care
consistent with the prevailing standards of medical practice in the
medical community, the department's treatment and diagnostic guidelines
and rules, and nationally recognized treatment guidelines.
(4) The quality assurance program must include, but not be limited
to:
(a) A written statement of goals and objectives that stresses
health and return-to-work outcomes as the principal criteria for the
evaluation of the quality of care rendered to injured workers;
(b) A written statement describing how methodology has been
incorporated into an ongoing system for monitoring of care that is
individual case-oriented and, when implemented, provides interpretation
and analysis of patterns of care rendered to individual patients by
individual providers;
(c) Written procedures for taking appropriate remedial action
whenever, as determined under the quality assurance program,
inappropriate or substandard services have been provided or services
that should have been provided have not;
(d) Appropriate financial incentives to reduce service costs and
utilization without sacrificing the quality of service. These
incentives may include additional fees to providers who submit their
medical reports in a timely fashion and cooperate in facilitating an
early return to work with the worker and employer;
(e) Adequate methods of peer review and utilization review. The
utilization review process must include a health care facilities'
precertification mechanism including, but not limited to, all elective
admissions and nonemergency surgeries and adherence to practice
parameters and protocols established in accordance with this chapter;
(f) Provisions for resolution of disputes between a provider within
the network and the network sponsor regarding reimbursements and,
consistent with section 10 of this act, utilization review; and
(g) Availability of a process for proactive medical care
coordination, as well as programs involving cooperative efforts by the
workers, the employer, the department, and the network to promote early
return to work for injured workers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 UTILIZATION REVIEW. (1) A network sponsor
must establish a utilization review process in compliance with this
section either directly or through a contract for utilization services.
Utilization review is performed at the discretion of the network
sponsor. An independent medical examination as authorized in RCW
51.32.110 may be performed before a utilization review.
(2) A network under contract with a network sponsor must employ or
designate a medical director who is licensed under chapter 18.57 or
18.71 RCW. The network medical director must ensure that the process
for review of requests complies with this section.
(3) Each utilization review process must be governed by written
policies and procedures that ensure that treatment decisions are made
consistent with the treatment guidelines under section 8 of this act.
The policies and procedures must be filed with the department and
disclosed to workers, providers, and the public upon request.
(4) The utilization review may be performed by a claims adjuster,
nurse case manager, the medical director of the network, or a peer
review panel.
(5) The criteria or guidelines used in the utilization review
process must be:
(a) Developed with involvement from actively practicing providers;
(b) Consistent with the treatment guidelines of section 8 of this
act;
(c) Evaluated at least annually and updated if necessary; and
(d) Disclosed to the provider treating the worker and the worker if
used as the basis of a decision involving the worker.
(6) The medical director of the network may request from the
provider only the information reasonably necessary to make the
determination.
(7) In determining whether to approve, modify, delay, or deny a
request by a provider prospectively, retrospectively, or concurrent
with the provision of treatment, the following requirements must be
met:
(a) Prospective or concurrent decisions must be made in a timely
manner appropriate for the worker's condition, not to exceed five
working days from the receipt of information reasonably necessary to
make the decision, but in no event more than fourteen days from the
date of the treatment recommendation by the provider. Retrospective
decisions must be communicated to the worker within thirty days of the
receipt of information reasonably necessary to make the decision.
(b) If the worker faces an imminent and serious threat to his or
her health including but not limited to the potential loss of life,
limb, or other major bodily function or adherence to the time frames in
(a) of this subsection would be detrimental to the worker's life or
health or could jeopardize the worker's ability to regain maximum
function, decisions must be made in a timely manner appropriate for the
worker's condition, not to exceed seventy-two hours after the receipt
of information reasonably necessary to make the decision.
(c) A decision to modify, delay, or deny all or part of the
requested treatment must be communicated to the provider initially by
telephone or facsimile and to the provider and the worker by mail
within twenty-four hours for concurrent review or within two business
days for prospective review.
(d) In the case of concurrent review, treatment shall not be
discontinued until the worker's primary care provider has been notified
of the decision and a care plan has been agreed to by the primary care
provider that is appropriate for the medical needs of the worker.
Treatment provided during concurrent review must be proper and
necessary and a self-insured employer and department are only liable
for treatment determined to be proper and necessary.
(e) Decisions to approve treatment must specify the specific
treatment approved. Decisions to modify, delay, or deny treatment must
include a clear and concise explanation for the reasons for the
decision, a description of the criteria or guidelines used, and the
clinical reasons for the decision.
(f) If a decision cannot be made within the time frames in this
subsection (7) because the network sponsor has not received all the
information reasonably necessary and requested, the network sponsor
must immediately notify the provider and the worker, in writing. The
entity must specify the information requested but not received or the
additional examinations or tests required, and the anticipated date on
which a decision may be rendered. Upon receipt of all information
reasonably requested, the medical director of the network must make the
decision under the timelines in (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection.
(g) The medical director of the network must maintain telephone
access for providers to request authorization for treatment.
(8) If medical issues in dispute cannot be resolved at the claims
adjuster level, by a nurse case manager, or through an independent
medical examination process, only a licensed physician within the
network or their peer review panel may modify, delay, or deny requests
for authorization of medical treatment.
(9) Disputes regarding treatment decisions must be resolved under
section 10 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 DISPUTE RESOLUTION. (1) The legislature
finds that delays in treatment decisions are not in the best interest
of the injured worker. The legislature intends to expedite all
disputes related to treatment and intends that all treatment and
diagnostic disputes between a worker, network sponsor, and provider are
reviewed initially through the network's internal dispute resolution
process.
(2) A medical provider network must establish and follow procedures
for hearing and resolving complaints from workers and providers
regarding treatment decisions under this chapter. The procedures must
encourage a settlement of the dispute and must meet the following
criteria:
(a) The complaint procedure must be in writing and provided to
workers and providers.
(b) Complaints must be considered in a timely manner and must be
transmitted to appropriate decision makers with the network who have
the authority to fully investigate the issue and take corrective
action.
(c) If a complaint is found to be valid, corrective action must be
taken promptly.
(d) All concerned parties must be notified of the results of a
complaint.
(3) All decisions on medical treatment must be based on objective
medical findings and medical treatment guidelines established by the
medical director of the department or nationally recognized treatment
guidelines.
(4) If a dispute is not resolved within the network, the
dissatisfied party or parties must contact the department's medical
director within ten days. The medical director must review the medical
file and issue an order and notice within twenty days. Additional
examinations may not be ordered by the medical director and other
reports may not be required to resolve the issues in dispute.
(5)(a) The department's medical director may contract with one or
more entities to secure expert medical advisors to provide peer review
or expert medical consultation and opinions in connection with
resolving disputes under this chapter, including utilization issues.
The director must establish the qualifications of expert medical
advisors, which must include training and experience in the state's
workers' compensation system and knowledge of and commitment to the
practice parameters and protocols established under this chapter. The
contract must require an expert medical advisor to provide services in
accordance with the timetables set forth in this chapter and to abide
by the rules adopted by the department.
(b) An expert medical advisor appointed to review a medical file
must have free and complete access to the medical records of the
worker.
(6) The parties may appeal the decision of the department's medical
director to the board of industrial appeals under RCW 51.36.060. The
rebuttable presumption in section 8(2) of this act applies to the
board's review of the decision.

Sec. 11 RCW 51.36.010 and 2007 c 134 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon the occurrence of any injury to a worker entitled to
compensation under the provisions of this title, he or she shall
receive proper and necessary medical and surgical services at the hands
of a physician or licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner of
his or her own choice, if conveniently located and subject to section
5 of this act, and proper and necessary hospital care and services
during the period of his or her disability from such injury. The
department for state fund claims shall pay, in accordance with the
department's fee schedule, for any alleged injury for which a worker
files a claim, any initial prescription drugs provided in relation to
that initial visit, without regard to whether the worker's claim for
benefits is allowed. In all accepted claims, treatment shall be
limited in point of duration as follows:
In the case of permanent partial disability, not to extend beyond
the date when compensation shall be awarded him or her, except when the
worker returned to work before permanent partial disability award is
made, in such case not to extend beyond the time when monthly
allowances to him or her shall cease; in case of temporary disability
not to extend beyond the time when monthly allowances to him or her
shall cease: PROVIDED, That after any injured worker has returned to
his or her work his or her medical and surgical treatment may be
continued if, and so long as, such continuation is deemed necessary by
the supervisor of industrial insurance to be necessary to his or her
more complete recovery; in case of a permanent total disability not to
extend beyond the date on which a lump sum settlement is made with him
or her or he or she is placed upon the permanent pension roll:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the supervisor of industrial insurance, solely
in his or her discretion, may authorize continued medical and surgical
treatment for conditions previously accepted by the department when
such medical and surgical treatment is deemed necessary by the
supervisor of industrial insurance to protect such worker's life or
provide for the administration of medical and therapeutic measures
including payment of prescription medications, but not including those
controlled substances currently scheduled by the state board of
pharmacy as Schedule I, II, III, or IV substances under chapter 69.50
RCW, which are necessary to alleviate continuing pain which results
from the industrial injury. In order to authorize such continued
treatment the written order of the supervisor of industrial insurance
issued in advance of the continuation shall be necessary.
The supervisor of industrial insurance, the supervisor's designee,
or a self-insurer, in his or her sole discretion, may authorize
inoculation or other immunological treatment in cases in which a work-related activity has resulted in probable exposure of the worker to a
potential infectious occupational disease. Authorization of such
treatment does not bind the department or self-insurer in any
adjudication of a claim by the same worker or the worker's beneficiary
for an occupational disease.

Sec. 12 RCW 51.36.080 and 1998 c 245 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, all fees
and medical charges under this title shall conform to the fee schedule
established by the director and shall be paid within sixty days of
receipt by the department of a proper billing in the form prescribed by
department rule or sixty days after the claim is allowed by final order
or judgment, if an otherwise proper billing is received by the
department prior to final adjudication of claim allowance. The
department shall pay interest at the rate of one percent per month, but
at least one dollar per month, whenever the payment period exceeds the
applicable sixty-day period on all proper fees and medical charges,
except that no interest is due if the provider has not filed required
reports to substantiate the charges.
Beginning in fiscal year 1987, interest payments under this
subsection may be paid only from funds appropriated to the department
for administrative purposes.
Nothing in this section may be construed to require the payment of
interest on any billing, fee, or charge if the industrial insurance
claim on which the billing, fee, or charge is predicated is ultimately
rejected or the billing, fee, or charge is otherwise not allowable.
In establishing fees for medical and other health care services,
the director shall consider the director's duty to purchase health care
in a prudent, cost-effective manner without unduly restricting access
to necessary care by persons entitled to the care. With respect to
workers admitted as hospital inpatients on or after July 1, 1987, the
director shall pay for inpatient hospital services on the basis of
diagnosis-related groups, contracting for services, or other prudent,
cost-effective payment method, which the director shall establish by
rules adopted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) If a provider specifically agrees in writing to follow
identified procedures aimed at providing quality medical care to
injured workers at reasonable costs, fees and charges may deviate from
the fee schedule. Procedures warranting deviation include, but are not
limited to, the timely scheduling of appointments for injured workers,
timely filing of medical reports, participation in return-to-work
programs with employers, expediting the reporting of treatments
provided to injured workers, and agreeing to continuing education,
utilization review, quality assurance, precertification, and case
management systems that are designed to provide needed treatment for
injured workers.
(3) The director may establish procedures for selectively or
randomly auditing the accuracy of fees and medical billings submitted
to the department under this title.

Sec. 13 RCW 51.36.085 and 1993 c 159 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, all fees
and medical charges under this title shall conform to regulations
promulgated, and the fee schedule established by the director and shall
be paid within sixty days of receipt by the self-insured of a proper
billing in the form prescribed by department rule or sixty days after
the claim is allowed by final order or judgment, if an otherwise proper
billing is received by the self-insured prior to final adjudication of
claim allowance. The self-insured shall pay interest at the rate of
one percent per month, but at least one dollar per month, whenever the
payment period exceeds the applicable sixty-day period on all proper
fees and medical charges, except that no interest is due if the
provider has not filed required reports to substantiate the charges.
(2) If a provider specifically agrees in writing to follow
identified procedures aimed at providing quality medical care to
injured workers at reasonable costs, fees and charges may deviate from
the fee schedule. Procedures warranting deviation include, but are not
limited to, the timely scheduling of appointments for injured workers,
timely filing of medical reports, participation in return-to-work
programs with employers, expediting the reporting of treatments
provided to injured workers, and agreeing to continuing education,
utilization review, quality assurance, precertification, and case
management systems that are designed to provide needed treatment for
injured workers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 RULE MAKING. The director shall adopt
rules as follows:
(1) The definition of reasonable geographic area under section 3 of
this act;
(2) The form, content, and timing of notices required under section
5 of this act; and
(3) The qualifications of expert medical advisors under section 10
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 NOTICES. The department and an employer
who uses a medical provider network must notify workers of their rights
regarding providers under section 5 (2) and (3) of this act and must
notify injured workers of their rights under section 5(5) of this act.

OCCUPATIONAL DISEASE
Sec. 16 RCW 51.08.140 and 1961 c 23 s 51.08.140 are each amended
to read as follows:
"Occupational disease" means such disease or infection as arises
((naturally and proximately)) out of and in the course of the
particular employment under ((the mandatory or elective adoption
provisions of)) this title in which the worker is exposed to such
disease or infection and which meets all of the following criteria:
(1) The disease or infection is proximately caused by the
distinctive conditions under which the work is performed and risk of
exposure inherent therein;
(2) The disease or infection arose as a natural incident of the
employment-related exposure;
(3) The worker would not have ordinarily been exposed to the
disease or infection outside of his or her employment; and
(4) The disease or infection is not an ordinary condition of life
to which the general public is exposed without regard to employment.

Sec. 17 RCW 51.32.180 and 1988 c 161 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every worker who suffers disability from an occupational disease
arising out of and in the course of the worker's particular employment
under the mandatory or elective adoption provisions of this title, or
his or her family and dependents in case of death of the worker from
such disease or infection, shall receive the same compensation benefits
and medical, surgical and hospital care and treatment as would be paid
and provided for a worker injured or killed in employment under this
title, except as follows: (((a))) (1) This section and RCW 51.16.040
shall not apply where the last exposure to the hazards of the disease
or infection occurred prior to January 1, 1937; and (((b))) (2) for
claims filed on or after July 1, 1988, the rate of compensation for
occupational diseases shall be established as of the date the disease
requires medical treatment or becomes totally or partially disabling,
whichever occurs first, and without regard to the date of the
contraction of the disease or the date of filing the claim.

VOLUNTARY SETTLEMENTS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 51.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Notwithstanding RCW 51.04.060 or any other provision of this
title, the parties to a claim for benefits may enter into a voluntary
settlement agreement at any time as provided in this section with
respect to one or more claims for benefits under this title. All
voluntary settlement agreements must be approved by the board of
industrial insurance appeals. The voluntary settlement agreement may:
(i) Bind the parties with regard to any or all aspects of a claim,
including but not limited to allowance or rejection of a claim,
monetary payment, vocational services, claim closure, and claim
reopening under RCW 51.32.160; and
(ii) Not subject any employer who is not a signatory to the
agreement to any responsibility or burden under any claim.
(b) For purposes of this section, "parties" means:
(i) For a self-insured claim, the worker and the employer; and
(ii) For a state fund claim, the worker, the employer, and the
department of labor and industries. If the employer participates in a
retrospective rating plan under chapter 51.18 RCW, the retrospective
rating group, through its administrator, is also a party.
(c) A voluntary settlement agreement entered into under this
section must be signed by the parties or their representatives and must
clearly state that the parties understand and agree to the terms of the
voluntary settlement agreement. Unless one of the parties revokes
consent to the agreement, as provided in subsection (3) of this
section, the voluntary settlement agreement becomes final and binding
thirty days after approval of the agreement by the board of industrial
insurance appeals.
(d) A voluntary settlement agreement that has become final and
binding as provided in this section is binding on the department and on
all parties to the agreement as to its terms and the injuries and
occupational diseases to which the voluntary settlement applies. A
voluntary settlement agreement that has become final and binding is not
subject to appeal.
(2)(a) If a worker is not represented by an attorney at the time of
signing a voluntary settlement agreement, the parties must forward a
copy of the signed settlement agreement to the board with a request for
a conference with a settlement officer. Unless one of the parties
requests a later date, the settlement officer must convene a conference
within fourteen days after receipt of the request for the limited
purpose of receiving the voluntary settlement agreement of the parties,
explaining to the worker the benefits generally available under this
title, and explaining that a voluntary settlement agreement may alter
the benefits payable on a claim. In no event may a settlement officer
render legal advice to any party.
(b) Before approving the settlement agreement, the settlement
officer shall ensure that the worker has an adequate understanding of
the settlement proposal and its consequences to the worker.
(c) The settlement officer may reject a settlement agreement only
if the officer finds the parties have not entered into the agreement
knowingly and willingly. Within seven days after the conference, the
settlement officer shall issue an order allowing or rejecting the
voluntary settlement agreement. There is no appeal from the settlement
officer's decision.
(d) If the settlement officer issues an order allowing the
voluntary settlement agreement, the order shall be submitted to the
board.
(3) If a worker is represented by an attorney at the time of
signing a voluntary settlement agreement, the parties may submit the
agreement directly to the board without the conference described in
this section.
(4) Upon receiving the voluntary settlement agreement, the board
shall approve the agreement within thirty working days of receipt
unless it finds that the parties have not entered into the agreement
knowingly and willingly. If the board approves the agreement, it shall
provide notice to the department of the binding terms of the agreement
and provide for placement of the agreement in the applicable claim
files.
(5) A party may revoke consent to the voluntary settlement
agreement by providing written notice to the other parties and the
board within thirty days after the date the agreement is approved by
the board.
(6) To the extent the worker is found to be entitled to temporary
total disability or permanent total disability benefits while a
voluntary settlement agreement is being negotiated, or during the
revocation period of an agreement, the benefits must be paid until the
agreement becomes final.
(7) If the parties have provided in a voluntary settlement
agreement that a claim is not subject to reopening under RCW 51.32.160,
any application to reopen the claim must be denied.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A new section is added to chapter 51.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The department must maintain copies of all voluntary settlement
agreements entered into between the parties and develop processes under
RCW 51.28.070 to furnish copies of such agreements to any party
contemplating any subsequent voluntary settlement agreement with the
worker on any claim. The department shall also furnish claims
histories that include all prior permanent disability awards received
by the worker on any claims by body part and category or percentage
rating, as applicable. Copies of such agreements and claims histories
shall be furnished within ten working days of a written request. An
employer may not consider a prior settlement agreement or claims
history when making a decision about hiring or the terms or conditions
of employment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 A new section is added to chapter 51.04 RCW
to read as follows:
If a worker has received a prior award of, or entered into a
voluntary settlement for, total or partial permanent disability
benefits, it shall be conclusively presumed that the medical condition
causing the prior permanent disability exists and is disabling at the
time of any subsequent industrial injury or occupational disease.
Except in the case of total permanent disability, the accumulation of
all permanent disability awards issued with respect to any one part of
the body in favor of the worker shall not exceed one hundred percent
over the worker's lifetime. When entering into a voluntary settlement
agreement under this chapter, the department or self-insured employer
may exclude amounts paid to settle claims for prior portions of a
worker's permanent total or partial disability.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 Sections 2 through 10 and 15 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 51 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 Sections 2 through 15 of this act take
effect January 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---