BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.64.044 and 2005 c 388 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A shopkeeper registered as provided in this section may sell
nonprescription drugs, if such drugs are sold in the original package
of the manufacturer.
(2) Every shopkeeper not a licensed pharmacist, desiring to secure
the benefits and privileges of this section, is hereby required to
register as a shopkeeper through the master license system, and he or
she shall pay the fee determined by the secretary for registration, and
on a date to be determined by the secretary thereafter the fee
determined by the secretary for renewal of the registration; and shall
at all times keep said registration or the current renewal thereof
conspicuously exposed in the location to which it applies. In event
such shopkeeper's registration is not renewed by the master license
expiration date, no renewal or new registration shall be issued except
upon payment of the registration renewal fee and the master license
delinquency fee under chapter 19.02 RCW. This registration fee shall
not authorize the sale of legend drugs or controlled substances.
(3) The registration fees determined by the secretary under
subsection (2) of this section shall not exceed the cost of registering
the shopkeeper.
(4) Any shopkeeper who shall vend or sell, or offer to sell to the
public any such nonprescription drug or preparation without having
registered to do so as provided in this section, shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor and each sale or offer to sell shall constitute a separate
offense.
(5) A shopkeeper who is not a licensed pharmacy may purchase
products containing any detectable quantity of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or
salts of isomers, only from a wholesaler licensed by the department
under RCW 18.64.046 or from a manufacturer licensed by the department
under RCW 18.64.045. The board shall issue a warning to a shopkeeper
who violates this subsection, and may suspend or revoke the
registration of the shopkeeper for a subsequent violation.
(6) A shopkeeper who has purchased products containing any
detectable quantity of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers((, in
a suspicious transaction as defined in RCW 69.43.035,)) is subject to
the following requirements:
(a) The shopkeeper may not sell ((any quantity)) products
containing a combined total of more than 3.6 grams per sale or more
than nine grams per thirty days of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers((, if
the total monthly sales of these products exceed ten percent of the
shopkeeper's total prior monthly sales of nonprescription drugs in
March through October. In November through February, the shopkeeper
may not sell any quantity of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, if
the total monthly sales of these products exceed twenty percent of the
shopkeeper's total prior monthly sales of nonprescription drugs. For
purposes of this section, "monthly sales" means total dollars paid by
buyers)). The board may suspend or revoke the registration of a
shopkeeper who violates this subsection.
(b) The shopkeeper shall maintain inventory records of the receipt
and disposition of nonprescription drugs, utilizing existing inventory
controls if an auditor or investigator can determine compliance with
(a) of this subsection, and otherwise in the form and manner required
by the board. The records must be available for inspection by the
board or any law enforcement agency and must be maintained for two
years. The board may suspend or revoke the registration of a
shopkeeper who violates this subsection. For purposes of this
subsection, "disposition" means the return of product to the wholesaler
or distributor.
(c) The shopkeeper must place all packages of tablets containing
ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or their salts,
isomers, or salts of isomers:
(i) Behind a counter where the public is not permitted; or
(ii) In a locked display case so that a customer wanting access to
the packages must ask an employee for assistance.
(d) A shopkeeper selling a nonprescription drug containing
ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or their salts,
isomers, or salts of isomers shall require the purchaser of the drug or
drugs to provide government-issued photographic identification of
himself or herself, and to sign a record of the transaction. The
record must include the name and address of the purchaser, the date and
time of the sale, the name and initials of the shopkeeper, pharmacist,
pharmacy technician, or employee conducting the transaction, the name
of the product being sold, as well as the total quantity in grams, of
ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or their salts,
isomers, or salts of isomers, being sold.
(7)(a) A shopkeeper shall, before completing a sale under this
section, submit the required information to the electronic sales
tracking system established under section 5 of this act, beginning six
months after such a system is available without cost to the shopkeeper
for accessing the system. The shopkeeper shall not complete the sale
if the system generates a stop sale alert. Absent negligence,
wantonness, recklessness, or deliberate misconduct, any shopkeeper
maintaining the electronic sales tracking system in accordance with
this subsection shall not be civilly liable as a result of any act or
omission in carrying out the duties required by this subsection and
shall be immune from liability to any third party unless he or she has
violated any provision of this subsection in relation to a claim
brought for such violation.
(b) If a shopkeeper selling a nonprescription drug containing
ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts,
isomers, or salts of isomers experiences mechanical or electronic
failure of the electronic sales tracking system and is unable to comply
with the electronic sales tracking requirement, he or she shall
maintain a written log or an alternative electronic recordkeeping
mechanism until such time as he or she is able to comply with the
electronic sales tracking requirement.
(c) A shopkeeper selling a nonprescription drug containing
ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts,
isomers, or salts of isomers may seek an exemption from submitting
transactions to the electronic sales tracking system in writing to the
Washington state attorney general stating the reasons for the
exemption. The attorney general may grant an exemption for good cause
shown, but in no event shall the exemption exceed one hundred eighty
days. A shopkeeper that receives an exemption shall maintain a logbook
in hardcopy form and must require the purchaser to provide the
information required under this section before the completion of any
sale. The logbook shall be maintained as a record of each sale for
inspection by any law enforcement officer or board inspector during
normal business hours.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.64.047 and 2005 c 388 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any itinerant vendor or any peddler of any nonprescription drug
or preparation for the treatment of disease or injury, shall pay a
registration fee determined by the secretary on a date to be determined
by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. The
department may issue a registration to such vendor on an approved
application made to the department.
(2) Any itinerant vendor or peddler who shall vend or sell, or
offer to sell to the public any such nonprescription drug or
preparation without having registered to do so as provided in this
section, is guilty of a misdemeanor and each sale or offer to sell
shall constitute a separate offense.
(3) In event the registration fee remains unpaid on the date due,
no renewal or new registration shall be issued except upon compliance
with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees
determined as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. This
registration shall not authorize the sale of legend drugs or controlled
substances.
(4) An itinerant vendor may purchase products containing any
detectable quantity of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers only
from a wholesaler licensed by the department under RCW 18.64.046 or
from a manufacturer licensed by the department under RCW 18.64.045.
The board shall issue a warning to an itinerant vendor who violates
this subsection, and may suspend or revoke the registration of the
vendor for a subsequent violation.
(5) An itinerant vendor who has purchased products containing any
detectable quantity of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers((, in
a suspicious transaction as defined in RCW 69.43.035,)) is subject to
the following requirements:
(a) The itinerant vendor may not sell ((any quantity)) products
containing a combined total of more than 3.6 grams per sale or more
than nine grams per thirty days of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers((, if
the total monthly sales of these products exceed ten percent of the
vendor's total prior monthly sales of nonprescription drugs in March
through October. In November through February, the vendor may not sell
any quantity of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or
their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, if the total monthly sales
of these products exceed twenty percent of the vendor's total prior
monthly sales of nonprescription drugs. For purposes of this section,
"monthly sales" means total dollars paid by buyers)). The board may
suspend or revoke the registration of an itinerant vendor who violates
this subsection.
(b) The itinerant vendor shall maintain inventory records of the
receipt and disposition of nonprescription drugs, utilizing existing
inventory controls if an auditor or investigator can determine
compliance with (a) of this subsection, and otherwise in the form and
manner required by the board. The records must be available for
inspection by the board or any law enforcement agency and must be
maintained for two years. The board may suspend or revoke the
registration of an itinerant vendor who violates this subsection. For
purposes of this subsection, "disposition" means the return of product
to the wholesaler or distributor.
(c) The itinerant vendor must place all packages of tablets
containing ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or their
salts, isomers, or salts of isomers:
(i) Behind a counter where the public is not permitted; or
(ii) In a locked display case so that a customer wanting access to
the packages must ask an employee for assistance.
(6) The itinerant vendor selling a nonprescription drug containing
ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or their salts,
isomers, or salts of isomers shall require the purchaser of the drug or
drugs to provide government-issued photographic identification of
himself or herself, and to sign a record of the transaction. The
record must include the name and address of the purchaser, the date and
time of the sale, the name and initials of the itinerant vendor or
employee conducting the transaction, the name of the product being
sold, as well as the total quantity in grams, of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts
of isomers, being sold.
(7)(a) An itinerant vendor shall, before completing a sale under
this section, submit the required information to the electronic sales
tracking system established under section 5 of this act, beginning six
months after such a system is available without cost to the itinerant
vendor for accessing the system. The itinerant vendor shall not
complete the sale if the system generates a stop sale alert. Absent
negligence, wantonness, recklessness, or deliberate misconduct, any
itinerant vendor maintaining the electronic sales tracking system in
accordance with this subsection shall not be civilly liable as a result
of any act or omission in carrying out the duties required by this
subsection and shall be immune from liability to any third party unless
he or she has violated any provision of this subsection in relation to
a claim brought for such violation.
(b) If an itinerant vendor selling a nonprescription drug
containing ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their
salts, isomers, or salts of isomers experiences mechanical or
electronic failure of the electronic sales tracking system and is
unable to comply with the electronic sales tracking requirement, he or
she shall maintain a written log or an alternative electronic
recordkeeping mechanism until such time as he or she is able to comply
with the electronic sales tracking requirement.
(c) An itinerant vendor selling a nonprescription drug containing
ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts,
isomers, or salts of isomers may seek an exemption from submitting
transactions to the electronic sales tracking system in writing to the
Washington state attorney general stating the reasons for the
exemption. The attorney general may grant an exemption for good cause
shown, but in no event shall the exemption exceed one hundred eighty
days. An itinerant vendor that receives an exemption shall maintain a
logbook in hardcopy form and must require the purchaser to provide the
information required under this section before the completion of any
sale. The logbook shall be maintained as a record of each sale for
inspection by any law enforcement officer or board inspector during
normal business hours.

Sec. 3 RCW 69.43.105 and 2005 c 388 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section, "traditional Chinese herbal
practitioner" means a person who is certified as a diplomate in Chinese
herbology from the national certification commission for acupuncture
and oriental medicine or who has received a certificate in Chinese
herbology from a school accredited by the accreditation council on
acupuncture and oriental medicine.
(2) A pharmacy licensed by, or shopkeeper or itinerant vendor
registered with, the department of health under chapter 18.64 RCW, or
an employee thereof, a practitioner as defined in RCW 18.64.011, or a
traditional Chinese herbal practitioner may not knowingly sell,
transfer, or otherwise furnish to any person a product at retail that
he or she knows to contain any detectable quantity of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or
salts of isomers, without ((first)) obtaining photo identification of
the person that shows the date of birth of the person and complying
with the requirements of RCW 18.64.044 or 18.64.047.
(3) A person buying or receiving a product at retail containing any
detectable quantity of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, from
a pharmacy licensed by, or shopkeeper or itinerant vendor registered
with, the department of health under chapter 18.64 RCW, or an employee
thereof, a practitioner as defined in RCW 18.64.011, or a traditional
Chinese herbal practitioner must first produce photo identification of
the person that shows the date of birth of the person.
(4) Any product containing any detectable quantity of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or
salts of isomers, shall be kept (a) behind a counter where the public
is not permitted, or (b) in a ((central location)) locked display case
so that ((is not accessible by)) a customer((s without assistance of))
wanting access must ask an employee of the merchant for assistance.
(5) No pharmacy licensed by, or shopkeeper or itinerant vendor
registered with, the department of health under chapter 18.64 RCW, or
an employee thereof, a practitioner as defined in RCW 18.64.011, or a
traditional Chinese herbal practitioner may sell any product containing
any detectable quantity of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, to
a person that is not at least eighteen years old.
(6) The board of pharmacy, by rule, may exempt products containing
ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts,
isomers, or salts of isomers, in combination with another active
ingredient from the requirements of this section if they are found not
to be used in the illegal manufacture of methamphetamine or other
controlled dangerous substances. A manufacturer of a drug product may
apply for removal of the product from the requirements of this section
if the product is determined by the board to have been formulated in
such a way as to effectively prevent the conversion of the active
ingredient into methamphetamine. The burden of proof for exemption is
upon the person requesting the exemption. The petitioner shall provide
the board with evidence that the product has been formulated in such a
way as to serve as an effective general deterrent to the conversion of
pseudoephedrine into methamphetamine. The evidence must include the
furnishing of a valid scientific study, conducted by an independent,
professional laboratory and evincing professional quality chemical
analysis. Factors to be considered in whether a product should be
excluded from this section include but are not limited to:
(a) Ease with which the product can be converted to
methamphetamine;
(b) Ease with which ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine is extracted from the substance and whether it
forms an emulsion, salt, or other form;
(c) Whether the product contains a "molecular lock" that renders it
incapable of being converted into methamphetamine;
(d) Presence of other ingredients that render the product less
likely to be used in the manufacture of methamphetamine; and
(e) Any pertinent data that can be used to determine the risk of
the substance being used in the illegal manufacture of methamphetamine
or any other controlled substance.
(7) Nothing in this section applies:
(a) To any product containing ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers that
is not the only active ingredient and that is in liquid, liquid
capsule, or gel capsule form;
(b) To the sale of a product that may only be sold upon the
presentation of a prescription;
(c) To the sale of a product by a traditional Chinese herbal
practitioner to a patient; or
(d) When the details of the transaction are recorded in a pharmacy
profile individually identified with the recipient and maintained by a
licensed pharmacy.
(8)(a) No pharmacy licensed by, or shopkeeper or itinerant vendor
registered with, the department of health under chapter 18.64 RCW, a
practitioner as defined in RCW 18.64.011, or a traditional Chinese
herbal practitioner may retaliate against any employee that has made a
good faith attempt to comply with the requirements of this section by
requesting that a customer present photo identification, making a
reasonable effort to determine the customer's age.
(b) No pharmacy licensed by, or shopkeeper or itinerant vendor
registered with, the department of health under chapter 18.64 RCW, a
practitioner as defined in RCW 18.64.011, or a traditional Chinese
herbal practitioner is subject to prosecution under subsection (9) of
this section if they made a good faith attempt to comply with the
requirements of this section by requesting that a customer present
photo identification, making a reasonable effort to determine the
customer's age.
(9) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 4 RCW 69.43.110 and 2005 c 388 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for a pharmacy licensed by, or shopkeeper or
itinerant vendor registered with, the department of health under
chapter 18.64 RCW, or an employee thereof, or a practitioner as defined
in RCW 18.64.011, knowingly to sell, transfer, or to otherwise furnish,
in a single transaction((:
(a) More than two packages of one or more products that he or she
knows to contain ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine,
their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers; or
(b))) a ((single package of any product that he or she knows to
contain)) total of more than ((three)) 3.6 grams of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, their salts, isomers, or salts
of isomers, ((or a combination of any of these substances)) per sale or
more than nine grams per thirty days.
(2) It is unlawful for a person who is not a manufacturer,
wholesaler, pharmacy, practitioner, shopkeeper, or itinerant vendor
licensed by or registered with the department of health under chapter
18.64 RCW to purchase or acquire((, in any twenty-four hour period,))
more than the quantities of the substances specified in subsection (1)
of this section.
(3) It is unlawful for any person to sell or distribute any of the
substances specified in subsection (1) of this section unless the
person is licensed by or registered with the department of health under
chapter 18.64 RCW, or is a practitioner as defined in RCW 18.64.011.
(4) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The attorney general shall implement a real-time electronic
sales tracking system to monitor the nonprescription sale of products
in this state containing any detectable quantity of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts
of isomers, provided that the system is available to the state without
cost to the state or retailers for accessing the system. The attorney
general is authorized to enter into a public-private partnership,
through a memorandum of understanding or similar arrangement, to make
the system available to retailers and law enforcement in the state.
(2) The information contained in the electronic sales tracking
system shall be available:
(a) To any law enforcement agency or entity as authorized by the
attorney general; or
(b) Pursuant to a subpoena issued by a grand jury or magistrate.
(3) The electronic sales tracking system shall be capable of
generating a stop sale alert, which shall be a notification that
completion of the sale would result in the seller or purchaser
violating the quantity limits set forth in this section. The system
shall contain an override function for use by a dispenser of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts
of isomers, who has a reasonable fear of imminent bodily harm. Each
instance in which the override function is utilized shall be logged by
the system.
(4) The attorney general shall have the authority to adopt rules
necessary to implement and enforce the provisions of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 RCW 69.43.170 (Ephedrine, pseudoephedrine,
phenylpropanolamine -- Pilot project to record retail transactions--Penalty) and 2005 c 388 s 8 are each repealed.

--- END ---