BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.330
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Beginning September 1, 2010, second-class districts may
annually submit a condensed compliance report to the superintendent of
public instruction.
(2) The boards of directors of second-class districts that choose
to submit a condensed compliance report must:
(a) Dedicate a public meeting for reviewing the report and
receiving public testimony;
(b) Adopt the report at a public meeting; and
(c) Require the report to be signed by the school district
superintendent and chair of the board and acknowledged before a notary
public.
(3) Compliance requests from the superintendent of public
instruction not tied to funding are voluntary for second-class
districts submitting a condensed compliance report.
(4) For the purposes of this section, compliance requests do not
include data requests required to be submitted in accordance with
federal or state law, including data for a comprehensive K-12 education
data improvement system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop a
condensed compliance report form for second-class districts by July 1,
2010. The report form shall allow districts the option of indicating
one of the following for each funded program:
(a) The district has complied or received a state board of
education-approved waiver;
(b) The district has not complied, accompanied by an explanation or
the steps taken to comply; or
(c) The district has received a grant for less than half of a
full-time equivalent instructional staff.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may
conduct random audits of second-class districts that submit a condensed
compliance report under section 1 of this act. The purpose of the
audit is to determine whether documentation exists to support a school
district superintendent's condensed compliance report.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.155
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28A.160
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28A.165
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 28A.170
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 28A.175
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 28A.180
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 28A.185
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 28A.200
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 28A.210
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 28A.215
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 28A.220
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 28A.225
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 28A.235
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 28A.250
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 A new section is added to chapter 28A.305
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 A new section is added to chapter 28A.310
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 A new section is added to chapter 28A.315
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 A new section is added to chapter 28A.323
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 A new section is added to chapter 28A.325
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 A new section is added to chapter 28A.330
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 A new section is added to chapter 28A.335
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 A new section is added to chapter 28A.340
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 A new section is added to chapter 28A.343
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 A new section is added to chapter 28A.400
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 A new section is added to chapter 28A.405
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33 A new section is added to chapter 28A.415
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 34 A new section is added to chapter 28A.500
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 35 A new section is added to chapter 28A.505
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 36 A new section is added to chapter 28A.510
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 37 A new section is added to chapter 28A.515
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 38 A new section is added to chapter 28A.520
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 39 A new section is added to chapter 28A.525
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 40 A new section is added to chapter 28A.527
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 41 A new section is added to chapter 28A.530
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 42 A new section is added to chapter 28A.535
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 43 A new section is added to chapter 28A.540
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 44 A new section is added to chapter 28A.545
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 45 A new section is added to chapter 28A.600
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 46 A new section is added to chapter 28A.620
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 47 A new section is added to chapter 28A.623
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 48 A new section is added to chapter 28A.625
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 49 A new section is added to chapter 28A.630
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 50 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this
chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 51 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

--- END ---