BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to:
(a) A new business during the first twelve months of operation of
the business; or
(b) A new business during the first twenty-four months of operation
of the business if the new business has less than twenty-five
employment positions at the time it begins to engage in the normal
course of business. During the next twelve months of operation of the
business, the business is exempt from fifty percent of taxes due under
this chapter.
(2) As used in this section:
(a)(i) "New business" means a business that obtained or was
required to obtain a registration certificate under RCW 82.32.030 for
the first time during the calendar year for which exemption is first
claimed under this section.
(ii) "New business" does not include:
(A) A business that has been restructured, reorganized, or
transferred, unless the majority of the activities to be conducted
after the restructuring, reorganization, or transfer are significantly
different from the activities previously conducted;
(B) A new branch location or other facility except by an existing
out-of-state entity first doing business in this state;
(C) A business that is substantially similar to a business
currently operated, or operated within the past five years, by the same
principals.
(b) "Employment position" means a full-time, permanent employee of
the new business.
(3)(a) A new business must file an application, in a form and
manner required by the department, to qualify for the exemption under
this section.
(b) An application under this section must be filed within one year
of the time the business was required to obtain a registration
certificate under RCW 82.32.030.
(c) The time periods in subsection (1) of this section begin when
the application is approved.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.350.070 and 2005 c 424 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The life sciences discovery fund is created in the custody of
the state treasurer. Only the board or the board's designee may
authorize expenditures from the fund. Expenditures from the fund may
be made only for purposes of this chapter. Administrative expenses of
the authority, including staff support, may be paid only from the fund.
Revenues to the fund consist of transfers made by the legislature from
strategic contribution payments deposited in the tobacco settlement
account under RCW 43.79.480, moneys received pursuant to contribution
agreements entered into pursuant to RCW 43.350.030, moneys received
from gifts, grants, and bequests, and interest earned on the fund.
(2) For fiscal years 2011 through 2014, strategic contribution
payments deposited in the tobacco settlement account in an amount equal
to the amount necessary to offset the cost of the tax exemption in
section 1 of this act must be transferred to the state general fund.
The amount transferred to the state general fund under this subsection
must only be used for the purposes of offsetting the cost of the tax
exemption in section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act expires July 1, 2014.

--- END ---