BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.12.460 and 2004 c 44 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An employer may not discharge from employment or discipline a
volunteer firefighter or reserve officer or civil air patrol member
because of leave taken related to an alarm of fire or an emergency call
or an emergency service operation.
(2)(a) A volunteer firefighter or reserve officer or civil air
patrol member who believes he or she was discharged or disciplined in
violation of this section may file a complaint alleging the violation
with the director. The volunteer firefighter or reserve officer or
civil air patrol member may allege a violation only by filing such a
complaint within ninety days of the alleged violation.
(b) Upon receipt of the complaint, the director must cause an
investigation to be made as the director deems appropriate and must
determine whether this section has been violated. Notice of the
director's determination must be sent to the complainant and the
employer within ninety days of receipt of the complaint.
(c) If the director determines that this section was violated and
the employer fails to reinstate the employee or withdraw the
disciplinary action taken against the employee, whichever is
applicable, within thirty days of receipt of notice of the director's
determination, the volunteer firefighter or reserve officer or civil
air patrol member may bring an action against the employer alleging a
violation of this section and seeking reinstatement or withdrawal of
the disciplinary action.
(d) In any action brought under this section, the superior court
shall have jurisdiction, for cause shown, to restrain violations under
this section and to order reinstatement of the employee or withdrawal
of the disciplinary action.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Alarm of fire or emergency call" means responding to, working
at, or returning from a fire alarm or an emergency call, but not
participating in training or other nonemergency activities.
(b) "Civil air patrol member" means a person who is a member of the
Washington wing of the civil air patrol.
(c) "Emergency service operation" means the following operations of
the civil air patrol:
(i) Search and rescue missions designated by the air force rescue
coordination center;
(ii) Disaster relief, when requested by the federal emergency
management agency or the department of homeland security;
(iii) Humanitarian services, when requested by the federal
emergency management agency or the department of homeland security;
(iv) United States air force support designated by the first air
force; and
(v) Counterdrug missions.
(d) "Employer" means an employer who had twenty or more full-time
equivalent employees in the previous year.
(((c))) (e) "Reinstatement" means reinstatement with back pay,
without loss of seniority or benefits, and with removal of any related
adverse material from the employee's personnel file, if a file is
maintained by the employer.
(((d))) (f) "Withdrawal of disciplinary action" means withdrawal of
disciplinary action with back pay, without loss of seniority or
benefits, and with removal of any related adverse material from the
employee's personnel file, if a file is maintained by the employer.
(((e))) (g) "Volunteer firefighter" means a firefighter who:
(i) Is not paid;
(ii) Is not already at his or her place of employment when called
to serve as a volunteer, unless the employer agrees to provide such an
accommodation; and
(iii) Has been ordered to remain at his or her position by the
commanding authority at the scene of the fire.
(((f))) (h) "Reserve officer" has the meaning provided in RCW
41.24.010.
(4) The legislature declares that the public policies articulated
in this section depend on the procedures established in this section
and no civil or criminal action may be maintained relying on the public
policies articulated in this section without complying with the
procedures set forth in this section, and to that end all civil actions
and civil causes of action for such injuries and all jurisdiction of
the courts of this state over such causes are hereby abolished, except
as provided in this section.

--- END ---