BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that:
(1) The rate of home foreclosures is rising to unprecedented levels,
both for prime and subprime loans and foreclosures are expected to rise
because homeowners will not be able to afford payments due to rising
adjustable loan payments, reset of interest rates, and rising
unemployment and job loss; (2) homeowners will continue to have
problems selling their properties at the value of their home loans due
to falling housing prices; (3) foreclosures contribute to the decline
in the state's housing market, loss of property values, and loss of tax
revenues; and (4) with the number of nonjudicial foreclosures climbing
the current system for resolving foreclosure matters is inadequate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act may be known and cited as the
protect Washington homeowners act.

Sec. 3 RCW 61.24.005 and 2009 c 292 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Affiliate of beneficiary" means any entity which controls, is
controlled by, or is under common control with a beneficiary.
(2) "Beneficiary" means the holder of the instrument or document
evidencing the obligations secured by the deed of trust, excluding
persons holding the same as security for a different obligation.
(3) "Borrower" means a person or a general partner in a
partnership, including a joint venture, that is liable for all or part
of the obligations secured by the deed of trust under the instrument or
other document that is the principal evidence of such obligations, or
the person's successors if they are liable for those obligations under
a written agreement with the beneficiary.
(4) "Commercial loan" means a loan that is not made primarily for
personal, family, or household purposes.
(5) "Department" means the department of financial institutions.
(6) "Fair value" means the value of the property encumbered by a
deed of trust that is sold pursuant to a trustee's sale. This value
shall be determined by the court or other appropriate adjudicator by
reference to the most probable price, as of the date of the trustee's
sale, which would be paid in cash or other immediately available funds,
after deduction of prior liens and encumbrances with interest to the
date of the trustee's sale, for which the property would sell on such
date after reasonable exposure in the market under conditions requisite
to a fair sale, with the buyer and seller each acting prudently,
knowledgeably, and for self-interest, and assuming that neither is
under duress.
(((6))) (7) "Grantor" means a person, or its successors, who
executes a deed of trust to encumber the person's interest in property
as security for the performance of all or part of the borrower's
obligations.
(((7))) (8) "Guarantor" means any person and its successors who is
not a borrower and who guarantees any of the obligations secured by a
deed of trust in any written agreement other than the deed of trust.
(((8))) (9) "Owner-occupied" means property that is the principal
residence of the borrower.
(((9))) (10) "Person" means any natural person, or legal or
governmental entity.
(((10))) (11) "Record" and "recorded" includes the appropriate
registration proceedings, in the instance of registered land.
(((11))) (12) "Residential real property" means property consisting
solely of a single-family residence, a residential condominium unit, or
a residential cooperative unit.
(((12))) (13) "Tenant-occupied property" means property consisting
solely of residential real property that is the principal residence of
a tenant subject to chapter 59.18 RCW or other building with four or
fewer residential units that is the principal residence of a tenant
subject to chapter 59.18 RCW.
(((13))) (14) "Trustee" means the person designated as the trustee
in the deed of trust or appointed under RCW 61.24.010(2).
(((14))) (15) "Trustee's sale" means a nonjudicial sale under a
deed of trust undertaken pursuant to this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 61.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) At any point after the beneficiary declares the underlying loan
in default and accelerates the loan, but at least thirty days before
the recording of a notice of sale pursuant to RCW 61.24.040 on owner-occupied residential real property, the beneficiary or authorized agent
must make a good faith review of the borrower's financial situation and
offer, whenever eligible, a loan modification, or other option to
assist the borrower in bringing the arrears current.
(2) A good faith review of the borrower's financial situation
includes, but is not limited to, an evaluation of the borrower's
eligibility for all loan modification programs established by the
federal government or mortgage industry, and if the borrower elects,
participation in the foreclosure mediation program established in this
section. Failure to act in good faith constitutes a defense to a
foreclosure and a violation of the consumer protection act.
(3) The foreclosure mediation program shall address all the issues
related to the foreclosure, including but not limited to,
reinstatement, modification of the loan, and restructuring of the debt.
(4) Prior to the recording of a notice of sale pursuant to RCW
61.24.040, a trustee, beneficiary, or authorized agent shall provide a
notice to the borrower and to the department by first-class mail,
return receipt requested, containing the following:
(a) The name, address, and telephone number of a person with
authority to negotiate a loan modification on behalf of the beneficiary
of the deed of trust;
(b) The toll-free telephone number made available by the United
States department of housing and urban development to find a department
certified housing counseling agency to assist homeowners in the state
avoid foreclosure; and
(c) The form notice, as proscribed by the department, explaining
the availability of the foreclosure mediation program and upon which
the borrower may indicate his or her election to enter into foreclosure
mediation or to waive mediation. The notice must encourage the
borrower to meet with a housing counselor or attorney prior to
mediation. The notice must inform the borrower that the form must be
returned to the department, or the department's designee, within thirty
days or the right to foreclosure mediation is waived.
(5) A trustee may not record a notice of sale under RCW 61.24.040
until thirty days after receiving a waiver of foreclosure mediation as
provided in subsection (7) of this section or the certification as
required by subsection (12) of this section.
(6) If the borrower indicates on the form the election to enter
into mediation, the department, or the department's designee, shall
notify the beneficiary of the deed of trust by mail, return receipt
requested, of the election of the borrower to enter into mediation.
The foreclosure is stayed and no further action may be taken to proceed
with the foreclosure until the certification of the foreclosure
mediation is made by the mediator.
(7) If the borrower indicates on the form his or her election to
waive mediation or fails to return the form to the department or
department's designee as required, the department or department's
designee shall execute an affidavit attesting to that fact under
penalty of perjury and mail a copy of the affidavit, together with the
waiver of mediation by the borrower, to the trustee, beneficiary, or
authorized agent, and in the case of a failure to return the form, to
the borrower.
(8) The department, or department's designee, shall maintain a list
of foreclosure mediators and may establish a required training program
for foreclosure mediators and require the training prior to being
appointed. The following persons may serve as foreclosure mediators
under this section:
(a) An attorney who is an active member of the Washington state bar
association;
(b) An employee of a United States department of housing and urban
development certified housing counseling agency;
(c) An employee or volunteer of a dispute resolution center; or
(d) Any other person authorized by the department.
(9) Within ten business days of the election by the borrower of
mediation, the department shall provide the borrower and the
beneficiary with the names, telephone numbers, and addresses of no
fewer than two mediators in the geographical area in which the
residential real property is located. Within five business days after
the department provides this information, each party shall select a
mediator and notify the department of the party's selection. If the
parties agree on a mediator, the department shall notify them of the
agreed upon mediator within five business days. If the parties do not
agree on a mediator, if one party does not notify the department of a
selection in a timely manner, or if both parties so request, the
department shall select a mediator and notify the parties of the
selection.
(10)(a) The foreclosure mediator may schedule phone conferences,
consultations with the parties individually, and other communications
to ensure that the parties have all the necessary information to engage
in a productive foreclosure mediation session. The foreclosure
mediator shall convene a foreclosure mediation session no later than
sixty days after receiving a referral from the department.
(b) The foreclosure mediator shall send written notice of the time,
date, and location of the foreclosure mediation session to the
borrower, the beneficiary, and the department at least seven days prior
to the foreclosure mediation session. The same notice must also state:
(i) That the borrower may be represented in the foreclosure mediation
session by an attorney or other advocate; (ii) that a person with
authority to agree to a proposed settlement, loan modification, and
dismissal or continuation of the foreclosure proceeding must represent
the beneficiary at the foreclosure mediation session; and (iii) the
complete list of documents and calculations that must be taken by the
parties to the mediation, including the documents and calculations as
required under subsection (12)(b) of this section. The department may
prescribe the format of this notice by rule.
(c) The borrower, the beneficiary, and the mediator may participate
by telephone during any contact required under this section.
(11) The participants in a foreclosure mediation session shall
address all issues of foreclosure, including but not limited to
reinstatement, modification of the loan, or restructuring of the debt,
that will enable the borrower and the lender to avoid foreclosure. Any
loan modification offered to the borrower must comply with current
federal and state law and the borrower must be able to reasonably
afford to repay the loan, as modified, according to the scheduled
payments. The mediator shall require the participants to address these
issues by considering the following:
(a) The borrower's current circumstances, including the borrower's
current income, debts, and obligations;
(b) The net present value of receiving payments pursuant to a
modified mortgage loan as compared to the anticipated net recovery
following foreclosure; and
(c) Any affordable loan modification calculation and net present
value calculation when required under the federal home affordable
modification program. If the loan is insured by the federal housing
administration, subject to federal national mortgage association or
federal home loan mortgage corporation guidelines, or insured by the
veterans administration, then the calculations required by those
agencies must be used. If such a calculation is not required, then the
beneficiary must use the current calculations, assumptions, and forms
that are established by the federal deposit insurance corporation and
published in the federal deposit insurance corporation loan
modification program guide. Any worksheet, spreadsheet, or other
calculation tool used to make the calculations, including all inputs
and numerical assumptions, must be provided to the borrower.
(12) The parties shall conduct all discussions in good faith. A
violation of the obligation of good faith includes:
(a) Failure to participate in mediation sessions without good
cause;
(b) Failure of the beneficiary to have access to the following
documentation at the foreclosure mediation: An accurate statement
containing the balance of the loan; copies of original loan documents;
proof that the entity claiming to be the beneficiary is the owner of
any promissory note or obligation secured by the deed of trust; the
amount of any arrearage; an itemized list of fees and charges
outstanding; the payment history and schedule; an itemized statement of
the arrearage, including a breakdown of all fees and charges claimed;
an affordable loan modification calculation; a net present value
calculation showing all inputs and the outcome of the net present value
test expressed in a dollar amount; the most recently available
appraisal; any other relevant information as determined by the
department; and if the beneficiary claims it is unable to implement a
loan modification due to limitations in a pooling and servicing
agreement, a copy of the pooling and servicing agreement containing the
restriction and documentation of efforts the beneficiary made to obtain
a waiver of the provision;
(c) Failure of a party to designate a representative with adequate
authority to fully settle, compromise, or otherwise mediate the matter;
(d) The beneficiary or lender requests, as a condition of agreeing
to a modification in the terms or conditions of the loan, that the
borrower waive other rights or claims he or she may have in connection
with the loan; or
(e) Failure of a beneficiary to agree to a modification of the loan
where the net present value of the modified loan exceeds the
anticipated net recovery at foreclosure.
(13) Within five business days after the conclusion of a
foreclosure mediation session, the foreclosure mediator shall make a
written certification to the department and send copies to the parties
of:
(a) The date, time, and location of the loan mediation session;
(b) The names of all persons in attendance at the loan mediation
session;
(c) Whether the default was cured by entry of a reinstatement,
modification of the loan, or restructuring of the debt;
(d) If held, whether the parties participated in the foreclosure
mediation in good faith; and
(e) A description of the net present value test used, and a copy of
the calculation including the result of the net present value test
expressed in a dollar amount.
(14) The failure of the beneficiary to act in good faith at the
mediation constitutes a defense to a foreclosure and is a violation of
the consumer protection act. If a mediation agreement was not reached
and the report of the mediator indicates that the calculations showed
the net present value of the modified loan exceeds the anticipated net
recovery at foreclosure, the borrower may enjoin the foreclosure.
(15) A loan mediator may charge fees as authorized by this
subsection or by the department. Unless the fee is waived or as
otherwise authorized by the department, a foreclosure mediator's fee is
set by rule by the department but may not exceed four hundred dollars
for a foreclosure mediation session lasting between one hour and three
hours. The foreclosure mediator's fee shall be divided equally between
the beneficiary and the borrower. The beneficiary and the borrower
shall tender the loan mediator's fee in full at the outset of the
session.
(16) This section applies only to deeds of trust made from January
1, 2003, to December 31, 2008, inclusive, that are recorded against
owner-occupied residential real property. This section does not apply
to deeds of trust:
(a) Securing a commercial loan;
(b) Securing obligations of a grantor who is not the borrower or a
guarantor; or
(c) Securing a purchaser's obligations under a seller-financed
sale.
(17) The department shall report annually to the legislature on:
(a) The performance of the program, including the numbers of
homeowners who are notified of mediation and who attend mediation;
(b) The results of the mediation program, including the numbers of
loans restructured or modified, the number of principal write-downs and
interest rate reductions, and to the extent practical, the number of
homeowners who default within a year of restructuring or modification;
and
(c) Make recommendations for any changes to the program to the
legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 61.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any duty that servicers may have to maximize net present value
under their pooling and servicing agreements is owed to all parties in
a deed of trust pool, not to any particular parties, and a servicer
acts in the best interests of all parties if it agrees to or implements
a deed of trust modification or workout plan for which both of the
following apply:
(a) The deed of trust is in payment default, or payment default is
reasonably foreseeable; and
(b) Anticipated recovery under the deed of trust modification or
workout plan exceeds the anticipated recovery through foreclosure on a
net present value basis.
(2) The mortgagee, beneficiary, or authorized agent shall offer the
borrower a deed of trust modification or workout plan if the
modification or plan is consistent with its contractual or other
authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 61.24 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that the practices covered by sections 4 and
5 of this act are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A
violation of sections 4 and 5 of this act is not reasonable in relation
to the development and preservation of business and is an unfair or
deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition
for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 36.22 RCW
to read as follows:
A surcharge in an amount determined by the department of financial
institutions by rule but no greater than the amount of the superior
court civil filing fee shall be charged by the county auditor at the
time of recording of each notice of sale on owner-occupied residential
real property under RCW 61.24.040. The auditor may retain up to two
percent of the funds collected to administer collection. The remaining
funds shall be transmitted monthly to the director of financial
institutions who shall deposit the funds into the protect Washington
homeowners mediation program account under section 8 of this act. The
department of financial institutions is responsible for the
distribution of the funds in the account and shall develop rules for
the use of these funds to fund the protect Washington homeowners
mediation program and to fund housing counseling agencies approved by
the United States department of housing and urban development operating
to assist homeowners in the state avoid foreclosure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 61.24 RCW
to read as follows:
The protect Washington homeowners mediation program account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the
surcharge under section 7 of this act must be deposited into the
account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the
purposes set forth in section 7 of this act. Only the director of
financial institutions or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act takes effect September 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 4, 7, and 8 of this act expire
December 31, 2014.

--- END ---