BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall reconvene the expert review panel appointed
under RCW 47.01.400, for the purpose of updating the work that was
previously completed by the panel on the Alaskan Way viaduct and
Seattle Seawall replacement project and the state route number 520
bridge replacement and HOV project. The expert review panel must
report updated findings and recommendations as described in RCW
47.01.400 to the joint transportation committee, the office of
financial management, and the governor by September 1, 2010. Upon
receipt of the expert review panel's updated findings and
recommendations, the governor must make a determination of whether the
financial plans for the Alaskan Way viaduct and Seattle Seawall
replacement project and the state route number 520 bridge replacement
and HOV project are feasible and sufficient to complete the projects as
described in their supplemental draft environmental impact statements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The King county executive shall facilitate a resolution to the
final project design for the state route number 520 bridge replacement
and HOV project by preparing a plan for addressing the impacts of the
state route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV project on
surrounding cities, neighborhoods, parks, and institutions of higher
education. In evaluating the project's impacts, the county executive
shall give great weight to the concerns of cities, neighborhoods, and
institutions of higher education impacted by design proposals on either
side of Lake Washington.
(2) The legislature intends that the plan will allow a
comprehensive approach to mitigating the impacts of the project and
that the county executive presents the plan to the department. The
plan must be fiscally constrained in its review of mitigation options
and recommend only those strategies that can be implemented within the
project budget amount as identified in RCW 47.01.418(2)(a).
(3) The county executive shall convene an advisory committee to
help finalize the plan; however, the county executive has final
approval of the plan. The county executive must designate
representation from the community council or governing body of each
neighborhood and city impacted by the state route number 520 bridge
replacement and HOV project and representation from the Washington park
arboretum to serve on the advisory committee to guide the planning
process and for plan preparation. The University of Washington and
secretary of transportation shall each designate a representative to
serve on the advisory committee. The department shall provide
technical assistance for the advisory committee.
(4) The department shall not commence construction on any part of
the state route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV project until
agreements have been reached with the county executive that are
consistent with the plan.

--- END ---