BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The city of Seattle shall prepare a plan for addressing the
impacts of the state route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV
project on Seattle neighborhoods, parks, and institutions of higher
education. In evaluating the project's impacts, the city shall give
great weight to the concerns of neighborhoods and institutions of
higher education impacted by design proposals.
(2) The legislature intends that the plan will allow a
comprehensive approach to mitigating the impacts of the project and
that the city presents the plan to the department.
(3) The mayor of Seattle and the Seattle city council shall convene
an advisory committee to help finalize the plan; however, the mayor of
Seattle and the Seattle city council have final approval of the plan.
The city must designate representation from the community council of
each neighborhood impacted by the state route number 520 bridge
replacement and HOV project and representation from the Washington park
arboretum to serve on the advisory committee to guide the planning
process and for plan preparation. The University of Washington and
secretary of transportation shall each designate a representative to
serve on the advisory committee.
(4) The department shall not commence construction on any part of
the state route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV project until
agreements have been reached with the city that are consistent with the
plan.

--- END ---