BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 81.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission shall establish rules to minimize the risk of
fire resulting from rail grinding, welding, or vegetation clearing
activities by railroads. These rules must include, but are not limited
to, requirements concerning notification to the commission and local
governments of such activities.
(2) A railroad may not engage in rail grinding, welding, or
vegetation clearing activities that do not comply with commission
rules.
(3) Each violation of this section is punishable by a fine of up to
twenty thousand dollars as determined by the commission.

--- END ---