BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 RCW 47.01.141 (Biennial report) and 1987 c
505 s 49, 1984 c 7 s 75, 1977 c 75 s 68, & 1973 2nd ex.s. c 12 s 1 are
each repealed.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.43.111 and 2005 c 27 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
To ensure transparency, integrity, and credibility during
Washington state patrol vehicle accident investigations, the agency
will continue to review and reform the agency policies and procedures
regarding Washington state patrol officers that are involved in vehicle
accidents. The agency shall develop agency policies and include as
part of the terms of their collective bargaining agreements a
progressive corrective process addressing Washington state patrol
officer vehicle accidents that may include retraining in vehicle
handling, wage or benefit reductions, and termination of employment.
The agency shall develop a process for tracking accidents and an
accident review process. ((Annually, a collision data report must be
produced designating each accident during the year as minor or severe
and any resulting disciplinary actions and be available for review by
the legislature.)) The agency shall implement communication procedures
for the victims involved in the accidents from the time the accident
occurs until the investigative process has been concluded. The
policies must also provide for outside supervision of accident
investigations by a qualified independent agency under certain
circumstances.
Before the legislative committee assembly in September 2005, the
Washington state patrol shall have an outside entity that has a
reputation for and has proven experience in law enforcement management
and reviewing law enforcement and criminal justice policies and
procedures review the agency's proposed law enforcement vehicle
accident policies and procedures where a law enforcement officer is
involved. The agency will present the proposed policies and procedures
to the legislature and finalize the policies and procedures based on
input from the legislature. The Washington state patrol shall report
to the house and senate transportation committees by November 30, 2005,
on the updated policies, processes, and procedures. Once the policies
and procedures are completed, other law enforcement agencies may adopt
the policies and procedures for their agencies.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.32.085 and 2009 c 46 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington state patrol, in consultation with the
department of licensing, shall adopt rules consistent with this chapter
to regulate vehicle safety requirements for motor carriers who own,
control, manage, or operate a commercial motor vehicle within this
state. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the rules adopted
by the state patrol under this section must be as rigorous as federal
regulations governing certain interstate motor carriers at 49 C.F.R.
Parts 40 and 380 through 397, which cover the areas of commercial motor
carrier driver training, controlled substance and alcohol use and
testing, compliance with the federal driver's license requirements and
penalties, vehicle equipment and safety standards, hazardous material
practices, financial responsibility, driver qualifications, hours of
service, vehicle inspection and corrective actions, and assessed
penalties for noncompliance. The state patrol shall amend these rules
periodically to maintain, to the extent permissible under this chapter,
standards as rigorous as the federal regulations governing certain
interstate motor carriers. ((The state patrol shall submit a report to
the legislature by December 31st of each year that outlines new rules
or rule changes and explains how the state rules compare to the federal
regulations.))
(2) Motor vehicles operated by entities with authority under
chapters 81.66, 81.68, 81.70, and 81.77 RCW, and by household goods
carriers operating under chapter 81.80 RCW, must comply with rules
regulating vehicle safety adopted by the utilities and transportation
commission.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.61.6885 and 2000 c 190 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The traffic safety commission shall conduct an educational campaign
using all available methods to raise public awareness of the importance
of properly restraining child passengers and the value of seatbelts to
adult motorists. ((The traffic safety commission shall report to the
transportation committees of the legislature on the campaign and
results observed on the highways. The first report is due December 1,
2000, and annually thereafter.))

Sec. 5 RCW 46.66.030 and 2007 c 199 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington auto theft prevention authority may obtain or
contract for staff services, including an executive director, and any
facilities and equipment as the authority requires to carry out its
duties.
(2) The director may enter into contracts with any public or
private organization to carry out the purposes of this section and RCW
46.66.010, 46.66.020, and 46.66.040 through 46.66.080.
(3) The authority shall review and make recommendations to the
legislature and the governor regarding motor vehicle theft in
Washington state. In preparing the recommendations, the authority
shall, at a minimum, review the following issues:
(a) Determine the scope of the problem of motor vehicle theft,
including:
(i) Particular areas of the state where the problem is the
greatest;
(ii) Annual data reported by local law enforcement regarding the
number of reported thefts, investigations, recovered vehicles, arrests,
and convictions; and
(iii) An assessment of estimated funds needed to hire sufficient
investigators to respond to all reported thefts.
(b) Analyze the various methods of combating the problem of motor
vehicle theft;
(c) Develop and implement a plan of operation; and
(d) Develop and implement a financial plan.
(4) The authority is not a law enforcement agency and may not
gather, collect, or disseminate intelligence information for the
purpose of investigating specific crimes or pursuing or capturing
specific perpetrators. Members of the authority may not exercise
general authority peace officer powers while acting in their capacity
as members of the authority, unless the exercise of peace officer
powers is necessary to prevent an imminent threat to persons or
property.
(((5) The authority shall annually report its activities, findings,
and recommendations during the preceding year to the legislature by
December 31st.))

Sec. 6 RCW 47.01.071 and 2007 c 516 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The transportation commission shall have the following functions,
powers, and duties:
(1) To propose policies to be adopted by the governor and the
legislature designed to assure the development and maintenance of a
comprehensive and balanced statewide transportation system which will
meet the needs of the people of this state for safe and efficient
transportation services. Wherever appropriate, the policies shall
provide for the use of integrated, intermodal transportation systems.
The policies must be aligned with the goals established in RCW
47.04.280. To this end the commission shall:
(a) Develop transportation policies which are based on the
policies, goals, and objectives expressed and inherent in existing
state laws;
(b) Inventory the adopted policies, goals, and objectives of the
local and area-wide governmental bodies of the state and define the
role of the state, regional, and local governments in determining
transportation policies, in transportation planning, and in
implementing the state transportation plan;
(c) Establish a procedure for review and revision of the state
transportation policy and for submission of proposed changes to the
governor and the legislature; and
(d) Integrate the statewide transportation plan with the needs of
the elderly and persons with disabilities, and coordinate federal and
state programs directed at assisting local governments to answer such
needs;
(2) To provide for the effective coordination of state
transportation planning with national transportation policy, state and
local land use policies, and local and regional transportation plans
and programs;
(3) In conjunction with the provisions under RCW 47.01.075, to
provide for public involvement in transportation designed to elicit the
public's views both with respect to adequate transportation services
and appropriate means of minimizing adverse social, economic,
environmental, and energy impact of transportation programs;
(4) By December 2010, to prepare a comprehensive and balanced
statewide transportation plan consistent with the state's growth
management goals and based on the transportation policy goals provided
under RCW 47.04.280 and applicable state and federal laws. The plan
must reflect the priorities of government developed by the office of
financial management and address regional needs, including multimodal
transportation planning. The plan must, at a minimum: (a) Establish
a vision for the development of the statewide transportation system;
(b) identify significant statewide transportation policy issues; and
(c) recommend statewide transportation policies and strategies to the
legislature to fulfill the requirements of subsection (1) of this
section. The plan must be the product of an ongoing process that
involves representatives of significant transportation interests and
the general public from across the state. Every four years, the plan
shall be reviewed and revised, and submitted to the governor and the
house of representatives and senate standing committees on
transportation.
The plan shall take into account federal law and regulations
relating to the planning, construction, and operation of transportation
facilities;
(5) ((By December 2007, the office of financial management shall
submit a baseline report on the progress toward attaining the policy
goals under RCW 47.04.280 in the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium. By October
1, 2008, beginning with the development of the 2009-2011 biennial
transportation budget, and by October 1st biennially thereafter, the
office of financial management shall submit to the legislature and the
governor a report on the progress toward the attainment by state
transportation agencies of the state transportation policy goals and
objectives prescribed by statute, appropriation, and governor
directive. The report must, at a minimum, include the degree to which
state transportation programs have progressed toward the attainment of
the policy goals established under RCW 47.04.280, as measured by the
objectives and performance measures established by the office of
financial management under RCW 47.04.280;
(6))) To propose to the governor and the legislature prior to the
convening of each regular session held in an odd-numbered year a
recommended budget for the operations of the commission as required by
RCW 47.01.061;
(((7))) (6) To adopt such rules as may be necessary to carry out
reasonably and properly those functions expressly vested in the
commission by statute;
(((8))) (7) To contract with the office of financial management or
other appropriate state agencies for administrative support, accounting
services, computer services, and other support services necessary to
carry out its other statutory duties;
(((9))) (8) To conduct transportation-related studies and policy
analysis to the extent directed by the legislature or governor in the
biennial transportation budget act, or as otherwise provided in law,
and subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose; and
(((10))) (9) To exercise such other specific powers and duties as
may be vested in the transportation commission by this or any other
provision of law.

Sec. 7 RCW 47.04.210 and 2005 c 319 s 122 are each amended to
read as follows:
Federal funds that are administered by the department of
transportation and are passed through to municipal corporations or
political subdivisions of the state and moneys that are received as
total reimbursement for goods, services, or projects constructed by the
department of transportation are removed from the transportation
budget. To process and account for these expenditures a new treasury
trust account is created to be used for all department of
transportation one hundred percent federal and local reimbursable
transportation expenditures. This new account is nonbudgeted and
nonappropriated. At the same time, federal and private local
appropriations and full-time equivalents in subprograms R2, R3, T6, Y6,
and Z2 processed through this new account are removed from the
department of transportation's 1997-99 budget.
The department of transportation may make expenditures from the
account before receiving federal and local reimbursements. However, at
the end of each biennium, the account must maintain a zero or positive
cash balance. In the twenty-fourth month of each biennium the
department of transportation shall calculate and transfer sufficient
cash from either the motor vehicle fund or the multimodal
transportation account to cover any negative cash balances. The amount
transferred is calculated based on expenditures from each fund. In
addition, any interest charges accruing to the new account must be
distributed to the motor vehicle fund and the multimodal transportation
account.
((The department of transportation shall provide an annual report
to the senate and house transportation committees and the office of
financial management on expenditures and full-time equivalents
processed through the new account. The report must also include
recommendations for process changes, if needed.))

Sec. 8 RCW 47.04.220 and 2005 c 319 s 123 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The miscellaneous transportation programs account is created in
the custody of the state treasurer.
(2) Moneys from the account may be used only for the costs of:
(a) Miscellaneous transportation services provided by the
department that are reimbursed by other public and private entities;
(b) Local transportation projects for which the department is a
conduit for federal reimbursement to a municipal corporation or
political subdivision; or
(c) Other reimbursable activities as recommended by the senate and
house transportation committees and approved by the office of financial
management.
(3) Moneys received as reimbursement for expenditures under
subsection (2) of this section must be deposited into the account.
(4) No appropriation is required for expenditures from this
account. This fund is not subject to allotment procedures provided
under chapter 43.88 RCW.
(5) Only the secretary of transportation or the secretary's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
(6) It is the intent of the legislature that this account maintain
a zero or positive cash balance at the end of each biennium. Toward
this purpose the department may make expenditures from the account
before receiving reimbursements under subsection (2) of this section.
Before the end of the biennium, the department shall transfer
sufficient cash to cover any negative cash balances from the motor
vehicle fund and the multimodal transportation account to the
miscellaneous transportation programs account for unrecovered
reimbursements. The department shall calculate the distribution of
this transfer based on expenditures. In the ensuing biennium the
department shall transfer the reimbursements received in the
miscellaneous transportation programs account back to the motor vehicle
fund and the multimodal transportation account to the extent of the
cash transferred at biennium end. The department shall also distribute
any interest charges accruing to the miscellaneous transportation
programs account to the motor vehicle fund and the multimodal
transportation account. Adjustments for any indirect cost recoveries
may also be made at this time.
(((7) The department shall provide an annual report to the senate
and house transportation committees and the office of financial
management on the expenditures and full-time equivalents processed
through the miscellaneous transportation programs account. The report
must also include recommendations for changes to the process, if
needed.))

Sec. 9 RCW 47.04.280 and 2007 c 516 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature to establish policy goals
for the planning, operation, performance of, and investment in, the
state's transportation system. The policy goals established under this
section are deemed consistent with the benchmark categories adopted by
the state's blue ribbon commission on transportation on November 30,
2000. Public investments in transportation should support achievement
of these policy goals:
(a) Preservation: To maintain, preserve, and extend the life and
utility of prior investments in transportation systems and services;
(b) Safety: To provide for and improve the safety and security of
transportation customers and the transportation system;
(c) Mobility: To improve the predictable movement of goods and
people throughout Washington state;
(d) Environment: To enhance Washington's quality of life through
transportation investments that promote energy conservation, enhance
healthy communities, and protect the environment; and
(e) Stewardship: To continuously improve the quality,
effectiveness, and efficiency of the transportation system.
(2) The powers, duties, and functions of state transportation
agencies must be performed in a manner consistent with the policy goals
set forth in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) These policy goals are intended to be the basis for
establishing detailed and measurable objectives and related performance
measures.
(4) It is the intent of the legislature that the office of
financial management establish objectives and performance measures for
the department of transportation and other state agencies with
transportation-related responsibilities to ensure transportation system
performance at local, regional, and state government levels progresses
toward the attainment of the policy goals set forth in subsection (1)
of this section. The office of financial management shall submit
initial objectives and performance measures to the legislature for its
review and shall provide copies of the same to the commission during
the 2008 legislative session. The office of financial management shall
submit objectives and performance measures to the legislature for its
review and shall provide copies of the same to the commission during
each regular session of the legislature during an even-numbered year
thereafter.
(5) By October 1, 2010, and by October 1st biennially thereafter,
the office of financial management shall submit to the legislature and
the governor a report on the progress toward the attainment by state
transportation agencies of the state transportation policy goals and
objectives prescribed by statute, appropriation, and governor
directive. The report must, at a minimum, include the degree to which
state transportation programs have progressed toward the attainment of
the policy goals established under this section, as measured by the
objectives and performance measures established by the office of
financial management under this section.
(6) This section does not create a private right of action.

Sec. 10 RCW 79A.25.030 and 2007 c 241 s 42 are each amended to
read as follows:
((From time to time, but at least once each four years, the
director of licensing shall determine the amount or proportion of
moneys paid to him or her as motor vehicle fuel tax which is tax on
marine fuel. The director of licensing shall make or authorize the
making of studies, surveys, or investigations to assist him or her in
making such determination, and shall hold one or more public hearings
on the findings of such studies, surveys, or investigations prior to
making his or her determination. The studies, surveys, or
investigations conducted pursuant to this section shall encompass a
period of twelve consecutive months each time. The final determination
by the director of licensing shall be implemented as of the next
biennium after the period from which the study data were collected.
The director of licensing may delegate his or her duties and authority
under this section to one or more persons of the department of
licensing if he or she finds such delegation necessary and proper to
the efficient performance of these duties. Costs of carrying out the
provisions of this section shall be paid from the marine fuel tax
refund account created in RCW 79A.25.040, upon legislative
appropriation)) (1) The amount or proportion of motor vehicle fuel tax
moneys that are tax on marine fuel is deemed to be one percent of the
total motor vehicle fuel tax moneys collected annually.
(2) One percent of the total motor vehicle fuel tax moneys
collected annually is to be deposited into the marine fuel tax refund
account as provided in RCW 79A.25.040 and 79A.25.070.

Sec. 11 RCW 79A.25.040 and 2000 c 11 s 71 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is created the marine fuel tax refund account in the state
treasury. The director of licensing shall request the state treasurer
to refund monthly from the motor vehicle fund ((amounts which have been
determined to be tax on marine fuel)) an amount equal to one percent of
the motor vehicle fuel tax moneys collected during that period. The
state treasurer shall refund such amounts and place them in the marine
fuel tax refund account to be held for those entitled thereto pursuant
to chapter 82.36 RCW and RCW 79A.25.050, except that ((he or she
shall)) the treasurer may not refund and place in the marine fuel tax
refund account ((for any period for which a determination has been made
pursuant to RCW 79A.25.030)) more than the greater of the following
amounts: (1) An amount equal to two percent of all moneys paid to
((him or her)) the treasurer as motor vehicle fuel tax for such period,
(2) an amount necessary to meet all approved claims for refund of tax
on marine fuel for such period.

Sec. 12 RCW 79A.25.070 and 2003 c 361 s 409 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon expiration of the time limited by RCW 82.36.330 for claiming
of refunds of tax on marine fuel, the state of Washington shall succeed
to the right to such refunds. The director of licensing, after taking
into account past and anticipated claims for refunds from and deposits
to the marine fuel tax refund account ((and the costs of carrying out
the provisions of RCW 79A.25.030)), shall request the state treasurer
to transfer monthly from the marine fuel tax refund account an amount
equal to the proportion of the moneys in the account representing a
motor vehicle fuel tax rate of: (1) Nineteen cents per gallon of motor
vehicle fuel from July 1, 2003, through June 30, 2005; (2) twenty cents
per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2005, through June 30,
2007; (3) twenty-one cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July
1, 2007, through June 30, 2009; (4) twenty-two cents per gallon of
motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011; and (5)
twenty-three cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel beginning July 1,
2011, and thereafter, to the recreation resource account and the
remainder to the motor vehicle fund.

--- END ---