BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 42.52 RCW
to read as follows:
An employee of the legislature is exempt from this chapter for an
act that is a violation of this chapter if the employee was directed by
a member of the legislature, in writing, to perform the act.

--- END ---