BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.16.110 and 2009 c 469 s 504 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Administrator" means an owner and assignee of a community
solar project as defined in subsection (2)(a)(i) of this section that
is responsible for applying for the investment cost recovery incentive
on behalf of the other owners and performing such administrative tasks
on behalf of the other owners as may be necessary, such as receiving
investment cost recovery incentive payments, and allocating and paying
appropriate amounts of such payments to the other owners.
(2)(a) "Community solar project" means:
(i) A solar energy system that produces a maximum instantaneous
power output of one hundred kilowatts of electricity and is owned by
local individuals, households, nonprofit organizations, or nonutility
businesses that is placed on the property owned by a cooperating local
governmental entity that is not in the light and power business or in
the gas distribution business; ((or))
(ii) A utility-owned solar energy system that produces a maximum
instantaneous power output of one hundred kilowatts of electricity and
that is voluntarily funded by the utility's ratepayers where, in
exchange for their financial support, the utility gives contributors a
payment or credit on their utility bill for the value of the
electricity produced by the project; or
(iii)(A) Except as provided in (B) of this subsection (2)(a)(iii),
a solar energy system, placed on the property owned by a cooperating
local governmental entity that is not in the light and power business
or in the gas distribution business, that produces a maximum
instantaneous power output of one hundred kilowatts of electricity, and
that is owned by a limited liability company whose members are each
eligible for an investment cost recovery incentive for the same
customer-generated electricity as provided in RCW 82.16.120.
(B) The one hundred kilowatt limitation in (A) of this subsection
(2)(a)(iii) does not apply to any community solar system owned by a
limited liability company that has received all required government
permits and approvals and begins construction by December 31, 2010.
(b) For the purposes of "community solar project" as defined in (a)
of this subsection:
(i) "Nonprofit organization" means an organization exempt from
taxation under ((Title)) 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal
internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, as of January 1, 2009; and
(ii) "Utility" means a light and power business, an electric
cooperative, or a mutual corporation that provides electricity service.
(((2))) (3) "Customer-generated electricity" means a community
solar project or the alternating current electricity that is generated
from a renewable energy system located in Washington and installed on
an individual's, businesses', or local government's real property that
is also provided electricity generated by a light and power business.
Except for community solar projects, a system located on a leasehold
interest does not qualify under this definition. Except for utility-owned community solar projects, "customer-generated electricity" does
not include electricity generated by a light and power business with
greater than one thousand megawatt hours of annual sales or a gas
distribution business.
(((3))) (4) "Economic development kilowatt-hour" means the actual
kilowatt-hour measurement of customer-generated electricity multiplied
by the appropriate economic development factor.
(((4))) (5) "Local governmental entity" means any unit of local
government of this state including, but not limited to, counties,
cities, towns, municipal corporations, quasi-municipal corporations,
special purpose districts, and school districts.
(((5))) (6) "Photovoltaic cell" means a device that converts light
directly into electricity without moving parts.
(((6))) (7) "Renewable energy system" means a solar energy system,
an anaerobic digester as defined in RCW 82.08.900, or a wind generator
used for producing electricity.
(((7))) (8) "Solar energy system" means any device or combination
of devices or elements that rely upon direct sunlight as an energy
source for use in the generation of electricity.
(((8))) (9) "Solar inverter" means the device used to convert
direct current to alternating current in a photovoltaic cell system.
(((9))) (10) "Solar module" means the smallest nondivisible self-contained physical structure housing interconnected photovoltaic cells
and providing a single direct current electrical output.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.16.120 and 2009 c 469 s 505 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Any individual, business, local governmental entity, not in
the light and power business or in the gas distribution business, or a
participant in a community solar project may apply to the light and
power business serving the situs of the system, each fiscal year
beginning on July 1, 2005, for an investment cost recovery incentive
for each kilowatt-hour from a customer-generated electricity renewable
energy system.
((No incentive may be paid for kilowatt-hours generated before July
1, 2005, or after June 30, 2020.))
(b) In the case of a community solar project as defined in RCW
82.16.110(2)(a)(i), the administrator must apply for the investment
cost recovery incentive on behalf of each of the other owners.
(c) In the case of a community solar project as defined in RCW
82.16.110(2)(a)(iii), the limited liability company owning the
community solar project must apply for the investment cost recovery
incentive on behalf of each member of the limited liability company.
(2)(a) Before submitting for the first time the application for the
incentive allowed under subsection (4) of this section, the applicant
must submit to the department of revenue and to the climate and rural
energy development center at the Washington State University,
established under RCW 28B.30.642, a certification in a form and manner
prescribed by the department that includes, but is not limited to, the
following information:
(i) The name and address of the applicant and location of the
renewable energy system.
(A) If the applicant is an administrator of a community solar
project as defined in RCW 82.16.110(2)(a)(i), the certification must
also include the name and address of each of the owners of the
community solar project.
(B) If the applicant is a limited liability company that owns a
community solar project as defined in RCW 82.16.110(2)(a)(iii), the
certification must also include the name and address of each member of
the limited liability company;
(ii) The applicant's tax registration number;
(iii) That the electricity produced by the applicant meets the
definition of "customer-generated electricity" and that the renewable
energy system produces electricity with:
(A) Any solar inverters and solar modules manufactured in
Washington state;
(B) A wind generator powered by blades manufactured in Washington
state;
(C) A solar inverter manufactured in Washington state;
(D) A solar module manufactured in Washington state; or
(E) Solar or wind equipment manufactured outside of Washington
state;
(iv) That the electricity can be transformed or transmitted for
entry into or operation in parallel with electricity transmission and
distribution systems; and
(v) The date that the renewable energy system received its final
electrical permit from the applicable local jurisdiction.
(b) Within thirty days of receipt of the certification the
department of revenue must notify the applicant by mail, or
electronically as provided in RCW 82.32.135, whether the renewable
energy system qualifies for an incentive under this section. The
department may consult with the climate and rural energy development
center to determine eligibility for the incentive. System
certifications and the information contained therein are subject to
disclosure under RCW 82.32.330(3)(m).
(3)(a) By August 1st of each year application for the incentive
((shall)) must be made to the light and power business serving the
situs of the system by certification in a form and manner prescribed by
the department that includes, but is not limited to, the following
information:
(i) The name and address of the applicant and location of the
renewable energy system.
(A) If the applicant is an administrator of a community solar
project as defined in RCW 82.16.110(2)(a)(i), the application must also
include the name and address of each of the owners of the community
solar project.
(B) If the applicant is a limited liability company that owns a
community solar project as defined in RCW 82.16.110(2)(a)(iii), the
application must also include the name and address of each member of
the limited liability company;
(ii) The applicant's tax registration number;
(iii) The date of the notification from the department of revenue
stating that the renewable energy system is eligible for the incentives
under this section; and
(iv) A statement of the amount of kilowatt-hours generated by the
renewable energy system in the prior fiscal year.
(b) Within sixty days of receipt of the incentive certification the
light and power business serving the situs of the system ((shall)) must
notify the applicant in writing whether the incentive payment will be
authorized or denied. The business may consult with the climate and
rural energy development center to determine eligibility for the
incentive payment. Incentive certifications and the information
contained therein are subject to disclosure under RCW 82.32.330(3)(m).
(c)(i) Persons receiving incentive payments ((shall)) must keep and
preserve, for a period of five years, suitable records as may be
necessary to determine the amount of incentive applied for and
received. Such records ((shall)) must be open for examination at any
time upon notice by the light and power business that made the payment
or by the department. If upon examination of any records or from other
information obtained by the business or department it appears that an
incentive has been paid in an amount that exceeds the correct amount of
incentive payable, the business may assess against the person for the
amount found to have been paid in excess of the correct amount of
incentive payable and ((shall)) must add thereto interest on the
amount. Interest ((shall be)) is assessed in the manner that the
department assesses interest upon delinquent tax under RCW 82.32.050.
(ii) If it appears that the amount of incentive paid is less than
the correct amount of incentive payable the business may authorize
additional payment.
(4) Except for community solar projects, the investment cost
recovery incentive may be paid fifteen cents per economic development
kilowatt-hour unless requests exceed the amount authorized for credit
to the participating light and power business. For community solar
projects, the investment cost recovery incentive may be paid thirty
cents per economic development kilowatt-hour unless requests exceed the
amount authorized for credit to the participating light and power
business. For the purposes of this section, the rate paid for the
investment cost recovery incentive may be multiplied by the following
factors:
(a) For customer-generated electricity produced using solar modules
manufactured in Washington state, two and four-tenths;
(b) For customer-generated electricity produced using a solar or a
wind generator equipped with an inverter manufactured in Washington
state, one and two-tenths;
(c) For customer-generated electricity produced using an anaerobic
digester, or by other solar equipment or using a wind generator
equipped with blades manufactured in Washington state, one; and
(d) For all other customer-generated electricity produced by wind,
eight-tenths.
(5)(a) No individual, household, business, or local governmental
entity is eligible for incentives provided under subsection (4) of this
section for more than five thousand dollars per year.
(b) Except as provided in (c) and (d) of this subsection (5), each
applicant in a community solar project is eligible for up to five
thousand dollars per year.
(c) Where the applicant is an administrator of a community solar
project as defined in RCW 82.16.110(2)(a)(i), each owner is eligible
for an incentive up to five thousand dollars per year.
(d) Where the applicant is a limited liability company owning a
community solar project that has applied for an investment cost
recovery incentive on behalf of its members, each member of the limited
liability company is eligible for the incentive that would otherwise
belong to the limited liability company, up to five thousand dollars
per year, and the limited liability company is not eligible for
incentives under this section.
(6) Owners in a community solar project are eligible to receive an
investment cost recovery incentive based on the total customer-generated electricity produced by the project but only in proportion to
each ownership share or, in the case of a utility-owned community solar
project, in proportion to each ratepayer's contribution. No owner in
a community solar project is eligible for incentives under this section
for more than five thousand dollars.
(7) If requests for the investment cost recovery incentive exceed
the amount of funds available for credit to the participating light and
power business, the incentive payments ((shall)) must be reduced
proportionately.
(((7))) (8) The climate and rural energy development center at
Washington State University energy program may establish guidelines and
standards for technologies that are identified as Washington
manufactured and therefore most beneficial to the state's environment.
(((8))) (9) The environmental attributes of the renewable energy
system belong to the applicant, and do not transfer to the state or the
light and power business upon receipt of the investment cost recovery
incentive.
(10) No incentive may be paid under this section for kilowatt-hours
generated before July 1, 2005, or after June 30, 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW
to read as follows:
Owners of a community solar project as defined in RCW
82.16.110(2)(a) (i) and (iii) must agree to hold harmless the light and
power business serving the situs of the system, including any employee,
for the good faith reliance on the information contained in an
application or certification submitted by an administrator or limited
liability company. In addition, the light and power business and any
employee is immune from civil liability for the good faith reliance on
any misstatement that may be made in such application or certification.
Should a light and power business or employee prevail upon the defense
provided in this section, it is entitled to recover expenses and
reasonable attorneys' fees incurred in establishing the defense.

--- END ---