BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.148.005 and 1990 c 64 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Final regulations adopted by the United States environmental
protection agency (EPA) require owners and operators of underground
petroleum storage tanks to demonstrate financial responsibility for
accidental releases of petroleum as a precondition to continued
ownership and operation of such tanks;
(b) Financial responsibility is demonstrated through the purchase
of pollution liability insurance or an acceptable alternative such as
coverage under a state financial responsibility program, in the amount
of at least five hundred thousand dollars per occurrence and one
million dollars annual aggregate depending upon the nature, use, and
number of tanks owned or operated;
(c) Many owners and operators of underground petroleum storage
tanks cannot purchase pollution liability insurance either because
private insurance is unavailable at any price or because owners and
operators cannot meet the rigid underwriting standards of existing
insurers, nor can many owners and operators meet the strict regulatory
standards imposed for alternatives to the purchase of insurance; and
(d) Without a state financial responsibility program for owners and
operators of underground petroleum storage tanks, many tank owners and
operators will be forced to discontinue the ownership and operation of
these tanks.
(2) The purpose of this chapter is to create a state financial
responsibility program meeting EPA standards for owners and operators
of underground petroleum storage tanks in a manner that:
(a) Minimizes state involvement in pollution liability claims
management and insurance administration;
(b) Protects the state of Washington from unwanted and
unanticipated liability for accidental release claims;
(c) Creates incentives for private insurers to provide needed
liability insurance; and
(d) Parallels generally accepted principles of insurance and risk
management.
To that end, this chapter establishes a temporary program to
provide pollution liability reinsurance at a price that will encourage
a private insurance company or risk retention group to sell pollution
liability insurance in accordance with the requirements of this chapter
to owners and operators of underground petroleum storage tanks, thereby
allowing the owners and operators to comply with the financial
responsibility regulations of the EPA.
(3) It is not the intent of this chapter to permit owners and
operators of underground petroleum storage tanks to obtain pollution
liability insurance without regard to the quality or condition of their
storage tanks or without regard to the risk management practices of
tank owners and operators, nor is it the intent of this chapter to
provide coverage or funding for past or existing petroleum releases.
Further, it is the intent of the legislature that the program follow
generally accepted insurance underwriting and actuarial principles and
to deviate from those principles only to the extent necessary and
within the tax revenue limits provided, to make pollution liability
insurance reasonably affordable and available to owners and operators
who meet the requirements of this chapter, particularly to those owners
and operators whose underground storage tanks meet a vital economic
need within the affected community.
(4) The pollution liability insurance program established by this
chapter and chapter 70.149 RCW is located within the department.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.148.010 and 1990 c 64 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context requires otherwise, the definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Accidental release" means any sudden or nonsudden release of
petroleum arising from operating an underground storage tank that
results in a need for corrective action, bodily injury, or property
damage neither expected nor intended by the owner or operator.
(2) "Director" means the ((Washington pollution liability insurance
program)) director of the department or the director's appointed
representative.
(3) "Bodily injury" means bodily injury, sickness, or disease
sustained by any person, including death at any time resulting from the
injury, sickness, or disease.
(4) "Corrective action" means those actions reasonably required to
be undertaken by the insured to remove, treat, neutralize, contain, or
clean up an accidental release in order to comply with any statute,
ordinance, rule, regulation, directive, order, or similar legal
requirement of the United States, the state of Washington, or any
political subdivision of the United States or the state of Washington
in effect at the time of an accidental release. "Corrective action"
includes, when agreed to in writing, in advance by the insurer, action
to remove, treat, neutralize, contain, or clean up an accidental
release to avert, reduce, or eliminate the liability of the insured for
corrective action, bodily injury, or property damage. "Corrective
action" also includes actions reasonably necessary to monitor, assess,
and evaluate an accidental release.
"Corrective action" does not include:
(a) Replacement or repair of storage tanks or other receptacles;
(b) Replacement or repair of piping, connections, and valves of
storage tanks or other receptacles;
(c) Excavation or backfilling done in conjunction with (a) or (b)
of this subsection; or
(d) Testing for a suspected accidental release if the results of
the testing indicate that there has been no accidental release.
(5) "Defense costs" include the costs of legal representation,
expert fees, and related costs and expenses incurred in defending
against claims or actions brought by or on behalf of:
(a) The United States, the state of Washington, or any political
subdivision of the United States or state of Washington to require
corrective action or to recover costs of corrective action; or
(b) A third party for bodily injury or property damage caused by an
accidental release.
(6) (("Washington pollution liability insurance program" or
"program" means the reinsurance program created by this chapter.))
"Department" means the Washington state department of ecology.
(7) "Insured" means the owner or operator who is provided insurance
coverage in accordance with this chapter.
(8) "Insurer" means the insurance company or risk retention group
licensed or qualified to do business in Washington and authorized by
the ((director)) department to provide insurance coverage in accordance
with this chapter.
(9) "Loss reserve" means the amount traditionally set aside by
commercial liability insurers for costs and expenses related to claims
that have been made. "Loss reserve" does not include losses that have
been incurred but not reported to the insurer.
(10) "Occurrence" means an accident, including continuous or
repeated exposure to conditions, that results in a release from an
underground storage tank.
(11) "Operator" means a person in control of, or having
responsibility for, the daily operation of an underground storage tank.
(12) "Owner" means a person who owns an underground storage tank.
(13) "Person" means an individual, trust, firm, joint stock
company, corporation (including government corporation), partnership,
association, consortium, joint venture, commercial entity, state,
municipality, commission, political subdivision of a state, interstate
body, the federal government, or any department or agency of the
federal government.
(14) "Petroleum" means crude oil or any fraction of crude oil that
is liquid at standard conditions of temperature and pressure, which
means at sixty degrees Fahrenheit and 14.7 pounds per square inch
absolute and includes gasoline, kerosene, heating oils, and diesel
fuels.
(15) "Pollution liability insurance program" or "program" means the
reinsurance program created by this chapter.
(16) "Property damage" means:
(a) Physical injury to, destruction of, or contamination of
tangible property, including the loss of use of the property resulting
from the injury, destruction, or contamination; or
(b) Loss of use of tangible property that has not been physically
injured, destroyed, or contaminated but has been evacuated, withdrawn
from use, or rendered inaccessible because of an accidental release.
(((16))) (17) "Release" means the emission, discharge, disposal,
dispersal, seepage, or escape of petroleum from an underground storage
tank into or upon land, groundwater, surface water, subsurface soils,
or the atmosphere.
(((17))) (18) "Surplus reserve" means the amount traditionally set
aside by commercial property and casualty insurance companies to
provide financial protection from unexpected losses and to serve, in
part, as a measure of an insurance company's net worth.
(((18))) (19) "Tank" means a stationary device, designed to contain
an accumulation of petroleum, that is constructed primarily of
nonearthen materials such as wood, concrete, steel, or plastic that
provides structural support.
(((19))) (20) "Underground storage tank" means any one or a
combination of tanks including underground pipes connected to the tank,
that is used to contain an accumulation of petroleum and the volume of
which (including the volume of the underground pipes connected to the
tank) is ten percent or more beneath the surface of the ground.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.148.020 and 2006 c 276 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The pollution liability insurance program trust account is
established in the custody of the state treasurer. All funds
appropriated for this chapter and all premiums collected for
reinsurance shall be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the
account shall be used exclusively for the purposes of this chapter
including payment of costs of administering the pollution liability
insurance and underground storage tank community assistance programs.
Expenditures for payment of administrative and operating costs of the
((agency)) program are subject to the allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW and may be made only after appropriation by statute.
No appropriation is required for other expenditures from the account.
(2) Each calendar quarter, the ((director)) department shall report
to the insurance commissioner the loss and surplus reserves required
for the calendar quarter. The ((director)) department shall notify the
department of revenue of this amount by the fifteenth day of each
calendar quarter.
(3) Each calendar quarter the ((director)) department shall
determine the amount of reserves necessary to fund commitments made to
provide financial assistance under RCW 70.148.130 to the extent that
the financial assistance reserves do not jeopardize the operations and
liabilities of the pollution liability insurance program. The
((director)) department shall notify the department of revenue of this
amount by the fifteenth day of each calendar quarter. The ((director))
department may immediately establish an initial financial assistance
reserve of five million dollars from available revenues. The
((director)) department may not expend more than fifteen million
dollars for the financial assistance program.
(4) ((During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the pollution liability insurance program trust account
to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund
balance of the account.
(5))) This section expires June 1, 2013.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.148.025 and 1995 c 20 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((director)) department shall provide reinsurance through the
pollution liability insurance program trust account to the heating oil
pollution liability protection program under chapter 70.149 RCW.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.148.030 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 805 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The ((Washington)) pollution liability insurance program is
((created as an independent agency of the state. The administrative
head and appointing authority of the program shall be the director who
shall be appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, and
shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. The salary for this
office shall be set by the governor pursuant to RCW 43.03.040. The
director shall appoint a deputy director. The director, deputy
director, and up to three other employees are exempt from the civil
service law, chapter 41.06 RCW)) located within the department. The
administrative head must be appointed by the director. The
administrative head of the program and up to three other employees are
exempt from the civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW, and serve at the
pleasure of the director.
(2) The director shall employ such other staff as are necessary to
fulfill the responsibilities and duties of the ((director)) department.
The staff is subject to the civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW. In
addition, the director may contract with third parties for services
necessary to carry out its activities where this will promote economy,
avoid duplication of effort, and make best use of available expertise.
To the extent necessary to protect the state from unintended liability
and ensure quality program and contract design, the director shall
contract with an organization or organizations with demonstrated
experience and ability in managing and designing pollution liability
insurance and with an organization or organizations with demonstrated
experience and ability in managing and designing pollution liability
reinsurance. The director shall enter into such contracts after
competitive bid but need not select the lowest bid. The contracting
activity is not subject to the competitive contracting provisions of
RCW 41.06.142. Any such contractor or consultant is prohibited from
releasing, publishing, or otherwise using any information made
available to it under its contractual responsibility without specific
permission of the ((program)) director. The director may call upon
other agencies of the state to provide technical support and available
information as necessary to assist the director in meeting the
director's responsibilities under this chapter. Agencies shall supply
this support and information as promptly as circumstances permit.
(3) The director may appoint ad hoc technical advisory committees
to obtain expertise necessary to fulfill the purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.148.035 and 1990 c 64 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((director)) department may design the program to cover the
costs incurred in determining whether a proposed applicant for
pollution insurance under the program meets the underwriting standards
of the insurer. In covering such costs the ((director)) department
shall consider the financial resources of the applicant, shall take
into consideration the economic impact of the discontinued use of the
applicant's storage tank upon the affected community, shall provide
coverage within the revenue limits provided under this chapter, and
shall limit coverage of such costs to the extent that coverage would be
detrimental to providing affordable insurance under the program.

Sec. 7 RCW 70.148.040 and 1990 c 64 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((director)) department may adopt rules consistent with this
chapter to carry out the purposes of this chapter. All rules shall be
adopted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 8 RCW 70.148.050 and 2006 c 276 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((director)) department has the following powers and duties:
(1) To design and from time to time revise a reinsurance contract
providing coverage to an insurer meeting the requirements of this
chapter. Before initially entering into a reinsurance contract, the
((director)) department shall prepare an actuarial report describing
the various reinsurance methods considered by the ((director))
department and describing each method's costs. In designing the
reinsurance contract the ((director)) department shall consider common
insurance industry reinsurance contract provisions and shall design the
contract in accordance with the following guidelines:
(a) The contract shall provide coverage to the insurer for the
liability risks of owners and operators of underground storage tanks
for third party bodily injury and property damage and corrective action
that are underwritten by the insurer.
(b) In the event of an insolvency of the insurer, the reinsurance
contract shall provide reinsurance payable directly to the insurer or
to its liquidator, receiver, or successor on the basis of the liability
of the insurer in accordance with the reinsurance contract. In no
event may the program be liable for or provide coverage for that
portion of any covered loss that is the responsibility of the insurer
whether or not the insurer is able to fulfill the responsibility.
(c) The total limit of liability for reinsurance coverage shall not
exceed one million dollars per occurrence and two million dollars
annual aggregate for each policy underwritten by the insurer less the
ultimate net loss retained by the insurer as defined and provided for
in the reinsurance contract.
(d) Disputes between the insurer and the insurance program shall be
settled through arbitration.
(2) To design and implement a structure of periodic premiums due
the ((director)) department from the insurer that takes full advantage
of revenue collections and projected revenue collections to ensure
affordable premiums to the insured consistent with sound actuarial
principles.
(3) To periodically review premium rates for reinsurance to
determine whether revenue appropriations supporting the program can be
reduced without substantially increasing the insured's premium costs.
(4) To solicit bids from insurers and select an insurer to provide
pollution liability insurance to owners and operators of underground
storage tanks for third party bodily injury and property damage and
corrective action.
(5) To monitor the activities of the insurer to ensure compliance
with this chapter and protect the program from excessive loss exposure
resulting from claims mismanagement by the insurer.
(6) To monitor the success of the program and periodically make
such reports and recommendations to the legislature as the ((director))
department deems appropriate, and to annually publish a financial
report on the pollution liability insurance program trust account
showing, among other things, administrative and other expenses paid
from the fund.
(7) To annually report the financial and loss experience of the
insurer as to policies issued under the program and the financial and
loss experience of the program to the legislature.
(8) To enter into contracts with public and private agencies to
assist the ((director)) department in ((his or her)) its duties to
design, revise, monitor, and evaluate the program and to provide
technical or professional assistance to the ((director)) department.
(9) To examine the affairs, transactions, accounts, records,
documents, and assets of insurers as the ((director)) department deems
advisable.

Sec. 9 RCW 70.148.060 and 2005 c 274 s 341 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All examination and proprietary reports and information
obtained by the ((director)) department and the ((director's))
department's staff in soliciting bids from insurers and in monitoring
the insurer selected by the ((director)) department shall not be made
public or otherwise disclosed to any person, firm, corporation, agency,
association, governmental body, or other entity.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section notwithstanding, the
((director)) department may furnish all or part of examination reports
prepared by the ((director)) department or by any person, firm,
corporation, association, or other entity preparing the reports on
behalf of the ((director)) department to:
(a) The Washington state insurance commissioner;
(b) A person or organization officially connected with the insurer
as officer, director, attorney, auditor, or independent attorney or
independent auditor; and
(c) The attorney general in his or her role as legal advisor to the
((director)) department.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section notwithstanding, the
((director)) department may furnish all or part of the examination or
proprietary reports or information obtained by the ((director))
department to:
(a) The Washington state insurance commissioner; and
(b) A person, firm, corporation, association, governmental body, or
other entity with whom the ((director)) department has contracted for
services necessary to perform his or her official duties.
(4) Examination reports and proprietary information obtained by the
((director)) department and the ((director's)) department's staff are
not subject to public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.
(5) A person who violates any provision of this section is guilty
of a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 10 RCW 70.148.070 and 1990 c 64 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In selecting an insurer to provide pollution liability
insurance coverage to owners and operators of underground storage
tanks, the ((director)) department shall evaluate bids based upon
criteria established by the ((director)) department that shall include:
(a) The insurer's ability to underwrite pollution liability
insurance;
(b) The insurer's ability to settle pollution liability claims
quickly and efficiently;
(c) The insurer's estimate of underwriting and claims adjustment
expenses;
(d) The insurer's estimate of premium rates for providing coverage;
(e) The insurer's ability to manage and invest premiums; and
(f) The insurer's ability to provide risk management guidance to
insureds.
The ((director)) department shall select the bidder most qualified
to provide insurance consistent with this chapter and need not select
the bidder submitting the least expensive bid. The ((director))
department may consider bids by groups of insurers and management
companies who propose to act in concert in providing coverage and who
otherwise meet the requirements of this chapter.
(2) The successful bidder shall agree to provide liability
insurance coverage to owners and operators of underground storage tanks
for third party bodily injury and property damage and corrective action
consistent with the following minimum standards:
(a) The insurer shall provide coverage for defense costs.
(b) The insurer shall collect a deductible from the insured for
corrective action in an amount approved by the ((director)) department.
(c) The insurer shall provide coverage for accidental releases in
the amount of five hundred thousand dollars per occurrence and one
million dollars annual aggregate but no more than one million dollars
per occurrence and two million dollars annual aggregate exclusive of
defense costs.
(d) The insurer shall require insurance applicants to meet at least
the following underwriting standards before issuing coverage to the
applicant:
(i) The applicant must be in compliance with statutes, ordinances,
rules, regulations, and orders governing the ownership and operation of
underground storage tanks as identified by the ((director)) department
by rule; and
(ii) The applicant must exercise adequate underground storage tank
risk management as specified by the ((director)) department by rule.
(e) The insurer may exclude coverage for losses arising before the
effective date of coverage, and the ((director)) department may adopt
rules establishing standards for determining whether a loss was
incurred before the effective date of coverage.
(f) The insurer may exclude coverage for bodily injury, property
damage, and corrective action as permitted by the ((director))
department by rule.
(g) The insurer shall use a variable rate schedule approved by the
((director)) department taking into account tank type, tank age, and
other factors specified by the ((director)) department.
(3) The ((director)) department shall adopt all rules necessary to
implement this section. In developing and adopting rules governing
rates, deductibles, underwriting standards, and coverage conditions,
limitations, and exclusions, the ((director)) department shall balance
the owner and operator's need for coverage with the need to maintain
the actuarial integrity of the program, shall take into consideration
the economic impact of the discontinued use of a storage tank upon the
affected community, and shall consult with the ((standing)) ad hoc
technical advisory committees established under RCW 70.148.030(3).
((In developing and adopting rules governing coverage exclusions
affecting corrective action, the director shall consult with the
Washington state department of ecology.))
(4) Notwithstanding the definitions contained in RCW 70.148.010,
the ((director)) department may permit an insurer to use different
words or phrases describing the coverage provided under the program.
In permitting such deviations from the definitions contained in RCW
70.148.010, the ((director)) department shall consider the regulations
adopted by the United States environmental protection agency requiring
financial responsibility by owners and operators of underground
petroleum storage tanks.
(5) Owners and operators of underground storage tanks or sites
containing underground storage tanks where a preexisting release has
been identified or where the owner or operator knows of a preexisting
release are eligible for coverage under the program subject to the
following conditions:
(a) The owner or operator must have a plan for proceeding with
corrective action; and
(b) If the owner or operator files a claim with the insurer, the
owner or operator has the burden of proving that the claim is not
related to a preexisting release until the owner or operator
demonstrates to the satisfaction of the ((director)) department that
corrective action has been completed.
(6) ((When)) Within thirty days of a reinsurance contract ((has
been)) being entered into by the ((agency)) department and insurance
companies, ((the director shall notify the department of ecology of the
letting of the contract. Within thirty days of that notification,))
the department ((of ecology)) shall notify all known owners and
operators of petroleum underground storage tanks that appropriate
levels of financial responsibility must be established by October 26,
1990, in accordance with federal environmental protection agency
requirements, and that insurance under the program is available. All
owners and operators of petroleum underground storage tanks must also
be notified that declaration of method of financial responsibility or
intent to seek to be insured under the program must be made to the
state by November 1, 1990. If the declaration of method of financial
responsibility is not made by November 1, 1990, the department ((of
ecology)) shall, pursuant to chapter 90.76 RCW, prohibit the owner or
operator of an underground storage tank from obtaining a tank tag or
receiving petroleum products until such time as financial
responsibility has been established.

Sec. 11 RCW 70.148.080 and 1990 c 64 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
If the insurer cancels or refuses to issue or renew a policy, the
affected owner or operator may appeal the insurer's decision to the
director or the director's designee. The director or the director's
designee shall conduct a brief adjudicative proceeding under chapter
34.05 RCW.

Sec. 12 RCW 70.148.090 and 1990 c 64 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The activities and operations of the program are exempt from
the provisions and requirements of Title 48 RCW and to the extent of
their participation in the program, the activities and operations of
the insurer selected by the ((director)) department to provide
liability insurance coverage to owners and operators of underground
storage tanks are exempt from the requirements of Title 48 RCW except
for:
(a) Chapter 48.03 RCW pertaining to examinations;
(b) RCW 48.05.250 pertaining to annual reports;
(c) Chapter 48.12 RCW pertaining to assets and liabilities;
(d) Chapter 48.13 RCW pertaining to investments;
(e) Chapter 48.30 RCW pertaining to deceptive, false, or fraudulent
acts or practices; and
(f) Chapter 48.92 RCW pertaining to liability risk retention.
(2) To the extent of their participation in the program, the
insurer selected by the ((director)) department to provide liability
insurance coverage to owners and operators of underground storage tanks
shall not participate in the Washington insurance guaranty association
nor shall the association be liable for coverage provided to owners and
operators of underground storage tanks issued in connection with the
program.

Sec. 13 RCW 70.148.130 and 2005 c 428 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the conditions and limitations of RCW 70.148.120
through 70.148.170, the ((director)) department shall establish and
manage a program for providing financial assistance to public and
private owners and operators of underground storage tanks who have been
certified by the governing body of the county, city, or town in which
the tanks are located as meeting a vital local government, public
health or safety need. In providing such financial assistance the
((director)) department shall:
(a) Require owners and operators, including local government owners
and operators, to demonstrate serious financial hardship;
(b) Limit assistance to only that amount necessary to supplement
applicant financial resources;
(c) Limit assistance to no more than two hundred thousand dollars
in value for any one underground storage tank site of which amount no
more than seventy-five thousand dollars in value may be provided for
corrective action; and
(d) Whenever practicable, provide assistance through the direct
payment of contractors and other professionals for labor, materials,
and other services.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in RCW 70.148.120 through
70.148.170, no grant of financial assistance may be used for any
purpose other than for corrective action and repair, replacement,
reconstruction, and improvement of underground storage tanks and tank
sites. If at any time prior to providing financial assistance or in
the course of providing such assistance, it appears to the ((director))
department that corrective action costs may exceed seventy-five
thousand dollars, the ((director)) department may not provide further
financial assistance until the owner or operator has developed and
implemented a corrective action plan with the department ((of
ecology)).
(b) A grant of financial assistance may also be made to an owner or
operator that has discontinued using underground petroleum storage
tanks due to economic hardship. An owner or operator may receive a
grant up to two hundred thousand dollars per retailing location if:
(i) The property is located in an underserved rural area;
(ii) The property was previously used by a private owner or
operator to provide motor vehicle fuel; and
(iii) The property is at least ten miles from the nearest motor
vehicle fuel service station.
(3) When requests for financial assistance exceed available funds,
the ((director)) department shall give preference to providing
assistance first to those underground storage tank sites which
constitute the sole source of petroleum products in remote rural
communities.
(4) The ((director shall consult with the department of ecology in
approving financial assistance for corrective action to ensure
compliance with regulations governing underground petroleum storage
tanks and corrective action)) department, in approving financial
assistance for corrective action, shall ensure compliance with rules
governing underground petroleum storage tanks and corrective action.
(5) The ((director)) department shall approve or disapprove
applications for financial assistance within sixty days of receipt of
a completed application meeting the requirements of RCW 70.148.120
through 70.148.170. The certification by local government of an owner
or operator shall not preclude the ((director)) department from
disapproving an application for financial assistance if the
((director)) department finds that such assistance would not meet the
purposes of RCW 70.148.120 through 70.148.170.
(6) The ((director)) department may adopt all rules necessary to
implement the financial assistance program and shall consult with the
technical advisory committee established under RCW 70.148.030 in
developing such rules and in reviewing applications for financial
assistance.

Sec. 14 RCW 70.148.140 and 1991 c 4 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To qualify for financial assistance, a private owner or
operator retailing petroleum products to the public must:
(a) First apply for insurance from the pollution liability
insurance program and request financial assistance in a form and manner
required by the ((director)) department;
(b) If the ((director)) department makes a preliminary
determination of possible eligibility for financial assistance, apply
to the appropriate governing body of the city or town in which the
tanks are located or in the case where the tanks are located outside of
the jurisdiction of a city or town, then to the appropriate governing
body of the county in which the tanks are located, for a determination
by the governing body of the city, town, or county that the continued
operation of the tanks meets a vital local government, or public health
or safety need; and
(c) Qualify for insurance coverage from the pollution liability
insurance program if such financial assistance were to be provided.
(2) In consideration for financial assistance and prior to
receiving such assistance the owner and operator must enter into an
agreement with the state whereby the owner and operator agree:
(a) To sell petroleum products to the public;
(b) To maintain the tank site for use in the retail sale of
petroleum products for a period of not less than fifteen years from the
date of agreement;
(c) To sell petroleum products to local government entities within
the affected community on a cost-plus basis periodically negotiated
between the owner and operator and the city, town, or county in which
the tanks are located; and
(d) To maintain compliance with state underground storage tank
financial responsibility and environmental regulations.
(3) The agreement shall be filed as a real property lien against
the tank site with the county auditor (([of the county])) of the county
in which the tanks are located. If the owner or operator transfers his
or her interest in such property, the new owner or operator must agree
to abide by the agreement or any financial assistance provided under
RCW 70.148.120 through 70.148.170 shall be immediately repaid to the
state by the owner or operator who received such assistance.
(4) As determined by the ((director)) department, if an owner or
operator materially breaches the agreement, any financial assistance
provided shall be immediately repaid by such owner or operator.
(5) The agreement between an owner and operator and the state
required under this section shall expire fifteen years from the date of
entering into the agreement.

Sec. 15 RCW 70.148.150 and 1991 c 4 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To qualify for financial assistance, a public owner or operator
must:
(a) First apply for insurance from the pollution liability
insurance program and request financial assistance in a form and manner
required by the ((director)) department;
(b) Provide to the ((director)) department a copy of the resolution
by the governing body of the city, town, or county having jurisdiction,
finding that the continued operation of the tanks is necessary to
maintain vital local public health, education, or safety needs;
(c) Qualify for insurance coverage from the pollution liability
insurance program if such financial assistance were to be provided.
(2) The ((director)) department shall give priority to and shall
encourage local government entities to consolidate multiple operational
underground storage tank sites into as few sites as possible. For this
purpose, the ((director)) department may provide financial assistance
for the establishment of a new local government underground storage
tank site contingent upon the closure of other operational sites in
accordance with environmental regulations. Within the per site
financial limits imposed under RCW 70.148.120 through 70.148.170, the
((director)) department may authorize financial assistance for the
closure of operational sites when closure is for the purpose of
consolidation.

Sec. 16 RCW 70.148.160 and 1991 c 4 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
To qualify for financial assistance, a rural hospital ((as defined
in RCW 18.89.020)), owning or operating an underground storage tank
must:
(1) First apply for insurance from the pollution liability
insurance program and request financial assistance in a form and manner
required by the ((director)) department;
(2) Apply to the governing body of the city, town, or county in
which the hospital is located for certification that the continued
operation of the tank or tanks is necessary to maintain vital local
public health or safety needs;
(3) Qualify for insurance coverage from the pollution liability
insurance program if such financial assistance were to be provided; and
(4) Agree to provide charity care ((as defined in RCW 70.39.020))
in an amount of equivalent value to the financial assistance provided
under RCW 70.148.120 through 70.148.170. The ((director)) department
shall consult with the department of health to monitor and determine
the time period over which such care should be expected to be provided
in the local community.

Sec. 17 RCW 70.148.170 and 1991 c 4 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((director)) department shall develop and distribute to
appropriate cities, towns, and counties a form for use by the local
government in making the certification required for all private owner
and operator financial assistance along with instructions on the use of
such form.
(2) In certifying a private owner or operator retailing petroleum
products to the public as meeting vital local government, public health
or safety needs, the local government shall:
(a) Consider and find that other retail suppliers of petroleum
products are located remote from the local community;
(b) Consider and find that the owner or operator requesting
certification is capable of faithfully fulfilling the agreement
required for financial assistance;
(c) Designate the local government official who will be responsible
for negotiating the price of petroleum products to be sold on a cost-plus basis to the local government entities in the affected communities
and the entities eligible to receive petroleum products at such price;
and
(d) State the vital need or needs that the owner or operator meets.
(3) In certifying a hospital as meeting local public health and
safety needs the local government shall:
(a) Consider and find that the continued use of the underground
storage tank by the hospital is necessary; and
(b) Consider and find that the hospital provides health care
services to the poor and otherwise provides charity care.
(4) The ((director)) department shall notify the governing body of
the city, town, or county providing certification when financial
assistance for a private owner or operator has been approved.

Sec. 18 RCW 70.149.010 and 1995 c 20 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature to establish a temporary
regulatory program to assist owners and operators of heating oil tanks.
The legislature finds that it is in the best interests of all citizens
for heating oil tanks to be operated safely and for tank leaks or
spills to be dealt with expeditiously. The legislature further finds
that it is necessary to protect tank owners from the financial hardship
related to damaged heating oil tanks. The problem is especially acute
because owners and operators of heating oil tanks used for space
heating have been unable to obtain pollution liability insurance or
insurance has been unaffordable.
(2) The pollution liability insurance program established by this
chapter and chapter 70.148 RCW is located within the department.

Sec. 19 RCW 70.149.030 and 1995 c 20 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Accidental release" means a sudden or nonsudden release of
heating oil, occurring after July 23, 1995, from operating a heating
oil tank that results in bodily injury, property damage, or a need for
corrective action, neither expected nor intended by the owner or
operator.
(2) "Bodily injury" means bodily injury, sickness, or disease
sustained by a person, including death at any time, resulting from the
injury, sickness, or disease.
(3)(a) "Corrective action" means those actions reasonably required
to be undertaken by the insured to remove, treat, neutralize, contain,
or clean up an accidental release in order to comply with a statute,
ordinance, rule, regulation, directive, order, or similar legal
requirement, in effect at the time of an accidental release, of the
United States, the state of Washington, or a political subdivision of
the United States or the state of Washington. "Corrective action"
includes, where agreed to in writing, in advance by the insurer, action
to remove, treat, neutralize, contain, or clean up an accidental
release to avert, reduce, or eliminate the liability of the insured for
corrective action, bodily injury, or property damage. "Corrective
action" also includes actions reasonably necessary to monitor, assess,
and evaluate an accidental release.
(b) "Corrective action" does not include:
(i) Replacement or repair of heating oil tanks or other
receptacles; or
(ii) Replacement or repair of piping, connections, and valves of
tanks or other receptacles.
(4) "Defense costs" include the costs of legal representation,
expert fees, and related costs and expenses incurred in defending
against claims or actions brought by or on behalf of:
(a) The United States, the state of Washington, or a political
subdivision of the United States or state of Washington to require
corrective action or to recover costs of corrective action; or
(b) A third party for bodily injury or property damage caused by an
accidental release.
(5) "Department" means the Washington state department of ecology.
(6) "Director" means the director of the ((Washington state
pollution liability insurance agency)) department or the director's
appointed representative.
(((6))) (7) "Heating oil" means any petroleum product used for
space heating in oil-fired furnaces, heaters, and boilers, including
stove oil, diesel fuel, or kerosene. "Heating oil" does not include
petroleum products used as fuels in motor vehicles, marine vessels,
trains, buses, aircraft, or any off-highway equipment not used for
space heating, or for industrial processing or the generation of
electrical energy.
(((7))) (8) "Heating oil tank" means a tank and its connecting
pipes, whether above or below ground, or in a basement, with pipes
connected to the tank for space heating of human living or working
space on the premises where the tank is located. "Heating oil tank"
does not include a decommissioned or abandoned heating oil tank, or a
tank used solely for industrial process heating purposes or generation
of electrical energy.
(((8))) (9) "Occurrence" means an accident, including continuous or
repeated exposure to conditions, that results in a release from a
heating oil tank.
(((9))) (10) "Owner or operator" means a person in control of, or
having responsibility for, the daily operation of a heating oil tank.
(((10))) (11) "Pollution liability insurance ((agency)) program" or
"program" means the Washington state pollution liability insurance
((agency)) program located within the department.
(((11))) (12) "Property damage" means:
(a) Physical injury to, destruction of, or contamination of
tangible property, including the loss of use of the property resulting
from the injury, destruction, or contamination; or
(b) Loss of use of tangible property that has not been physically
injured, destroyed, or contaminated but has been evacuated, withdrawn
from use, or rendered inaccessible because of an accidental release.
(((12))) (13) "Release" means a spill, leak, emission, escape, or
leaching into the environment.
(((13))) (14) "Remedial action costs" means reasonable costs that
are attributable to or associated with a remedial action.
(((14))) (15) "Tank" means a stationary device, designed to contain
an accumulation of heating oil, that is constructed primarily of
nonearthen materials such as concrete, steel, fiberglass, or plastic
that provides structural support.
(((15))) (16) "Third-party liability" means the liability of a
heating oil tank owner to another person due to property damage or
personal injury that results from a leak or spill.

Sec. 20 RCW 70.149.040 and 2009 c 560 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((director)) department shall:
(1) Design a program, consistent with RCW 70.149.120, for providing
pollution liability insurance for heating oil tanks that provides up to
sixty thousand dollars per occurrence coverage and aggregate limits,
and protects the state of Washington from unwanted or unanticipated
liability for accidental release claims;
(2) Administer, implement, and enforce the provisions of this
chapter. To assist in administration of the program, the director is
authorized to appoint up to two employees who are exempt from the civil
service law, chapter 41.06 RCW, and who shall serve at the pleasure of
the director;
(3) Administer the heating oil pollution liability trust account,
as established under RCW 70.149.070;
(4) Employ and discharge, at ((his or her)) its discretion, agents,
attorneys, consultants, companies, organizations, and employees as
deemed necessary, and to prescribe their duties and powers, and fix
their compensation;
(5) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to carry out
the provisions of this chapter;
(6) Design and from time to time revise a reinsurance contract
providing coverage to an insurer or insurers meeting the requirements
of this chapter. The ((director)) department is authorized to provide
reinsurance through the pollution liability insurance program trust
account;
(7) Solicit bids from insurers and select an insurer to provide
pollution liability insurance for third-party bodily injury and
property damage, and corrective action to owners and operators of
heating oil tanks;
(8) Register, and design a means of accounting for, operating
heating oil tanks;
(9) Implement a program to provide advice and technical assistance
to owners and operators of active and abandoned heating oil tanks if
contamination from an active or abandoned heating oil tank is
suspected. Advice and assistance regarding administrative and
technical requirements may include observation of testing or site
assessment and review of the results of reports. If the ((director))
department finds that contamination is not present or that the
contamination is apparently minor and not a threat to human health or
the environment, the ((director)) department may provide written
opinions and conclusions on the results of the investigation to owners
and operators of active and abandoned heating oil tanks. The
((agency)) department is authorized to collect, from persons requesting
advice and assistance, the costs incurred by the ((agency)) department
in providing such advice and assistance. The costs may include travel
costs and expenses associated with review of reports and preparation of
written opinions and conclusions. Funds from cost reimbursement must
be deposited in the heating oil pollution liability trust account. The
state of Washington, the department, the pollution liability insurance
((agency)) program, and its officers and employees are immune from all
liability, and no cause of action arises from any act or omission in
providing, or failing to provide, such advice, opinion, conclusion, or
assistance;
(10) Establish a public information program to provide information
regarding liability, technical, and environmental requirements
associated with active and abandoned heating oil tanks;
(11) Monitor ((agency)) program expenditures and seek to minimize
costs and maximize benefits to ensure responsible financial
stewardship;
(12) Study if appropriate user fees to supplement program funding
are necessary and develop recommendations for legislation to authorize
such fees.

Sec. 21 RCW 70.149.050 and 1995 c 20 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In selecting an insurer to provide pollution liability
insurance coverage to owners and operators of heating oil tanks used
for space heating, the ((director)) department shall evaluate bids
based upon criteria established by the ((director)) department that
shall include:
(a) The insurer's ability to underwrite pollution liability
insurance;
(b) The insurer's ability to settle pollution liability claims
quickly and efficiently;
(c) The insurer's estimate of underwriting and claims adjustment
expenses;
(d) The insurer's estimate of premium rates for providing coverage;
(e) The insurer's ability to manage and invest premiums; and
(f) The insurer's ability to provide risk management guidance to
insureds.
(2) The ((director)) department shall select the bidder most
qualified to provide insurance consistent with this chapter and need
not select the bidder submitting the least expensive bid. The
((director)) department may consider bids by groups of insurers and
management companies who propose to act in concert in providing
coverage and who otherwise meet the requirements of this chapter.
(3) Owners and operators of heating oil tanks, or sites containing
heating oil tanks where a preexisting release has been identified or
where the owner or operator knows of a preexisting release are eligible
for coverage under the program subject to the following conditions:
(a) The owner or operator must have a plan for proceeding with
corrective action; and
(b) If the owner or operator files a claim with the insurer, the
owner or operator has the burden of proving that the claim is not
related to a preexisting release until the owner or operator
demonstrates to the satisfaction of the ((director)) department that
corrective action has been completed.

Sec. 22 RCW 70.149.060 and 1995 c 20 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The activities and operations of the program are exempt from
the provisions and requirements of Title 48 RCW and to the extent of
their participation in the program, the activities and operations of
the insurer selected by the ((director)) department to provide
liability insurance coverage to owners and operators of heating oil
tanks are exempt from the requirements of Title 48 RCW except for:
(a) Chapter 48.03 RCW pertaining to examinations;
(b) RCW 48.05.250 pertaining to annual reports;
(c) Chapter 48.12 RCW pertaining to assets and liabilities;
(d) Chapter 48.13 RCW pertaining to investments;
(e) Chapter 48.30 RCW pertaining to deceptive, false, or fraudulent
acts or practices; and
(f) Chapter 48.92 RCW pertaining to liability risk retention.
(2) To the extent of their participation in the program, the
insurer selected by the ((director)) department to provide liability
insurance coverage to owners and operators of heating oil tanks shall
not participate in the Washington insurance guaranty association nor
shall the association be liable for coverage provided to owners and
operators of heating oil tanks issued in connection with the program.

Sec. 23 RCW 70.149.090 and 2005 c 274 s 342 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following shall be confidential and exempt under chapter 42.56
RCW, subject to the conditions set forth in this section:
(1) All examination and proprietary reports and information
obtained by the ((director)) department and the ((director's))
department's staff in soliciting bids from insurers and in monitoring
the insurer selected by the ((director)) department may not be made
public or otherwise disclosed to any person, firm, corporation, agency,
association, governmental body, or other entity.
(2) All information obtained by the ((director)) department or the
((director's)) department's staff related to registration of heating
oil tanks to be insured may not be made public or otherwise disclosed
to any person, firm, corporation, agency, association, governmental
body, or other entity.
(3) The ((director)) department may furnish all or part of
examination reports prepared by the ((director)) department or by any
person, firm, corporation, association, or other entity preparing the
reports on behalf of the director to:
(a) The Washington state insurance commissioner;
(b) A person or organization officially connected with the insurer
as officer, director, attorney, auditor, or independent attorney or
independent auditor; and
(c) The attorney general in his or her role as legal advisor to the
((director)) department.

Sec. 24 RCW 70.149.120 and 2007 c 240 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ((pollution liability insurance agency)) department shall
identify design criteria for heating oil tanks that provide superior
protection against future leaks as compared to standard steel tank
designs. Any tank designs identified under this section must either be
constructed with fiberglass or offer at least an equivalent level of
protection against leaks as a standard fiberglass design.
(2) The ((pollution liability insurance agency)) department shall
reimburse any owner or operator, who is participating in the program
created in this chapter and who has experienced an occurrence or
remedial action, for the difference in price between a standard steel
heating tank and a new heating oil tank that satisfies the design
standards identified under subsection (1) of this section, if the owner
or operator chooses or is required to replace his or her tank at the
time of the occurrence or remedial action.
(3) Any new heating oil tank reimbursement provided under this
section must be funded within the amount of per occurrence coverage
provided to the owner or operator under RCW 70.149.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 A new section is added to chapter 70.149
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The following decisions by the department regarding the heating
oil pollution liability insurance program may be appealed to the
pollution control hearings board: Denial of eligibility for coverage;
amount of payment allowed for corrective action; amount of payment
allowed for property damage; and amount of payment allowed for a third-party claim.
(2) A party aggrieved by a decision of the department regarding
denial of eligibility for coverage; amount of payment allowed for
corrective action; amount of payment allowed for property damage; or
the amount of payment allowed for a third-party claim may appeal the
decision to the pollution control hearings board within thirty days of
the decision. Review of such a decision must be conducted in
accordance with chapter 43.21B RCW. The pollution control hearings
board may hear such an appeal as a short board appeal pursuant to RCW
43.21B.305. Any subsequent appeal of a decision of the pollution
control hearings board shall be obtained in accordance with RCW
43.21B.180.
(3) If the appeal to the pollution control hearings board is not
received within thirty days after the decision, no further
consideration will be given to the appeal.

Sec. 26 RCW 43.21B.110 and 2009 c 456 s 16, 2009 c 332 s 18, and
2009 c 183 s 17 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The hearings board shall only have jurisdiction to hear and
decide appeals from the following decisions of the department, the
director, local conservation districts, and the air pollution control
boards or authorities as established pursuant to chapter 70.94 RCW, or
local health departments:
(a) Civil penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431,
70.105.080, 70.107.050, 88.46.090, 90.03.600, 90.46.270, 90.48.144,
90.56.310, and 90.56.330.
(b) Orders issued pursuant to RCW 18.104.043, 18.104.060,
43.27A.190, 70.94.211, 70.94.332, 70.105.095, 86.16.020, 88.46.070,
90.14.130, 90.46.250, 90.48.120, and 90.56.330.
(c) A final decision by the department or director made under
chapter 183, Laws of 2009.
(d) Except as provided in RCW 90.03.210(2), the issuance,
modification, or termination of any permit, certificate, or license by
the department or any air authority in the exercise of its
jurisdiction, including the issuance or termination of a waste disposal
permit, the denial of an application for a waste disposal permit, the
modification of the conditions or the terms of a waste disposal permit,
or a decision to approve or deny an application for a solid waste
permit exemption under RCW 70.95.300.
(e) Decisions of local health departments regarding the grant or
denial of solid waste permits pursuant to chapter 70.95 RCW.
(f) Decisions of local health departments regarding the issuance
and enforcement of permits to use or dispose of biosolids under RCW
70.95J.080.
(g) Decisions of the department regarding waste-derived fertilizer
or micronutrient fertilizer under RCW 15.54.820, and decisions of the
department regarding waste-derived soil amendments under RCW 70.95.205.
(h) Decisions of local conservation districts related to the denial
of approval or denial of certification of a dairy nutrient management
plan; conditions contained in a plan; application of any dairy nutrient
management practices, standards, methods, and technologies to a
particular dairy farm; and failure to adhere to the plan review and
approval timelines in RCW 90.64.026.
(i) Any other decision by the department or an air authority which
pursuant to law must be decided as an adjudicative proceeding under
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(j) Regarding the heating oil pollution liability insurance program
described in chapter 70.149 RCW, any decision by the department
regarding: Denial of eligibility for coverage; amount of payment
allowed for corrective action; amount of payment allowed for property
damage; and amount of payment allowed for a third-party claim. The
pollution control hearings board may hear such an appeal as a short
board appeal pursuant to RCW 43.21B.305.
(2) The following hearings shall not be conducted by the hearings
board:
(a) Hearings required by law to be conducted by the shorelines
hearings board pursuant to chapter 90.58 RCW.
(b) Hearings conducted by the department pursuant to RCW 70.94.332,
70.94.390, 70.94.395, 70.94.400, 70.94.405, 70.94.410, 70.148.080, and
90.44.180.
(c) Appeals of decisions by the department under RCW 90.03.110 and
90.44.220.
(d) Hearings conducted by the department to adopt, modify, or
repeal rules.
(e) Appeals of decisions by the department as provided in chapter
43.21L RCW.
(3) Review of rules and regulations adopted by the hearings board
shall be subject to review in accordance with the provisions of the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 By September 1, 2011, the department of
ecology shall submit a report to the governor and appropriate
legislative committees that include findings on the consolidation of
the pollution liability insurance agency within the department of
ecology and recommendations for legislation in 2012, including draft
legislation, if needed, to implement the recommendations and strategies
identified in the report. In the report, the department of ecology
shall discuss:
(1) Statutory changes that would ensure that the pollution
liability insurance program's consolidation within the department of
ecology is efficient and effective;
(2) The organizational structure of the pollution liability
insurance program;
(3) The appeals process;
(4) Information management;
(5) Coordination of the pollution liability insurance program,
underground storage tanks rule, and toxics cleanup program; and
(6) Reauthorization of the pollution liability insurance program by
July 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 A new section is added to chapter 70.148
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The pollution liability insurance agency is transferred to the
department.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the pollution
liability insurance agency shall be delivered to the custody of the
department of ecology. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment,
motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the pollution
liability insurance agency shall be transferred to the department of
ecology. All funds, credits, or other assets held by the pollution
liability insurance agency shall be assigned to the department of
ecology.
(b) Any appropriations made to the pollution liability insurance
agency shall be transferred and credited to the department of ecology.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel,
funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other
tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the
performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the pollution liability insurance agency are
transferred to the jurisdiction of the department of ecology. All
employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service
law, are assigned to the department of ecology to perform their usual
duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights,
subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance
with the laws and rules governing state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the pollution
liability insurance agency shall be continued and acted upon by the
pollution liability insurance program as part of the department of
ecology. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full
force and shall be performed by the pollution liability insurance
program as part of the department of ecology.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the pollution liability insurance agency to the department of ecology
under this act shall not affect the validity of any activity performed
before the effective date of this section or the effective date of the
consolidation.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
consolidation directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the affected agencies,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) All classified employees of the pollution liability insurance
agency assigned to the department of ecology under this act whose
positions are within an existing bargaining unit description at the
department of ecology shall become a part of the existing bargaining
unit at the department of ecology and shall be considered an
appropriate inclusion or modification of the existing bargaining unit
under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 (1) Sections 1 through 26 and 28 of this
act expire June 1, 2013.
(2) Section 27 of this act expires January 1, 2012.

--- END ---