BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is a need
to create career pathways in health care professions to prepare
Washington state to emerge strong from the economic downturn. The
legislature further finds that certified home care aides are a valuable
potential source of advanced degree health care workers who will be
needed to meet the health care needs of Washington state. In addition,
the legislature finds that health care occupations, such as home care
aides and registered nurses, will be among the fastest growing
occupations over the next decade despite the recession and rising
unemployment. Despite these findings, the legislature recognizes that
entry-level, long-term jobs often have little room for advancement.
The legislature intends to provide additional career advancement
training opportunities for home care aides through partnerships between
the community college system, federal agencies, local governments,
private foundations, boarding home associations, adult family home
associations, licensed home care agency provider associations, and
labor-management organizations to promote the development of these
career pathways.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) To the extent that funds are
specifically appropriated for this purpose, by June 1, 2011, the state
board for community and technical colleges, in consultation with the
training partnership established in RCW 74.39A.360, shall solicit
proposals from community and technical colleges to develop and adapt
curriculum for up to three existing degree and certificate programs in
health care, social services, and special education to be used as part
of a career track for incumbent home care aides.
(2) The curriculum development and adaptation shall include
integrated credit for prior learning in basic and advanced home care
aide training, delivered under RCW 74.39A.073 or 74.39A.350, and shall
also integrate best practices for working adults. The colleges shall
solicit input from health care, social service, and special education
labor-management partnerships, boarding home associations, adult family
home associations, licensed home care agency provider associations, and
centers of excellence, throughout the curriculum development and
adaptation process.
(3) Curriculum developed or adapted pursuant to this section shall
be made available for replication across the state and shall be posted
on the appropriate center of excellence, department of health, and
department of social and health services web sites.

--- END ---