BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Approved eyewear" means eye protection approved for use by the
United States food and drug administration under 21 C.F.R. Sec.
1040.20.
(2) "Department" means the department of health.
(3) "Phototherapy device" means equipment that emits ultraviolet
radiation used by a health care professional in the treatment of
disease.
(4) "Tanning device" means any equipment that emits electromagnetic
radiation with wavelengths in the air between two hundred and four
hundred nanometers used for tanning of the skin, including, but not
limited to, a sunlamp, tanning booth, or tanning bed. Tanning device
does not include a phototherapy device.
(5) "Tanning facility" means any commercial location, place, area,
structure, or business that provides a person access to a tanning
device.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A tanning facility must post a written
health notice in a conspicuous location that is readily visible to a
person intending to use a tanning device.
(2) It is unlawful for an operator or employee of a tanning
facility to allow a minor under age eighteen to use a tanning device.
(3) The department must adopt by rule standards for the health
notice required by subsection (1) of this section.
(4) A violation of this section is a class 1 civil infraction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department, in consultation with
representatives from the tanning facility industry, shall adopt by rule
a program to train operators of tanning devices. The training program
must include, at a minimum, information regarding the following issues:
(a) The manufacturer's recommended operation of a tanning device;
(b) The proper use of approved eye wear;
(c) The radiation output of tanning equipment as measured under
standard operating conditions by a typical user;
(d) Sanitation standards; and
(e) Other issues the department and industry representatives deem
necessary.
(2) The department, in consultation with representatives from the
tanning facility industry, shall also determine by rule the frequency
of training and retraining of operators of tanning devices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---