BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 10.19 RCW
to read as follows:
A person who is held in custody and is alleged to have committed a
crime against a person, when the crime is a felony, shall appear before
a judicial officer for an individualized determination of pretrial
release conditions prior to the person's release from custody if the
offense is bailable.

--- END ---