BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that between the years
2000 and 2005, three hundred twenty-six initiatives were filed with the
secretary of state's office and twenty-one initiatives were certified
to the ballot. Each initiative filed requires the state to invest, at
a minimum, the time and resources to process the filed initiative in
the secretary of state's office and allow the code reviser to review
draft initiatives for errors, review for potential conflict with
existing statutes, and prepare a certificate of review for the
initiative sponsor. Additionally, the secretary of state's office
assigns a serial number to all initiatives and forwards the initiative
to the attorney general for formulation of the ballot title and
summary. After an initiative sponsor obtains and submits signatures,
the secretary of state must check the signatures to ascertain whether
there are sufficient signatures to qualify the measure for the ballot.
The legislature finds that the current initiative filing fee of five
dollars, which was set decades ago, is insufficient to offset the
administrative costs involved in the initiative process. Therefore, to
more adequately provide for the administrative costs involved in the
initiative process, it is the intent of the legislature to increase the
initiative filing fee. The filing fee shall be refunded in part upon
the initiative being certified by the secretary of state for the
general election ballot.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.72.010 and 2003 c 111 s 1802 are each amended to
read as follows:
If any legal voter of the state, either individually or on behalf
of an organization, desires to petition the legislature to enact a
proposed measure, or submit a proposed initiative measure to the
people, or order that a referendum of all or part of any act, bill, or
law, passed by the legislature be submitted to the people, he or she
shall file with the secretary of state a legible copy of the measure
proposed, or the act or part of such act on which a referendum is
desired, accompanied by an affidavit that the sponsor is a legal voter
and a filing fee ((prescribed under RCW 43.07.120)) of two hundred
fifty dollars. If the measure is certified by the secretary of state
for the general election ballot, the sponsor shall receive a refund of
two hundred dollars.

--- END ---