BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the goal of
the judicial branch is to provide consistency in its rulings whereas
the legislative branch must often modify or enact laws in response to
a rapidly changing environment. The legislature believes the role of
policymaking requires clarity, consistency, and precision in the
preparation and interpretation of legislation. The legislature finds
that over the past decades, there have been instances in which statutes
have been judicially construed differently than may have been intended
and that it will be helpful to the judicial and legislative branches if
the rules by which statutes are judicially construed are reviewed and
better understood by both branches. The legislature also finds that
rules of construction should be codified to the extent possible such
that both branches will have enhanced opportunities to: (a) Achieve
mutually consistent understandings of legislative intent regarding
matters of public policy; (b) reduce the necessity of ongoing
revisions; and (c) provide parties to litigation increased
predictability of outcome of contested matters.
The legislature further finds that some sources from which to
determine legislative intent are better reflections of legislative
intent than others. The legislature finds that the ad hoc statutory
construction work group convened by the chair of the senate judiciary
committee should take into account the relative values of the
multiplicity of sources available to consider when seeking to determine
the legislative intent of enacted law. The work group should emphasize
in its findings that legislative intent should be construed from
sources beginning with the final action of the legislative body on a
bill and moving backward in recognition of the collective nature of the
legislature, in which the actions of the full body reflect the will of
a majority of the elected representatives who represent Washington's
citizens.
(2) It is anticipated that the work group will ultimately recommend
language defining a more complete hierarchy of legislative history to
be considered in determining legislative intent. Therefore, the work
group should take into consideration the following suggested
nonexclusive hierarchy of factors to consider:
(a) The floor colloquies on final passage, if any;
(b) The content of amendments to the legislation adopted on the
floor of a chamber of the legislature;
(c) The content of amendments to the legislation adopted in a
committee of the legislature;
(d) The intent section of an act, if present; and
(e) Where available, parties discerning legislative intent shall
consider the introductory comments of the prime sponsor of the
legislation as a guide to understanding both the issue to which the
legislature was responding and the context in which the law was
enacted.
Staff materials prepared to assist legislators in their
deliberative process, including bill reports, should not be included in
the hierarchy.

--- END ---