BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington entrepreneurial development and small business
reference service is created in the department of commerce.
(2) To the extent that funds are provided for this purpose, the
department must:
(a) In conjunction with and drawing on information compiled by the
work force training and education coordinating board and the Washington
economic development commission:
(i) Establish and maintain an inventory of the public and private
entrepreneurial training and technical assistance services, programs,
and resources available in the state;
(ii) Disseminate information about available entrepreneurial
development and small business assistance services, programs, and
resources via in-person presentations and electronic and printed
materials and undertake other activities to raise awareness of
entrepreneurial training and small business assistance offerings; and
(iii) Evaluate the extent to which existing entrepreneurial
training and technical assistance programs in the state are effective
and represent a consistent, integrated approach to meeting the needs of
start-up and existing entrepreneurs;
(b) Assist providers of entrepreneurial development and small
business assistance services in applying for federal and private
funding to support the entrepreneurial development and small business
assistance activities in the state;
(c) Distribute awards for excellence in entrepreneurial training
and small business assistance; and
(d) Report to the governor, the economic development commission,
the work force training and education coordinating board, and the
appropriate legislative committees its recommendations for statutory
changes necessary to enhance operational efficiencies or enhance
coordination related to entrepreneurial development and small business
assistance.
(3) In carrying out the duties under this section, the department
must seek the advice of small business owners and advocates, the
Washington economic development commission, the work force training and
education coordinating board, the state board for community and
technical colleges, the employment security department, the Washington
state microenterprise association, associate development organizations,
impact Washington, the Washington quality award council, the Washington
technology center, the small business export finance assistance center,
the Spokane intercollegiate research and technology institute,
representatives of the University of Washington business school and the
Washington State University college of business and economics, the
office of minority and women's business enterprises, the Washington
economic development finance authority, and staff from small business
development centers.
(4) The director may appoint an advisory board or convene such
other individuals or groups as he or she deems appropriate to assist in
carrying out the department's duties under this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.30.530 and 2009 c 486 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board of regents of Washington State University ((shall))
must establish the Washington State University small business
development center.
(2) The center ((shall)) must provide management and technical
assistance including but not limited to training, counseling, and
research services to small businesses throughout the state. The center
shall work with the department of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce, the state board for community and technical
colleges, the higher education coordinating board, the workforce
training and education coordinating board, the employment security
department, the Washington state economic development commission,
associate development organizations, and workforce development councils
to:
(a) Integrate small business development centers with other state
and local economic development and workforce development programs;
(b) Target the centers' services to small businesses;
(c) Tailor outreach and services at each center to the needs and
demographics of entrepreneurs and small businesses located within the
service area;
(d) Establish and expand small business development center
satellite offices when financially feasible; and
(e) Coordinate delivery of services to avoid duplication. In
carrying out the duty under this subsection and to the extent that
funds are provided for these purposes, the center must, consistent with
the scope, goals, deliverables, and timeline of work specified in the
annual cooperative agreement with the United States small business
administration:
(i) Develop and maintain a state comprehensive plan for the
coordination and integration of small business and entrepreneurial
development programs and the operations of a statewide small business
and entrepreneurial development system. The plan must include but not
be limited to setting measurable goals, objectives, and priorities;
(ii) Advocate for the state's small business and entrepreneurial
development system and for meeting the needs of small start-ups and
existing entrepreneurs;
(iii) Work with private and public entrepreneurial development and
small business assistance providers to develop entrepreneurial training
and small business assistance instructional materials and curricula
that meet the particular entrepreneurial development and small business
assistance needs of rural and low-income communities and small
manufacturers interested in exporting; and
(iv) Identify policies to reduce administrative and other barriers
to efficient delivery and coordination of small business and
entrepreneurial assistance.
(3) The administrator of the center may contract with other public
or private entities for the provision of specialized services.
(4) The small business development center may accept and disburse
federal grants or federal matching funds or other funds or donations
from any source when made, granted, or donated to carry out the
center's purposes. When drawing on funds from the business assistance
account created in RCW ((30.60.010)) 28B.30.531, the center must first
use the funds to make increased management and technical assistance
available to small and start-up businesses at satellite offices. The
funds may also be used to develop and expand assistance programs such
as small business planning workshops and small business counseling.
(5) The legislature directs the small business development center
to request United States small business administration approval of a
special emphasis initiative, as permitted under 13 C.F.R. 130.340(c) as
of April 1, 2009, to target assistance to Washington state's smaller
businesses. This initiative would be negotiated and included in the
first cooperative agreement application process that occurs after July
26, 2009.
(6) By December 1, 2009, and December 1, 2010, respectively, the
center shall provide a written progress report and a final report to
the appropriate committees of the legislature with respect to the
requirements in subsections (2) and (5) of this section and the amount
and use of funding received through the business assistance account.
The reports must also include data on the number, location, staffing,
and budget levels of satellite offices; affiliations with community
colleges, associate development organizations or other local
organizations; the number, size, and type of small businesses assisted;
and the types of services provided. The reports must also include
information on the outcomes achieved, such as jobs created or retained,
private capital invested, and return on the investment of state and
federal dollars.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.20.297 and 2005 c 357 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that small technology-based firms are the
source of approximately one-half of the economy's major innovations.
The legislature further finds that economic development in the state is
increasingly driven by innovative firms and that it is in the interest
of the state to:
(a) Increase participation by Washington state small businesses in
the federal small business innovation research program by assisting
them in becoming small business innovation research program grant
recipients((.
The legislature further finds that many small business innovators
lack the grant-writing skills necessary to prepare a successful small
business innovation research program proposal, and the federal program
that funded grant-writing assistance has stopped operations. Nearly
fifty percent of small businesses trained under the federal program won
grants compared to less than ten percent of those that did not receive
training)); and
(b) Increase the number of innovative firms that understand and
engage in the technology commercialization process by providing
information resources and technical assistance in accessing new
technologies.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Small business innovation research program" means the program,
enacted pursuant to the small business innovation development act of
1982, P.L. 97-219, that provided funds to small businesses to conduct
innovative research having commercial application.
(b) "Small business" means a corporation, partnership, sole
proprietorship, or individual, operating a business for profit, with
two hundred fifty employees or fewer, including employees employed in
a subsidiary or affiliated corporation, that otherwise meets the
requirements of the federal small business innovation research program.
(3) To the extent funds are appropriated for these purposes, the
Washington technology center ((shall)) must establish a small business
innovation research and assistance program, including a proposal review
process, to train and assist Washington small businesses to win phase
I federal small business innovation research program awards((.
(a))) and federal technology innovation program awards. In
operating the program, the Washington technology center ((shall)) must
give priority to first-time small business innovation research program
applicants, new businesses, and firms with fewer than ten employees.
(((b))) (4) The Washington technology center may charge a fee for
((this)) its services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The investing in innovation account is created in the custody of
the state treasurer. Funds may be directed to the account from
federal, state, and private sources. Expenditures from the account may
be used only to carry out the investing in innovation grants program
established under RCW 70.210.030, and other innovation and
commercialization purposes consistent with the federal, state, or
private and other funding guidelines that apply to the funds deposited
in the account. Only the executive director of the Washington
technology center or the executive director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.06.335 and 2004 c 245 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington quality award council ((shall)) must be
organized as a private, nonprofit corporation, in accordance with
chapter 24.03 RCW and this section.
(2) The council ((shall)) must oversee the governor's Washington
state quality award program. The purpose of the program is to improve
the overall competitiveness of the state's economy by stimulating
Washington state industries, business, and organizations to bring about
measurable success through setting standards of organizational
excellence, encouraging organizational self-assessment, identifying
successful organizations as role models, and providing a valuable
mechanism for promoting and strengthening a commitment to continuous
quality improvement in all sectors of the state's economy. The
governor ((shall)) must annually present the award to organizations
that improve the quality of their products and services and are
noteworthy examples of high-performing work organizations, as
determined by the council in consultation with the governor or
appointed representative.
(3) The governor ((shall)) must appoint a representative to serve
on the board of directors of the council.
(4) The council ((shall)) must establish a board of examiners, a
recognition committee, and such other committees or subgroups as it
deems appropriate to carry out its responsibilities.
(5) The council may conduct such public information, research,
education, and assistance programs as it deems appropriate to further
quality improvement in organizations operating in the state of
Washington.
(6) To the extent funds are appropriated for these purposes, the
council ((shall)) must:
(a) Approve and announce award recipients;
(b) Approve guidelines to examine applicant organizations;
(c) Approve appointment of board of examiners; ((and))
(d) Arrange appropriate annual awards and recognition for
recipients;
(e) Provide training to technical assistance providers from the
department of commerce, impact Washington, small business development
centers, associate development organizations, and other organizations
in continuous quality improvement, performance measurement, strategic
planning, and other approaches designed to reduce operating costs,
improve effectiveness, and increase productivity in businesses
receiving assistance; and
(f) Offer the services of a public sector and a private sector
manager to conduct conferences, perform outreach, provide training, and
deliver technical assistance to organizations, agencies, and businesses
to allow them to develop and implement quality management,
accountability, and performance systems.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.338.020 and 2008 c 315 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington manufacturing innovation and modernization
extension service program is created to provide assistance to small
manufacturers located in the state of Washington. The program
((shall)) must be administered by the department subject to funds
provided for this purpose.
(2)(a) Application to receive assistance under this program must be
made to the department in a form and manner specified by the
department. Successful applicants will receive an innovation and
modernization extension voucher from the department to cover the costs
of extension services performed by a qualified manufacturing extension
partnership affiliate. An applicant may not receive a voucher or
vouchers of over two hundred thousand dollars per calendar year. The
department shall only allocate up to sixty percent of available funding
during the first year of a biennium.
(b) Applicants must:
(i) Have a valid agreement with a qualified manufacturing extension
partnership affiliate to engage in innovation and modernization
extension services;
(ii) Agree to: (A) Make a contribution to the manufacturing
innovation and modernization account created in RCW 43.338.030, in an
amount equal to twenty-five percent of the amount of the innovation and
modernization extension voucher, upon completion of the innovation and
modernization extension service; and (B) make monthly or quarterly
contributions over the subsequent eighteen months, as specified in
their agreement with the affiliate, to the manufacturing innovation and
modernization account created in RCW 43.338.030 in an amount equal to
eighty percent of the amount of the innovation and modernization
extension voucher;
(iii) Be a small manufacturer or an industry association or cluster
association at the time the applicant entered into an agreement with a
qualified manufacturing extension partnership affiliate; and
(iv) If a small manufacturer, ensure that the number of employees
the applicant has in the state during the calendar year following the
completion of the program will be equal to or greater than the number
of employees the applicant had in the state in the calendar year
preceding the start of the program.
(3) The director may solicit and receive gifts, grants, funds,
fees, and endowments, in trust or otherwise, from tribal, local,
federal, or other governmental entities, as well as private sources,
for the purpose of providing funding for the innovation and
modernization extension services and outreach services specified in
this chapter. All revenue solicited and received by the department
pursuant to this subsection must be deposited into the manufacturing
innovation and modernization account created in RCW 43.338.030.
(4) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.
(5) Any qualified manufacturing extension partnership affiliate
receiving funding under this program is required to submit a copy of
its annual independent federal audit to the department within three
months of its issuance.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.131.409 and 2008 c 315 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Washington manufacturing innovation and modernization extension
service program under chapter 43.338 RCW ((shall be terminated))
terminates on June 30, ((2012)) 2017, as provided in RCW 43.131.410.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.131.410 and 2008 c 315 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective June 30, ((2013)) 2018:
(1) RCW 43.338.005 and 2008 c 315 § 1;
(2) RCW 43.338.010 and 2008 c 315 § 2;
(3) RCW 43.338.020 and 2008 c 315 § 3;
(4) RCW 43.338.900 and 2008 c 315 § 4;
(5) RCW 43.338.030 and 2008 c 315 § 5; and
(6) RCW 43.338.040 and 2008 c 315 § 6.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2009 c 87 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the toll collection
account, the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the
energy account, the fair fund, the family leave insurance account, the
food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship account, the fruit and
vegetable inspection account, the future teachers conditional
scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the GET ready
for math and science scholarship account, the grain inspection
revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive account, the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local
tourism promotion account, the pilotage account, the produce railcar
pool account, the regional transportation investment district account,
the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center
account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, the children's
trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred
owners' bonus fund and breeder awards account, the Washington horse
racing commission class C purse fund account, the individual
development account program account, the Washington horse racing
commission operating account (earnings from the Washington horse racing
commission operating account must be credited to the Washington horse
racing commission class C purse fund account), the life sciences
discovery fund, the Washington state heritage center account, the
reduced cigarette ignition propensity account, the investing in
innovation account, and the reading achievement account. However, the
earnings to be distributed shall first be reduced by the allocation to
the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right-of-way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act
must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal
unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

--- END ---