BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.215.405 and 2006 c 265 s 210 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout RCW 43.215.400 through 43.215.450 and
43.215.900 through 43.215.903.
(1) "Advisory committee" means the advisory committee under RCW
43.215.420.
(2) "Department" means the department of early learning.
(3) "Eligible child" means a child not eligible for kindergarten
whose family income is at or below one hundred ten percent of the
federal poverty level, as published annually by the federal department
of health and human services, and includes a child whose family is
eligible for public assistance, and who is not a participant in a
federal or state program providing comprehensive services; a child with
disabilities who qualifies for funds in accordance with part B of the
federal individuals with disabilities education act and any other
federal or state laws relating to the provision of special education
services; and may include children who are eligible under rules adopted
by the department if the number of such children equals not more than
ten percent of the total enrollment in the early childhood program.
Priority for enrollment shall be given to children from families with
the lowest income, children in foster care, or to eligible children
from families with multiple needs.
(4) "Approved programs" means those state-supported education and
special assistance programs which are recognized by the department as
meeting the minimum program rules adopted by the department to qualify
under RCW 43.215.400 through 43.215.450 and 43.215.900 through
43.215.903 and are designated as eligible for funding by the department
under RCW 43.215.430 and 43.215.440.
(5) "Comprehensive" means an assistance program that focuses on the
needs of the child and includes education, health, and family support
services.
(6) "Family support services" means providing opportunities for
parents to:
(a) Actively participate in their child's early childhood program;
(b) Increase their knowledge of child development and parenting
skills;
(c) Further their education and training;
(d) Increase their ability to use needed services in the community;
(e) Increase their self-reliance.

--- END ---