BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.30.530 and 2009 c 486 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board of regents of Washington State University ((shall))
must establish the Washington State University small business
development center.
(2) The center ((shall)) must provide management and technical
assistance including but not limited to training, counseling, and
research services to small businesses throughout the state. The center
((shall)) must work with the department of ((community, trade, and
economic development)) commerce, the state board for community and
technical colleges, the higher education coordinating board, the
workforce training and education coordinating board, the employment
security department, the Washington state economic development
commission, associate development organizations, and workforce
development councils to:
(a) Integrate small business development centers with other state
and local economic development and workforce development programs;
(b) Target the centers' services to small businesses;
(c) Tailor outreach and services at each center to the needs and
demographics of entrepreneurs and small businesses located within the
service area;
(d) Establish and expand small business development center
satellite offices when financially feasible; and
(e) Coordinate delivery of services to avoid duplication.
(3) The administrator of the center may contract with other public
or private entities for the provision of specialized services.
(4) The small business development center may accept and disburse
federal grants or federal matching funds or other funds or donations
from any source when made, granted, or donated to carry out the
center's purposes. When drawing on funds from the business assistance
account created in RCW ((30.60.010)) 28B.30.531, the center must
((first use the funds to make increased management and technical
assistance available to small and start-up businesses at satellite
offices)) give priority to the expansion of its existing services to
start-up businesses. The funds may also be used ((to develop and
expand assistance programs such as small business planning workshops
and small business counseling)) for the development and provision of
new training, planning, counseling, and technical assistance services.
(5) The legislature directs the small business development center
to request United States small business administration approval of a
special emphasis initiative, as permitted under 13 C.F.R. 130.340(c) as
of April 1, 2009, to target assistance to Washington state's smaller
businesses. This initiative would be negotiated and included in the
first cooperative agreement application process that occurs after July
26, 2009.
(6) By December 1, 2009, and December 1, 2010, respectively, the
center shall provide a written progress report and a final report to
the appropriate committees of the legislature with respect to the
requirements in subsections (2) and (5) of this section and the amount
and use of funding received through the business assistance account.
The reports must also include data on the number, location, staffing,
and budget levels of satellite offices; affiliations with community
colleges, associate development organizations or other local
organizations; the number, size, and type of small businesses assisted;
and the types of services provided. The reports must also include
information on the outcomes achieved, such as jobs created or retained,
private capital invested, and return on the investment of state and
federal dollars.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.02.075 and 1995 c 403 s 1007 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department ((shall)) must collect a fee of fifteen dollars
on each master application. The entire master application fee
((shall)) must be deposited in the master license fund.
(2) The department ((shall)) must collect a fee of nine dollars on
each renewal application. Renewal application fees ((shall)) must be
deposited in the master license fund.
(3) The department shall provide the applicant for each initial and
each renewal master business application the opportunity to make a
donation of five dollars to support the small business development
centers. The department shall ensure that the donation opportunity
under this section is voluntary. Funds collected by these donations
shall be deposited by the department in the business assistance account
created in RCW 28B.30.531, and used by the small business development
center administrator or the administrator's designee for business
assistance purposes as provided in RCW 28B.30.530.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.02.080 and 1992 c 107 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
All fees collected under the system ((shall)) must be deposited
with the state treasurer. Upon issuance or renewal of the master
license or supplemental licenses, the department ((shall)) must
distribute the fees, except for fees covered under RCW 19.02.075(3),
19.02.210, and ((for fees covered under RCW)) 19.80.075, to the
appropriate accounts under the applicable statutes for those agencies'
licenses.

--- END ---