BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to allow
the office of insurance commissioner to recognize nontraditional groups
and allow these groups to purchase group medical insurance. Current
group purchases are limited to such groups as employers, trade
associations, and labor unions. The legislature recognizes that
additional groups of individuals, such as church congregants or bank
depositors, may benefit from the opportunity to purchase insurance
together and it is the desire of the legislature that opportunities to
purchase insurance be expanded.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Group medical insurance offered to a resident of this state
under a group medical insurance policy may be issued to a group other
than one described in RCW 48.24.020, 48.24.035, 48.24.040, 48.24.045,
48.24.050, 48.24.060, 48.24.070, 48.24.080, 48.24.090, or 48.24.095
subject to the requirements in this subsection. No group medical
insurance policy may be delivered under this section in this state
unless the commissioner finds that:
(a) The issuance of the group policy is not contrary to the best
interest of the public;
(b) The issuance of the group policy would result in economies of
acquisition or administration; and
(c) The benefits are reasonable in relation to the premiums
charged.
(2) No group medical insurance coverage may be offered under this
section in this state by an insurer under a policy issued in another
state unless the commissioner or the insurance commissioner of another
state having requirements substantially similar to those contained in
subsection (1)(a) through (c) of this section has made a determination
that the requirements have been met.
(3) The premium for the policy must be paid from funds from the
policyholder, the covered persons, or both the policyholder and the
covered persons.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The commissioner may adopt rules to
implement this act.

--- END ---