BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.285.030 and 2009 c 565 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Attorney general" means the Washington state office of the
attorney general.
(2) "Auditor" means: (a) The Washington state auditor's office or
its designee for qualifying utilities under its jurisdiction that are
not investor-owned utilities; or (b) an independent auditor selected by
a qualifying utility that is not under the jurisdiction of the state
auditor and is not an investor-owned utility.
(3) "Commission" means the Washington state utilities and
transportation commission.
(4) "Conservation" means any reduction in electric power
consumption resulting from increases in the efficiency of energy use,
production, or distribution.
(5) "Cost-effective" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
80.52.030.
(6) "Council" means the Washington state apprenticeship and
training council within the department of labor and industries.
(7) "Customer" means a person or entity that purchases electricity
for ultimate consumption and not for resale.
(8) "Department" means the department of commerce or its successor.
(9) "Distributed generation" means an eligible renewable resource
where the generation facility or any integrated cluster of such
facilities has a generating capacity of not more than five megawatts.
(10) "Eligible renewable resource" means:
(a) Electricity from a generation facility powered by a renewable
resource other than fresh water that commences operation after March
31, 1999, where((: (i))) the facility is located ((in the Pacific
Northwest; or (ii) the electricity from the facility is delivered into
Washington state on a real-time basis without shaping, storage, or
integration services)) within the geographic boundary of the western
electricity coordinating council or its successor entity; ((or))
(b) Incremental electricity produced as a result of efficiency
improvements completed after March 31, 1999, to hydroelectric
generation ((projects)) facilities owned by a qualifying utility and
located in the Pacific Northwest or to hydroelectric generation in
irrigation pipes and canals located in the Pacific Northwest, where the
additional generation in either case does not result in new water
diversions or ((impoundments)) an increase in the amount of water
storage;
(c)(i) That portion of incremental electricity produced as a result
of equipment efficiency improvements completed after March 31, 1999,
attributable to a qualifying utility's share of the electricity output
to hydroelectric generation facilities whose energy output is marketed
by the Bonneville power administration where the additional generation
does not result in new water diversions or an increase in the amount of
water storage;
(ii) That portion of incremental electricity produced as a result
of operational efficiency improvements completed after March 31, 1999,
attributable to a qualifying utility's share of the electricity output
to hydroelectric generation facilities whose energy output is marketed
by the Bonneville power administration where the additional generation
does not result in new water diversions or an increase in the amount of
water storage. However, no qualifying utility may claim such
operational efficiencies until appropriate rule making determines how
the efficiencies are apportioned among qualifying utilities; or
(d) Electricity from a biomass energy generation facility located
in Washington that commenced operation before March 31, 1999, and that
has been significantly modified after the effective date of this
section. For the purposes of this subsection, "significantly modified"
means an investment to increase a generation facility's energy
efficiency that is equal to or greater than fifty percent of the
generation facility's net book value. For the purposes of this
subsection, "net book value" is calculated as the asset ending balance,
as established under generally accepted accounting rules, for the year
immediately preceding when the investment is made, plus accumulated
depreciation that is accounted for as a negative number.
(11) "Investor-owned utility" has the same meaning as defined in
RCW 19.29A.010.
(12) "Load" means the amount of kilowatt-hours of electricity
delivered in the most recently completed year by a qualifying utility
to its Washington retail customers.
(13)(a) "Nonpower attributes" means all environmentally related
characteristics, exclusive of energy, capacity reliability, and other
electrical power service attributes, that are associated with the
generation of electricity from a renewable resource, including but not
limited to the facility's fuel type, geographic location, vintage,
qualification as an eligible renewable resource, and avoided emissions
of pollutants to the air, soil, or water, and avoided emissions of
carbon dioxide and other greenhouse gases.
(b) "Nonpower attributes" does not include any aspects, claims,
characteristics, or benefits associated with the on-site capture and
destruction of methane or other greenhouse gases at a facility through
a digester system, landfill gas collection system, or other mechanism,
which may be separately marketable as greenhouse gas emissions
reduction credits, offsets, or similar tradable commodities.
(14) "Pacific Northwest" has the same meaning as defined for the
Bonneville power administration in section 3 of the Pacific Northwest
electric power planning and conservation act (94 Stat. 2698; 16 U.S.C.
Sec. 839a).
(15) "Public facility" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
39.35C.010.
(16) "Qualifying utility" means an electric utility, as the term
"electric utility" is defined in RCW 19.29A.010, that serves more than
twenty-five thousand customers in the state of Washington. The number
of customers served may be based on data reported by a utility in form
861, "annual electric utility report," filed with the energy
information administration, United States department of energy.
(17) "Renewable energy credit" means a tradable certificate of
proof of at least one megawatt-hour of an eligible renewable resource
where the generation facility is not powered by fresh water, the
certificate includes all of the nonpower attributes associated with
that one megawatt-hour of electricity, and the certificate is verified
by a renewable energy credit tracking system selected by the
department.
(18) "Renewable resource" means: (a) Water; (b) wind; (c) solar
energy; (d) geothermal energy; (e) landfill gas; (f) wave, ocean, or
tidal power; (g) gas from sewage treatment facilities; (h) biodiesel
fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135 that is not derived from crops raised
on land cleared from old growth ((or first-growth)) forests where the
clearing occurred after December 7, 2006; ((and)) or (i) biomass energy
((based on animal waste or solid organic fuels from wood, forest, or
field residues, or dedicated energy crops that do not include (i) wood
pieces that have been treated with chemical preservatives such as
creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; (ii) black
liquor by-product from paper production; (iii) wood from old growth
forests; or (iv) municipal solid waste)).
(19) "Rule" means rules adopted by an agency or other entity of
Washington state government to carry out the intent and purposes of
this chapter.
(20) "Year" means the twelve-month period commencing January 1st
and ending December 31st.
(21)(a) "Biomass energy" means: (i) By-products of pulping and
wood manufacturing process; (ii) animal waste; (iii) solid organic
fuels from wood; (iv) forest or field residues; (v) wooden demolition
or construction debris; (vi) food waste; (vii) liquors derived from
algae and other sources; (viii) dedicated energy crops; (ix) biosolids;
and (x) yard waste.
(b) "Biomass energy" does not include: (i) Wood pieces that have
been treated with chemical preservatives such as creosote,
pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; (ii) wood from old growth
forests; or (iii) municipal solid waste.
(22) "Greenhouse gases" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
80.80.010.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.285.040 and 2007 c 1 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each qualifying utility shall pursue all available conservation
that is cost-effective, reliable, and feasible.
(a) By January 1, 2010, using methodologies consistent with those
used by the Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning
council in its most recently published regional power plan, each
qualifying utility shall identify its achievable cost-effective
conservation potential through 2019. At least every two years
thereafter, the qualifying utility shall review and update this
assessment for the subsequent ten-year period.
(b) ((Beginning)) By January 1, 2010, each qualifying utility shall
establish and make publicly available a biennial acquisition target for
cost-effective conservation consistent with its identification of
achievable opportunities in (a) of this subsection, and meet that
target during the subsequent two-year period. At a minimum, each
biennial acquisition target must be no lower than the qualifying
utility's pro rata share for that two-year period of its cost-effective
conservation potential for the subsequent ten-year period. A
qualifying utility may not use incremental electricity produced as a
result of efficiency improvements to hydroelectric generation
facilities to meet its biennial conservation acquisition target if the
improvements were used to meet its targets under subsection (2)(a) of
this section.
(c) In meeting its conservation targets, a qualifying utility may
count high-efficiency cogeneration owned and used by a retail electric
customer to meet its own needs. High-efficiency cogeneration is the
sequential production of electricity and useful thermal energy from a
common fuel source, where, under normal operating conditions, the
facility ((has a useful thermal energy output of no less than thirty-three percent of the total energy output)) is designed to have a
projected overall thermal conversion efficiency of at least seventy
percent. For the purposes of this section, "overall thermal conversion
efficiency" means the output of electricity plus usable heat divided by
fuel input. The reduction in load due to high-efficiency cogeneration
shall be((: (i) Calculated as the ratio of the fuel chargeable to
power heat rate of the cogeneration facility compared to the heat rate
on a new and clean basis of a best-commercially available technology
combined-cycle natural gas-fired combustion turbine; and (ii))) counted
towards meeting the biennial conservation target in the same manner as
other conservation savings.
(d) The commission may determine if a conservation program
implemented by an investor-owned utility is cost-effective based on the
commission's policies and practice.
(e) The commission may rely on its standard practice for review and
approval of investor-owned utility conservation targets.
(2)(a) Each qualifying utility shall use eligible renewable
resources or acquire equivalent renewable energy credits, or a
combination of both, to meet the following annual targets:
(i) At least three percent of its load ((by January 1,)) for the
year 2012, and each year thereafter through December 31, 2015;
(ii) At least ((nine)) ten and twenty-five one-hundredths (10.25%)
percent of its load ((by January 1,)) for the year 2016, and each year
thereafter through December 31, 2019; and
(iii) At least ((fifteen)) sixteen and twenty-five one-hundredths
(16.25%) percent of its load ((by January 1,)) for the year 2020, and
each year thereafter.
(b) On or before January 1, 2012, and each year thereafter, each
qualifying utility shall develop an implementation plan for meeting the
renewable energy targets in this subsection for that target year. The
implementation plan must include the qualifying utility's average of
its load for the two years preceding the target year, projected load
for the target year based on the utility's most recent load forecast,
an estimate of the quantity of eligible renewable resources and
renewable energy credits that the qualifying utility will require to
meet the target for the target year, and the amount and type of already
owned or contracted eligible renewable resources that may be used to
meet the target. A qualifying utility that is an investor-owned
utility shall submit the implementation plan to the commission. All
other utilities shall submit the implementation plan to their governing
boards and to the department, and make the implementation plan
available to the auditor. The content of the implementation plan may
not be the basis for enforcement actions or penalties against the
qualifying utility.
(c) A qualifying utility may count distributed generation at double
the facility's electrical output if the utility: (i) Owns or has
contracted for the distributed generation and the associated renewable
energy credits; or (ii) has contracted to purchase the associated
renewable energy credits.
(((c))) (d) In meeting the annual targets in (a) of this
subsection, a qualifying utility shall calculate its annual load based
on the average of the utility's load for the previous two years.
(((d))) (e) A qualifying utility shall be considered in compliance
with an annual target in (a) of this subsection if: (i) The utility's
weather-adjusted load for the previous three years on average did not
increase over that time period; (ii) after December 7, 2006, the
utility did not commence or renew ownership or incremental purchases of
electricity from resources other than renewable resources other than on
a daily spot price basis and the electricity is not offset by
equivalent renewable energy credits; and (iii) the utility invested at
least one percent of its total annual retail revenue requirement that
year on eligible renewable resources, renewable energy credits, or a
combination of both.
(((e))) (f) The requirements of this section may be met for any
given year with renewable energy credits ((produced)) generated during
((that)) the target year, the preceding two years, or that may be
generated during the first three months of the subsequent year. Each
renewable energy credit may be used only once to meet the requirements
of this section.
(((f))) (g) In complying with the targets established in (a) of
this subsection, a qualifying utility may not count:
(i) Eligible renewable resources or distributed generation where
the associated renewable energy credits are owned by a separate entity;
or
(ii) Eligible renewable resources or renewable energy credits
obtained for and used in an optional pricing program such as the
program established in RCW 19.29A.090.
(((g))) (h) Where fossil and combustible renewable resources are
cofired in one generating unit located in the Pacific Northwest where
the cofiring commenced after March 31, 1999, the unit shall be
considered to produce eligible renewable resources in direct proportion
to the percentage of the total heat value represented by the heat value
of the renewable resources.
(((h))) (i)(i) Except as provided in (j)(i) of this subsection, a
qualifying utility that acquires an eligible renewable resource or
renewable energy credit may ((count)) apply a multiplier for that
acquisition ((at)) of one and two-tenths times its base value:
(A) Where the eligible renewable resource comes from a facility
that commenced operation after December 31, 2005; and
(B) Where the developer of the facility used apprenticeship
programs approved by the council during facility construction.
(ii) The council shall establish minimum levels of labor hours to
be met through apprenticeship programs to qualify for this extra
credit.
(((i))) (j)(i) A qualifying utility that acquires an eligible
renewable resource or renewable energy credit may apply a multiplier
based on a percentage of apprenticeship labor hours as follows:

Percentage of
apprenticeship
labor hours Multiplier

16 1.2

17 1.3

18 1.4

19 1.5

20 and above 1.6

(A) Where the eligible renewable resource comes from a facility
that commenced operation after the effective date of this section
through December 31, 2013;
(B) Where the acquisition is made after the effective date of this
section through December 31, 2013; and
(C) Where the developer of the facility used apprenticeship
programs as specified in (i)(i) of this subsection.
(k) A qualifying utility shall be considered in compliance with an
annual target in (a) of this subsection if events beyond the reasonable
control of the utility that could not have been reasonably anticipated
or ameliorated prevented it from meeting the renewable energy target.
Such events include weather-related damage, mechanical failure,
strikes, lockouts, and actions of a governmental authority that
adversely affect the generation, transmission, or distribution of an
eligible renewable resource under contract to a qualifying utility.
(3) Utilities that become qualifying utilities after December 31,
2006, shall meet the requirements in this section on a time frame
comparable in length to that provided for qualifying utilities as of
December 7, 2006.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.285.060 and 2007 c 1 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a
qualifying utility that fails to comply with the energy conservation or
renewable energy targets established in RCW 19.285.040 shall pay an
administrative penalty to the state of Washington in the amount of
fifty dollars for each megawatt-hour of shortfall. Beginning in 2007,
this penalty shall be adjusted annually according to the rate of change
of the inflation indicator, gross domestic product-implicit price
deflator, as published by the bureau of economic analysis of the United
States department of commerce or its successor.
(2) A qualifying utility that does not meet an annual renewable
energy target established in RCW 19.285.040(2) is exempt from the
administrative penalty in subsection (1) of this section for that year
if the commission for investor-owned utilities or the auditor for all
other qualifying utilities determines that the utility complied with
RCW 19.285.040(2) (((d) or (i))) (e) or (k) or 19.285.050(1).
(3) A qualifying utility must notify its retail electric customers
in published form within three months of incurring a penalty regarding
the size of the penalty and the reason it was incurred.
(4) The commission shall determine if an investor-owned utility may
recover the cost of this administrative penalty in electric rates, and
may consider providing positive incentives for an investor-owned
utility to exceed the targets established in RCW 19.285.040.
(5) Administrative penalties collected under this chapter shall be
deposited into the energy independence act special account which is
hereby created. All receipts from administrative penalties collected
under this chapter must be deposited into the account. Expenditures
from the account may be used only for the purchase of renewable energy
credits or for energy conservation projects at public facilities, local
government facilities, community colleges, or state universities. The
state shall own and retire any renewable energy credits purchased using
moneys from the account. Only the director of general administration
or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.
(6) For a qualifying utility that is an investor-owned utility, the
commission shall determine compliance with the provisions of this
chapter and assess penalties for noncompliance as provided in
subsection (1) of this section.
(7) For qualifying utilities that are not investor-owned utilities,
the governing board of the utility shall apply the rules adopted by the
department under RCW 19.285.080(2) in making its determination of
compliance in meeting the targets established in RCW 19.285.040 or
alternative compliance under RCW 19.285.040(2) or 19.285.050(1), and
rules adopted under this chapter, and may request assistance from the
department in doing so.
(8) For qualifying utilities that are not investor-owned utilities,
the auditor is responsible for auditing compliance with this chapter
and rules adopted under this chapter that apply to those utilities and
the attorney general is responsible for enforcing that compliance.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.285.070 and 2007 c 1 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) On or before June 1, 2012, and annually thereafter, each
qualifying utility shall report to the department on its progress in
the preceding year in meeting the conservation targets established in
RCW 19.285.040(1), including expected electricity savings from the
biennial conservation target, expenditures on conservation((,)) and
actual electricity savings results((,)).
(2) On or before June 1, 2013, and each year thereafter, each
qualifying utility shall submit an annual report to the department. In
addition to the material required in subsection (1) of this section,
the annual report must contain relevant data demonstrating how the
renewable energy targets established in RCW 19.285.040(2) were met,
including the utility's annual load for the prior two years, the amount
of megawatt-hours needed to meet the annual renewable energy target,
the amount of megawatt-hours of each type of eligible renewable
resource acquired, the type and amount of renewable energy credits
acquired, and the percent of its total annual retail revenue
requirement invested in the incremental cost of eligible renewable
resources and the cost of renewable energy credits. For each year that
a qualifying utility elects to demonstrate alternative compliance under
RCW 19.285.040(2) (((d) or (i))) (e) or (k) or 19.285.050(1), it must
include in its annual report relevant data to demonstrate that it met
the criteria in that section. A qualifying utility may submit its
report to the department in conjunction with its annual obligations in
chapter 19.29A RCW.
(((2))) (3) A qualifying utility that is an investor-owned utility
shall also report all information required in subsection (1) of this
section to the commission, and all other qualifying utilities shall
also make all information required in subsection (1) of this section
available to the auditor, and on or before June 1, 2013, and annually
thereafter, make available to the auditor its determination of
compliance in meeting the targets established in RCW 19.285.040. For
each year that a qualifying utility determines alternative compliance
under RCW 19.285.040(2) (e) or (k) or 19.285.050(1), it must include in
its annual report, and make available to the auditor, relevant data to
demonstrate that the qualifying utility met the criteria for the
applicable section.
(3) A qualifying utility shall also make reports required in this
section available to its customers.

Sec. 5 RCW 19.285.080 and 2007 c 1 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission may adopt rules to ensure the proper
implementation and enforcement of this chapter as it applies to
investor-owned utilities.
(2) The department shall adopt rules concerning only process,
timelines, and documentation to ensure the proper implementation of
this chapter as it applies to qualifying utilities that are not
investor-owned utilities. Those rules include, but are not limited to,
rules associated with a qualifying utility's development of
conservation targets under RCW 19.285.040(1); a qualifying utility's
decision to pursue alternative compliance in RCW 19.285.040(2) (((d) or
(i))) (e) or (k) or 19.285.050(1); and the format and content of
reports required in RCW 19.285.070. Nothing in this subsection may be
construed to restrict the rate-making authority of the commission or a
qualifying utility as otherwise provided by law.
(3) The commission and department may coordinate in developing
rules related to process, timelines, and documentation that are
necessary for implementation of this chapter.
(4) Pursuant to the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05
RCW, rules needed for the implementation of this chapter must be
adopted by December 31, ((2007)) 2011. These rules may be revised as
needed to carry out the intent and purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) By June 30, 2014, the joint legislative
audit and review committee shall conduct a study on the costs and
benefits of the renewable and conservation targets under chapter 19.285
RCW, including an examination of how the targets affect the following:
The cost of electricity for commercial, industrial, and residential
customers of each qualifying utility; and the development of renewable
energy.
(2)(a) The department of commerce shall contract with a mutually
acceptable person or entity to study the feasibility of measuring
hydroelectric power that is used to integrate an eligible renewable
resource and whether classifying such hydroelectric power as an
eligible renewable resource will further the purposes of chapter 19.285
RCW. The study must be presented to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2013.
(b) Before selecting the contractor, the department of commerce
shall consult the following: Qualifying utilities; large industrial
customers; organizations representing environmental interests; and any
other directly interested organizations and associations.

--- END ---