BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to appoint a panel
of experts to study bail practices and procedures. The bail system
must be examined in a comprehensive and well-considered manner from all
aspects including, but not limited to, judicial discretion, bail
amounts and procedures, public safety, variations in county practices,
constitutional restraints, and cost to local government. The variety
of practices and procedures requires that a panel of experts study the
issue and report its recommendation to the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1)(a) A legislative task force on bail
practices is established, with members as provided in this subsection.
(i) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate;
(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives;
(iii) The chief justice of the Washington state supreme court or
the chief justice's designee;
(iv) A superior court judge appointed by the superior court judges
association;
(v) A district or municipal court judge appointed by the district
and municipal court judges association;
(vi) The governor or the governor's designee;
(vii) The secretary of the Washington state department of
corrections or the secretary's designee;
(viii) Two prosecutors appointed by the Washington association of
prosecuting attorneys or designees of the prosecutors;
(ix) Two attorneys selected by separate associations of attorneys
whose members have practices that focus on representing criminal
defendants;
(x) One police officer and one deputy sheriff selected by a
statewide association of such officers and deputies;
(xi) A representative of a statewide association of city
governments, selected by the association;
(xii) A representative of a statewide association of counties,
selected by the association;
(xiii) A representative employed as an adult corrections officer
selected by a statewide association of such officers;
(xiv) A representative from an entity representing corrections
officers at a local county jail in which adult offenders are in custody
and located in any county with a population in excess of one million
persons, selected by the entity;
(xv) A representative of a statewide organization concerned
primarily with the protection of individual liberties, selected by the
organization;
(xvi) A representative of a statewide association of advocates who
work on behalf of victims and survivors of violent crimes, selected by
the association;
(xvii) A representative of the bail bond enforcement industry,
chosen by a statewide association of bail bond enforcement agents;
(xviii) A representative of the bail bond industry, chosen by a
statewide association of bail companies;
(xix) A representative of a statewide consumer advocacy
organization with at least thirty thousand members, selected by the
organization.
(b) The task force shall choose its cochairs from among its
legislative membership. The legislative cochairs shall convene the
initial meeting of the task force.
(2) The task force shall review, at a minimum, the following
issues:
(a) All aspects of bail, paying particular attention to legislation
affecting bail and pretrial release introduced during the 2010
legislative session;
(b) A validated risk assessment tool that measures or predicts the
likelihood that an offender will exhibit violent behavior if released
and whether judges should use this tool at bail hearings;
(c) Bail practices by county, including the processes used to seek
and grant bail as well as the standards by which bail is granted;
(d) Whether, or to what extent, uniformity of bail practices should
be required by state law;
(e) The characteristics of the federal system;
(f) The benefits of competitive freedom of government regulation in
the pricing of bail bonds;
(g) The interests of crime victims in being notified of a person's
release on bail;
(h) The interests of counties and cities that maintain municipal
courts;
(i) Legal and constitutional constraints in granting or denying
bail;
(j) Whether the existing regulatory, judicial, or statutory
constraints on bail should be revised; and
(k) The pretrial release system.
(3) The task force shall request that the Washington state
institute for public policy conduct research to better inform the task
force on issues, such as: (a) The percentage of people who are
released on bail and reoffend while released on bail; (b) the
likelihood that the offense for which bail was granted is statistically
or causally related to additional offenses that are committed; and (c)
the effect that race or economic status of a person seeking bail has on
the likelihood of being granted bail.
(4) Staff support for the task force must be provided by senate
committee services and the house of representatives office of program
research.
(5) Travel and other membership expenses for legislative members
must not be reimbursed. Nonlegislative members must seek reimbursement
for travel and other membership expenses through their respective
agencies or organizations.
(6) The task force shall hold meetings in state or local government
facilities and shall endeavor to accommodate the varied places of
residence among task force members.
(7) The task force may organize itself in a manner, and adopt rules
of procedure, that it determines are most conducive to the timely
completion of its charge.
(8) The task force is subject to chapter 42.30 RCW.
(9) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to
the Washington state supreme court, the governor, and appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2010.
(10) This section expires December 31, 2010.

--- END ---