BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the global health
sector develops new technologies and products for the improvement of
health delivery locally and worldwide and that Washington is home to
the world's richest collection of global health research and education
programs creating new and innovative technologies on a daily basis. It
is the intent of the legislature to stimulate our economy and foster
job creation in the emerging field of global health while improving the
health of people in our state and the world. The purpose of this act
is to create a funding mechanism and a grant program to ensure that
Washington remains competitive in global health innovation and to
guarantee that the development, manufacture, and delivery of global
health products will become an even more dynamic part of the state's
economy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The Washington global health
technologies and product development competitiveness program is
created.
(2)(a) The program must be administered by a board of directors
appointed by the governor. The governor must make the appointments
after consultation with a state-wide alliance of global health
research, nonprofit, and private entities. The board consists of the
following members:
(i) Three members representing private companies engaged in the
provision of global health products or services;
(ii) Three members representing nonprofit organizations supporting
global health research or providing global health products or services;
(iii) Three members representing public research institutions
engaged in global health research and education; and
(iv) One member who is a former elected official.
(b) The governor must appoint the chair of the board from among the
members. The governor must appoint the members to staggered terms and
each appointment may not last more than three years, but an appointee
may serve more than one term.
(3) The board must contract with the department of health for
management services to assist the board in implementing the program.
(4) The board must solicit and receive gifts, grants, bequests,
royalty payments, licensing income, and other funds from businesses,
foundations, and the federal government to promote the development and
delivery of global health technologies and products. When required by
those providing the funds, all such funds received must be deposited in
the Washington global health technologies and product development
account created in section 3 of this act. For all other funds
received, the board must create and administer an account to carry out
the purposes of this section. Funds from the account created by the
board may be used solely for expenditures on activities required in
this section.
(5) The board must establish eligibility criteria for global health
technologies and product development grants and adopt policies and
procedures to facilitate the orderly process of grant application,
review, and reward.
(6) The board must make grants to entities pursuant to contract for
the development, production, promotion, and delivery of global health
technologies and products considering the following:
(a) The quality of the proposed research or the proposed technical
assistance in product development or production process design. Any
grant funds awarded for research activities must be awarded for
nonbasic research which will assist in commercialization or manufacture
of global health technologies;
(b) The potential for the grant recipient to improve global health
outcomes;
(c) The potential for the grant to leverage additional funding for
the development of global health technologies and products;
(d) The potential for the grant to stimulate, or promote technical
skills training for, employment in the development of global health
technologies in the state;
(e) The willingness of the grant recipient, when appropriate, to
enter into royalty or licensing income agreements with the board; and
(f) Any other factors, as the board determines.
(7) Grant contracts must specify that award recipients must conduct
their research, development, and any subsequent production activities
within Washington, with the exception of activities such as clinical
trials that must be carried out in developing countries, and that a
failure to comply with this requirement will obligate the recipient to
return the amount of the award plus interest as determined by the
board.
(8) Upon the recommendation of the Washington economic development
commission, the board may provide funding for the recruitment and
employment by public research and global health nonprofit institutions
in the state of global health researchers with a history of
commercialization of global health technologies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The Washington global health technologies
and product development account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. Only the board of directors of the Washington global health
technologies and product development competitiveness program or the
board's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. All
receipts from the solicitations required in section 2 of this act must
be deposited in the account if such deposition is required by those
providing the funds. Expenditures from the account may be used only
for funding activities of the Washington global health technologies and
product development competitiveness program created in section 2 of
this act. The account is subject to the allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures. No state or local governmental funds may be deposited in
the account and moneys in the account do not constitute public funds
for the purposes of any constitutional or statutory limitation on the
use of public funds. Of the total amounts deposited into the account
the department of health may use up to three percent for management
services and administrative expenses related to the program.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2009 c 87 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the toll collection
account, the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the
energy account, the fair fund, the family leave insurance account, the
food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship account, the fruit and
vegetable inspection account, the future teachers conditional
scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the GET ready
for math and science scholarship account, the Washington global health
technologies and product development account, the grain inspection
revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive account, the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local
tourism promotion account, the pilotage account, the produce railcar
pool account, the regional transportation investment district account,
the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center
account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, the children's
trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred
owners' bonus fund and breeder awards account, the Washington horse
racing commission class C purse fund account, the individual
development account program account, the Washington horse racing
commission operating account (earnings from the Washington horse racing
commission operating account must be credited to the Washington horse
racing commission class C purse fund account), the life sciences
discovery fund, the Washington state heritage center account, the
reduced cigarette ignition propensity account, and the reading
achievement account. However, the earnings to be distributed shall
first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service
fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right-of-way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---