BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.70.350 and 2006 c 159 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The following restrictions apply to vessel designations and
substitutions on Dungeness crab-coastal fishery licenses:
(a) The holder of the license may not:
(i) Designate on the license a vessel the hull length of which
exceeds ninety-nine feet; or
(ii) Change vessel designation if the hull length of the vessel
proposed to be designated exceeds the hull length designated on the
license on June 7, 2006, by more than ten feet. However, if such
vessel designation is the result of an emergency transfer, the
applicable vessel length would be the most recent permanent vessel
designation on the license prior to June 7, 2006;
(b) If the hull length of the vessel proposed to be designated is
comparable to or exceeds by up to one foot the hull length of the
currently designated vessel, the department may change the vessel
designation no more than once in any ((two consecutive Washington state
coastal crab seasons)) one year period, measured from September 15th to
September 15th of the following year, unless the currently designated
vessel is lost or in disrepair such that it does not safely operate, in
which case the department may allow a change in vessel designation;
(c) If the hull length of the vessel proposed to be designated
exceeds by between one and ten feet the hull length of the designated
vessel on June 7, 2006, the department may change the vessel
designation no more than once on or after June 7, 2006, unless a
request is made by the license holder during a Washington state coastal
crab season for an emergency change in vessel designation. If such an
emergency request is made, the director may allow a temporary change in
designation to another vessel, if the hull length of the other vessel
does not exceed by more than ten feet the hull length of the currently
designated vessel.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "hull length" means the
length overall of a vessel's hull as shown by marine survey or by
manufacturer's specifications.
(3) By December 31, 2010, the department must, in cooperation with
the coastal crab fishing industry, evaluate the effectiveness of this
section and, if necessary, recommend any statutory changes to the
appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives.

--- END ---