BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
AEROSPACE TRAINING AND RESEARCH COORDINATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 The aerospace industry is critically
important to the economic vitality of Washington. The aerospace
industry accounts for over thirty-six billion dollars in economic value
to Washington. A highly skilled and educated workforce is a key
ingredient to the continued vitality and growth of the technology-driven aerospace industry throughout the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Aerospace company" means an entity that is primarily engaged
in the research, design, manufacture, assembly, or sale of completed
products for use in commercial or governmental aviation and avionics.
(2) "Board" means the board of advisors of the Washington aerospace
training and research coordination institute.
(3) "Executive director" means the executive director of the
institute.
(4) "Institute" means the Washington state aerospace training and
coordination institute.
(5) "Skill centers" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
28A.245.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 (1) The Washington state aerospace
training and coordination institute is created, to the extent that
state funds are appropriated or other funds are available for this
specific purpose. The goal and purpose of the institute is to enhance
the vitality of the aerospace industry through improving the state's
aerospace training, education, research, and development programs by
coordinating, providing, and developing curricula for a statewide
consortium of schools and programs that provide aerospace workforce
education and training.
(2) The institute must concentrate its efforts on providing the
highest quality training and education programs, fostering the creation
and retention of family wage jobs, integrating cutting edge research
and development into the training and education of a skilled workforce,
and facilitating growth and innovation in the aerospace industry.
(3) The institute must emphasize public-private partnership and
provide a forum for effective interaction, collaboration, and
partnerships between and among the state's aerospace industry, labor,
institutions of higher education, workforce training and education
coordinating board, innovation partnership zones, and other relevant
and appropriate public and private entities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 (1) The institute must be headquartered in
Snohomish county and overseen by a board of advisors.
(2) The board must consist of the following members:
(a) One representative from the machinist trade;
(b) One representative from professional aerospace engineering
associations;
(c) One representative from an aerospace company with sixty
thousand employees or more;
(d) Two representatives from an aerospace company with less than
sixty thousand but more than two hundred employees;
(e) Two representatives from an aerospace company with less than
two hundred employees;
(f) One representative from a four-year state public higher
education institution located in a county with a population of one
million or more residents;
(g) One representative from a four-year state public higher
education institution located east of the crest of the Cascade
mountains with student enrollment of seventeen thousand or more;
(h) One representative from the higher education coordinating
board;
(i) One representative from the state board for community and
technical colleges;
(j) One representative from the workforce training and education
coordinating board; and
(k) One representative from the office of the superintendent of
public instruction.
(3) The term of office for each board member, excluding the
representatives from the higher education coordinating board, state
board for community and technical colleges, workforce training and
education coordinating board, office of the superintendent of public
instruction, and institutions of higher education, is three years. The
executive director of the institute must be an ex officio, nonvoting
member of the board. Except for the representative from the office of
the superintendent of public instruction, board members must be
appointed by the governor. The governor must stagger the terms of the
first group of appointees to ensure the long-term continuity of the
board. The board must meet at least quarterly.
(4) The duties of the board include:
(a) Developing the general operating policies for the institute;
(b) Appointing the executive director of the institute;
(c) Adopting the biennial operating budget of the institute;
(d) Developing and maintaining on a biennial basis a state
comprehensive plan on aerospace training and education programs;
(e) Developing a program in partnership with the office of the
superintendent of public instruction and the skill centers that will
generate interest and prepare students for postsecondary education,
careers, employment, and apprenticeships in the aerospace industry;
(f) Establishing and maintaining an inventory of aerospace training
programs and research and development discoveries at the two and four-year colleges and universities and assess the extent to which the
programs represent a consistent, coordinated, efficient, and integrated
approach to meet the training needs of the aerospace industry;
(g) Evaluating how research and development discoveries from
institutions of higher education must be incorporated into aerospace
training programs;
(h) Coordinating a yearly forum in partnership with the center for
aerospace technology innovation to promote research and development
discoveries;
(i) Producing a biennial report to the governor, legislature, and
the entities represented on the board on progress by the institute in
evaluating the state's aerospace training programs and meeting the
other obligations of this chapter, as well as including recommendations
for any statutory changes necessary to enhance operational efficiencies
or improve coordination.
(j) The board may enter into contracts to fulfill its
responsibilities and purposes under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 (1) The board must employ an executive
director and may delegate management to the director. The director
must:
(a) Serve at the pleasure of the board;
(b) Be the executive officer of the board; and
(c) Administer the provisions of this chapter under the board's
supervision.
(2) The executive director must, with the approval of the board:
(a) Employ necessary deputy exempt staff under chapter 41.06 RCW who
serve at his or her pleasure on such terms and conditions as he or she
determines and (b) subject to the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW,
appoint and employ such other employees as may be required for the
proper discharge of the functions of the institute.
(3) The executive director must exercise such additional powers,
other than rule making, as may be delegated by the board by resolution.
(4) In fulfilling the duties under this chapter, the board must
make extensive use of those state agencies with responsibility for
implementing and supporting the plans of the aerospace training and
research coordination institute.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 (1) The institute may receive gifts,
grants, or endowments from public or private sources that are made from
time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the
purposes of the institute and spend gifts, grants, or endowments or
income from the public or private sources according to their terms,
unless the receipt of the gifts, grants, or endowments violates RCW
42.17.710.
(2) The institute may accept appropriate financial support levels
by private business, community groups, foundations, and individuals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 A new section is added to chapter 43.42
RCW to read as follows:
The Washington aerospace futures account is created in the custody
of the state treasurer. The governor may authorize expenditures from
the account. Expenditures from the account may be made only for the
purpose of statewide aerospace workforce and industry development,
including programs and activities related to workforce training and
education, research and development, and aerospace industry retention
and expansion. Administrative expenses, including staff support, may
be paid from the account. Revenues to the account consist of moneys
received from grants and donations, funds administered under the
governor's discretion that are deposited into the account, and moneys
received pursuant to legislative appropriations.

PART II
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON--CENTER FOR AEROSPACE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 (1) The legislature finds that
Washington's aerospace industry is important to the economic vitality
of the state and provides opportunities for the citizens of the state.
The legislature finds that there is a need for coordination among the
training and education programs referred to in sections 101 through 104
of this act and research and development of new aerospace technologies
under this center as well as existing private and public universities.
(2) The legislature also finds that it is in the interests of the
state of Washington to provide a mechanism to transfer and apply
research and technology developed at the institutions of higher
education to the private sector in order to create new products and
technologies which provide job opportunities in the aerospace industry.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature that the University of
Washington, Washington State University, and the department of commerce
must work cooperatively with the private sector in the development and
implementation of research and new technology.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Aerospace company" means an entity that is primarily engaged
in the research, design, manufacture, assembly, or sale of completed
products for use in commercial or governmental aviation and avionics.
(2) "Board" means the board of directors of the center for
aerospace technology innovation.
(3) "Center" means the center for aerospace technology innovation,
including the affiliated staff, faculty, facilities, and research
centers operated by the center.
(4) "Executive director" means the executive director of the
center.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 The center for aerospace technology
innovation is created, to the extent that state funds are appropriated
or other funds are available for this specific purpose. The center is
to lead a collaborative effort between the state's universities,
private industry, and government for the aerospace industry. The
center must be headquartered at the University of Washington. The
mission of the center is to advance the research and development of new
aerospace technologies on a statewide basis that benefits the
intermediate and long-term economic vitality of the state through
increasing the competitive capacity of the state and the aerospace
industry, and to develop and strengthen university-industry
relationships through the conduct of research that relates to the
interest of the state and the aerospace industry. The center must:
(1) Perform and/or facilitate research supportive of state science
and technology objectives, particularly as they relate to aerospace;
(2) Provide leading edge collaborative research in the aerospace
field;
(3) Emphasize and develop nonstate support of the center's research
activities; and
(4) Provide a venue for effective interaction between the state's
academic research institutions and the aerospace industry through the
promotion of faculty collaboration with industry, particularly within
the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 (1) The center must be overseen by the
board of directors of the center.
(2) The board must consist of the following members:
(a) The provost of the University of Washington or his or her
designated representative;
(b) The provost of Washington State University or his or her
designated representative;
(c) The director of the department of commerce or his or her
designated representative;
(d) One representative from an aerospace company with sixty
thousand employees or more; and
(e) One representative from an aerospace company with less than
sixty thousand employees.
(3) The term of office for each board member, excluding the provost
of the University of Washington, the provost of Washington State
University, and the department of commerce, is three years. The
executive director of the center must be an ex officio, nonvoting
member of the board. Board members from the aerospace companies must
be appointed by the governor. The governor must stagger the terms of
the two aerospace representatives to ensure the long-term continuity of
the board. The board must meet at least quarterly.
(4) The board must contract with the University of Washington to
provide such services as necessary for the operation of the center and
implementation of the duties of the center.
(5) The duties of the board include:
(a) Developing the general operating policies for the center;
(b) Appointing the executive director of the center;
(c) Adopting the biennial operating budget of the center;
(d) Establishing eligibility criteria for the selection and funding
of research projects that guarantee the greatest potential return on
the state's investment;
(e) Approving and allocating funding for research projects
conducted by the center, based on the recommendations from faculty and
aerospace companies;
(f) Coordinating a yearly forum in partnership with the Washington
state aerospace training and coordination institute to promote research
and development discoveries;
(g) Developing a biennial work plan and five-year strategic plan
for the center;
(h) Coordinating with the University of Washington and Washington
State University in the development of research and development
programs to be conducted at the center to enhance the vitality of the
state and the aerospace industry;
(i) Reviewing annual progress reports on funded research projects;
and
(j) Providing a biennial report to the governor, the legislature,
and the universities detailing the activities, performance, roles, and
contractual obligations of the center.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 The center may receive gifts, grants, or
endowments from public or private sources that are made from time to
time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purpose of
the center and spend gifts, grants, or endowments or income from the
public or private sources according to their terms, unless the receipt
of the gifts, grants, or endowments violates RCW 42.17.710.

PART III
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 Sections 101 through 106 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 Sections 201 through 205 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

--- END ---