BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.210.040 and 1998 c 109 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The small business export finance assistance center formed
under RCW 43.210.020 and 43.210.030 ((shall have)) has the powers
granted under chapter 24.03 RCW. In exercising such powers, the center
may:
(a) Solicit and accept grants, contributions, and any other
financial assistance from the federal government, federal agencies, and
any other sources to carry out its purposes;
(b) Make loans or provide loan guarantees on loans made by
financial institutions to Washington businesses with annual sales of
two hundred million dollars or less for the purpose of financing
exports of goods or services by those businesses to buyers in foreign
countries and for the purpose of financing business growth to
accommodate increased export sales. Loans or loan guarantees made
under the authority of this section may only be considered upon a
financial institution's assurance that such loan or loan guarantee is
otherwise not available;
(c) Provide assistance to businesses with annual sales of two
hundred million dollars or less in obtaining loans and guarantees of
loans made by financial institutions for the purpose of financing
export of goods or services from the state of Washington;
(((c))) (d) Provide export finance and risk mitigation counseling
to Washington exporters with annual sales of two hundred million
dollars or less, provided that such counseling is not practicably
available from a Washington for-profit business. For such counseling,
the center may charge reasonable fees as it determines are necessary;
(((d))) (e) Provide assistance in obtaining export credit insurance
or alternate forms of foreign risk mitigation to facilitate the export
of goods and services from the state of Washington;
(((e))) (f) Be available as a teaching resource to both public and
private sponsors of workshops and programs relating to the financing
and risk mitigation aspects of exporting products and services from the
state of Washington;
(((f))) (g) Develop a comprehensive inventory of export-financing
resources, both public and private, including information on resource
applicability to specific countries and payment terms;
(((g))) (h) Contract with the federal government and its agencies
to become a program administrator for federally provided loan guarantee
and export credit insurance programs; and
(((h))) (i) Take whatever action may be necessary to accomplish the
purposes set forth in this chapter.
(2) The center may not use any Washington state funds or funds
which come from the public treasury of the state of Washington to make
loans or to make any payment under a loan guarantee agreement. Under
no circumstances may the center use any funds received under RCW
43.210.050 to make or assist in making any loan or to pay or assist in
paying any amount under a loan guarantee agreement. Debts of the
center shall be center debts only and may be satisfied only from the
resources of the center. The state of Washington shall not in any way
be liable for such debts.
(3) The small business export finance assistance center shall make
every effort to seek nonstate funds for its continued operation.
(4) The small business export finance assistance center may receive
such gifts, grants, and endowments from public or private sources as
may be made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and
benefit of the purposes of the small business export finance assistance
center and expend the same or any income therefrom according to the
terms of the gifts, grants, or endowments.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.210.050 and 1998 c 245 s 84 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The small business export finance assistance center formed
under RCW 43.210.020 and 43.210.030 ((shall)) must enter into a
contract under this chapter with the department of ((community, trade,
and economic development)) commerce or its statutory successor.
(2) The contract ((shall)) under subsection (1) of this section
must:
(a) Require the center to provide export assistance services((,
consistent with RCW 43.210.070 and 43.210.100 through 43.210.120,
shall));
(b) Have a duration of two years((, and shall));
(c) Require the center to aggressively seek to fund its continued
operation from nonstate funds((. The contract shall also)); and
(d) Require the center to report annually to the department on its
success in obtaining nonstate funding. ((Upon expiration of the
contract, any provisions within the contract applicable to the Pacific
Northwest export assistance project shall be automatically renewed
without change provided the legislature appropriates funds for
administration of the small business export assistance center and the
Pacific Northwest export assistance project. The provisions of the
contract related to the Pacific Northwest export assistance project may
be changed at any time if the director of the department of community,
trade, and economic development or the president of the small business
export finance assistance center present compelling reasons supporting
the need for a contract change to the board of directors and a majority
of the board of directors agrees to the changes. The department of
agriculture shall be included in the contracting negotiations with the
department of community, trade, and economic development and the small
business export finance assistance center when the Pacific Northwest
export assistance project provides export services to industrial
sectors within the administrative domain of the Washington state
department of agriculture.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.210 RCW
to read as follows:
To the extent funds are appropriated for these purposes, the small
business export finance assistance center must:
(1) Develop a rural manufacturer export outreach program in
conjunction with impact Washington. The program must provide outreach
services to rural manufacturers in Washington to inform them of the
importance of and opportunities in international trade, and to inform
them of the export assistance programs available to assist these
businesses to become exporters; and
(2) Develop export loan or loan guarantee programs in conjunction
with the Washington economic development finance authority and the
appropriate federal and private entities.

--- END ---