BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.44.010 and 2007 c 267 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Health care services" means and includes medical, surgical,
dental, chiropractic, hospital, optometric, podiatric, pharmaceutical,
ambulance, custodial, mental health, and other therapeutic services.
(2) "Provider" means any health professional, hospital, or other
institution, organization, or person that furnishes health care
services and is licensed to furnish such services.
(3) "Health care service contractor" means any corporation,
cooperative group, or association, which is sponsored by or otherwise
intimately connected with a provider or group of providers, who or
which not otherwise being engaged in the insurance business, accepts
prepayment for health care services from or for the benefit of persons
or groups of persons as consideration for providing such persons with
any health care services. "Health care service contractor" does not
include direct patient-provider primary care practices as defined in
RCW 48.150.010.
(4) "Participating provider" means a provider, who or which has
contracted in writing with a health care service contractor to accept
payment from and to look solely to such contractor according to the
terms of the subscriber contract for any health care services rendered
to a person who has previously paid, or on whose behalf prepayment has
been made, to such contractor for such services.
(5) "Enrolled participant" means a person or group of persons who
have entered into a contractual arrangement or on whose behalf a
contractual arrangement has been entered into with a health care
service contractor to receive health care services.
(6) "Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner.
(7) "Uncovered expenditures" means the costs to the health care
service contractor for health care services that are the obligation of
the health care service contractor for which an enrolled participant
would also be liable in the event of the health care service
contractor's insolvency and for which no alternative arrangements have
been made as provided herein. The term does not include expenditures
for covered services when a provider has agreed not to bill the
enrolled participant even though the provider is not paid by the health
care service contractor, or for services that are guaranteed, insured
or assumed by a person or organization other than the health care
service contractor.
(8) "Copayment" means an amount specified in a group or individual
contract which is an obligation of an enrolled participant for a
specific service which is not fully prepaid.
(9) "Deductible" means the amount an enrolled participant is
responsible to pay before the health care service contractor begins to
pay the costs associated with treatment.
(10) "Group contract" means a contract for health care services
which by its terms limits eligibility to members of a specific group.
The group contract may include coverage for dependents.
(11) "Individual contract" means a contract for health care
services issued to and covering an individual. An individual contract
may include dependents.
(12) "Carrier" means a health maintenance organization, an insurer,
a health care service contractor, or other entity responsible for the
payment of benefits or provision of services under a group or
individual contract.
(13) "Replacement coverage" means the benefits provided by a
succeeding carrier.
(14) "Insolvent" or "insolvency" means that the organization has
been declared insolvent and is placed under an order of liquidation by
a court of competent jurisdiction.
(15) "Fully subordinated debt" means those debts that meet the
requirements of RCW 48.44.037(3) and are recorded as equity.
(16) "Net worth" means the excess of total admitted assets as
defined in RCW 48.12.010 over total liabilities but the liabilities
shall not include fully subordinated debt.
(17) "Census date" means the date upon which a health care services
contractor offering coverage to a small employer must base rate
calculations. For a small employer applying for a health benefit plan
through a contractor other than its current contractor, the census date
is the date that final group composition is received by the contractor.
For a small employer that is renewing its health benefit plan through
its existing contractor, the census date is sixty days prior to the
effective date of the renewal.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.44.023 and 2009 c 131 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A health care services contractor offering any health
benefit plan to a small employer, either directly or through an
association or member-governed group formed specifically for the
purpose of purchasing health care, may offer and actively market to the
small employer a health benefit plan featuring a limited schedule of
covered health care services. Nothing in this subsection shall
preclude a contractor from offering, or a small employer from
purchasing, other health benefit plans that may have more comprehensive
benefits than those included in the product offered under this
subsection. A contractor offering a health benefit plan under this
subsection shall clearly disclose all covered benefits to the small
employer in a brochure filed with the commissioner.
(b) A health benefit plan offered under this subsection shall
provide coverage for hospital expenses and services rendered by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not subject
to the requirements of RCW 48.44.225, 48.44.240, 48.44.245, 48.44.290,
48.44.300, 48.44.310, 48.44.320, 48.44.325, 48.44.330, 48.44.335,
48.44.344, 48.44.360, 48.44.400, 48.44.440, 48.44.450, and 48.44.460.
(2) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a health care service
contractor from offering, or a purchaser from seeking, health benefit
plans with benefits in excess of the health benefit plan offered under
subsection (1) of this section. All forms, policies, and contracts
shall be submitted for approval to the commissioner, and the rates of
any plan offered under this section shall be reasonable in relation to
the benefits thereto.
(3) Premium rates for health benefit plans for small employers as
defined in this section shall be subject to the following provisions:
(a) The contractor shall develop its rates based on an adjusted
community rate and may only vary the adjusted community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age; and
(iv) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Employees under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The contractor shall be permitted to develop separate rates for
individuals age sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is
the primary payer and coverage for which medicare is not the primary
payer. Both rates shall be subject to the requirements of this
subsection (3).
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs. Up to a twenty percent variance may be
allowed for small employers that develop and implement a wellness
program or activities that directly improve employee wellness.
Employers shall document program activities with the carrier and may,
after three years of implementation, request a reduction in premiums
based on improved employee health and wellness. While carriers may
review the employer's claim history when making a determination
regarding whether the employer's wellness program has improved employee
health, the carrier may not use maternity or prevention services claims
to deny the employer's request. Carriers may consider issues such as
improved productivity or a reduction in absenteeism due to illness if
submitted by the employer for consideration. Interested employers may
also work with the carrier to develop a wellness program and a means to
track improved employee health.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;
(ii) Changes to the family composition of the employee;
(iii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small
employer; or
(iv) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) On the census date, as defined in RCW 48.44.010, rating factors
shall produce premiums for identical groups that differ only by the
amounts attributable to plan design, and differences in census date
between new and renewal groups, with the exception of discounts for
health improvement programs.
(h) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. A carrier
may develop its rates based on claims costs due to network provider
reimbursement schedules or type of network. This subsection does not
restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as provided in RCW
48.43.015.
(i) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall
pool the medical experience of all groups purchasing coverage,
including the small group participants in the health insurance
partnership established in RCW 70.47A.030. However, annual rate
adjustments for each small group health benefit plan may vary by up to
plus or minus four percentage points from the overall adjustment of a
carrier's entire small group pool, such overall adjustment to be
approved by the commissioner, upon a showing by the carrier, certified
by a member of the American academy of actuaries that: (i) The
variation is a result of deductible leverage, benefit design, or
provider network characteristics; and (ii) for a rate renewal period,
the projected weighted average of all small group benefit plans will
have a revenue neutral effect on the carrier's small group pool.
Variations of greater than four percentage points are subject to review
by the commissioner, and must be approved or denied within sixty days
of submittal. A variation that is not denied within sixty days shall
be deemed approved. The commissioner must provide to the carrier a
detailed actuarial justification for any denial within thirty days of
the denial.
(j) For health benefit plans purchased through the health insurance
partnership established in chapter 70.47A RCW:
(i) Any surcharge established pursuant to RCW 70.47A.030(2)(e)
shall be applied only to health benefit plans purchased through the
health insurance partnership; and
(ii) Risk adjustment or reinsurance mechanisms may be used by the
health insurance partnership program to redistribute funds to carriers
participating in the health insurance partnership based on differences
in risk attributable to individual choice of health plans or other
factors unique to health insurance partnership participation. Use of
such mechanisms shall be limited to the partnership program and will
not affect small group health plans offered outside the partnership.
(k) If the rate developed under this section varies the adjusted
community rate for the factors listed in (a) of this subsection, the
date for determining those factors must be no more than sixty days
prior to the effective date of the health benefit plan.
(4) Nothing in this section shall restrict the right of employees
to collectively bargain for insurance providing benefits in excess of
those provided herein.
(5)(a) Except as provided in this subsection and subsection (3)(g)
of this section, requirements used by a contractor in determining
whether to provide coverage to a small employer shall be applied
uniformly among all small employers applying for coverage or receiving
coverage from the carrier.
(b) A contractor shall not require a minimum participation level
greater than:
(i) One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups
with three or less employees; and
(ii) Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups
with more than three employees.
(c) In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to
a small employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or
dependents who have similar existing coverage in determining whether
the applicable percentage of participation is met.
(d) A contractor may not increase any requirement for minimum
employee participation or modify any requirement for minimum employer
contribution applicable to a small employer at any time after the small
employer has been accepted for coverage.
(e) Minimum participation requirements and employer premium
contribution requirements adopted by the health insurance partnership
board under RCW 70.47A.110 shall apply only to the employers and
employees who purchase health benefit plans through the health
insurance partnership.
(6) A contractor must offer coverage to all eligible employees of
a small employer and their dependents. A contractor may not offer
coverage to only certain individuals or dependents in a small employer
group or to only part of the group. A contractor may not modify a
health plan with respect to a small employer or any eligible employee
or dependent, through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict or
exclude coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions,
or services otherwise covered by the plan.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.46.020 and 1990 c 119 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, the terms defined in this section shall
have the meanings indicated unless the context indicates otherwise.
(1) "Health maintenance organization" means any organization
receiving a certificate of registration by the commissioner under this
chapter which provides comprehensive health care services to enrolled
participants of such organization on a group practice per capita
prepayment basis or on a prepaid individual practice plan, except for
an enrolled participant's responsibility for copayments and/or
deductibles, either directly or through contractual or other
arrangements with other institutions, entities, or persons, and which
qualifies as a health maintenance organization pursuant to RCW
48.46.030 and 48.46.040.
(2) "Comprehensive health care services" means basic consultative,
diagnostic, and therapeutic services rendered by licensed health
professionals together with emergency and preventive care, inpatient
hospital, outpatient and physician care, at a minimum, and any
additional health care services offered by the health maintenance
organization.
(3) "Enrolled participant" means a person who or group of persons
which has entered into a contractual arrangement or on whose behalf a
contractual arrangement has been entered into with a health maintenance
organization to receive health care services.
(4) "Health professionals" means health care practitioners who are
regulated by the state of Washington.
(5) "Health maintenance agreement" means an agreement for services
between a health maintenance organization which is registered pursuant
to the provisions of this chapter and enrolled participants of such
organization which provides enrolled participants with comprehensive
health services rendered to enrolled participants by health
professionals, groups, facilities, and other personnel associated with
the health maintenance organization.
(6) "Consumer" means any member, subscriber, enrollee, beneficiary,
or other person entitled to health care services under terms of a
health maintenance agreement, but not including health professionals,
employees of health maintenance organizations, partners, or
shareholders of stock corporations licensed as health maintenance
organizations.
(7) "Meaningful role in policy making" means a procedure approved
by the commissioner which provides consumers or elected representatives
of consumers a means of submitting the views and recommendations of
such consumers to the governing board of such organization coupled with
reasonable assurance that the board will give regard to such views and
recommendations.
(8) "Meaningful grievance procedure" means a procedure for
investigation of consumer grievances in a timely manner aimed at mutual
agreement for settlement according to procedures approved by the
commissioner, and which may include arbitration procedures.
(9) "Provider" means any health professional, hospital, or other
institution, organization, or person that furnishes any health care
services and is licensed or otherwise authorized to furnish such
services.
(10) "Department" means the state department of social and health
services.
(11) "Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner.
(12) "Group practice" means a partnership, association,
corporation, or other group of health professionals:
(a) The members of which may be individual health professionals,
clinics, or both individuals and clinics who engage in the coordinated
practice of their profession; and
(b) The members of which are compensated by a prearranged salary,
or by capitation payment or drawing account that is based on the number
of enrolled participants.
(13) "Individual practice health care plan" means an association of
health professionals in private practice who associate for the purpose
of providing prepaid comprehensive health care services on a fee-for-service or capitation basis.
(14) "Uncovered expenditures" means the costs to the health
maintenance organization of health care services that are the
obligation of the health maintenance organization for which an enrolled
participant would also be liable in the event of the health maintenance
organization's insolvency and for which no alternative arrangements
have been made as provided herein. The term does not include
expenditures for covered services when a provider has agreed not to
bill the enrolled participant even though the provider is not paid by
the health maintenance organization, or for services that are
guaranteed, insured, or assumed by a person or organization other than
the health maintenance organization.
(15) "Copayment" means an amount specified in a subscriber
agreement which is an obligation of an enrolled participant for a
specific service which is not fully prepaid.
(16) "Deductible" means the amount an enrolled participant is
responsible to pay out-of-pocket before the health maintenance
organization begins to pay the costs associated with treatment.
(17) "Fully subordinated debt" means those debts that meet the
requirements of RCW 48.46.235(3) and are recorded as equity.
(18) "Net worth" means the excess of total admitted assets as
defined in RCW 48.12.010 over total liabilities but the liabilities
shall not include fully subordinated debt.
(19) "Participating provider" means a provider as defined in
subsection (9) of this section who contracts with the health
maintenance organization or with its contractor or subcontractor and
has agreed to provide health care services to enrolled participants
with an expectation of receiving payment, other than copayment or
deductible, directly or indirectly, from the health maintenance
organization.
(20) "Carrier" means a health maintenance organization, an insurer,
a health care services contractor, or other entity responsible for the
payment of benefits or provision of services under a group or
individual agreement.
(21) "Replacement coverage" means the benefits provided by a
succeeding carrier.
(22) "Insolvent" or "insolvency" means that the organization has
been declared insolvent and is placed under an order of liquidation by
a court of competent jurisdiction.
(23) "Census date" means the date upon which a health maintenance
organization offering coverage to a small employer must base rate
calculations. For a small employer applying for a health benefit plan
through a health maintenance organization other than its current health
maintenance organization, the census date is the date that final group
composition is received by the health maintenance organization. For a
small employer that is renewing its health benefit plan through its
existing health maintenance organization, the census date is sixty days
prior to the effective date of the renewal.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.46.066 and 2009 c 131 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A health maintenance organization offering any health
benefit plan to a small employer, either directly or through an
association or member-governed group formed specifically for the
purpose of purchasing health care, may offer and actively market to the
small employer a health benefit plan featuring a limited schedule of
covered health care services. Nothing in this subsection shall
preclude a health maintenance organization from offering, or a small
employer from purchasing, other health benefit plans that may have more
comprehensive benefits than those included in the product offered under
this subsection. A health maintenance organization offering a health
benefit plan under this subsection shall clearly disclose all the
covered benefits to the small employer in a brochure filed with the
commissioner.
(b) A health benefit plan offered under this subsection shall
provide coverage for hospital expenses and services rendered by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not subject
to the requirements of RCW 48.46.275, 48.46.280, 48.46.285, 48.46.350,
48.46.355, 48.46.375, 48.46.440, 48.46.480, 48.46.510, 48.46.520, and
48.46.530.
(2) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a health maintenance
organization from offering, or a purchaser from seeking, health benefit
plans with benefits in excess of the health benefit plan offered under
subsection (1) of this section. All forms, policies, and contracts
shall be submitted for approval to the commissioner, and the rates of
any plan offered under this section shall be reasonable in relation to
the benefits thereto.
(3) Premium rates for health benefit plans for small employers as
defined in this section shall be subject to the following provisions:
(a) The health maintenance organization shall develop its rates
based on an adjusted community rate and may only vary the adjusted
community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age; and
(iv) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Employees under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The health maintenance organization shall be permitted to
develop separate rates for individuals age sixty-five or older for
coverage for which medicare is the primary payer and coverage for which
medicare is not the primary payer. Both rates shall be subject to the
requirements of this subsection (3).
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs. Up to a twenty percent variance may be
allowed for small employers that develop and implement a wellness
program or activities that directly improve employee wellness.
Employers shall document program activities with the carrier and may,
after three years of implementation, request a reduction in premiums
based on improved employee health and wellness. While carriers may
review the employer's claim history when making a determination
regarding whether the employer's wellness program has improved employee
health, the carrier may not use maternity or prevention services claims
to deny the employer's request. Carriers may consider issues such as
improved productivity or a reduction in absenteeism due to illness if
submitted by the employer for consideration. Interested employers may
also work with the carrier to develop a wellness program and a means to
track improved employee health.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;
(ii) Changes to the family composition of the employee;
(iii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small
employer; or
(iv) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) On the census date, as defined in RCW 48.46.020, rating factors
shall produce premiums for identical groups that differ only by the
amounts attributable to plan design, and differences in census date
between new and renewal groups, with the exception of discounts for
health improvement programs.
(h) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. A carrier
may develop its rates based on claims costs due to network provider
reimbursement schedules or type of network. This subsection does not
restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as provided in RCW
48.43.015.
(i) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall
pool the medical experience of all groups purchasing coverage,
including the small group participants in the health insurance
partnership established in RCW 70.47A.030. However, annual rate
adjustments for each small group health benefit plan may vary by up to
plus or minus four percentage points from the overall adjustment of a
carrier's entire small group pool, such overall adjustment to be
approved by the commissioner, upon a showing by the carrier, certified
by a member of the American academy of actuaries that: (i) The
variation is a result of deductible leverage, benefit design, or
provider network characteristics; and (ii) for a rate renewal period,
the projected weighted average of all small group benefit plans will
have a revenue neutral effect on the carrier's small group pool.
Variations of greater than four percentage points are subject to review
by the commissioner, and must be approved or denied within sixty days
of submittal. A variation that is not denied within sixty days shall
be deemed approved. The commissioner must provide to the carrier a
detailed actuarial justification for any denial within thirty days of
the denial.
(j) For health benefit plans purchased through the health insurance
partnership established in chapter 70.47A RCW:
(i) Any surcharge established pursuant to RCW 70.47A.030(2)(e)
shall be applied only to health benefit plans purchased through the
health insurance partnership; and
(ii) Risk adjustment or reinsurance mechanisms may be used by the
health insurance partnership program to redistribute funds to carriers
participating in the health insurance partnership based on differences
in risk attributable to individual choice of health plans or other
factors unique to health insurance partnership participation. Use of
such mechanisms shall be limited to the partnership program and will
not affect small group health plans offered outside the partnership.
(k) If the rate developed under this section varies the adjusted
community rate for the factors listed in (a) of this subsection, the
date for determining those factors must be no more than sixty days
prior to the effective date of the health benefit plan.
(4) Nothing in this section shall restrict the right of employees
to collectively bargain for insurance providing benefits in excess of
those provided herein.
(5)(a) Except as provided in this subsection and subsection (3)(g)
of this section, requirements used by a health maintenance organization
in determining whether to provide coverage to a small employer shall be
applied uniformly among all small employers applying for coverage or
receiving coverage from the carrier.
(b) A health maintenance organization shall not require a minimum
participation level greater than:
(i) One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups
with three or less employees; and
(ii) Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups
with more than three employees.
(c) In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to
a small employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or
dependents who have similar existing coverage in determining whether
the applicable percentage of participation is met.
(d) A health maintenance organization may not increase any
requirement for minimum employee participation or modify any
requirement for minimum employer contribution applicable to a small
employer at any time after the small employer has been accepted for
coverage.
(e) Minimum participation requirements and employer premium
contribution requirements adopted by the health insurance partnership
board under RCW 70.47A.110 shall apply only to the employers and
employees who purchase health benefit plans through the health
insurance partnership.
(6) A health maintenance organization must offer coverage to all
eligible employees of a small employer and their dependents. A health
maintenance organization may not offer coverage to only certain
individuals or dependents in a small employer group or to only part of
the group. A health maintenance organization may not modify a health
plan with respect to a small employer or any eligible employee or
dependent, through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict or
exclude coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions,
or services otherwise covered by the plan.

Sec. 5 RCW 48.21.045 and 2009 c 131 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) An insurer offering any health benefit plan to a small
employer, either directly or through an association or member-governed
group formed specifically for the purpose of purchasing health care,
may offer and actively market to the small employer a health benefit
plan featuring a limited schedule of covered health care services.
Nothing in this subsection shall preclude an insurer from offering, or
a small employer from purchasing, other health benefit plans that may
have more comprehensive benefits than those included in the product
offered under this subsection. An insurer offering a health benefit
plan under this subsection shall clearly disclose all covered benefits
to the small employer in a brochure filed with the commissioner.
(b) A health benefit plan offered under this subsection shall
provide coverage for hospital expenses and services rendered by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not subject
to the requirements of RCW 48.21.130, 48.21.140, 48.21.141, 48.21.142,
48.21.144, 48.21.146, 48.21.160 through 48.21.197, 48.21.200,
48.21.220, 48.21.225, 48.21.230, 48.21.235, 48.21.244, 48.21.250,
48.21.300, 48.21.310, or 48.21.320.
(2) Nothing in this section shall prohibit an insurer from
offering, or a purchaser from seeking, health benefit plans with
benefits in excess of the health benefit plan offered under subsection
(1) of this section. All forms, policies, and contracts shall be
submitted for approval to the commissioner, and the rates of any plan
offered under this section shall be reasonable in relation to the
benefits thereto.
(3) Premium rates for health benefit plans for small employers as
defined in this section shall be subject to the following provisions:
(a) The insurer shall develop its rates based on an adjusted
community rate and may only vary the adjusted community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age; and
(iv) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Employees under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The insurer shall be permitted to develop separate rates for
individuals age sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is
the primary payer and coverage for which medicare is not the primary
payer. Both rates shall be subject to the requirements of this
subsection (3).
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs. Up to a twenty percent variance may be
allowed for small employers that develop and implement a wellness
program or activities that directly improve employee wellness.
Employers shall document program activities with the carrier and may,
after three years of implementation, request a reduction in premiums
based on improved employee health and wellness. While carriers may
review the employer's claim history when making a determination
regarding whether the employer's wellness program has improved employee
health, the carrier may not use maternity or prevention services claims
to deny the employer's request. Carriers may consider issues such as
improved productivity or a reduction in absenteeism due to illness if
submitted by the employer for consideration. Interested employers may
also work with the carrier to develop a wellness program and a means to
track improved employee health.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;
(ii) Changes to the family composition of the employee;
(iii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small
employer; or
(iv) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) On the census date, as defined in RCW 48.21.047, rating factors
shall produce premiums for identical groups that differ only by the
amounts attributable to plan design, and differences in census date
between new and renewal groups, with the exception of discounts for
health improvement programs.
(h) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. A carrier
may develop its rates based on claims costs due to network provider
reimbursement schedules or type of network. This subsection does not
restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as provided in RCW
48.43.015.
(i) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall
pool the medical experience of all small groups purchasing coverage,
including the small group participants in the health insurance
partnership established in RCW 70.47A.030. However, annual rate
adjustments for each small group health benefit plan may vary by up to
plus or minus four percentage points from the overall adjustment of a
carrier's entire small group pool, such overall adjustment to be
approved by the commissioner, upon a showing by the carrier, certified
by a member of the American academy of actuaries that: (i) The
variation is a result of deductible leverage, benefit design, or
provider network characteristics; and (ii) for a rate renewal period,
the projected weighted average of all small group benefit plans will
have a revenue neutral effect on the carrier's small group pool.
Variations of greater than four percentage points are subject to review
by the commissioner, and must be approved or denied within sixty days
of submittal. A variation that is not denied within sixty days shall
be deemed approved. The commissioner must provide to the carrier a
detailed actuarial justification for any denial within thirty days of
the denial.
(j) For health benefit plans purchased through the health insurance
partnership established in chapter 70.47A RCW:
(i) Any surcharge established pursuant to RCW 70.47A.030(2)(e)
shall be applied only to health benefit plans purchased through the
health insurance partnership; and
(ii) Risk adjustment or reinsurance mechanisms may be used by the
health insurance partnership program to redistribute funds to carriers
participating in the health insurance partnership based on differences
in risk attributable to individual choice of health plans or other
factors unique to health insurance partnership participation. Use of
such mechanisms shall be limited to the partnership program and will
not affect small group health plans offered outside the partnership.
(k) If the rate developed under this section varies the adjusted
community rate for the factors listed in (a) of this subsection, the
date for determining those factors must be no more than sixty days
prior to the effective date of the health benefit plan.
(4) Nothing in this section shall restrict the right of employees
to collectively bargain for insurance providing benefits in excess of
those provided herein.
(5)(a) Except as provided in this subsection and subsection (3)(g)
of this subsection, requirements used by an insurer in determining
whether to provide coverage to a small employer shall be applied
uniformly among all small employers applying for coverage or receiving
coverage from the carrier.
(b) An insurer shall not require a minimum participation level
greater than:
(i) One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups
with three or less employees; and
(ii) Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups
with more than three employees.
(c) In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to
a small employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or
dependents who have similar existing coverage in determining whether
the applicable percentage of participation is met.
(d) An insurer may not increase any requirement for minimum
employee participation or modify any requirement for minimum employer
contribution applicable to a small employer at any time after the small
employer has been accepted for coverage.
(e) Minimum participation requirements and employer premium
contribution requirements adopted by the health insurance partnership
board under RCW 70.47A.110 shall apply only to the employers and
employees who purchase health benefit plans through the health
insurance partnership.
(6) An insurer must offer coverage to all eligible employees of a
small employer and their dependents. An insurer may not offer coverage
to only certain individuals or dependents in a small employer group or
to only part of the group. An insurer may not modify a health plan
with respect to a small employer or any eligible employee or dependent,
through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict or exclude
coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions, or
services otherwise covered by the plan.
(7) As used in this section, "health benefit plan," "small
employer," "adjusted community rate," and "wellness activities" mean
the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec. 6 RCW 48.21.047 and 2005 c 223 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An insurer may not offer any health benefit plan to any small
employer without complying with RCW 48.21.045(3).
(2) Employers purchasing health plans provided through associations
or through member-governed groups formed specifically for the purpose
of purchasing health care are not small employers and the plans are not
subject to RCW 48.21.045(3).
(3) For purposes of this section, "health benefit plan," "health
plan," and "small employer" mean the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.
(4) For purposes of this section, "census date" has the same
meaning as defined in RCW 48.44.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act applies to policies issued on or
after January 1, 2011.

--- END ---