BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Every state agency shall implement processes to send all
renewal notices to customers via electronic means by July 1, 2012.
(2) Every state agency shall allow customers to opt for a physical
notice in lieu of, or in addition to, an electronic renewal notice.
Every state agency shall charge customers opting for the physical
notice a fee to cover the costs of providing the physical notice, if
the state agency finds it is economically feasible to do so.
(3) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Renewal notices" includes, but is not limited to, notices for
the renewal of licenses, registrations, and permits; and
(b) "State agency" includes every state office, department,
division, bureau, board, and commission of the state.

--- END ---