BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that a number of
counties have moved to designate certain countywide elective offices as
nonpartisan. Because the creation of these nonpartisan offices is a
relatively new occurrence, there is not a mechanism in the state
Constitution or statutory laws to fill vacancies in these offices. The
legislature also finds that many local governments have not created a
mechanism for expediently filling the vacancies. The legislature
further finds the following: Political representation is an important
and fundamental aspect of elective government; vacancies in elective
office effectively disenfranchise portions of the state's citizenry;
vacancies in elective office can hamper or completely stall the
efficient administration of all aspects of governance, including the
appointment of inferior office holders responsible for the
administration of health, public safety, and a myriad of social
services; and that all of these governing functions represent public
policy considerations of broad concern. Therefore, it is the
responsibility and intent of the legislature to provide a mechanism for
filling vacancies in these offices that is in keeping with the state
Constitution and current statute.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.16.110 and 2003 c 238 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The county legislative authority in each county shall, at its
next regular or special meeting after being appraised of any vacancy in
any county, township, precinct, or road district office of the county,
fill the vacancy by the appointment of some person qualified to hold
such office, and the officers thus appointed shall hold office until
the next general election, and until their successors are elected and
qualified.
(2) If a vacancy occurs in a partisan county office after the
general election in a year that the position appears on the ballot and
before the start of the next term, the term of the successor who is of
the same party as the incumbent may commence once he or she has
qualified as defined in RCW ((29.01.135)) 29A.04.133 and shall continue
through the term for which he or she was elected.
(3) If a vacancy occurs in a nonpartisan county board of
commissioners elective office or nonpartisan county council elective
office, the person appointed to fill the vacancy must be from the same
legislative district, county, or county commissioner or council
district as the county elective officer whose office was vacated, and
must be one of three persons who must be nominated by the nonpartisan
executive or nonpartisan chair of the board of commissioners for the
county. In case a majority of the members of the county legislative
authority do not agree upon the appointment within thirty days after
the vacancy occurs, the governor shall within fifteen days thereafter,
and from the list of nominees provided for in this section, appoint
someone to fill the vacancy.
(4) If a vacancy occurs in a nonpartisan county board of
commissioners elective office or nonpartisan county council elective
office after the general election in a year that the position appears
on the ballot and before the start of the next term, the term of the
successor may commence once he or she has qualified as defined in RCW
29A.04.133 and shall continue through the term for which he or she was
elected.

--- END ---