BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.4494 and 2009 c 469 s 401 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, harvesters are
allowed a credit against the amount of tax otherwise due under this
chapter, as provided in this section. The credit per harvested green
ton of forest derived biomass sold, transferred, or used for production
of electricity, steam, heat, or biofuel is as follows:
(a) For forest derived biomass harvested October 1, 2009, through
June 30, 2010, zero dollars;
(b) For forest derived biomass harvested July 1, 2010, through June
30, 2013, ((three)) five dollars;
(c) For forest derived biomass harvested July 1, 2013, through June
30, ((2015)) 2020, ((five)) ten dollars.
(2) Credit may not be claimed for forest derived biomass sold,
transferred, or used before July 1, 2009. The amount of credit allowed
for a reporting period may not exceed the tax otherwise due under this
chapter for that reporting period. Any unused excess credit in a
reporting period may be carried forward to future reporting periods for
a maximum of two years.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "harvested" and "harvesters"
are defined in RCW 84.33.035, and "biofuel" is defined in RCW
43.325.010.
(4) This section expires June 30, ((2015)) 2020.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.957 and 2009 c 469 s 402 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
forest derived biomass used to produce electricity, steam, heat, or
biofuel. This exemption is available only if the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(2) For purposes of this section, "biofuel" is defined in RCW
43.325.010.
(3) This section expires June 30, ((2013)) 2020.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.12.957 and 2009 c 469 s 403 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of forest derived biomass for production of electricity, steam,
heat, or biofuel.
(2) For purposes of this section, "biofuel" is defined in RCW
43.325.010.
(3) This section expires June 30, ((2013)) 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
machinery and equipment used exclusively to recover forest derived
biomass for the production of electricity, steam, heat, or biofuel.
(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Biofuel" is defined in RCW 43.325.010.
(b) "Machinery and equipment" means machines, equipment, and
devices, including repair parts and replacement parts, that are
integral and necessary for the recovery of forest derived biomass used
to produce electricity, steam, heat, or biofuel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of machinery and equipment used exclusively to recover forest
derived biomass for the production of electricity, steam, heat, or
biofuel.
(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the definitions in section 4
of this act apply.

--- END ---