BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.140.010 and 2009 c 281 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any county legislative authority of a county where a public
utility district owns and operates a plant or system for the
generation, transmission, and distribution of electric energy for sale
within the county may construct, purchase, acquire, operate, and
maintain a facility within the county to generate electricity from
biomass energy that is a renewable resource under RCW 19.285.030 or
from biomass energy that is produced from lignin in spent pulping
liquors or liquors derived from algae and other sources. The county
legislative authority has the authority to regulate and control the
use, distribution, sale, and price of the electricity produced from the
biomass facility authorized under this section.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "County legislative authority" means the board of county
commissioners or the county council; and
(b) "Public utility district" means a municipal corporation formed
under chapter 54.08 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 54.44.020 and 2008 c 198 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
cities of the first class, public utility districts organized under
chapter 54.08 RCW, and joint operating agencies organized under chapter
43.52 RCW, any such cities and public utility districts which operate
electric generating facilities or distribution systems and any joint
operating agency shall have power and authority to participate and
enter into agreements with each other and with electrical companies
which are subject to the jurisdiction of the Washington utilities and
transportation commission or the public utility commissioner of Oregon,
hereinafter called "regulated utilities", and with rural electric
cooperatives, including generation and transmission cooperatives for
the undivided ownership of any type of electric generating plants and
facilities, including, but not limited to, nuclear and other thermal
power generating plants and facilities and transmission facilities
including, but not limited to, related transmission facilities,
hereinafter called "common facilities", and for the planning,
financing, acquisition, construction, operation and maintenance
thereof. It shall be provided in such agreements that each city,
public utility district, or joint operating agency shall own a
percentage of any common facility equal to the percentage of the money
furnished or the value of property supplied by it for the acquisition
and construction thereof and shall own and control a like percentage of
the electrical output thereof.
(2) Cities of the first class, public utility districts organized
under chapter 54.08 RCW, and joint operating agencies organized under
chapter 43.52 RCW, shall have the power and authority to participate
and enter into agreements for the undivided ownership of a coal-fired
thermal electric generating plant and facility placed in operation
before July 1, 1975, including related common facilities, and for the
planning, financing, acquisition, construction, operation, and
maintenance of the plant and facility. It shall be provided in such
agreements that each city, public utility district, or joint operating
agency shall own a percentage of any common facility equal to the
percentage of the money furnished or the value of property supplied by
the city, district, or agency, for the acquisition and construction of
the facility, and shall own and control a like percentage of the
electrical output thereof. Cities of the first class, public utility
districts, and joint operating agencies may enter into agreements under
this subsection with each other, with regulated utilities, with rural
electric cooperatives, with electric companies subject to the
jurisdiction of the regulatory commission of any other state, and with
any power marketer subject to the jurisdiction of the federal energy
regulatory commission.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this
section, cities of the first class, counties with biomass facilities
authorized under RCW 36.140.010, public utility districts organized
under chapter 54.08 RCW, any cities that operate electric generating
facilities or distribution systems, any joint operating agency
organized under chapter 43.52 RCW, or any separate legal entity
comprising two or more thereof organized under chapter 39.34 RCW shall,
either directly or as co-owners of a separate legal entity, have power
and authority to participate and enter into agreements described in (b)
and (c) of this subsection with each other, and with any of the
following, either directly or as co-owners of a separate legal entity:
(i) Any public agency, as that term is defined in RCW 39.34.020;
(ii) Electrical companies that are subject to the jurisdiction of
the Washington utilities and transportation commission or the
regulatory commission of any state; and
(iii) Rural electric cooperatives and generation and transmission
cooperatives or any wholly owned subsidiaries of either rural electric
cooperatives or generation and transmission cooperatives.
(b) Except as provided in (b)(i)(B) of this subsection (3),
agreements may provide for:
(i)(A) The undivided ownership, or indirect ownership in the case
of a separate legal entity, of common facilities that include any type
of electric generating plant ((powered by)) generating an eligible
renewable resource, as defined in RCW 19.285.030, and transmission
facilities including, but not limited to, related transmission
facilities, and for the planning, financing, acquisition, construction,
operation, and maintenance thereof;
(B) For counties with biomass facilities authorized under RCW
36.140.010, the provisions in (b)(i)(A) of this subsection (3) are
limited to the purposes of RCW 36.140.010; and
(ii) The formation, operation, and ownership of a separate legal
entity that may own the common facilities.
(c) Agreements must provide that each city, county, public utility
district, or joint operating agency:
(i) Owns a percentage of any common facility or a percentage of any
separate legal entity equal to the percentage of the money furnished or
the value of property supplied by it for the acquisition and
construction thereof; and
(ii) Owns and controls, or has a right to own and control in the
case of a separate legal entity, a like percentage of the electrical
output thereof.
(d) Any entity in which a public utility district participates,
either directly or as co-owner of a separate legal entity, in
constructing or developing a common facility pursuant to this
subsection shall comply with the provisions of chapter 39.12 RCW.
(4) Each participant shall defray its own interest and other
payments required to be made or deposited in connection with any
financing undertaken by it to pay its percentage of the money furnished
or value of property supplied by it for the planning, acquisition and
construction of any common facility, or any additions or betterments
thereto. The agreement shall provide a uniform method of determining
and allocating operation and maintenance expenses of the common
facility.
(5) Each city, county acting under RCW 36.140.010, public utility
district, joint operating agency, regulated utility, and cooperatives
participating in the direct or indirect ownership or operation of a
common facility described in subsections (1) through (3) of this
section shall pay all taxes chargeable to its share of the common
facility and the electric energy generated thereby under applicable
statutes as now or hereafter in effect, and may make payments during
preliminary work and construction for any increased financial burden
suffered by any county or other existing taxing district in the county
in which the common facility is located, pursuant to agreement with
such county or taxing district.

--- END ---