BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.010 and 2007 c 242 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for a person to operate any vehicle over and
along a public highway of this state without first having obtained and
having in full force and effect a current and proper vehicle license
and display vehicle license number plates ((therefor)) as provided by
this chapter ((provided)).
(2) Failure to make initial registration before operation on the
highways of this state is a traffic infraction, and any person
committing this infraction ((shall)) must pay a ((penalty)) fine of
five hundred twenty-nine dollars, subject to applicable assessments, no
part of which may be suspended or deferred. This fine is in addition
to any delinquent taxes and fees that must be deposited and distributed
in the same manner as if the taxes and fees were properly paid in a
timely fashion. The five hundred twenty-nine dollar fine must be
deposited into the vehicle licensing fraud account created in the state
treasury in RCW 46.68.250.
(3) Failure to renew an expired registration before operation on
the highways of this state is a traffic infraction.
(4) The licensing of a vehicle in another state by a resident of
this state, as defined in RCW 46.16.028, evading the payment of any tax
or license fee imposed in connection with registration, is a gross
misdemeanor punishable, in lieu of the fine in subsection (2) of this
section, as follows:
(a) For a first offense((,)):
(i) Up to one year in the county jail ((and));
(ii) Payment of a fine of five hundred twenty-nine dollars ((plus
twice the amount of delinquent taxes and fees)) plus any applicable
assessments, no part of which may be suspended or deferred. The fine
of five hundred twenty-nine dollars must be deposited into the vehicle
licensing fraud account created in the state treasury in RCW 46.68.250;
(iii) A fine of one thousand dollars to be deposited into the
vehicle licensing fraud account created in the state treasury in RCW
46.68.250, no part of which may be suspended or deferred; and
(iv) The delinquent taxes and fees, which must be deposited and
distributed in the same manner as if the taxes and fees were properly
paid in a timely fashion, no part of which may be suspended or
deferred;
(b) For a second or subsequent offense((,)):
(i) Up to one year in the county jail ((and));
(ii) Payment of a fine of five hundred twenty-nine dollars ((plus
four times the amount of delinquent taxes and fees)) plus any
applicable assessments, no part of which may be suspended or deferred.
The fine of five hundred twenty-nine dollars must be deposited into the
vehicle licensing fraud account created in the state treasury in RCW
46.68.250;
(iii) A fine of five thousand dollars to be deposited into the
vehicle licensing fraud account created in the state treasury in RCW
46.68.250, no part of which may be suspended or deferred;
(((c) For fines levied under (b) of this subsection, an amount
equal to the avoided taxes and fees owed will be deposited in the
vehicle licensing fraud account created in the state treasury;
(d) The avoided taxes and fees shall be deposited and distributed
in the same manner as if the taxes and fees were properly paid in a
timely fashion)) and
(iv) The amount of delinquent taxes and fees, which must be
deposited and distributed in the same manner as if the taxes and fees
were properly paid in a timely fashion, no part of which may be
suspended or deferred.
(5) These provisions ((shall)) do not apply to the following
vehicles:
(a) Motorized foot scooters;
(b) Electric-assisted bicycles;
(c) Off-road vehicles operating on nonhighway roads under RCW
46.09.115;
(d) Farm vehicles if operated within a radius of fifteen miles of
the farm where principally used or garaged, farm tractors and farm
implements including trailers designed as cook or bunk houses used
exclusively for animal herding temporarily operating or drawn upon the
public highways, and trailers used exclusively to transport farm
implements from one farm to another during the daylight hours or at
night when such equipment has lights that comply with the law;
(e) Spray or fertilizer applicator rigs designed and used
exclusively for spraying or fertilization in the conduct of
agricultural operations and not primarily for the purpose of
transportation, and nurse rigs or equipment auxiliary to the use of and
designed or modified for the fueling, repairing, or loading of spray
and fertilizer applicator rigs and not used, designed, or modified
primarily for the purpose of transportation;
(f) Fork lifts operated during daylight hours on public highways
adjacent to and within five hundred feet of the warehouses which they
serve((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). However, these provisions
((shall)) do not apply to vehicles used by the state parks and
recreation commission exclusively for park maintenance and operations
upon public highways within state parks;
(g) "Trams" used for transporting persons to and from facilities
related to the horse racing industry as regulated in chapter 67.16 RCW,
as long as the public right-of-way routes over which the trams operate
are not more than one mile from end to end, the public rights-of-way
over which the tram operates have an average daily traffic of not more
than 15,000 vehicles per day, and the activity is in conformity with
federal law. The operator must be a licensed driver and at least
eighteen years old. For the purposes of this section, "tram" also
means a vehicle, or combination of vehicles linked together with a
single mode of propulsion, used to transport persons from one location
to another;
(h)(i) "Special highway construction equipment" defined as follows:
Any vehicle which is designed and used primarily for grading of
highways, paving of highways, earth moving, and other construction work
on highways and which is not designed or used primarily for the
transportation of persons or property on a public highway and which is
only incidentally operated or moved over the highway. It includes, but
is not limited to, road construction and maintenance machinery so
designed and used such as portable air compressors, air drills, asphalt
spreaders, bituminous mixers, bucket loaders, track laying tractors,
ditchers, leveling graders, finishing machines, motor graders, paving
mixers, road rollers, scarifiers, earth moving scrapers and carryalls,
lighting plants, welders, pumps, power shovels and draglines, self-propelled and tractor-drawn earth moving equipment and machinery,
including dump trucks and tractor-dump trailer combinations which
((either (i))):
(A) Are in excess of the legal width((,)); or (((ii) which,))
(B) Because of their length, height, or unladen weight, may not be
moved on a public highway without the permit specified in RCW 46.44.090
and which are not operated laden except within the boundaries of the
project limits as defined by the contract, and other similar types of
construction equipment((,)); or (((iii) which))
(C) Are driven or moved upon a public highway only for the purpose
of crossing such highway from one property to another, provided such
movement does not exceed five hundred feet and the vehicle is equipped
with wheels or pads which will not damage the roadway surface.
((Exclusions:))
(ii) "Special highway construction equipment" does not include
((any of the following:)) dump trucks originally designed to comply
with the legal size and weight provisions of this code notwithstanding
any subsequent modification which would require a permit, as specified
in RCW 46.44.090, to operate such vehicles on a public highway,
including trailers, truck-mounted transit mixers, cranes and shovels,
or other vehicles designed for the transportation of persons or
property to which machinery has been attached.
(6) The following vehicles, whether operated solo or in
combination, are exempt from license registration and displaying
license plates as required by this chapter:
(a) A converter gear used to convert a semitrailer into a trailer
or a two-axle truck or tractor into a three or more axle truck or
tractor or used in any other manner to increase the number of axles of
a vehicle. Converter gear includes an auxiliary axle, booster axle,
dolly, and jeep axle.
(b) A tow dolly that is used for towing a motor vehicle behind
another motor vehicle. The front or rear wheels of the towed vehicle
are secured to and rest on the tow dolly that is attached to the towing
vehicle by a tow bar.
(c) An off-road vehicle operated on a street, road, or highway as
authorized under RCW 46.09.180.
(7)(a) A motor vehicle subject to initial or renewal registration
under this section shall not be registered to a natural person unless
the person at time of application:
(i) Presents an unexpired Washington state driver's license; or
(ii) Certifies that he or she is:
(A) A Washington resident who does not operate a motor vehicle on
public roads; or
(B) Exempt from the requirement to obtain a Washington state
driver's license under RCW 46.20.025.
(b) For shared or joint ownership, the department will set up
procedures to verify that all owners meet the requirements of this
subsection.
(c) A person falsifying residency is guilty of a gross misdemeanor
punishable only by a fine of five hundred twenty-nine dollars.
(d) The department may adopt rules necessary to implement this
subsection, including rules under which a natural person applying for
registration may be exempt from the requirements of this subsection
where the person provides evidence satisfactory to the department that
he or she has a valid and compelling reason for not being able to meet
the requirements of this subsection.
(8) A vehicle with an expired registration of more than forty-five
days parked on a public street may be impounded by a police officer
under RCW 46.55.113(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of seventy-five thousand dollars per
fiscal year is appropriated to the department of revenue or as much
thereof as may be necessary and the sum of two hundred fifty thousand
dollars is appropriated to the Washington state patrol per fiscal year,
or as much thereof as may be necessary, from the vehicle license fraud
account for the purposes of vehicle license fraud enforcement and
collections by the Washington state patrol and the department of
revenue.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---