BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 61.24.030 and 2009 c 292 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be requisite to a trustee's sale:
(1) That the deed of trust contains a power of sale;
(2) That the deed of trust contains a statement that the real
property conveyed is not used principally for agricultural purposes;
provided, if the statement is false on the date the deed of trust was
granted or amended to include that statement, and false on the date of
the trustee's sale, then the deed of trust must be foreclosed
judicially. Real property is used for agricultural purposes if it is
used in an operation that produces crops, livestock, or aquatic goods;
(3) That a default has occurred in the obligation secured or a
covenant of the grantor, which by the terms of the deed of trust makes
operative the power to sell;
(4) That no action commenced by the beneficiary of the deed of
trust is now pending to seek satisfaction of an obligation secured by
the deed of trust in any court by reason of the grantor's default on
the obligation secured: PROVIDED, That (a) the seeking of the
appointment of a receiver shall not constitute an action for purposes
of this chapter; and (b) if a receiver is appointed, the grantor shall
be entitled to any rents or profits derived from property subject to a
homestead as defined in RCW 6.13.010. If the deed of trust was granted
to secure a commercial loan, this subsection shall not apply to actions
brought to enforce any other lien or security interest granted to
secure the obligation secured by the deed of trust being foreclosed;
(5) That the deed of trust has been recorded in each county in
which the land or some part thereof is situated;
(6) That prior to the date of the notice of trustee's sale and
continuing thereafter through the date of the trustee's sale, the
trustee must maintain a street address in this state where personal
service of process may be made, and the trustee must maintain a
physical presence and have telephone service at such address;
(7)(a) That, for residential real property, before the notice of
trustee's sale is recorded, transmitted, or served, the trustee shall
have proof that the beneficiary is the owner of any promissory note or
other obligation secured by the deed of trust. A declaration by the
beneficiary made under the penalty of perjury stating that the
beneficiary is the actual holder of the promissory note or other
obligation secured by the deed of trust shall be sufficient proof as
required under this subsection.
(b) Unless the trustee has violated his or her duty under RCW
61.24.010(4), the trustee is entitled to rely on the beneficiary's
declaration as evidence of proof required under this subsection.
(c) This subsection (7) does not apply to association beneficiaries
subject to chapter 64.32, 64.34, or 64.38 RCW; ((and))
(8) That at least thirty days before notice of sale shall be
recorded, transmitted or served, written notice of default shall be
transmitted by the beneficiary or trustee to the borrower and grantor
at their last known addresses by both first-class and either registered
or certified mail, return receipt requested, and the beneficiary or
trustee shall cause to be posted in a conspicuous place on the
premises, a copy of the notice, or personally served on the borrower
and grantor. This notice shall contain the following information:
(a) A description of the property which is then subject to the deed
of trust;
(b) A statement identifying each county in which the deed of trust
is recorded and the document number given to the deed of trust upon
recording by each county auditor or recording officer;
(c) A statement that the beneficiary has declared the borrower or
grantor to be in default, and a concise statement of the default
alleged;
(d) An itemized account of the amount or amounts in arrears if the
default alleged is failure to make payments;
(e) An itemized account of all other specific charges, costs, or
fees that the borrower, grantor, or any guarantor is or may be obliged
to pay to reinstate the deed of trust before the recording of the
notice of sale;
(f) A statement showing the total of (d) and (e) of this
subsection, designated clearly and conspicuously as the amount
necessary to reinstate the note and deed of trust before the recording
of the notice of sale;
(g) A statement that failure to cure the alleged default within
thirty days of the date of mailing of the notice, or if personally
served, within thirty days of the date of personal service thereof, may
lead to recordation, transmittal, and publication of a notice of sale,
and that the property described in (a) of this subsection may be sold
at public auction at a date no less than one hundred twenty days in the
future;
(h) A statement that the effect of the recordation, transmittal,
and publication of a notice of sale will be to (i) increase the costs
and fees and (ii) publicize the default and advertise the grantor's
property for sale;
(i) A statement that the effect of the sale of the grantor's
property by the trustee will be to deprive the grantor of all their
interest in the property described in (a) of this subsection;
(j) A statement that the borrower, grantor, and any guarantor has
recourse to the courts pursuant to RCW 61.24.130 to contest the alleged
default on any proper ground;
(k) The following statement: You have the right to a postponement
of a foreclosure sale if you are receiving unemployment compensation.
If you are receiving unemployment payments from the state of Washington
under chapter 50.12 RCW, you should notify the beneficiary or its
authorized agent in writing of the date you filed for unemployment
benefits;
(l) In the event the property secured by the deed of trust is
owner-occupied residential real property, a statement, prominently set
out at the beginning of the notice, which shall state as follows:
"You should take care to protect your interest in your home. This
notice of default (your failure to pay) is the first step in a process
that could result in you losing your home. You should carefully review
your options. For example:
Can you pay and stop the foreclosure process?
Do you dispute the failure to pay?
Can you sell your property to preserve your equity?
Are you able to refinance this loan or obligation with a new loan
or obligation from another lender with payments, terms, and fees that
are more affordable?
Do you qualify for any government or private homeowner assistance
programs?
Do you know if filing for bankruptcy is an option? What are the
pros and cons of doing so?
Do not ignore this notice; because if you do nothing, you could
lose your home at a foreclosure sale. (No foreclosure sale can be held
any sooner than ninety days after a notice of sale is issued and a
notice of sale cannot be issued until thirty days after this notice.)
Also, if you do nothing to pay what you owe, be careful of people who
claim they can help you. There are many individuals and businesses
that watch for the notices of sale in order to unfairly profit as a
result of borrowers' distress.
You may feel you need help understanding what to do. There are a
number of professional resources available, including home loan
counselors and attorneys, who may assist you. Many legal services are
lower-cost or even free, depending on your ability to pay. If you
desire legal help in understanding your options or handling this
default, you may obtain a referral (at no charge) by contacting the
county bar association in the county where your home is located. These
legal referral services also provide information about lower-cost or
free legal services for those who qualify. You may contact the
Department of Financial Institutions or the statewide civil legal aid
hotline for possible assistance or referrals; and
(((l))) (m) In the event the property secured by the deed of trust
is residential real property, the name and address of the owner of any
promissory notes or other obligations secured by the deed of trust and
the name, address, and telephone number of a party acting as a servicer
of the obligations secured by the deed of trust((.))"; and
(9) That when the security for the deed of trust is owner-occupied
property and the beneficiary or its authorized agent has received a
notice from the borrower under subsection (8)(k) of this section that
the borrower is receiving unemployment compensation, the beneficiary or
its authorized agent must inform the trustee and the trustee cannot
proceed with a nonjudicial or judicial foreclosure sale under this
chapter until one year from the date that the borrower commenced
receiving unemployment compensation. A sale made in violation of this
subsection is void.

Sec. 2 RCW 61.24.031 and 2009 c 292 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A trustee, beneficiary, or authorized agent may not issue a
notice of default under RCW 61.24.030(8) until thirty days after
initial contact with the borrower is made as required under (b) of this
subsection or thirty days after satisfying the due diligence
requirements as described in subsection (5) of this section.
(b) A beneficiary or authorized agent shall contact the borrower by
letter and by telephone in order to assess the borrower's financial
ability to pay the debt secured by the deed of trust and explore
options for the borrower to avoid foreclosure. The letter required
under this subsection must be mailed in accordance with subsection
(5)(a) of this section and must include the information described in
subsection (5)(a) and (e)(i) through (iv) of this section.
(c) During the initial contact, the beneficiary or authorized agent
shall advise the borrower that he or she has the right to request a
subsequent meeting and, if requested, the beneficiary or authorized
agent shall schedule the meeting to occur within fourteen days of the
request. The assessment of the borrower's financial ability to repay
the debt and a discussion of options may occur during the initial
contact or at a subsequent meeting scheduled for that purpose. At the
initial contact, the borrower must be provided the toll-free telephone
number made available by the department to find a department-certified
housing counseling agency and the toll-free numbers for the department
of financial institutions and the statewide civil legal aid hotline for
possible assistance and referrals.
(d) Any meeting under this section may occur telephonically.
(2) A notice of default issued under RCW 61.24.030(8) must include
a declaration, as provided in subsection (9) of this section, from the
beneficiary or authorized agent that it has contacted the borrower as
provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section, it has tried with due
diligence to contact the borrower under subsection (5) of this section,
or the borrower has surrendered the property to the trustee,
beneficiary, or authorized agent. Unless the trustee has violated his
or her duty under RCW 61.24.010(4), the trustee is entitled to rely on
the declaration as evidence that the requirements of this section have
been satisfied, and the trustee is not liable for the beneficiary's or
its authorized agent's failure to comply with the requirements of this
section.
(3) A beneficiary's or authorized agent's loss mitigation personnel
may participate by telephone during any contact required under this
section.
(4) Within fourteen days after the initial contact under subsection
(1) of this section, if a borrower has designated a department-certified housing counseling agency, attorney, or other advisor to
discuss with the beneficiary or authorized agent, on the borrower's
behalf, options for the borrower to avoid foreclosure, the borrower
shall inform the beneficiary or authorized agent and provide the
contact information. The beneficiary or authorized agent shall contact
the designated representative for the borrower for the discussion
within fourteen days after the representative is designated by the
borrower. Any deed of trust modification or workout plan offered at
the meeting with the borrower's designated representative by the
beneficiary or authorized agent is subject to approval by the borrower.
(5) A notice of default may be issued under RCW 61.24.030(8) if a
beneficiary or authorized agent has not contacted a borrower as
required under subsection (1)(b) of this section and the failure to
contact the borrower occurred despite the due diligence of the
beneficiary or authorized agent. Due diligence requires the following:
(a) A beneficiary or authorized agent shall first attempt to
contact a borrower by sending a first-class letter to the address in
the beneficiary's records for sending account statements to the
borrower and to the address of the property encumbered by the deed of
trust. The letter must include the toll-free telephone number made
available by the department to find a department-certified housing
counseling agency, and the following information:
"You may contact the Department of Financial Institutions, the
Washington State Bar Association, or the statewide civil legal aid
hotline for possible assistance or referrals."
(b)(i) After the letter has been sent, the beneficiary or
authorized agent shall attempt to contact the borrower by telephone at
least three times at different hours and on different days. Telephone
calls must be made to the primary and secondary telephone numbers on
file with the beneficiary or authorized agent.
(ii) A beneficiary or authorized agent may attempt to contact a
borrower using an automated system to dial borrowers if the telephone
call, when answered, is connected to a live representative of the
beneficiary or authorized agent.
(iii) A beneficiary or authorized agent satisfies the telephone
contact requirements of this subsection (5)(b) if the beneficiary or
authorized agent determines, after attempting contact under this
subsection (5)(b), that the borrower's primary telephone number and
secondary telephone number or numbers on file, if any, have been
disconnected or are not good contact numbers for the borrower.
(c) If the borrower does not respond within fourteen days after the
telephone call requirements of (b) of this subsection have been
satisfied, the beneficiary or authorized agent shall send a certified
letter, with return receipt requested, to the borrower at the address
in the beneficiary's records for sending account statements to the
borrower and to the address of the property encumbered by the deed of
trust. The letter must include the information described in (e)(i)
through (iv) of this subsection.
(d) The beneficiary or authorized agent shall provide a means for
the borrower to contact the beneficiary or authorized agent in a timely
manner, including a toll-free telephone number or charge-free
equivalent that will provide access to a live representative during
business hours.
(e) The beneficiary or authorized agent shall post a link on the
home page of the beneficiary's or authorized agent's internet web site,
if any, to the following information:
(i) Options that may be available to borrowers who are unable to
afford their mortgage payments and who wish to avoid foreclosure, and
instructions to borrowers advising them on steps to take to explore
those options;
(ii) A list of financial documents borrowers should collect and be
prepared to present to the beneficiary or authorized agent when
discussing options for avoiding foreclosure;
(iii) A toll-free telephone number or charge-free equivalent for
borrowers who wish to discuss options for avoiding foreclosure with
their beneficiary or authorized agent; and
(iv) The toll-free telephone number or charge-free equivalent made
available by the department to find a department-certified housing
counseling agency.
(6) Subsections (1) and (5) of this section do not apply if any of
the following occurs:
(a) The borrower has surrendered the property as evidenced by
either a letter confirming the surrender or delivery of the keys to the
property to the trustee, beneficiary, or authorized agent; or
(b) The borrower has filed for bankruptcy, and the bankruptcy stay
remains in place, or the borrower has filed for bankruptcy and the
bankruptcy court has granted relief from the bankruptcy stay allowing
enforcement of the deed of trust.
(7)(a) This section applies only to deeds of trust ((made from
January 1, 2003, to December 31, 2007, inclusive,)) that are recorded
against owner-occupied residential real property. This section does
not apply to deeds of trust: (i) Securing a commercial loan; (ii)
securing obligations of a grantor who is not the borrower or a
guarantor; or (iii) securing a purchaser's obligations under a seller-financed sale.
(b) This section does not apply to association beneficiaries
subject to chapter 64.32, 64.34, or 64.38 RCW.
(8) As used in this section:
(a) "Department" means the United States department of housing and
urban development.
(b) "Seller-financed sale" means a residential real property
transaction where the seller finances all or part of the purchase
price, and that financed amount is secured by a deed of trust against
the subject residential real property.
(9) The form of declaration to be provided by the beneficiary or
authorized agent as required under subsection (2) of this section must
be in substantially the following form:

"FORECLOSURE LOSS MITIGATION FORM

Please select applicable option(s) below.

The undersigned beneficiary or authorized agent for the beneficiary
hereby represents and declares under the penalty of perjury that [check
the applicable box and fill in any blanks so that the trustee can
insert, on the beneficiary's behalf, the applicable declaration in the
notice of default required under chapter 61.24 RCW]:
(1) [ ] The beneficiary or beneficiary's authorized agent has
contacted the borrower under, and has complied with, RCW 61.24.031
(contact provision to "assess the borrower's financial ability to pay
the debt secured by the deed of trust and explore options for the
borrower to avoid foreclosure").
(2) [ ] The beneficiary or beneficiary's authorized agent has
exercised due diligence to contact the borrower as required in RCW
61.24.031(5) and, after waiting fourteen days after the requirements in
RCW 61.24.031 were satisfied, the beneficiary or the beneficiary's
authorized agent sent to the borrower(s), by certified mail, return
receipt requested, the letter required under RCW 61.24.031.
(3) [ ] The borrower has surrendered the secured property as
evidenced by either a letter confirming the surrender or by delivery of
the keys to the secured property to the beneficiary, the beneficiary's
authorized agent or to the trustee.
(4) [ ] Under RCW 61.24.031, the beneficiary or the beneficiary's
authorized agent has verified information that, on or before the date
of this declaration, the borrower(s) has filed for bankruptcy, and the
bankruptcy stay remains in place, or the borrower has filed for
bankruptcy and the bankruptcy court has granted relief from the
bankruptcy stay allowing the enforcement of the deed of trust."

Sec. 3 RCW 61.24.040 and 2009 c 292 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
A deed of trust foreclosed under this chapter shall be foreclosed
as follows:
(1) At least ninety days before the sale, the trustee shall:
(a) Record a notice in the form described in (f) of this subsection
in the office of the auditor in each county in which the deed of trust
is recorded and pay a recording fee of twenty-five dollars which shall
be remitted to the department of financial institutions to be used
under RCW 43.320.150 for homeownership prepurchase outreach and
education and postpurchase counseling and support;
(b) To the extent the trustee elects to foreclose its lien or
interest, or the beneficiary elects to preserve its right to seek a
deficiency judgment against a borrower or grantor under RCW
61.24.100(3)(a), and if their addresses are stated in a recorded
instrument evidencing their interest, lien, or claim of lien, or an
amendment thereto, or are otherwise known to the trustee, cause a copy
of the notice of sale described in (f) of this subsection to be
transmitted by both first-class and either certified or registered
mail, return receipt requested, to the following persons or their legal
representatives, if any, at such address:
(i) The borrower and grantor;
(ii) The beneficiary of any deed of trust or mortgagee of any
mortgage, or any person who has a lien or claim of lien against the
property, that was recorded subsequent to the recordation of the deed
of trust being foreclosed and before the recordation of the notice of
sale;
(iii) The vendee in any real estate contract, the lessee in any
lease, or the holder of any conveyances of any interest or estate in
any portion or all of the property described in such notice, if that
contract, lease, or conveyance of such interest or estate, or a
memorandum or other notice thereof, was recorded after the recordation
of the deed of trust being foreclosed and before the recordation of the
notice of sale;
(iv) The last holder of record of any other lien against or
interest in the property that is subject to a subordination to the deed
of trust being foreclosed that was recorded before the recordation of
the notice of sale;
(v) The last holder of record of the lien of any judgment
subordinate to the deed of trust being foreclosed; and
(vi) The occupants of property consisting solely of a single-family
residence, or a condominium, cooperative, or other dwelling unit in a
multiplex or other building containing fewer than five residential
units, whether or not the occupant's rental agreement is recorded,
which notice may be a single notice addressed to "occupants" for each
unit known to the trustee or beneficiary;
(c) Cause a copy of the notice of sale described in (f) of this
subsection to be transmitted by both first-class and either certified
or registered mail, return receipt requested, to the plaintiff or the
plaintiff's attorney of record, in any court action to foreclose a lien
or other encumbrance on all or any part of the property, provided a
court action is pending and a lis pendens in connection therewith is
recorded in the office of the auditor of any county in which all or
part of the property is located on the date the notice is recorded;
(d) Cause a copy of the notice of sale described in (f) of this
subsection to be transmitted by both first-class and either certified
or registered mail, return receipt requested, to any person who has
recorded a request for notice in accordance with RCW 61.24.045, at the
address specified in such person's most recently recorded request for
notice;
(e) Cause a copy of the notice of sale described in (f) of this
subsection to be posted in a conspicuous place on the property, or in
lieu of posting, cause a copy of said notice to be served upon any
occupant of the property;
(f) The notice shall be in substantially the following form:

NOTICE OF TRUSTEE'S SALE

I.

NOTICE IS HEREBY GIVEN that the undersigned Trustee will on the . . . .
day of . . . . . ., . . ., at the hour of . . . . o'clock . . . . M. at
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . [street
address and location if inside a building] in the City of . . . . . .,
State of Washington, sell at public auction to the highest and best
bidder, payable at the time of sale, the following described real
property, situated in the County(ies) of . . . . . ., State of
Washington, to-wit:

[If any personal property is to be included in the trustee's
sale, include a description that reasonably identifies such
personal property]

which is subject to that certain Deed of Trust dated . . . . . .,
. . ., recorded . . . . . ., . . ., under Auditor's File No. . . . .,
records of . . . . . . County, Washington, from . . . . . . . . ., as
Grantor, to . . . . . . . . ., as Trustee, to secure an obligation in
favor of . . . . . . . . ., as Beneficiary, the beneficial interest in
which was assigned by . . . . . . . . ., under an Assignment recorded
under Auditor's File No. . . . . [Include recording information for
all counties if the Deed of Trust is recorded in more than one county.]

II.

No action commenced by the Beneficiary of the Deed of Trust is now
pending to seek satisfaction of the obligation in any Court by reason
of the Borrower's or Grantor's default on the obligation secured by the
Deed of Trust.

[If there is another action pending to foreclose other security
for all or part of the same debt, qualify the statement and
identify the action.]

III.

The default(s) for which this foreclosure is made is/are as follows:

[If default is for other than payment of money, set forth the
particulars]

Failure to pay when due the following amounts which are now in arrears:

IV.

The sum owing on the obligation secured by the Deed of Trust is:
Principal $ . . . . . ., together with interest as provided in the note
or other instrument secured from the . . . . day of . . . . . ., . . .,
and such other costs and fees as are due under the note or other
instrument secured, and as are provided by statute.

V.

The above-described real property will be sold to satisfy the expense
of sale and the obligation secured by the Deed of Trust as provided by
statute. The sale will be made without warranty, express or implied,
regarding title, possession, or encumbrances on the . . . . day of
. . . . . ., . . . The default(s) referred to in paragraph III must be
cured by the . . . . day of . . . . . ., . . . (11 days before the sale
date), to cause a discontinuance of the sale. The sale will be
discontinued and terminated if at any time on or before the . . . . day
of . . . . . ., . . ., (11 days before the sale date), the default(s)
as set forth in paragraph III is/are cured and the Trustee's fees and
costs are paid. The sale may be terminated any time after the . . . .
day of . . . . . ., . . . (11 days before the sale date), and before
the sale by the Borrower, Grantor, any Guarantor, or the holder of any
recorded junior lien or encumbrance paying the entire principal and
interest secured by the Deed of Trust, plus costs, fees, and advances,
if any, made pursuant to the terms of the obligation and/or Deed of
Trust, and curing all other defaults.

VI.

A written notice of default was transmitted by the Beneficiary or
Trustee to the Borrower and Grantor at the following addresses:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

by both first-class and certified mail on the . . . . day of
. . . . . ., . . ., proof of which is in the possession of the Trustee;
and the Borrower and Grantor were personally served on the . . . . day
of . . . . . ., . . ., with said written notice of default or the
written notice of default was posted in a conspicuous place on the real
property described in paragraph I above, and the Trustee has possession
of proof of such service or posting.

VII.

The Trustee whose name and address are set forth below will provide in
writing to anyone requesting it, a statement of all costs and fees due
at any time prior to the sale.

VIII.

The effect of the sale will be to deprive the Grantor and all those who
hold by, through or under the Grantor of all their interest in the
above-described property.

IX.

Anyone having any objection to the sale on any grounds whatsoever will
be afforded an opportunity to be heard as to those objections if they
bring a lawsuit to restrain the sale pursuant to RCW 61.24.130.
Failure to bring such a lawsuit may result in a waiver of any proper
grounds for invalidating the Trustee's sale.

[Add Part X to this notice if applicable under RCW 61.24.040(9)]

[Acknowledgment]

(2) In addition to providing the borrower and grantor the notice of
sale described in subsection (1)(f) of this section, the trustee shall
include with the copy of the notice which is mailed to the grantor, a
statement to the grantor in substantially the following form:

NOTICE OF FORECLOSURE

Pursuant to the Revised Code of Washington,

Chapter 61.24 RCW

The attached Notice of Trustee's Sale is a consequence of
default(s) in the obligation to . . . . . ., the Beneficiary of your
Deed of Trust and owner of the obligation secured thereby. Unless the
default(s) is/are cured, your property will be sold at auction on the
. . . . day of . . . . . ., . . .
To cure the default(s), you must bring the payments current, cure
any other defaults, and pay accrued late charges and other costs,
advances, and attorneys' fees as set forth below by the . . . . day of
. . . . . ., . . . [11 days before the sale date]. To date, these
arrears and costs are as follows:

Estimated amount

Currently due that will be due

to reinstate to reinstate

on. . . . . on. . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

(11 days before

the date set

for sale)

Delinquent payments

from. . . . . . ,

. . . , in the

amount of

$. . . . /mo.: $. . . . $. . . .

Late charges in

the total

amount of: $. . . . $. . . .

Estimated

Amounts

Attorneys' fees: $. . . . $. . . .

Trustee's fee: $. . . . $. . . .

Trustee's expenses:

(Itemization)

Title report $. . . . $. . . .

Recording fees $. . . . $. . . .

Service/Posting
of Notices
$. . . .
$. . . .

Postage/Copying
expense
$. . . .
$. . . .

Publication $. . . . $. . . .

Telephone
charges
$. . . . $. . . .

Inspection fees $. . . . $. . . .

. . . . . . $. . . . $. . . .

. . . . . . $. . . . $. . . .

TOTALS $. . . . $. . . .

To pay off the entire obligation secured by your Deed of Trust as
of the . . . . . day of . . . . . . you must pay a total of $. . . . .
in principal, $. . . . . in interest, plus other costs and advances
estimated to date in the amount of $. . . . . . From and after the
date of this notice you must submit a written request to the Trustee to
obtain the total amount to pay off the entire obligation secured by
your Deed of Trust as of the payoff date.
As to the defaults which do not involve payment of money to the
Beneficiary of your Deed of Trust, you must cure each such default.
Listed below are the defaults which do not involve payment of money to
the Beneficiary of your Deed of Trust. Opposite each such listed
default is a brief description of the action necessary to cure the
default and a description of the documentation necessary to show that
the default has been cured.

You may reinstate your Deed of Trust and the obligation secured
thereby at any time up to and including the . . . . day of . . . . . .,
. . . [11 days before the sale date], by paying the amount set forth or
estimated above and by curing any other defaults described above. Of
course, as time passes other payments may become due, and any further
payments coming due and any additional late charges must be added to
your reinstating payment. Any new defaults not involving payment of
money that occur after the date of this notice must also be cured in
order to effect reinstatement. In addition, because some of the
charges can only be estimated at this time, and because the amount
necessary to reinstate or to pay off the entire indebtedness may
include presently unknown expenditures required to preserve the
property or to comply with state or local law, it will be necessary for
you to contact the Trustee before the time you tender reinstatement or
the payoff amount so that you may be advised of the exact amount you
will be required to pay. Tender of payment or performance must be made
to: . . . . . ., whose address is . . . . . ., telephone ( )
. . . . . . AFTER THE . . . . DAY OF . . . . . ., . . ., YOU MAY NOT
REINSTATE YOUR DEED OF TRUST BY PAYING THE BACK PAYMENTS AND COSTS AND
FEES AND CURING THE OTHER DEFAULTS AS OUTLINED ABOVE. The Trustee will
respond to any written request for current payoff or reinstatement
amounts within ten days of receipt of your written request. In such a
case, you will only be able to stop the sale by paying, before the
sale, the total principal balance ($ . . . . . .) plus accrued
interest, costs and advances, if any, made pursuant to the terms of the
documents and by curing the other defaults as outlined above.
You may contest this default by initiating court action in the
Superior Court of the county in which the sale is to be held. In such
action, you may raise any legitimate defenses you have to this default.
A copy of your Deed of Trust and documents evidencing the obligation
secured thereby are enclosed. You may wish to consult a lawyer. Legal
action on your part may prevent or restrain the sale, but only if you
persuade the court of the merits of your defense. You may contact the
Department of Financial Institutions or the statewide civil legal aid
hotline for possible assistance or referrals.
The court may grant a restraining order or injunction to restrain
a trustee's sale pursuant to RCW 61.24.130 upon five days notice to the
trustee of the time when, place where, and the judge before whom the
application for the restraining order or injunction is to be made.
This notice shall include copies of all pleadings and related documents
to be given to the judge. Notice and other process may be served on
the trustee at:

If you do not reinstate the secured obligation and your Deed of
Trust in the manner set forth above, or if you do not succeed in
restraining the sale by court action, your property will be sold. The
effect of such sale will be to deprive you and all those who hold by,
through or under you of all interest in the property;
(3) In addition, the trustee shall cause a copy of the notice of
sale described in subsection (1)(f) of this section (excluding the
acknowledgment) to be published in a legal newspaper in each county in
which the property or any part thereof is situated, once on or between
the thirty-fifth and twenty-eighth day before the date of sale, and
once on or between the fourteenth and seventh day before the date of
sale;
(4) On the date and at the time designated in the notice of sale,
the trustee or its authorized agent shall sell the property at public
auction to the highest bidder. The trustee may sell the property in
gross or in parcels as the trustee shall deem most advantageous;
(5) The place of sale shall be at any designated public place
within the county where the property is located and if the property is
in more than one county, the sale may be in any of the counties where
the property is located. The sale shall be on Friday, or if Friday is
a legal holiday on the following Monday, and during the hours set by
statute for the conduct of sales of real estate at execution;
(6) The trustee has no obligation to, but may, for any cause the
trustee deems advantageous, continue the sale for a period or periods
not exceeding a total of one hundred twenty days by (a) a public
proclamation at the time and place fixed for sale in the notice of sale
and if the continuance is beyond the date of sale, by giving notice of
the new time and place of the sale by both first class and either
certified or registered mail, return receipt requested, to the persons
specified in subsection (1)(b)(i) and (ii) of this section to be
deposited in the mail (i) not less than four days before the new date
fixed for the sale if the sale is continued for up to seven days; or
(ii) not more than three days after the date of the continuance by oral
proclamation if the sale is continued for more than seven days, or,
alternatively, (b) by giving notice of the time and place of the
postponed sale in the manner and to the persons specified in subsection
(1)(b), (c), (d), and (e) of this section and publishing a copy of such
notice once in the newspaper(s) described in subsection (3) of this
section, more than seven days before the date fixed for sale in the
notice of sale. No other notice of the postponed sale need be given;
(7) The purchaser shall forthwith pay the price bid and on payment
the trustee shall execute to the purchaser its deed; the deed shall
recite the facts showing that the sale was conducted in compliance with
all of the requirements of this chapter and of the deed of trust, which
recital shall be prima facie evidence of such compliance and conclusive
evidence thereof in favor of bona fide purchasers and encumbrancers for
value, except that these recitals shall not affect the lien or interest
of any person entitled to notice under subsection (1) of this section,
if the trustee fails to give the required notice to such person. In
such case, the lien or interest of such omitted person shall not be
affected by the sale and such omitted person shall be treated as if
such person was the holder of the same lien or interest and was omitted
as a party defendant in a judicial foreclosure proceeding;
(8) The sale as authorized under this chapter shall not take place
less than one hundred ninety days from the date of default in any of
the obligations secured;
(9) If the trustee elects to foreclose the interest of any occupant
or tenant of property comprised solely of a single-family residence, or
a condominium, cooperative, or other dwelling unit in a multiplex or
other building containing fewer than five residential units, the
following notice shall be included as Part X of the Notice of Trustee's
Sale:

X.

NOTICE TO OCCUPANTS OR TENANTS

The purchaser at the trustee's sale is entitled to possession of the
property on the 20th day following the sale, as against the grantor
under the deed of trust (the owner) and anyone having an interest
junior to the deed of trust, including occupants who are not tenants.
After the 20th day following the sale the purchaser has the right to
evict occupants who are not tenants by summary proceedings under
chapter 59.12 RCW. For tenant-occupied property, the purchaser shall
provide a tenant with written notice in accordance with RCW 61.24.060;
(10) Only one copy of all notices required by this chapter need be
given to a person who is both the borrower and the grantor. All
notices required by this chapter that are given to a general
partnership are deemed given to each of its general partners, unless
otherwise agreed by the parties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 2009 c 292 s 13 (uncodified) is repealed.

--- END ---