BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
ACCOUNTABILITY FRAMEWORK
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 The legislature finds that it is the
state's responsibility to create a coherent and effective
accountability framework for the continuous improvement for all schools
and districts. This system must provide an excellent and equitable
education for all students; an aligned federal/state accountability
system; and the tools necessary for schools and districts to be
accountable. These tools include the necessary accounting and data
reporting systems, assessment systems to monitor student achievement,
and a system of general support, targeted assistance, and if necessary,
intervention.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction is
responsible for developing and implementing the accountability tools to
build district capacity and working within federal and state
guidelines. The legislature assigned the state board of education
responsibility and oversight for creating an accountability framework.
This framework provides a unified system of support for challenged
schools that aligns with basic education, increases the level of
support based upon the magnitude of need, and uses data for decisions.
Such a system will identify schools and their districts for recognition
as well as for additional state support. For a specific group of
challenged schools, defined as persistently lowest-achieving schools,
and their districts, it is necessary to provide a required action
process that creates a partnership between the state and local district
to target funds and assistance to turn around the identified lowest-achieving schools.
Phase I of this accountability system will recognize schools that
have done an exemplary job of raising student achievement and closing
the achievement gaps using the state board of education's
accountability index. The state board of education shall have ongoing
collaboration with the achievement gap oversight and accountability
committee regarding the measures used to measure the closing of the
achievement gaps and the recognition provided to the school districts
for closing the achievement gaps. Phase I will also target the lowest
five percent of persistently lowest-achieving schools defined under
federal guidelines to provide federal funds and federal intervention
models through a voluntary option in 2010, and for those who do not
volunteer and have not improved student achievement, a required action
process beginning in 2011.
Phase II of this accountability system will work toward
implementing the state board of education's accountability index for
identification of schools in need of improvement, including those that
are not Title I schools, and the use of state and local intervention
models and state funds through a required action process beginning in
2013, in addition to the federal program. Federal approval of the
state board of education's accountability index must be obtained or
else the federal guidelines for persistently lowest-achieving schools
will continue to be used.
The expectation from implementation of this accountability system
is the improvement of student achievement for all students to prepare
them for postsecondary education, work, and global citizenship in the
twenty-first century.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 (1) Beginning in 2010, and each year
thereafter, by December 1st, the superintendent of public instruction
shall annually identify schools as one of the state's persistently
lowest-achieving schools if the school is a Title I school, or a school
that is eligible for, but does not receive Title I funds, that is among
the lowest-achieving five percent of schools in the state.
(2) The criteria for determining whether a school is among the
persistently lowest-achieving five percent of Title I schools, or Title
I eligible schools, under subsection (1) of this section shall be
established by the superintendent of public instruction. The criteria
must meet all applicable requirements for the receipt of a federal
school improvement grant under the American recovery and reinvestment
act of 2009 and Title I of the elementary and secondary education act
of 1965, and take into account both:
(a) The academic achievement of the "all students" group in a
school in terms of proficiency on the state's assessment, and any
alternative assessments, in reading and mathematics combined; and
(b) The school's lack of progress on the mathematics and reading
assessments over a number of years in the "all students" group.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 (1) Beginning in January 2011, the
superintendent of public instruction shall annually recommend to the
state board of education school districts for designation as required
action districts. A district with at least one school identified as a
persistently lowest-achieving school shall be designated as a required
action district if it meets the criteria developed by the
superintendent of public instruction. However, a school district shall
not be recommended for designation as a required action district if the
district was awarded a federal school improvement grant by the
superintendent in 2010 and for three consecutive years following
receipt of the grant implemented a federal school intervention model at
each school identified for improvement. The state board of education
may designate a district that received a school improvement grant in
2010 as a required action district if after three years of voluntarily
implementing a plan the district continues to have a school identified
as persistently lowest-achieving and meets the criteria for designation
established by the superintendent of public instruction.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall provide a school
district superintendent with written notice of the recommendation for
designation as a required action district by certified mail or personal
service. A school district superintendent may request reconsideration
of the superintendent of public instruction's recommendation. The
reconsideration shall be limited to a determination of whether the
school district met the criteria for being recommended as a required
action district. A request for reconsideration must be in writing and
served on the superintendent of public instruction within ten days of
service of the notice of the superintendent's recommendation.
(3) The state board of education shall annually designate those
districts recommended by the superintendent in subsection (1) of this
section as required action districts. A district designated as a
required action district shall be required to notify all parents of
students attending a school identified as a persistently lowest-achieving school in the district of the state board of education's
designation of the district as a required action district and the
process for complying with the requirements set forth in sections 104
through 109 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 (1) The superintendent of public
instruction shall contract with an external review team to conduct an
academic performance audit of the district and each persistently
lowest-achieving school in a required action district to identify the
potential reasons for the school's low performance and lack of
progress. The review team must consist of persons under contract with
the superintendent who have expertise in comprehensive school and
district reform and may not include staff from the agency, the school
district that is the subject of the audit, or members or staff of the
state board of education.
(2) The audit must be conducted based on criteria developed by the
superintendent of public instruction and must include but not be
limited to an examination of the following:
(a) Student demographics;
(b) Mobility patterns;
(c) School feeder patterns;
(d) The performance of different student groups on assessments;
(e) Effective school leadership;
(f) Strategic allocation of resources;
(g) Clear and shared focus on student learning;
(h) High standards and expectations for all students;
(i) High level of collaboration and communication;
(j) Aligned curriculum, instruction, and assessment to state
standards;
(k) Frequency of monitoring of learning and teaching;
(l) Focused professional development;
(m) Supportive learning environment;
(n) High level of family and community involvement; and
(o) Alternative secondary schools best practices.
(3) Audit findings must be made available to the local school
district, its staff, the community, and the state board of education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 (1) The local district superintendent and
local school board of a school district designated as a required action
district must submit a required action plan to the state board of
education for approval. Unless otherwise required by subsection (3) of
this section, the plan must be submitted under a schedule as required
by the state board. A required action plan must be developed in
collaboration with administrators, teachers, and other staff, parents,
unions representing any employees within the district, students, and
other representatives of the local community. The superintendent of
public instruction shall provide a district with assistance in
developing its plan if requested. The school board must conduct a
public hearing to allow for comment on a proposed required action plan.
The local school district shall submit the plan first to the office of
the superintendent of public instruction to review and approve that the
plan is consistent with federal guidelines. After the office of the
superintendent of public instruction has approved that the plan is
consistent with federal guidelines, the local school district must
submit its required action plan to the state board of education for
approval.
(2) A required action plan must include all of the following:
(a) Implementation of one of the four federal intervention models
required for the receipt of a federal school improvement grant, for
those persistently lowest-achieving schools that the district will be
focusing on for required action. However, a district may not establish
a charter school under a federal intervention model without express
legislative authority. The intervention models are the turnaround,
restart, school closure, and transformation models. The intervention
model selected must address the concerns raised in the academic
performance audit and be intended to improve student performance to
allow a school district to be removed from the list of districts
designated as a required action district by the state board of
education within three years of implementation of the plan;
(b) Submission of an application for a federal school improvement
grant to the superintendent of public instruction;
(c) A budget that provides for adequate resources to implement the
federal model selected and any other requirements of the plan;
(d) A description of the changes in the district's or school's
existing policies, structures, agreements, processes, and practices
that are intended to attain significant achievement gains for all
students enrolled in the school;
(e) Identification of the measures that the school district will
use in assessing student achievement at a school identified as a
persistently lowest-achieving school, which include improving
mathematics and reading student achievement and graduation rates as
defined by the office of the superintendent of public instruction that
enable the school to no longer be identified as a persistently lowest-achieving school.
(3)(a) For any district designated for required action, the parties
to any collective bargaining agreement negotiated, renewed, or extended
under chapter 41.59 or 41.56 RCW after the effective date of this
section must reopen the agreement, or negotiate an addendum, if needed,
to make changes to terms and conditions of employment that are
necessary to implement a required action plan.
(b) If the school district and the employee organizations are
unable to agree on the terms of an addendum or modification to an
existing collective bargaining agreement, the parties, including all
labor organizations affected under the required action plan, shall
request the public employment relations commission to, and the
commission shall, appoint an employee of the commission to act as a
mediator to assist in the resolution of a dispute between the school
district and the employee organizations. Beginning in 2011, and each
year thereafter, mediation shall commence no later than April 15th.
All mediations held under this section shall include the employer and
representatives of all affected bargaining units.
(c) If the executive director of the public employment relations
commission, upon the recommendation of the assigned mediator, finds
that the employer and any affected bargaining unit are unable to reach
agreement following a reasonable period of negotiations and mediation,
but by no later than May 15th of the year in which mediation occurred,
the executive director shall certify any disputed issues for a decision
by the superior court in the county where the school district is
located. The issues for determination by the superior court must be
limited to the issues certified by the executive director.
(d) The process for filing with the court in this subsection (3)(d)
must be used in the case where the executive director certifies issues
for a decision by the superior court.
(i) The school district shall file a petition with the superior
court, by no later than May 20th of the same year in which the issues
were certified, setting forth the following:
(A) The name, address, and telephone number of the school district
and its principal representative;
(B) The name, address, and telephone number of the employee
organizations and their principal representatives;
(C) A description of the bargaining units involved;
(D) A copy of the unresolved issues certified by the executive
director for a final and binding decision by the court; and
(E) The academic performance audit that the office of the
superintendent of public instruction completed for the school district.
(ii) Within seven days after the filing of the petition, each party
shall file with the court the proposal it is asking the court to order
be implemented in a required action plan for the district for each
issue certified by the executive director. Contemporaneously with the
filing of the proposal, a party must file a brief with the court
setting forth the reasons why the court should order implementation of
its proposal in the final plan.
(iii) Following receipt of the proposals and briefs of the parties,
the court must schedule a date and time for a hearing on the petition.
The hearing must be limited to argument of the parties or their counsel
regarding the proposals submitted for the court's consideration. The
parties may waive a hearing by written agreement.
(iv) The court must enter an order selecting the proposal for
inclusion in a required action plan that best responds to the issues
raised in the school district's academic performance audit, and allows
for the award of a federal school improvement grant to the district
from the office of the superintendent of public instruction to
implement one of the four federal intervention models. The court's
decision must be issued no later than June 15th of the year in which
the petition is filed and is final and binding on the parties; however
the court's decision is subject to appeal only in the case where it
does not allow the school district to implement a required action plan
consistent with the requirements for the award of a federal school
improvement grant by the superintendent of public instruction.
(e) Each party shall bear its own costs and attorneys' fees
incurred under this statute.
(f) Any party that proceeds with the process in this section after
knowledge that any provision of this section has not been complied with
and who fails to state its objection in writing is deemed to have
waived its right to object.
(4) All contracts entered into between a school district and an
employee must be consistent with this section and allow school
districts designated as required action districts to implement one of
the four federal models in a required action plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 A required action plan developed by a
district's school board and superintendent must be submitted to the
state board of education for approval. The state board must accept for
inclusion in any required action plan the final decision by the
superior court on any issue certified by the executive director of the
public employment relations commission under the process in section 105
of this act. The state board of education shall approve a plan
proposed by a school district only if it meets the requirements set
forth in section 105 of this act. Any addendum or modification to an
existing collective bargaining agreement, negotiated under section 105
of this act or by agreement of the district and the exclusive
bargaining unit, related to student achievement or school improvement
shall not go into effect until approval of a required action plan by
the state board of education. If the state board does not approve a
proposed plan, it must notify the local school board and local
district's superintendent in writing with an explicit rationale for why
the plan was not approved. Nonapproval by the state board of education
of the local school district's initial required action plan submitted
is not intended to trigger any actions under section 107 of this act.
With the assistance of the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, the superintendent and school board of the required action
district shall submit a new plan to the state board of education for
approval within forty days of notification that its plan was rejected.
If federal funds are not available, the plan is not required to be
implemented until such funding becomes available. If federal funds for
this purpose are available, a required action plan must be implemented
in the immediate school year following the district's designation as a
required action district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 The state board of education may direct
the superintendent of public instruction to require a school district
that has not submitted a final required action plan for approval, or
has submitted but not received state board of education approval of a
required action plan by the beginning of the school year in which the
plan is intended to be implemented, to redirect the district's Title I
funds based on the academic performance audit findings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 A school district must implement a
required action plan upon approval by the state board of education.
The office of superintendent of public instruction must provide the
required action district with technical assistance and federal school
improvement grant funds, if available, to implement an approved plan.
The district must submit a report to the superintendent of public
instruction that provides the progress the district is making in
meeting the student achievement goals based on the state's assessments,
identifying strategies and assets used to solve audit findings, and
establishing evidence of meeting plan implementation benchmarks as set
forth in the required action plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 (1) The superintendent of public
instruction must provide a report twice per year to the state board of
education regarding the progress made by all school districts
designated as required action districts.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction must recommend to the
state board of education that a school district be released from the
designation as a required action district after the district implements
a required action plan for a period of three years; has made progress,
as defined by the superintendent of public instruction, in reading and
mathematics on the state's assessment over the past three consecutive
years; and no longer has a school within the district identified as
persistently lowest achieving. The state board shall release a school
district from the designation as a required action district upon
confirmation that the district has met the requirements for a release.
(3) If the state board of education determines that the required
action district has not met the requirements for release, the district
remains in required action and must submit a new or revised plan under
the process in section 105 of this act.

Sec. 110 RCW 28A.305.225 and 2009 c 548 s 503 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education shall continue to refine the
development of an accountability framework that creates a unified
system of support for challenged schools, that aligns with basic
education, increases the level of support based upon the magnitude of
need, and uses data for decisions.
(2) The state board of education shall develop an accountability
index to identify schools and districts for recognition, for continuous
improvement, and for additional state support. The index shall be
based on criteria that are fair, consistent, and transparent.
Performance shall be measured using multiple outcomes and indicators
including, but not limited to, graduation rates and results from
statewide assessments. The index shall be developed in such a way as
to be easily understood by both employees within the schools and
districts, as well as parents and community members. It is the
legislature's intent that the index provide feedback to schools and
districts to self-assess their progress, and enable the identification
of schools with exemplary student performance and those that need
assistance to overcome challenges in order to achieve exemplary student
performance. ((Once the accountability index has identified schools
that need additional help, a more thorough analysis will be done to
analyze specific conditions in the district including but not limited
to the level of state resources a school or school district receives in
support of the basic education system, achievement gaps for different
groups of students, and community support.
(3) Based on the accountability index and in consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction, the state board of education
shall develop a proposal and timeline for implementation of a
comprehensive system of voluntary support and assistance for schools
and districts. The timeline must take into account and accommodate
capacity limitations of the K-12 educational system. Changes that have
a fiscal impact on school districts, as identified by a fiscal analysis
prepared by the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
shall take effect only if formally authorized by the legislature
through the omnibus appropriations act or other enacted legislation.
(4)(a) The state board of education shall develop a proposal and
implementation timeline for a more formalized comprehensive system
improvement targeted to challenged schools and districts that have not
demonstrated sufficient improvement through the voluntary system. The
timeline must take into account and accommodate capacity limitations of
the K-12 educational system. The proposal and timeline shall be
submitted to the education committees of the legislature by December 1,
2009, and shall include recommended legislation and recommended
resources to implement the system according to the timeline developed.
(b) The proposal shall outline a process for addressing performance
challenges that will include the following features: (i) An academic
performance audit using peer review teams of educators that considers
school and community factors in addition to other factors in developing
recommended specific corrective actions that should be undertaken to
improve student learning; (ii) a requirement for the local school board
plan to develop and be responsible for implementation of corrective
action plan taking into account the audit findings, which plan must be
approved by the state board of education at which time the plan becomes
binding upon the school district to implement; and (iii) monitoring of
local district progress by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction. The proposal shall take effect only if formally
authorized by the legislature through the omnibus appropriations act or
other enacted legislation.
(5))) (3) The state board of education, in cooperation with the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall annually
recognize schools for exemplary performance as measured on the state
board of education accountability index. The state board of education
shall have ongoing collaboration with the achievement gap oversight and
accountability committee regarding the measures used to measure the
closing of the achievement gaps and the recognition provided to the
school districts for closing the achievement gaps.
(4) In coordination with the superintendent of public instruction,
the state board of education shall seek approval from the United States
department of education for use of the accountability index and the
state system of support, assistance, and intervention, to replace the
federal accountability system under P.L. 107-110, the no child left
behind act of 2001.
(((6))) (5) The state board of education shall work with the
education data center established within the office of financial
management and the technical working group established in section 112,
chapter 548, Laws of 2009 to determine the feasibility of using the
prototypical funding allocation model as not only a tool for allocating
resources to schools and districts but also as a tool for schools and
districts to report to the state legislature and the state board of
education on how the state resources received are being used.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "All students group" means those students in grades three
through eight and high school who take the state's assessment in
reading and mathematics required under 20 U.S.C. Sec. 6311(b)(3).
(2) "Title I" means Title I, part A of the federal elementary and
secondary education act of 1965 (ESEA) (20 U.S.C. Secs. 6311-6322).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 112 The superintendent of public instruction
may adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to
implement this chapter.

PART II
EVALUATIONS
Sec. 201 RCW 28A.150.230 and 2006 c 263 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is the intent and purpose of this section to guarantee that
each common school district board of directors, whether or not acting
through its respective administrative staff, be held accountable for
the proper operation of their district to the local community and its
electorate. In accordance with the provisions of Title 28A RCW, as now
or hereafter amended, each common school district board of directors
shall be vested with the final responsibility for the setting of
policies ensuring quality in the content and extent of its educational
program and that such program provide students with the opportunity to
achieve those skills which are generally recognized as requisite to
learning.
(2) In conformance with the provisions of Title 28A RCW, as now or
hereafter amended, it shall be the responsibility of each common school
district board of directors to adopt policies to:
(a) Establish performance criteria and an evaluation process for
its superintendent, classified staff, certificated personnel, including
administrative staff, and for all programs constituting a part of such
district's curriculum. Each district shall report annually to the
superintendent of public instruction the following for each employee
group listed in this subsection (2)(a): (i) Evaluation criteria and
rubrics; (ii) a description of each rating; and (iii) the number of
staff in each rating;
(b) Determine the final assignment of staff, certificated or
classified, according to board enumerated classroom and program needs
and data, based upon a plan to ensure that the assignment policy: (i)
Supports the learning needs of all the students in the district; and
(ii) gives specific attention to high-need schools and classrooms;
(c) Provide information to the local community and its electorate
describing the school district's policies concerning hiring, assigning,
terminating, and evaluating staff, including the criteria for
evaluating teachers and principals;
(d) Determine the amount of instructional hours necessary for any
student to acquire a quality education in such district, in not less
than an amount otherwise required in RCW 28A.150.220, or rules of the
state board of education;
(((d))) (e) Determine the allocation of staff time, whether
certificated or classified;
(((e))) (f) Establish final curriculum standards consistent with
law and rules of the superintendent of public instruction, relevant to
the particular needs of district students or the unusual
characteristics of the district, and ensuring a quality education for
each student in the district; and
(((f))) (g) Evaluate teaching materials, including text books,
teaching aids, handouts, or other printed material, in public hearing
upon complaint by parents, guardians or custodians of students who
consider dissemination of such material to students objectionable.

Sec. 202 RCW 28A.405.100 and 1997 c 278 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
superintendent of public instruction shall establish and may amend from
time to time minimum criteria for the evaluation of the professional
performance capabilities and development of certificated classroom
teachers and certificated support personnel. For classroom teachers
the criteria shall be developed in the following categories:
Instructional skill; classroom management, professional preparation and
scholarship; effort toward improvement when needed; the handling of
student discipline and attendant problems; and interest in teaching
pupils and knowledge of subject matter.
(b) Every board of directors shall, in accordance with procedure
provided in RCW 41.59.010 through 41.59.170, 41.59.910 and 41.59.920,
establish evaluative criteria and procedures for all certificated
classroom teachers and certificated support personnel. The evaluative
criteria must contain as a minimum the criteria established by the
superintendent of public instruction pursuant to this section and must
be prepared within six months following adoption of the superintendent
of public instruction's minimum criteria. The district must certify to
the superintendent of public instruction that evaluative criteria have
been so prepared by the district.
(2)(a) Pursuant to the implementation schedule established in
subsection (7)(b) of this section, every board of directors shall, in
accordance with procedures provided in RCW 41.59.010 through 41.59.170,
41.59.910, and 41.59.920, establish revised evaluative criteria and a
four-level rating system for all certificated classroom teachers.
(b) The minimum criteria shall include: (i) Centering instruction
on high expectations for student achievement; (ii) demonstrating
effective teaching practices; (iii) recognizing individual student
learning needs and developing strategies to address those needs; (iv)
providing clear and intentional focus on subject matter content and
curriculum; (v) fostering and managing a safe, positive learning
environment; (vi) using multiple student data elements to modify
instruction and improve student learning; (vii) communicating and
collaborating with parents and school community; and (viii) exhibiting
collaborative and collegial practices focused on improving
instructional practice and student learning.
(c) The four-level rating system used to evaluate the certificated
classroom teacher must describe performance along a continuum that
indicates the extent to which the criteria have been met or exceeded.
When student growth data, if available and relevant to the teacher and
subject matter, is referenced in the evaluation process it must be
based on multiple measures that can include classroom-based, school-based, district-based, and state-based tools. As used in this
subsection, "student growth" means the change in student achievement
between two points in time.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subsection (((5))) (10) of this
section, it shall be the responsibility of a principal or his or her
designee to evaluate all certificated personnel in his or her school.
During each school year all classroom teachers and certificated support
personnel((, hereinafter referred to as "employees" in this section,))
shall be observed for the purposes of evaluation at least twice in the
performance of their assigned duties. Total observation time for each
employee for each school year shall be not less than sixty minutes. An
employee in the third year of provisional status as defined in RCW
28A.405.220 shall be observed at least three times in the performance
of his or her duties and the total observation time for the school year
shall not be less than ninety minutes. Following each observation, or
series of observations, the principal or other evaluator shall promptly
document the results of the observation in writing, and shall provide
the employee with a copy thereof within three days after such report is
prepared. New employees shall be observed at least once for a total
observation time of thirty minutes during the first ninety calendar
days of their employment period.
(b) As used in this subsection and subsection (4) of this section,
"employees" means classroom teachers and certificated support
personnel.
(4)(a) At any time after October 15th, an employee whose work is
not judged ((unsatisfactory)) satisfactory based on district evaluation
criteria shall be notified in writing of the specific areas of
deficiencies along with a reasonable program for improvement. During
the period of probation, the employee may not be transferred from the
supervision of the original evaluator. Improvement of performance or
probable cause for nonrenewal must occur and be documented by the
original evaluator before any consideration of a request for transfer
or reassignment as contemplated by either the individual or the school
district. A probationary period of sixty school days shall be
established. The establishment of a probationary period does not
adversely affect the contract status of an employee within the meaning
of RCW 28A.405.300. The purpose of the probationary period is to give
the employee opportunity to demonstrate improvements in his or her
areas of deficiency. The establishment of the probationary period and
the giving of the notice to the employee of deficiency shall be by the
school district superintendent and need not be submitted to the board
of directors for approval. During the probationary period the
evaluator shall meet with the employee at least twice monthly to
supervise and make a written evaluation of the progress, if any, made
by the employee. The evaluator may authorize one additional
certificated employee to evaluate the probationer and to aid the
employee in improving his or her areas of deficiency; such additional
certificated employee shall be immune from any civil liability that
might otherwise be incurred or imposed with regard to the good faith
performance of such evaluation. The probationer may be removed from
probation if he or she has demonstrated improvement to the satisfaction
of the principal in those areas specifically detailed in his or her
initial notice of deficiency and subsequently detailed in his or her
improvement program. Lack of necessary improvement during the
established probationary period, as specifically documented in writing
with notification to the probationer and shall constitute grounds for
a finding of probable cause under RCW 28A.405.300 or 28A.405.210.
(b) Immediately following the completion of a probationary period
that does not produce performance changes detailed in the initial
notice of deficiencies and improvement program, the employee may be
removed from his or her assignment and placed into an alternative
assignment for the remainder of the school year. This reassignment may
not displace another employee nor may it adversely affect the
probationary employee's compensation or benefits for the remainder of
the employee's contract year. If such reassignment is not possible,
the district may, at its option, place the employee on paid leave for
the balance of the contract term.
(((2))) (5) Every board of directors shall establish evaluative
criteria and procedures for all superintendents, principals, and other
administrators. It shall be the responsibility of the district
superintendent or his or her designee to evaluate all administrators.
Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, such evaluation
shall be based on the administrative position job description. Such
criteria, when applicable, shall include at least the following
categories: Knowledge of, experience in, and training in recognizing
good professional performance, capabilities and development; school
administration and management; school finance; professional preparation
and scholarship; effort toward improvement when needed; interest in
pupils, employees, patrons and subjects taught in school; leadership;
and ability and performance of evaluation of school personnel.
(((3))) (6)(a) Pursuant to the implementation schedule established
by subsection (7)(b) of this section, every board of directors shall
establish revised evaluative criteria and a four-level rating system
for principals.
(b) The minimum criteria shall include: (i) Creating a school
culture that promotes the ongoing improvement of learning and teaching
for students and staff; (ii) demonstrable commitment to closing the
achievement gap; (iii) providing for school safety; (iv) leading the
development, implementation, and evaluation of a data-driven plan for
increasing student achievement, including the use of multiple student
data elements; (v) assisting instructional staff with alignment of
curriculum, instruction, and assessment with state and local district
learning goals; (vi) monitoring, assisting, and evaluating effective
instruction and assessment practices; (vii) managing both staff and
fiscal resources to support student achievement and legal
responsibilities; and (viii) partnering with the school community to
promote student learning.
(c) The four-level rating system used to evaluate the principal
must describe performance along a continuum that indicates the extent
to which the criteria have been met or exceeded. When available,
student growth data that is referenced in the evaluation process must
be based on multiple measures that can include classroom-based, school-based, district-based, and state-based tools. As used in this
subsection, "student growth" means the change in student achievement
between two points in time.
(7)(a) The superintendent of public instruction, in collaboration
with state professional associations representing teachers, principals,
administrators, and at least one parent who is not a teacher,
principal, administrator, or employee of a school district, educational
service district, or state educational agency, association, or
organization shall create models for implementing the evaluation system
criteria, student growth tools, professional development programs, and
evaluator training for certificated classroom teachers and principals.
The statewide parent-teacher organization shall select one
representative. Individuals who apply must have demonstrated an
interest in public schools, be supportive of educational improvement,
and be willing to devote sufficient time to create the models,
programs, and tools. Human resources specialists, professional
development experts, and assessment experts must also be consulted.
Due to the diversity of teaching assignments and the many developmental
levels of students, classroom teachers and principals must be
prominently represented in this work. The models must be available for
use in the 2011-12 school year.
(b) A new certificated classroom teacher evaluation system that
implements the provisions of subsection (2) of this section and a new
principal evaluation system that implements the provisions of
subsection (6) of this section shall be phased-in beginning with the
2010-11 school year by districts identified in (c) of this subsection
and implemented in all school districts beginning with the 2013-14
school year.
(c) A set of school districts shall be selected by the
superintendent of public instruction to participate in a collaborative
process resulting in the development and piloting of new certificated
classroom teacher and principal evaluation systems during the 2010-11
and 2011-12 school years. These school districts must be selected
based on: (i) The agreement of the local associations representing
classroom teachers and principals to collaborate with the district in
this developmental work and (ii) the agreement to participate in the
full range of development and implementation activities, including:
Development of rubrics for the evaluation criteria and ratings in
subsections (2) and (6) of this section; identification of or
development of appropriate multiple measures of student growth in
subsections (2) and (6) of this section; development of appropriate
evaluation system forms; participation in professional development for
principals and classroom teachers regarding the content of the new
evaluation system; participation in evaluator training; and
participation in activities to evaluate the effectiveness of the new
systems and support programs. The school districts must submit all
student data available to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, preferably in electronic form. The superintendent of
public instruction must analyze the districts' evaluative data,
including data that is not used or is underutilized in the evaluations,
consult with participating districts and stakeholders, recommend
appropriate changes, and address statewide implementation issues. The
superintendent of public instruction shall report evaluation system
implementation status, evaluation data, and recommendations to
appropriate committees of the legislature and governor by July 1, 2011,
and at the conclusion of the development phase by July 1, 2012.
(8) Each certificated ((employee)) classroom teacher and
certificated support personnel shall have the opportunity for
confidential conferences with his or her immediate supervisor on no
less than two occasions in each school year. Such confidential
conference shall have as its sole purpose the aiding of the
administrator in his or her assessment of the employee's professional
performance.
(((4))) (9) The failure of any evaluator to evaluate or supervise
or cause the evaluation or supervision of certificated ((employees))
classroom teachers and certificated support personnel or administrators
in accordance with this section, as now or hereafter amended, when it
is his or her specific assigned or delegated responsibility to do so,
shall be sufficient cause for the nonrenewal of any such evaluator's
contract under RCW 28A.405.210, or the discharge of such evaluator
under RCW 28A.405.300.
(((5))) (10) After ((an employee)) a certificated classroom teacher
or certificated support personnel has four years of satisfactory
evaluations under subsection (1) of this section or has received one of
the two top ratings for four years under subsection (2) of this
section, a school district may use a short form of evaluation, a
locally bargained evaluation emphasizing professional growth, an
evaluation under subsection (1) or (2) of this section, or any
combination thereof. The short form of evaluation shall include either
a thirty minute observation during the school year with a written
summary or a final annual written evaluation based on the criteria in
subsection (1) or (2) of this section and based on at least two
observation periods during the school year totaling at least sixty
minutes without a written summary of such observations being prepared.
A locally bargained short-form evaluation emphasizing professional
growth must provide that the professional growth activity conducted by
the certificated classroom teacher be specifically linked to one or
more of the certificated classroom teacher evaluation criteria.
However, the evaluation process set forth in subsection (1) or (2) of
this section shall be followed at least once every three years unless
this time is extended by a local school district under the bargaining
process set forth in chapter 41.59 RCW. The employee or evaluator may
require that the evaluation process set forth in subsection (1) or (2)
of this section be conducted in any given school year. No evaluation
other than the evaluation authorized under subsection (1) or (2) of
this section may be used as a basis for determining that an employee's
work is ((unsatisfactory)) not satisfactory under subsection (1) or (2)
of this section or as probable cause for the nonrenewal of an
employee's contract under RCW 28A.405.210 unless an evaluation process
developed under chapter 41.59 RCW determines otherwise.

Sec. 203 RCW 28A.405.220 and 2009 c 57 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 28A.405.210, every person
employed by a school district in a teaching or other nonsupervisory
certificated position shall be subject to nonrenewal of employment
contract as provided in this section during the first ((two)) three
years of employment by such district, unless: (a) The employee has
previously completed at least two years of certificated employment in
another school district in the state of Washington, in which case the
employee shall be subject to nonrenewal of employment contract pursuant
to this section during the first year of employment with the new
district; or (b) the school district superintendent may make a
determination to remove an employee from provisional status if the
employee has received one of the top two evaluation ratings during the
second year of employment by the district. Employees as defined in
this section shall hereinafter be referred to as "provisional
employees(("))."
(2) In the event the superintendent of the school district
determines that the employment contract of any provisional employee
should not be renewed by the district for the next ensuing term such
provisional employee shall be notified thereof in writing on or before
May 15th preceding the commencement of such school term, or if the
omnibus appropriations act has not passed the legislature by May 15th,
then notification shall be no later than June 15th, which notification
shall state the reason or reasons for such determination. Such notice
shall be served upon the provisional employee personally, or by
certified or registered mail, or by leaving a copy of the notice at the
place of his or her usual abode with some person of suitable age and
discretion then resident therein. The determination of the
superintendent shall be subject to the evaluation requirements of RCW
28A.405.100.
(3) Every such provisional employee so notified, at his or her
request made in writing and filed with the superintendent of the
district within ten days after receiving such notice, shall be given
the opportunity to meet informally with the superintendent for the
purpose of requesting the superintendent to reconsider his or her
decision. Such meeting shall be held no later than ten days following
the receipt of such request, and the provisional employee shall be
given written notice of the date, time and place of meeting at least
three days prior thereto. At such meeting the provisional employee
shall be given the opportunity to refute any facts upon which the
superintendent's determination was based and to make any argument in
support of his or her request for reconsideration.
(4) Within ten days following the meeting with the provisional
employee, the superintendent shall either reinstate the provisional
employee or shall submit to the school district board of directors for
consideration at its next regular meeting a written report recommending
that the employment contract of the provisional employee be nonrenewed
and stating the reason or reasons therefor. A copy of such report
shall be delivered to the provisional employee at least three days
prior to the scheduled meeting of the board of directors. In taking
action upon the recommendation of the superintendent, the board of
directors shall consider any written communication which the
provisional employee may file with the secretary of the board at any
time prior to that meeting.
(5) The board of directors shall notify the provisional employee in
writing of its final decision within ten days following the meeting at
which the superintendent's recommendation was considered. The decision
of the board of directors to nonrenew the contract of a provisional
employee shall be final and not subject to appeal.
(6) This section applies to any person employed by a school
district in a teaching or other nonsupervisory certificated position
after June 25, 1976. This section provides the exclusive means for
nonrenewing the employment contract of a provisional employee and no
other provision of law shall be applicable thereto, including, without
limitation, RCW 28A.405.210 and chapter 28A.645 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 A new section is added to chapter 28A.405
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Representatives of the office of the superintendent of public
instruction and statewide associations representing administrators,
principals, human resources specialists, and certificated classroom
teachers shall analyze how the evaluation systems in RCW 28A.405.100
(2) and (6) affect issues related to a change in contract status.
(2) The analysis shall be conducted during each of the phase-in
years of the certificated classroom teacher and principal evaluation
systems. The analysis shall include: Procedures, timelines,
probationary periods, appeal procedures, and other items related to the
timely exercise of employment decisions and due process provisions for
certificated classroom teachers and principals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 A new section is added to chapter 28A.405
RCW to read as follows:
If funds are provided for professional development activities
designed specifically for first through third-year teachers, the funds
shall be allocated first to districts participating in the evaluation
systems in RCW 28A.405.100 (2) and (6) before the required
implementation date under that section.

PART III
ENCOURAGING INNOVATIONS AND PERFORMANCE BY ADDRESSING THE ACHIEVEMENT
GAP AND SCIENCE TECHNOLOGY, ENGINEERING, AND MATHEMATICS
Sec. 301 RCW 28A.400.200 and 2002 c 353 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every school district board of directors shall fix, alter,
allow, and order paid salaries and compensation for all district
employees in conformance with this section.
(2)(a) Salaries for certificated instructional staff shall not be
less than the salary provided in the appropriations act in the
statewide salary allocation schedule for an employee with a
baccalaureate degree and zero years of service; and
(b) Salaries for certificated instructional staff with a master's
degree shall not be less than the salary provided in the appropriations
act in the statewide salary allocation schedule for an employee with a
master's degree and zero years of service;
(3)(a) The actual average salary paid to certificated instructional
staff shall not exceed the district's average certificated
instructional staff salary used for the state basic education
allocations for that school year as determined pursuant to RCW
28A.150.410.
(b) Fringe benefit contributions for certificated instructional
staff shall be included as salary under (a) of this subsection only to
the extent that the district's actual average benefit contribution
exceeds the amount of the insurance benefits allocation provided per
certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating
appropriations act in effect at the time the compensation is payable.
For purposes of this section, fringe benefits shall not include payment
for unused leave for illness or injury under RCW 28A.400.210; employer
contributions for old age survivors insurance, workers' compensation,
unemployment compensation, and retirement benefits under the Washington
state retirement system; or employer contributions for health benefits
in excess of the insurance benefits allocation provided per
certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating
appropriations act in effect at the time the compensation is payable.
A school district may not use state funds to provide employer
contributions for such excess health benefits.
(c) Salary and benefits for certificated instructional staff in
programs other than basic education shall be consistent with the salary
and benefits paid to certificated instructional staff in the basic
education program.
(4) Salaries and benefits for certificated instructional staff may
exceed the limitations in subsection (3) of this section only by
separate contract for additional time, for additional responsibilities,
((or)) for incentives, or for implementing specific measurable
innovative activities, including professional development, specified by
the school district to: (a) Close one or more achievement gaps, (b)
focus on development of science, technology, engineering, and
mathematics (STEM) learning opportunities, or (c) provide arts
education. Beginning September 1, 2011, school districts shall
annually provide a brief description of the innovative activities
included in any supplemental contract to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction. The superintendent of public
instruction shall annually summarize the district information and
submit a report to the education committees of the house of
representatives and the senate. Supplemental contracts shall not cause
the state to incur any present or future funding obligation.
Supplemental contracts shall be subject to the collective bargaining
provisions of chapter 41.59 RCW and the provisions of RCW 28A.405.240,
shall not exceed one year, and if not renewed shall not constitute
adverse change in accordance with RCW 28A.405.300 through 28A.405.380.
No district may enter into a supplemental contract under this
subsection for the provision of services which are a part of the basic
education program required by Article IX, section 3 of the state
Constitution.
(5) Employee benefit plans offered by any district shall comply
with RCW 28A.400.350 and 28A.400.275 and 28A.400.280.

PART IV
EXPANDING PROFESSIONAL PREPARATION OPTIONS AND WORKFORCE INFORMATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
Beginning with the 2011-12 school year, all professional educator
standards board-approved teacher preparation programs must administer
to all preservice candidates the evidence-based assessment of teaching
effectiveness adopted by the professional educator standards board.
Candidates completing teacher preparation programs in the 2012-13
school year and thereafter must successfully pass this assessment.
Assessment results from persons completing each preparation program
must be reported annually by the professional educator standards board
to the governor and the education and fiscal committees of the
legislature by December 1st.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
By September 30, 2010, the professional educator standards board
shall review and revise teacher and administrator preparation program
approval standards and proposal review procedures at the residency
certificate level to ensure they are rigorous and appropriate standards
for an expanded range of potential providers, including community
college and nonhigher education providers.
Beginning September 30, 2010, the professional educator standards
board must accept proposals for community college and nonhigher
education providers of educator preparation programs. Proposals must
be processed and considered by the board as expeditiously as possible.
By September 1, 2011, all professional educator standards board-approved residency teacher preparation programs at institutions of
higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 not currently a partner
in an alternative route program approved by the professional educator
standards board must submit to the board a proposal to offer one or
more of the alternative route programs that meet the requirements of
RCW 28A.660.020 and 28A.660.040.

Sec. 403 RCW 28A.660.020 and 2006 c 263 s 816 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((Each)) The professional educator standards board shall
transition the alternative route partnership grant program from a
separate competitive grant program to a preparation program model to be
expanded among approved preparation program providers. Alternative
routes are partnerships between professional educator standards board-approved preparation programs, Washington school districts, and other
partners as appropriate.
(2) Each prospective teacher preparation program provider, in
cooperation with a Washington school district or consortia of school
districts applying ((for the)) to operate alternative route
certification program shall ((submit a)) include in its proposal to the
Washington professional educator standards board ((specifying)):
(a) The route or routes the partnership program intends to offer
and a detailed description of how the routes will be structured and
operated by the partnership;
(b) The estimated number of candidates that will be enrolled per
route;
(c) An identification, indication of commitment, and description of
the role of approved teacher preparation programs ((that are)) and
partnering ((with the)) district or consortia of districts;
(d) An assurance ((of)) that the district ((provision of)) or
approved preparation program provider will provide adequate training
for mentor teachers ((either through participation in a state mentor
training academy or district-provided training that meets state-
established mentor-training standards)) specific to the mentoring of
alternative route candidates;
(e) An assurance that significant time will be provided for mentor
teachers to spend with the alternative route teacher candidates
throughout the internship. Partnerships must provide each candidate
with intensive classroom mentoring until such time as the candidate
demonstrates the competency necessary to manage the classroom with less
intensive supervision and guidance from a mentor;
(f) A description of the rigorous screening process for applicants
to alternative route programs, including entry requirements specific to
each route, as provided in RCW 28A.660.040; ((and))
(g) A summary of procedures that provide flexible completion
opportunities for candidates to achieve a residency certificate; and
(h) The design and use of a teacher development plan for each
candidate. The plan shall specify the alternative route coursework and
training required of each candidate and shall be developed by comparing
the candidate's prior experience and coursework with the state's new
performance-based standards for residency certification and adjusting
any requirements accordingly. The plan may include the following
components:
(i) A minimum of one-half of a school year, and an additional
significant amount of time if necessary, of intensive mentorship during
field experience, starting with full-time mentoring and progressing to
increasingly less intensive monitoring and assistance as the intern
demonstrates the skills necessary to take over the classroom with less
intensive support. For route one and two candidates, before the
supervision is diminished, the mentor of the teacher candidate at the
school and the supervisor of the teacher candidate from the ((higher
education)) teacher preparation program must both agree that the
teacher candidate is ready to manage the classroom with less intensive
supervision. For route three and four candidates, the mentor of the
teacher candidate shall make the decision;
(ii) Identification of performance indicators based on the
knowledge and skills standards required for residency certification by
the Washington professional educator standards board;
(iii) Identification of benchmarks that will indicate when the
standard is met for all performance indicators;
(iv) A description of strategies for assessing candidate
performance on the benchmarks;
(v) Identification of one or more tools to be used to assess a
candidate's performance once the candidate has been in the classroom
for about one-half of a school year; ((and))
(vi) A description of the criteria that would result in residency
certification after about one-half of a school year but before the end
of the program; and
(vii) A description of how the district intends for the alternative
route program to support its workforce development plan and how the
presence of alternative route interns will advance its school
improvement plans.
(((2))) (3) To the extent funds are appropriated for this purpose,
((districts)) alternative route programs may apply for program funds to
pay stipends to trained mentor teachers of interns during the mentored
internship. The per intern amount of mentor stipend provided by state
funds shall not exceed five hundred dollars.

Sec. 404 RCW 28A.660.040 and 2009 c 192 s 1 and 2009 c 166 s 1
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
((Partnership grants funded)) Alternative route programs under this
chapter shall operate one to four specific route programs. Successful
completion of the program shall make a candidate eligible for residency
teacher certification. ((For route one and two candidates,)) The
mentor of the teacher candidate at the school and the supervisor of the
teacher candidate from the ((higher education)) teacher preparation
program must both agree that the teacher candidate has successfully
completed the program. ((For route three and four candidates, the
mentor of the teacher candidate shall make the determination that the
candidate has successfully completed the program.))
(1) ((Partnership grant programs seeking funds to operate))
Alternative route programs operating route one programs shall enroll
currently employed classified instructional employees with transferable
associate degrees seeking residency teacher certification with
endorsements in special education, bilingual education, or English as
a second language. It is anticipated that candidates enrolled in this
route will complete both their baccalaureate degree and requirements
for residency certification in two years or less, including a mentored
internship to be completed in the final year. In addition, partnership
programs shall uphold entry requirements for candidates that include:
(a) District or building validation of qualifications, including
one year of successful student interaction and leadership as a
classified instructional employee;
(b) Successful passage of the statewide basic skills exam((, when
available)); and
(c) Meeting the age, good moral character, and personal fitness
requirements adopted by rule for teachers.
(2) ((Partnership grant programs seeking funds to operate))
Alternative route programs operating route two programs shall enroll
currently employed classified staff with baccalaureate degrees seeking
residency teacher certification in subject matter shortage areas and
areas with shortages due to geographic location. Candidates enrolled
in this route must complete a mentored internship complemented by
flexibly scheduled training and coursework offered at a local site,
such as a school or educational service district, or online or via
video-conference over the K-20 network, in collaboration with the
partnership program's higher education partner. In addition,
partnership grant programs shall uphold entry requirements for
candidates that include:
(a) District or building validation of qualifications, including
one year of successful student interaction and leadership as classified
staff;
(b) A baccalaureate degree from a regionally accredited institution
of higher education. The individual's college or university grade
point average may be considered as a selection factor;
(c) Successful completion of the ((content test, once the state
content test is available)) subject matter assessment required by RCW
28A.410.220(3);
(d) Meeting the age, good moral character, and personal fitness
requirements adopted by rule for teachers; and
(e) Successful passage of the statewide basic skills exam((, when
available)).
(3) ((Partnership grant)) Alternative route programs seeking funds
to operate route three programs shall enroll individuals with
baccalaureate degrees, who are not employed in the district at the time
of application. When selecting candidates for certification through
route three, districts and approved preparation program providers shall
give priority to individuals who are seeking residency teacher
certification in subject matter shortage areas or shortages due to
geographic locations. ((For route three only, the districts may
include additional candidates in nonshortage subject areas if the
candidates are seeking endorsements with a secondary grade level
designation as defined by rule by the professional educator standards
board. The districts shall disclose to candidates in nonshortage
subject areas available information on the demand in those subject
areas.)) Cohorts of candidates for this route shall attend an
intensive summer teaching academy, followed by a full year employed by
a district in a mentored internship, followed, if necessary, by a
second summer teaching academy. In addition, partnership programs
shall uphold entry requirements for candidates that include:
(a) A baccalaureate degree from a regionally accredited institution
of higher education. The individual's grade point average may be
considered as a selection factor;
(b) Successful completion of the ((content test, once the state
content test is available)) subject matter assessment required by RCW
28A.410.220(3);
(c) External validation of qualifications, including demonstrated
successful experience with students or children, such as reference
letters and letters of support from previous employers;
(d) Meeting the age, good moral character, and personal fitness
requirements adopted by rule for teachers; and
(e) Successful passage of statewide basic skills exam((s, when
available)).
(4) ((Partnership grant programs seeking funds to operate))
Alternative route programs operating route four programs shall enroll
individuals with baccalaureate degrees, who are employed in the
district at the time of application, or who hold conditional teaching
certificates or emergency substitute certificates. Cohorts of
candidates for this route shall attend an intensive summer teaching
academy, followed by a full year employed by a district in a mentored
internship. If employed on a conditional certificate, the intern may
serve as the teacher of record, supported by a well-trained mentor. In
addition, partnership programs shall uphold entry requirements for
candidates that include:
(a) A baccalaureate degree from a regionally accredited institution
of higher education. The individual's grade point average may be
considered as a selection factor;
(b) Successful completion of the ((content test, once the state
content test is available)) subject matter assessment required by RCW
28A.410.220(3);
(c) External validation of qualifications, including demonstrated
successful experience with students or children, such as reference
letters and letters of support from previous employers;
(d) Meeting the age, good moral character, and personal fitness
requirements adopted by rule for teachers; and
(e) Successful passage of statewide basic skills exam((s, when
available)).
(5) Applicants for alternative route programs who are eligible
veterans or national guard members and who meet the entry requirements
for the alternative route program for which application is made shall
be given preference in admission.

Sec. 405 RCW 28A.660.050 and 2009 c 539 s 3 and 2009 c 192 s 2
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for these
purposes, the conditional scholarship programs in this chapter are
created under the following guidelines:
(1) The programs shall be administered by the higher education
coordinating board. In administering the programs, the higher
education coordinating board has the following powers and duties:
(a) To adopt necessary rules and develop guidelines to administer
the programs;
(b) To collect and manage repayments from participants who do not
meet their service obligations; and
(c) To accept grants and donations from public and private sources
for the programs.
(2) Requirements for participation in the conditional scholarship
programs are as provided in this subsection (2).
(a) The alternative route conditional scholarship program is
limited to interns of ((the partnership grant)) professional educator
standards board-approved alternative routes to teaching programs under
RCW 28A.660.040. For fiscal year 2011, priority must be given to
fiscal year 2010 participants in the alternative route partnership
program. In order to receive conditional scholarship awards,
recipients shall:
(i) Be accepted and maintain enrollment in alternative
certification routes through ((the partnership grant)) a professional
educator standards board-approved program;
(ii) Continue to make satisfactory progress toward completion of
the alternative route certification program and receipt of a residency
teaching certificate; and
(iii) Receive no more than the annual amount of the scholarship,
not to exceed eight thousand dollars, for the cost of tuition, fees,
and educational expenses, including books, supplies, and transportation
for the alternative route certification program in which the recipient
is enrolled. The board may adjust the annual award by the average rate
of resident undergraduate tuition and fee increases at the state
universities as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.
(b) The pipeline for paraeducators conditional scholarship program
is limited to qualified paraeducators as provided by RCW 28A.660.042.
In order to receive conditional scholarship awards, recipients shall:
(i) Be accepted and maintain enrollment at a community and
technical college for no more than two years and attain an associate of
arts degree;
(ii) Continue to make satisfactory progress toward completion of an
associate of arts degree. This progress requirement is a condition for
eligibility into a route one program of the alternative routes to
teacher certification program for a mathematics, special education, or
English as a second language endorsement; and
(iii) Receive no more than the annual amount of the scholarship,
not to exceed four thousand dollars, for the cost of tuition, fees, and
educational expenses, including books, supplies, and transportation for
the alternative route certification program in which the recipient is
enrolled. The board may adjust the annual award by the average rate of
tuition and fee increases at the state community and technical
colleges.
(c) The retooling to teach mathematics and science conditional
scholarship program is limited to current K-12 teachers ((and
individuals having an elementary education certificate but who are not
employed in positions requiring an elementary education certificate as
provided by RCW 28A.660.045)). In order to receive conditional
scholarship awards:
(i) Individuals currently employed as teachers shall pursue a
middle level mathematics or science, or secondary mathematics or
science endorsement; or
(ii) Individuals who are certificated with an elementary education
endorsement((, but not employed in positions requiring an elementary
education certificate,)) shall pursue an endorsement in middle level
mathematics or science, or both; and
(iii) Individuals shall use one of the pathways to endorsement
processes to receive a mathematics or science endorsement, or both,
which shall include passing a mathematics or science endorsement test,
or both tests, plus observation and completing applicable coursework to
attain the proper endorsement; and
(iv) Individuals shall receive no more than the annual amount of
the scholarship, not to exceed three thousand dollars, for the cost of
tuition, test fees, and educational expenses, including books,
supplies, and transportation for the endorsement pathway being pursued.
(3) The Washington professional educator standards board shall
select individuals to receive conditional scholarships. In selecting
recipients, preference shall be given to eligible veterans or national
guard members.
(4) For the purpose of this chapter, a conditional scholarship is
a loan that is forgiven in whole or in part in exchange for service as
a certificated teacher employed in a Washington state K-12 public
school. The state shall forgive one year of loan obligation for every
two years a recipient teaches in a public school. Recipients who fail
to continue a course of study leading to residency teacher
certification or cease to teach in a public school in the state of
Washington in their endorsement area are required to repay the
remaining loan principal with interest.
(5) Recipients who fail to fulfill the required teaching obligation
are required to repay the remaining loan principal with interest and
any other applicable fees. The higher education coordinating board
shall adopt rules to define the terms for repayment, including
applicable interest rates, fees, and deferments.
(6) The higher education coordinating board may deposit all
appropriations, collections, and any other funds received for the
program in this chapter in the future teachers conditional scholarship
account authorized in RCW 28B.102.080.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 406 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
Beginning with the 2010 school year and annually thereafter, each
educational service district, in cooperation with the professional
educator standards board, must convene representatives from school
districts within that region and professional educator standards board-approved educator preparation programs to review district and regional
educator workforce data, make biennial projections of certificate
staffing needs, and identify how recruitment and enrollment plans in
educator preparation programs reflect projected need.

Sec. 407 RCW 28B.76.335 and 2007 c 396 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
As part of the state needs assessment process conducted by the
board in accordance with RCW 28B.76.230, the board shall, in
collaboration with the professional educator standards board, assess
the need for additional ((baccalaureate)) degree and certificate
programs in Washington that specialize in teacher preparation ((in
mathematics, science, and technology)) to meet regional or subject area
shortages. If the board determines that there is a need for additional
programs, then the board shall encourage the appropriate institutions
of higher education or institutional sectors to create such a program.

Sec. 408 RCW 28B.76.230 and 2005 c 258 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall develop a comprehensive and ongoing assessment
process to analyze the need for additional degrees and programs,
additional off-campus centers and locations for degree programs, and
consolidation or elimination of programs by the four-year institutions.
(2) As part of the needs assessment process, the board shall
examine:
(a) Projections of student, employer, and community demand for
education and degrees, including liberal arts degrees, on a regional
and statewide basis;
(b) Current and projected degree programs and enrollment at public
and private institutions of higher education, by location and mode of
service delivery; ((and))
(c) Data from the workforce training and education coordinating
board and the state board for community and technical colleges on the
supply and demand for workforce education and certificates and
associate degrees; and
(d) Data from the professional educator standards board.
(3) Every two years the board shall produce, jointly with the state
board for community and technical colleges, the professional educator
standards board, and the workforce training and education coordinating
board, an assessment of the number and type of higher education and
training credentials required to match employer demand for a skilled
and educated workforce. The assessment shall include the number of
forecasted net job openings at each level of higher education and
training and the number of credentials needed to match the forecast of
net job openings.
(4) The board shall determine whether certain major lines of study
or types of degrees, including applied degrees or research-oriented
degrees, shall be assigned uniquely to some institutions or
institutional sectors in order to create centers of excellence that
focus resources and expertise.
(5) The following activities are subject to approval by the board:
(a) New degree programs by a four-year institution;
(b) Creation of any off-campus program by a four-year institution;
(c) Purchase or lease of major off-campus facilities by a four-year
institution or a community or technical college;
(d) Creation of higher education centers and consortia;
(e) New degree programs and creation of off-campus programs by an
independent college or university in collaboration with a community or
technical college; and
(f) Applied baccalaureate degree programs developed by colleges
under RCW 28B.50.810.
(6) Institutions seeking board approval under this section must
demonstrate that the proposal is justified by the needs assessment
developed under this section. Institutions must also demonstrate how
the proposals align with or implement the statewide strategic master
plan for higher education under RCW 28B.76.200.
(7) The board shall develop clear guidelines and objective
decision-making criteria regarding approval of proposals under this
section, which must include review and consultation with the
institution and other interested agencies and individuals.
(8) The board shall periodically recommend consolidation or
elimination of programs at the four-year institutions, based on the
needs assessment analysis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 409 A new section is added to chapter 28B.76
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The board must establish boundaries for service regions for
institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016
implementing professional educator standards board-approved educator
preparation programs. Regions shall be established to encourage and
support, not exclude, the reach of public institutions of higher
education across the state.
(2) Based on the data in the assessment in RCW 28B.76.230 and
28B.76.335, the board shall determine whether reasonable teacher
preparation program access for prospective teachers is available in
each region. If access is determined to be inadequate in a region, the
institution of higher education responsible for the region shall submit
a plan for meeting the access need to the board.
(3) Partnerships with other teacher preparation program providers
and the use of appropriate technology shall be considered. The board
shall review the plan and, as appropriate, assist the institution in
developing support and resources for implementing the plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 410 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 28A.660.010 (Partnership grant program) and 2004 c 23 s 1
& 2001 c 158 s 2;
(2) RCW 28A.415.100 (Student teaching centers -- Legislative
recognition -- Intent) and 1991 c 258 s 1;
(3) RCW 28A.415.105 (Definitions) and 2006 c 263 s 811, 1995 c 335
s 403, & 1991 c 258 s 2;
(4) RCW 28A.415.130 (Allocation of funds for student teaching
centers) and 2006 c 263 s 813 & 1991 c 258 s 7;
(5) RCW 28A.415.135 (Alternative means of teacher placement) and
1991 c 258 s 8; and
(6) RCW 28A.415.140 (Field experiences) and 1991 c 258 s 9.

PART V
COMMON CORE ADOPTION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall submit to the
education committees of the house of representatives and the senate a
detailed comparison of the learning standards authorized under RCW
28A.655.070 and the standards being developed by a multistate
consortium in which Washington is a participant. The analysis shall
include the comparative level of rigor and specificity of both sets of
standards, and the implications of any identified differences.
(2) The analysis and information in subsection (1) of this section
shall be submitted to the education committees, the governor,
educators, and the public by April 15, or thirty days after the
multistate standards are finalized, whichever occurs later. The
superintendent shall request comments on the analysis, including
whether the superintendent should adopt the standards with, or without,
the addition of current Washington standards not included in the
multistate standards, the additional current standards not to exceed
fifteen percent of the standards for each content area.
(3) After considering the comments received from legislators,
educators, and the public, but no later than August 2, 2010, the
superintendent of public instruction shall adopt the multistate
standards, or adopt the multistate standards with additional standards,
however, the additional current standards are not to exceed fifteen
percent of the standards for each content area.

PART VI
PARENTS AND COMMUNITY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 A new section is added to chapter 28A.605
RCW to read as follows:
School districts are encouraged to strengthen family, school, and
community partnerships by creating spaces in school buildings, if space
is available, where students and families can access the services they
need, such as after-school tutoring, dental and health services,
counseling, or clothing and food banks.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2010-11 school year, each school shall
annually invite parents and community members to provide feedback
regarding their experiences with the school. The school shall
summarize the responses in its annual report under RCW 28A.655.110.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
create a working group with at least one representative from the
statewide parent-teacher organization, and each of the state-level
associations representing teachers and principals. By September 1,
2010, the working group shall develop a model feedback tool that school
districts may use to facilitate the feedback process required in
subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 603 RCW 28A.655.110 and 1999 c 388 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 1994-95 school year, to provide the local
community and electorate with access to information on the educational
programs in the schools in the district, each school shall publish
annually a school performance report and deliver the report to each
parent with children enrolled in the school and make the report
available to the community served by the school. The annual
performance report shall be in a form that can be easily understood and
be used by parents, guardians, and other members of the community who
are not professional educators to make informed educational decisions.
As data from the assessments in RCW 28A.655.060 becomes available, the
annual performance report should enable parents, educators, and school
board members to determine whether students in the district's schools
are attaining mastery of the student learning goals under RCW
28A.150.210, and other important facts about the schools' performance
in assisting students to learn. The annual report shall make
comparisons to a school's performance in preceding years ((and shall
include school level goals under RCW 28A.655.050)), student performance
relative to the goals and the percentage of students performing at each
level of the assessment, a comparison of student performance at each
level of the assessment to the previous year's performance, and
information regarding school-level plans to achieve the goals.
(2) The annual performance report shall include, but not be limited
to: (a) A brief statement of the mission of the school and the school
district; (b) enrollment statistics including student demographics; (c)
expenditures per pupil for the school year; (d) a summary of student
scores on all mandated tests; (e) a concise annual budget report; (f)
student attendance, graduation, and dropout rates; (g) information
regarding the use and condition of the school building or buildings;
(h) a brief description of the learning improvement plans for the
school; (i) a summary of the feedback from parents and community
members obtained under section 602 of this act; and (((i))) (j) an
invitation to all parents and citizens to participate in school
activities.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop by June
30, 1994, and update periodically, a model report form, which shall
also be adapted for computers, that schools may use to meet the
requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section. In order to
make school performance reports broadly accessible to the public, the
superintendent of public instruction, to the extent feasible, shall
make information on each school's report available on or through the
superintendent's internet web site.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
There is a sizeable body of research positively supporting the
involvement of parents taking an engaged and active role in their
child's education. Therefore, the legislature intends to provide state
recognition by the center for the improvement of student learning
within the office of the superintendent of public instruction for
schools that increase the level of direct parental involvement with
their child's education. By September 1, 2010, the center for the
improvement of student learning shall determine the measures to be used
to evaluate the level of parental involvement in a school, including
the number and hours of parents and community members who volunteer,
and the recognition to be provided to schools that are successfully
involving parents in their child's education. The center for the
improvement of student learning shall begin recognizing school
districts using the measures beginning in the 2010-11 school year.

PART VII
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING
Sec. 701 RCW 41.56.100 and 1989 c 45 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A public employer shall have the authority to engage in
collective bargaining with the exclusive bargaining representative and
no public employer shall refuse to engage in collective bargaining with
the exclusive bargaining representative((: PROVIDED, That nothing
contained herein shall require any)). However, a public employer is
not required to bargain collectively with any bargaining representative
concerning any matter which by ordinance, resolution, or charter of
said public employer has been delegated to any civil service commission
or personnel board similar in scope, structure, and authority to the
board created by chapter 41.06 RCW.
(2) Upon the failure of the public employer and the exclusive
bargaining representative to conclude a collective bargaining
agreement, any matter in dispute may be submitted by either party to
the commission. This subsection does not apply to negotiations and
mediations conducted between a school district employer and an
exclusive bargaining representative under section 105 of this act.
(3) If a public employer implements its last and best offer where
there is no contract settlement, allegations that either party is
violating the terms of the implemented offer shall be subject to
grievance arbitration procedures if and as such procedures are set
forth in the implemented offer, or, if not in the implemented offer, if
and as such procedures are set forth in the parties' last contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702 A new section is added to chapter 41.56
RCW to read as follows:
All collective bargaining agreements entered into between a school
district employer and school district employees under this chapter
after the effective date of this section, as well as bargaining
agreements existing on the effective date of this section but renewed
or extended after the effective date of this section, shall be
consistent with section 105 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703 A new section is added to chapter 41.59
RCW to read as follows:
All collective bargaining agreements entered into between a school
district employer and school district employees under this chapter
after the effective date of this section, as well as bargaining
agreements existing on the effective date of this section but renewed
or extended after the effective date of this section, shall be
consistent with section 105 of this act.

Sec. 704 RCW 41.59.120 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 288 s 13 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Either an employer or an exclusive bargaining representative
may declare that an impasse has been reached between them in collective
bargaining and may request the commission to appoint a mediator for the
purpose of assisting them in reconciling their differences and
resolving the controversy on terms which are mutually acceptable. If
the commission determines that its assistance is needed, not later than
five days after the receipt of a request therefor, it shall appoint a
mediator in accordance with rules and regulations for such appointment
prescribed by the commission. The mediator shall meet with the parties
or their representatives, or both, forthwith, either jointly or
separately, and shall take such other steps as he may deem appropriate
in order to persuade the parties to resolve their differences and
effect a mutually acceptable agreement. The mediator, without the
consent of both parties, shall not make findings of fact or recommend
terms of settlement. The services of the mediator, including, if any,
per diem expenses, shall be provided by the commission without cost to
the parties. Nothing in this subsection (1) shall be construed to
prevent the parties from mutually agreeing upon their own mediation
procedure, and in the event of such agreement, the commission shall not
appoint its own mediator unless failure to do so would be inconsistent
with the effectuation of the purposes and policy of this chapter.
(2) If the mediator is unable to effect settlement of the
controversy within ten days after his or her appointment, either party,
by written notification to the other, may request that their
differences be submitted to fact-finding with recommendations, except
that the time for mediation may be extended by mutual agreement between
the parties. Within five days after receipt of the aforesaid written
request for fact-finding, the parties shall select a person to serve as
fact finder and obtain a commitment from that person to serve. If they
are unable to agree upon a fact finder or to obtain such a commitment
within that time, either party may request the commission to designate
a fact finder. The commission, within five days after receipt of such
request, shall designate a fact finder in accordance with rules and
regulations for such designation prescribed by the commission. The
fact finder so designated shall not be the same person who was
appointed mediator pursuant to subsection (1) of this section without
the consent of both parties.
The fact finder, within five days after his appointment, shall meet
with the parties or their representatives, or both, either jointly or
separately, and make inquiries and investigations, hold hearings, and
take such other steps as he may deem appropriate. For the purpose of
such hearings, investigations and inquiries, the fact finder shall have
the power to issue subpoenas requiring the attendance and testimony of
witnesses and the production of evidence. If the dispute is not
settled within ten days after his appointment, the fact finder shall
make findings of fact and recommend terms of settlement within thirty
days after his appointment, which recommendations shall be advisory
only.
(3) Such recommendations, together with the findings of fact, shall
be submitted in writing to the parties and the commission privately
before they are made public. Either the commission, the fact finder,
the employer, or the exclusive bargaining representative may make such
findings and recommendations public if the dispute is not settled
within five days after their receipt from the fact finder.
(4) The costs for the services of the fact finder, including, if
any, per diem expenses and actual and necessary travel and subsistence
expenses, and any other incurred costs, shall be borne by the
commission without cost to the parties.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an
employer and an exclusive bargaining representative from agreeing to
substitute, at their own expense, their own procedure for resolving
impasses in collective bargaining for that provided in this section or
from agreeing to utilize for the purposes of this section any other
governmental or other agency or person in lieu of the commission.
(6) Any fact finder designated by an employer and an exclusive
representative or the commission for the purposes of this section shall
be deemed an agent of the state.
(7) This section does not apply to negotiations and mediations
conducted under section 105 of this act.

PART VIII
CLOSING THE ACHIEVEMENT GAP
Sec. 801 RCW 28A.300.136 and 2009 c 468 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An achievement gap oversight and accountability committee is
created to synthesize the findings and recommendations from the 2008
achievement gap studies into an implementation plan, and to recommend
policies and strategies to the superintendent of public instruction,
the professional educator standards board, and the state board of
education to close the achievement gap.
(2) The committee shall recommend specific policies and strategies
in at least the following areas:
(a) Supporting and facilitating parent and community involvement
and outreach;
(b) Enhancing the cultural competency of current and future
educators and the cultural relevance of curriculum and instruction;
(c) Expanding pathways and strategies to prepare and recruit
diverse teachers and administrators;
(d) Recommending current programs and resources that should be
redirected to narrow the gap;
(e) Identifying data elements and systems needed to monitor
progress in closing the gap;
(f) Making closing the achievement gap part of the school and
school district improvement process; and
(g) Exploring innovative school models that have shown success in
closing the achievement gap.
(3) Taking a multidisciplinary approach, the committee may seek
input and advice from other state and local agencies and organizations
with expertise in health, social services, gang and violence
prevention, substance abuse prevention, and other issues that
disproportionately affect student achievement and student success.
(4) The achievement gap oversight and accountability committee
shall be composed of the following members:
(a) The chairs and ranking minority members of the house and senate
education committees, or their designees;
(b) One additional member of the house of representatives appointed
by the speaker of the house and one additional member of the senate
appointed by the president of the senate;
(c) A representative of the office of the education ombudsman;
(d) A representative of the center for the improvement of student
learning in the office of the superintendent of public instruction;
(e) A representative of federally recognized Indian tribes whose
traditional lands and territories lie within the borders of Washington
state, designated by the federally recognized tribes; and
(f) Four members appointed by the governor in consultation with the
state ethnic commissions, who represent the following populations:
African-Americans, Hispanic Americans, Asian Americans, and Pacific
Islander Americans.
(5) The governor and the tribes are encouraged to designate members
who have experience working in and with schools.
(6) The committee may convene ad hoc working groups to obtain
additional input and participation from community members. Members of
ad hoc working groups shall serve without compensation and shall not be
reimbursed for travel or other expenses.
(7) The chair or cochairs of the committee shall be selected by the
members of the committee. Staff support for the committee shall be
provided by the center for the improvement of student learning.
Members of the committee shall serve without compensation but must be
reimbursed as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Legislative
members of the committee shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 44.04.120.
(8) The superintendent of public instruction, the state board of
education, the professional educator standards board, and the quality
education council shall work collaboratively with the achievement gap
oversight and accountability committee to close the achievement gap.

PART IX
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 RCW 28A.305.225 is recodified as a section
in the chapter created in section 902 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902 Sections 101 through 109 and 111 and 112
of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 28A RCW.

--- END ---