BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.45.100 and 1997 c 332 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall require ((periodic)) annual reports from the
nonprofit corporation or its successor nonprofit corporation or
foundation and from the acquiring person or other parties to the
acquisition to ensure compliance with commitments made. The department
may subpoena information and documents and may conduct on-site
compliance audits at the acquiring person's expense. The reports must
continue for ten consecutive years after the completion of the sale.
If the department receives information indicating that the
acquiring person is not fulfilling commitments to the affected
community under RCW 70.45.080, the department shall hold a hearing upon
ten days' notice to the affected parties. If after the hearing the
department determines that the ((information is true, it)) acquiring
person is not fulfilling commitments to the affected community, the
department is authorized to take one or more of the following actions
as conditions of the hospital license: (1) Impose reasonable
conditions on a license such as require corrective action within a
specific period of time; (2) impose civil penalties of not more than
five hundred dollars per day per violation; or (3) suspend, revoke, or
refuse to renew a license. If the terms of corrective action dictated
by the department are not adhered to by the acquiring person according
to required timelines and conditions, the department may immediately
revoke or suspend the hospital license issued to the acquiring person
((pursuant to the procedure established under RCW 70.41.130)), refer
the matter to the attorney general for appropriate action, or both.
The attorney general may seek a court order compelling the acquiring
person to fulfill its commitments under RCW 70.45.080.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.45.080 and 1997 c 332 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall only approve an application if the acquisition
in question will not detrimentally affect the continued existence of
accessible, affordable health care that is responsive to the needs of
the community in which the hospital to be acquired is located. ((To
this end,)) The department shall consult with a qualified independent
expert to determine the health impact of the acquisition in question.
The health impact study will provide the department with health data
regarding the impact of the sale and identify specific conditions that
should be placed on a proposed sale to ensure that it provides the most
benefit possible to the people of the impacted area. Any costs related
to the consultation shall be at the expense of the acquiring person, in
addition to the fees charged under RCW 70.45.030. The department shall
not approve an application unless, at a minimum, it determines that:
(1) Sufficient safeguards are included to assure the affected
community continued access to affordable care, and that alternative
sources of care are available in the community should the acquisition
result in a reduction or elimination of particular health services;
(2) The acquisition will not result in the revocation of hospital
privileges;
(3) Sufficient safeguards are included to maintain appropriate
capacity for health science research and health care provider
education;
(4) The acquiring person and parties to the acquisition are
committed to providing health care to the disadvantaged, the uninsured,
and the underinsured and to providing benefits to promote improved
health in the affected community. Activities and funding provided
under RCW 70.45.070(8) may be considered in evaluating compliance with
this commitment; and
(5) Sufficient safeguards are included to avoid conflict of
interest in patient referral.

--- END ---