BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.16.035 and 2005 c 410 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall classify all occupations or industries in
accordance with their degree of hazard and fix therefor basic rates of
premium which shall be:
(a) The lowest necessary to maintain actuarial solvency of the
accident and medical aid funds in accordance with recognized insurance
principles; and
(b) Designed to attempt to limit fluctuations in premium rates.
(2) The department shall formulate and adopt rules governing the
method of premium calculation and collection and providing for a rating
system consistent with recognized principles of workers' compensation
insurance which shall be designed to stimulate and encourage accident
prevention and to facilitate collection. The department may
annually((, or at such other times as it deems necessary to achieve the
objectives under this section,)) readjust rates in accordance with the
rating system to become effective on ((such dates as the department may
designate)) January 1st. Rate notices shall be sent to all employers
by November 1st of each year indicating the rate that will apply for
the following calendar year.
(3)(a) After the first report is issued by the state auditor under
RCW 51.44.115, the workers' compensation advisory committee shall
review the report and, as the committee deems appropriate, may make
recommendations to the department concerning:
(i) The level or levels of a contingency reserve that are
appropriate to maintain actuarial solvency of the accident and medical
aid funds, limit premium rate fluctuations, and account for economic
conditions; and
(ii) When surplus funds exist in the trust funds, the circumstances
under which the department should give premium dividends, or similar
measures, or temporarily reduce rates below the rates fixed under
subsection (1) of this section, including any recommendations regarding
notifications that should be given before taking the action.
(b) Following subsequent reports issued by the state auditor under
RCW 51.44.115, the workers' compensation advisory committee may, as it
deems appropriate, update its recommendations to the department on the
matters covered under (a) of this subsection.
(4) In providing a retrospective rating plan under RCW 51.18.010,
the department may consider each individual retrospective rating group
as a single employing entity for purposes of dividends or premium
discounts.

--- END ---