BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is a
continuing, critical shortage of nurses in Washington and that the
state must increase its efforts to educate nurses to meet the future
demands in the state. The legislature further finds that eLearning
programs, such as the successful eLearning nursing program at Lower
Columbia College, merit special recognition for enhancing the
opportunities of students from all regions of Washington to access high
quality nursing preparation coursework. The legislature further finds
that the eLearning program in nursing at Lower Columbia College should
be shared, replicated, and expanded to the greatest extent possible.
The legislature recognizes that a major obstacle to expansion of
nursing programs is the cost of developing and the availability of
clinical sites. The legislature further recognizes the need to develop
additional pathways for the development of clinical nursing sites for
eLearning students on a statewide basis.

--- END ---