BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.04.005 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 10 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
For the purposes of this title, unless the context indicates
otherwise, the following definitions shall apply:
(1) "Public assistance" or "assistance" -- Public aid to persons in
need thereof for any cause, including services, medical care,
assistance grants, disbursing orders, work relief, general assistance
and federal-aid assistance.
(2) "Department" -- The department of social and health services.
(3) "County or local office" -- The administrative office for one or
more counties or designated service areas.
(4) "Director" or "secretary" means the secretary of social and
health services.
(5) "Federal-aid assistance" -- The specific categories of assistance
for which provision is made in any federal law existing or hereafter
passed by which payments are made from the federal government to the
state in aid or in respect to payment by the state for public
assistance rendered to any category of needy persons for which
provision for federal funds or aid may from time to time be made, or a
federally administered needs-based program.
(6)(((a) "General assistance" -- Aid to persons in need who:
(i) Are not eligible to receive federal-aid assistance, other than
food stamps or food stamp benefits transferred electronically and
medical assistance; however, an individual who refuses or fails to
cooperate in obtaining federal-aid assistance, without good cause, is
not eligible for general assistance;
(ii) Meet one of the following conditions:
(A) Pregnant: PROVIDED, That need is based on the current income
and resource requirements of the federal temporary assistance for needy
families program; or
(B) Subject to chapter 165, Laws of 1992, incapacitated from
gainful employment by reason of bodily or mental infirmity that will
likely continue for a minimum of ninety days as determined by the
department.
(C) Persons who are unemployable due to alcohol or drug addiction
are not eligible for general assistance. Persons receiving general
assistance on July 26, 1987, or becoming eligible for such assistance
thereafter, due to an alcohol or drug-related incapacity, shall be
referred to appropriate assessment, treatment, shelter, or supplemental
security income referral services as authorized under chapter 74.50
RCW. Referrals shall be made at the time of application or at the time
of eligibility review. Alcoholic and drug addicted clients who are
receiving general assistance on July 26, 1987, may remain on general
assistance if they otherwise retain their eligibility until they are
assessed for services under chapter 74.50 RCW. Subsection
(6)(a)(ii)(B) of this section shall not be construed to prohibit the
department from granting general assistance benefits to alcoholics and
drug addicts who are incapacitated due to other physical or mental
conditions that meet the eligibility criteria for the general
assistance program;
(iii) Are citizens or aliens lawfully admitted for permanent
residence or otherwise residing in the United States under color of
law; and
(iv) Have furnished the department their social security account
number. If the social security account number cannot be furnished
because it has not been issued or is not known, an application for a
number shall be made prior to authorization of assistance, and the
social security number shall be provided to the department upon
receipt.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (6)(a)(i), (ii),
and (c) of this section, general assistance shall be provided to the
following recipients of federal-aid assistance:
(i) Recipients of supplemental security income whose need, as
defined in this section, is not met by such supplemental security
income grant because of separation from a spouse; or
(ii) To the extent authorized by the legislature in the biennial
appropriations act, to recipients of temporary assistance for needy
families whose needs are not being met because of a temporary reduction
in monthly income below the entitled benefit payment level caused by
loss or reduction of wages or unemployment compensation benefits or
some other unforeseen circumstances. The amount of general assistance
authorized shall not exceed the difference between the entitled benefit
payment level and the amount of income actually received.
(c) General assistance shall be provided only to persons who are
not members of assistance units receiving federal aid assistance,
except as provided in subsection (6)(a)(ii)(A) and (b) of this section,
and will accept available services which can reasonably be expected to
enable the person to work or reduce the need for assistance unless
there is good cause to refuse. Failure to accept such services shall
result in termination until the person agrees to cooperate in accepting
such services and subject to the following maximum periods of
ineligibility after reapplication:
(i) First failure: One week;
(ii) Second failure within six months: One month;
(iii) Third and subsequent failure within one year: Two months.
(d) Persons found eligible for general assistance based on
incapacity from gainful employment may, if otherwise eligible, receive
general assistance pending application for federal supplemental
security income benefits. Any general assistance that is subsequently
duplicated by the person's receipt of supplemental security income for
the same period shall be considered a debt due the state and shall by
operation of law be subject to recovery through all available legal
remedies.
(e) The department shall adopt by rule medical criteria for general
assistance eligibility to ensure that eligibility decisions are
consistent with statutory requirements and are based on clear,
objective medical information.
(f) The process implementing the medical criteria shall involve
consideration of opinions of the treating or consulting physicians or
health care professionals regarding incapacity, and any eligibility
decision which rejects uncontroverted medical opinion must set forth
clear and convincing reasons for doing so.
(g) Recipients of general assistance based upon a finding of
incapacity from gainful employment who remain otherwise eligible shall
have their benefits discontinued unless the recipient demonstrates no
material improvement in their medical or mental condition. The
department may discontinue benefits when there was specific error in
the prior determination that found the recipient eligible by reason of
incapacitation. Recipients of general assistance based upon pregnancy
who relinquish their child for adoption, remain otherwise eligible, and
are not eligible to receive benefits under the federal temporary
assistance for needy families program shall not have their benefits
terminated until the end of the month in which the period of six weeks
following the birth of the recipient's child falls. Recipients of the
federal temporary assistance for needy families program who lose their
eligibility solely because of the birth and relinquishment of the
qualifying child may receive general assistance through the end of the
month in which the period of six weeks following the birth of the child
falls.
(h) No person may be considered an eligible individual for general
assistance with respect to any month if during that month the person:
(i) Is fleeing to avoid prosecution of, or to avoid custody or
confinement for conviction of, a felony, or an attempt to commit a
felony, under the laws of the state of Washington or the place from
which the person flees; or
(ii) Is violating a condition of probation, community supervision,
or parole imposed under federal or state law for a felony or gross
misdemeanor conviction.
(7))) "Applicant" -- Any person who has made a request, or on behalf
of whom a request has been made, to any county or local office for
assistance.
(((8))) (7) "Recipient" -- Any person receiving assistance and in
addition those dependents whose needs are included in the recipient's
assistance.
(((9))) (8) "Standards of assistance" -- The level of income required
by an applicant or recipient to maintain a level of living specified by
the department.
(((10))) (9) "Resource" -- Any asset, tangible or intangible, owned
by or available to the applicant at the time of application, which can
be applied toward meeting the applicant's need, either directly or by
conversion into money or its equivalent. The department may by rule
designate resources that an applicant may retain and not be ineligible
for public assistance because of such resources. Exempt resources
shall include, but are not limited to:
(a) A home that an applicant, recipient, or their dependents is
living in, including the surrounding property;
(b) Household furnishings and personal effects;
(c) A motor vehicle, other than a motor home, used and useful
having an equity value not to exceed five thousand dollars;
(d) A motor vehicle necessary to transport a ((physically
disabled)) household member with a physical disability. This exclusion
is limited to one vehicle per ((physically disabled)) person with a
physical disability;
(e) All other resources, including any excess of values exempted,
not to exceed one thousand dollars or other limit as set by the
department, to be consistent with limitations on resources and
exemptions necessary for federal aid assistance. The department shall
also allow recipients of temporary assistance for needy families to
exempt savings accounts with combined balances of up to an additional
three thousand dollars;
(f) Applicants for or recipients of ((general assistance))
temporary assistance for unemployable persons and assistance for the
aged, blind, and disabled shall have their eligibility based on
resource limitations consistent with the temporary assistance for needy
families program rules adopted by the department; and
(g) If an applicant for or recipient of public assistance possesses
property and belongings in excess of the ceiling value, such value
shall be used in determining the need of the applicant or recipient,
except that: (i) The department may exempt resources or income when
the income and resources are determined necessary to the applicant's or
recipient's restoration to independence, to decrease the need for
public assistance, or to aid in rehabilitating the applicant or
recipient or a dependent of the applicant or recipient; and (ii) the
department may provide grant assistance for a period not to exceed nine
months from the date the agreement is signed pursuant to this section
to persons who are otherwise ineligible because of excess real property
owned by such persons when they are making a good faith effort to
dispose of that property: PROVIDED, That:
(A) The applicant or recipient signs an agreement to repay the
lesser of the amount of aid received or the net proceeds of such sale;
(B) If the owner of the excess property ceases to make good faith
efforts to sell the property, the entire amount of assistance may
become an overpayment and a debt due the state and may be recovered
pursuant to RCW 43.20B.630;
(C) Applicants and recipients are advised of their right to a fair
hearing and afforded the opportunity to challenge a decision that good
faith efforts to sell have ceased, prior to assessment of an
overpayment under this section; and
(D) At the time assistance is authorized, the department files a
lien without a sum certain on the specific property.
(((11))) (10) "Income" -- (a) All appreciable gains in real or
personal property (cash or kind) or other assets, which are received by
or become available for use and enjoyment by an applicant or recipient
during the month of application or after applying for or receiving
public assistance. The department may by rule and regulation exempt
income received by an applicant for or recipient of public assistance
which can be used by him or her to decrease his or her need for public
assistance or to aid in rehabilitating him or her or his or her
dependents, but such exemption shall not, unless otherwise provided in
this title, exceed the exemptions of resources granted under this
chapter to an applicant for public assistance. In addition, for cash
assistance the department may disregard income pursuant to RCW
74.08A.230 and 74.12.350.
(b) If, under applicable federal requirements, the state has the
option of considering property in the form of lump sum compensatory
awards or related settlements received by an applicant or recipient as
income or as a resource, the department shall consider such property to
be a resource.
(((12))) (11) "Need" -- The difference between the applicant's or
recipient's standards of assistance for himself or herself and the
dependent members of his or her family, as measured by the standards of
the department, and value of all nonexempt resources and nonexempt
income received by or available to the applicant or recipient and the
dependent members of his or her family.
(((13))) (12) For purposes of determining eligibility for public
assistance and participation levels in the cost of medical care, the
department shall exempt restitution payments made to people of Japanese
and Aleut ancestry pursuant to the Civil Liberties Act of 1988 and the
Aleutian and Pribilof Island Restitution Act passed by congress, P.L.
100-383, including all income and resources derived therefrom.
(((14))) (13) In the construction of words and phrases used in this
title, the singular number shall include the plural, the masculine
gender shall include both the feminine and neuter genders and the
present tense shall include the past and future tenses, unless the
context thereof shall clearly indicate to the contrary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent that funds are appropriated for the particular
purposes of temporary assistance for unemployable persons, temporary
assistance for unemployable persons may be provided to persons in need
who:
(a) Are not eligible to receive federal-aid assistance, other than
medical assistance or supplemental nutrition assistance program
benefits. However, an individual who refuses or fails to cooperate in
obtaining federal-aid assistance, without good cause, is not eligible
for temporary assistance for unemployable persons;
(b) Meet the following requirements:
(i) Are pregnant, if the need is based on the current income and
resource requirements of the federal temporary assistance for needy
families program;
(ii) Are determined by the department to be incapacitated from
gainful employment by reason of physical or mental impairment that will
likely continue for a minimum of ninety days and do not qualify for
state assistance for the aged, blind, and disabled under section 3 of
this act; or
(iii) Are determined by the department to be incapacitated from
gainful employment solely by reason of drug or alcohol dependency,
which incapacity will likely continue for a minimum of ninety days;
(c) Are citizens or aliens lawfully admitted for permanent
residence or otherwise residing in the United States under color of
law;
(d) Have furnished the department their social security account
number. If the social security account number cannot be furnished
because it has not been issued or is not known, an application for a
number shall be made prior to authorization of assistance, and the
social security number shall be provided to the department upon
receipt; and
(e) Have not refused or failed without good cause to participate in
drug or alcohol treatment if an assessment by a certified chemical
dependency counselor indicates a need for such treatment. Good cause
may be found to exist when a person's physical or mental condition, as
determined by the department, prevents the person from participating in
drug or alcohol dependency treatment. However, good cause does not
exist if the person is not able to participate because drug or alcohol
dependency treatment is not available.
(2) Assistance under subsection (1)(b)(i) of this section shall be
provided only to persons who accept available services that can
reasonably be expected to enable the person to work or reduce the need
for assistance. Failure to accept such services without good cause
shall result in termination. After reapplication and agreeing to
cooperate in accepting such services, the person shall be subject to
the following periods of ineligibility:
(a) First failure: One week;
(b) Second failure within six months of first failure: One month;
(c) Third and subsequent failure within one year of first failure:
Two months.
(3) Persons found eligible for temporary assistance for the
unemployable may, if otherwise eligible, receive assistance pending a
final determination of eligibility for federal supplemental security
income benefits. Any assistance that is subsequently duplicated by the
person's receipt of supplemental security income for the same period
shall be considered a debt due the state and shall by operation of law
be subject to recovery through all available legal remedies. Persons
found eligible for temporary assistance for unemployable persons may,
if otherwise eligible, receive assistance under this section pending a
final determination regarding the client's eligibility for state
assistance under section 3 of this act. Any assistance received under
this section shall be credited and deducted from any assistance the
client is subsequently determined eligible to receive under section 3
of this act during any same period.
(4) The department shall adopt rules consistent with the statutory
requirements of this title that are necessary for the administration of
the temporary assistance for unemployable persons program.
(a) For assistance under subsection (1)(b)(i) of this section, such
rules shall include medical criteria necessary to ensure that
incapacity decisions are based on clear, objective medical information.
(i) The process implementing the medical criteria shall involve
consideration of opinions of the treating or consulting physicians or
health care professionals regarding incapacity and any eligibility
decision which rejects uncontroverted medical opinion must set forth
clear and convincing reasons for doing so.
(ii) The department shall adopt by rule criteria for conducting
periodic reviews of the eligibility of recipients of temporary
assistance for unemployable persons. The department may discontinue
benefits if a recipient is unable to demonstrate that his or her
medical or mental impairment continues to meet the criteria established
under this subsection or when there was a specific error in the prior
incapacity decision.
(b) For assistance under subsection (1)(b)(ii) of this section, the
department shall provide client assessment, treatment, and support
services. The assessment shall include diagnostic evaluation and
arranging for admission into treatment and supported living programs.
The department shall base its determination of incapacity due to drug
or alcohol dependency on documented evidence by a drug or alcohol
treatment professional who is determined by the department to be
qualified to make this finding.
(5) A person may not be considered an eligible individual for
temporary assistance for the unemployable with respect to any month if
during that month the person:
(a) Is fleeing to avoid prosecution of, or to avoid custody or
confinement for conviction of, a felony, or an attempt to commit a
felony, under the laws of the state of Washington or the place from
which the person flees; or
(b) Is violating a condition of probation, community supervision,
or parole imposed under federal or state law for a felony or gross
misdemeanor conviction.
(6) In order to administer the program within the funds
appropriated for temporary assistance for unemployable persons, the
department may by rule establish methods to limit the number of
recipients of such assistance. These methods may include a limit on
the number of months a person may receive such assistance or a freeze
on new enrollment in the program. In determining the number of months
a person may receive temporary assistance for unemployable persons, the
department may include months the person received general assistance or
medical care services based on eligibility for drug or alcohol
dependency services prior to the effective date of this act. In order
to rationally allocate drug and alcohol dependency treatment services,
the department may establish by rule additional eligibility criteria,
including the setting of priorities among classes of persons found
incapacitated under subsection (1)(b)(ii) of this section for treatment
services. Such rules shall give first priority for treatment services
to pregnant women and parents of young children.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The assistance for the aged, blind, and disabled program shall
provide income assistance for persons in need who:
(a) Are not eligible to receive federal-aid assistance, other than
medical assistance or supplemental nutrition assistance program
benefits. However, an individual who refuses or fails to cooperate in
obtaining federal-aid assistance, without good cause, is not eligible
for assistance for the aged, blind, and disabled; and
(b) Meet the following requirements:
(i) Are residents of a long-term care facility or who have been
determined by the department to be aged, blind, or disabled based on
age, blindness, and disability standards used to establish eligibility
for supplemental security income under Title XVI of the federal social
security act;
(ii) Are citizens or aliens lawfully admitted for permanent
residence or otherwise residing in the United States under color of
law;
(iii) Have furnished the department their social security account
number. If the social security account number cannot be furnished
because it has not been issued or is not known, an application for a
number shall be made prior to authorization of assistance, and the
social security number shall be provided to the department upon
receipt; and
(iv) Have not refused or failed without good cause to participate
in drug or alcohol treatment if an assessment by a certified chemical
dependency counselor indicates a need for such treatment.
(2) Assistance shall be provided only to persons who will accept
available services that can reasonably be expected to reduce the need
for assistance. Failure to accept such services without good cause
shall result in termination. After reapplication and agreeing to
cooperate in accepting such services, the person shall be subject to
the following maximum periods of ineligibility:
(a) First failure: One week;
(b) Second failure within six months of first failure: One month;
(c) Third and subsequent failure within one year of first failure:
Two months.
(3) The department shall adopt rules consistent with the statutory
requirements of this title that are necessary for the administration of
the assistance for the aged, blind, and disabled program. Such rules
shall include medical criteria for disability and blindness
determinations to ensure that eligibility decisions are consistent with
federal statutory requirements for the supplemental security income
program and are based on clear, objective medical information.
(4) The department shall by rule adopt criteria for conducting
periodic reviews of the eligibility of recipients of assistance for the
aged, blind, and disabled whose eligibility is based on a determination
of blindness or disability. The department may discontinue such
benefits if it determines the recipient's medical or mental impairment
no longer meets the criteria established under subsection (3) of this
section or when there was specific error in the prior determination of
disability or blindness. If benefits are discontinued under this
subsection, the department shall redetermine the person's eligibility
for temporary assistance for unemployable persons under section 2 of
this act.
(5)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this
section, persons who appear eligible to receive supplemental security
income under Title XVI of the federal social security act may, if
otherwise eligible, receive interim assistance for the aged, blind, and
disabled pending final determination on an application for federal
supplemental security income benefits, as provided for in RCW
74.04.620. Upon a final determination of eligibility by the social
security administration, interim assistance for the aged, blind, and
disabled will cease. Any assistance that is subsequently duplicated by
the person's receipt of supplemental security income for the same
period shall be considered a debt due the state and shall by operation
of law be subject to recovery through all available legal remedies.
(b) If a person has been denied interim assistance to the aged,
blind, and disabled under this subsection and has not been found by the
social security administration to be eligible for supplemental security
income, the department shall determine the person's eligibility for
temporary assistance for unemployable persons under section 2 of this
act.
(6) A person may not be considered an eligible individual for
assistance to the aged, blind, and disabled with respect to any month
if during that month the person:
(a) Is fleeing to avoid prosecution of, or to avoid custody or
confinement for conviction of, a felony, or an attempt to commit a
felony, under the laws of the state of Washington or the place from
which the person flees; or
(b) Is violating a condition of probation, community supervision,
or parole imposed under federal or state law for a felony or gross
misdemeanor conviction.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.04.230 and 1982 c 204 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
Persons eligible for ((general assistance under RCW 74.04.005))
temporary assistance for unemployable persons under section 2 of this
act and assistance for the aged, blind, and disabled under section 3 of
this act are eligible for mental health services to the extent that
they meet the client definitions and priorities established by chapter
71.24 RCW.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.04.266 and 1977 ex.s. c 215 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
In determining need for ((general)) temporary assistance for
unemployable persons as defined in ((RCW 74.04.005(6)(a))) section 2 of
this act and assistance for the aged, blind, and disabled as defined in
section 3 of this act, the department may by rule and regulation
establish a monthly earned income exemption in an amount not to exceed
the exemption allowable under disability programs authorized in Title
XVI of the federal social security act.

Sec. 6 RCW 74.04.620 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 41 s 37 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The department is authorized to establish a program of state
supplementation to the national program of supplemental security income
consistent with Public Law 92-603 and Public Law 93-66 to those persons
who are in need thereof in accordance with eligibility requirements
established by the department.
(2) The department is authorized to establish reasonable standards
of assistance and resource and income exemptions specifically for such
program of state supplementation which shall be consistent with the
provisions of the Social Security Act.
(3) The department is authorized to make payments to applicants for
supplemental security income, pursuant to agreements as provided in
Public Law 93-368, ((who are otherwise eligible)) but for ((general
assistance)) their eligibility to receive supplemental security income
would receive temporary assistance for unemployable persons and
assistance for the aged, blind, and disabled, as provided in section 3
of this act.
(4) Any agreement between the department and a supplemental
security income applicant providing for the reimbursement of interim
assistance to the department shall provide, if the applicant has been
represented by an attorney, that twenty-five percent of the
reimbursement received shall be withheld by the department and all or
such portion thereof as has been approved as a fee by the United States
department of health and human services shall be released directly to
the applicant's attorney. The secretary may maintain such records as
are deemed appropriate to measure the cost and effectiveness of such
agreements and may make recommendations concerning the continued use of
such agreements to the legislature.

Sec. 7 RCW 74.09.035 and 1987 c 406 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To the extent of available funds, medical care services may be
provided to recipients of ((general)) temporary assistance for
unemployable persons chapter 74.08 RCW, assistance for the aged, blind,
and disabled under chapter 74.08 RCW, and recipients of alcohol and
drug addiction services provided under chapter 74.50 RCW, in accordance
with medical eligibility requirements established by the department.
(2) ((Determination of)) In order to administer the program within
the funds appropriated for medical care services for recipients of
temporary assistance for unemployable persons, assistance for the aged,
blind, and disabled, or alcohol or drug dependency or abuse services,
the department may impose limitations on the amount, scope, and
duration of medical care services ((shall be limited to coverage as
defined by the department, except that)) provided to recipients may
limit the number of persons receiving medical care services, and may
limit the number of months of coverage. However, adult dental((,)) and
routine foot care shall not be included unless there is a specific
appropriation for these services.
(3) The department shall establish standards of assistance and
resource and income exemptions, which may include deductibles and co-insurance provisions. In addition, the department may include a
prohibition against the voluntary assignment of property or cash for
the purpose of qualifying for assistance.
(4) Residents of skilled nursing homes, intermediate care
facilities, and intermediate care facilities for the mentally retarded
who are eligible for medical care services shall be provided medical
services to the same extent as provided to those persons eligible under
the medical assistance program.
(5) Payments made by the department under this program shall be the
limit of expenditures for medical care services solely from state
funds.
(6) Eligibility for medical care services shall commence with the
date of certification for ((general assistance)) temporary assistance
for unemployable persons or assistance for the aged, blind, and
disabled under chapter 74.08 RCW or the date of eligibility for alcohol
and drug addiction services provided under chapter 74.50 RCW.

Sec. 8 RCW 74.09.010 and 2007 c 3 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Children's health program" means the health care services
program provided to children under eighteen years of age and in
households with incomes at or below the federal poverty level as
annually defined by the federal department of health and human services
as adjusted for family size, and who are not otherwise eligible for
medical assistance or the limited casualty program for the medically
needy.
(2) "Committee" means the children's health services committee
((created in section 3 of this act)).
(3) "County" means the board of county commissioners, county
council, county executive, or tribal jurisdiction, or its designee. A
combination of two or more county authorities or tribal jurisdictions
may enter into joint agreements to fulfill the requirements of RCW
74.09.415 through 74.09.435.
(4) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(5) "Department of health" means the Washington state department of
health created pursuant to RCW 43.70.020.
(6) "Internal management" means the administration of medical
assistance, medical care services, the children's health program, and
the limited casualty program.
(7) "Limited casualty program" means the medical care program
provided to medically needy persons as defined under Title XIX of the
federal social security act, and to medically indigent persons who are
without income or resources sufficient to secure necessary medical
services.
(8) "Medical assistance" means the federal aid medical care program
provided to categorically needy persons as defined under Title XIX of
the federal social security act.
(9) "Medical care services" means the limited scope of care
financed by state funds and provided to ((general assistance
recipients)) temporary assistance for unemployed recipients under
chapter 74.08 RCW, assistance for aged, blind, and disabled recipients
under chapter 74.08 RCW, and recipients of alcohol and drug addiction
services provided under chapter 74.50 RCW.
(10) "Nursing home" means nursing home as defined in RCW 18.51.010.
(11) "Poverty" means the federal poverty level determined annually
by the United States department of health and human services, or
successor agency.
(12) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.
(13) "Full benefit dual eligible beneficiary" means an individual
who, for any month: Has coverage for the month under a medicare
prescription drug plan or medicare advantage plan with part D coverage;
and is determined eligible by the state for full medicaid benefits for
the month under any eligibility category in the state's medicaid plan
or a section 1115 demonstration waiver that provides pharmacy benefits.

Sec. 9 RCW 74.09.555 and 2005 c 503 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt rules and policies providing that
when persons with a mental disorder, who were enrolled in medical
assistance immediately prior to confinement, are released from
confinement, their medical assistance coverage will be fully reinstated
on the day of their release, subject to any expedited review of their
continued eligibility for medical assistance coverage that is required
under federal or state law.
(2) The department, in collaboration with the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the department of
corrections, and the regional support networks, shall establish
procedures for coordination between department field offices,
institutions for mental disease, and correctional institutions, as
defined in RCW 9.94.049, that result in prompt reinstatement of
eligibility and speedy eligibility determinations for persons who are
likely to be eligible for medical assistance services upon release from
confinement. Procedures developed under this subsection must address:
(a) Mechanisms for receiving medical assistance services
applications on behalf of confined persons in anticipation of their
release from confinement;
(b) Expeditious review of applications filed by or on behalf of
confined persons and, to the extent practicable, completion of the
review before the person is released;
(c) Mechanisms for providing medical assistance services identity
cards to persons eligible for medical assistance services immediately
upon their release from confinement; and
(d) Coordination with the federal social security administration,
through interagency agreements or otherwise, to expedite processing of
applications for federal supplemental security income or social
security disability benefits, including federal acceptance of
applications on behalf of confined persons.
(3) Where medical or psychiatric examinations during a person's
confinement indicate that the person is disabled, the correctional
institution or institution for mental diseases shall provide the
department with that information for purposes of making medical
assistance eligibility and enrollment determinations prior to the
person's release from confinement. The department shall, to the
maximum extent permitted by federal law, use the examination in making
its determination whether the person is disabled and eligible for
medical assistance.
(4) For purposes of this section, "confined" or "confinement" means
incarcerated in a correctional institution, as defined in RCW 9.94.049,
or admitted to an institute for mental disease, as defined in 42 C.F.R.
part 435, Sec. 1009 on July 24, 2005.
(5) For purposes of this section, "likely to be eligible" means
that a person:
(a) Was enrolled in medicaid or supplemental security income or
((general assistance)) temporary assistance for unemployed recipients
under chapter 74.08 RCW, or assistance for aged, blind, and disabled
recipients under chapter 74.08 RCW immediately before he or she was
confined and his or her enrollment was terminated during his or her
confinement; or
(b) Was enrolled in medicaid or supplemental security income or
((general assistance)) temporary assistance for unemployed recipients
under chapter 74.08 RCW, or assistance for aged, blind, and disabled
recipients under chapter 74.08 RCW at any time during the five years
before his or her confinement, and medical or psychiatric examinations
during the person's confinement indicate that the person continues to
be disabled and the disability is likely to last at least twelve months
following release.
(6) The economic services administration shall adopt standardized
statewide screening and application practices and forms designed to
facilitate the application of a confined person who is likely to be
eligible for medicaid.

Sec. 10 RCW 74.50.060 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 18 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish a shelter assistance program to
provide, within available funds, shelter for persons eligible under
this chapter. "Shelter," "shelter support," or "shelter assistance"
means a facility under contract to the department providing room and
board in a supervised living arrangement, normally in a group or
dormitory setting, to eligible recipients under this chapter. This may
include supervised domiciliary facilities operated under the auspices
of public or private agencies. No facility under contract to the
department shall allow the consumption of alcoholic beverages on the
premises. The department may contract with counties and cities for
such shelter services. To the extent possible, the department shall
not displace existing emergency shelter beds for use as shelter under
this chapter. In areas of the state in which it is not feasible to
develop shelters, due to low numbers of people needing shelter
services, or in which sufficient numbers of shelter beds are not
available, the department may provide shelter through an intensive
protective payee program, unless the department grants an exception on
an individual basis for less intense supervision.
(2) Persons continuously eligible for ((the general)) temporary
assistance(( -- )) for unemployable ((program)) recipients under chapter
74.08 RCW or assistance for aged, blind, and disabled recipients under
chapter 74.08 RCW since July 25, 1987, who transfer to the program
established by this chapter, have the option to continue their present
living situation, but only through a protective payee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 RCW 74.04.0052 (Teen applicants' living
situation -- Criteria -- Presumption -- Protective payee -- Adoption referral)
and 1997 c 58 s 502 & 1994 c 299 s 34 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---