BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.4452 and 2005 c 514 s 1003 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for each person whose research and development spending during
the year in which the credit is claimed exceeds 0.92 percent of the
person's taxable amount during the same calendar year.
(2) The credit ((shall be)) is calculated as follows:
(a) Determine the greater of the amount of qualified research and
development expenditures of a person or eighty percent of amounts
received by a person other than a public educational or research
institution in compensation for the conduct of qualified research and
development;
(b) ((Subtract 0.92 percent of the person's taxable amount from the
amount determined under (a) of this subsection;
(c))) Multiply the amount determined under (((b))) (a) of this
subsection by the following:
(i) For the period June 10, 2004, through December 31, 2006, the
person's average tax rate for the calendar year for which the credit is
claimed;
(ii) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2007, the greater of
the person's average tax rate for that calendar year or 0.75 percent;
(iii) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2008, the greater
of the person's average tax rate for that calendar year or 1.0 percent;
(iv) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2009, the greater of
the person's average tax rate for that calendar year or 1.25 percent;
(v) For ((the calendar year ending December 31, 2010, and
thereafter, 1.50 percent)) qualified research and development
expenditures conducted under contract with a public educational or
research institution or made in an innovation partnership zone.
(3) For purposes of calculating the credit, if a person's reporting
period is less than annual, the person may use an estimated average tax
rate for the calendar year for which the credit is claimed by using the
person's average tax rate for each reporting period. A person who uses
an estimated average tax rate must make an adjustment to the total
credit claimed for the calendar year using the person's actual average
tax rate for the calendar year when the person files its last return
for the calendar year for which the credit is claimed.
(((3))) (4) Any person entitled to the credit provided in
subsection (2) of this section as a result of qualified research and
development conducted under contract may assign all or any portion of
the credit to the person contracting for the performance of the
qualified research and development.
(((4))) (5) The credit, including any credit assigned to a person
under subsection (((3))) (4) of this section, ((shall)) must be claimed
against taxes due for the same calendar year in which the qualified
research and development expenditures are incurred. The credit,
including any credit assigned to a person under subsection (((3))) (4)
of this section, for each calendar year shall not exceed the lesser of
two million dollars or the amount of tax otherwise due under this
chapter for the calendar year.
(((5))) (6) For any person claiming the credit, including any
credit assigned to a person under subsection (((3))) (4) of this
section, whose research and development spending during the calendar
year in which the credit is claimed fails to exceed 0.92 percent of the
person's taxable amount during the same calendar year or who is
otherwise ineligible, the department ((shall)) must declare the taxes
against which the credit was claimed to be immediately due and payable.
The department shall assess interest, but not penalties, on the taxes
against which the credit was claimed. Interest ((shall be)) is
assessed at the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter
82.32 RCW, retroactively to the date the credit was claimed, and
((shall)) accrues until the taxes against which the credit was claimed
are repaid. Any credit assigned to a person under subsection (((3)))
(4) of this section that is disallowed as a result of this section may
be claimed by the person who performed the qualified research and
development subject to the limitations set forth in subsection (((4)))
(5) of this section.
(((6))) (7)(a) The legislature finds that accountability and
effectiveness are important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to
make policy choices regarding the best use of limited state resources
the legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(b) A person claiming the credit ((shall)) must file a complete
annual survey with the department. The survey is due by March 31st
following any year in which a credit is claimed. The department may
extend the due date for timely filing of annual surveys under this
section as provided in RCW 82.32.590. The survey ((shall)) must
include the amount of the tax credit claimed, the qualified research
and development expenditures during the calendar year for which the
credit is claimed, the taxable amount during the calendar year for
which the credit is claimed, the number of new products or research
projects by general classification, the number of trademarks, patents,
and copyrights associated with the research and development activities
for which a credit was claimed, and whether the credit has been
assigned under subsection (((3))) (4) of this section and who assigned
the credit. The survey ((shall)) must also include the following
information for employment positions in Washington:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(c) The department may request additional information necessary to
measure the results of the tax credit program, to be submitted at the
same time as the survey.
(d)(i) All information collected under this subsection, except the
amount of the tax credit claimed, is deemed taxpayer information under
RCW 82.32.330. Information on the amount of tax credit claimed is not
subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be
disclosed to the public upon request, except as provided in this
subsection (((6))) (7)(d). If the amount of the tax credit as reported
on the survey is different than the amount actually claimed on the
taxpayer's tax returns or otherwise allowed by the department, the
amount actually claimed or allowed may be disclosed.
(ii) Persons for whom the actual amount of the tax credit claimed
on the taxpayer's returns or otherwise allowed by the department is
less than ten thousand dollars during the period covered by the survey
may request the department to treat the tax credit amount as
confidential under RCW 82.32.330.
(e) If a person fails to file a complete annual survey required
under this subsection with the department by the due date or any
extension under RCW 82.32.590, the person entitled to the credit
provided in subsection (2) of this section is not eligible to claim or
assign the credit provided in subsection (2) of this section in the
year the person failed to timely file a complete survey.
(((7))) (8) The department shall use the information from
subsection (((6))) (7) of this section to prepare summary descriptive
statistics by category. No fewer than three taxpayers ((shall)) may be
included in any category. The department shall report these statistics
to the legislature each year by September 1st.
(((8))) (9) The department ((shall)) must use the information from
subsection (((6))) (7) of this section to study the tax credit program
authorized under this section. The department ((shall)) must report to
the legislature by December 1, 2009, and December 1, 2013. The reports
((shall)) must measure the effect of the program on job creation, the
number of jobs created for Washington residents, company growth, the
introduction of new products, the diversification of the state's
economy, growth in research and development investment, the movement of
firms or the consolidation of firms' operations into the state, and
such other factors as the department selects.
(((9))) (10) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Average tax rate" means a person's total tax liability under
this chapter for the calendar year for which the credit is claimed
divided by the taxpayer's total taxable amount under this chapter for
the calendar year for which the credit is claimed.
(b) "Qualified research and development expenditures" means
operating expenses, including wages, compensation of a proprietor or a
partner in a partnership as determined under rules adopted by the
department, benefits, supplies, and computer expenses, directly
incurred in qualified research and development by a person claiming the
credit provided in this section. The term does not include amounts
paid to a person other than a public educational or research
institution to conduct qualified research and development. Nor does
the term include capital costs and overhead, such as expenses for land,
structures, or depreciable property.
(c) "Qualified research and development" ((shall have)) has the
same meaning as in RCW 82.63.010.
(d) "Research and development spending" means qualified research
and development expenditures plus eighty percent of amounts paid to a
person other than a public educational or research institution to
conduct qualified research and development.
(e) "Taxable amount" means the taxable amount subject to the tax
imposed in this chapter required to be reported on the person's
combined excise tax returns for the calendar year for which the credit
is claimed, less any taxable amount for which a credit is allowed under
RCW 82.04.440.
(((10))) (11) This section expires January 1, 2015.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.448 and 2003 c 149 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the limits and provisions of this section, a credit
is authorized against the tax otherwise due under RCW 82.04.240(2) for
persons engaged in the business of manufacturing semiconductor
materials. For the purposes of this section "semiconductor materials"
has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.240(2).
(2)(a) ((The credit under this section shall equal three thousand
dollars for each)) For employment positions used in manufacturing
production that takes place in a new building exempt from sales and use
tax under RCW 82.08.965 and 82.12.965, the credit under this section
equals four thousand dollars for each employment position with wages
and benefits greater than fifty thousand dollars annually and two
thousand dollars for each employment position with wages and benefits
between thirty and fifty thousand dollars annually. A credit is earned
for the calendar year a person fills a position. Additionally a credit
is earned for each year the position is maintained over the subsequent
consecutive years, up to eight years. Those positions that are not
filled for the entire year are eligible for fifty percent of the credit
if filled less than six months, and the entire credit if filled more
than six months.
(b) To qualify for the credit, the manufacturing activity of the
person must be conducted at a new building that qualifies for the
exemption from sales and use tax under RCW 82.08.965 and 82.12.965.
(c) In those situations where a production building in existence on
the effective date of this section will be phased out of operation,
during which time employment at the new building at the same site is
increased, the person is eligible for credit for employment at the
existing building and new building, with the limitation that the
combined eligible employment not exceed full employment at the new
building. "Full employment" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.965.
The credit may not be earned until the commencement of commercial
production, as that term is used in RCW 82.08.965.
(3) No application is necessary for the tax credit. The person is
subject to all of the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW. In no case
may a credit earned during one calendar year be carried over to be
credited against taxes incurred in a subsequent calendar year. No
refunds may be granted for credits under this section.
(4) If at any time the department finds that a person is not
eligible for tax credit under this section, the amount of taxes for
which a credit has been claimed ((shall be)) is immediately due. The
department ((shall)) must assess interest, but not penalties, on the
taxes for which the person is not eligible. The interest ((shall be))
is assessed at the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under
chapter 82.32 RCW, ((shall be)) is retroactive to the date the tax
credit was taken, and ((shall)) accrues until the taxes for which a
credit has been used are repaid.
(5) A person taking the credit under this section must report under
RCW 82.32.535.
(6) Credits may be taken after twelve years after the effective
date of this act, for those buildings at which commercial production
began before twelve years after the effective date of this act, subject
to all of the eligibility criteria and limitations of this section.
(7) This section expires twelve years after the effective date of
this act.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.04.4483 and 2004 c 25 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the limits and provisions of this section, a credit
is authorized against the tax otherwise due under this chapter for
persons engaged in a rural county in the business of manufacturing
computer software or programming, as those terms are defined in this
section.
(2) A person who partially or totally relocates a business from one
rural county to another rural county is eligible for any new qualifying
employment positions created as a result of the relocation but is not
eligible to receive credit for the jobs moved from one county to the
other.
(3)(a) To qualify for the credit, the qualifying activity of the
person must be conducted in a rural county ((and)), the new qualified
employment position must be located in the rural county, and the new
qualified employment position must be filled by an individual that has
been a resident of the rural county for a minimum of one year prior to
the hiring decision.
(b) If an activity is conducted both from a rural county and
outside of a rural county, the credit is available if at least ninety
percent of the qualifying activity is conducted within a rural county.
If the qualifying activity is a service taxable activity, the place
where the work is performed is the place at which the activity is
conducted.
(4)(a) The credit under this section ((shall equal one thousand
dollars)) for each new qualified employment position created after
January 1, ((2004)) 2010, in an eligible area equals four thousand
dollars for positions with wages and benefits greater than fifty
thousand dollars annually and two thousand dollars for each qualified
employment position with wages and benefits between thirty and fifty
thousand dollars annually. A credit is earned for the calendar year
the person is hired to fill the position. Additionally a credit is
earned for each year the position is maintained over the subsequent
consecutive years, up to four years. The county must meet the
definition of a rural county at the time the position is filled. If
the county does not have a rural county status the following year or
years, the position is still eligible for the remaining years if all
other conditions are met.
(b) Participants who claimed credit under RCW 82.04.4456 for
qualified employment positions created before December 31, 2003, are
eligible to earn credit for each year the position is maintained over
the subsequent consecutive years, for up to four years, which four
years include any years claimed under RCW 82.04.4456. Those persons
who did not receive a credit under RCW 82.04.4456 before December 31,
2003, are not eligible to earn credit for qualified employment
positions created before December 31, 2003.
(c) Credit is authorized for new employees hired for new qualified
employment positions created on or after January 1, 2004. New
qualified employment positions filled by existing employees are
eligible for the credit under this section only if the position vacated
by the existing employee is filled by a new hire. A business that is
a sole proprietorship without any employees is equivalent to one
employee position and this type of business is eligible to receive
credit for one position.
(d) If a position is filled before July 1st, the position is
eligible for the full yearly credit for that calendar year. If it is
filled after June 30th, the position is eligible for half of the credit
for that calendar year.
(5) No application is necessary for the tax credit. The person
must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility
under this section. This information includes information relating to
description of qualifying activity conducted in the rural county and
outside the rural county by the person as well as detailed records on
positions and employees.
(6) If at any time the department finds that a person is not
eligible for tax credit under this section, the amount of taxes for
which a credit has been claimed ((shall be)) is immediately due. The
department ((shall)) must assess interest, but not penalties, on the
taxes for which the person is not eligible. The interest ((shall be))
is assessed at the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under
chapter 82.32 RCW, ((shall be)) is assessed retroactively to the date
the tax credit was taken, and ((shall)) accrues until the taxes for
which a credit has been used are repaid.
(7) The credit under this section may be used against any tax due
under this chapter, but in no case may a credit earned during one
calendar year be carried over to be credited against taxes incurred in
a subsequent calendar year. A person is not eligible to receive a
credit under this section if the person is receiving credit for the
same position under chapter 82.62 RCW or RCW 82.04.44525 or is taking
a credit under this chapter for information technology help desk
services conducted from a rural county. No refunds may be granted for
credits under this section.
(8) Transfer of ownership does not affect credit eligibility.
However, the successive credits are available to the successor for
remaining periods in the five years only if the eligibility conditions
of this section are met.
(9) A person taking tax credits under this section ((shall)) must
make an annual report to the department. The report shall be in a
letter form and ((shall)) must include the following information:
Number of positions for which credit is being claimed, type of position
for which credit is being claimed, type of activity in which the person
is engaged in the county, how long the person has been located in the
county, and taxpayer name and registration number. The report must be
filed by January 30th of each year for which credit was claimed during
the previous year. Failure to file a report will not result in the
loss of eligibility under this section. However, the department,
through its research division, ((shall)) must contact taxpayers who
have not filed the report and obtain the data from the taxpayer or
assist the taxpayer in the filing of the report, so that the data and
information necessary to measure the program's effectiveness is
maintained.
(10) As used in this section:
(a) "Computer software" has the meaning as defined in RCW 82.04.215
after June 30, 2004, and includes "software" as defined in RCW
82.04.215 before July 1, 2004.
(b) "Manufacturing" means the same as "to manufacture" under RCW
82.04.120. Manufacturing includes the activities of both manufacturers
and processors for hire.
(c) "Programming" means the activities that involve the creation or
modification of computer software, as that term is defined in this
chapter, and that are taxable as a service under RCW 82.04.290(2) or as
a retail sale under RCW 82.04.050.
(d) "Qualifying activity" means manufacturing of computer software
or programming.
(e) "Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time
position doing programming of computer software or manufacturing of
computer software. This excludes administrative, professional,
service, executive, and other similar positions. If an employee is
either voluntarily or involuntarily separated from employment, the
employment position is considered filled on a full-time basis if the
employer is either training or actively recruiting a replacement
employee. Full-time means a position for at least thirty-five hours a
week.
(f) "Rural county" means the same as in RCW 82.14.370.
(11) No credit may be taken or accrued under this section on or
after January 1, ((2011)) 2013.
(12) This section expires January 1, ((2011)) 2013.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.62.030 and 2007 c 485 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A person ((shall be)) is allowed a credit against the tax
due under chapter 82.04 RCW as provided in this section. The credit
((shall)) equals: (i) Four thousand dollars for each qualified
employment position with wages and benefits greater than ((forty))
fifty thousand dollars annually that is directly created in an eligible
business project and (ii) two thousand dollars for each qualified
employment position with wages and benefits ((less than or equal to
forty)) between thirty and fifty thousand dollars annually that is
directly created in an eligible business project.
(b) For purposes of calculating the amount of credit under (a) of
this subsection with respect to qualified employment positions as
defined in RCW 82.62.010(8)(a)(ii):
(i) In determining the number of qualified employment positions, a
fractional amount is rounded down to the nearest whole number; and
(ii) Wages and benefits for each qualified employment position
((shall be)) are equal to the quotient derived by dividing: (A) The
sum of the wages and benefits earned for the four consecutive full
calendar quarter period for which a credit under this chapter is earned
by all of the person's new seasonal employees hired during that period;
by (B) the number of qualified employment positions plus any fractional
amount subject to rounding as provided under (b)(i) of this subsection.
For purposes of this chapter, a credit is earned for the four
consecutive full calendar quarters after the calendar quarter during
which the first qualified employment position is filled.
(c) To qualify for the credit under this section, the new qualified
employment position must be filled by an individual that has been a
resident of the rural county for a minimum of one year prior to the
hiring decision.
(2) The department ((shall)) must keep a running total of all
credits allowed under this chapter during each fiscal year. The
department ((shall)) may not allow any credits which would cause the
total to exceed seven million five hundred thousand dollars in any
fiscal year. If all or part of an application for credit is disallowed
under this subsection, the disallowed portion ((shall)) must be carried
over to the next fiscal year. However, the carryover into the next
fiscal year is only permitted to the extent that the cap for the next
fiscal year is not exceeded.
(3) No recipient may use the tax credits to decertify a union or to
displace existing jobs in any community in the state.
(4) The credit may be used against any tax due under chapter 82.04
RCW, and may be carried over until used. No refunds may be granted for
credits under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 1 of this act takes effect July 1,
2010.

--- END ---