BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.63 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature that state universities
engage in the commercialization of research and other economic
development and workforce development activities that benefit the
intermediate and long-term economic vitality of Washington. State
universities are expected to develop and strengthen university-industry
relationships through the conduct of research, the support of company
formation and job generation, and collaborative training. The state
universities must perform one or more of the following functions:
(a) Provide collaborative research and technology transfer
opportunities;
(b) Publicize their commercialization processes and include an
explanation of how to access commercialization resources at the
universities;
(c) Develop mechanisms for pairing researchers, entrepreneurs, and
investors. Such mechanisms are to include, but are not limited to,
developing guides, web sites, or workshops on funding opportunities, on
entrepreneurship and the process of starting a company, and on
university-industry relations;
(d) Host events to connect researchers to entrepreneurs, investors,
and individuals from the state's technology-based industries; and
(e) Provide opportunities for training undergraduate and graduate
students through direct involvement in research and industry
interactions.
(2) In carrying out the duties in this section, the universities
may work with and through the higher education coordinating board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.63 RCW
to read as follows:
To facilitate the creation of companies based on university
research, the state universities are authorized to establish and
administer bridge-funding programs for start-up companies using funds
from the federal government and the private sector.

Sec. 3 RCW 42.52.160 and 1996 c 213 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No state officer or state employee may employ or use any
person, money, or property under the officer's or employee's official
control or direction, or in his or her official custody, for the
private benefit or gain of the officer, employee, or another.
(2) This section does not prohibit the use of public resources to
benefit others as part of a state officer's or state employee's
official duties.
(3) To facilitate the formation of companies from universities,
university research employees may make reasonable use of the
university's facilities, services, and commercialization resources to
benefit these start-up companies.
(4) The appropriate ethics boards may adopt rules providing
exceptions to this section for occasional use of the state officer or
state employee, of de minimis cost and value, if the activity does not
result in interference with the proper performance of public duties.

--- END ---