BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature continues to find that our
family law system is the primary reason for the disengagement of
fathers from the lives of their children following divorce. This was
the conclusion of the largest federally funded study on the effects of
fathers and the children of divorce, conducted by Dr. Sanford Braver,
and reported in his book, Divorced Dads: Shattering the Myth.
The legislature finds that research from the national center for
fathering, in a report entitled Father's Involvement in Children's
Learning, is very positive to show the value of increased father
involvement concerning outcomes for the respective children. The data
was collected in two periods about ten years apart, from October 1-3,
1999 and then again May 16-18, 2008. In almost all categories,
increased father participation had better results for the children.
This is the cheapest investment that taxpayers and the legislature can
make to help our children in that the cost of this legislation is about
as close to zero that any legislature can claim.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act may be known and cited as the youth
school dropout reduction and crime prevention act of 2010.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.09.002 and 2007 c 496 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
Parents have the responsibility to make decisions and perform other
parental functions necessary for the care and growth of their minor
children. In any proceeding between parents under this chapter, the
best interests of the child shall be the standard by which the court
determines and allocates the parties' parental responsibilities. The
state recognizes the fundamental importance of the parent-child
relationship to the welfare of the child, and that the relationship
between the child and each parent should be fostered unless
inconsistent with the child's best interests. Residential time and
financial support are equally important components of parenting
arrangements. The best interests of the child are served by a
parenting arrangement that best maintains a child's emotional growth,
health and stability, and physical care, therefore there shall be a
presumption in favor of shared parental responsibility unless it is not
in the child's best interests. Further, the best interests of the
child ((is)) are ordinarily served when the existing pattern of
interaction between a parent and child is altered only to the extent
necessitated by the changed relationship of the parents or as required
to protect the child from physical, mental, or emotional harm.
The legislature finds that family fragmentation creates a high
social and financial cost to the involved parents and children as well
as to the taxpayers and citizens of this state. The financial costs
for children of divorced parents and children born to unwed or never
married parents is estimated at over seven hundred million dollars per
year and the social costs are even higher.
The legislature further finds that between seven and eight of every
ten high school dropouts comes from fatherless homes and boys make up
a majority of these dropout casualties, costing the state over two
hundred twenty thousand dollars over the lifetime for each person.
This cost estimate does not include the potential federal costs to
individuals in terms of food stamps, health care, public assistance,
and incarceration. Almost nine out of every ten juveniles in our
juvenile justice system, at a cost of seventy-five thousand dollars per
year, come from fatherless homes. These juveniles impact not only
their personal lives but also the lives of their victims. The same is
true for eight out of every ten adult men in the state's county jails
and state prisons where the cost to incarcerate is over thirty thousand
dollars annually.
The legislature finds that one way to lower dropout rates and
increase high school graduation rates and also reduce instances of
crime involving children, both as victims and perpetrators, is to
increase the involvement of the second parent, mostly fathers, in the
daily lives of their children, especially in the educational arena. A
study conducted by the national education association concluded that
such interaction dramatically reduced dropout rates.
As a result, the legislature concludes that a rebuttable
presumption in favor of a shared parenting arrangement following a
dissolution or legal separation is in the best interests of the child
or children involved and society.

Sec. 4 RCW 26.09.004 and 2009 c 502 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Military duties potentially impacting parenting functions"
means those obligations imposed, voluntarily or involuntarily, on a
parent serving in the armed forces that may interfere with that
parent's abilities to perform his or her parenting functions under a
temporary or permanent parenting plan. Military duties potentially
impacting parenting functions include, but are not limited to:
(a) "Deployment," which means the temporary transfer of a service
member serving in an active-duty status to another location in support
of a military operation, to include any tour of duty classified by the
member's branch of the armed forces as "remote" or "unaccompanied";
(b) "Activation" or "mobilization," which means the call-up of a
national guard or reserve service member to extended active-duty
status. For purposes of this definition, "mobilization" does not
include national guard or reserve annual training, inactive duty days,
or drill weekends; or
(c) "Temporary duty," which means the transfer of a service member
from one military base or the service member's home to a different
location, usually another base, for a limited period of time to
accomplish training or to assist in the performance of a noncombat
mission.
(2) "Parenting functions" means those aspects of the parent-child
relationship in which the parent makes decisions and performs functions
necessary for the care and growth of the child. Parenting functions
include:
(a) Maintaining a loving, stable, consistent, and nurturing
relationship with the child;
(b) Attending to the daily needs of the child, such as feeding,
clothing, physical care and grooming, supervision, health care, and day
care, and engaging in other activities which are appropriate to the
developmental level of the child and that are within the social and
economic circumstances of the particular family;
(c) Attending to adequate education for the child, including
remedial or other education essential to the best interests of the
child;
(d) Assisting the child in developing and maintaining appropriate
interpersonal relationships;
(e) Exercising appropriate judgment regarding the child's welfare,
consistent with the child's developmental level and the family's social
and economic circumstances; and
(f) Providing for the financial support of the child.
(3) "Permanent parenting plan" means a plan for parenting the
child, including allocation of parenting functions, which plan is
incorporated in any final decree or decree of modification in an action
for dissolution of marriage or domestic partnership, declaration of
invalidity, or legal separation.
(4) "Temporary parenting plan" means a plan for parenting of the
child pending final resolution of any action for dissolution of
marriage or domestic partnership, declaration of invalidity, or legal
separation which is incorporated in a temporary order.
(5) "Shared parental responsibility" means shared residential
placement and mutual decision-making authority.
(6) "Shared residential placement" means an order awarding each of
the parents periods of time, amounting to at least one-third of a year,
in which a child resides with or is under the actual, direct,
day-to-day care and supervision of each of the parents. "Shared
residential placement" does not necessarily mean the child must
alternate his or her residence between the households of the parents
for brief periods of time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 26.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There shall be a presumption that shared parental
responsibility is in the best interests of children unless:
(a) The parents have agreed to an alternate award of residential
placement or decision-making authority to only one parent;
(b) The limitations of RCW 26.09.191 are dispositive of the child's
residential schedule; or
(c) The court finds that shared parental responsibility would be
detrimental due to the age or needs of the child or children.
(2) A parent alleging that shared parental responsibility would be
detrimental to the child or children shall have the burden of
establishing the allegation by a preponderance of the evidence.
(3) If a parent alleges that shared parental responsibility would
be detrimental to a particular child, the court, in making a
determination whether a shared parental responsibility order is
appropriate, may direct that an investigation be conducted in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 26.09.220. If the court declines
to enter a shared parental responsibility order under this section, the
court shall enter findings of fact and conclusions of law stating the
reasons that shared parental responsibility is not in the best
interests of the child.

Sec. 6 RCW 26.09.187 and 2007 c 496 s 603 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) DISPUTE RESOLUTION PROCESS. The court shall not order a
dispute resolution process, except court action, when it finds that any
limiting factor under RCW 26.09.191 applies, or when it finds that
either parent is unable to afford the cost of the proposed dispute
resolution process. If a dispute resolution process is not precluded
or limited, then in designating such a process the court shall consider
all relevant factors, including:
(a) Differences between the parents that would substantially
inhibit their effective participation in any designated process;
(b) The parents' wishes or agreements and, if the parents have
entered into agreements, whether the agreements were made knowingly and
voluntarily; and
(c) Differences in the parents' financial circumstances that may
affect their ability to participate fully in a given dispute resolution
process.
(2) ALLOCATION OF DECISION-MAKING AUTHORITY.
(a) AGREEMENTS BETWEEN THE PARTIES. The court shall approve
agreements of the parties allocating decision-making authority, or
specifying rules in the areas listed in RCW 26.09.184(5)(a), when it
finds that:
(i) The agreement is consistent with any limitations on a parent's
decision-making authority mandated by RCW 26.09.191; and
(ii) The agreement is knowing and voluntary.
(b) SOLE DECISION-MAKING AUTHORITY. The court shall order sole
decision-making to one parent when it finds that:
(i) A limitation on the other parent's decision-making authority is
mandated by RCW 26.09.191;
(ii) Both parents are opposed to mutual decision making;
(iii) One parent is opposed to mutual decision making, and such
opposition is reasonable based on the criteria in (c) of this
subsection.
(c) MUTUAL DECISION-MAKING AUTHORITY. Except as provided in (a)
and (b) of this subsection, the court shall consider the following
criteria in allocating decision-making authority:
(i) The existence of a limitation under RCW 26.09.191;
(ii) The history of participation of each parent in decision making
in each of the areas in RCW 26.09.184(5)(a);
(iii) Whether the parents have a demonstrated ability and desire to
cooperate with one another in decision making in each of the areas in
RCW 26.09.184(5)(a); and
(iv) The parents' geographic proximity to one another, to the
extent that it affects their ability to make timely mutual decisions.
(3) RESIDENTIAL PROVISIONS.
(a) The court shall make residential provisions for each child
which encourage each parent to maintain a loving, stable, and nurturing
relationship with the child, consistent with the best interests of the
child, the child's developmental level, and the family's social and
economic circumstances. There is a presumption that the child's
residential schedule shall provide shared parental responsibility in
accordance with section 5 of this act. The child's residential
schedule shall be consistent with RCW 26.09.191. Where the limitations
of RCW 26.09.191 are not dispositive of the child's residential
schedule, the court shall consider the following factors:
(i) The relative strength, nature, and stability of the child's
relationship with each parent;
(ii) Which parent is more likely to allow and encourage the child's
frequent and continuing contact with the other parent;
(iii) The agreements of the parties, provided they were entered
into knowingly and voluntarily;
(((iii))) (iv) Each parent's past and potential for future
performance of parenting functions as defined in RCW 26.09.004(((3)))
(2), including whether a parent has taken greater responsibility for
performing parenting functions relating to the daily needs of the
child;
(((iv))) (v) The emotional needs and developmental level of the
child and any special physical needs of the child;
(((v))) (vi) Whether the child is a nursing child;
(vii) The child's relationship with siblings and with other
significant adults, as well as the child's involvement with his or her
physical surroundings, school, or other significant activities;
(((vi))) (viii) The wishes of the parents and the wishes of a child
who is sufficiently mature to express reasoned and independent
preferences as to his or her residential schedule; and
(((vii))) (ix) Each parent's employment schedule, and shall make
accommodations consistent with those schedules.
Factor (i) shall be given the greatest weight.
(b) ((Where the limitations of RCW 26.09.191 are not dispositive,
the court may order that a child frequently alternate his or her
residence between the households of the parents for brief and
substantially equal intervals of time if such provision is in the best
interests of the child. In determining whether such an arrangement is
in the best interests of the child, the court may consider the parties
geographic proximity to the extent necessary to ensure the ability to
share performance of the parenting functions.
(c) For any child, residential provisions may contain any
reasonable terms or conditions that facilitate the orderly and
meaningful exercise of residential time by a parent, including but not
limited to requirements of reasonable notice when residential time will
not occur.)) For any child, residential provisions may contain any
reasonable terms or conditions that facilitate the orderly and
meaningful exercise of residential time by a parent, including one or
more of the following:
(i) Requirements that residential times be specified;
(ii) Requirements of reasonable notice when residential time will
not occur;
(iii) Any other reasonable condition determined to be appropriate
in the particular case including but not limited to a domestic violence
assessment.
(c) In any parenting plan in which the court finds that the parties
do not have a satisfactory history of cooperation or the limitations of
RCW 26.09.191 are dispositive; to the extent necessary, the parenting
plan shall include a safe, neutral, and public location for the
exchange of the child such as a school, day care, place of worship, or
any other appropriate public facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The administrative office of the courts,
pursuant to funding provided specifically for this purpose, shall
commission a study to commence by September 1, 2010. The study shall
survey a statistically relevant number of geographically diverse final
parenting plans in Washington to determine the allocation of
residential time as between parents, including an analysis of gender
disparities between parents, and the impact of legal counsel on
outcomes of parenting plan disputes. The study shall be completed and
a report provided to the legislature, the governor, and to the public
within two years of the effective date of this section.

--- END ---