BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
DIRECT SELLER B&O TAX EXEMPTION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 (1) A business and occupation tax
exemption is provided in RCW 82.04.423 for certain out-of-state sellers
that sell consumer products exclusively to or through a direct seller's
representative. The intent of the legislature in enacting this
exemption was to provide a narrow exemption for out-of-state businesses
engaged in direct sales of consumer products, typically accomplished
through in-home parties or door-to-door selling.
(2) In Dot Foods, Inc. v. Dep't of Revenue, Docket No. 81022-2
(September 10, 2009), the Washington supreme court held that the
exemption in RCW 82.04.423 applied to a taxpayer: (a) That sold
nonconsumer products through its representative in addition to consumer
products; and (b) whose consumer products were ultimately sold at
retail in permanent retail establishments.
(3) The legislature finds that most out-of-state businesses selling
consumer products in this state will either be eligible for the
exemption under RCW 82.04.423 or could easily restructure their
business operations to qualify for the exemption. As a result, the
legislature expects that the broadened interpretation of the direct
sellers' exemption will lead to large and devastating revenue losses.
This comes at a time when the state's existing budget is facing a two
billion six hundred million dollar shortfall, which could grow, while
at the same time the demand for state and state-funded services is also
growing. Moreover, the legislature further finds that RCW 82.04.423
provides preferential tax treatment for out-of-state businesses over
their in-state competitors and now creates a strong incentive for in-state businesses to move their operations outside Washington.
(4) Therefore, the legislature finds that it is necessary to
reaffirm the legislature's intent in establishing the direct sellers'
exemption and prevent the loss of revenues resulting from the expanded
interpretation of the exemption by amending RCW 82.04.423 retroactively
to conform the exemption to the original intent of the legislature and
by prospectively ending the direct sellers' exemption effective July 1,
2010. The legislature recognizes that the department of revenue has
asked the Washington supreme court to reconsider its decision in Dot
Foods. As a result, if the Dot Foods decision is not final on the
effective date of section 102 of this act, it is the legislature's
intent that the amendments in section 102 of this act be considered
clarifying in nature.

Sec. 102 RCW 82.04.423 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 66 s 5 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Prior to July 1, 2010, this chapter ((shall)) does not apply to
any person in respect to gross income derived from the business of
making sales at wholesale or retail if such person:
(a) Does not own or lease real property within this state; and
(b) Does not regularly maintain a stock of tangible personal
property in this state for sale in the ordinary course of business; and
(c) Is not a corporation incorporated under the laws of this state;
and
(d) Makes sales in this state exclusively to or through a direct
seller's representative.
(2) For purposes of this section, the term "direct seller's
representative" means a person who buys only consumer products on a
buy-sell basis or a deposit-commission basis for resale, by the buyer
or any other person, in the home or otherwise than in a permanent
retail establishment, or who sells at retail, or solicits the sale at
retail of, only consumer products in the home or otherwise than in a
permanent retail establishment; and
(a) Substantially all of the remuneration paid to such person,
whether or not paid in cash, for the performance of services described
in this subsection is directly related to sales or other output,
including the performance of services, rather than the number of hours
worked; and
(b) The services performed by the person are performed pursuant to
a written contract between such person and the person for whom the
services are performed and such contract provides that the person will
not be treated as an employee with respect to such purposes for federal
tax purposes.
(3) Nothing in this section ((shall)) may be construed to imply
that a person exempt from tax under this section was engaged in a
business activity taxable under this chapter prior to ((the enactment
of this section)) August 23, 1983.

PART II
FIRST MORTGAGE INTEREST B&O TAX DEDUCTION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 (1) A business and occupation tax
deduction is provided in RCW 82.04.4292 to financial businesses for
amounts derived from interest received on investments or loans
primarily secured by first mortgages or trust deeds on nontransient
residential properties.
(2) The Washington supreme court in Homestreet, Inc. v. Dep't of
Revenue, 166 Wn.2d 444 (2009) held that a mortgage lender was entitled
to a business and occupation tax deduction under RCW 82.04.4292 for the
portion of interest it retained for servicing loans and mortgage-backed
securities that it sold on a service-retained basis on the secondary
market.
(3) The legislature never intended the deduction in RCW 82.04.4292
to apply to fees received in exchange for services rendered.
(4) Therefore, by this act, the legislature intends to restore the
RCW 82.04.4292 deduction to ensure that it conforms with the
legislature's original intent. To that end, the legislature declares
that the deduction provided by RCW 82.04.4292 does not apply to fees
that are received in exchange for services, regardless of whether the
source of the fees is or may have been interest when paid by a
borrower.

Sec. 202 RCW 82.04.4292 and 1980 c 37 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax
by those engaged in banking, loan, security or other financial
businesses, ((amounts derived from)) interest received on investments
or loans primarily secured by first mortgages or trust deeds on
nontransient residential properties.
(2) Interest deductible under this section includes the portion of
fees charged to borrowers, including points and loan origination fees,
that is recognized over the life of the loan as an adjustment to yield
in the taxpayer's books and records according to generally accepted
accounting principles.
(3) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section notwithstanding, the
following is a nonexclusive list of items that are not deductible under
this section:
(a) Fees for specific services such as: Document preparation fees;
finder fees; brokerage fees; title examination fees; fees for credit
checks; notary fees; loan application fees; interest lock-in fees if
the loan is not made; servicing fees, including servicing fees received
by lenders when they sell loans or mortgage-backed or mortgage-related
securities in the secondary market while retaining the right to service
the loans or securities and receive a portion of the interest payments
as the servicing fee; and similar fees or amounts;
(b) Fees received in consideration for an agreement to make funds
available for a specific period of time at specified terms, commonly
referred to as commitment fees;
(c) Any other fees, or portion of a fee, that is not recognized
over the life of the loan as an adjustment to yield in the taxpayer's
books and records according to generally accepted accounting
principles; and
(d) Gains on the sale of valuable rights such as:
(i) Service release premiums, which are amounts received when
servicing rights are sold; and
(ii) Gains on the sale of loans.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 Nothing in this act may be construed as
authorizing a deduction under RCW 82.04.4292 before July 1, 2010, for
amounts described in RCW 82.04.4292(3).

PART III
B&O TAX PREFERENCES FOR MANUFACTURERS OF PRODUCTS
DERIVED FROM CERTAIN AGRICULTURAL PRODUCTS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 (1)(a) In 1967, the legislature amended
RCW 82.04.260 in chapter 149, Laws of 1967 ex. sess. to authorize a
preferential business and occupation tax rate for slaughtering,
breaking, and/or processing perishable meat products and/or selling the
same at wholesale. The legislature finds that RCW 82.04.260(4) was
interpreted by the state supreme court on January 13, 2005, in Agrilink
Foods, Inc. v. Department of Revenue, 153 Wn.2d 392 (2005). The
supreme court held that the preferential business and occupation tax
rate on the slaughtering, breaking, and/or processing of perishable
meat products applied to the processing of perishable meat products
into nonperishable finished products, such as canned food.
(b) The legislature intends to narrow the exemption provided for
slaughtering, breaking, and/or processing perishable meat products
and/or selling such products at wholesale by requiring that the end
product be a perishable meat product; a nonperishable meat product that
is comprised primarily of animal carcass by weight or volume, other
than a canned meat product; or a meat by-product.
(2)(a) A business and occupation tax exemption is provided for (i)
manufacturing by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or
dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables, and (ii) selling such products
at wholesale by the manufacturer to purchasers who transport the goods
out of state in the ordinary course of business. This exemption
expires July 1, 2012, and is replaced by a preferential business and
occupation tax rate.
(b) The legislature finds that the rationale of the Agrilink
decision, if applied to these tax preferences, could result in
preferential tax treatment for any processed food product that
contained any fresh fruit or vegetable as an ingredient, however small
the amount.
(c) The legislature intends to narrow the tax preference provided
to fruit and vegetable manufacturers by requiring that the end product
be comprised either (i) exclusively of fruits and/or vegetables, or
(ii) of any combination of fruits, vegetables, and certain other
substances that, cumulatively, may not exceed the amount of fruits and
vegetables contained in the product measured by weight or volume.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Perishable meat products, by slaughtering, breaking, or
processing, if the finished product is a perishable meat product; as to
such persons the tax imposed is equal to the value of the perishable
meat products manufactured, or, in the case of a processor for hire,
the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.138
percent;
(b) Meat products, by dehydration, curing, smoking, or any
combination of these activities, if the finished meat products are not
canned; as to such persons the tax imposed is equal to the value of the
meat products manufactured, or, in the case of a processor for hire,
the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.138
percent;
(c) Hides, tallow, meat meal, and other similar meat by-products,
if such products are derived in part from animals and manufactured in
a rendering plant licensed under chapter 16.68 RCW; as to such persons
the tax imposed is equal to the value of the products manufactured, or,
in the case of a processor for hire, the gross income of the business,
multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
selling at wholesale:
(a) Perishable meat products; as to such persons the tax imposed is
equal to the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the
rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Meat products that have been manufactured by the seller by
dehydration, curing, smoking, or any combination of such activities, if
the finished meat products are not canned; as to such persons the tax
imposed is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such sales
multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(c) Hides, tallow, meat meal, and other similar meat by-products,
if such products are derived in part from animals and manufactured by
the seller in a rendering plant; as to such persons the tax imposed is
equal to the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the
rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Animal" means all members of the animal kingdom except humans,
fish, and insects.
(b) "Carcass" means all or any parts, including viscera, of a
slaughtered animal.
(c) "Fish" means any water-breathing animal, including shellfish.
(d) "Hide" means any unprocessed animal pelt or skin.
(e)(i) "Meat products" means:
(A) Products comprised exclusively of animal carcass; and
(B) Except as provided in (e)(ii) of this subsection (3), products,
such as jerky, sausage, and other cured meat products, that are
comprised primarily of animal carcass by weight or volume and may also
contain water; nitrates; nitrites; acids; binders and extenders;
natural or synthetic casings; colorings; flavorings such as soy sauce,
liquid smoke, seasonings, citric acid, sugar, molasses, corn syrup, and
vinegar; and similar substances.
(ii) "Meat products" does not include products containing any
cereal grains or cereal-grain products, dairy products, legumes and
legume products, fruit or vegetable products as defined in RCW
82.04.260, and similar ingredients, unless the ingredient is used as a
flavoring. For purposes of this subsection, "flavoring" means a
substance that contains the flavoring constituents derived from a
spice, fruit or fruit juice, vegetable or vegetable juice, edible
yeast, herb, bark, bud, root, leaf, or any other edible substance of
plant origin, whose primary function in food is flavoring or seasoning
rather than nutritional, and which may legally appear as "natural
flavor," "flavor," or "flavorings" in the ingredient statement on the
label of the meat product.
(iii) "Meat products" includes only products that are intended for
human consumption as food or animal consumption as feed.
(f) "Perishable" means having a high risk of spoilage within thirty
days of manufacture without any refrigeration or freezing.
(g) "Rendering plant" means any place of business or location where
dead animals or any part or portion thereof, or packing house refuse,
are processed for the purpose of obtaining the hide, skin, grease
residue, or any other by-product whatsoever.

Sec. 303 RCW 82.04.4266 and 2006 c 354 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This chapter ((shall)) does not apply to the value of products
or the gross proceeds of sales derived from:
(a) Manufacturing fruit((s)) or vegetable((s)) products by canning,
preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or
vegetables; or
(b) Selling at wholesale fruit((s)) or vegetable((s)) products
manufactured by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing,
processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to
purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods
out of this state. A person taking an exemption under this subsection
(1)(b) must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW
82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser
in the ordinary course of business out of this state.
(2)(a) "Fruit or vegetable products" means:
(i) Products comprised exclusively of fruits, vegetables, or both;
and
(ii) Products comprised of fruits, vegetables, or both, and which
may also contain water, sugar, salt, seasonings, preservatives,
binders, stabilizers, flavorings, yeast, and similar substances.
However, the amount of all ingredients contained in the product, other
than fruits, vegetables, and water, may not exceed the amount of fruits
and vegetables contained in the product measured by weight or volume.
(b) "Fruit or vegetable products" includes only products that are
intended for human consumption as food or animal consumption as feed.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2012.

Sec. 304 RCW 82.04.260 and 2009 c 479 s 64, 2009 c 461 s 1, and
2009 c 162 s 34 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into
soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola by-products, or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to
the value of the flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola by-product manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Beginning July 1, 2012, seafood products that remain in a raw,
raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing
by that person; or selling manufactured seafood products that remain in
a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the
manufacturing, to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of
business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the value of
the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such
sales, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and
preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing
that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course
of business out of this state;
(c) Beginning July 1, 2012, dairy products that as of September 20,
2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135,
including by-products from the manufacturing of the dairy products such
as whey and casein; or selling the same to purchasers who transport in
the ordinary course of business the goods out of state; as to such
persons the tax imposed ((shall be)) is equal to the value of the
products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales
multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and
preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing
that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course
of business out of this state;
(d)(i) Beginning July 1, 2012, fruit((s)) or vegetable((s))
products by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating
fresh fruits or vegetables, or selling at wholesale fruit((s)) or
vegetable((s)) products manufactured by the seller by canning,
preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or
vegetables and sold to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course
of business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount
of tax with respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the value
of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such
sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and
preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing
that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course
of business out of this state;
(ii) For purposes of this subsection, "fruit or vegetable products"
means:
(A) Products comprised exclusively of fruits, vegetables, or both;
or
(B) Products comprised of fruits, vegetables, or both, and which
may also contain water, sugar, salt, seasonings, preservatives,
binders, stabilizers, flavorings, yeast, and similar substances.
However, the amount of all ingredients contained in the product, other
than fruits, vegetables, and water, may not exceed the amount of fruits
and vegetables contained in the product measured by weight or volume;
(iii) "Fruit and vegetable products" includes only products that
are intended for human consumption as food or animal consumption as
feed;
(e) Until July 1, 2009, alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel
feedstock, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business ((shall be)) is
equal to the value of alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel
feedstock manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent; and
(f) Alcohol fuel or wood biomass fuel, as those terms are defined
in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to
the business ((shall be)) is equal to the value of alcohol fuel or wood
biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the value of
the peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association
engaging within this state in research and development, as to such
corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such
activities ((shall be)) is equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(4) ((Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products
and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such
persons the tax imposed shall be equal to the gross proceeds derived
from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(5))) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to such activities ((shall be)) is equal
to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate
of 0.275 percent.
(((6))) (5) Upon every person engaging within this state in
business as an international steamship agent, international customs
house broker, international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo
charter broker in foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo
agent; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to only
international activities ((shall be)) is equal to the gross income
derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(((7))) (6) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the
movement of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign
commerce; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business ((shall be)) is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to
taxation under this subsection ((shall be)) are exempt from payment of
taxes imposed by chapter 82.16 RCW for that portion of their business
subject to taxation under this subsection. Stevedoring and associated
activities pertinent to the conduct of goods and commodities in
waterborne interstate or foreign commerce are defined as all activities
of a labor, service or transportation nature whereby cargo may be
loaded or unloaded to or from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or
under a wharf, pier, or similar structure; cargo may be moved to a
warehouse or similar holding or storage yard or area to await further
movement in import or export or may move to a consolidation freight
station and be stuffed, unstuffed, containerized, separated or
otherwise segregated or aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode
of transportation for delivery to its consignee. Specific activities
included in this definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading,
unloading, moving of cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the
consignee or a convenient place for further movement to export mode;
documentation services in connection with the receipt, delivery,
checking, care, custody and control of cargo required in the transfer
of cargo; imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee;
terminal stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not
limited to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers,
trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship
hatch covers.
(((8))) (7)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010;
as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business
((shall be)) is equal to the gross income of the business, excluding
any fees imposed under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of
3.3 percent.
(b) If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to
activities both within and without this state, the gross income
attributable to this state ((shall)) must be determined in accordance
with the methods of apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.
(((9))) (8) Upon every person engaging within this state as an
insurance producer or title insurance agent licensed under chapter
48.17 RCW or a surplus line broker licensed under chapter 48.15 RCW; as
to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed
activities ((shall be)) is equal to the gross income of such business
multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(((10))) (9) Upon every person engaging within this state in
business as a hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is
operated as a nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its
political subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with
respect to such activities ((shall be)) is equal to the gross income of
the business multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30,
1995, and 1.5 percent thereafter.
(((11))) (10)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person
engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail
or wholesale, of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes,
manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business ((shall)), in the case of manufacturers,
((be)) is equal to the value of the product manufactured and the gross
proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of
processors for hire, ((be)) is equal to the gross income of the
business, multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through ((the later of))
June 30, 2007; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning July 1, 2007.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, upon every person who is not eligible
to report under the provisions of (a) of this subsection (((11))) (10)
and is engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing
tooling specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial
airplanes or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail
or wholesale, of such tooling manufactured by the seller, as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to such business ((shall)), in
the case of manufacturers, ((be)) is equal to the value of the product
manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of the product
manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, ((be)) is equal to
the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.2904
percent.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (((11))) (10), "commercial
airplane" and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW
82.32.550.
(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person eligible for the tax rate under this subsection (((11))) (10)
must report as required under RCW 82.32.545.
(e) This subsection (((11))) (10) does not apply on and after July
1, 2024.
(((12))) (11)(a) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging
within this state in the business of extracting timber or extracting
for hire timber; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to
the business ((shall)), in the case of extractors, ((be)) is equal to
the value of products, including by-products, extracted, or in the case
of extractors for hire, ((be)) is equal to the gross income of the
business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006,
through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through
June 30, 2024.
(b) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire: (i)
Timber into timber products or wood products; or (ii) timber products
into other timber products or wood products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business ((shall)), in the case
of manufacturers, ((be)) is equal to the value of products, including
by-products, manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire,
((be)) is equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the
rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and
0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.
(c) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling at wholesale: (i) Timber extracted by
that person; (ii) timber products manufactured by that person from
timber or other timber products; or (iii) wood products manufactured by
that person from timber or timber products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business ((shall be)) is equal to
the gross proceeds of sales of the timber, timber products, or wood
products multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006,
through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through
June 30, 2024.
(d) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling standing timber; as to such persons
the amount of the tax with respect to the business ((shall be)) is
equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of
0.2904 percent. For purposes of this subsection (((12))) (11)(d),
"selling standing timber" means the sale of timber apart from the land,
where the buyer is required to sever the timber within thirty months
from the date of the original contract, regardless of the method of
payment for the timber and whether title to the timber transfers
before, upon, or after severance.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Biocomposite surface products" means surface material products
containing, by weight or volume, more than fifty percent recycled paper
and that also use nonpetroleum-based phenolic resin as a bonding agent.
(ii) "Paper and paper products" means products made of interwoven
cellulosic fibers held together largely by hydrogen bonding. "Paper
and paper products" includes newsprint; office, printing, fine, and
pressure-sensitive papers; paper napkins, towels, and toilet tissue;
kraft bag, construction, and other kraft industrial papers; paperboard,
liquid packaging containers, containerboard, corrugated, and solid-fiber containers including linerboard and corrugated medium; and
related types of cellulosic products containing primarily, by weight or
volume, cellulosic materials. "Paper and paper products" does not
include books, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and other printed
publications, advertising materials, calendars, and similar types of
printed materials.
(iii) "Recycled paper" means paper and paper products having fifty
percent or more of their fiber content that comes from postconsumer
waste. For purposes of this subsection (((12))) (11)(e)(iii),
"postconsumer waste" means a finished material that would normally be
disposed of as solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a
consumer item.
(iv) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or
publicly owned land. "Timber" does not include Christmas trees that
are cultivated by agricultural methods or short-rotation hardwoods as
defined in RCW 84.33.035.
(v) "Timber products" means:
(A) Logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood waste, and similar products
obtained wholly from the processing of timber, short-rotation hardwoods
as defined in RCW 84.33.035, or both;
(B) Pulp, including market pulp and pulp derived from recovered
paper or paper products; and
(C) Recycled paper, but only when used in the manufacture of
biocomposite surface products.
(vi) "Wood products" means paper and paper products; dimensional
lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard, oriented strand
board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood doors; wood
windows; and biocomposite surface products.
(((13))) (12) Upon every person engaging within this state in
inspecting, testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by
another person, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to
such activities ((shall be)) is equal to the gross income derived from
such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(((14))) (13) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of printing a newspaper, publishing a newspaper, or both, the
amount of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the
business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.

Sec. 305 RCW 82.04.250 and 2008 c 81 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail, except persons taxable as retailers under other
provisions of this chapter, as to such persons, the amount of tax with
respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the gross proceeds of
sales of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.471 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under
chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or
82.08.0263, except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260(((11))) (10) or
subsection (3) of this section, as to such persons, the amount of tax
with respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the gross
proceeds of sales of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.484
percent.
(3) Upon every person classified by the federal aviation
administration as a federal aviation regulation part 145 certificated
repair station and that is engaging within this state in the business
of making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under
chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or
82.08.0263, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such
business ((shall be)) is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the
business, multiplied by the rate of .2904 percent.

Sec. 306 RCW 82.04.250 and 2007 c 54 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail, except persons taxable as retailers under other
provisions of this chapter, as to such persons, the amount of tax with
respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the gross proceeds of
sales of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.471 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under
chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or
82.08.0263, except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260(((11))) (10), as
to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business
((shall be)) is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the business,
multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

Sec. 307 RCW 82.04.261 and 2007 c 54 s 7 and 2007 c 48 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the taxes imposed under RCW 82.04.260(((12)))
(11), a surcharge is imposed on those persons who are subject to any of
the taxes imposed under RCW 82.04.260(((12))) (11). Except as
otherwise provided in this section, the surcharge is equal to 0.052
percent. The surcharge is added to the rates provided in RCW
82.04.260(((12))) (11) (a), (b), (c), and (d). The surcharge and this
section expire July 1, 2024.
(2) All receipts from the surcharge imposed under this section
((shall)) must be deposited into the forest and fish support account
created in RCW 76.09.405.
(3)(a) The surcharge imposed under this section ((shall be)) is
suspended if:
(i) Receipts from the surcharge total at least eight million
dollars during any fiscal biennium; or
(ii) The office of financial management certifies to the department
that the federal government has appropriated at least two million
dollars for participation in forest and fish report-related activities
by federally recognized Indian tribes located within the geographical
boundaries of the state of Washington for any federal fiscal year.
(b)(i) The suspension of the surcharge under (a)(i) of this
subsection (3) ((shall)) takes effect on the first day of the calendar
month that is at least thirty days after the end of the month during
which the department determines that receipts from the surcharge total
at least eight million dollars during the fiscal biennium. The
surcharge ((shall be)) is imposed again at the beginning of the
following fiscal biennium.
(ii) The suspension of the surcharge under (a)(ii) of this
subsection (3) ((shall)) takes effect on the later of the first day of
October of any federal fiscal year for which the federal government
appropriates at least two million dollars for participation in forest
and fish report-related activities by federally recognized Indian
tribes located within the geographical boundaries of the state of
Washington, or the first day of a calendar month that is at least
thirty days following the date that the office of financial management
makes a certification to the department under subsection (5) of this
section. The surcharge ((shall be)) is imposed again on the first day
of the following July.
(4)(a) If, by October 1st of any federal fiscal year, the office of
financial management certifies to the department that the federal
government has appropriated funds for participation in forest and fish
report-related activities by federally recognized Indian tribes located
within the geographical boundaries of the state of Washington but the
amount of the appropriation is less than two million dollars, the
department ((shall)) must adjust the surcharge in accordance with this
subsection.
(b) The department ((shall)) must adjust the surcharge by an amount
that the department estimates will cause the amount of funds deposited
into the forest and fish support account for the state fiscal year that
begins July 1st and that includes the beginning of the federal fiscal
year for which the federal appropriation is made, to be reduced by
twice the amount of the federal appropriation for participation in
forest and fish report-related activities by federally recognized
Indian tribes located within the geographical boundaries of the state
of Washington.
(c) Any adjustment in the surcharge ((shall)) takes effect at the
beginning of a calendar month that is at least thirty days after the
date that the office of financial management makes the certification
under subsection (5) of this section.
(d) The surcharge ((shall be)) is imposed again at the rate
provided in subsection (1) of this section on the first day of the
following state fiscal year unless the surcharge is suspended under
subsection (3) of this section or adjusted for that fiscal year under
this subsection.
(e) Adjustments of the amount of the surcharge by the department
are final and ((shall)) may not be used to challenge the validity of
the surcharge imposed under this section.
(f) The department ((shall)) must provide timely notice to affected
taxpayers of the suspension of the surcharge or an adjustment of the
surcharge.
(5) The office of financial management ((shall)) must make the
certification to the department as to the status of federal
appropriations for tribal participation in forest and fish report-related activities.

Sec. 308 RCW 82.04.298 and 2008 c 49 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The amount of tax with respect to a qualified grocery
distribution cooperative's sales of groceries or related goods for
resale, excluding items subject to tax under ((RCW 82.04.260(4)))
section 302 of this act, to customer-owners of the grocery distribution
cooperative is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the grocery
distribution cooperative multiplied by the rate of one and one-half
percent.
(2) A qualified grocery distribution cooperative is allowed a
deduction from the gross proceeds of sales of groceries or related
goods for resale, excluding items subject to tax under ((RCW
82.04.260(4))) section 302 of this act, to customer-owners of the
grocery distribution cooperative that is equal to the portion of the
gross proceeds of sales for resale that represents the actual cost of
the merchandise sold by the grocery distribution cooperative to
customer-owners.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Grocery distribution cooperative" means an entity that sells
groceries and related items to customer-owners of the grocery
distribution cooperative and has customer-owners, in the aggregate, who
own a majority of the outstanding ownership interests of the grocery
distribution cooperative or of the entity controlling the grocery
distribution cooperative. "Grocery distribution cooperative" includes
an entity that controls a grocery distribution cooperative.
(b) "Qualified grocery distribution cooperative" means:
(i) A grocery distribution cooperative that has been determined by
a court of record of the state of Washington to be not engaged in
wholesaling or making sales at wholesale, within the meaning of RCW
82.04.270 or any similar provision of a municipal ordinance that
imposes a tax on gross receipts, gross proceeds of sales, or gross
income, with respect to purchases made by customer-owners, and
subsequently changes its form of doing business to make sales at
wholesale of groceries or related items to its customer-owners; or
(ii) A grocery distribution cooperative that has acquired
substantially all of the assets of a grocery distribution cooperative
described in (b)(i) of this subsection.
(c) "Customer-owner" means a person who has an ownership interest
in a grocery distribution cooperative and purchases groceries and
related items at wholesale from that grocery distribution cooperative.
(d) "Controlling" means holding fifty percent or more of the voting
interests of an entity and having at least equal power to direct or
cause the direction of the management and policies of the entity,
whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract, or
otherwise.

Sec. 309 RCW 82.04.334 and 2007 c 48 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
This chapter does not apply to any sale of standing timber excluded
from the definition of "sale" in RCW 82.45.010(3). The definitions in
RCW 82.04.260(((12))) (11) apply to this section.

Sec. 310 RCW 82.04.440 and 2006 c 300 s 8 and 2006 c 84 s 6 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Every person engaged in activities that are subject to tax
under two or more provisions of RCW 82.04.230 through 82.04.298,
inclusive, ((shall be)) is taxable under each provision applicable to
those activities.
(2) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.2909(2), 82.04.250, 82.04.270,
82.04.294(2), or 82.04.260 (1) (b), (c), (((4),)) or (d), (10), or
(11), or (((12))) section 302(2) of this act with respect to selling
products in this state, including those persons who are also taxable
under RCW 82.04.261, ((shall be)) are allowed a credit against those
taxes for any (a) manufacturing taxes paid with respect to the
manufacturing of products so sold in this state, and/or (b) extracting
taxes paid with respect to the extracting of products so sold in this
state or ingredients of products so sold in this state. Extracting
taxes taken as credit under subsection (3) of this section may also be
taken under this subsection, if otherwise allowable under this
subsection. The amount of the credit ((shall)) may not exceed the tax
liability arising under this chapter with respect to the sale of those
products.
(3) Persons taxable as manufacturers under RCW 82.04.240 or
82.04.260 (1)(b) or (((12))) (11), including those persons who are also
taxable under RCW 82.04.261, ((shall be)) are allowed a credit against
those taxes for any extracting taxes paid with respect to extracting
the ingredients of the products so manufactured in this state. The
amount of the credit ((shall)) may not exceed the tax liability arising
under this chapter with respect to the manufacturing of those products.
(4) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.230, 82.04.240, 82.04.2909(1),
82.04.294(1), 82.04.2404, or 82.04.260 (1), (2), (((4),)) (10), or
(11), or (((12))) section 302(1) of this act, including those persons
who are also taxable under RCW 82.04.261, with respect to extracting or
manufacturing products in this state ((shall be)) are allowed a credit
against those taxes for any (i) gross receipts taxes paid to another
state with respect to the sales of the products so extracted or
manufactured in this state, (ii) manufacturing taxes paid with respect
to the manufacturing of products using ingredients so extracted in this
state, or (iii) manufacturing taxes paid with respect to manufacturing
activities completed in another state for products so manufactured in
this state. The amount of the credit ((shall)) may not exceed the tax
liability arising under this chapter with respect to the extraction or
manufacturing of those products.
(5) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Gross receipts tax" means a tax:
(i) Which is imposed on or measured by the gross volume of
business, in terms of gross receipts or in other terms, and in the
determination of which the deductions allowed would not constitute the
tax an income tax or value added tax; and
(ii) Which is also not, pursuant to law or custom, separately
stated from the sales price.
(b) "State" means (i) the state of Washington, (ii) a state of the
United States other than Washington, or any political subdivision of
such other state, (iii) the District of Columbia, and (iv) any foreign
country or political subdivision thereof.
(c) "Manufacturing tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the
act or privilege of engaging in business as a manufacturer, and
includes (i) the taxes imposed in RCW 82.04.240, 82.04.2404,
82.04.2909(1), 82.04.260 (1), (2), (((4),)) (10), and (11), ((and
(12))) section 302(1) of this act, and 82.04.294(1); (ii) the tax
imposed under RCW 82.04.261 on persons who are engaged in business as
a manufacturer; and (iii) similar gross receipts taxes paid to other
states.
(d) "Extracting tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the act
or privilege of engaging in business as an extractor, and includes (i)
the tax imposed on extractors in RCW 82.04.230 and 82.04.260(((12)))
(11); (ii) the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.261 on persons who are
engaged in business as an extractor; and (iii) similar gross receipts
taxes paid to other states.
(e) "Business", "manufacturer", "extractor", and other terms used
in this section have the meanings given in RCW 82.04.020 through
82.04.212, notwithstanding the use of those terms in the context of
describing taxes imposed by other states.

Sec. 311 RCW 82.04.4463 and 2008 c 81 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for property taxes and leasehold excise taxes paid during the
calendar year.
(2) The credit is equal to:
(a)(i)(A) Property taxes paid on buildings, and land upon which the
buildings are located, constructed after December 1, 2003, and used
exclusively in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such
airplanes; and
(B) Leasehold excise taxes paid with respect to buildings
constructed after January 1, 2006, the land upon which the buildings
are located, or both, if the buildings are used exclusively in
manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes; and
(C) Property taxes or leasehold excise taxes paid on, or with
respect to, buildings constructed after June 30, 2008, the land upon
which the buildings are located, or both, and used exclusively for
aerospace product development or in providing aerospace services, by
persons not within the scope of (a)(i)(A) and (B) of this subsection
(2) and are: (I) Engaged in manufacturing tooling specifically
designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or their
components; or (II) taxable under RCW 82.04.290(3) or 82.04.250(3); or
(ii) Property taxes attributable to an increase in assessed value
due to the renovation or expansion, after: (A) December 1, 2003, of a
building used exclusively in manufacturing commercial airplanes or
components of such airplanes; and (B) June 30, 2008, of buildings used
exclusively for aerospace product development or in providing aerospace
services, by persons not within the scope of (a)(ii)(A) of this
subsection (2) and are: (I) Engaged in manufacturing tooling
specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or
their components; or (II) taxable under RCW 82.04.290(3) or
82.04.250(3); and
(b) An amount equal to:
(i)(A) Property taxes paid, by persons taxable under RCW
82.04.260(((11))) (10)(a), on machinery and equipment exempt under RCW
82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 and acquired after December 1, 2003;
(B) Property taxes paid, by persons taxable under RCW
82.04.260(((11))) (10)(b), on machinery and equipment exempt under RCW
82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 and acquired after June 30, 2008; or
(C) Property taxes paid, by persons taxable under RCW
((82.04.0250(3) [82.04.250(3)])) 82.04.250(3) or 82.04.290(3), on
computer hardware, computer peripherals, and software exempt under RCW
82.08.975 or 82.12.975 and acquired after June 30, 2008.
(ii) For purposes of determining the amount eligible for credit
under (i)(A) and (B) of this subsection (2)(b), the amount of property
taxes paid is multiplied by a fraction.
(((I))) (A) The numerator of the fraction is the total taxable
amount subject to the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.260(((11))) (10) (a)
or (b) on the applicable business activities of manufacturing
commercial airplanes, components of such airplanes, or tooling
specifically designed for use in the manufacturing of commercial
airplanes or components of such airplanes.
(((II))) (B) The denominator of the fraction is the total taxable
amount subject to the tax imposed under all manufacturing
classifications in chapter 82.04 RCW.
(((III))) (C) For purposes of both the numerator and denominator of
the fraction, the total taxable amount refers to the total taxable
amount required to be reported on the person's returns for the calendar
year before the calendar year in which the credit under this section is
earned. The department may provide for an alternative method for
calculating the numerator in cases where the tax rate provided in RCW
82.04.260(((11))) (10) for manufacturing was not in effect during the
full calendar year before the calendar year in which the credit under
this section is earned.
(((IV))) (D) No credit is available under (b)(i)(A) or (B) of this
subsection (2) if either the numerator or the denominator of the
fraction is zero. If the fraction is greater than or equal to nine-tenths, then the fraction is rounded to one.
(((V))) (E) As used in (((III))) (b)(ii)(C) of this subsection
(2)(((b)(ii)(C))), "returns" means the tax returns for which the tax
imposed under this chapter is reported to the department.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.
(a) "Aerospace product development" has the same meaning as
provided in RCW 82.04.4461.
(b) "Aerospace services" has the same meaning given in RCW
82.08.975.
(c) "Commercial airplane" and "component" have the same meanings as
provided in RCW 82.32.550.
(4) A credit earned during one calendar year may be carried over to
be credited against taxes incurred in a subsequent calendar year, but
may not be carried over a second year. No refunds may be granted for
credits under this section.
(5) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person taking the credit under this section must report as required
under RCW 82.32.545.
(6) This section expires July 1, 2024.

Sec. 312 RCW 82.08.806 and 2009 c 461 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales, to a
printer or publisher, of computer equipment, including repair parts and
replacement parts for such equipment, when the computer equipment is
used primarily in the printing or publishing of any printed material,
or to sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in
respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the
computer equipment. This exemption applies only to computer equipment
not otherwise exempt under RCW 82.08.02565.
(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. This exemption is available only when the purchaser provides
the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The seller ((shall)) must retain a copy
of the certificate for the seller's files.
(3) The definitions in this subsection (3) apply throughout this
section, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Computer" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.215.
(b) "Computer equipment" means a computer and the associated
physical components that constitute a computer system, including
monitors, keyboards, printers, modems, scanners, pointing devices, and
other computer peripheral equipment, cables, servers, and routers.
"Computer equipment" also includes digital cameras and computer
software.
(c) "Computer software" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.215.
(d) "Primarily" means greater than fifty percent as measured by
time.
(e) "Printer or publisher" means a person, as defined in RCW
82.04.030, who is subject to tax under RCW 82.04.260(((14))) (13) or
82.04.280(1).
(4) "Computer equipment" does not include computer equipment that
is used primarily for administrative purposes including but not limited
to payroll processing, accounting, customer service, telemarketing, and
collection. If computer equipment is used simultaneously for
administrative and nonadministrative purposes, the administrative use
((shall)) must be disregarded during the period of simultaneous use for
purposes of determining whether the computer equipment is used
primarily for administrative purposes.

Sec. 313 RCW 82.32.545 and 2008 c 81 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness are
important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources the
legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(2)(a) A person who reports taxes under RCW 82.04.260(((11))) (10),
82.04.250(3), or 82.04.290(3), or who claims an exemption or credit
under RCW 82.04.4461, 82.08.980, 82.12.980, 82.29A.137, 84.36.655, and
82.04.4463 ((shall)) must make an annual report to the department
detailing employment, wages, and employer-provided health and
retirement benefits for employment positions in Washington. However,
persons engaged in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of
such airplanes may report employment, wage, and benefit information per
job at the manufacturing site. The report ((shall)) may not include
names of employees. The report ((shall)) must also detail employment
by the total number of full-time, part-time, and temporary positions.
The first report filed under this subsection ((shall)) must include
employment, wage, and benefit information for the twelve-month period
immediately before first use of a preferential tax rate under RCW
82.04.260(((11))) (10), 82.04.250(3), or 82.04.290(3), or tax exemption
or credit under RCW 82.04.4461, 82.08.980, 82.12.980, 82.29A.137,
84.36.655, and 82.04.4463, unless a survey covering this twelve-month
period was filed as required by a statute repealed by chapter 81, Laws
of 2008. The report is due by March 31st following any year in which
a preferential tax rate under RCW 82.04.260(((11))) (10), 82.04.250(3),
or 82.04.290(3), is used, or tax exemption or credit under RCW
82.04.4461, 82.08.980, 82.12.980, 82.29A.137, 84.36.655, and 82.04.4463
is taken. This information is not subject to the confidentiality
provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon
request.
(b) If a person fails to submit an annual report under (a) of this
subsection by the due date of the report, the department ((shall)) must
declare the amount of taxes exempted or credited, or reduced in the
case of the preferential business and occupation tax rate, for that
year to be immediately due and payable. Excise taxes payable under
this subsection are subject to interest but not penalties, as provided
under this chapter. This information is not subject to the
confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the
public upon request.
(3) By November 1, 2010, and by November 1, 2023, the fiscal
committees of the house of representatives and the senate, in
consultation with the department, ((shall)) must report to the
legislature on the effectiveness of chapter 1, Laws of 2003 2nd sp.
sess., chapter 177, Laws of 2006, and chapter 81, Laws of 2008 in
regard to keeping Washington competitive. The report ((shall)) must
measure the effect of these laws on job retention, net jobs created for
Washington residents, company growth, diversification of the state's
economy, cluster dynamics, and other factors as the committees select.
The reports ((shall)) must include a discussion of principles to apply
in evaluating whether the legislature should reenact any or all of the
tax preferences in chapter 1, Laws of 2003 2nd sp. sess., chapter 177,
Laws of 2006, and chapter 81, Laws of 2008.

Sec. 314 RCW 82.32.550 and 2008 c 81 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(((a) Chapter 1, Laws of 2003 2nd sp. sess. takes effect on the
first day of the month in which the governor and a manufacturer of
commercial airplanes sign a memorandum of agreement regarding an
affirmative final decision to site a significant commercial airplane
final assembly facility in Washington state. The department shall
provide notice of the effective date of chapter 1, Laws of 2003 2nd sp.
sess. to affected taxpayers, the legislature, and others as deemed
appropriate by the department.
(b) Chapter 1, Laws of 2003 2nd sp. sess. is contingent upon the
siting of a significant commercial airplane final assembly facility in
the state of Washington. If a memorandum of agreement under subsection
(1) of this section is not signed by June 30, 2005, chapter 1, Laws of
2003 2nd sp. sess. is null and void.
(c)(i) The rate in RCW 82.04.260(11)(a)(ii) takes effect July 1,
2007.
(ii) If on December 31, 2007, final assembly of a superefficient
airplane has not begun in Washington state, the department shall
provide notice of such to affected taxpayers, the legislature, and
others as deemed appropriate by the department.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a))) "Commercial airplane" has its ordinary meaning, which is an
airplane certified by the federal aviation administration for
transporting persons or property, and any military derivative of such
an airplane.
(((b))) (2) "Component" means a part or system certified by the
federal aviation administration for installation or assembly into a
commercial airplane.
(((c) "Final assembly of a superefficient airplane" means the
activity of assembling an airplane from components parts necessary for
its mechanical operation such that the finished commercial airplane is
ready to deliver to the ultimate consumer.
(d) "Significant commercial airplane final assembly facility" means
a location with the capacity to produce at least thirty-six
superefficient airplanes a year.
(e) "Siting" means a final decision by a manufacturer to locate a
significant commercial airplane final assembly facility in Washington
state.
(f))) (3) "Superefficient airplane" means a twin aisle airplane
that carries between two hundred and three hundred fifty passengers,
with a range of more than seven thousand two hundred nautical miles, a
cruising speed of approximately mach .85, and that uses fifteen to
twenty percent less fuel than other similar airplanes on the market.

Sec. 315 RCW 82.32.630 and 2007 c 48 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness are
important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources, the
legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(2)(a) A person who reports taxes under RCW 82.04.260(((12) shall))
(11) must file a complete annual survey with the department. The
survey is due by March 31st following any year in which a person
reports taxes under RCW 82.04.260(((12))) (11). The department may
extend the due date for timely filing of annual surveys under this
section as provided in RCW 82.32.590. The survey ((shall)) must
include the amount of tax reduced under the preferential rate in RCW
82.04.260(((12))) (11). The survey ((shall)) must also include the
following information for employment positions in Washington:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(b) The first survey filed under this subsection ((shall)) must
include employment, wage, and benefit information for the twelve-month
period immediately before first use of a preferential tax rate under
RCW 82.04.260(((12))) (11).
(c) As part of the annual survey, the department may request
additional information, including the amount of investment in equipment
used in the activities taxable under the preferential rate in RCW
82.04.260(((12))) (11), necessary to measure the results of, or
determine eligibility for, the preferential tax rate in RCW
82.04.260(((12))) (11).
(d) All information collected under this section, except the amount
of the tax reduced under the preferential rate in RCW 82.04.260(((12)))
(11), is deemed taxpayer information under RCW 82.32.330. Information
on the amount of tax reduced is not subject to the confidentiality
provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon
request, except as provided in (e) of this subsection. If the amount
of the tax reduced as reported on the survey is different than the
amount actually reduced based on the taxpayer's excise tax returns or
otherwise allowed by the department, the amount actually reduced may be
disclosed.
(e) Persons for whom the actual amount of the tax reduction is less
than ten thousand dollars during the period covered by the survey may
request the department to treat the amount of the tax reduction as
confidential under RCW 82.32.330.
(f) Small harvesters as defined in RCW 84.33.035 are not required
to file the annual survey under this section.
(3) If a person fails to submit a complete annual survey under
subsection (2) of this section by the due date or any extension under
RCW 82.32.590, the department shall declare the amount of taxes reduced
under the preferential rate in RCW 82.04.260(((12))) (11) for the
period covered by the survey to be immediately due and payable. The
department ((shall)) must assess interest, but not penalties, on the
taxes. Interest ((shall)) must be assessed at the rate provided for
delinquent excise taxes under this chapter, retroactively to the date
the reduced taxes were due, and ((shall)) will accrue until the amount
of the reduced taxes is repaid.
(4) The department ((shall)) must use the information from the
annual survey required under subsection (2) of this section to prepare
summary descriptive statistics by category. The department ((shall))
must report these statistics to the legislature each year by September
1st. The requirement to prepare and report summary descriptive
statistics ((shall)) ceases after September 1, 2025.
(5) By November 1, 2011, and November 1, 2023, the fiscal
committees of the house of representatives and the senate, in
consultation with the department, ((shall)) must report to the
legislature on the effectiveness of the preferential tax rate provided
in RCW 82.04.260(((12))) (11). The report shall measure the effect of
the preferential tax rate provided in RCW 82.04.260(((12))) (11) on job
retention, net jobs created for Washington residents, company growth,
and other factors as the committees select. The report ((shall)) must
include a discussion of principles to apply in evaluating whether the
legislature should continue the preferential tax rate provided in RCW
82.04.260(((12))) (11).

Sec. 316 RCW 82.32.632 and 2009 c 461 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Every person claiming the preferential rate provided in RCW
82.04.260(((14))) (13) must file a complete annual report with the
department. The report is due by March 31st of the year following any
calendar year in which a person is eligible to claim the preferential
rate provided in RCW 82.04.260(((14))) (13). The department may extend
the due date for timely filing of annual reports under this section as
provided in RCW 82.32.590.
(b) The report must include information detailing employment,
wages, and employer-provided health and retirement benefits for
employment positions in Washington for the year that the preferential
rate was claimed. The report must not include names of employees. The
report must also detail employment by the total number of full-time,
part-time, and temporary positions for the year that the tax preference
was claimed.
(c) If a person filing a report under this section did not file a
report with the department in the previous calendar year, the report
filed under this section must also include employment, wage, and
benefit information for the calendar year immediately preceding the
calendar year for which the preferential rate provided in RCW
82.04.260(((14))) (13) was claimed.
(2) As part of the annual report, the department may request
additional information necessary to measure the results of, or
determine eligibility for, the preferential rate provided in RCW
82.04.260(((14))) (13).
(3) Other than information requested under subsection (2) of this
section, the information contained in an annual report filed under this
section is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW
82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.
(4) Except as otherwise provided by law, if a person claims the
preferential rate provided in RCW 82.04.260(((14))) (13) but fails to
submit a report by the due date or any extension under RCW 82.32.590,
the department must declare the amount of the tax preference claimed
for the previous calendar year to be immediately due and payable. The
department must assess interest, but not penalties, on the amounts due
under this subsection. The interest must be assessed at the rate
provided for delinquent taxes under this chapter, retroactively to the
date the tax preference was claimed, and accrues until the taxes for
which the tax preference was claimed are repaid. Amounts due under
this subsection are not subject to the confidentiality provisions of
RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.
(5) By November 1, 2014, and November 1, 2016, the fiscal
committees of the house of representatives and the senate, in
consultation with the department, must report to the legislature on the
effectiveness of the preferential rate provided in RCW
82.04.260(((14))) (13). The report must measure the effect of the
preferential rate provided in RCW 82.04.260(((14))) (13) on job
retention, net jobs created for Washington residents, industry growth,
and other factors as the committees select. The report must include a
discussion of principles to apply in evaluating whether the legislature
should continue the preferential rate provided in RCW 82.04.260(((14)))
(13).

Sec. 317 RCW 82.45.195 and 2007 c 48 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
A sale of standing timber is exempt from tax under this chapter if
the gross income from such sale is taxable under RCW 82.04.260(((12)))
(11)(d).

Sec. 318 RCW 35.102.150 and 2009 c 461 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
Notwithstanding RCW 35.102.130, a city that imposes a business and
occupation tax must allocate a person's gross income from the
activities of printing, and of publishing newspapers, periodicals, or
magazines, to the principal place in this state from which the
taxpayer's business is directed or managed. As used in this section,
the activities of printing, and of publishing newspapers, periodicals,
or magazines are those activities to which the tax rates in RCW
82.04.260(((14))) (13) and 82.04.280(1) apply.

Sec. 319 RCW 48.14.080 and 2009 c 535 s 1102 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) As to insurers, other than title insurers and taxpayers under
RCW 48.14.0201, the taxes imposed by this title ((shall be)) are in
lieu of all other taxes, except as otherwise provided in this section.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply with respect to:
(a) Taxes on real and tangible personal property;
(b) Excise taxes on the sale, purchase, use, or possession of (i)
real property; (ii) tangible personal property; (iii) extended
warranties; (iv) services, including digital automated services as
defined in RCW 82.04.192; and (v) digital goods and digital codes as
those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.192; and
(c) The tax imposed in RCW 82.04.260(((10))) (9), regarding public
and nonprofit hospitals.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the term "taxes" includes
taxes imposed by the state or any county, city, town, municipal
corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or other political
subdivision.

PART IV
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 Section 102 of this act does not affect
any final judgments, not subject to appeal, entered by a court of
competent jurisdiction before the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 Section 102 of this act applies both
retroactively and prospectively.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 Except for sections 101, 102, 306, and 403
of this act, this act takes effect July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405 Section 305 of this act expires July 1,
2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 406 Section 306 of this act takes effect July
1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 407 Sections 101, 102, and 403 of this act are
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health,
or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect immediately.

--- END ---