BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
ELIMINATING TAX PREFERENCES FOR BULLION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 RCW 82.04.062 ("Sale at wholesale," "sale
at retail" excludes sale of precious metal bullion and monetized
bullion -- Computation of tax) and 1985 c 471 s 5 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 The repeal in section 101 of this act does
not affect any existing right acquired or liability or obligation
incurred under the statute repealed or under any rule or order adopted
under that statute nor does it affect any proceeding instituted under
the repealed statute.

PART II
TEMPORARILY NARROWING THE SALES AND USE TAX EXEMPTION FOR LIVESTOCK
NUTRIENT EQUIPMENT AND FACILITIES
Sec. 201 RCW 82.08.890 and 2009 c 469 s 601 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to
eligible persons of:
(a) Qualifying livestock nutrient management equipment;
(b) Labor and services rendered in respect to installing,
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving qualifying livestock
nutrient management equipment; and
(c)(i) Labor and services rendered in respect to repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving of qualifying livestock nutrient
management facilities, or to tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of qualifying livestock nutrient management
facilities in the course of repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving
of such facilities.
(ii) The exemption provided in this subsection (1)(c) does not
apply to the sale of or charge made for: (A) Labor and services
rendered in respect to the constructing of new, or replacing previously
existing, qualifying livestock nutrient management facilities; or (B)
tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or component of
qualifying livestock nutrient management facilities during the course
of constructing new, or replacing previously existing, qualifying
livestock nutrient management facilities.
(2) The exemption provided in subsection (1) of this section
applies to sales made after the livestock nutrient management plan is:
(a) Certified under chapter 90.64 RCW; (b) approved as part of the
permit issued under chapter 90.48 RCW; or (c) approved as required
under subsection (4)(((c))) (d)(iii) of this section.
(3)(a) The department of revenue must provide an exemption
certificate to an eligible person upon application by that person.
(b) The department of agriculture must provide a list of eligible
persons, as defined in subsection (4)(((c))) (d)(i) and (ii) of this
section, to the department of revenue. Conservation districts must
maintain lists of eligible persons as defined in subsection (4)(((c)))
(d)(iii) of this section to allow the department of revenue to verify
eligibility. The application must be in a form and manner prescribed
by the department and must contain information regarding the location
of the dairy or animal feeding operation and other information the
department may require.
(((b))) (c) A person claiming an exemption under this section must
keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under
this section. The exemption is available only when the buyer provides
the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the
certificate for the seller's files.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section and
RCW 82.12.890 unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Animal feeding operation" means a lot or facility, other than
an aquatic animal production facility, where the following conditions
are met:
(i) Animals, other than aquatic animals, have been, are, or will be
stabled or confined and fed or maintained for a total of forty-five
days or more in any twelve-month period; and
(ii) Crops, vegetation, forage growth, or postharvest residues are
not sustained in the normal growing season over any portion of the lot
or facility.
(b) "Beef cattle feeding operation" means an animal feeding
operation primarily engaged in the feeding of beef cattle.
(c) "Conservation district" means a subdivision of state government
organized under chapter 89.08 RCW.
(((c))) (d) "Eligible person" means a person who:
(i) Is licensed to produce milk under chapter 15.36 RCW and who has
a certified dairy nutrient management plan, as required by chapter
90.64 RCW;
(ii) ((who)) Owns an animal feeding operation, other than a beef
cattle feeding operation, and has a permit issued under chapter 90.48
RCW; or
(iii) ((who)) Owns an animal feeding operation, other than a beef
cattle feeding operation, and has a nutrient management plan approved
by a conservation district as meeting natural resource conservation
service field office technical guide standards and who possesses an
exemption certificate under RCW 82.08.855.
(((d))) (e) "Handling and treatment of livestock manure" means the
activities of collecting, storing, moving, or transporting livestock
manure, separating livestock manure solids from liquids, or applying
livestock manure to the agricultural lands of an eligible person other
than through the use of pivot or linear type traveling irrigation
systems.
(((e))) (f) "Permit" means either a state waste discharge permit or
a national pollutant discharge elimination system permit, or both.
(((f))) (g)(i) "Qualifying livestock nutrient management equipment"
means the following tangible personal property for exclusive use in the
handling and treatment of livestock manure, including repair and
replacement parts for such equipment: (((i))) (A) Aerators; (((ii)))
(B) agitators; (((iii))) (C) augers; (((iv))) (D) conveyers; (((v)))
(E) gutter cleaners; (((vi))) (F) hard-hose reel traveler irrigation
systems; (((vii))) (G) lagoon and pond liners and floating covers;
(((viii))) (H) loaders; (((ix))) (I) manure composting devices; (((x)))
(J) manure spreaders; (((xi))) (K) manure tank wagons; (((xii))) (L)
manure vacuum tanks; (((xiii))) (M) poultry house cleaners; (((xiv)))
(N) poultry house flame sterilizers; (((xv))) (O) poultry house
washers; (((xvi))) (P) poultry litter saver machines; (((xvii))) (Q)
pipes; (((xviii))) (R) pumps; (((xix))) (S) scrapers; (((xx))) (T)
separators; (((xxi))) (U) slurry injectors and hoses; and (((xxii)))
(V) wheelbarrows, shovels, and pitchforks.
(((g))) (ii) "Qualifying livestock nutrient management equipment"
does not include tangible personal property used in the handling and
treatment of livestock manure originating from a beef cattle feeding
operation.
(h) "Qualifying livestock nutrient management facilities" means the
following structures and facilities for exclusive use in the handling
and treatment of livestock manure except for livestock manure
originating from a beef cattle feeding operation: (i) Flush systems;
(ii) lagoons; (iii) liquid livestock manure storage structures, such as
concrete tanks or glass-lined steel tanks; and (iv) structures used
solely for the dry storage of manure, including roofed stacking
facilities.

Sec. 202 RCW 82.12.890 and 2009 c 469 s 602 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use by an eligible person of:
(a) Qualifying livestock nutrient management equipment;
(b) Labor and services rendered in respect to installing,
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving qualifying livestock
nutrient management equipment; and
(c)(i) Tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or
component of qualifying livestock nutrient management facilities in the
course of repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving of such
facilities.
(ii) The exemption provided in this subsection (1)(c) does not
apply to the use of tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of qualifying livestock nutrient management
facilities during the course of constructing new, or replacing
previously existing, qualifying livestock nutrient management
facilities.
(2)(a) To be eligible, the equipment and facilities must be used
exclusively for activities necessary to maintain a livestock nutrient
management plan.
(b) The exemption applies to the use of tangible personal property
and labor and services made after the livestock nutrient management
plan is: (i) Certified under chapter 90.64 RCW; (ii) approved as part
of the permit issued under chapter 90.48 RCW; or (iii) approved as
required under RCW 82.08.890(4)(((c))) (d)(iii).
(3) The exemption certificate and recordkeeping requirements of RCW
82.08.890 apply to this section. The definitions in RCW 82.08.890
apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) The department must make a reasonable effort to notify any
person who operates a beef cattle feeding operation as defined in RCW
82.08.890 and who was issued an exemption certificate under RCW
82.08.890 before July 1, 2010, that the person is no longer an eligible
person for purposes of the exemptions provided in RCW 82.08.890 and
82.12.890 and that the person's exemption certificate is void.
(b) The notice required in this subsection must also advise the
person that:
(i) Continued use of the exemption certificate to claim exemption
under RCW 82.08.890 will subject the person to the penalty imposed in
subsection (2) of this section; and
(ii) The person must reapply for an exemption certificate under RCW
82.08.890 to claim an exemption under RCW 82.08.890 after June 30,
2013. Such applications may be made no earlier than April 30, 2013.
(2) If any person who, after receiving notice as provided in
subsection (1) of this section, uses the person's exemption
certificate, including the exemption certificate number, issued by the
department to claim an exemption under RCW 82.08.890, the department
must assess against that person a penalty of fifty percent of the tax
due, in addition to all other taxes, penalties, and interest due, on
the item or service purchased.

PART III
ENDING THE PREFERENTIAL BUSINESS AND OCCUPATION TAX TREATMENT RECEIVED
BY DIRECTORS OF CORPORATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 (1) In adopting the state's business and
occupation tax, the legislature intended to tax virtually all business
activities carried on within the state. See Simpson Inv. Co. v. Dep't
of Revenue, 141 Wn.2d 139, 149 (2000). The legislature recognizes that
the business and occupation tax applies to all activities engaged in
with the object of gain, benefit, or advantage to the taxpayer or to
another person or class, directly or indirectly, unless a specific
exemption applies.
(2) One of the major business and occupation tax exemptions is
provided in RCW 82.04.360 for income earned as an employee or servant
as distinguished from income earned as an independent contractor. The
legislature's intent in providing this exemption was to exempt employee
wages from the business and occupation tax but not to exempt income
earned as an independent contractor.
(3) The legislature finds that corporate directors are not
employees or servants of the corporation whose board they serve on and
therefore are not entitled to a business and occupation tax exemption
under RCW 82.04.360. The legislature further finds that there are no
business and occupation tax exemptions for compensation received for
serving as a member of a corporation's board of directors.
(4) The legislature also finds that there is a widespread
misunderstanding among corporate directors that the business and
occupation tax does not apply to the compensation they receive for
serving as a director of a corporation. It is the legislature's
expectation that the department of revenue will take appropriate
measures to ensure that corporate directors understand and comply with
their business and occupation tax obligations with respect to their
director compensation. However, because of the widespread
misunderstanding by corporate directors of their liability for business
and occupation tax on director compensation, the legislature finds that
it is appropriate in this unique situation to provide limited relief
against the retroactive assessment of business and occupation taxes on
corporate director compensation.
(5) The legislature also reaffirms its intent that all income of
all independent contractors is subject to business and occupation tax
unless specifically exempt under the Constitution or laws of this state
or the United States.

Sec. 302 RCW 82.04.360 and 1991 c 324 s 19 and 1991 c 275 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) This chapter ((shall)) does not apply to any person in respect
to his or her employment in the capacity of an employee or servant as
distinguished from that of an independent contractor. For the purposes
of this section, the definition of employee shall include those persons
that are defined in section 3121(d)(3)(B) of the federal internal
revenue code of 1986, as amended through January 1, 1991.
(2) ((A booth renter, as defined by RCW 18.16.020, is an
independent contractor for purposes of this chapter.)) Until July 1,
2010, this chapter does not apply to amounts received by an individual
from a corporation as compensation for serving as a member of that
corporation's board of directors. Beginning July 1, 2010, such amounts
are taxable under RCW 82.04.290(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 The sole reason for deleting the language
in RCW 82.04.360(2) is because RCW 18.16.020 no longer defines the term
"booth renter." This should not be construed as a substantive change
in the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 In accordance with Article VIII, section
5 of the state Constitution, sections 302 and 402 of this act do not
authorize refunds of business and occupation tax validly collected
before July 1, 2010, on amounts received by an individual from a
corporation as compensation for serving as a member of that
corporation's board of directors.

PART IV
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 Section 302 of this act applies
retroactively as well as prospectively.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 Sections 101 through 203 of this act take
effect July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 Sections 201 and 202 of this act expire
July 1, 2013.

--- END ---