BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
CLARIFICATIONS AND TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS
Sec. 101 RCW 39.100.050 and 2007 c 266 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A local government that creates a benefit zone and has received
approval from the department under RCW 82.32.700 to impose the local
option sales and use tax authorized in RCW 82.14.465 may use annually
any excess local excise taxes received by it from taxable activity
within the benefit zone to finance public improvement costs associated
with the public improvements financed in whole or in part by hospital
benefit zone financing. The use of excess local excise taxes must
cease when tax allocation revenues are no longer necessary or obligated
to pay the costs of the public improvements. Any participating taxing
authority is authorized to allocate excess local excise taxes to the
local government as long as the local government has received approval
from the department under RCW 82.32.700 to impose the local option
sales and use tax authorized in RCW 82.14.465. The legislature
declares that it is a proper purpose of a local government or
participating taxing authority to allocate excess local excise taxes
for purposes of financing public improvements under this chapter.
(2) A local government ((shall)) must provide the department
accurate information describing the geographical boundaries of the
benefit zone at least seventy-five days before the effective date of
the ordinance creating the benefit zone. The local government
((shall)) must ensure that the boundary information provided to the
department is kept current.
(3) The department ((shall)) must provide the necessary information
to calculate excess local excise taxes to each local government that
has provided boundary information to the department as provided in this
section and that has received approval from the department under RCW
82.32.700 to impose the local option sales and use tax authorized in
RCW 82.14.465.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Base year" means the calendar year immediately following the
creation of a benefit zone.
(b) "Excess local excise taxes" means the amount of local excise
taxes received by the local government during the measurement year from
taxable activity within the benefit zone over and above the amount of
local excise taxes received by the local government during the base
year from taxable activity within the benefit zone. However, if a
local government creates the benefit zone and reasonably determines
that no activity subject to tax under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW
occurred in the twelve months immediately preceding the creation of the
benefit zone within the boundaries of the area that became the benefit
zone, "excess local excise taxes" means the entire amount of local
excise taxes received by the local government during a calendar year
period beginning with the calendar year immediately following the
creation of the benefit zone and continuing with each measurement year
thereafter.
(c) "Local excise taxes" means local revenues derived from the
imposition of sales and use taxes authorized in RCW 82.14.030 at the
tax rate that was in effect at the time the hospital benefit zone is
approved by the department, except that if a local government reduces
the rate of such tax after the ((revenue development area)) hospital
benefit zone was approved, "local excise taxes" means the local
revenues derived from the imposition of the sales and use taxes
authorized in RCW 82.14.030 at the lower tax rate.
(d) "Measurement year" means a calendar year, beginning with the
calendar year following the base year and each calendar year
thereafter, that is used annually to measure the amount of excess state
excise taxes and excess local excise taxes required to be used to
finance public improvement costs associated with public improvements
financed in whole or in part by hospital benefit zone financing.

Sec. 102 RCW 82.04.050 and 2009 c 563 s 301 and 2009 c 535 s 301
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) "Sale at retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of
tangible personal property (including articles produced, fabricated, or
imprinted) to all persons irrespective of the nature of their business
and including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons
who install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real
or personal property of or for consumers other than a sale to a person
((who presents a seller's permit or uniform exemption certificate in
conformity with RCW 82.04.470 and)) who:
(((a))) (i) Purchases for the purpose of resale as tangible
personal property in the regular course of business without intervening
use by such person, but a purchase for the purpose of resale by a
regional transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a sale for
resale; or
(((b))) (ii) Installs, repairs, cleans, alters, imprints, improves,
constructs, or decorates real or personal property of or for consumers,
if such tangible personal property becomes an ingredient or component
of such real or personal property without intervening use by such
person; or
(((c))) (iii) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property
purchased in producing for sale as a new article of tangible personal
property or substance, of which such property becomes an ingredient or
component or is a chemical used in processing, when the primary purpose
of such chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through
contact with an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale; or
(((d))) (iv) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property
purchased in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in
producing magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property
is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an
ingredient of ferrosilicon; or
(((e))) (v) Purchases for the purpose of providing the property to
consumers as part of competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW
82.04.065((. The term shall include every sale of tangible personal
property which is used or consumed or to be used or consumed in the
performance of any activity classified as a "sale at retail" or "retail
sale" even though such property is resold or utilized as provided in
(a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) of this subsection following such use. The
term also means every sale of tangible personal property to persons
engaged in any business which is taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (2) and
(7), 82.04.290, and 82.04.2908)); or
(((f))) (vi) Purchases for the purpose of satisfying the person's
obligations under an extended warranty as defined in subsection (7) of
this section, if such tangible personal property replaces or becomes an
ingredient or component of property covered by the extended warranty
without intervening use by such person.
(b) The term includes every sale of tangible personal property that
is used or consumed or to be used or consumed in the performance of any
activity defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though
such property is resold or used as provided in (a)(i) through (vi) of
this subsection following such use.
(c) The term also means every sale of tangible personal property to
persons engaged in any business that is taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (2)
and (7), 82.04.290, and 82.04.2908.
(2) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the sale of
or charge made for tangible personal property consumed and/or for labor
and services rendered in respect to the following:
(a) The installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or
improving of tangible personal property of or for consumers, including
charges made for the mere use of facilities in respect thereto, but
excluding charges made for the use of self-service laundry facilities,
and also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit health care
facilities, and excluding services rendered in respect to live animals,
birds and insects;
(b) The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or
existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real
property of or for consumers, including the installing or attaching of
any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether
or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation, and shall also include the sale of services or charges
made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth excepting the
mere leveling of land used in commercial farming or agriculture;
(c) The constructing, repairing, or improving of any structure
upon, above, or under any real property owned by an owner who conveys
the property by title, possession, or any other means to the person
performing such construction, repair, or improvement for the purpose of
performing such construction, repair, or improvement and the property
is then reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the
original owner;
(d) The cleaning, fumigating, razing, or moving of existing
buildings or structures, but ((may)) does not include the charge made
for janitorial services; and for purposes of this section the term
"janitorial services" ((shall)) means those cleaning and caretaking
services ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service businesses
including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor cleaning
and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery.
The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering,
repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or
sandblasting;
(e) Automobile towing and similar automotive transportation
services, but not in respect to those required to report and pay taxes
under chapter 82.16 RCW;
(f) The furnishing of lodging and all other services by a hotel,
rooming house, tourist court, motel, trailer camp, and the granting of
any similar license to use real property, as distinguished from the
renting or leasing of real property, and it is presumed that the
occupancy of real property for a continuous period of one month or more
constitutes a rental or lease of real property and not a mere license
to use or enjoy the same. For the purposes of this subsection, it
((shall be)) is presumed that the sale of and charge made for the
furnishing of lodging for a continuous period of one month or more to
a person is a rental or lease of real property and not a mere license
to enjoy the same;
(g) The installing, repairing, altering, or improving of digital
goods for consumers;
(h) Persons taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), and (g) of
this subsection when such sales or charges are for property, labor and
services which are used or consumed in whole or in part by such persons
in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at retail" or
"retail sale" even though such property, labor and services may be
resold after such use or consumption. Nothing contained in this
subsection ((shall)) may be construed to modify subsection (1) of this
section and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section may be
construed to modify this subsection.
(3) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the sale of
or charge made for personal, business, or professional services
including amounts designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and
other service emoluments however designated, received by persons
engaging in the following business activities:
(a) Amusement and recreation services including but not limited to
golf, pool, billiards, skating, bowling, ski lifts and tows, day trips
for sightseeing purposes, and others, when provided to consumers;
(b) Abstract, title insurance, and escrow services;
(c) Credit bureau services;
(d) Automobile parking and storage garage services;
(e) Landscape maintenance and horticultural services but excluding
(i) horticultural services provided to farmers and (ii) pruning,
trimming, repairing, removing, and clearing of trees and brush near
electric transmission or distribution lines or equipment, if performed
by or at the direction of an electric utility;
(f) Service charges associated with tickets to professional
sporting events; and
(g) The following personal services: Physical fitness services,
tanning salon services, tattoo parlor services, steam bath services,
turkish bath services, escort services, and dating services.
(4)(a) The term also includes((:
(i))) the renting or leasing of tangible personal property to
consumers((; and
(ii) Providing tangible personal property along with an operator
for a fixed or indeterminate period of time. A consideration of this
is that the operator is necessary for the tangible personal property to
perform as designed. For the purpose of this subsection (4)(a)(ii), an
operator must do more than maintain, inspect, or set up the tangible
personal property)).
(b) The term does not include the renting or leasing of tangible
personal property where the lease or rental is for the purpose of
sublease or subrent.
(5) The term also includes the providing of "competitive telephone
service," "telecommunications service," or "ancillary services," as
those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.
(6)(a) The term also includes the sale of prewritten computer
software ((other than a sale)) to a ((person who presents a seller's
permit or uniform exemption certificate in conformity with RCW
82.04.470)) consumer, regardless of the method of delivery to the end
user. For purposes of this subsection (6)(a), the sale of prewritten
computer software includes the sale of or charge made for a key or an
enabling or activation code, where the key or code is required to
activate prewritten computer software and put the software into use.
There is no separate sale of the key or code from the prewritten
computer software, regardless of how the sale may be characterized by
the vendor or by the purchaser.
The term "retail sale" does not include the sale of or charge made
for:
(i) Custom software; or
(ii) The customization of prewritten computer software.
(b) The term also includes the charge made to consumers for the
right to access and use prewritten computer software, where possession
of the software is maintained by the seller or a third party,
regardless of whether the charge for the service is on a per use, per
user, per license, subscription, or some other basis.
(7) The term also includes the sale of or charge made for an
extended warranty to a consumer. For purposes of this subsection,
"extended warranty" means an agreement for a specified duration to
perform the replacement or repair of tangible personal property at no
additional charge or a reduced charge for tangible personal property,
labor, or both, or to provide indemnification for the replacement or
repair of tangible personal property, based on the occurrence of
specified events. The term "extended warranty" does not include an
agreement, otherwise meeting the definition of extended warranty in
this subsection, if no separate charge is made for the agreement and
the value of the agreement is included in the sales price of the
tangible personal property covered by the agreement. For purposes of
this subsection, "sales price" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.08.010.
(8)(a) The term also includes the following sales to consumers of
digital goods, digital codes, and digital automated services:
(i) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser the right
of permanent use;
(ii) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser a right of
use that is less than permanent;
(iii) Sales in which the purchaser is not obligated to make
continued payment as a condition of the sale; and
(iv) Sales in which the purchaser is obligated to make continued
payment as a condition of the sale.
(b) A retail sale of digital goods, digital codes, or digital
automated services under this subsection (8) includes any services
provided by the seller exclusively in connection with the digital
goods, digital codes, or digital automated services, whether or not a
separate charge is made for such services.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, "permanent" means perpetual or
for an indefinite or unspecified length of time. A right of permanent
use is presumed to have been granted unless the agreement between the
seller and the purchaser specifies or the circumstances surrounding the
transaction suggest or indicate that the right to use terminates on the
occurrence of a condition subsequent.
(9) The term also includes the charge made for providing tangible
personal property along with an operator for a fixed or indeterminate
period of time. A consideration of this is that the operator is
necessary for the tangible personal property to perform as designed.
For the purpose of this subsection (9), an operator must do more than
maintain, inspect, or set up the tangible personal property.
(10) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor
and services rendered in respect to the building, repairing, or
improving of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way,
mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or
political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is
used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including
mass transportation vehicles of any kind.
(((10))) (11) The term also does not include sales of chemical
sprays or washes to persons for the purpose of postharvest treatment of
fruit for the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or decay, nor does it
include sales of feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents for enhanced
pollination including insects such as bees, and spray materials to:
(a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation reserve
program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands
reserve program, and the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their
successors administered by the United States department of agriculture;
(b) farmers for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural
product; and (c) farmers acting under cooperative habitat development
or access contracts with an organization exempt from federal income tax
under ((Title)) 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal
revenue code or the Washington state department of fish and wildlife to
produce or improve wildlife habitat on land that the farmer owns or
leases.
(((11))) (12) The term does not include the sale of or charge made
for labor and services rendered in respect to the constructing,
repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or
other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the
United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing
authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing, or attaching of any article of tangible personal property
therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a
part of the realty by virtue of installation. Nor does the term
include the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land
and the moving of earth of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority. Nor
does the term include the sale of services or charges made for cleaning
up for the United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste
and other by-products of weapons production and nuclear research and
development.
(((12))) (13) The term does not include the sale of or charge made
for labor, services, or tangible personal property pursuant to
agreements providing maintenance services for bus, rail, or rail fixed
guideway equipment when a regional transit authority is the recipient
of the labor, services, or tangible personal property, and a transit
agency, as defined in RCW 81.104.015, performs the labor or services.

Sec. 103 RCW 82.04.190 and 2009 c 535 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
"Consumer" means the following:
(1) Any person who purchases, acquires, owns, holds, or uses any
article of tangible personal property irrespective of the nature of the
person's business and including, among others, without limiting the
scope hereof, persons who install, repair, clean, alter, improve,
construct, or decorate real or personal property of or for consumers
other than for the purpose of:
(a) ((of)) Resale as tangible personal property in the regular
course of business ((or));
(b) ((of)) Incorporating such property as an ingredient or
component of real or personal property when installing, repairing,
cleaning, altering, imprinting, improving, constructing, or decorating
such real or personal property of or for consumers ((or));
(c) ((of)) Consuming such property in producing for sale as a new
article of tangible personal property or a new substance, of which such
property becomes an ingredient or component or as a chemical used in
processing, when the primary purpose of such chemical is to create a
chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of a new
article being produced for sale ((or));
(d) ((of)) Consuming the property purchased in producing
ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing magnesium for
sale, if the primary purpose of such property is to create a chemical
reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of ferrosilicon;
or
(e) ((of)) Satisfying the person's obligations under an extended
warranty as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7), if such tangible personal
property replaces or becomes an ingredient or component of property
covered by the extended warranty without intervening use by such
person;
(2)(a) Any person engaged in any business activity taxable under
RCW 82.04.290 or 82.04.2908; (b) any person who purchases, acquires, or
uses any competitive telephone service, ancillary services, or
telecommunications service as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065,
other than for resale in the regular course of business; (c) any person
who purchases, acquires, or uses any service defined in RCW
82.04.050(2) (a) or (g), other than for resale in the regular course of
business or for the purpose of satisfying the person's obligations
under an extended warranty as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7); (d) any
person who purchases, acquires, or uses any amusement and recreation
service defined in RCW 82.04.050(3)(a), other than for resale in the
regular course of business; (e) any person who purchases or acquires an
extended warranty as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7) other than for resale
in the regular course of business; and (f) any person who is an end
user of software. For purposes of this subsection (2)(f) and RCW
82.04.050(6), a person who purchases or otherwise acquires prewritten
computer software, who provides services described in RCW
82.04.050(6)(b) and who will charge consumers for the right to access
and use the prewritten computer software, is not an end user of the
prewritten computer software;
(3) Any person engaged in the business of contracting for the
building, repairing or improving of any street, place, road, highway,
easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking
facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal
corporation or political subdivision of the state of Washington or by
the United States and which is used or to be used primarily for foot or
vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind as
defined in RCW 82.04.280, in respect to tangible personal property when
such person incorporates such property as an ingredient or component of
such publicly owned street, place, road, highway, easement,
right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility,
bridge, tunnel, or trestle by installing, placing or spreading the
property in or upon the right-of-way of such street, place, road,
highway, easement, bridge, tunnel, or trestle or in or upon the site of
such mass public transportation terminal or parking facility;
(4) Any person who is an owner, lessee or has the right of
possession to or an easement in real property which is being
constructed, repaired, decorated, improved, or otherwise altered by a
person engaged in business, excluding only (a) municipal corporations
or political subdivisions of the state in respect to labor and services
rendered to their real property which is used or held for public road
purposes, and (b) the United States, instrumentalities thereof, and
county and city housing authorities created pursuant to chapter 35.82
RCW in respect to labor and services rendered to their real property.
Nothing contained in this or any other subsection of this definition
shall be construed to modify any other definition of "consumer";
(5) Any person who is an owner, lessee, or has the right of
possession to personal property which is being constructed, repaired,
improved, cleaned, imprinted, or otherwise altered by a person engaged
in business;
(6) Any person engaged in the business of constructing, repairing,
decorating, or improving new or existing buildings or other structures
under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created
pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing or attaching of
any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether
or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation; also, any person engaged in the business of clearing land
and moving earth of or for the United States, any instrumentality
thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant to
chapter 35.82 RCW. Any such person ((shall be)) is a consumer within
the meaning of this subsection in respect to tangible personal property
incorporated into, installed in, or attached to such building or other
structure by such person, except that consumer does not include any
person engaged in the business of constructing, repairing, decorating,
or improving new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon,
or above real property of or for the United States, or any
instrumentality thereof, if the investment project would qualify for
sales and use tax deferral under chapter 82.63 RCW if undertaken by a
private entity;
(7) Any person who is a lessor of machinery and equipment, the
rental of which is exempt from the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 under
RCW 82.08.02565, with respect to the sale of or charge made for
tangible personal property consumed in respect to repairing the
machinery and equipment, if the tangible personal property has a useful
life of less than one year. Nothing contained in this or any other
subsection of this section ((shall)) may be construed to modify any
other definition of "consumer";
(8) Any person engaged in the business of cleaning up for the
United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste and other
by-products of weapons production and nuclear research and development;
(9) Any person who is an owner, lessee, or has the right of
possession of tangible personal property that, under the terms of an
extended warranty as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7), has been repaired or
is replacement property, but only with respect to the sale of or charge
made for the repairing of the tangible personal property or the
replacement property;
(10) Any person who purchases, acquires, or uses services described
in RCW 82.04.050(6)(b) other than for resale in the regular course of
business; ((and))
(11)(a) Any end user of a digital product or digital code.
(b)(i) For purposes of this subsection, "end user" means any
taxpayer as defined in RCW 82.12.010 other than a taxpayer who receives
by contract a digital product for further commercial broadcast,
rebroadcast, transmission, retransmission, licensing, relicensing,
distribution, redistribution or exhibition of the product, in whole or
in part, to others. A person that purchases digital products or
digital codes for the purpose of giving away such products or codes
will not be considered to have engaged in the distribution or
redistribution of such products or codes and will be treated as an end
user;
(ii) If a purchaser of a digital code does not receive the
contractual right to further redistribute, after the digital code is
redeemed, the underlying digital product to which the digital code
relates, then the purchaser of the digital code is an end user. If the
purchaser of the digital code receives the contractual right to further
redistribute, after the digital code is redeemed, the underlying
digital product to which the digital code relates, then the purchaser
of the digital code is not an end user. A purchaser of a digital code
who has the contractual right to further redistribute the digital code
is an end user if that purchaser does not have the right to further
redistribute, after the digital code is redeemed, the underlying
digital product to which the digital code relates; and
(12) Any person who provides services described in RCW
82.04.050(9). Any such person is a consumer with respect to the
purchase, acquisition, or use of the tangible personal property that
the person provides along with an operator in rendering services
defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(9). Any such person may also
be a consumer under other provisions of this section.

Sec. 104 RCW 82.04.360 and 1991 c 324 s 19 and 1991 c 275 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) This chapter ((shall)) does not apply to any person in respect
to his or her employment in the capacity of an employee or servant as
distinguished from that of an independent contractor. For the purposes
of this section, the definition of employee shall include those persons
that are defined in section 3121(d)(3)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code
of 1986, as amended through January 1, 1991.
(2) A booth renter((, as defined by RCW 18.16.020,)) is an
independent contractor for purposes of this chapter. For purposes of
this subsection, "booth renter" means any person who:
(a) Performs cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, or manicuring
services for which a license is required under chapter 18.16 RCW; and
(b) Pays a fee for the use of salon or shop facilities and receives
no compensation or other consideration from the owner of the salon or
shop for the services performed.

Sec. 105 RCW 82.04.3651 and 1999 c 358 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to amounts received from
fundraising activities by nonprofit organizations, as defined in
subsection (2) of this section, ((for fund-raising activities)) and
libraries as defined in RCW 27.12.010.
(2) As used in this section, a "nonprofit organization" means:
(a) An organization exempt from tax under section 501(c) (3), (4),
or (10) of the federal internal revenue code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)
(3), (4), or (10));
(b) A nonprofit organization that would qualify under (a) of this
subsection except that it is not organized as a nonprofit corporation;
or
(c) A nonprofit organization that meets all of the following
criteria:
(i) The members, stockholders, officers, directors, or trustees of
the organization do not receive any part of the organization's gross
income, except as payment for services rendered;
(ii) The compensation received by any person for services rendered
to the organization does not exceed an amount reasonable under the
circumstances; and
(iii) The activities of the organization do not include a
substantial amount of political activity, including but not limited to
influencing legislation and participation in any campaign on behalf of
any candidate for political office.
(3) As used in this section, the term "fund-raising activity" means
soliciting or accepting contributions of money or other property or
activities involving the anticipated exchange of goods or services for
money between the soliciting organization and the organization or
person solicited, for the purpose of furthering the goals of the
nonprofit organization. "Fund-raising activity" does not include the
operation of a regular place of business in which sales are made during
regular hours such as a bookstore, thrift shop, restaurant, or similar
business or the operation of a regular place of business from which
services are provided or performed during regular hours such as the
provision of retail, personal, or professional services. The sale of
used books, used videos, used sound recordings, or similar used
information products in a library, as defined in RCW 27.12.010, is not
the operation of a regular place of business for the purposes of this
section, if the proceeds of the sales are used to support the library.

Sec. 106 RCW 82.04.394 and 1998 c 338 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to amounts received by a property
management company from the owner of a property for gross wages and
benefits paid directly to or on behalf of on-site personnel from
property management trust accounts that are required to be maintained
under RCW ((18.85.310)) 18.85.285.
(2) As used in this section, "on-site personnel" means a person who
meets all of the following conditions: (a) The person works primarily
at the owner's property; (b) the person's duties include leasing
property units, maintaining the property, collecting rents, or similar
activities; and (c) under a written property management agreement: (i)
The person's compensation is the ultimate obligation of the property
owner and not the property manager; (ii) the property manager is liable
for payment only as agent of the owner; and (iii) the property manager
is the agent of the owner with respect to the on-site personnel and
that all actions, including, but not limited to, hiring, firing,
compensation, and conditions of employment, taken by the property
manager with respect to the on-site personnel are subject to the
approval of the property owner.

Sec. 107 RCW 82.08.0256 and 2009 c 535 s 509 are each amended to
read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales (including
transfers of title through decree of appropriation) heretofore or
hereafter made of the entire operating property of a publicly or
privately owned public utility, or of a complete operating integral
section thereof, to the state or a political subdivision thereof for
use in conducting any public service business as defined in RCW
82.16.010 (((1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), (10) or
(11))). For purposes of this section, "operating property" includes
digital goods and digital codes.

Sec. 108 RCW 82.08.02573 and 1998 c 336 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to a sale made by a
nonprofit organization or a library, if the gross income from the sale
is exempt under RCW 82.04.3651.

Sec. 109 RCW 82.08.0273 and 2009 c 535 s 512 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to
nonresidents of this state of tangible personal property, digital
goods, and digital codes, when such property is for use outside this
state, and the purchaser (a) is a bona fide resident of a state or
possession or Province of Canada other than the state of Washington and
such state, possession, or Province of Canada does not impose a retail
sales tax or use tax of three percent or more or, if imposing such a
tax, permits Washington residents exemption from otherwise taxable
sales by reason of their residence, and (b) agrees, when requested, to
grant the department of revenue access to such records and other forms
of verification at his or her place of residence to assure that such
purchases are not first used substantially in the state of Washington.
(2) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this chapter, if
parts or other tangible personal property are installed by the seller
during the course of repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving motor
vehicles, trailers, or campers and the seller makes a separate charge
for the tangible personal property, the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020
does not apply to the separately stated charge to a nonresident
purchaser for the tangible personal property but only if the separately
stated charge does not exceed either the seller's current publicly
stated retail price for the tangible personal property or, if no
publicly stated retail price is available, the seller's cost for the
tangible personal property. However, the exemption provided by this
section does not apply if tangible personal property is installed by
the seller during the course of repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving motor vehicles, trailers, or campers and the seller makes a
single nonitemized charge for providing the tangible personal property
and service. All of the requirements in subsections (1) and (3)
through (6) of this section apply to this subsection.
(3)(a) Any person claiming exemption from retail sales tax under
the provisions of this section must display proof of his or her current
nonresident status as provided in this section.
(b) Acceptable proof of a nonresident person's status includes one
piece of identification such as a valid driver's license from the
jurisdiction in which the out-of-state residency is claimed or a valid
identification card which has a photograph of the holder and is issued
by the out-of-state jurisdiction. Identification under this subsection
(3)(b) must show the holder's residential address and have as one of
its legal purposes the establishment of residency in that out-of-state
jurisdiction.
(c) In lieu of furnishing proof of a person's nonresident status
under (b) of this subsection (3), a person claiming exemption from
retail sales tax under the provisions of this section may provide the
seller with an exemption certificate in compliance with subsection
(4)(b) of this section.
(4)(a) Nothing in this section requires the vendor to make tax
exempt retail sales to nonresidents. A vendor may choose to make sales
to nonresidents, collect the sales tax, and remit the amount of sales
tax collected to the state as otherwise provided by law. If the vendor
chooses to make a sale to a nonresident without collecting the sales
tax, the vendor ((shall, in good faith,)) must examine the purchaser's
proof of nonresidence, determine whether the proof is acceptable under
subsection (3)(b) of this section, and maintain records for each
nontaxable sale which shall show the type of proof accepted, including
any identification numbers where appropriate, and the expiration date,
if any.
(b) In lieu of using the method provided in (a) of this subsection
to document an exempt sale to a nonresident, a seller may accept from
the purchaser a properly completed uniform exemption certificate
approved by the streamlined sales and use tax agreement governing board
or any other exemption certificate as may be authorized by the
department and properly completed by the purchaser. A nonresident
purchaser who uses an exemption certificate authorized in this
subsection (4)(b) must include the purchaser's driver's license number
or other state-issued identification number and the state of issuance.
(c) In lieu of using the methods provided in (a) and (b) of this
subsection to document an exempt sale to a nonresident, a seller may
capture the relevant data elements as allowed under the streamlined
sales and use tax agreement.
(5)(a) Any person making fraudulent statements, which includes the
offer of fraudulent identification or fraudulently procured
identification to a vendor, in order to purchase goods without paying
retail sales tax is guilty of perjury under chapter 9A.72 RCW.
(b) Any person making tax exempt purchases under this section by
displaying proof of identification not his or her own, or counterfeit
identification, with intent to violate the provisions of this section,
is guilty of a misdemeanor and, in addition, is liable for the tax and
subject to a penalty equal to the greater of one hundred dollars or the
tax due on such purchases.
(6)(a) Any vendor who makes sales without collecting the tax ((to
a person who does not hold valid identification establishing out-of-state residency, and any vendor)) and who fails to maintain records of
sales to nonresidents as provided in this section((,)) is personally
liable for the amount of tax due.
(b) Any vendor who makes sales without collecting the retail sales
tax under this section and who has actual knowledge that the
purchaser's proof of identification establishing out-of-state residency
is fraudulent is guilty of a misdemeanor and, in addition, is liable
for the tax and subject to a penalty equal to the greater of one
thousand dollars or the tax due on such sales. In addition, both the
purchaser and the vendor are liable for any penalties and interest
assessable under chapter 82.32 RCW.

Sec. 110 RCW 82.08.700 and 2007 c 22 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to
nonresident individuals of vessels thirty feet or longer if an
individual purchasing a vessel purchases and displays a valid use
permit.
(2)(a) An individual claiming exemption from retail sales tax under
this section must display proof of his or her current nonresident
status at the time of purchase.
(b) Acceptable proof of a nonresident individual's status includes
one piece of identification such as a valid driver's license from the
jurisdiction in which the out-of-state residency is claimed or a valid
identification card that has a photograph of the holder and is issued
by the out-of-state jurisdiction. Identification under this subsection
(2)(b) must show the holder's residential address and have as one of
its legal purposes the establishment of residency in that out-of-state
jurisdiction.
(3) Nothing in this section requires the vessel dealer to make tax
exempt retail sales to nonresidents. A dealer may choose to make sales
to nonresidents, collect the sales tax, and remit the amount of sales
tax collected to the state as otherwise provided by law. If the dealer
chooses to make a sale to a nonresident without collecting the sales
tax, the vendor ((shall, in good faith,)) must examine the proof of
nonresidence, determine whether the proof is acceptable under
subsection (2)(b) of this section, and maintain records for each
nontaxable sale that shows the type of proof accepted, including any
identification numbers where appropriate, and the expiration date, if
any.
(4) A vessel dealer shall issue a use permit to a buyer if the
dealer is satisfied that the buyer is a nonresident. The use permit
((shall)) must be in a form and manner required by the department and
((shall)) must include an affidavit, signed by the purchaser, declaring
that the vessel will be used in a manner consistent with this section.
The fee for the issuance of a use permit is five hundred dollars for
vessels fifty feet in length or less and eight hundred dollars for
vessels greater than fifty feet in length. Funds collected under this
section and RCW 82.12.700 ((shall)) must be reported on the dealer's
excise tax return and remitted to the department in accordance with RCW
82.32.045. The department ((shall)) must transmit the fees to the
state treasurer to be deposited in the state general fund. The use
permit must be displayed on the vessel and is valid for twelve
consecutive months from the date of issuance. A use permit is not
renewable. A purchaser at the time of purchase must make an
irrevocable election to take the exemption authorized in this section
or the exemption in either RCW 82.08.0266 or 82.08.02665. A vessel
dealer must maintain a copy of the use permit for the dealer's records.
Vessel dealers must provide copies of use permits issued by the dealer
under this section and RCW 82.12.700 to the department on a quarterly
basis.
(5) A nonresident who claims an exemption under this section and
who uses a vessel in this state after his or her use permit for that
vessel has expired is liable for the tax imposed under RCW 82.08.020 on
the original selling price of the vessel and ((shall)) must pay the tax
directly to the department. Interest at the rate provided in RCW
82.32.050 applies to amounts due under this subsection, retroactively
to the date the vessel was purchased, and accrues until the full amount
of tax due is paid to the department.
(6) Any vessel dealer who makes sales without collecting the tax to
a person who does not hold valid identification establishing
out-of-state residency, and any dealer who fails to maintain records of
sales to nonresidents as provided in this section, is personally liable
for the amount of tax due.
(7) Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the administration of the fee
imposed in this section and RCW 82.12.700.
(8) A vessel dealer that issues use permits under this section and
RCW 82.12.700 must file with the department all returns in an
electronic format as provided or approved by the department. As used
in this subsection, "returns" has the same meaning as "return" in RCW
82.32.050.
(a) Any return required to be filed in an electronic format under
this subsection is not filed until received by the department in an
electronic format provided or approved by the department.
(b) The electronic filing requirement in this subsection ends when
a vessel dealer no longer issues use permits, and the dealer has
electronically filed all of its returns reporting the fees collected
under this section and RCW 82.12.700.
(c) The department may waive the electronic filing requirement in
this subsection for good cause shown.

Sec. 111 RCW 82.12.0257 and 2009 c 535 s 611 are each amended to
read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use
of any article of personal property included within the transfer of the
title to the entire operating property of a publicly or privately owned
public utility, or of a complete operating integral section thereof, by
the state or a political subdivision thereof in conducting any public
service business as defined in RCW 82.16.010 (((1), (2), (3), (4), (5),
(6), (7), (8), (9), (10), or (11))). For the purposes of this section,
"operating property" includes digital goods and digital codes.

Sec. 112 RCW 82.12.040 and 2009 c 535 s 1108 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every person who maintains in this state a place of business or
a stock of goods, or engages in business activities within this state,
shall obtain from the department a certificate of registration, and
shall, at the time of making sales of tangible personal property,
digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, extended
warranties, or sales of any service defined as a retail sale in RCW
82.04.050 (2) (a) or (g), (3)(a), or (6)(b), or making transfers of
either possession or title, or both, of tangible personal property for
use in this state, collect from the purchasers or transferees the tax
imposed under this chapter. The tax to be collected under this section
must be in an amount equal to the purchase price multiplied by the rate
in effect for the retail sales tax under RCW 82.08.020. For the
purposes of this chapter, the phrase "maintains in this state a place
of business" shall include the solicitation of sales and/or taking of
orders by sales agents or traveling representatives. For the purposes
of this chapter, "engages in business activity within this state"
includes every activity which is sufficient under the Constitution of
the United States for this state to require collection of tax under
this chapter. The department must in rules specify activities which
constitute engaging in business activity within this state, and must
keep the rules current with future court interpretations of the
Constitution of the United States.
(2) Every person who engages in this state in the business of
acting as an independent selling agent for persons who do not hold a
valid certificate of registration, and who receives compensation by
reason of sales of tangible personal property, digital goods, digital
codes, digital automated services, extended warranties, or sales of any
service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2) (a) or (g),
(3)(a), or (6)(b), of his or her principals for use in this state,
must, at the time such sales are made, collect from the purchasers the
tax imposed on the purchase price under this chapter, and for that
purpose ((shall be)) is deemed a retailer as defined in this chapter.
(3) The tax required to be collected by this chapter is deemed to
be held in trust by the retailer until paid to the department, and any
retailer who appropriates or converts the tax collected to the
retailer's own use or to any use other than the payment of the tax
provided herein to the extent that the money required to be collected
is not available for payment on the due date as prescribed is guilty of
a misdemeanor. In case any seller fails to collect the tax herein
imposed or having collected the tax, fails to pay the same to the
department in the manner prescribed, whether such failure is the result
of the seller's own acts or the result of acts or conditions beyond the
seller's control, the seller is nevertheless personally liable to the
state for the amount of such tax, unless the seller has taken from the
buyer ((in good faith)) a copy of a direct pay permit issued under RCW
82.32.087.
(4) Any retailer who refunds, remits, or rebates to a purchaser, or
transferee, either directly or indirectly, and by whatever means, all
or any part of the tax levied by this chapter is guilty of a
misdemeanor.
(5) Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (4) of this section,
any person making sales is not obligated to collect the tax imposed by
this chapter if:
(a) The person's activities in this state, whether conducted
directly or through another person, are limited to:
(i) The storage, dissemination, or display of advertising;
(ii) The taking of orders; or
(iii) The processing of payments; and
(b) The activities are conducted electronically via a web site on
a server or other computer equipment located in Washington that is not
owned or operated by the person making sales into this state nor owned
or operated by an affiliated person. "Affiliated persons" has the same
meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.424.
(6) Subsection (5) of this section expires when: (a) The United
States congress grants individual states the authority to impose sales
and use tax collection duties on remote sellers; or (b) it is
determined by a court of competent jurisdiction, in a judgment not
subject to review, that a state can impose sales and use tax collection
duties on remote sellers.
(7) Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (4) of this section,
any person making sales is not obligated to collect the tax imposed by
this chapter if the person would have been obligated to collect retail
sales tax on the sale absent a specific exemption provided in chapter
82.08 RCW, and there is no corresponding use tax exemption in this
chapter. Nothing in this subsection (7) may be construed as relieving
purchasers from liability for reporting and remitting the tax due under
this chapter directly to the department.

Sec. 113 RCW 82.16.010 and 2009 c 535 s 1110 and 2009 c 469 s 701
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter, unless otherwise required by the
context:
(1) "Express business" means the business of carrying property for
public hire on the line of any common carrier operated in this state,
when such common carrier is not owned or leased by the person engaging
in such business.
(2) "Gas distribution business" means the business of operating a
plant or system for the production or distribution for hire or sale of
gas, whether manufactured or natural.
(3) "Gross income" means the value proceeding or accruing from the
performance of the particular public service or transportation business
involved, including operations incidental thereto, but without any
deduction on account of the cost of the commodity furnished or sold,
the cost of materials used, labor costs, interest, discount, delivery
costs, taxes, or any other expense whatsoever paid or accrued and
without any deduction on account of losses.
(4) "Light and power business" means the business of operating a
plant or system for the generation, production or distribution of
electrical energy for hire or sale and/or for the wheeling of
electricity for others.
(5) "Log transportation business" means the business of
transporting logs by truck, ((other than)) except when such
transportation meets the definition of urban transportation business or
occurs exclusively upon private roads.
(6) "Motor transportation business" means the business (except
urban transportation business) of operating any motor propelled vehicle
by which persons or property of others are conveyed for hire, and
includes, but is not limited to, the operation of any motor propelled
vehicle as an auto transportation company (except urban transportation
business), common carrier, or contract carrier as defined by RCW
81.68.010 and 81.80.010. However, "motor transportation business" does
not mean or include: (a) A log transportation business; or (b) the
transportation of logs or other forest products exclusively upon
private roads or private highways.
(7)(a) "Public service business" means any of the businesses
defined in subsections (1), (2), (4), (6), (8), (9), (10), (12), and
(13) of this section or any business subject to control by the state,
or having the powers of eminent domain and the duties incident thereto,
or any business hereafter declared by the legislature to be of a public
service nature, except telephone business and low-level radioactive
waste site operating companies as redefined in RCW 81.04.010. It
includes, among others, without limiting the scope hereof: Airplane
transportation, boom, dock, ferry, pipe line, toll bridge, toll logging
road, water transportation and wharf businesses.
(b) The definitions in this subsection (7)(b) apply throughout this
subsection (7).
(i) "Competitive telephone service" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.04.065.
(ii) "Network telephone service" means the providing by any person
of access to a telephone network, telephone network switching service,
toll service, or coin telephone services, or the providing of
telephonic, video, data, or similar communication or transmission for
hire, via a telephone network, toll line or channel, cable, microwave,
or similar communication or transmission system. "Network telephone
service" includes the provision of transmission to and from the site of
an internet provider via a telephone network, toll line or channel,
cable, microwave, or similar communication or transmission system.
"Network telephone service" does not include the providing of
competitive telephone service, the providing of cable television
service, the providing of broadcast services by radio or television
stations, nor the provision of internet access as defined in RCW
82.04.297, including the reception of dial-in connection, provided at
the site of the internet service provider.
(iii) "Telephone business" means the business of providing network
telephone service. It includes cooperative or farmer line telephone
companies or associations operating an exchange.
(iv) "Telephone service" means competitive telephone service or
network telephone service, or both, as defined in (b)(i) and (ii) of
this subsection.
(8) "Railroad business" means the business of operating any
railroad, by whatever power operated, for public use in the conveyance
of persons or property for hire. It shall not, however, include any
business herein defined as an urban transportation business.
(9) "Railroad car business" means the business of operating stock
cars, furniture cars, refrigerator cars, fruit cars, poultry cars, tank
cars, sleeping cars, parlor cars, buffet cars, tourist cars, or any
other kinds of cars used for transportation of property or persons upon
the line of any railroad operated in this state when such railroad is
not owned or leased by the person engaging in such business.
(10) "Telegraph business" means the business of affording
telegraphic communication for hire.
(11) "Tugboat business" means the business of operating tugboats,
towboats, wharf boats or similar vessels in the towing or pushing of
vessels, barges or rafts for hire.
(12) "Urban transportation business" means the business of
operating any vehicle for public use in the conveyance of persons or
property for hire, insofar as (a) operating entirely within the
corporate limits of any city or town, or within five miles of the
corporate limits thereof, or (b) operating entirely within and between
cities and towns whose corporate limits are not more than five miles
apart or within five miles of the corporate limits of either thereof.
Included herein, but without limiting the scope hereof, is the business
of operating passenger vehicles of every type and also the business of
operating cartage, pickup, or delivery services, including in such
services the collection and distribution of property arriving from or
destined to a point within or without the state, whether or not such
collection or distribution be made by the person performing a local or
interstate line-haul of such property.
(13) "Water distribution business" means the business of operating
a plant or system for the distribution of water for hire or sale.
(14) The meaning attributed, in chapter 82.04 RCW, to the term "tax
year," "person," "value proceeding or accruing," "business," "engaging
in business," "in this state," "within this state," "cash discount" and
"successor" ((shall apply)) applies equally in the provisions of this
chapter.

Sec. 114 RCW 82.16.110 and 2009 c 469 s 504 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1)(a) "Community solar project" means:
(i) A solar energy system owned by local individuals, households,
nonprofit organizations, or nonutility businesses that is placed on the
property owned by a cooperating local governmental entity that is not
in the light and power business or in the gas distribution business; or
(ii) A utility-owned solar energy system that is voluntarily funded
by the utility's ratepayers where, in exchange for their financial
support, the utility gives contributors a payment or credit on their
utility bill for the value of the electricity produced by the project.
(b) For the purposes of "community solar project" as defined in (a)
of this subsection:
(i) "Nonprofit organization" means an organization exempt from
taxation under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal
revenue code of 1986, as amended, as of January 1, 2009; and
(ii) "Utility" means a light and power business, an electric
cooperative, or a mutual corporation that provides electricity service.
(2) "Customer-generated electricity" means a community solar
project or the alternating current electricity that is generated from
a renewable energy system located on an individual's, businesses', or
local government's real property that is also provided electricity
generated by a light and power business. Except for community solar
projects, a system located on a leasehold interest does not qualify
under this definition. Except for utility-owned community solar
projects, "customer-generated electricity" does not include electricity
generated by a light and power business with greater than one thousand
megawatt hours of annual sales or a gas distribution business.
(3) "Economic development kilowatt-hour" means the actual kilowatt-hour measurement of customer-generated electricity multiplied by the
appropriate economic development factor.
(4) "Local governmental entity" means any unit of local government
of this state including, but not limited to, counties, cities, towns,
municipal corporations, quasi-municipal corporations, special purpose
districts, and school districts.
(5) "Photovoltaic cell" means a device that converts light directly
into electricity without moving parts.
(6) "Renewable energy system" means a solar energy system, an
anaerobic digester as defined in RCW 82.08.900, or a wind generator
used for producing electricity.
(7) "Solar energy system" means any device or combination of
devices or elements that rely upon direct sunlight as an energy source
for use in the generation of electricity.
(8) "Solar inverter" means the device used to convert direct
current to alternating current in a photovoltaic cell system.
(9) "Solar module" means the smallest nondivisible self-contained
physical structure housing interconnected photovoltaic cells and
providing a single direct current electrical output.

Sec. 115 RCW 82.32.080 and 2009 c 176 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) When authorized by the department, payment of the tax may be
made by uncertified check under such rules as the department
prescribes, but, if a check so received is not paid by the bank on
which it is drawn, the taxpayer, by whom such check is tendered, will
remain liable for payment of the tax and for all legal penalties, the
same as if such check had not been tendered.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, payment of
the tax must be made by electronic funds transfer, as defined in RCW
82.32.085, if the taxpayer is required to file and remit its taxes on
a monthly basis. As an alternative to electronic funds transfer, the
department may authorize other forms of electronic payment, such as
credit card and e-check. All taxes administered by this chapter are
subject to this requirement except the taxes authorized by chapters
82.14A, 82.14B, 82.24, ((82.27,)) 82.29A, and 84.33 RCW. It is the
intent of this subsection to require electronic payment for those taxes
reported on the department's combined excise tax return or any
successor return. The mandatory electronic payment requirement in this
subsection also applies to taxpayers who meet the threshold for filing
and remitting taxes on a monthly basis as established by rule of the
department but for whom the department has authorized a less frequent
reporting frequency, when such authorization became effective on or
after July 26, 2009.
(b) The department, for good cause, may waive the electronic
payment requirement in this subsection for any taxpayer. In the
discretion of the department, a waiver under this subsection may be
made temporary or permanent, and may be made on the department's own
motion.
(c) The department is authorized to accept payment of taxes by
electronic funds transfer or other acceptable forms of electronic
payment from taxpayers that are not subject to the mandatory electronic
payment requirements in this subsection.
(3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, returns
must be filed electronically using the department's online tax filing
service, if the taxpayer is required to file and remit its taxes on a
monthly basis. The mandatory electronic filing requirement in this
subsection also applies to taxpayers who meet the threshold for filing
and remitting taxes on a monthly basis as established by rule of the
department but for whom the department has authorized a less frequent
reporting frequency, when such authorization became effective on or
after July 26, 2009.
(b) The department, for good cause, may waive the electronic filing
requirement in this subsection for any taxpayer. In the discretion of
the department, a waiver under this subsection may be made temporary or
permanent, and may be made on the department's own motion.
(c) The department is authorized to ((accept payment of taxes by
electronic funds transfer or other acceptable forms of electronic
payment)) allow electronic filing of returns from taxpayers that are
not subject to the mandatory electronic ((payment)) filing requirements
in this subsection.
(4)(a)(i) The department, for good cause shown, may extend the time
for making and filing any return, and may grant such reasonable
additional time within which to make and file returns as it may deem
proper, but any permanent extension granting the taxpayer a reporting
date without penalty more than ten days beyond the due date, and any
extension in excess of thirty days must be conditional on deposit with
the department of an amount to be determined by the department which
shall be approximately equal to the estimated tax liability for the
reporting period or periods for which the extension is granted. In the
case of a permanent extension or a temporary extension of more than
thirty days the deposit must be deposited within the state treasury
with other tax funds and a credit recorded to the taxpayer's account
which may be applied to taxpayer's liability upon cancellation of the
permanent extension or upon reporting of the tax liability where an
extension of more than thirty days has been granted.
(ii) The department must review the requirement for deposit at
least annually and may require a change in the amount of the deposit
required when it believes that such amount does not approximate the tax
liability for the reporting period or periods for which the extension
is granted.
(b) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12),
the department, on its own motion or at the request of any taxpayer
affected by the emergency, may extend the time for making or filing any
return as the department deems proper. The department may not require
any deposit as a condition for granting an extension under this
subsection (4)(b).
(5) The department must keep full and accurate records of all funds
received and disbursed by it. Subject to the provisions of RCW
82.32.105 and 82.32.350, the department must apply the payment of the
taxpayer first against penalties and interest, and then upon the tax,
without regard to any direction of the taxpayer.
(6) The department may refuse to accept any return that is not
accompanied by a remittance of the tax shown to be due thereon or that
is not filed electronically as required in this section. When such
return is not accepted, the taxpayer is deemed to have failed or
refused to file a return and is subject to the procedures provided in
RCW 82.32.100 and to the penalties provided in RCW 82.32.090. The
above authority to refuse to accept a return may not apply when a
return is timely filed electronically and a timely payment has been
made by electronic funds transfer or other form of electronic payment
as authorized by the department.
(7) Except for returns and remittances required to be transmitted
to the department electronically under this section and except as
otherwise provided in this chapter, a return or remittance that is
transmitted to the department by United States mail is deemed filed or
received on the date shown by the post office cancellation mark stamped
upon the envelope containing it. A return or remittance that is
transmitted to the department electronically is deemed filed or
received according to procedures set forth by the department.
(8)(a) For purposes of subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
"good cause" means the inability of a taxpayer to comply with the
requirements of subsection (2) or (3) of this section because:
(i) The taxpayer does not have the equipment or software necessary
to enable the taxpayer to comply with subsection (2) or (3) of this
section;
(ii) The equipment or software necessary to enable the taxpayer to
comply with subsection (2) or (3) of this section is not functioning
properly;
(iii) The taxpayer does not have access to the internet using the
taxpayer's own equipment;
(iv) The taxpayer does not have a bank account or a credit card;
(v) The taxpayer's bank is unable to send or receive electronic
funds transfer transactions; or
(vi) Some other circumstance or condition exists that, in the
department's judgment, prevents the taxpayer from complying with the
requirements of subsection (2) or (3) of this section.
(b) "Good cause" also includes any circumstance that, in the
department's judgment, supports the efficient or effective
administration of the tax laws of this state, including providing
relief from the requirements of subsection (2) or (3) of this section
to any taxpayer that is voluntarily collecting and remitting this
state's sales or use taxes on sales to Washington customers but has no
legal requirement to be registered with the department.

Sec. 116 RCW 82.32.520 and 2007 c 54 s 18 and 2007 c 6 s 1001 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except for the defined telecommunications services listed in
subsection (3) of this section, the sale of telecommunications service
as defined in RCW 82.04.065 sold on a call-by-call basis shall be
sourced to (a) each level of taxing jurisdiction where the call
originates and terminates in that jurisdiction or (b) each level of
taxing jurisdiction where the call either originates or terminates and
in which the service address is also located.
(2) Except for the defined telecommunications services listed in
subsection (3) of this section, a sale of telecommunications service as
defined in RCW 82.04.065 sold on a basis other than a call-by-call
basis, is sourced to the customer's place of primary use.
(3) The sales of telecommunications service as defined in RCW
82.04.065 that are listed in subsection (3) of this section ((shall))
must be sourced to each level of taxing jurisdiction as follows:
(a) A sale of mobile telecommunications services, other than air-ground radiotelephone service and prepaid calling service, is sourced
to the customer's place of primary use as required by RCW 82.08.066.
(b) A sale of postpaid calling service is sourced to the
origination point of the telecommunications signal as first identified
by either (i) the seller's telecommunications system, or (ii)
information received by the seller from its service provider, where the
system used to transport such signals is not that of the seller.
(c) A sale of prepaid calling service or a sale of a prepaid
wireless calling service is sourced as follows:
(i) When a prepaid calling service or a prepaid wireless calling
service is received by the purchaser at a business location of the
seller, the sale is sourced to that business location;
(ii) When a prepaid calling service or a prepaid wireless calling
service is not received by the purchaser at a business location of the
seller, the sale is sourced to the location where receipt by the
purchaser or the purchaser's donee, designated as such by the
purchaser, occurs, including the location indicated by instructions for
delivery to the purchaser or donee, known to the seller;
(iii) When (c)(i) and (ii) of this subsection do not apply, the
sale is sourced to the location indicated by an address for the
purchaser that is available from the business records of the seller
that are maintained in the ordinary course of the seller's business
when use of this address does not constitute bad faith;
(iv) When (c)(i), (ii), and (iii) of this subsection do not apply,
the sale is sourced to the location indicated by an address for the
purchaser obtained during the consummation of the sale, including the
address of a purchaser's payment instrument, if no other address is
available, when use of this address does not constitute bad faith;
(v) When (c)(i), (ii), (iii), and (iv) of this subsection do not
apply, including the circumstance where the seller is without
sufficient information to apply those provisions, ((then)) the
((location shall be determined by the address from which tangible
personal property was shipped, from which the digital good or the
computer software delivered electronically was first available for
transmission by the seller, or from which the service defined as a
retail sale under RCW 82.04.050 was provided, disregarding for these
purposes any location that merely provided the digital transfer of the
product sold)) sale is sourced as provided in RCW 82.32.730(1)(e);
(vi) In the case of a sale of prepaid wireless calling service,
(c)(v) of this subsection shall include as an option the location
associated with the mobile telephone number.
(d) A sale of a private communication service is sourced as
follows:
(i) Service for a separate charge related to a customer channel
termination point is sourced to each level of jurisdiction in which
such customer channel termination point is located.
(ii) Service where all customer termination points are located
entirely within one jurisdiction or levels of jurisdiction is sourced
in such jurisdiction in which the customer channel termination points
are located.
(iii) Service for segments of a channel between two customer
channel termination points located in different jurisdictions and which
segment of channel are separately charged is sourced fifty percent in
each level of jurisdiction in which the customer channel termination
points are located.
(iv) Service for segments of a channel located in more than one
jurisdiction or levels of jurisdiction and which segments are not
separately billed is sourced in each jurisdiction based on the
percentage determined by dividing the number of customer channel
termination points in the jurisdiction by the total number of customer
channel termination points.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
chapter.
(a) "Air-ground radiotelephone service" means air-ground radio
service, as defined in 47 C.F.R. Sec. 22.99, as amended or renumbered
as of January 1, 2003, in which common carriers are authorized to offer
and provide radio telecommunications service for hire to subscribers in
aircraft.
(b) "Call-by-call basis" means any method of charging for
telecommunications services where the price is measured by individual
calls.
(c) "Communications channel" means a physical or virtual path of
communications over which signals are transmitted between or among
customer channel termination points.
(d) "Customer" means the person or entity that contracts with the
seller of telecommunications services. If the end user of
telecommunications services is not the contracting party, the end user
of the telecommunications service is the customer of the
telecommunications service. "Customer" does not include a reseller of
telecommunications service or for mobile telecommunications service of
a serving carrier under an agreement to serve the customer outside the
home service provider's licensed service area.
(e) "Customer channel termination point" means the location where
the customer either inputs or receives the communications.
(f) "End user" means the person who uses the telecommunications
service. In the case of an entity, the term end user means the
individual who uses the service on behalf of the entity.
(g) "Home service provider" means the same as that term is defined
in RCW 82.04.065.
(h) "Mobile telecommunications service" means the same as that term
is defined in RCW 82.04.065.
(i) "Place of primary use" means the street address representative
of where the customer's use of the telecommunications service primarily
occurs, which must be the residential street address or the primary
business street address of the customer. In the case of mobile
telecommunications services, "place of primary use" must be within the
licensed service area of the home service provider.
(j) "Postpaid calling service" means the telecommunications service
obtained by making a payment on a call-by-call basis either through the
use of a credit card or payment mechanism such as a bank card, travel
card, credit card, or debit card, or by charge made to a telephone
number that is not associated with the origination or termination of
the telecommunications service. A postpaid calling service includes a
telecommunications service, except a prepaid wireless calling service,
that would be a prepaid calling service except it is not exclusively a
telecommunications service.
(k) "Prepaid calling service" means the right to access exclusively
telecommunications services, which must be paid for in advance and
which enables the origination of calls using an access number and/or
authorization code, whether manually or electronically dialed, and that
is sold in predetermined units or dollars of which the number declines
with use in a known amount.
(l) "Prepaid wireless calling service" means a telecommunications
service that provides the right to use mobile wireless service as well
as other nontelecommunications services, including the download of
digital products delivered electronically, content, and ancillary
services, which must be paid for in advance that is sold in
predetermined units or dollars of which the number declines with use in
a known amount.
(m) "Private communication service" means a telecommunications
service that entitles the customer to exclusive or priority use of a
communications channel or group of channels between or among
termination points, regardless of the manner in which such channel or
channels are connected, and includes switching capacity, extension
lines, stations, and any other associated services that are provided in
connection with the use of such channel or channels.
(n) "Service address" means:
(i) The location of the telecommunications equipment to which a
customer's call is charged and from which the call originates or
terminates, regardless of where the call is billed or paid;
(ii) If the location in (n)(i) of this subsection is not known, the
origination point of the signal of the telecommunications services
first identified by either the seller's telecommunications system or in
information received by the seller from its service provider, where the
system used to transport such signals is not that of the seller;
(iii) If the locations in (n)(i) and (ii) of this subsection are
not known, the location of the customer's place of primary use.

Sec. 117 RCW 82.36.440 and 2003 c 350 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied in this chapter is in lieu of any excise,
privilege, or occupational tax upon the business of manufacturing,
selling, or distributing motor vehicle fuel, and no city, town, county,
township or other subdivision or municipal corporation of the state
shall levy or collect any excise tax upon or measured by the sale,
receipt, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel, except as provided
in chapter 82.80 RCW and RCW 82.47.020.
(2) This section does not apply to any tax imposed by the state.

Sec. 118 RCW 82.38.280 and 2003 c 350 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied in this chapter is in lieu of any excise,
privilege, or occupational tax upon the business of manufacturing,
selling, or distributing special fuel, and no city, town, county,
township or other subdivision or municipal corporation of the state
((shall)) may levy or collect any excise tax upon or measured by the
sale, receipt, distribution, or use of special fuel, except as provided
in chapter 82.80 RCW and RCW 82.47.020.
(2) This section does not apply to any tax imposed by the state.

Sec. 119 RCW 82.62.010 and 2007 c 485 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax credit under this
chapter.
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(3) "Eligible area" means an area as defined in RCW 82.60.020.
(4)(a) "Eligible business project" means manufacturing or research
and development activities which are conducted by an applicant in an
eligible area at a specific facility, provided the applicant's average
qualified employment positions at the specific facility will be at
least fifteen percent greater in the four consecutive full calendar
quarters after the calendar quarter during which the first qualified
employment position is filled than the applicant's average qualified
employment positions at the same facility in the four consecutive full
calendar quarters immediately preceding the calendar quarter during
which the first qualified employment position is filled.
(b) "Eligible business project" does not include any portion of a
business project undertaken by a light and power business as defined in
RCW 82.16.010(((5))) or that portion of a business project creating
qualified full-time employment positions outside an eligible area.
(5) "First qualified employment position" means the first qualified
employment position filled for which a credit under this chapter is
sought.
(6) "Manufacturing" means the same as defined in RCW 82.04.120.
"Manufacturing" also includes computer programming, the production of
computer software, and other computer-related services, and the
activities performed by research and development laboratories and
commercial testing laboratories.
(7) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.
(8)(a)(i) "Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time employee employed in the eligible business project during four
consecutive full calendar quarters.
(ii) For seasonal employers, "qualified employment position" also
includes the equivalent of a full-time employee in work hours for four
consecutive full calendar quarters.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "full time" means a normal
work week of at least thirty-five hours.
(c) Once a permanent, full-time employee has been employed, a
position does not cease to be a qualified employment position solely
due to periods in which the position goes vacant, as long as:
(i) The cumulative period of any vacancies in that position is not
more than one hundred twenty days in the four-quarter period; and
(ii) During a vacancy, the employer is training or actively
recruiting a replacement permanent, full-time employee for the
position.
(9) "Recipient" means a person receiving tax credits under this
chapter.
(10) "Research and development" means the development, refinement,
testing, marketing, and commercialization of a product, service, or
process before commercial sales have begun. As used in this
subsection, "commercial sales" excludes sales of prototypes or sales
for market testing if the total gross receipts from such sales of the
product, service, or process do not exceed one million dollars.
(11) "Seasonal employee" means an employee of a seasonal employer
who works on a seasonal basis. For the purposes of this subsection and
subsection (12) of this section, "seasonal basis" means a continuous
employment period of less than twelve consecutive months.
(12) "Seasonal employer" means a person who regularly hires more
than fifty percent of its employees to work on a seasonal basis.

Sec. 120 RCW 82.80.120 and 2006 c 311 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Distributor" means every person who imports, refines,
manufactures, produces, or compounds motor vehicle fuel and special
fuel as defined in RCW 82.36.010 and 82.38.020, respectively, and sells
or distributes the fuel into a county;
(b) "Person" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.030;
(c) "District" means a regional transportation investment district
under chapter 36.120 RCW.
(2) A regional transportation investment district under chapter
36.120 RCW, subject to the conditions of this section, may levy
additional excise taxes equal to ten percent of the statewide motor
vehicle fuel tax rate under RCW 82.36.025 on each gallon of motor
vehicle fuel as defined in RCW 82.36.010 and on each gallon of special
fuel as defined in RCW 82.38.020 sold within the boundaries of the
district. The additional excise tax is subject to the approval of a
majority of the voters within the district boundaries. Vehicles paying
an annual license fee under RCW 82.38.075 are exempt from the
district's fuel excise tax. The additional excise taxes are subject to
the same exceptions and rights of refund as applicable to other motor
vehicle fuel and special fuel excise taxes levied under chapters 82.36
and 82.38 RCW. The proposed tax may not be levied less than one month
from the date the election results are certified. The commencement
date for the levy of any tax under this section will be the first day
of January, April, July, or October.
(3) The local option motor vehicle fuel tax on each gallon of motor
vehicle fuel and on each gallon of special fuel is imposed upon the
distributor of the fuel.
(4) A taxable event for the purposes of this section occurs upon
the first distribution of the fuel within the boundaries of the
district to a retail outlet, bulk fuel user, or ultimate user of the
fuel.
(5) All administrative provisions in chapters 82.01, 82.03, and
82.32 RCW, insofar as they are applicable, apply to local option fuel
taxes imposed under this section.
(6) Before the effective date of the imposition of the fuel taxes
under this section, a district ((shall)) must contract with the
department of ((licensing)) revenue for the administration and
collection of the taxes. The contract must provide that a percentage
amount, not to exceed one percent of the taxes imposed under this
section, will be deposited into the local tax administration account
created in the custody of the state treasurer. The department of
((licensing)) revenue may spend money from this account, upon
appropriation, for the administration of the local taxes imposed under
this section.
(7) The state treasurer ((shall)) must distribute monthly to the
district levying the tax as part of the regional transportation
investment district plan, after the deductions for payments and
expenditures as provided in RCW 46.68.090(1) (a) and (b).
(8) The proceeds of the additional taxes levied by a district in
this section, to be used as a part of a regional transportation
investment district plan, must be used in accordance with chapter
36.120 RCW, but only for those areas that are considered "highway
purposes" as that term is construed in Article II, section 40 of the
state Constitution.
(9) A district may only levy the tax under this section if the
district is comprised of boundaries identical to the boundaries of a
county or counties. A district may not levy the tax in this section if
a member county is levying the tax in RCW 82.80.010 or 82.80.110.

Sec. 121 RCW 83.100.040 and 2005 c 516 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A tax in an amount computed as provided in this section is
imposed on every transfer of property located in Washington. For the
purposes of this section, any intangible property owned by a resident
is located in Washington.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the amount of
tax is the amount provided in the following table:

If Washington Taxable

The amount of Tax Equals
Of Washington
Taxable Estate Value
Greater than

Estate is at least But Less Than Initial Tax Amount Plus Tax Rate %

$0 $1,000,000 $0 10.00% $0

$1,000,000 $2,000,000 $100,000 14.00% $1,000,000

$2,000,000 $3,000,000 $240,000 15.00% $2,000,000

$3,000,000 $4,000,000 $390,000 16.00% $3,000,000

$4,000,000 $6,000,000 $550,000 17.00% $4,000,000

$6,000,000 $7,000,000 $890,000 18.00% $6,000,000

$7,000,000 $9,000,000 $1,070,000 18.50% $7,000,000

((Above))
$9,000,000 $1,440,000 19.00% ((Above))
$9,000,000

(b) If any property in the decedent's estate is located outside of
Washington, the amount of tax is the amount determined in (a) of this
subsection multiplied by a fraction. The numerator of the fraction is
the value of the property located in Washington. The denominator of
the fraction is the value of the decedent's gross estate. Property
qualifying for a deduction under RCW 83.100.046 ((shall)) must be
excluded from the numerator and denominator of the fraction.
(3) The tax imposed under this section is a stand-alone estate tax
that incorporates only those provisions of the internal revenue code as
amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2005, that do not conflict with
the provisions of this chapter. The tax imposed under this chapter is
independent of any federal estate tax obligation and is not affected by
termination of the federal estate tax.

Sec. 122 RCW 83.100.046 and 2005 c 514 s 1201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of determining the Washington taxable estate,
a deduction is allowed from the federal taxable estate for:
(a) The value of qualified real property reduced by any amounts
allowable as a deduction in respect of the qualified real property
((and tangible personal property)) under ((section)) 26 U.S.C. Sec.
2053(a)(4) of the federal internal revenue code, if the decedent was at
the time of his or her death a citizen or resident of the United
States.
(b) The value of any tangible personal property used by the
decedent or a member of the decedent's family for a qualified use on
the date of the decedent's death, reduced by any amounts allowable as
a deduction in respect of the tangible personal property under
((section)) 26 U.S.C. Sec. 2053(a)(4) of the federal internal revenue
code, if all of the requirements of subsection (10)(f)(i)(A) of this
section are met and the decedent was at the time of his or her death a
citizen or resident of the United States.
(c) The value of real property that is not deductible under (a) of
this subsection solely by reason of subsection (10)(f)(i)(B) of this
section, reduced by any amounts allowable as a deduction in respect of
the ((qualified)) real property ((and tangible personal property))
under ((section)) 26 U.S.C. Sec. 2053(a)(4) of the federal internal
revenue code, if the requirements of subsection (10)(f)(i)(C) of this
section are met with respect to the property and the decedent was at
the time of his or her death a citizen or resident of the United
States.
(2) Property ((shall)) will be considered to have been acquired
from or to have passed from the decedent if:
(a) The property is so considered under ((section)) 26 U.S.C. Sec.
1014(b) of the federal internal revenue code;
(b) The property is acquired by any person from the estate; or
(c) The property is acquired by any person from a trust, to the
extent the property is includible in the gross estate of the decedent.
(3) If the decedent and the decedent's surviving spouse at any time
held qualified real property as community property, the interest of the
surviving spouse in the property ((shall)) must be taken into account
under this section to the extent necessary to provide a result under
this section with respect to the property which is consistent with the
result which would have obtained under this section if the property had
not been community property.
(4) In the case of any qualified woodland, the value of trees
growing on the woodland may be deducted if otherwise qualified under
this section.
(5) If property is qualified real property with respect to a
decedent, hereinafter in this subsection referred to as the "first
decedent," and the property was acquired from or passed from the first
decedent to the surviving spouse of the first decedent, active
management of the farm by the surviving spouse ((shall)) must be
treated as material participation by the surviving spouse in the
operation of the farm.
(6) Property owned indirectly by the decedent may qualify for a
deduction under this section if owned through an interest in a
corporation, partnership, or trust as the terms corporation,
partnership, or trust are used in ((section)) 26 U.S.C. Sec. 2032A(g)
of the federal internal revenue code. In order to qualify for a
deduction under this subsection, the interest, in addition to meeting
the other tests for qualification under this section, must qualify
under ((section)) 26 U.S.C. Sec. 6166(b)(1) of the federal internal
revenue code as an interest in a closely held business on the date of
the decedent's death and for sufficient other time, combined with
periods of direct ownership, to equal at least five years of the eight-year period preceding the death.
(7)(a) If, on the date of the decedent's death, the requirements of
subsection (10)(f)(i)(C)(II) of this section with respect to the
decedent for any property are not met, and the decedent (i) was
receiving old age benefits under Title II of the social security act
for a continuous period ending on such date, or (ii) was disabled for
a continuous period ending on this date, then subsection
(10)(f)(i)(C)(II) of this section shall be applied with respect to the
property by substituting "the date on which the longer of such
continuous periods began" for "the date of the decedent's death" in
subsection (10)(f)(i)(C) of this section.
(b) For the purposes of (a) of this subsection, an individual
((shall be)) is disabled if the individual has a mental or physical
impairment which renders that individual unable to materially
participate in the operation of the farm.
(8) Property may be deducted under this section whether or not
special valuation is elected under ((section)) 26 U.S.C. Sec. 2032A of
the federal internal revenue code on the federal return. For the
purposes of determining the deduction under this section, the value of
property is its value as used to determine the value of the gross
estate.
(9)(a) In the case of any qualified replacement property, any
period during which there was ownership, qualified use, or material
participation with respect to the replaced property by the decedent or
any member of the decedent's family ((shall)) must be treated as a
period during which there was ownership, use, or material
participation, as the case may be, with respect to the qualified
replacement property.
(b) Subsection (9)(a) of this section ((shall)) does not apply to
the extent that the fair market value of the qualified replacement
property, as of the date of its acquisition, exceeds the fair market
value of the replaced property, as of the date of its disposition.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (9), the following
definitions apply:
(i)(A) "Qualified replacement property" means any real property:
(((A))) (I) Which is acquired in an exchange which qualifies under
((section)) 26 U.S.C. Sec. 1031 of the federal internal revenue code;
or
(((B))) (II) The acquisition of which results in the nonrecognition
of gain under ((section)) 26 U.S.C. Sec. 1033 of the federal internal
revenue code.
(B) The term "qualified replacement property" only includes
property which is used for the same qualified use as the replaced
property was being used before the exchange.
(ii) "Replaced property" means the property was:
(A) Transferred in the exchange which qualifies under ((section))
26 U.S.C. Sec. 1031 of the federal internal revenue code; or
(B) Compulsorily or involuntarily converted within the meaning of
((section)) 26 U.S.C. Sec. 1033 of the federal internal revenue code.
(10) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Active management" means the making of the management
decisions of a farm, other than the daily operating decisions.
(b) "Farm" includes stock, dairy, poultry, fruit, furbearing
animal, and truck farms; plantations; ranches; nurseries; ranges;
greenhouses or other similar structures used primarily for the raising
of agricultural or horticultural commodities; and orchards and
woodlands.
(c) "Farming purposes" means:
(i) Cultivating the soil or raising or harvesting any agricultural
or horticultural commodity, including the raising, shearing, feeding,
caring for, training, and management of animals on a farm;
(ii) Handling, drying, packing, grading, or storing on a farm any
agricultural or horticultural commodity in its unmanufactured state,
but only if the owner, tenant, or operator of the farm regularly
produces more than one-half of the commodity so treated; and
(iii)(A) The planting, cultivating, caring for, or cutting of
trees; or
(B) The preparation, other than milling, of trees for market.
(d)(i) "Member of the family" means, with respect to any
individual, only:
(((i))) (A) An ancestor of the individual;
(((ii))) (B) The spouse of the individual;
(((iii))) (C) A lineal descendant of the individual, of the
individual's spouse, or of a parent of the individual; or
(((iv))) (D) The spouse of any lineal descendant described in
(d)(((iii))) (i)(C) of this subsection.
(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (10)(d), a legally adopted
child of an individual ((shall)) must be treated as the child of such
individual by blood.
(e) "Qualified heir" means, with respect to any property, a member
of the decedent's family who acquired property, or to whom property
passed, from the decedent.
(f)(i) "Qualified real property" means real property which was
acquired from or passed from the decedent to a qualified heir of the
decedent and which, on the date of the decedent's death, was being used
for a qualified use by the decedent or a member of the decedent's
family, but only if:
(A) Fifty percent or more of the adjusted value of the gross estate
consists of the adjusted value of real or personal property which:
(I) On the date of the decedent's death, was being used for a
qualified use by the decedent or a member of the decedent's family; and
(II) Was acquired from or passed from the decedent to a qualified
heir of the decedent;
(B) Twenty-five percent or more of the adjusted value of the gross
estate consists of the adjusted value of real property which meets the
requirements of (f)(i)(A)(II) and (f)(i)(C) of this subsection; and
(C) During the eight-year period ending on the date of the
decedent's death there have been periods aggregating five years or more
during which:
(I) The real property was owned by the decedent or a member of the
decedent's family and used for a qualified use by the decedent or a
member of the decedent's family; and
(II) There was material participation by the decedent or a member
of the decedent's family in the operation of the farm. For the
purposes of this subsection (f)(i)(C)(II), material participation
((shall)) must be determined in a manner similar to the manner used for
purposes of ((section)) 26 U.S.C. Sec. 1402(a)(1) of the federal
internal revenue code.
(ii) For the purposes of this subsection, the term "adjusted value"
means:
(A) In the case of the gross estate, the value of the gross estate,
determined without regard to any special valuation under ((section)) 26
U.S.C. Sec. 2032A of the federal internal revenue code, reduced by any
amounts allowable as a deduction under ((section)) 26 U.S.C. Sec.
2053(a)(4) of the federal internal revenue code; or
(B) In the case of any real or personal property, the value of the
property for purposes of chapter 11 of the federal internal revenue
code, determined without regard to any special valuation under
((section)) 26 U.S.C. Sec. 2032A of the federal internal revenue code,
reduced by any amounts allowable as a deduction in respect of such
property under ((section)) 26 U.S.C. Sec. 2053(a)(4) of the federal
internal revenue code.
(g) "Qualified use" means the property is used as a farm for
farming purposes. In the case of real property which meets the
requirements of (f)(i)(C) of this subsection, residential buildings and
related improvements on the real property occupied on a regular basis
by the owner or lessee of the real property or by persons employed by
the owner or lessee for the purpose of operating or maintaining the
real property, and roads, buildings, and other structures and
improvements functionally related to the qualified use ((shall)) must
be treated as real property devoted to the qualified use. For tangible
personal property eligible for a deduction under subsection (1)(b) of
this section, "qualified use" means the property is used primarily for
farming purposes on a farm.
(h) "Qualified woodland" means any real property which:
(i) Is used in timber operations; and
(ii) Is an identifiable area of land such as an acre or other area
for which records are normally maintained in conducting timber
operations.
(i) "Timber operations" means:
(i) The planting, cultivating, caring for, or cutting of trees; or
(ii) The preparation, other than milling, of trees for market.

Sec. 123 RCW 83.100.046 and 2009 c 521 s 191 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of determining the Washington taxable estate,
a deduction is allowed from the federal taxable estate for:
(a) The value of qualified real property reduced by any amounts
allowable as a deduction in respect of the qualified real property
((and tangible personal property)) under ((section)) 26 U.S.C. Sec.
2053(a)(4) of the federal internal revenue code, if the decedent was at
the time of his or her death a citizen or resident of the United
States.
(b) The value of any tangible personal property used by the
decedent or a member of the decedent's family for a qualified use on
the date of the decedent's death, reduced by any amounts allowable as
a deduction in respect of the tangible personal property under
((section)) 26 U.S.C. Sec. 2053(a)(4) of the federal internal revenue
code, if all of the requirements of subsection (10)(f)(i)(A) of this
section are met and the decedent was at the time of his or her death a
citizen or resident of the United States.
(c) The value of real property that is not deductible under (a) of
this subsection solely by reason of subsection (10)(f)(i)(B) of this
section, reduced by any amounts allowable as a deduction in respect of
the ((qualified)) real property ((and tangible personal property))
under ((section)) 26 U.S.C. Sec. 2053(a)(4) of the federal internal
revenue code, if the requirements of subsection (10)(f)(i)(C) of this
section are met with respect to the property and the decedent was at
the time of his or her death a citizen or resident of the United
States.
(2) Property ((shall)) will be considered to have been acquired
from or to have passed from the decedent if:
(a) The property is so considered under ((section)) 26 U.S.C. Sec.
1014(b) of the internal revenue code;
(b) The property is acquired by any person from the estate; or
(c) The property is acquired by any person from a trust, to the
extent the property is includible in the gross estate of the decedent.
(3) If the decedent and the decedent's surviving spouse at any time
held qualified real property as community property, the interest of the
surviving spouse in the property ((shall)) must be taken into account
under this section to the extent necessary to provide a result under
this section with respect to the property which is consistent with the
result which would have obtained under this section if the property had
not been community property.
(4) In the case of any qualified woodland, the value of trees
growing on the woodland may be deducted if otherwise qualified under
this section.
(5) If property is qualified real property with respect to a
decedent, hereinafter in this subsection referred to as the "first
decedent," and the property was acquired from or passed from the first
decedent to the surviving spouse of the first decedent, active
management of the farm by the surviving spouse shall be treated as
material participation by the surviving spouse in the operation of the
farm.
(6) Property owned indirectly by the decedent may qualify for a
deduction under this section if owned through an interest in a
corporation, partnership, or trust as the terms corporation,
partnership, or trust are used in ((section)) 26 U.S.C. Sec. 2032A(g)
of the federal internal revenue code. In order to qualify for a
deduction under this subsection, the interest, in addition to meeting
the other tests for qualification under this section, must qualify
under ((section)) 26 U.S.C. Sec. 6166(b)(1) of the federal internal
revenue code as an interest in a closely held business on the date of
the decedent's death and for sufficient other time, combined with
periods of direct ownership, to equal at least five years of the eight-year period preceding the death.
(7)(a) If, on the date of the decedent's death, the requirements of
subsection (10)(f)(i)(C)(II) of this section with respect to the
decedent for any property are not met, and the decedent (i) was
receiving old age benefits under Title II of the social security act
for a continuous period ending on such date, or (ii) was disabled for
a continuous period ending on this date, then subsection
(10)(f)(i)(C)(II) of this section ((shall)) must be applied with
respect to the property by substituting "the date on which the longer
of such continuous periods began" for "the date of the decedent's
death" in subsection (10)(f)(i)(C) of this section.
(b) For the purposes of (a) of this subsection, an individual
((shall be)) is disabled if the individual has a mental or physical
impairment which renders that individual unable to materially
participate in the operation of the farm.
(8) Property may be deducted under this section whether or not
special valuation is elected under ((section)) 26 U.S.C. Sec. 2032A of
the federal internal revenue code on the federal return. For the
purposes of determining the deduction under this section, the value of
property is its value as used to determine the value of the gross
estate.
(9)(a) In the case of any qualified replacement property, any
period during which there was ownership, qualified use, or material
participation with respect to the replaced property by the decedent or
any member of the decedent's family ((shall)) must be treated as a
period during which there was ownership, use, or material
participation, as the case may be, with respect to the qualified
replacement property.
(b) Subsection (9)(a) of this section ((shall)) does not apply to
the extent that the fair market value of the qualified replacement
property, as of the date of its acquisition, exceeds the fair market
value of the replaced property, as of the date of its disposition.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (9), the following
definitions apply:
(i)(A) "Qualified replacement property" means any real property:
(((A))) (I) Which is acquired in an exchange which qualifies under
((section)) 26 U.S.C. Sec. 1031 of the federal internal revenue code;
or
(((B))) (II) The acquisition of which results in the nonrecognition
of gain under ((section)) 26 U.S.C. Sec. 1033 of the federal internal
revenue code.
(B) The term "qualified replacement property" only includes
property which is used for the same qualified use as the replaced
property was being used before the exchange.
(ii) "Replaced property" means the property was:
(A) Transferred in the exchange which qualifies under ((section))
26 U.S.C. Sec. 1031 of the federal internal revenue code; or
(B) Compulsorily or involuntarily converted within the meaning of
((section)) 26 U.S.C. Sec. 1033 of the federal internal revenue code.
(10) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Active management" means the making of the management
decisions of a farm, other than the daily operating decisions.
(b) "Farm" includes stock, dairy, poultry, fruit, furbearing
animal, and truck farms; plantations; ranches; nurseries; ranges;
greenhouses or other similar structures used primarily for the raising
of agricultural or horticultural commodities; and orchards and
woodlands.
(c) "Farming purposes" means:
(i) Cultivating the soil or raising or harvesting any agricultural
or horticultural commodity, including the raising, shearing, feeding,
caring for, training, and management of animals on a farm;
(ii) Handling, drying, packing, grading, or storing on a farm any
agricultural or horticultural commodity in its unmanufactured state,
but only if the owner, tenant, or operator of the farm regularly
produces more than one-half of the commodity so treated; and
(iii)(A) The planting, cultivating, caring for, or cutting of
trees; or
(B) The preparation, other than milling, of trees for market.
(d)(i) "Member of the family" means, with respect to any
individual, only:
(((i))) (A) An ancestor of the individual;
(((ii))) (B) The spouse or state registered domestic partner of the
individual;
(((iii))) (C) A lineal descendant of the individual, of the
individual's spouse or state registered domestic partner, or of a
parent of the individual; or
(((iv))) (D) The spouse or state registered domestic partner of any
lineal descendant described in (d)(((iii))) (1)(C) of this subsection.
(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (10)(d), a legally adopted
child of an individual ((shall)) must be treated as the child of such
individual by blood.
(e) "Qualified heir" means, with respect to any property, a member
of the decedent's family who acquired property, or to whom property
passed, from the decedent.
(f)(i) "Qualified real property" means real property which was
acquired from or passed from the decedent to a qualified heir of the
decedent and which, on the date of the decedent's death, was being used
for a qualified use by the decedent or a member of the decedent's
family, but only if:
(A) Fifty percent or more of the adjusted value of the gross estate
consists of the adjusted value of real or personal property which:
(I) On the date of the decedent's death, was being used for a
qualified use by the decedent or a member of the decedent's family; and
(II) Was acquired from or passed from the decedent to a qualified
heir of the decedent;
(B) Twenty-five percent or more of the adjusted value of the gross
estate consists of the adjusted value of real property which meets the
requirements of (f)(i)(A)(II) and (f)(i)(C) of this subsection; and
(C) During the eight-year period ending on the date of the
decedent's death there have been periods aggregating five years or more
during which:
(I) The real property was owned by the decedent or a member of the
decedent's family and used for a qualified use by the decedent or a
member of the decedent's family; and
(II) There was material participation by the decedent or a member
of the decedent's family in the operation of the farm. For the
purposes of this subsection (f)(i)(C)(II), material participation
((shall)) must be determined in a manner similar to the manner used for
purposes of ((section)) 26 U.S.C. Sec. 1402(a)(1) of the federal
internal revenue code.
(ii) For the purposes of this subsection, the term "adjusted value"
means:
(A) In the case of the gross estate, the value of the gross estate,
determined without regard to any special valuation under ((section)) 26
U.S.C. Sec. 2032A of the federal internal revenue code, reduced by any
amounts allowable as a deduction under ((section)) 26 U.S.C. Sec.
2053(a)(4) of the federal internal revenue code; or
(B) In the case of any real or personal property, the value of the
property for purposes of chapter 11 of the federal internal revenue
code, determined without regard to any special valuation under
((section)) 26 U.S.C. Sec. 2032A of the federal internal revenue code,
reduced by any amounts allowable as a deduction in respect of such
property under ((section)) 26 U.S.C. Sec. 2053(a)(4) of the federal
internal revenue code.
(g) "Qualified use" means the property is used as a farm for
farming purposes. In the case of real property which meets the
requirements of (f)(i)(C) of this subsection, residential buildings and
related improvements on the real property occupied on a regular basis
by the owner or lessee of the real property or by persons employed by
the owner or lessee for the purpose of operating or maintaining the
real property, and roads, buildings, and other structures and
improvements functionally related to the qualified use ((shall)) must
be treated as real property devoted to the qualified use. For tangible
personal property eligible for a deduction under subsection (1)(b) of
this section, "qualified use" means the property is used primarily for
farming purposes on a farm.
(h) "Qualified woodland" means any real property which:
(i) Is used in timber operations; and
(ii) Is an identifiable area of land such as an acre or other area
for which records are normally maintained in conducting timber
operations.
(i) "Timber operations" means:
(i) The planting, cultivating, caring for, or cutting of trees; or
(ii) The preparation, other than milling, of trees for market.

Sec. 124 RCW 82.04.290 and 2008 c 81 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
providing international investment management services, as to such
persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business ((shall be))
is equal to the gross income or gross proceeds of sales of the business
multiplied by a rate of 0.275 percent.
(2)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in any business
activity other than or in addition to an activity taxed explicitly
under another section in this chapter or subsection (1) or (3) of this
section; as to such persons the amount of tax on account of such
activities ((shall be)) is equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of 1.5 percent.
(b) This subsection (2) includes, among others, and without
limiting the scope hereof (whether or not title to materials used in
the performance of such business passes to another by accession,
confusion or other than by outright sale), persons engaged in the
business of rendering any type of service which does not constitute a
"sale at retail" or a "sale at wholesale." The value of advertising,
demonstration, and promotional supplies and materials furnished to an
agent by his principal or supplier to be used for informational,
educational and promotional purposes ((shall)) may not be considered a
part of the agent's remuneration or commission and ((shall)) is not
((be)) subject to taxation under this section.
(3)(a) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of performing aerospace product development for
others, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such
business ((shall be)) is equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by a rate of 0.9 percent.
(b) "Aerospace product development" has the meaning as provided in
RCW 82.04.4461.

PART II
PROPERTY TAX
Sec. 201 RCW 29A.36.210 and 2004 c 80 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ballot proposition authorizing a taxing district to impose
the regular property tax levies authorized in RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145,
67.38.130, 84.52.069, or 84.52.135 ((shall)) must contain in substance
the following:

"((Shall)) Will the . . . . . . (insert the name of the taxing
district) be authorized to impose regular property tax levies of
. . . . . . (insert the maximum rate) or less per thousand dollars of
assessed valuation for each of . . . . . . (insert the maximum number
of years allowable) consecutive years?
Yes. . . . . . . . . . . . □
No . . . . . . . . . . . . □"
Each voter ((shall)) may indicate either "Yes" or "No" on his or
her ballot in accordance with the procedures established under this
title.

(2) The ballot proposition authorizing a taxing district to impose
a permanent regular tax levy under RCW 84.52.069 ((shall)) must contain
in substance the following:

"((Shall)) Will the . . . . . (insert the name of the taxing
district) be authorized to impose a PERMANENT regular property levy of
. . . . . (insert the maximum rate) or less per thousand dollars of
assessed valuation?
Yes. . . . . . . . . . . . □
No . . . . . . . . . . . . □"

Sec. 202 RCW 36.68.525 and 1994 c 156 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
A park and recreation service area may impose regular property tax
levies in an amount equal to sixty cents or less per thousand dollars
of assessed value of property in the service area in each year for six
consecutive years when specifically authorized so to do by a majority
of at least three-fifths of the voters thereof approving a proposition
authorizing the levies submitted not more than twelve months prior to
the date on which the proposed initial levy is to be made and not
oftener than twice in such twelve month period, either at a special
election or at the regular election of the service area, at which
election the number of voters voting "yes" on the proposition ((shall))
must constitute three-fifths of a number equal to forty percent of the
number of voters voting in the service area at the last preceding
general election when the number of voters voting on the proposition
does not exceed forty percent of the number of voters voting in such
taxing district in the last preceding general election; or by a
majority of at least three-fifths of the voters thereof voting on the
proposition if the number of voters voting on the proposition exceeds
forty per centum of the number of voters voting in such taxing district
in the last preceding general election. A proposition authorizing such
tax levies ((shall)) may not be submitted by a park and recreation
service area more than twice in any twelve-month period. Ballot
propositions ((shall)) must conform with RCW ((29.30.111)) 29A.36.210.
If a park and recreation service area is levying property taxes, which
in combination with property taxes levied by other taxing districts
result in taxes in excess of the ((nine-dollar and fifteen cents per
thousand dollars of assessed valuation)) limitation provided for in RCW
84.52.043(2), the park and recreation service area property tax levy
((shall)) must be reduced or eliminated ((before the property tax
levies of other taxing districts are reduced)) as provided in RCW
84.52.010.

Sec. 203 RCW 36.69.145 and 1994 c 156 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A park and recreation district may impose regular property tax
levies in an amount equal to sixty cents or less per thousand dollars
of assessed value of property in the district in each year for six
consecutive years when specifically authorized so to do by a majority
of at least three-fifths of the voters thereof approving a proposition
authorizing the levies submitted at a special election or at the
regular election of the district, at which election the number of
voters voting "yes" on the proposition ((shall)) must constitute three-fifths of a number equal to forty per centum of the number of voters
voting in such district at the last preceding general election when the
number of voters voting on the proposition does not exceed forty per
centum of the number of voters voting in such taxing district in the
last preceding general election; or by a majority of at least three-fifths of the voters thereof voting on the proposition if the number of
voters voting on the proposition exceeds forty per centum of the number
of voters voting in such taxing district in the last preceding general
election. A proposition authorizing the tax levies ((shall)) may not
be submitted by a park and recreation district more than twice in any
twelve-month period. Ballot propositions ((shall)) must conform with
RCW ((29.30.111)) 29A.36.210. In the event a park and recreation
district is levying property taxes, which in combination with property
taxes levied by other taxing districts subject to the one percent
limitation provided for in Article 7, section 2, of our state
Constitution result in taxes in excess of the limitation provided for
in RCW 84.52.043(2), the park and recreation district property tax levy
((shall)) must be reduced or eliminated ((before the property tax
levies of other taxing districts are reduced)) as provided in RCW
84.52.010.
(2) The limitation in RCW 84.55.010 ((shall)) does not apply to the
first levy imposed under this section following the approval of the
levies by the voters under subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 204 RCW 84.34.020 and 2009 c 513 s 1 and 2009 c 255 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is required by
the context:
(1) "Open space land" means (a) any land area so designated by an
official comprehensive land use plan adopted by any city or county and
zoned accordingly, or (b) any land area, the preservation of which in
its present use would (i) conserve and enhance natural or scenic
resources, or (ii) protect streams or water supply, or (iii) promote
conservation of soils, wetlands, beaches or tidal marshes, or (iv)
enhance the value to the public of abutting or neighboring parks,
forests, wildlife preserves, nature reservations or sanctuaries or
other open space, or (v) enhance recreation opportunities, or (vi)
preserve historic sites, or (vii) preserve visual quality along
highway, road, and street corridors or scenic vistas, or (viii) retain
in its natural state tracts of land not less than one acre situated in
an urban area and open to public use on such conditions as may be
reasonably required by the legislative body granting the open space
classification, or (c) any land meeting the definition of farm and
agricultural conservation land under subsection (8) of this section.
As a condition of granting open space classification, the legislative
body may not require public access on land classified under (b)(iii) of
this subsection for the purpose of promoting conservation of wetlands.
(2) "Farm and agricultural land" means:
(a) Any parcel of land that is twenty or more acres or multiple
parcels of land that are contiguous and total twenty or more acres:
(i) Devoted primarily to the production of livestock or
agricultural commodities for commercial purposes;
(ii) Enrolled in the federal conservation reserve program or its
successor administered by the United States department of agriculture;
or
(iii) Other similar commercial activities as may be established by
rule;
(b)(i) Any parcel of land that is five acres or more but less than
twenty acres devoted primarily to agricultural uses, which has produced
a gross income from agricultural uses equivalent to, as of January 1,
1993:
(A) One hundred dollars or more per acre per year for three of the
five calendar years preceding the date of application for
classification under this chapter for all parcels of land that are
classified under this subsection or all parcels of land for which an
application for classification under this subsection is made with the
granting authority prior to January 1, 1993; and
(B) On or after January 1, 1993, two hundred dollars or more per
acre per year for three of the five calendar years preceding the date
of application for classification under this chapter;
(ii) For the purposes of (b)(i) of this subsection, "gross income
from agricultural uses" includes, but is not limited to, the wholesale
value of agricultural products donated to nonprofit food banks or
feeding programs;
(c) Any parcel of land of less than five acres devoted primarily to
agricultural uses which has produced a gross income as of January 1,
1993, of:
(i) One thousand dollars or more per year for three of the five
calendar years preceding the date of application for classification
under this chapter for all parcels of land that are classified under
this subsection or all parcels of land for which an application for
classification under this subsection is made with the granting
authority prior to January 1, 1993; and
(ii) On or after January 1, 1993, fifteen hundred dollars or more
per year for three of the five calendar years preceding the date of
application for classification under this chapter. Parcels of land
described in (b)(i)(A) and (c)(i) of this subsection ((shall)) will,
upon any transfer of the property excluding a transfer to a surviving
spouse or surviving state registered domestic partner, be subject to
the limits of (b)(i)(B) and (c)(ii) of this subsection;
(d) Any parcel of land that is five acres or more but less than
twenty acres devoted primarily to agricultural uses, which meet one of
the following criteria:
(i) Has produced a gross income from agricultural uses equivalent
to two hundred dollars or more per acre per year for three of the five
calendar years preceding the date of application for classification
under this chapter;
(ii) Has standing crops with an expectation of harvest within seven
years, except as provided in (d)(iii) of this subsection, and a
demonstrable investment in the production of those crops equivalent to
one hundred dollars or more per acre in the current or previous
calendar year. For the purposes of this subsection (2)(d)(ii),
"standing crop" means Christmas trees, vineyards, fruit trees, or other
perennial crops that: (A) Are planted using agricultural methods
normally used in the commercial production of that particular crop; and
(B) typically do not produce harvestable quantities in the initial
years after planting; or
(iii) Has a standing crop of short rotation hardwoods with an
expectation of harvest within fifteen years and a demonstrable
investment in the production of those crops equivalent to one hundred
dollars or more per acre in the current or previous calendar year;
(e) Any lands including incidental uses as are compatible with
agricultural purposes, including wetlands preservation, provided such
incidental use does not exceed twenty percent of the classified land
and the land on which appurtenances necessary to the production,
preparation, or sale of the agricultural products exist in conjunction
with the lands producing such products. Agricultural lands shall also
include any parcel of land of one to five acres, which is not
contiguous, but which otherwise constitutes an integral part of farming
operations being conducted on land qualifying under this section as
"farm and agricultural lands";
(f) The land on which housing for employees and the principal place
of residence of the farm operator or owner of land classified pursuant
to (a) of this subsection is sited if: The housing or residence is on
or contiguous to the classified parcel; and the use of the housing or
the residence is integral to the use of the classified land for
agricultural purposes; or
(g) Any land that is used primarily for equestrian related
activities for which a charge is made, including, but not limited to,
stabling, training, riding, clinics, schooling, shows, or grazing for
feed and that otherwise meet the requirements of (a), (b), or (c) of
this subsection.
(3) "Timber land" means any parcel of land that is five or more
acres or multiple parcels of land that are contiguous and total five or
more acres which is or are devoted primarily to the growth and harvest
of timber for commercial purposes. Timber land means the land only and
does not include a residential homesite. The term includes land used
for incidental uses that are compatible with the growing and harvesting
of timber but no more than ten percent of the land may be used for such
incidental uses. It also includes the land on which appurtenances
necessary for the production, preparation, or sale of the timber
products exist in conjunction with land producing these products.
(4) "Current" or "currently" means as of the date on which property
is to be listed and valued by the assessor.
(5) "Owner" means the party or parties having the fee interest in
land, except that where land is subject to real estate contract "owner"
((shall)) means the contract vendee.
(6) "Contiguous" means land adjoining and touching other property
held by the same ownership. Land divided by a public road, but
otherwise an integral part of a farming operation, ((shall be)) is
considered contiguous.
(7) "Granting authority" means the appropriate agency or official
who acts on an application for classification of land pursuant to this
chapter.
(8) "Farm and agricultural conservation land" means either:
(a) Land that was previously classified under subsection (2) of
this section, that no longer meets the criteria of subsection (2) of
this section, and that is reclassified under subsection (1) of this
section; or
(b) Land that is traditional farmland that is not classified under
chapter 84.33 or 84.34 RCW, that has not been irrevocably devoted to a
use inconsistent with agricultural uses, and that has a high potential
for returning to commercial agriculture.

Sec. 205 RCW 84.36.381 and 2008 c 6 s 706 are each amended to
read as follows:
A person ((shall be)) is exempt from any legal obligation to pay
all or a portion of the amount of excess and regular real property
taxes due and payable in the year following the year in which a claim
is filed, and thereafter, in accordance with the following:
(1) The property taxes must have been imposed upon a residence
which was occupied by the person claiming the exemption as a principal
place of residence as of the time of filing((: PROVIDED, That)).
However, any person who sells, transfers, or is displaced from his or
her residence may transfer his or her exemption status to a replacement
residence, but no claimant ((shall)) may receive an exemption on more
than one residence in any year((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). Moreover,
confinement of the person to a hospital, nursing home, boarding home,
or adult family home ((shall)) does not disqualify the claim of
exemption if:
(a) The residence is temporarily unoccupied;
(b) The residence is occupied by a spouse or a domestic partner
and/or a person financially dependent on the claimant for support; or
(c) The residence is rented for the purpose of paying nursing home,
hospital, boarding home, or adult family home costs;
(2) The person claiming the exemption must have owned, at the time
of filing, in fee, as a life estate, or by contract purchase, the
residence on which the property taxes have been imposed or if the
person claiming the exemption lives in a cooperative housing
association, corporation, or partnership, such person must own a share
therein representing the unit or portion of the structure in which he
or she resides. For purposes of this subsection, a residence owned by
a marital community or state registered domestic partnership or owned
by cotenants ((shall be)) is deemed to be owned by each spouse or each
domestic partner or each cotenant, and any lease for life ((shall be))
is deemed a life estate;
(3) The person claiming the exemption must be (a) sixty-one years
of age or older on December 31st of the year in which the exemption
claim is filed, or must have been, at the time of filing, retired from
regular gainful employment by reason of disability, or (b) a veteran of
the armed forces of the United States with one hundred percent service-connected disability as provided in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 423 (d)(1)(A) as
amended prior to January 1, 2005, or such subsequent date as the
department may provide by rule consistent with the purpose of this
section. However, any surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner
of a person who was receiving an exemption at the time of the person's
death ((shall)) will qualify if the surviving spouse or surviving
domestic partner is fifty-seven years of age or older and otherwise
meets the requirements of this section;
(4) The amount that the person ((shall be)) is exempt from an
obligation to pay ((shall be)) is calculated on the basis of combined
disposable income, as defined in RCW 84.36.383. If the person claiming
the exemption was retired for two months or more of the assessment
year, the combined disposable income of such person ((shall)) must be
calculated by multiplying the average monthly combined disposable
income of such person during the months such person was retired by
twelve. If the income of the person claiming exemption is reduced for
two or more months of the assessment year by reason of the death of the
person's spouse or the person's domestic partner, or when other
substantial changes occur in disposable income that are likely to
continue for an indefinite period of time, the combined disposable
income of such person ((shall)) must be calculated by multiplying the
average monthly combined disposable income of such person after such
occurrences by twelve. If it is necessary to estimate income to comply
with this subsection, the assessor may require confirming documentation
of such income prior to May 31 of the year following application;
(5)(a) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has
a combined disposable income of thirty-five thousand dollars or less
((shall be)) is exempt from all excess property taxes; and
(b)(i) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has
a combined disposable income of thirty thousand dollars or less but
greater than twenty-five thousand dollars ((shall be)) is exempt from
all regular property taxes on the greater of fifty thousand dollars or
thirty-five percent of the valuation of his or her residence, but not
to exceed seventy thousand dollars of the valuation of his or her
residence; or
(ii) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a
combined disposable income of twenty-five thousand dollars or less
((shall be)) is exempt from all regular property taxes on the greater
of sixty thousand dollars or sixty percent of the valuation of his or
her residence;
(6)(a) For a person who otherwise qualifies under this section and
has a combined disposable income of thirty-five thousand dollars or
less, the valuation of the residence ((shall be)) is the assessed value
of the residence on the later of January 1, 1995, or January 1st of the
assessment year the person first qualifies under this section. If the
person subsequently fails to qualify under this section only for one
year because of high income, this same valuation ((shall)) must be used
upon requalification. If the person fails to qualify for more than one
year in succession because of high income or fails to qualify for any
other reason, the valuation upon requalification ((shall be)) is the
assessed value on January 1st of the assessment year in which the
person requalifies. If the person transfers the exemption under this
section to a different residence, the valuation of the different
residence ((shall be)) is the assessed value of the different residence
on January 1st of the assessment year in which the person transfers the
exemption.
(b) In no event may the valuation under this subsection be greater
than the true and fair value of the residence on January 1st of the
assessment year.
(c) This subsection does not apply to subsequent improvements to
the property in the year in which the improvements are made.
Subsequent improvements to the property ((shall)) must be added to the
value otherwise determined under this subsection at their true and fair
value in the year in which they are made.

Sec. 206 RCW 84.36.383 and 2008 c 182 s 1 and 2008 c 6 s 709 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
As used in RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389, except where the
context clearly indicates a different meaning:
(1) The term "residence" means a single family dwelling unit
whether such unit be separate or part of a multiunit dwelling,
including the land on which such dwelling stands not to exceed one
acre, except that a residence includes any additional property up to a
total of five acres that comprises the residential parcel if this
larger parcel size is required under land use regulations. The term
((shall)) also includes a share ownership in a cooperative housing
association, corporation, or partnership if the person claiming
exemption can establish that his or her share represents the specific
unit or portion of such structure in which he or she resides. The term
((shall)) also includes a single family dwelling situated upon lands
the fee of which is vested in the United States or any instrumentality
thereof including an Indian tribe or in the state of Washington, and
notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 84.04.080 and 84.04.090, such a
residence ((shall be)) is deemed real property.
(2) The term "real property" ((shall)) also includes a mobile home
which has substantially lost its identity as a mobile unit by virtue of
its being fixed in location upon land owned or leased by the owner of
the mobile home and placed on a foundation (posts or blocks) with fixed
pipe, connections with sewer, water, or other utilities. A mobile home
located on land leased by the owner of the mobile home is subject, for
tax billing, payment, and collection purposes, only to the personal
property provisions of chapter 84.56 RCW and RCW 84.60.040.
(3) "Department" means the state department of revenue.
(4) "Combined disposable income" means the disposable income of the
person claiming the exemption, plus the disposable income of his or her
spouse or domestic partner, and the disposable income of each cotenant
occupying the residence for the assessment year, less amounts paid by
the person claiming the exemption or his or her spouse or domestic
partner during the assessment year for:
(a) Drugs supplied by prescription of a medical practitioner
authorized by the laws of this state or another jurisdiction to issue
prescriptions;
(b) The treatment or care of either person received in the home or
in a nursing home, boarding home, or adult family home; and
(c) Health care insurance premiums for medicare under Title XVIII
of the social security act.
(5) "Disposable income" means adjusted gross income as defined in
the federal internal revenue code, as amended prior to January 1, 1989,
or such subsequent date as the director may provide by rule consistent
with the purpose of this section, plus all of the following items to
the extent they are not included in or have been deducted from adjusted
gross income:
(a) Capital gains, other than gain excluded from income under
section 121 of the federal internal revenue code to the extent it is
reinvested in a new principal residence;
(b) Amounts deducted for loss;
(c) Amounts deducted for depreciation;
(d) Pension and annuity receipts;
(e) Military pay and benefits other than attendant-care and
medical-aid payments;
(f) Veterans benefits, other than:
(i) Attendant-care payments;
(ii) Medical-aid payments;
(iii) Disability compensation, as defined in Title 38, part 3,
section 3.4 of the code of federal regulations, as of January 1, 2008;
and
(iv) Dependency and indemnity compensation, as defined in Title 38,
part 3, section 3.5 of the code of federal regulations, as of January
1, 2008;
(g) Federal social security act and railroad retirement benefits;
(h) Dividend receipts; and
(i) Interest received on state and municipal bonds.
(6) "Cotenant" means a person who resides with the person claiming
the exemption and who has an ownership interest in the residence.
(7) "Disability" has the same meaning as provided in 42 U.S.C. Sec.
423(d)(1)(A) as amended prior to January 1, ((2004)) 2005, or such
subsequent date as the ((director)) department may provide by rule
consistent with the purpose of this section.

Sec. 207 RCW 84.37.030 and 2007 sp.s. c 2 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
A claimant may defer payment of fifty percent of special
assessments or real property taxes, or both, listed on the annual tax
statement in any year in which all of the following conditions are met:
(1) The special assessments or property taxes must be imposed upon
a residence that was occupied by the claimant as a principal place of
residence as of January 1st of the year in which the assessments and
taxes are due, subject to the exceptions allowed under RCW
84.36.381(1);
(2) The claimant must have combined disposable income, as defined
in RCW 84.36.383, of fifty-seven thousand dollars or less in the
calendar year preceding the filing of the declaration;
(3) The claimant must have paid one-half of the total amount of
special assessments and property taxes listed on the annual tax
statement for the year in which the deferral claim is made;
(4) A deferral is not allowed for special assessments ((or)),
property taxes, or both, levied for collection in the first five
calendar years in which the person owns the residence;
(5) The claimant who defers payment of special assessments or real
property taxes, or both, listed on the annual tax statement under this
section must also meet the conditions of RCW 84.38.030 (4) and (5);
(6) The total amount deferred by a claimant under this chapter must
not exceed forty percent of the amount of the claimant's equity value
in the claimant's residence; and
(7) The claimant may not defer taxes under both this chapter and
chapter 84.38 RCW((; and
(8) In the case of deferred special assessments, the claimant must
have opted for payment of the assessments on the installment method if
this method was available)) in the same tax year.

Sec. 208 RCW 84.37.902 and 2007 sp.s. c 2 s 13 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) ((During calendar year 2011, the joint legislative audit and
review committee shall review the property tax deferral program under
chapter 84.37 RCW.)) Pursuant to chapter 43.136 RCW, the citizen
commission for performance measurement of tax preferences must schedule
the property tax deferral program under this chapter for a tax
preference review by the joint legislative audit and review committee
in 2011. The department of revenue and county assessors ((shall)) must
provide the committee with any data within its purview that the
committee considers necessary to conduct the review. ((By December 1,
2011, the joint legislative audit and review committee shall report to
the legislature the results of its review.))
(2) ((As part of its review under subsection (1) of this section))
In addition to the factors in RCW 43.136.055(1), the committee
((shall)) must also study and report on:
(a) The effectiveness of the property tax deferral program in
assisting families in economic distress in remaining in their homes;
(b) The effectiveness of the property tax deferral program in
decreasing the default rate on residential mortgages for the statewide
population within the income threshold of the program;
(c) The number of potential participants per thousand population by
geographic region;
(d) The ratio of actual deferral program participants to potential
deferral program participants by geographic region;
(e) The ratio of average annual household property taxes for
deferral program participants and average annual income of deferral
program participants by geographic region;
(f) Economic conditions in the housing and lending markets for the
prior three years and the forecasted economic conditions for the
current biennium and the next succeeding biennium;
(g) Annual costs specific to the administration of the deferral
program; and
(h) Total annual costs of the deferral program((;
(i) Recommended changes to the deferral program that would increase
program participation;
(j) Any other recommendations the committee may have to improve the
deferral program; and
(k) Any other factors that the committee considers necessary to
properly evaluate the deferral program)).
(3) This section expires January 1, 2012.

Sec. 209 RCW 84.48.050 and 1995 c 134 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The county assessor ((shall)) must, on or before the fifteenth
day of January in each year, ((make out and transmit to the state
auditor, in such form as may be prescribed,)) prepare a complete
abstract of the tax rolls of the county, showing the number of acres
that have been assessed and the total value of the real property,
including the structures on the real property; the total value of all
taxable personal property in the county; the aggregate amount of all
taxable property in the county; the total amount as equalized and the
total amount of taxes levied in the county for state, county, city, and
other taxing district purposes, for that year. ((Should the))
(2) If an assessor of any county fails to transmit to the
department of revenue the abstract provided for in RCW 84.48.010, and
if((, by reason of such failure to transmit such abstract, any)) a
county ((shall)) fails to collect and pay to the state its due
proportion of the state tax for any year because of that failure, the
department of revenue ((shall)) must ascertain what amount of state tax
((said)) the county ((has)) failed to collect((, and)). The department
must certify ((the same)) to the ((state)) county auditor((, who shall
charge the amount to the proper county and notify the auditor of said
county of the amount of said charge; said)) the amount of state tax the
county failed to collect. This sum ((shall be)) is due and payable
immediately by warrant in favor of the state on the current expense
fund of ((said)) the county.

Sec. 210 RCW 84.52.030 and 1994 c 124 s 38 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purpose of raising revenue for state, county, and other
taxing district purposes, the county legislative authority of each
county ((at its October session)), and all other officials or boards
authorized by law to levy taxes for taxing district purposes, ((shall))
must levy taxes on all the taxable property in the county or district,
as the case may be, sufficient for such purposes, and within the
limitations permitted by law.

Sec. 211 RCW 84.52.070 and 1994 c 81 s 86 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It ((shall be)) is the duty of the county legislative authority
of each county, on or before the thirtieth day of November in each
year, to certify to the county assessor ((of the county)) the amount of
taxes levied upon the property in the county for county purposes, and
the respective amounts of taxes levied by the board for each taxing
district, within or coextensive with the county, for district
purposes((, and)).
(2) It ((shall be)) is the duty of the council of each city having
a population of three hundred thousand or more, and of the council of
each town, and of all officials or boards of taxing districts within or
coextensive with the county, authorized by law to levy taxes directly
and not through the county legislative authority, on or before the
thirtieth day of November in each year, to certify to the county
assessor ((of the county)) the amount of taxes levied upon the property
within the city, town, or district for city, town, or district
purposes.
(3) If a levy amount is ((not)) certified to the county assessor
((by)) after the thirtieth day of November, the county assessor
((shall)) may use no more than the certified levy amount for the
previous year for the taxing district((: PROVIDED, That)). This
((shall)) subsection (3) does not apply to the state levy or when the
assessor has not certified assessed values as required by RCW 84.48.130
at least twelve working days ((prior to)) before November 30th.

Sec. 212 RCW 84.52.080 and 1989 c 378 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The county assessor ((shall)) must extend the taxes upon the
tax rolls in the form ((herein)) prescribed in this section. The rate
percent necessary to raise the amounts of taxes levied for state and
county purposes, and for purposes of taxing districts coextensive with
the county, ((shall)) must be computed upon the assessed value of the
property of the county((;)). The rate percent necessary to raise the
amount of taxes levied for any taxing district within the county
((shall)) must be computed upon the assessed value of the property of
the district((;)). All taxes assessed against any property ((shall))
must be added together and extended on the rolls in a column headed
consolidated or total tax. In extending any tax, whenever ((it)) the
tax amounts to a fractional part of a cent greater than ((five mills))
one-half of a cent it ((shall)) must be ((made)) rounded up to one
cent, and whenever it amounts to ((five mills)) one-half of a cent or
less ((than five mills)) it ((shall)) must be dropped. The amount of
all taxes ((shall)) must be entered in the proper columns, as shown by
entering the rate percent necessary to raise the consolidated or total
tax and the total tax assessed against the property.
(2) For the purpose of computing the rate necessary to raise the
amount of any excess levy in a taxing district ((which has classified
or designated forest land under chapter 84.33 RCW)) entitled to a
distribution under RCW 84.33.081, other than the state, the county
assessor ((shall)) must add the district's timber assessed value, as
defined in RCW 84.33.035, to the assessed value of the property((:
PROVIDED, That)). However, for school districts maintenance and
operations levies, only one-half of the district's timber assessed
value or eighty percent of the timber roll of ((such)) the district in
calendar year 1983 as determined under chapter 84.33 RCW, whichever is
greater, ((shall)) must be added to the assessed value of the property.
(3) Upon the completion of such tax extension, it ((shall be)) is
the duty of the county assessor to make in each assessment book, tax
roll or list a certificate in the following form:

(4) The county assessor ((shall)) must deliver ((said)) the tax
rolls to the county treasurer, on or before the fifteenth day of
January, taking a receipt ((therefor, and)) from the treasurer. At the
same time, the county assessor ((shall)) must provide the county
auditor with an abstract of the tax rolls showing the total amount of
taxes collectible in each of the taxing districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213 RCW 84.55.080 (Adjustment to tax
limitation) and 2006 c 184 s 5 & 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 12 are each
repealed.

PART III
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 2009 c 461 s 9, 2006 c 300 s 12, and 2003
c 149 s 12 (uncodified) are codified as a section within chapter 82.32
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 Except as otherwise provided in section
304 of this act, this act takes effect July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 Section 123 of this act takes effect
January 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 Section 122 of this act expires January 1,
2014.

--- END ---