BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.77.165 and 1993 c 31 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In the event of an escape by a person committed under this
chapter from a state ((institution)) facility or the disappearance of
such a person on conditional release ((to the department of social and
health services, the superintendent, or in the event of a disappearance
of such a person on conditional release to the department of
corrections, the community corrections officer)) or other authorized
absence, the superintendent shall((, as appropriate,)) notify the
following persons or entities about information necessary for the
public safety or to assist in the apprehension of the person:
(a) State and local law enforcement officers((,)) located in the
city and county where the person escaped;
(b) The victim of the crime for which the person was convicted or
the victim's next of kin if the crime was a homicide;
(c) Any witnesses who testified against the person in any court
proceedings if the person was charged with a violent offense;
(d) Other appropriate governmental agencies((,));
(e) The person's relatives((,)); and
(f) Any other appropriate persons ((about information necessary for
the public safety or to assist in the apprehension of the person)).
(2) The notice provisions of this section are in addition to those
provided in RCW 10.77.205.

--- END ---