BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the
administration of the property tax on personal property is inefficient
for government and business. The legislature concludes that a study is
necessary to identify methods to best accomplish the elimination of the
personal property tax.
(2) The department of revenue must conduct a study on alternatives
for eliminating the property tax on personal property. In conducting
the study, the department must examine the cost of administering the
tax, savings to government and taxpayers by eliminating the tax, the
effect on property tax rates, and property tax shifts.
(3) The department of revenue must seek the advice and input of
local officials administering the property tax.
(4) The department of revenue must present a final report of its
findings and alternatives, including a legislative draft proposal, to
the ways and means committee in the senate and the finance committee in
the house of representatives by October 31, 2011.

--- END ---