BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
protect employees who are acting in furtherance of any public policy.
Common law in this area is in a state of disorder and a clear rule of
law will ensure consistent and predictable application for employees
and employers. Section 2 of this act creates a cause of action,
separate from the common law tort of wrongful discharge, protecting
employees from adverse employment actions in retaliation for conduct
that promotes local, state, or federal public policy. The intended
result is to encourage employees to act to protect public policy by
deterring employer retaliation. Illustrative examples of activities
that are protected include, but are not limited to, reporting crimes or
professional misconduct, opposing unlawful actions or unsafe
conditions, and exercising legal rights or performing legal duties,
such as voting, testifying, and performing jury duty.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) It is unlawful for an employer to
retaliate against an employee or independent contractor where
retaliation is a substantial factor in the decision to take adverse
employment action.
(2) An employee or independent contractor who is retaliated against
has a civil cause of action in a court of competent jurisdiction to
enjoin further violations, and to recover actual damages sustained by
the employee or contractor, together with the cost of suit including
reasonable attorneys' fees and any other appropriate remedy authorized
by the Washington law against discrimination, RCW 49.60.030(2).
(3) A civil cause of action is available for a violation of this
section notwithstanding the existence of any other local, state, or
federal statutory or administrative means of protecting public policy,
and supplements any civil cause or remedy that may exist at common law.
(4) A three-year statute of limitations applies to violations of
this section.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "retaliate" means to commit
an adverse employment action against an employee or independent
contractor for conduct that the employee or independent contractor
reasonably believes promotes a clear mandate of any public policy.
Protected conduct includes, but is not limited to, the refusal to
commit an illegal act, performing a legal duty or obligation,
exercising a legal right or privilege, or reporting employer misconduct
or whistleblowing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act are each added
to chapter 49.60 RCW.

--- END ---