BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) No later than thirty days after the
effective date of this section, the office of financial management
shall establish a working group on language access services.
(2) The working group shall include members that have experience
and knowledge of language access services in Washington state,
including representatives of a statewide association representing
hospitals, community health centers and providers for underserved and
immigrant populations, statewide associations representing physicians,
other health care providers who serve medicaid patients, a statewide
labor union currently working with language access providers, statewide
professional interpreter associations, community-based organizations
that advocate for persons with limited English proficiency, language
access providers, brokers, and representatives of the department of
social and health services.
(3) A representative of the office of financial management shall
chair the working group, and the department shall provide staff to
support the working group's activities.
(4) The working group shall develop a plan to improve the
efficiency and effectiveness of language access services. The plan
shall describe the best possible means by which the following criteria
are achieved: Administrative and overhead costs, including brokers and
language access agencies, are reduced; timeliness and flexibility for
medical providers is improved; the pool of qualified interpreters is
stabilized; and fraud and abuse are prevented.
(5) The office of financial management shall report the findings of
the working group to the legislature and the governor no later than
September 30, 2010.

--- END ---