BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 23B.07.050 and 1989 c 165 s 64 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A corporation shall notify shareholders of the date, time, and
place of each annual and special shareholders' meeting. Such notice
shall be given no fewer than ten nor more than sixty days before the
meeting date, except that notice of a shareholders' meeting to act on
an amendment to the articles of incorporation, a plan of merger or
share exchange, a proposed sale of assets pursuant to RCW 23B.12.020,
or the dissolution of the corporation shall be given no fewer than
twenty nor more than sixty days before the meeting date. Unless this
title or the articles of incorporation require otherwise, the
corporation is required to give notice only to shareholders entitled to
vote at the meeting.
(2) Unless this title or the articles of incorporation require
otherwise, notice of an annual meeting need not include a description
of the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called.
(3) Notice of a special meeting must include a description of the
purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called.
(4) Unless the bylaws require otherwise, if an annual or special
shareholders' meeting is adjourned to a different date, time, or place,
notice need not be given of the new date, time, or place if the new
date, time, or place is announced at the meeting before adjournment.
If a new record date for the adjourned meeting is or must be fixed
under RCW 23B.07.070, however, notice of the adjourned meeting must be
given under this section to persons who are shareholders as of the new
record date.
(5) In each notice to shareholders of annual or special meetings,
the notice shall include the corporation's web site, if any, and a
citation to the United States securities and exchange commission's
electronic data gathering, analysis and retrieval system, if
applicable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 30.12 RCW
to read as follows:
In each notice to shareholders of annual or special meetings, the
notice shall include the bank's web site, if any, and a citation to the
United States securities and exchange commission's electronic data
gathering, analysis, and retrieval system, if applicable.

--- END ---