BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1)(a) A legislature shall convene a work
group on the subject of costs related to court hearings under the
involuntary treatment act, with members as provided in this subsection.
(i) Members shall be invited to participate who represent the
diversity of opinions and practices around the state. Invited members
must include, but need not be limited to, members representing a
regional support network east of the Cascade mountains, a regional
support network west of the Cascade mountains, a predominantly urban
county, a predominantly rural county, a court administrator, a
prosecutor or representative of a prosecutor's association, a defense
attorney or representative of a defense association, and a consumer or
family representative.
(ii) The department of social and health services shall cooperate
with the work group and maintain a liaison representative, who shall be
a nonvoting member.
(b) The work group shall choose its chair from among its
membership. The legislature shall convene the initial meeting of the
work group.
(2) The work group shall review the following issues:
(a) Appropriate allocation of responsibility for court-related
costs and fees associated with involuntary commitment hearings; and
(b) Appropriate allocation of responsibility for court-related
costs and fees associated with involuntary commitment hearings when the
commitment hearing takes place in a different locality than the
locality in which the respondent was originally detained.
(3) Staff support for the work group must be provided by the senate
committee services and the house of representatives office of program
research.
(4) The expenses of the work group must be paid jointly by the
senate and house of representatives. Work group expenditures are
subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee
and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their
successor committees.
(5) The work group shall report its findings and recommendations to
the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2010.
(6) This section expires June 1, 2011.

--- END ---