BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 64.34.364 and 1990 c 166 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The association has a lien on a unit for any unpaid assessments
levied against a unit from the time the assessment is due.
(2) A lien under this section shall be prior to all other liens and
encumbrances on a unit except: (a) Liens and encumbrances recorded
before the recording of the declaration; (b) a mortgage on the unit
recorded before the date on which the earliest unpaid assessment sought
to be enforced became delinquent; and (c) liens for real property taxes
and other governmental assessments or charges against the unit. A lien
under this section is not subject to the provisions of chapter 6.13
RCW.
(3) Except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section,
the lien shall also be prior to the mortgages described in subsection
(2)(b) of this section to the extent of regular or special assessments
for common expenses, excluding any amounts for capital improvements,
based on the periodic or revised budget adopted by the association
pursuant to RCW 64.34.360(1) which would have become due during the
((six)) twelve months immediately preceding the date of ((a sheriff's
sale in an)) recording of any lis pendens in any action for judicial
foreclosure by either the association or a mortgagee, the date of a
trustee's sale in a nonjudicial foreclosure by a mortgagee, or the date
of recording of the declaration of forfeiture in a proceeding by the
vendor under a real estate contract. The twelve-month priority
exception to mortgages described in subsection (2)(b) of this section
includes any assessments made against a unit for any period of time
during which the mortgagee is in default of its obligation to the
association, the association has notified the mortgagee of the default,
and the mortgagee has failed to enforce its rights to foreclose on its
mortgage.
(4) The priority of the association's lien against units encumbered
by a mortgage held by an eligible mortgagee or by a mortgagee which has
given the association a written request for a notice of delinquent
assessments shall be reduced by up to ((three)) six months if and to
the extent that the lien priority under subsection (3) of this section
includes delinquencies which relate to a period after such holder
becomes an eligible mortgagee or has given such notice and before the
association gives the holder a written notice of the delinquency. This
subsection does not affect the priority of mechanics' or materialmen's
liens, or the priority of liens for other assessments made by the
association.
(5) If the association forecloses its lien under this section
nonjudicially pursuant to chapter 61.24 RCW, as provided by subsection
(9) of this section, the association shall not be entitled to the lien
priority provided for under subsection (3) of this section.
(6) Unless the declaration otherwise provides, if two or more
associations have liens for assessments created at any time on the same
real estate, those liens have equal priority.
(7) Recording of the declaration constitutes record notice and
perfection of the lien for assessments. While no further recording of
any claim of lien for assessment under this section shall be required
to perfect the association's lien, the association may record a notice
of claim of lien for assessments under this section in the real
property records of any county in which the condominium is located.
Such recording shall not constitute the written notice of delinquency
to a mortgagee referred to in subsection (2) of this section.
(8) A lien for unpaid assessments and the personal liability for
payment of assessments is extinguished unless proceedings to enforce
the lien or collect the debt are instituted within three years after
the amount of the assessments sought to be recovered becomes due.
(9) The lien arising under this section may be enforced judicially
by the association or its authorized representative in the manner set
forth in chapter 61.12 RCW. The lien arising under this section may be
enforced nonjudicially in the manner set forth in chapter 61.24 RCW for
nonjudicial foreclosure of deeds of trust if the declaration (a)
contains a grant of the condominium in trust to a trustee qualified
under RCW 61.24.010 to secure the obligations of the unit owners to the
association for the payment of assessments, (b) contains a power of
sale, (c) provides in its terms that the units are not used principally
for agricultural or farming purposes, and (d) provides that the power
of sale is operative in the case of a default in the obligation to pay
assessments. The association or its authorized representative shall
have the power, unless prohibited by the declaration, to purchase the
unit at the foreclosure sale and to acquire, hold, lease, mortgage, or
convey the same. Upon an express waiver in the complaint of any right
to a deficiency judgment in a judicial foreclosure action, the period
of redemption shall be eight months. Nothing in this section shall
prohibit an association from taking a deed in lieu of foreclosure.
(10) From the time of commencement of an action by the association
to foreclose a lien for nonpayment of delinquent assessments against a
unit that is not occupied by the owner thereof, the association shall
be entitled to the appointment of a receiver to collect from the lessee
thereof the rent for the unit as and when due. If the rental is not
paid, the receiver may obtain possession of the unit, refurbish it for
rental up to a reasonable standard for rental units in this type of
condominium, rent the unit or permit its rental to others, and apply
the rents first to the cost of the receivership and attorneys' fees
thereof, then to the cost of refurbishing the unit, then to applicable
charges, then to costs, fees, and charges of the foreclosure action,
and then to the payment of the delinquent assessments. Only a receiver
may take possession and collect rents under this subsection, and a
receiver shall not be appointed less than ninety days after the
delinquency. The exercise by the association of the foregoing rights
shall not affect the priority of preexisting liens on the unit.
(11) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the
holder of a mortgage or other purchaser of a unit who obtains the right
of possession of the unit through foreclosure shall not be liable for
assessments or installments thereof that became due prior to such right
of possession. Such unpaid assessments shall be deemed to be common
expenses collectible from all the unit owners, including such mortgagee
or other purchaser of the unit. Foreclosure of a mortgage does not
relieve the prior owner of personal liability for assessments accruing
against the unit prior to the date of such sale as provided in this
subsection.
(12) In addition to constituting a lien on the unit, each
assessment shall be the joint and several obligation of the owner or
owners of the unit to which the same are assessed as of the time the
assessment is due. In a voluntary conveyance, the grantee of a unit
shall be jointly and severally liable with the grantor for all unpaid
assessments against the grantor up to the time of the grantor's
conveyance, without prejudice to the grantee's right to recover from
the grantor the amounts paid by the grantee therefor. Suit to recover
a personal judgment for any delinquent assessment shall be maintainable
in any court of competent jurisdiction without foreclosing or waiving
the lien securing such sums.
(13) The association may from time to time establish reasonable
late charges and a rate of interest to be charged on all subsequent
delinquent assessments or installments thereof. In the absence of
another established nonusurious rate, delinquent assessments shall bear
interest from the date of delinquency at the maximum rate permitted
under RCW 19.52.020 on the date on which the assessments became
delinquent.
(14) The association shall be entitled to recover any costs and
reasonable attorneys' fees incurred in connection with the collection
of delinquent assessments, whether or not such collection activities
result in suit being commenced or prosecuted to judgment. In addition,
the association shall be entitled to recover costs and reasonable
attorneys' fees if it prevails on appeal and in the enforcement of a
judgment.
(15) The association upon written request shall furnish to a unit
owner or a mortgagee a statement signed by an officer or authorized
agent of the association setting forth the amount of unpaid assessments
against that unit. The statement shall be furnished within fifteen
days after receipt of the request and is binding on the association,
the board of directors, and every unit owner, unless and to the extent
known by the recipient to be false.
(16) To the extent not inconsistent with this section, the
declaration may provide for such additional remedies for collection of
assessments as may be permitted by law.

--- END ---