BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An aircraft is either exempt from taxation, if the aircraft is:
(a)(i) Owned by a nonprofit organization that is exempt from
federal income taxation under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3);
(ii) Used to provide emergency medical transportation services; and
(iii) The exemption inures to the benefit of the nonprofit
organization that owns the aircraft; or
(b) A private aircraft exclusively used for medivac flights from
islands in Washington state.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.48.100 and 1999 c 302 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
This chapter ((shall)) does not apply to:
(1) Aircraft owned by and used exclusively in the service of any
government or any political subdivision thereof, including the
government of the United States, any state, territory, or possession of
the United States, or the District of Columbia, which are not engaged
in carrying persons or property for commercial purposes;
(2) Aircraft registered under the laws of a foreign country;
(3) Aircraft which are owned by a nonresident and registered in
another state((: PROVIDED, That)). However, if any such aircraft
((shall)) remains in and/or ((be)) is based in this state for a period
of ninety days or longer it ((shall)) is not ((be)) exempt under this
section;
(4) Aircraft engaged principally in commercial flying which
constitutes interstate or foreign commerce; and aircraft owned by the
manufacturer thereof while being operated for test or experimental
purposes, or for the purpose of training crews for purchasers of the
aircraft;
(5) Aircraft being held for sale, exchange, delivery, test, or
demonstration purposes solely as stock in trade of an aircraft dealer
licensed under Title 14 RCW;
(6) Aircraft owned by a nonresident of this state if the aircraft
is kept at an airport in this state and that airport is jointly owned
or operated by a municipal corporation or other governmental entity of
this state and a municipal corporation or other governmental entity of
another state, and the owner or operator of the aircraft provides the
department with proof that the owner or operator has paid all taxes,
license fees, and registration fees required by the state in which the
owner or operator resides; and
(7) Aircraft that are: (a)(i) Owned by a nonprofit organization
that is exempt from federal income taxation under 26 U.S.C. Sec.
501(c)(3); and (ii) exclusively used to provide emergency medical
transportation services; or
(b) Private aircraft exclusively used for medivac flights from
islands in Washington state.

--- END ---