BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The department of fish and wildlife must
work with appropriate stakeholders including, at minimum, regional
fisheries enhancement groups, food banks, current and past surplus
salmon disposal contractors, commercial and recreational fishers,
tribes, and commercial aquaculture in order to facilitate the
disposition of surplus salmon, including eggs and carcasses, in the
manner that best utilizes the resource and enhances both: Revenues to
regional fisheries enhancement groups authorized under RCW 77.95.060;
and the provision of nutrients to food banks. The department of fish
and wildlife must provide a summary of these discussions, outcomes, and
any legislative recommendations to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by November 1, 2010.
(2) The department of fish and wildlife must carry out the
requirements of this section within existing funds.
(3) This section expires December 31, 2010.

--- END ---