BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.52.020 and 2002 c 194 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A driver of any vehicle involved in an accident ((resulting in
the injury to or death of any person or)) involving striking the body
of a deceased person shall immediately stop such vehicle at the scene
of such accident or as close thereto as possible but shall then
forthwith return to, and in every event remain at, the scene of such
accident until he or she has fulfilled the requirements of subsection
(((3))) (5) of this section; every such stop shall be made without
obstructing traffic more than is necessary.
(2) A driver of any vehicle involved in an accident resulting in
the death of a pedestrian, bicyclist, or motorcyclist shall immediately
stop such vehicle at the scene of such accident or as close thereto as
possible but shall then forthwith return to, and in every event remain
at, the scene of such accident until he or she has fulfilled the
requirements of subsection (5) of this section.
(3) A driver of any vehicle involved in an accident resulting in
the injury of a pedestrian, bicyclist, or motorcyclist shall
immediately stop such vehicle at the scene of such accident or as close
thereto as possible but shall then forthwith return to, and in every
event remain at, the scene of such accident until he or she has
fulfilled the requirements of subsection (5) of this section.
(4)(a) The driver of any vehicle involved in an accident resulting
only in damage to a vehicle which is driven or attended by any person
or damage to other property must move the vehicle as soon as possible
off the roadway or freeway main lanes, shoulders, medians, and adjacent
areas to a location on an exit ramp shoulder, the frontage road, the
nearest suitable cross street, or other suitable location. The driver
shall remain at the suitable location until he or she has fulfilled the
requirements of subsection (((3))) (5) of this section. Moving the
vehicle in no way affects fault for an accident.
(b) A law enforcement officer or representative of the department
of transportation may cause a motor vehicle, cargo, or debris to be
moved from the roadway; and neither the department of transportation
representative, nor anyone acting under the direction of the officer or
the department of transportation representative is liable for damage to
the motor vehicle, cargo, or debris caused by reasonable efforts of
removal.
(((3))) (5) Unless otherwise provided in subsection (((7))) (9) of
this section the driver of any vehicle involved in an accident
resulting in injury to or death of any person, or involving striking
the body of a deceased person, or resulting in damage to any vehicle
which is driven or attended by any person or damage to other property
shall (a) give his or her name, address, insurance company, insurance
policy number, and vehicle license number and shall exhibit his or her
vehicle driver's license to any person struck or injured or the driver
or any occupant of, or any person attending, any such vehicle collided
with ((and shall)), (b) render to any person injured in such accident
reasonable assistance, including the carrying or the making of
arrangements for the carrying of such person to a physician or hospital
for medical treatment if it is apparent that such treatment is
necessary or if such carrying is requested by the injured person or on
his or her behalf, and (c) contact law enforcement or emergency
personnel. Under no circumstances shall the rendering of assistance or
other compliance with the provisions of this subsection be evidence of
the liability of any driver for such accident.
(((4))) (6)(a) Any driver covered by the provisions of subsections
(1) through (3) of this section failing to stop or comply with any of
the requirements of subsection (((3))) (5) of this section in the case
of an accident resulting in death is guilty of a class B felony and,
upon conviction, is punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(b) Any driver covered by the provisions of subsections (((1))) (2)
and (3) of this section failing to stop or comply with any of the
requirements of subsection (((3))) (5) of this section in the case of
an accident resulting in injury is guilty of a class C felony and, upon
conviction, is punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(c) Any driver covered by the provisions of subsections (1) through
(3) of this section failing to stop or comply with any of the
requirements of subsection (((3))) (5) of this section in the case of
an accident involving striking the body of a deceased person is guilty
of a gross misdemeanor.
(d) This subsection shall not apply to any person injured or
incapacitated by such accident to the extent of being physically
incapable of complying with this section.
(((5))) (7) Any driver covered by the provisions of subsection
(((2))) (4) of this section failing to stop or to comply with any of
the requirements of subsection (((3))) (5) of this section under said
circumstances shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor: PROVIDED, That
this provision shall not apply to any person injured or incapacitated
by such accident to the extent of being physically incapable of
complying herewith.
(((6))) (8) The license or permit to drive or any nonresident
privilege to drive of any person convicted under this section or any
local ordinance consisting of substantially the same language as this
section of failure to stop and give information or render aid following
an accident with any vehicle driven or attended by any person shall be
revoked by the department.
(((7))) (9) If none of the persons specified are in condition to
receive the information to which they otherwise would be entitled under
subsection (((3))) (5) of this section, and no police officer is
present, the driver of any vehicle involved in such accident after
fulfilling all other requirements of subsections (1) ((and (3)))
through (5) of this section insofar as possible on his or her part to
be performed, shall forthwith report such accident to the nearest
office of the duly authorized police authority and submit thereto the
information specified in subsection (((3))) (5) of this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.515 and 2008 c 108 s 23 and 2008 c 38 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN
EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVI Aggravated Murder 1 (RCW
10.95.020)

XV Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW
70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIV Murder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

Trafficking 1 (RCW 9A.40.100(1))

XIII Malicious explosion 2 (RCW
70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1
(RCW 70.74.270(1))

XII Assault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

Trafficking 2 (RCW 9A.40.100(2))

XI Hit and run, if a death occurs to a
pedestrian, bicyclist, or
motorcyclist and the driver of the
vehicle fails to fulfill their duty to
render aid or to contact law
enforcement/emergency personnel
(RCW 46.52.020)

Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

X Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW
9A.42.020)

Hit and run, if a death occurs to a
pedestrian, bicyclist, or
motorcyclist and the driver of the
vehicle fulfills their duty to render
aid or to contact law
enforcement/emergency personnel
(RCW 46.52.020)

Indecent Liberties (with forcible
compulsion) (RCW
9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW
70.74.280(3))

Sexually Violent Predator Escape
(RCW 9A.76.115)

IX Abandonment of Dependent Person 1
(RCW 9A.42.060)

Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW
70.74.180)

Hit and Run--Death (RCW
46.52.020(((4)(a))) (1))

Homicide by Watercraft, by being
under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW
79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2
(RCW 70.74.270(2))

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under
the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)

VIII Arson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Homicide by Watercraft, by the
operation of any vessel in a
reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Promoting Commercial Sexual Abuse
of a Minor (RCW 9.68A.101)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW
9A.88.070)

Theft of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation
of any vehicle in a reckless manner
(RCW 46.61.520)

VII Burglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Civil Disorder Training (RCW
9A.48.120)

Dealing in depictions of minor engaged
in sexually explicit conduct (RCW
9.68A.050)

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible
compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW
9A.76.140)

Malicious placement of an explosive 3
(RCW 70.74.270(3))

Negligently Causing Death By Use of a
Signal Preemption Device (RCW
46.37.675)

Sending, bringing into state depictions
of minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.060)

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in
the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1))

Use of a Machine Gun in Commission
of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for
the safety of others (RCW
46.61.520)

VI Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW
9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Hit and run, if an injury occurs to a
pedestrian, bicyclist, or
motorcyclist and the driver of the
vehicle fails to fulfill their duty to
render aid or to contact law
enforcement/emergency personnel
(RCW 46.52.020)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW
9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Possession of Depictions of a Minor
Engaged in Sexually Explicit
Conduct (RCW 9.68A.070)

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful Storage of Ammonia (RCW
69.55.020)

V Abandonment of Dependent Person 2
(RCW 9A.42.070)

Advancing money or property for
extortionate extension of credit
(RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail Jumping with class A Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW
9A.42.030)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW
9A.44.160)

Domestic Violence Court Order
Violation (RCW 10.99.040,
10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070,
or 74.34.145)

Driving While Under the Influence
(RCW 46.61.502(6))

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit (RCW
9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect
Extensions of Credit (RCW
9A.82.040)

Hit and run, if an injury occurs to a
pedestrian, bicyclist, or
motorcyclist and the driver of the
vehicle fulfills their duty to render
aid or to contact law
enforcement/emergency personnel
(RCW 46.52.020)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW
9.94.070)

Physical Control of a Vehicle While
Under the Influence (RCW
46.61.504(6))

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW
9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1
(RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1
(RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains
(RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070)

IV Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault 3 (of a Peace Officer with a
Projectile Stun Gun) (RCW
9A.36.031(1)(h))

Assault by Watercraft (RCW
79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by
Witness (RCW 9A.72.090,
9A.72.100)

Cheating 1 (RCW 9.46.1961)

Commercial Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Endangerment with a Controlled
Substance (RCW 9A.42.100)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

((Hit and Run -- Injury (RCW
46.52.020(4)(b))))

Hit and Run with Vessel -- Injury
Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under
Age Fourteen (subsequent sex
offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting Event
(RCW 9A.82.070)

Malicious Harassment (RCW
9A.36.080)

Residential Burglary (RCW
9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.82.050)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(b))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health care service
contractor (RCW 48.44.016(3))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health maintenance
organization (RCW 48.46.033(3))

Unlawful transaction of insurance
business (RCW 48.15.023(3))

Unlicensed practice as an insurance
professional (RCW
48.17.063(((3))) (2))

Use of Proceeds of Criminal
Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1)
and (2))

Vehicular Assault, by being under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, or by the operation or
driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from
Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

III Animal Cruelty 1 (Sexual Conduct or
Contact) (RCW 16.52.205(3))

Assault 3 (Except Assault 3 of a Peace
Officer With a Projectile Stun
Gun) (RCW 9A.36.031 except
subsection (1)(h))

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Commercial Sexual Abuse of a Minor
(RCW 9.68A.100)

Communication with a Minor for
Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW
9A.46.120)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Cyberstalking (subsequent conviction
or threat of death) (RCW
9.61.260(3))

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW
9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW
9A.76.150)

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property
(RCW 81.60.070)

Mortgage Fraud (RCW 19.144.080)

Negligently Causing Substantial Bodily
Harm By Use of a Signal
Preemption Device (RCW
46.37.674)

Organized Retail Theft 1 (RCW
9A.56.350(2))

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW
9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW
9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW
9A.88.080)

Retail Theft with Extenuating
Circumstances 1 (RCW
9A.56.360(2))

Securities Act violation (RCW
21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW
9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent
conviction or threat of death)
(RCW 9.61.230(2))

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.083)

Theft with the Intent to Resell 1 (RCW
9A.56.340(2))

Trafficking in Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.82.055)

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW
9A.40.040)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the
second degree (RCW 9.41.040(2))

Vehicular Assault, by the operation or
driving of a vehicle with disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from Work
Release (RCW 72.65.070)

II Computer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))

Escape from Community Custody
(RCW 72.09.310)

Failure to Register as a Sex Offender
(second or subsequent offense)
(RCW 9A.44.130(11)(a))

Health Care False Claims (RCW
48.80.030)

Identity Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(3))

Improperly Obtaining Financial
Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW
9A.48.070)

Organized Retail Theft 2 (RCW
9A.56.350(3))

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.56.150)

Possession of a Stolen Vehicle (RCW
9A.56.068)

Retail Theft with Extenuating
Circumstances 2 (RCW
9A.56.360(3))

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of a Motor Vehicle (RCW
9A.56.065)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one
thousand five hundred dollars or
more) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(a))

Theft with the Intent to Resell 2 (RCW
9A.56.340(3))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW
48.30A.015)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(a))

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW
2.48.180)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or
Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

Voyeurism (RCW 9A.44.115)

I Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police
Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False Verification for Welfare (RCW
74.08.055)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Fraudulent Creation or Revocation of a
Mental Health Advance Directive
(RCW 9A.60.060)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW
9A.48.080)

Mineral Trespass (RCW 78.44.330)

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 2 (RCW 9A.56.075)

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two
hundred fifty dollars or more but
less than one thousand five
hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(5)(b))

Transaction of insurance business
beyond the scope of licensure
(RCW 48.17.063(((4))))

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts
(RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful Possession of Fictitious
Identification (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Instruments of
Financial Fraud (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of a Personal
Identification Device (RCW
9A.56.320)

Unlawful Production of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Trafficking in Food Stamps
(RCW 9.91.142)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW
9.91.144)

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

--- END ---