BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The Washington supreme court has determined that the state must
rely on dependable and regular tax sources to support basic education;
(2) Washington, like most states across the country, relies on the
property tax to provide financial support for public schools;
(3) Property tax support for public schools has been shifting from
the statewide, uniform tax to increasing reliance on excess property
tax levies that are not dependable and vary widely from school district
to school district;
(4) A dependable and regular source of financing for K-12 capital
facilities has not been identified; and
(5) Individual citizens have proposed innovative, comprehensive
solutions to provide ongoing, substantial financial support for K-12
public schools, and these solutions should be thoughtfully considered
for their possible adoption as a new state education finance policy.

Sec. 2 2009 c 548 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2010, the office of financial management,
with assistance and support from the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, shall convene a technical working group to develop
options for a new system of supplemental school funding through local
school levies and local effort assistance.
(2) The working group shall consider the impact on overall school
district revenues of the new basic education funding system established
under this act and shall recommend a phase-in plan that ensures that no
school district suffers a decrease in funding from one school year to
the next due to implementation of the new system of supplemental
funding.
(3)(a) The working group shall also examine options for a
comprehensive K-12 finance policy based on the following principles:
(i) Increasing support for public schools through the statewide
property tax;
(ii) Reducing reliance on property taxes from voter-approved excess
levies;
(iii) Removing historical inequities caused by grandfathering of
levy lids in certain school districts;
(iv) Providing a consistent source of financing to support K-12
capital facilities; and
(v) Providing a fair and equitable means of adjusting tax burden
for property-poor school districts.
(b) The working group shall consider innovative proposals that have
previously been developed, identify possible alternatives, analyze
their strengths and weaknesses, and examine the impact on taxpayers in
various regions of the state. The working group shall report to the
quality education council and the legislature on its findings and
analysis of options under this subsection (3) by November 30, 2010.
(4) The working group shall be composed of representatives from the
department of revenue, the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee, school district and educational service district
financial managers, and representatives of the Washington association
of school business officers, the Washington education association, the
Washington association of school administrators, the association of
Washington school principals, the Washington state school directors'
association, the public school employees of Washington, and other
interested stakeholders with expertise in education finance. The
working group may convene advisory subgroups on specific topics as
necessary to assure participation and input from a broad array of
diverse stakeholders. In addition to the staff support provided by the
office of financial management and the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, the department of revenue shall provide technical
assistance, including financial and legal analysis, to support the
working group's findings and analysis under subsection (3) of this
section.
(((4))) (5) The local funding working group shall be monitored and
overseen by the legislature and by the quality education council
created in ((section 114 of this act)) RCW 28A.290.010. The working
group shall submit a final report to the legislature by December 1,
2011.

--- END ---