BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.30.080 and 2005 c 273 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A special meeting may be called at any time by the presiding
officer of the governing body of a public agency or by a majority of
the members of the governing body by delivering written notice
personally, by mail, by fax, or by electronic mail to each member of
the governing body; ((and to each local newspaper of general
circulation and)) to each local radio or television station which has
on file with the governing body a written request to be notified of
such special meeting or of all special meetings; and by posting a
prominently placed hyperlink to the written notice on the agency's web
site. Such notice must be delivered personally, by mail, by fax,
((or)) by electronic mail, or posted electronically, at least twenty-four hours before the time of such meeting as specified in the notice.
The call and notice shall specify the time and place of the special
meeting and the business to be transacted. Final disposition shall not
be taken on any other matter at such meetings by the governing body.
Such written notice may be dispensed with as to any member who at or
prior to the time the meeting convenes files with the clerk or
secretary of the governing body a written waiver of notice. Such
waiver may be given by telegram, by fax, or electronic mail. Such
written notice may also be dispensed with as to any member who is
actually present at the meeting at the time it convenes. The notices
provided in this section may be dispensed with in the event a special
meeting is called to deal with an emergency involving injury or damage
to persons or property or the likelihood of such injury or damage, when
time requirements of such notice would make notice impractical and
increase the likelihood of such injury or damage.

--- END ---