BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.92.128 and 2007 c 235 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall issue a veterinary technician license to an
individual who has:
(a) Successfully ((passed an)) completed required examinations
administered or approved by the board; and
(b)(i) Successfully completed a posthigh school course approved by
the board in the care and treatment of animals; or
(ii) ((Had)) Completed, before July 1, 2015, five years' practical
experience, acceptable to the board, with a licensed veterinarian.
(2) The board shall adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW identifying
standard tasks and procedures that must be included in the experience
of a person who qualifies to take the veterinarian technician
examination through the period of practical experience required in
subsection (1)(b)(ii) of this section, and requirements for the
supervising veterinarian's attestation to completion of the practical
experience and that training included the required tasks and
procedures.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.92.128 and 2010 c . . . s 1 (section 1 of this act)
are each amended to read as follows:
(((1))) The board shall issue a veterinary technician license to an
individual who has:
(((a))) (1) Successfully completed required examinations
administered or approved by the board; and
(((b)(i))) (2) Successfully completed a posthigh school course
approved by the board in the care and treatment of animals((; or
(ii) Completed, before July 1, 2015, five years' practical
experience, acceptable to the board, with a licensed veterinarian.
(2) The board shall adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW identifying
standard tasks and procedures that must be included in the experience
of a person who qualifies to take the veterinarian technician
examination through the period of practical experience required in
subsection (1)(b)(ii) of this section, and requirements for the
supervising veterinarian's attestation to completion of the practical
experience and that training included the required tasks and
procedures)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1,
2015.

--- END ---