BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature affirms that the constitutional requirement of due
process applies to nontenured faculty in community and technical
colleges. Therefore, after an appropriate probationary period of
evaluation, nontenured faculty members whose contracts are not renewed
shall be provided with the reasons for the nonrenewal and a process to
challenge the nonrenewal. The challenge process described in this
section does not apply when the nonrenewal of contract is based on
enrollment, funding, or program changes.
The details of the evaluation tools and processes, the length of
probation, and the challenge process are subject to collective
bargaining. The evaluation of performance must include, but is not
limited to, areas such as instructional skill, classroom management,
professional preparation, and outcomes assessment.

--- END ---