BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 79.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In an effort to recover the service cost incurred for staff
time and other expenses involved in data delivery, the program must
charge either a six thousand dollar annual subscription fee or a one
hundred dollar access fee per request, plus a charge of seventy-five
dollars per hour rounded to the nearest half-hour to process and
respond to the data request. The hourly rate applies to, but is not
limited to, data analysis, technical assistance, manual searches, map
interpretations, and preparing special reports.
(2) The program may waive user charges when a data request requires
less than one hour of response time or when no data is provided. All
moneys collected under this section must be deposited into the natural
resources conservation areas stewardship account created in RCW
79.71.090.
(3) The department may adjust or modify the fees specified in this
section as necessary to recover the service costs.
(4) To support Washington's working forest land base, the
department may provide one annual subscription as described in this
section to any statewide trade association whose membership is
comprised of private forest landowners to serve as the annual
subscription for any of that association's members.

Sec. 2 RCW 79.71.090 and 2000 c 11 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby created the natural resources conservation areas
stewardship account in the state treasury to ensure proper and
continuing management of land acquired or designated pursuant to this
chapter. Funds for the stewardship account shall be derived from
appropriations of state general funds, federal funds, grants,
donations, gifts, bond issue receipts, securities, ((and)) other
monetary instruments of value, and the collection of fees charged for
data delivery services under section 1 of this act. Income derived
from the management of natural resources conservation areas shall also
be deposited in this stewardship account.
Appropriations from this account to the department shall be
expended for no other purpose than the following: (1) To manage the
areas approved by the legislature in fulfilling the purposes of this
chapter; (2) to manage property acquired as natural area preserves
under chapter 79.70 RCW; (3) to manage property transferred under the
authority and appropriation provided by the legislature to be managed
under chapter 79.70 RCW or this chapter or acquired under chapter
79A.15 RCW; and (4) to pay for operating expenses for the natural
heritage program under chapter 79.70 RCW.

--- END ---