BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.214 and 2008 c 273 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Until June 30, ((2011)) 2015, "newspaper" means:
(i) A publication issued regularly at stated intervals at least
twice a month and printed on newsprint in tabloid or broadsheet format
folded loosely together without stapling, glue, or any other binding of
any kind, including any supplement of a printed newspaper; and
(ii) An electronic version of a printed newspaper that:
(A) Shares content with the printed newspaper; and
(B) Is prominently identified by the same name as the printed
newspaper or otherwise conspicuously indicates that it is a complement
to the printed newspaper.
(b) For purposes of this section, "supplement" means a printed
publication, including a magazine or advertising section, that is:
(i) Labeled and identified as part of the printed newspaper; and
(ii) Circulated or distributed:
(A) As an insert or attachment to the printed newspaper; or
(B) Separate and apart from the printed newspaper so long as the
distribution is within the general circulation area of the newspaper.
(2) Beginning July 1, ((2011)) 2015, "newspaper" means a
publication issued regularly at stated intervals at least twice a month
and printed on newsprint in tabloid or broadsheet format folded loosely
together without stapling, glue, or any other binding of any kind,
including any supplement of a printed newspaper as defined in
subsection (1)(b) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---