BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 64.06.005 and 2009 c 505 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commercial real estate" has the same meaning as in RCW
60.42.005.
(2) "Improved residential real property" means:
(a) Real property consisting of, or improved by, one to four
residential dwelling units;
(b) A residential condominium as defined in RCW 64.34.020(9),
unless the sale is subject to the public offering statement requirement
in the Washington condominium act, chapter 64.34 RCW;
(c) A residential timeshare, as defined in RCW 64.36.010(11),
unless subject to written disclosure under the Washington timeshare
act, chapter 64.36 RCW; or
(d) A mobile or manufactured home, as defined in RCW 43.22.335 or
46.04.302, that is personal property.
(((2))) (3) "Residential real property" means both improved and
unimproved residential real property.
(((3))) (4) "Seller disclosure statement" means the form to be
completed by the seller of residential real property as prescribed by
this chapter.
(((4))) (5) "Unimproved residential real property" means property
zoned for residential use that is not improved by one or more
residential dwelling units, a residential condominium, a residential
timeshare, or a mobile or manufactured home. It does not include
commercial real estate or property defined as "timber land" under RCW
84.34.020.

Sec. 2 RCW 64.06.010 and 2008 c 6 s 632 are each amended to read
as follows:
This chapter does not apply to the following transfers of
((residential)) real property:
(1) A foreclosure or deed-in-lieu of foreclosure;
(2) A gift or other transfer to a parent, spouse, domestic partner,
or child of a transferor or child of any parent, spouse, or domestic
partner of a transferor;
(3) A transfer between spouses or between domestic partners in
connection with a marital dissolution or dissolution of a state
registered domestic partnership;
(4) A transfer where a buyer had an ownership interest in the
property within two years of the date of the transfer including, but
not limited to, an ownership interest as a partner in a partnership, a
limited partner in a limited partnership, a shareholder in a
corporation, a leasehold interest, or transfers to and from a
facilitator pursuant to a tax deferred exchange;
(5) A transfer of an interest that is less than fee simple, except
that the transfer of a vendee's interest under a real estate contract
is subject to the requirements of this chapter;
(6) A transfer made by the personal representative of the estate of
the decedent or by a trustee in bankruptcy; and
(7) A transfer in which the buyer has expressly waived the receipt
of the seller disclosure statement. However, if the answer to any of
the questions in the section entitled "Environmental" would be "yes,"
the buyer may not waive the receipt of the "Environmental" section of
the seller disclosure statement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 64.06 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In a transaction for the sale of commercial real estate, the
seller shall, unless the buyer has expressly waived the right to
receive the disclosure statement under RCW 64.06.010, or unless the
transfer is otherwise exempt under RCW 64.06.010, deliver to the buyer
a completed seller disclosure statement in the following format and
that contains, at a minimum, the following information:

INSTRUCTIONS TO THE SELLER
Please complete the following form. Do not leave any spaces blank. If
the question clearly does not apply to the property write "NA." If the
answer is "yes" to any * items, please explain on attached sheets.
Please refer to the line number(s) of the question(s) when you provide
your explanation(s). For your protection you must date and sign each
page of this disclosure statement and each attachment. Delivery of the
disclosure statement must occur not later than five business days,
unless otherwise agreed, after mutual acceptance of a written contract
to purchase between a buyer and a seller.

NOTICE TO THE BUYER
THE FOLLOWING DISCLOSURES ARE MADE BY SELLER ABOUT THE CONDITION OF THE
PROPERTY LOCATED AT . . . . . . . . . . . .
("THE PROPERTY"), OR AS LEGALLY DESCRIBED ON ATTACHED EXHIBIT A.

SELLER MAKES THE FOLLOWING DISCLOSURES OF EXISTING MATERIAL FACTS OR
MATERIAL DEFECTS TO BUYER BASED ON SELLER'S ACTUAL KNOWLEDGE OF THE
PROPERTY AT THE TIME SELLER COMPLETES THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT.
UNLESS YOU AND SELLER OTHERWISE AGREE IN WRITING, YOU HAVE THREE
BUSINESS DAYS FROM THE DAY SELLER OR SELLER'S AGENT DELIVERS THIS
DISCLOSURE STATEMENT TO YOU TO RESCIND THE AGREEMENT BY DELIVERING A
SEPARATELY SIGNED WRITTEN STATEMENT OF RESCISSION TO SELLER OR SELLER'S
AGENT. IF THE SELLER DOES NOT GIVE YOU A COMPLETED DISCLOSURE
STATEMENT, THEN YOU MAY WAIVE THE RIGHT TO RESCIND PRIOR TO OR AFTER
THE TIME YOU ENTER INTO A SALE AGREEMENT.

THE FOLLOWING ARE DISCLOSURES MADE BY SELLER AND ARE NOT THE
REPRESENTATIONS OF ANY REAL ESTATE LICENSEE OR OTHER PARTY. THIS
INFORMATION IS FOR DISCLOSURE ONLY AND IS NOT INTENDED TO BE A PART OF
ANY WRITTEN AGREEMENT BETWEEN BUYER AND SELLER.

FOR A MORE COMPREHENSIVE EXAMINATION OF THE SPECIFIC CONDITION OF THIS
PROPERTY YOU ARE ADVISED TO OBTAIN AND PAY FOR THE SERVICES OF
QUALIFIED EXPERTS TO INSPECT THE PROPERTY, WHICH MAY INCLUDE, WITHOUT
LIMITATION, ARCHITECTS, ENGINEERS, LAND SURVEYORS, PLUMBERS,
ELECTRICIANS, ROOFERS, BUILDING INSPECTORS, ON-SITE WASTEWATER
TREATMENT INSPECTORS, OR STRUCTURAL PEST INSPECTORS. THE PROSPECTIVE
BUYER AND SELLER MAY WISH TO OBTAIN PROFESSIONAL ADVICE OR INSPECTIONS
OF THE PROPERTY OR TO PROVIDE APPROPRIATE PROVISIONS IN A CONTRACT
BETWEEN THEM WITH RESPECT TO ANY ADVICE, INSPECTION, DEFECTS OR
WARRANTIES.

Seller . . . . is/ . . . . is not occupying the property.

I. SELLER'S DISCLOSURES:

*If you answer "Yes" to a question with an asterisk (*), please explain your answer
and attach documents, if available and not otherwise publicly recorded. If
necessary, use an attached sheet.

1. TITLE AND LEGAL

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know A. Do you have legal authority to sell
the property? If no, please explain.

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *B. Is title to the property subject to
any of the following?

(1) First right of refusal

(2) Option

(3) Lease or rental agreement

(4) Life estate?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. Are there any encroachments,
boundary agreements, or boundary
disputes?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *D. Is there any leased parking?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *E. Is there a private road or easement
agreement for access to the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *F. Are there any rights-of-way,
easements, shared use agreements, or
access limitations?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *G. Are there any written agreements
for joint maintenance of an easement or
right-of-way?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *H. Are there any zoning violations or
nonconforming uses?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *I. Is there a survey for the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *J. Are there any legal actions pending
or threatened that affect the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *K. Is the property in compliance with
the Americans with Disabilities Act?

2. WATER

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *Are there any water rights for the
property, such as a water right permit,
certificate, or claim?

3. SEWER/ON-SITE SEWAGE
SYSTEM

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *Is the property subject to any sewage
system fees or charges in addition to
those covered in your regularly billed
sewer or on-site sewage system
maintenance service?

4. STRUCTURAL

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *A. Has the roof leaked within the last
five years?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *B. Has any occupied subsurface
flooded or leaked within the last five
years?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. Have there been any conversions,
additions, or remodeling?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(1) If yes, were all building
permits obtained?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(2) If yes, were all final
inspections obtained?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *D. Has there been any settling,
slippage, or sliding of the property or its
improvements?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *E. Are there any defects with the
following: (If yes, please check
applicable items and explain.)

□ Foundations
□ Slab Floors

□ Doors □ Outbuildings

□ Ceilings □ Exterior Walls

□ Sidewalks □ Siding

□ Other

□ Interior Walls

□ Windows

5. SYSTEMS AND FIXTURES

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know * Are there any defects in the following
systems? If yes, please explain.

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (1) Electrical system

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (2) Plumbing system

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (3) Heating and cooling systems

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (4) Fire and security system

6. ENVIRONMENTAL

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *A. Have there been any flooding,
standing water, or drainage problems on
the property that affect the property or
access to the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *B. Is there any material damage to the
property from fire, wind, floods, beach
movements, earthquake, expansive
soils, or landslides?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. Are there any shorelines, wetlands,
floodplains, or critical areas on the
property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *D. Are there any substances,
materials, or products in or on the
property that may be environmental
concerns, such as asbestos,
formaldehyde, radon gas, lead-based
paint, fuel or chemical storage tanks, or
contaminated soil or water?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *E. Is there any soil or groundwater
contamination?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *F. Has the property been used as a
legal or illegal dumping site?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *G. Has the property been used as an
illegal drug manufacturing site?

7. FULL DISCLOSURE BY
SELLERS

A. Other conditions or defects:

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *Are there any other existing material
defects affecting the property that a
prospective buyer should know about?

B. Verification:

The foregoing answers and attached
explanations (if any) are complete and
correct to the best of my/our knowledge
and I/we have received a copy hereof.
I/we authorize all of my/our real estate
licensees, if any, to deliver a copy of
this disclosure statement to other real
estate licensees and all prospective
buyers of the property.

DATE . . . . . . . . . . . .
SELLER . . . . . . . . . . . .
SELLER . . . . . . . . . . . .

NOTICE TO BUYER

INFORMATION REGARDING REGISTERED SEX OFFENDERS MAY BE
OBTAINED FROM LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES. THIS NOTICE
IS INTENDED ONLY TO INFORM YOU OF WHERE TO OBTAIN THIS
INFORMATION AND IS NOT AN INDICATION OF THE PRESENCE OF
REGISTERED SEX OFFENDERS.

II. BUYER'S ACKNOWLEDGMENT

A. Buyer hereby acknowledges that: Buyer has a duty to pay
diligent attention to any material defects that are known to
Buyer or can be known to Buyer by utilizing diligent
attention and observation.

B. The disclosures set forth in this statement and in any
amendments to this statement are made only by the Seller
and not by any real estate licensee or other party.

C. Buyer acknowledges that, pursuant to RCW 64.06.050(2),
real estate licensees are not liable for inaccurate information
provided by Seller, except to the extent that real estate
licensees know of such inaccurate information.

D. This information is for disclosure only and is not intended to
be a part of the written agreement between the Buyer and
Seller.

E. Buyer (which term includes all persons signing the "Buyer's
acceptance" portion of this disclosure statement below) has
received a copy of this Disclosure Statement (including
attachments, if any) bearing Seller's signature.

DISCLOSURES CONTAINED IN THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT ARE PROVIDED BY
SELLER BASED ON SELLER'S ACTUAL KNOWLEDGE OF THE PROPERTY AT THE TIME
SELLER COMPLETES THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT. UNLESS BUYER AND SELLER
OTHERWISE AGREE IN WRITING, BUYER SHALL HAVE THREE BUSINESS DAYS FROM
THE DAY SELLER OR SELLER'S AGENT DELIVERS THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT TO
RESCIND THE AGREEMENT BY DELIVERING A SEPARATELY SIGNED WRITTEN
STATEMENT OF RESCISSION TO SELLER OR SELLER'S AGENT. YOU MAY WAIVE THE
RIGHT TO RESCIND PRIOR TO OR AFTER THE TIME YOU ENTER INTO A SALE
AGREEMENT.
BUYER HEREBY ACKNOWLEDGES RECEIPT OF A COPY OF THIS DISCLOSURE
STATEMENT AND ACKNOWLEDGES THAT THE DISCLOSURES MADE HEREIN ARE THOSE
OF THE SELLER ONLY, AND NOT OF ANY REAL ESTATE LICENSEE OR OTHER PARTY.
DATE . . . . . . . BUYER . . . . . . . . . BUYER . . . . . . . . . . . .

(2) The seller disclosure statement shall be for disclosure only,
and shall not be considered part of any written agreement between the
buyer and seller of residential property. The seller disclosure
statement shall be only a disclosure made by the seller, and not any
real estate licensee involved in the transaction, and shall not be
construed as a warranty of any kind by the seller or any real estate
licensee involved in the transaction.

Sec. 4 RCW 64.06.022 and 2006 c 77 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A seller of residential real property shall make available to the
buyer the following statement: "This notice is to inform you that the
real property you are considering for purchase may lie in close
proximity to a farm. The operation of a farm involves usual and
customary agricultural practices, which are protected under RCW
7.48.305, the Washington right to farm act."

Sec. 5 RCW 64.06.040 and 2009 c 505 s 4 and 2009 c 130 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) If, after the date that a seller of ((residential)) real
property completes a real property transfer disclosure statement, the
seller learns from a source other than the buyer or others acting on
the buyer's behalf such as an inspector of additional information or an
adverse change which makes any of the disclosures made inaccurate, the
seller shall amend the real property transfer disclosure statement, and
deliver the amendment to the buyer. No amendment shall be required,
however, if the seller takes whatever corrective action is necessary so
that the accuracy of the disclosure is restored, or the adverse change
is corrected, at least three business days prior to the closing date.
Unless the corrective action is completed by the seller prior to the
closing date, the buyer shall have the right to exercise one of the
following two options: (a) Approving and accepting the amendment, or
(b) rescinding the agreement of purchase and sale of the property
within three business days after receiving the amended real property
transfer disclosure statement. Acceptance or recision shall be subject
to the same procedures described in RCW 64.06.030. If the closing date
provided in the purchase and sale agreement is scheduled to occur
within the three-business-day rescission period provided for in this
section, the closing date shall be extended until the expiration of the
three-business-day rescission period. The buyer shall have no right of
rescission if the seller takes whatever action is necessary so that the
accuracy of the disclosure is restored at least three business days
prior to the closing date.
(2) In the event any act, occurrence, or agreement arising or
becoming known after the closing of a ((residential)) real property
transfer causes a real property transfer disclosure statement to be
inaccurate in any way, the seller of such property shall have no
obligation to amend the disclosure statement, and the buyer shall not
have the right to rescind the transaction under this chapter.
(3) If the seller in a ((residential)) real property transfer fails
or refuses to provide to the prospective buyer a real property transfer
disclosure statement as required under this chapter, the prospective
buyer's right of rescission under this section shall apply until the
earlier of three business days after receipt of the real property
transfer disclosure statement or the date the transfer has closed,
unless the buyer has otherwise waived the right of rescission in
writing. Closing is deemed to occur when the buyer has paid the
purchase price, or down payment, and the conveyance document, including
a deed or real estate contract, from the seller has been delivered and
recorded. After closing, the seller's obligation to deliver the real
property transfer disclosure statement and the buyer's rights and
remedies under this chapter shall terminate.
(4) Failure of a homeowners' association or its officers,
directors, employees, or authorized agents to provide requested
information in part 8 of the disclosure statement form in RCW 64.06.015
or part 6 of the disclosure statement form in RCW 64.06.020 does not
constitute a seller's failure or refusal to provide a real property
transfer disclosure statement under subsection (3) of this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 64.06.050 and 1996 c 301 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The seller ((of residential real property)) shall not be liable
for any error, inaccuracy, or omission in the real property transfer
disclosure statement if the seller had no actual knowledge of the
error, inaccuracy, or omission. Unless the seller ((of residential
real property)) has actual knowledge of an error, inaccuracy, or
omission in a real property transfer disclosure statement, the seller
shall not be liable for such error, inaccuracy, or omission if the
disclosure was based on information provided by public agencies, or by
other persons providing information within the scope of their
professional license or expertise, including, but not limited to, a
report or opinion delivered by a land surveyor, title company, title
insurance company, structural inspector, pest inspector, licensed
engineer, or contractor.
(2) Any ((licensed)) real estate ((salesperson or broker)) licensee
involved in a ((residential)) real property transaction is not liable
for any error, inaccuracy, or omission in the real property transfer
disclosure statement if the licensee had no actual knowledge of the
error, inaccuracy, or omission. Unless the ((salesperson or broker))
licensee has actual knowledge of an error, inaccuracy, or omission in
a real property transfer disclosure statement, the ((salesperson or
broker)) licensee shall not be liable for such error, inaccuracy, or
omission if the disclosure was based on information provided by public
agencies, or by other persons providing information within the scope of
their professional license or expertise, including, but not limited to,
a report or opinion delivered by a land surveyor, title company, title
insurance company, structural inspector, pest inspector, licensed
engineer, or contractor.

Sec. 7 RCW 64.06.070 and 1996 c 301 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 64.06.050, nothing in this chapter shall
extinguish or impair any rights or remedies of a buyer of real estate
against the seller or against any agent acting for the seller otherwise
existing pursuant to common law, statute, or contract; nor shall
anything in this chapter create any new right or remedy for a buyer of
((residential)) real property other than the right of recision
exercised on the basis and within the time limits provided in this
chapter.

--- END ---