BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.14.475 and 2009 c 267 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A sponsoring local government, and any cosponsoring local
government, that has been approved by the board to use local
infrastructure financing may impose a sales and use tax in accordance
with the terms of this chapter and subject to the criteria set forth in
this section. Except as provided in this section, the tax is in
addition to other taxes authorized by law and ((shall be)) is collected
from those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08
and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the
taxing jurisdiction of the sponsoring local government or cosponsoring
local government.
(2) The tax authorized under subsection (1) of this section ((shall
be)) is credited against the state taxes imposed under RCW 82.08.020(1)
and 82.12.020 at the rate provided in RCW 82.08.020(1). The department
((shall)) must perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the
sponsoring local government or cosponsoring local government at no cost
to the sponsoring local government or cosponsoring local government and
((shall)) must remit the taxes as provided in RCW 82.14.060.
(3) The aggregate rate of tax imposed by the sponsoring local
government, and any cosponsoring local government, must not exceed the
lesser of:
(a) The rate provided in RCW 82.08.020(1) less:
(i) The aggregate rates of all other local sales and use taxes
imposed by any taxing authority on the same taxable events;
(ii) The aggregate rates of all taxes under RCW 82.14.465 and this
section that are authorized to be imposed on the same taxable events
but have not yet been imposed by a sponsoring local government or
cosponsoring local government that has been approved by the department
or the community economic revitalization board to receive a state
contribution under chapter((s [chapter])) 39.100 or 39.102 RCW; and
(iii) The percentage amount of distributions required under RCW
82.08.020(5) multiplied by the rate of state taxes imposed under RCW
82.08.020(1); and
(b) The rate, as determined by the sponsoring local government, and
any cosponsoring local government, in consultation with the department,
reasonably necessary to receive the state contribution over ten months.
(4) Sponsoring local governments that have been approved before
October 1, 2008, by the community economic revitalization board for a
state contribution must select the rate of tax under this section no
later than September 1, 2009.
(5) The department, upon request, must assist a sponsoring local
government and cosponsoring local government in establishing their tax
rate in accordance with subsection (3) of this section. Once the rate
of tax is selected, it may not be increased.
(6)(a) No tax may be imposed under the authority of this section:
(i) Before July 1, 2008; and
(ii) Before July 1st of the second calendar year following the year
approval by the board under RCW 39.102.040 was made((; and
(iii) Before)).
(b) Until the first calendar year in which the state excise tax
allocation revenues and state property tax allocation revenues ((for
the preceding calendar year)) equal or exceed the amount of project
award approved by the board under RCW 39.102.040, the state
contribution for any fiscal year may not exceed the greater of:
(i) The estimated increase in the amount of state excise tax
allocation revenues and state property tax allocation revenues for the
then-current fiscal year as compared to the amount of such revenues
received in the fiscal year preceding the year in which the tax was
first imposed under this section; or
(ii) The amount of the state contribution in the immediately
preceding fiscal year.
(b) The tax imposed under this section ((shall)) expires when all
indebtedness issued under the authority of RCW 39.102.150 is retired
and all other contractual obligations relating to the financing of
public improvements under chapter 39.102 RCW are satisfied, but not
more than twenty-five years after the tax is first imposed.
(7) An ordinance adopted by the legislative authority of a
sponsoring local government or cosponsoring local government imposing
a tax under this section ((shall)) must provide that:
(a) The tax ((shall)) is first ((be)) imposed on the first day of
a fiscal year;
(b) The cumulative amount of tax received by the sponsoring local
government, and any cosponsoring local government, in any fiscal year
((shall)) may not exceed the amount of the state contribution;
(c) The tax ((shall)) will cease to be distributed for the
remainder of any fiscal year in which either:
(i) The amount of tax received by the sponsoring local government,
and any cosponsoring local government, equals the amount of the state
contribution, as limited by subsection (6)(b) of this section;
(ii) The amount of revenue from taxes imposed under this section by
all sponsoring and cosponsoring local governments equals the annual
state contribution limit; or
(iii) The amount of tax received by the sponsoring local government
equals the amount of project award granted in the approval notice
described in RCW 39.102.040;
(d) Neither the local excise tax allocation revenues nor the local
property tax allocation revenues may constitute more than eighty
percent of the total local funds as described in RCW 39.102.020(28)(b).
This requirement applies beginning January 1st of the fifth calendar
year after the calendar year in which the sponsoring local government
begins allocating local excise tax allocation revenues under RCW
39.102.110;
(e) The tax ((shall)) must be distributed again, should it cease to
be distributed for any of the reasons provided in (c) of this
subsection, at the beginning of the next fiscal year, subject to the
restrictions in this section; and
(f) Any revenue generated by the tax in excess of the amounts
specified in (c) of this subsection ((shall)) belongs to the state of
Washington.
(8) If a county and city cosponsor a revenue development area, the
combined amount of distributions received by both the city and county
may not exceed the state contribution.
(9) The department ((shall)) must determine the amount of tax
receipts distributed to each sponsoring local government, and any
cosponsoring local government, imposing sales and use tax under this
section and shall advise a sponsoring or cosponsoring local government
when tax distributions for the fiscal year equal the amount of state
contribution for that fiscal year as provided in subsection (11) of
this section. Determinations by the department of the amount of tax
distributions attributable to each sponsoring or cosponsoring local
government are final and ((shall)) may not be used to challenge the
validity of any tax imposed under this section. The department
((shall)) must remit any tax receipts in excess of the amounts
specified in subsection (7)(c) of this section to the state treasurer
who ((shall)) must deposit the money in the general fund.
(10) If a sponsoring or cosponsoring local government fails to
comply with RCW 39.102.140, no tax may be distributed in the subsequent
fiscal year until such time as the sponsoring or cosponsoring local
government complies and the department calculates the state
contribution amount for such fiscal year.
(11) Each year, the amount of taxes approved by the department for
distribution to a sponsoring or cosponsoring local government in the
next fiscal year ((shall)) must be equal to the state contribution, as
limited by subsection (6)(b) of this section, and ((shall)) may be no
more than the total local funds as described in RCW 39.102.020(28)(b).
The department ((shall)) must consider information from reports
described in RCW 39.102.140 when determining the amount of state
contributions for each fiscal year, which reports and estimates may
include such adjustments as may be necessary to separately analyze the
effects of the public improvements financed using local infrastructure
financing from the broader negative effects of general economic
conditions. A sponsoring or cosponsoring local government ((shall))
may not receive, in any fiscal year, more revenues from taxes imposed
under the authority of this section than the amount approved annually
by the department. The department ((shall)) may not approve the
receipt of more distributions of sales and use tax under this section
to a sponsoring or cosponsoring local government than is authorized
under subsection (7) of this section.
(12) The amount of tax distributions received from taxes imposed
under the authority of this section by all sponsoring and cosponsoring
local governments is limited annually to not more than seven million
five hundred thousand dollars.
(13) ((The definitions in RCW 39.102.020 apply to this section
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(14))) If a sponsoring local government is a federally recognized
Indian tribe, the distribution of the sales and use tax authorized
under this section ((shall)) must be authorized through an interlocal
agreement pursuant to chapter 39.34 RCW.
(((15))) (14) Subject to RCW 39.102.195, the tax imposed under the
authority of this section may be applied either to provide for the
payment of debt service on bonds issued under RCW 39.102.150 by the
sponsoring local government or to pay public improvement costs on a
pay-as-you-go basis, or both.
(((16))) (15) The tax imposed under the authority of this section
((shall)) must cease to be imposed if the sponsoring local government
or cosponsoring local government fails to issue indebtedness under the
authority of RCW 39.102.150, and fails to commence construction on
public improvements, by June 30th of the fifth fiscal year in which the
local tax authorized under this section is imposed.
(((17))) (16) For purposes of this section, the definitions in RCW
39.102.020 and the following definitions apply unless the context
clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Local sales and use taxes" means sales and use taxes imposed
by cities, counties, public facilities districts, and other local
governments under the authority of this chapter, chapter 67.28 or
67.40 RCW, or any other chapter, and that are credited against the
state sales and use taxes.
(b) "State sales and use taxes" means the tax imposed in RCW
82.08.020(1) and the tax imposed in RCW 82.12.020 at the rate provided
in RCW 82.08.020(1).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act expires June 30, 2039.

--- END ---