BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature respects our state
Constitution and supports the people's right to initiative and
referendum. Voters' right to have their valid signature count, right
to peacefully petition their government for change, and right to
participate must be facilitated and protected by their elected
representatives and the laws of the state of Washington.
It is the intent of the legislature to require that valid voter
signatures on initiative and referendum petitions be counted by the
secretary of state. To disenfranchise a valid voter signature solely
because of a signature gatherer's conduct is inconsistent with our
state Constitution, as expounded by the Washington supreme court in
Sudduth v. Chapman, 88 Wn.2d 274, 558 P.2d 806 (1977). If the voter's
signature on a petition matches the signature on the voter's
registration, then the valid voter's signature must be counted.
It is also the intent of the legislature to fully inform citizens
about the laws relating to petition signing, petition signature
gathering, and unlawful interference with or harassment of anyone
signing a petition or gathering signatures for a petition.
The legislature also intends to ensure the safety of citizens who
gather signatures for initiatives and referenda. In Washington
Initiatives Now v. Rippie, 213 F.3d 1132 (9th Cir. 2000), the ninth
circuit court of appeals struck down a Washington state law requiring
the disclosure of the names and addresses of signature gatherers. The
court concluded: "There can be no doubt that the compelled disclosure
of this information chills political speech." Compelling testimony by
citizens shows that passions and emotions run high before, during, and
after signature drives for initiatives and referenda. Protection of
peaceful citizen participation is essential for a functioning process.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.72.170 and 2003 c 111 s 1818 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of state may refuse to file any initiative or
referendum petition being submitted upon any of the following grounds:
(1) That the petition does not contain the information required by
RCW 29A.72.110, 29A.72.120, or 29A.72.130.
(2) That the petition clearly bears insufficient signatures.
(3) That the time within which the petition may be filed has
expired.
In case of such refusal, the secretary of state shall endorse on
the petition the word "submitted" and the date, and retain the petition
pending appeal.
If none of the grounds for refusal exists, the secretary of state
must accept and file the petition.
For individual voter signatures on an initiative or referendum
petition, the secretary of state must accept and may not reject a valid
voter signature if it matches the signature on the voter's registration
as long as the requirements in subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this
section are fulfilled.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.72.140 and 2003 c 111 s 1815 are each amended to
read as follows:
The word "warning" and the following warning statement regarding
signing petitions and gathering signatures for petitions must appear on
petitions as prescribed by this title and must be printed on each
petition sheet such that they occupy not less than ((four)) six square
inches of the front of the petition sheet.

WARNING

Every person who signs this petition with any other than his or her
true name, knowingly signs more than one of these petitions, signs this
petition when he or she is not a legal voter, or makes any false
statement on this petition may be punished by fine or imprisonment or
both. Every person who gathers signatures for this petition is warned
that, under chapter 29A.84 RCW, forgery of signatures on this petition
constitutes a class C felony, and that offering any consideration or
gratuity to any person to induce them to sign a petition is a gross
misdemeanor, such violations being punishable by fine or imprisonment
or both. Every person who interferes with the signature gathering
process is warned that, under RCW 9A.46.020, any conduct constituting
harassment against a petition signature gatherer is a gross
misdemeanor, such violations being punishable by fine or imprisonment
or both. This penalty does not preclude the victim from seeking any
other remedy otherwise available under law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 29A.72 RCW
to read as follows:
Initiative and referendum petitions shall not require the signature
gatherer to put their name, address, city, state, and zip code on the
petition to ensure the safety of those individuals and to protect them
from, and make them less susceptible to, intimidation, retaliation, or
harassment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act shall be known and cited as the
valid voter signature protection act.

--- END ---