BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.40.030 and 2007 c 301 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
All property shall be valued at one hundred percent of its true and
fair value in money and assessed on the same basis unless specifically
provided otherwise by law.
Taxable leasehold estates shall be valued at such price as they
would bring at a fair, voluntary sale for cash without any deductions
for any indebtedness owed including rentals to be paid.
The true and fair value of real property for taxation purposes
(including property upon which there is a coal or other mine, or stone
or other quarry) shall be based upon the following criteria:
(1) Any sales of the property being appraised or similar properties
with respect to sales made within the past five years. The appraisal
shall be consistent with the comprehensive land use plan, development
regulations under chapter 36.70A RCW, zoning, and any other
governmental policies or practices in effect at the time of appraisal
that affect the use of property, as well as physical and environmental
influences. An assessment may not be determined by a method that
assumes a land usage or highest and best use not permitted, for that
property being appraised, under existing zoning or land use planning
ordinances or statutes or other government restrictions. The appraisal
shall also take into account: (a) In the use of sales by real estate
contract as similar sales, the extent, if any, to which the stated
selling price has been increased by reason of the down payment,
interest rate, or other financing terms; and (b) the extent to which
the sale of a similar property actually represents the general
effective market demand for property of such type, in the geographical
area in which such property is located. Sales involving deed releases
or similar seller-developer financing arrangements shall not be used as
sales of similar property.
(2) In addition to sales as defined in subsection (1) of this
section, consideration may be given to cost, cost less depreciation,
reconstruction cost less depreciation, or capitalization of income that
would be derived from prudent use of the property, as limited by law or
ordinance. Consideration should be given to any agreement, between an
owner of rental housing and any government agency, that restricts
rental income, appreciation, and liquidity; and to the impact of
government restrictions on operating expenses and on ownership rights
in general of such housing. In the case of property of a complex
nature, or being used under terms of a franchise from a public agency,
or operating as a public utility, or property not having a record of
sale within five years and not having a significant number of sales of
similar property in the general area, the provisions of this subsection
shall be the dominant factors in valuation. When provisions of this
subsection are relied upon for establishing values the property owner
shall be advised upon request of the factors used in arriving at such
value.
(3) In valuing any tract or parcel of real property, the true and
fair value of the land, exclusive of structures thereon shall be
determined; also the true and fair value of structures thereon, but the
valuation shall not exceed the true and fair value of the total
property as it exists. In valuing agricultural land, growing crops
shall be excluded.
(4)(a) When residential real property is valued, the assessor must
value the property at its current true and fair value using appropriate
statistical data. In gathering appropriate statistical data and
determining residential real property market trends, the assessor must
consider current sales data.
(b) To the extent feasible, and in accordance with generally
accepted appraisal practices, the assessor shall compile the
statistical data into categories of comparable properties.
Comparability is most often determined by similar use and location and
may be based upon the following use classifications:
(i) Single-family residential;
(ii) Residential with from two to four units; and
(iii) Residential with more than four unit.
(c) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) "Appropriate statistical data" means the data required to
accurately adjust real property values and includes, but is not limited
to, data reflecting costs of new construction, residential real
property market trends, and short sales.
(ii) "Current sales data" means sales of residential real property
that occurred within the past five years of the date of appraisal and
may include sales that occur in the assessment year.
(iii) "Short sales" means a sales transaction where residential
real property is sold for less than the balance owed and less than the
property's assessed value.

--- END ---