BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.72.230 and 2003 c 111 s 1823 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon the filing of an initiative or referendum petition, the
secretary of state shall proceed to verify and canvass the names of the
legal voters on the petition. The verification and canvass of
signatures on the petition may be observed by persons representing the
advocates and opponents of the proposed measure so long as they make no
record of the names, addresses, or other information on the petitions
or related records during the verification process except upon the
order of the superior court of Thurston county. The secretary of state
may limit the number of observers to not less than two on each side, if
in his or her opinion, a greater number would cause undue delay or
disruption of the verification process. Any such limitation shall
apply equally to both sides. The secretary of state may use any
statistical sampling techniques for this verification and canvass which
have been adopted by rule as provided by chapter 34.05 RCW. No
petition will be rejected on the basis of any statistical method
employed, and no petition will be accepted on the basis of any
statistical method employed if such method indicates that the petition
contains fewer than the requisite number of signatures of legal voters.
If the secretary of state finds the same name signed to more than one
petition, he or she shall reject all but the first such valid
signature. For an initiative to the legislature, the secretary of
state shall transmit a certified copy of the proposed measure to the
legislature at the opening of its session and, as soon as the
signatures on the petition have been verified and canvassed, the
secretary of state shall send to the legislature a certificate of the
facts relating to the filing, verification, and canvass of the
petition.
The names, addresses, and signatures of persons who signed the
petition are public records under chapter 42.56 RCW and may be made
available for public inspection and copying.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.72.140 and 2003 c 111 s 1815 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The word "warning" and the following warning statement
regarding signing petitions must appear on petitions as prescribed by
this title and must be printed on each petition sheet such that they
occupy not less than four square inches of the front of the petition
sheet.

WARNING

Every person who signs this petition with any other than his or her
true name, knowingly signs more than one of these petitions, signs this
petition when he or she is not a legal voter, or makes any false
statement on this petition may be punished by fine or imprisonment or
both.
(2) The following statement must appear on petitions as prescribed
by this title and must be printed on each petition sheet.
Signature petitions are public documents. By signing this
document, your name, address, and signature may be released as part of
a public records request.

--- END ---