BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A growing body of research suggests that
students increase their abilities to learn and live productive lives
through the maintenance of proper diets and optimum levels of physical
exercise. It is the intent of the legislature to assist schools with
the implementation of school health and fitness-related policies. To
this end, a coordinated school health public-private partnership is
established to assist school districts in implementing the policies
created under RCW 28A.210.360 concerning model school district policies
on access to nutritious foods and developmentally appropriate exercise
and RCW 28A.210.365 concerning school district standards for food
choice, physical activity, and childhood fitness.
(2) The partnership shall be composed of the following members:
(a) Four members of the legislature, with one member from each
major caucus of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker
of the house of representatives, and one member from each major caucus
of the senate, appointed by the president of the senate;
(b) Four representatives from the private for-profit and four
representatives from the private nonprofit-related health, nutrition,
and fitness services sectors, appointed by the governor;
(c) Four teachers, appointed by the superintendent of public
instruction, with one teacher from each of the following education
sectors: Elementary, middle, secondary, and postsecondary education.
These teachers shall have experience teaching in general education,
special education, or career and technical education with a health and
fitness focus;
(d) One school district nutrition director, appointed by the
superintendent of public instruction;
(e) One school nurse, nominated by a school nurse professional
organization;
(f) One school counselor, nominated by a school counselor
professional organization;
(g) One nutrition representative, nominated by the school dietician
professional organization;
(h) Two parents and two students, appointed by the governor;
(i) One school district superintendent, one school board member,
one building principal, one member of the state teachers' union, and
one member of the classified staff union, each nominated by his or her
respective professional association;
(j) One representative from the department of health, appointed by
the director;
(k) Three representatives from the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, with one involved in school health, one involved in
fitness education, and one involved in school nutrition services; and
(l) A representative from the University of Washington's center for
public health nutrition.
(3) The chair of the partnership shall be selected by the members
of the partnership.
(4) The members of the partnership shall be appointed by July 1,
2010.
(5) Members of the partnership shall not be compensated for travel
or other expenses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The task of the coordinated school
health public-private partnership is to seek out innovative ways to
assist schools with the implementation of RCW 28A.210.360 and
28A.210.365. The partnership must identify the most effective programs
and proven methods for assisting schools in preparing their students
with requisite decision-making skills and foundational knowledge about
healthy lifestyle choices. Wherever possible, the partnership must
promote the use of private for-profit and nonprofit-related health and
fitness services sectors, especially those that are Washington-based.
(2) In carrying out its task, and to the extent that funds are
available, the partnership shall, within the context of a coordinated
school health approach:
(a) Assist the superintendent of public instruction in
communicating to school districts the value and utility of health and
nutrition standards;
(b) Assist district school health advisory committees with
implementation of the model policy on access to nutritious foods and
developmentally appropriate exercise;
(c) Assist school district health advisory committees to advise
school administration and school board members on policies,
environmental changes, and programs needed to support healthy food
choice and physical activity and childhood fitness; and
(d) Assist the office of the superintendent of public instruction
with development of the demonstration projects identified in section 4
of this act.
(3) Additional technical and logistical support may be provided by
the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the entities
comprising the partnership, and other participants in the coordinated
school health public-private partnership.
(4) Beginning with August 1, 2011, the office of the superintendent
of public instruction shall prepare an annual report to the legislature
that describes the activities identified in this section. If funding
is available and awarded, the report shall include an analysis of the
demonstration projects identified in section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 To the extent funds are available, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction may hire staff to
convene the partnership members, bring together stakeholders, and
garner funds to implement the goals of sections 1 through 4 of this
act, including supervision of the demonstration projects described in
section 4 of this act. Any such staff shall reside in the office of
the superintendent of public instruction for administrative purposes.
Any grant funds garnered beyond the cost of hiring staff are intended
to fund the demonstration projects and assist school districts in the
implementation of requirements and goals enumerated in RCW 28A.210.360
and 28A.210.365.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 To the extent funds are available,
identified schools may create demonstration projects, as funded by the
coordinated school health public-private partnership, in order to
implement the policies created under RCW 28A.210.360 and 28A.210.365.
Demonstration projects must be designed to assure that all students
meet standards for health and fitness education, and to measure
achievement changes in students resulting from their behavioral changes
in food choices, physical activity, and increased knowledge of the
health and nutrition standards. School districts may apply on a
competitive basis to participate as a demonstration project. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction and the partnership
shall select up to four school districts as demonstration projects,
with two districts located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains
and two districts located west of the crest of the Cascade mountains.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The coordinated school health public-private
partnership account is hereby created in the custody of the state
treasurer. The purpose of the account is to support the coordinated
school health public-private partnership, as described in sections 1
through 4 of this act. Revenues to the account may include gifts from
the private sector, federal funds, and any appropriations made by the
legislature or other sources. Grants and their administration shall be
paid from the account. Only the superintendent of public instruction
or the superintendent's designee may authorize expenditures from the
account, and only at the direction of the partnership. The account is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Nothing in this act may require action
of the superintendent of public instruction if funding is not available
in sufficient amounts to carry out the specific tasks of the
partnership.
(2) Nothing in this act may commit federal resources to be used to
meet state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act are each
added to chapter 28A.210 RCW.

--- END ---