BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The department of early learning, the
superintendent of public instruction, and thrive by five's joint early
learning recommendations to the governor, and the quality education
council's January 2010 recommendations to the legislature both
suggested that a voluntary program of early learning should be included
within the overall program of basic education. The legislature intends
to examine these recommendations and Attorney General Opinion Number 8
(2009) through the development of a working group to identify and
recommend a comprehensive plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Beginning April 1, 2010, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction, with assistance and support
from the department of early learning, shall convene a technical
working group to develop a comprehensive plan for a voluntary program
of early learning. The plan shall examine the opportunities and
barriers of at least two options:
(a) A program of early learning under the program of basic
education; and
(b) A program of early learning as an entitlement, either
statutorily or constitutionally protected.
(2) The working group shall, at a minimum, include in the plan the
following recommendations for each option:
(a) Criteria for eligible children;
(b) Program standards, including, but not limited to, direct
services to be provided, number of hours per school year, teacher
qualifications, and transportation requirements;
(c) Performance measures;
(d) Criteria for eligible providers, specifying whether or not they
may be:
(i) Approved, certified, or licensed by the department of early
learning; and
(ii) Public, private, nonsectarian, or sectarian organizations;
(e) Governance responsibilities for the superintendent of public
instruction and the department of early learning;
(f) Funding necessary to implement a voluntary program of early
learning, including, but not limited to, early learning teachers,
professional development, facilities, and technical assistance;
(g) A timeline for implementation; and
(h) The early childhood education and assistance program's role in
the new program of early learning.
(3) While developing the plan, the working group shall review early
learning programs in Washington state, including the early childhood
education and assistance program and the federal head start program, as
well as programs in other states.
(4) The working group shall be composed of:
(a) At least one representative each from the following: The
department of early learning, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, the nongovernmental private-public partnership
created in RCW 43.215.070, and the office of the attorney general;
(b) Two members of the early learning advisory council established
in RCW 43.215.090 to be appointed by the council; and
(c) Additional stakeholders with expertise in early learning to be
appointed by the early learning advisory council.
(5) The working group may convene advisory subgroups on specific
topics as necessary to assure participation and input from a broad
array of diverse stakeholders.
(6) The working group shall be monitored and overseen by the
quality education council created in RCW 28A.290.010. The working
group shall submit a progress report by July 1, 2010, and final report
with the plan by November 1, 2010, to the early learning advisory
council and the quality education council.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.215.090 and 2007 c 394 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The early learning advisory council is established to advise
the department on statewide early learning ((community needs and
progress)) issues that would build a comprehensive system of quality
early learning programs and services for Washington's children and
families by assessing needs and the availability of services, aligning
resources, developing plans for data collection and professional
development of early childhood educators, and establishing key
performance measures.
(2) The council shall work in conjunction with the department to
develop a statewide early learning plan that ((crosses systems and
sectors to promote)) guides the department in promoting alignment of
private and public sector actions, objectives, and resources, and ((to
ensure)) ensuring school readiness.
(3) The council shall include diverse, statewide representation
from public, nonprofit, and for-profit entities. Its membership shall
reflect regional, racial, and cultural diversity to adequately
represent the needs of all children and families in the state.
(4) Council members shall serve two-year terms. However, to
stagger the terms of the council, the initial appointments for twelve
of the members shall be for one year. Once the initial one-year to
two-year terms expire, all subsequent terms shall be for two years,
with the terms expiring on June 30th of the applicable year. The terms
shall be staggered in such a way that, where possible, the terms of
members representing a specific group do not expire simultaneously.
(5) The council shall consist of not more than ((twenty-five))
twenty-three members, as follows:
(a) The governor shall appoint at least one representative from
each of the following: The department, the office of financial
management, the department of social and health services, the
department of health, the higher education coordinating board, and the
state board for community and technical colleges;
(b) One representative from the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, to be appointed by the superintendent of public
instruction;
(c) The governor shall appoint ((at least)) seven leaders in early
childhood education, with at least one representative with experience
or expertise in each of the areas such as the following ((areas)):
Children with disabilities, the K-12 system, family day care providers,
and child care centers;
(d) Two members of the house of representatives, one from each
caucus, and two members of the senate, one from each caucus, to be
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and the
president of the senate, respectively;
(e) Two parents, one of whom serves on the department's parent
advisory council, to be appointed by the governor;
(f) ((Two)) One representative((s)) of the private-public
partnership created in RCW 43.215.070, to be appointed by the
partnership board;
(g) One representative designated by sovereign tribal governments;
and
(h) One representative from the Washington federation of
independent schools.
(6) The council shall be cochaired by one representative of a state
agency and one nongovernmental member, to be elected by the council for
two-year terms.
(7) The council shall appoint two members and stakeholders with
expertise in early learning to sit on the technical working group
created in section 2, chapter . . ., Laws of 2010 (section 2 of the
act).
(8) Each member of the board shall be compensated in accordance
with RCW 43.03.240 and reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in
carrying out the duties of the board in accordance with RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060.
(((8))) (9) The department shall provide staff support to the
council.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.290.010 and 2009 c 548 s 114 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The quality education council is created to recommend and
inform the ongoing implementation by the legislature of an evolving
program of basic education and the financing necessary to support such
program. The council shall develop strategic recommendations on the
program of basic education for the common schools. The council shall
take into consideration the capacity report produced under RCW
28A.300.172 and the availability of data and progress of implementing
the data systems required under RCW 28A.655.210. Any recommendations
for modifications to the program of basic education shall be based on
evidence that the programs effectively support student learning. The
council shall update the statewide strategic recommendations every four
years. The recommendations of the council are intended to:
(a) Inform future educational policy and funding decisions of the
legislature and governor;
(b) Identify measurable goals and priorities for the educational
system in Washington state for a ten-year time period, including the
goals of basic education and ongoing strategies for coordinating
statewide efforts to eliminate the achievement gap and reduce student
dropout rates; and
(c) Enable the state of Washington to continue to implement an
evolving program of basic education.
(2) The council may request updates and progress reports from the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, the state board of
education, the professional educator standards board, and the
department of early learning on the work of the agencies as well as
educational working groups established by the legislature.
(3) The chair of the council shall be selected from the
councilmembers. The council shall be composed of the following
members:
(a) Four members of the house of representatives, with two members
representing each of the major caucuses and appointed by the speaker of
the house of representatives;
(b) Four members of the senate, with two members representing each
of the major caucuses and appointed by the president of the senate; and
(c) One representative each from the office of the governor, office
of the superintendent of public instruction, state board of education,
professional educator standards board, and department of early
learning.
(4) In the 2009 fiscal year, the council shall meet as often as
necessary as determined by the chair. In subsequent years, the council
shall meet no more than four times a year.
(5)(a) The council shall submit an initial report to the governor
and the legislature by January 1, 2010, detailing its recommendations,
including recommendations for resolving issues or decisions requiring
legislative action during the 2010 legislative session, and
recommendations for any funding necessary to continue development and
implementation of chapter 548, Laws of 2009.
(b) The initial report shall, at a minimum, include:
(i) Consideration of how to establish a statewide beginning teacher
mentoring and support system;
(ii) Recommendations for a program of early learning for at-risk
children;
(iii) A recommended schedule for the concurrent phase-in of the
changes to the instructional program of basic education and the
implementation of the funding formulas and allocations to support the
new instructional program of basic education as established under
chapter 548, Laws of 2009. The phase-in schedule shall have full
implementation completed by September 1, 2018; and
(iv) A recommended schedule for phased-in implementation of the new
distribution formula for allocating state funds to school districts for
the transportation of students to and from school, with phase-in
beginning no later than September 1, 2013.
(6) The council shall submit a report to the legislature by January
1, 2011, detailing its recommendations for a comprehensive plan for a
voluntary program of early learning. Before submitting the report, the
council shall seek input from the early learning advisory council
created in RCW 43.215.090.
(7) The council shall be staffed by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction and the office of financial
management. Additional staff support shall be provided by the state
entities with representatives on the committee. Senate committee
services and the house of representatives office of program research
may provide additional staff support.
(((7))) (8) Legislative members of the council shall serve without
additional compensation but may be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 44.04.120 while attending sessions of the council
or on official business authorized by the council. Nonlegislative
members of the council may be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---