BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to continue to
refine and provide greater detail to the distribution formula for the
basic education instructional allocation, which shall be based on
minimum staffing and nonstaff costs that the legislature deems
necessary to support instruction and operations in prototypical schools
as defined by the legislature. The legislature expects that the
detailed prototype school model will bring greater transparency,
understanding, and public accountability to the funding system because
it displays funding assumptions in understandable terms centered on the
operations of school buildings.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.150.260 and 2009 c 548 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
The purpose of this section is to provide for the allocation of
state funding that the legislature deems necessary to support school
districts in offering the minimum instructional program of basic
education under RCW 28A.150.220. The allocation shall be determined as
follows:
(1) The governor shall and the superintendent of public instruction
may recommend to the legislature a formula for the distribution of a
basic education instructional allocation for each common school
district.
(2) The distribution formula under this section shall be for
allocation purposes only. Except as may be required under chapter
28A.155, 28A.165, 28A.180, or ((28A.155)) 28A.185 RCW, or federal laws
and regulations, nothing in this section requires school districts to
use basic education instructional funds to implement a particular
instructional approach or service. Nothing in this section requires
school districts to maintain a particular classroom teacher-to-student
ratio or other staff-to-student ratio or to use allocated funds to pay
for particular types or classifications of staff. Nothing in this
section entitles an individual teacher to a particular teacher planning
period.
(3)(a) To the extent the technical details of the formula have been
adopted by the legislature and except when specifically provided as a
school district allocation, the distribution formula for the basic
education instructional allocation shall be based on minimum staffing
and nonstaff costs the legislature deems necessary to support
instruction and operations in prototypical schools serving high,
middle, and elementary school students as provided in this section.
The use of prototypical schools for the distribution formula does not
constitute legislative intent that schools should be operated or
structured in a similar fashion as the prototypes. Prototypical
schools illustrate the level of resources needed to operate a school of
a particular size with particular types and grade levels of students
using commonly understood terms and inputs, such as class size, hours
of instruction, and various categories of school staff. It is the
intent that the funding allocations to school districts be adjusted
from the school prototypes based on the actual number of annual average
full-time equivalent students in each grade level at each school in the
district and not based on the grade-level configuration of the school
to the extent that data is available. The allocations shall be further
adjusted from the school prototypes with minimum allocations for small
schools and to reflect other factors identified in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(b) For the purposes of this section, prototypical schools are
defined as follows:
(i) A prototypical high school has six hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades nine through twelve;
(ii) A prototypical middle school has four hundred thirty-two
average annual full-time equivalent students in grades seven and eight;
and
(iii) A prototypical elementary school has four hundred average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through
six.
(c)(i) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school
shall be based on the number of full-time equivalent classroom teachers
needed to provide instruction over the minimum required annual
instructional hours under RCW 28A.150.220 and provide at least one
teacher planning period per school day, and based on ((an)) the
following general education average class size ((as specified in the
omnibus appropriations act.)) of full-time equivalent students per
teacher:

General education
average
class size
Grades K-3 . . . . . . . . . . . . 25.23
Grade 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00
Grades 5-6 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00
Grades 7-8 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.53
Grades 9-12, except in cases when lower average class sizes
are specified for approved career and technical education
programs and skill centers . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.74
Approved career and technical education offered at
the middle school and high school level . . . . . . . . . . . . 26.57
Skill center programs meeting the standards established
by the office of the superintendent of public instruction . . . . . . . . . . . . 22.76

(ii) According to an implementation schedule adopted by the
legislature, the omnibus appropriations act shall at a minimum specify:
(((i) Basic average class size;
(ii) Basic)) (A) A high-poverty average class size in schools where
more than fifty percent of the students are eligible for free and
reduced-price meals; and
(((iii))) (B) A specialty average class size for ((exploratory and
preparatory career and technical education,)) laboratory science,
advanced placement, and international baccalaureate courses((; and
(iv) Average class size in grades kindergarten through three)).
(d) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school
shall include allocations for the following types of staff in addition
to classroom teachers:
(((i) Principals, including assistant principals, and other
certificated building-level administrators;
(ii) Teacher librarians, performing functions including information
literacy, technology, and media to support school library media
programs;
(iii) Student health services, a function that includes school
nurses, whether certificated instructional or classified employee, and
social workers;
(iv) Guidance counselors, performing functions including parent
outreach and graduation advisor;
(v) Professional development coaches;
(vi) Teaching assistance, which includes any aspect of educational
instructional services provided by classified employees;
(vii) Office support, technology support, and other
noninstructional aides;
(viii) Custodians, warehouse, maintenance, laborer, and
professional and technical education support employees; and
(ix) Classified staff providing student and staff safety.
(4)(a)))

Elementary
School Middle
School High
School

Principals, assistant principals, and other certificated building-level
administrators, except administrators for approved career
and technical programs and skill centers . . . . . . . . . . . .

1.253

1.353

1.880

Teacher librarians, a function that includes information literacy,
technology, and media to support school library media programs . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.663
0.519
0.523

Health and social services:

School nurses . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.076 0.060 0.096

Social workers . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.042 0.006 0.015

Psychologists . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.017 0.002 0.007

Guidance counselors, a function that includes parent outreach and
graduation advising . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.493
1.116
1.909

Professional development coaches . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.00 0.00 0.00

Teaching assistance, including any aspect of educational instructional
services provided by classified employees . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.917
0.685
0.638

Office support and other noninstructional aides . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.971 2.277 3.201

Custodians . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.622 1.902 2.903

Classified staff providing student and staff safety . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.077 0.090 0.138

Parent involvement coordinators . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.000 0.000 0.000

(4)(a) For career and technical education programs approved by the
superintendent of public instruction, the minimum allocation for
administrative staff shall be allocated at 0.410 per one hundred full-time equivalent career and technical education students and for other
school-level certificated staff at 0.202 per one hundred full-time
equivalent career and technical education students, regardless of the
grade level at which the program is delivered.
(b) The average annual full-time equivalent student enrollment for
career and technical programs used for administrative, classroom
teachers, and school-level certificated staff calculations under this
subsection (4) shall be excluded from the average annual full-time
equivalent student enrollment used for the administrative, classroom
teachers, and school-level certificated staff allocations by grade
level.
(5)(a) For skill center programs meeting the standards for skill
center funding established in January 1999 by the superintendent of
public instruction, the minimum allocation for administrative staff
shall be allocated at 0.490 per one hundred full-time equivalent skill
center students and for other school-level certificated staff at 0.236
per one hundred full-time equivalent skill center students.
(b) The average annual full-time equivalent student enrollment for
skill centers used for administrative, classroom teachers, and school-
level certificated staff calculations under this subsection (5) shall
be excluded from the average annual full-time equivalent student
enrollment used for the administrative, classroom teachers, and school-level certificated staff allocations by grade level.
(6)(a) The minimum staffing allocation for each school district to
provide district-wide support services shall be allocated per one
thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-12 as follows:

Staff per 1,000
K-12 students
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.615
Facilities, maintenance, and grounds . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.776
Warehouse, laborers, and mechanics . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.325

(b) The minimum allocation for each school district to support
certificated and classified staffing of central administration shall be
5.39 percent of the staff units generated for the prototypical school
staff and district-wide support staff in subsections (3) and (4) of
this section and (a) of this subsection to provide the following
services: Supervisors/finance/personnel/communications; central office
clerical; and certificated administrators.
(7)(a) Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, the
minimum allocation for each school district shall include allocations
per annual average full-time equivalent student for the following
materials, supplies, and operating costs: ((Student technology;
utilities; curriculum, textbooks, library materials, and instructional
supplies; instructional professional development for both certificated
and classified staff; other building-level costs including maintenance,
custodial, and security; and central office administration.))

Per annual average
full-time equivalent student
in grades K-12
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . $54.43
Utilities and insurance . . . . . . . . . . . . $147.90
Curriculum and textbooks . . . . . . . . . . . . $58.44
Other supplies and library materials . . . . . . . . . . . . $124.07
Instructional professional development for certified and
classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $9.04
Facilities maintenance . . . . . . . . . . . . $73.27
Security and central office . . . . . . . . . . . . $50.76

(b) ((The annual average full-time equivalent student amounts in
(a) of this subsection shall be enhanced)) According to an
implementation schedule adopted by the legislature and in addition to
the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, the omnibus
appropriations act shall provide an amount based on the full-time
equivalent student enrollment ((in)) for each of the following: (i)
Exploratory career and technical education courses for students in
grades seven through twelve; (ii) laboratory science courses for
students in grades nine through twelve; (iii) preparatory career and
technical education courses for students in grades nine through twelve
offered in a high school; and (iv) preparatory career and technical
education courses for students in grades eleven and twelve offered
through a skill center.
(((5))) (8) In addition to the allocations provided under
subsections (3) and (((4))) (7) of this section shall be ((enhanced as
follows to provide)) an amount provided for additional allocations for
classroom teachers and maintenance, supplies, and operating costs:
(a) To provide supplemental instruction and services for
underachieving students through the learning assistance program under
RCW 28A.165.005 through 28A.165.065, allocations shall be based on the
((percent)) average percentage of students in ((each school)) grades K-12 who ((are)) were eligible for free ((and)) or reduced-price meals.
The minimum allocation for the ((learning assistance)) program shall
provide ((an extended school day and extended school year)) for each
level of prototypical school ((and a per student allocation for
maintenance, supplies, and operating costs)) resources to provide
1.5156 hours per week in extra instruction with a class size of fifteen
learning assistance program students per teacher and zero hours per
week of instruction during vacation periods.
(b) To provide supplemental instruction and services for students
whose primary language is other than English, allocations shall be
based on the head count number of students in each school who are
eligible for and enrolled in the transitional bilingual instruction
program under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080. The minimum
allocation for each level of prototypical school shall provide ((for
supplemental instruction based on percent of the school day a student
is assumed to receive supplemental instruction and a per student
allocation for maintenance, supplies, and operating costs)) resources
to provide 4.7780 hours per week in extra instruction with fifteen
transitional bilingual instruction program students per teacher and
zero hours per week of instruction during vacation periods.
(((6))) (9) The allocations provided under subsections (3) and
(((4))) (7) of this section shall be enhanced to provide additional
allocations to support programs for highly capable students under RCW
28A.185.010 through 28A.185.030, based on two and three hundred
fourteen one-thousandths percent of each school district's full-time
equivalent basic education enrollment. The minimum allocation for the
programs shall provide ((an extended school day and extended school
year for each level of prototypical school and a per student allocation
for maintenance, supplies, and operating costs)) resources to provide
2.1590 hours per week in extra instruction with fifteen highly capable
program students per teacher and zero hours per week of instruction
during vacation periods.
(((7))) (10) The allocations under subsections (3)(b), (c)(i), and
(d), (((4), and (8))) (6), and (7)(a) of this section shall be enhanced
as provided under RCW 28A.150.390 on an excess cost basis to provide
supplemental instructional resources for students with disabilities.
(((8) The distribution formula shall include allocations to school
districts to support certificated and classified staffing of central
office administration. The minimum allocation shall be calculated as
a percentage, identified in the omnibus appropriations act, of the
total allocations for staff under subsections (3) and (6) of this
section for all schools in the district.
(9))) (11)(a) For the purposes of allocations for prototypical high
schools and middle schools under subsections (3) and (((5))) (8) of
this section that are based on the percent of students in the school
who are eligible for free and reduced-price meals, the actual percent
of such students in a school shall be adjusted by a factor identified
in the omnibus appropriations act to reflect underreporting of free and
reduced-price meal eligibility among middle and high school students.
(b) Allocations or enhancements provided under subsections (3)
((and)), (4), (5), and (7) of this section for exploratory and
preparatory career and technical education courses shall be provided
only for courses approved by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction under chapter 28A.700 RCW.
(((10))) (12)(a) This formula for distribution of basic education
funds shall be reviewed biennially by the superintendent and governor.
The recommended formula shall be subject to approval, amendment or
rejection by the legislature.
(b) In the event the legislature rejects the distribution formula
recommended by the governor, without adopting a new distribution
formula, the distribution formula for the previous school year shall
remain in effect.
(c) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average
number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as
provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the first school day of each
month, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW
28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing
school district. The definition of full-time equivalent student shall
be determined by rules of the superintendent of public instruction and
shall be included as part of the superintendent's biennial budget
request. The definition shall be based on the minimum instructional
hour offerings required under RCW 28A.150.220. Any revision of the
present definition shall not take effect until approved by the house
ways and means committee and the senate ways and means committee.
(d) The office of financial management shall make a monthly review
of the superintendent's reported full-time equivalent students in the
common schools in conjunction with RCW 43.62.050.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.150.390 and 2009 c 548 s 108 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall submit to each
regular session of the legislature during an odd-numbered year a
programmed budget request for special education programs for students
with disabilities. Funding for programs operated by local school
districts shall be on an excess cost basis from appropriations provided
by the legislature for special education programs for students with
disabilities and shall take account of state funds accruing through RCW
28A.150.260 (3) (b), (c)(i), and (d), (((4), and (8) and federal
medical assistance and private funds accruing under RCW 74.09.5249
through 74.09.5253 and 74.09.5254 through 74.09.5256)) (6), and (7)(a).
(2) The excess cost allocation to school districts shall be based
on the following:
(a) A district's annual average headcount enrollment of students
ages birth through four and those five year olds not yet enrolled in
kindergarten who are eligible for and enrolled in special education,
multiplied by the district's base allocation per full-time equivalent
student, multiplied by 1.15; and
(b) A district's annual average full-time equivalent basic
education enrollment, multiplied by the district's funded enrollment
percent, multiplied by the district's base allocation per full-time
equivalent student, multiplied by 0.9309.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) "Base allocation" means the total state allocation to all
schools in the district generated by the distribution formula under RCW
28A.150.260 (3) (b), (c)(i), and (d), (((4), and (8))) (6), and (7)(a),
to be divided by the district's full-time equivalent enrollment.
(b) "Basic education enrollment" means enrollment of resident
students including nonresident students enrolled under RCW 28A.225.225
and students from nonhigh districts enrolled under RCW 28A.225.210 and
excluding students residing in another district enrolled as part of an
interdistrict cooperative program under RCW 28A.225.250.
(c) "Enrollment percent" means the district's resident special
education annual average enrollment, excluding students ages birth
through four and those five year olds not yet enrolled in kindergarten,
as a percent of the district's annual average full-time equivalent
basic education enrollment.
(d) "Funded enrollment percent" means the lesser of the district's
actual enrollment percent or twelve and seven-tenths percent.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.150.410 and 2007 c 403 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature shall establish for each school year in the
appropriations act a statewide salary allocation schedule, for
allocation purposes only, to be used to distribute funds for basic
education certificated instructional staff salaries under RCW
28A.150.260. For the purposes of this section, the staff allocations
for classroom teachers, teacher librarians, professional development
coaches, guidance counselors, and student health services staff under
RCW 28A.150.260 are considered allocations for certificated
instructional staff.
(2) Salary allocations for state-funded basic education
certificated instructional staff shall be calculated by the
superintendent of public instruction by determining the district's
average salary for certificated instructional staff, using the
statewide salary allocation schedule and related documents, conditions,
and limitations established by the omnibus appropriations act.
(3) Beginning January 1, 1992, no more than ninety college quarter-hour credits received by any employee after the baccalaureate degree
may be used to determine compensation allocations under the state
salary allocation schedule and LEAP documents referenced in the omnibus
appropriations act, or any replacement schedules and documents, unless:
(a) The employee has a master's degree; or
(b) The credits were used in generating state salary allocations
before January 1, 1992.
(4) Beginning in the 2007-08 school year, the calculation of years
of service for occupational therapists, physical therapists, speech-language pathologists, audiologists, nurses, social workers,
counselors, and psychologists regulated under Title 18 RCW may include
experience in schools and other nonschool positions as occupational
therapists, physical therapists, speech-language pathologists,
audiologists, nurses, social workers, counselors, or psychologists.
The calculation shall be that one year of service in a nonschool
position counts as one year of service for purposes of this chapter, up
to a limit of two years of nonschool service. Nonschool years of
service included in calculations under this subsection shall not be
applied to service credit totals for purposes of any retirement benefit
under chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW, or any other state retirement
system benefits.

Sec. 5 2009 c 548 s 710 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) RCW 28A.150.030 (School day) and 1971 ex.s. c 161 s 1 & 1969
ex.s. c 223 s 28A.01.010;
(2) RCW 28A.150.060 (Certificated employee) and 2005 c 497 s 212,
1990 c 33 s 102, 1977 ex.s. c 359 s 17, 1975 1st ex.s. c 288 s 21, &
1973 1st ex.s. c 105 s 1;
(3) ((RCW 28A.150.100 (Basic education certificated instructional
staff -- Definition -- Ratio to students) and 1990 c 33 s 103 & 1987 1st
ex.s. c 2 s 203;
(4))) RCW 28A.150.040 (School year -- Beginning -- End) and 1990 c 33
s 101, 1982 c 158 s 5, 1977 ex.s. c 286 s 1, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118
s 22, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.01.020;
(((5))) (4) RCW 28A.150.370 (Additional programs for which
legislative appropriations must or may be made) and 1995 c 335 s 102,
1995 c 77 s 5, 1990 c 33 s 114, 1982 1st ex.s. c 24 s 1, & 1977 ex.s.
c 359 s 7; and
(((6))) (5) RCW 28A.155.180 (Safety net funds--Application--Technical assistance--Annual survey) and 2007 c 400 s 8.

Sec. 6 2009 c 548 s 804 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
Sections 101 through 105, 107 through 110, and 701 through 710 of
this act take effect September 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act takes effect September 1, 2011.

--- END ---