BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature intends not to reduce
the overall K-12 funding level in the 2010 supplemental operating
budget, including both basic and nonbasic education allocations. The
legislature intends to allocate at least fifty percent of any new state
revenue to the implementation of the basic education program as
established in chapter 548, Laws of 2009.
(2) It is the legislature's intent to adjust the timelines for
other working groups so that their expertise and advice can be received
as soon as possible and to make technical adjustments to certain
provisions of chapter 548, Laws of 2009.
(3) The legislature intends the quality education council to:
(a) Monitor progress of the K-12 data governance group and to
develop and recommend a process for how to adequately fund and use
research-based, empirical data analysis to analyze and drive evidence-based practices through the education research and data center and data
governance group; and
(b) Evaluate the effectiveness of the beginning educator support
team pilot program and, if the program proves effective, to recommend
the phase-in of funding beginning in the 2011-12 school year.
(4) Finally, the legislature intends for the funding formula
technical working group to develop the details of a new component to
the prototype school funding formulas. The new component shall provide
funding for school districts designated as requiring action by the
state board of education to support transformation efforts in
persistently low-performing schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The education stabilization account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation
and solely for the purpose of implementing the basic education program
as established in chapter 548, Laws of 2009. All receipts from
subsection (3) of this section shall be deposited into the account.
(2) The appropriations in the 2009-11 supplemental appropriations
act, made for K-12 basic and nonbasic allocations for school years
2009-10 and 2010-11 shall be made in accordance with the statutory and
budget policies in effect as of June 1, 2009, and those allocations
shall not be reduced.
(3) In addition to the amount transferred to the education
stabilization account under subsection (2) of this section, by
September 30, 2011, and by September 30th of each odd-numbered year
thereafter, at least fifty percent of all general state revenues that
exceed the state revenues from the previous fiscal biennium shall be
transferred to the account to be used solely for the purpose of
implementing the basic education program established in chapter 548,
Laws of 2009.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "general state revenues"
shall be as defined by Article VIII, section 1 of the state
Constitution.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.150.390 and 2009 c 548 s 108 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall submit to each
regular session of the legislature during an odd-numbered year a
programmed budget request for special education programs for students
with disabilities. Funding for programs operated by local school
districts shall be on an excess cost basis from appropriations provided
by the legislature for special education programs for students with
disabilities and shall take account of state funds accruing through RCW
28A.150.260 (3) (b), (c)(i), and (d), (4), and (8) ((and federal
medical assistance and private funds accruing under RCW 74.09.5249
through 74.09.5253 and 74.09.5254 through 74.09.5256)).
(2) The excess cost allocation to school districts shall be based
on the following:
(a) A district's annual average headcount enrollment of students
ages birth through four and those five year olds not yet enrolled in
kindergarten who are eligible for and enrolled in special education,
multiplied by the district's base allocation per full-time equivalent
student, multiplied by 1.15; and
(b) A district's annual average full-time equivalent basic
education enrollment, multiplied by the district's funded enrollment
percent, multiplied by the district's base allocation per full-time
equivalent student, multiplied by 0.9309.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) "Base allocation" means the total state allocation to all
schools in the district generated by the distribution formula under RCW
28A.150.260 (3) (b), (c)(i), and (d), (4), and (8), to be divided by
the district's full-time equivalent enrollment.
(b) "Basic education enrollment" means enrollment of resident
students including nonresident students enrolled under RCW 28A.225.225
and students from nonhigh districts enrolled under RCW 28A.225.210 and
excluding students residing in another district enrolled as part of an
interdistrict cooperative program under RCW 28A.225.250.
(c) "Enrollment percent" means the district's resident special
education annual average enrollment, excluding students ages birth
through four and those five year olds not yet enrolled in kindergarten,
as a percent of the district's annual average full-time equivalent
basic education enrollment.
(d) "Funded enrollment percent" means the lesser of the district's
actual enrollment percent or twelve and seven-tenths percent.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.150.315 and 2009 c 548 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2007-08 school year, funding for voluntary
all-day kindergarten programs shall be phased-in beginning with schools
with the highest poverty levels, defined as those schools with the
highest percentages of students qualifying for free and reduced-price
lunch support in the prior school year. Beginning with the 2011-12
school year, funding shall continue to be phased-in incrementally each
year until full statewide implementation of all-day kindergarten is
achieved in the 2017-18 school year. Once a school receives funding
for the all-day kindergarten program, that school shall remain eligible
for funding in subsequent school years regardless of changes in the
school's percentage of students eligible for free and reduced-price
lunches as long as other program requirements are fulfilled.
Additionally, schools receiving all-day kindergarten program support
shall agree to the following conditions:
(a) Provide at least a one thousand-hour instructional program;
(b) Provide a curriculum that offers a rich, varied set of
experiences that assist students in:
(i) Developing initial skills in the academic areas of reading,
mathematics, and writing;
(ii) Developing a variety of communication skills;
(iii) Providing experiences in science, social studies, arts,
health and physical education, and a world language other than English;
(iv) Acquiring large and small motor skills;
(v) Acquiring social and emotional skills including successful
participation in learning activities as an individual and as part of a
group; and
(vi) Learning through hands-on experiences;
(c) Establish learning environments that are developmentally
appropriate and promote creativity;
(d) Demonstrate strong connections and communication with early
learning community providers; and
(e) Participate in kindergarten program readiness activities with
early learning providers and parents.
(2) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the
superintendent of public instruction shall designate one or more school
districts to serve as resources and examples of best practices in
designing and operating a high-quality all-day kindergarten program.
Designated school districts shall serve as lighthouse programs and
provide technical assistance to other school districts in the initial
stages of implementing an all-day kindergarten program. Examples of
topics addressed by the technical assistance include strategic
planning, developing the instructional program and curriculum, working
with early learning providers to identify students and communicate with
parents, and developing kindergarten program readiness activities.

Sec. 5 2009 c 548 s 112 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) The legislature intends to continue to redefine the
instructional program of education under RCW 28A.150.220 that fulfills
the obligations and requirements of Article IX of the state
Constitution. The funding formulas under RCW 28A.150.260 to support
the instructional program shall be implemented to the extent the
technical details of the formula have been established and according to
an implementation schedule to be adopted by the legislature. The
object of the schedule is to assure that any increases in funding
allocations are timely, predictable, and occur concurrently with any
increases in program or instructional requirements. It is the intent
of the legislature that no increased programmatic or instructional
expectations be imposed upon schools or school districts without an
accompanying increase in resources as necessary to support those
increased expectations.
(2) The office of financial management, with assistance and support
from the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall
convene a technical working group to:
(a) Develop the details of the funding formulas under RCW
28A.150.260;
(b) Recommend to the legislature an implementation schedule for
phasing-in any increased program or instructional requirements
concurrently with increases in funding for adoption by the legislature;
and
(c) Examine possible sources of revenue to support increases in
funding allocations and present options to the legislature and the
quality education council created in ((section 114 of this act)) RCW
28A.290.010 for consideration.
(3) The working group shall include representatives of the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, school
district and educational service district financial managers, the
Washington association of school business officers, the Washington
education association, the Washington association of school
administrators, the association of Washington school principals, the
Washington state school directors' association, the public school
employees of Washington, and other interested stakeholders with
expertise in education finance. The working group may convene advisory
subgroups on specific topics as necessary to assure participation and
input from a broad array of diverse stakeholders.
(4) The working group shall be monitored and overseen by the
legislature and the quality education council established in ((section
114 of this act)) RCW 28A.290.010. The working group shall submit its
recommendations to the legislature by December 1, 2009.
(5) After the 2009 report to the legislature, the office of
financial management and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall periodically reconvene the working group to monitor
and provide advice on further development and implementation of the
funding formulas under RCW 28A.150.260 and provide technical assistance
to the ongoing work of the quality education council.
(6) By December 1, 2010, the working group shall recommend to the
quality education council the details of a new component to be included
in the prototypical school funding formula. The new component shall be
a struggling schools fund and shall also be known as the sos fund. The
fund shall provide state funding for school districts designated as
requiring action by the state board of education to support
transformation efforts in persistently low-performing schools.

Sec. 6 2009 c 548 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) Beginning ((July)) April 1, 2010, the office of financial
management, with assistance and support from the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, shall convene a technical working
group to develop options for a new system of supplemental school
funding through local school levies and local effort assistance.
(2) The working group shall consider the impact on overall school
district revenues of the new basic education funding system established
under this act and shall recommend a phase-in plan that ensures that no
school district suffers a decrease in funding from one school year to
the next due to implementation of the new system of supplemental
funding.
(3) The working group shall also:
(a) Examine local school district capacity to address facility
needs associated with phasing-in full-day kindergarten across the state
and reducing class size in kindergarten through third grade; and
(b) Provide the quality education council with analysis on the
potential use of local funds that may become available for redeployment
and redirection as a result of increased state funding allocations for
pupil transportation and maintenance, supplies, and operating costs.
(4) The working group shall be composed of representatives from the
department of revenue, the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee, school district and educational service district
financial managers, and representatives of the Washington association
of school business officers, the Washington education association, the
Washington association of school administrators, the association of
Washington school principals, the Washington state school directors'
association, the public school employees of Washington, and other
interested stakeholders with expertise in education finance. The
working group may convene advisory subgroups on specific topics as
necessary to assure participation and input from a broad array of
diverse stakeholders.
(((4))) (5) The local funding working group shall be monitored and
overseen by the legislature and by the quality education council
created in ((section 114 of this act)) RCW 28A.290.010. The working
group shall report to the legislature ((December 1, 2011)) November 30,
2010.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.41.398 and 2009 c 548 s 601 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that providing students with the
opportunity to access a world-class educational system depends on our
continuing ability to provide students with access to world-class
educators. The legislature also understands that continuing to attract
and retain the highest quality educators will require increased
investments. The legislature intends to enhance the current salary
allocation model and recognizes that changes to the current model
cannot be imposed without great deliberation and input from teachers,
administrators, and classified employees. Therefore, it is the intent
of the legislature to begin the process of developing an enhanced
salary allocation model that is collaboratively designed to ensure the
rationality of any conclusions regarding what constitutes adequate
compensation.
(2) Beginning ((July 1, 2011)) April 1, 2010, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, in collaboration with the office
of financial management, shall convene a technical working group to
recommend the details of an enhanced salary allocation model that
aligns state expectations for educator development and certification
with the compensation system and establishes recommendations for a
concurrent implementation schedule. In addition to any other details
the technical working group deems necessary, the technical working
group shall make recommendations on the following:
(a) How to reduce the number of tiers within the existing salary
allocation model;
(b) How to account for labor market adjustments;
(c) How to account for different geographic regions of the state
where districts may encounter difficulty recruiting and retaining
teachers;
(d) The role of and types of bonuses available;
(e) Ways to accomplish salary equalization over a set number of
years; and
(f) Initial fiscal estimates for implementing the recommendations
including a recognition that staff on the existing salary allocation
model would have the option to grandfather in permanently to the
existing schedule.
(3) As part of its work, the technical working group shall conduct
or contract for a preliminary comparative labor market analysis of
salaries and other compensation for school district employees to be
conducted and shall include the results in any reports to the
legislature. For the purposes of this subsection, "salaries and other
compensation" includes average base salaries, average total salaries,
average employee basic benefits, and retirement benefits.
(4) The analysis required under subsection (1) of this section
must:
(a) Examine salaries and other compensation for teachers, other
certificated instructional staff, principals, and other building-level
certificated administrators, and the types of classified employees for
whom salaries are allocated;
(b) Be calculated at a statewide level that identifies labor
markets in Washington through the use of data from the United States
bureau of the census and the bureau of labor statistics; and
(c) Include a comparison of salaries and other compensation to the
appropriate labor market for at least the following subgroups of
educators: Beginning teachers and types of educational staff
associates.
(5) The working group shall include representatives of the
department of personnel, the professional educator standards board, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, the Washington
education association, the Washington association of school
administrators, the association of Washington school principals, the
Washington state school directors' association, the public school
employees of Washington, and other interested stakeholders with
appropriate expertise in compensation related matters. The working
group may convene advisory subgroups on specific topics as necessary to
assure participation and input from a broad array of diverse
stakeholders.
(6) The working group shall be monitored and overseen by the
legislature and the quality education council created in RCW
28A.290.010. The working group shall make an initial report to the
legislature by ((December 1, 2012)) November 30, 2010, and shall
include in its report recommendations for whether additional further
work of the group is necessary.

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.290.010 and 2009 c 548 s 114 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The quality education council is created to recommend and
inform the ongoing implementation by the legislature of an evolving
program of basic education and the financing necessary to support such
program. The council shall develop strategic recommendations on the
program of basic education for the common schools. The council shall
take into consideration the capacity report produced under RCW
28A.300.172 and the availability of data and progress of implementing
the data systems required under RCW 28A.655.210. Any recommendations
for modifications to the program of basic education shall be based on
evidence that the programs effectively support student learning. The
council shall update the statewide strategic recommendations every four
years. The recommendations of the council are intended to:
(a) Inform future educational policy and funding decisions of the
legislature and governor;
(b) Identify measurable goals and priorities for the educational
system in Washington state for a ten-year time period, including the
goals of basic education and ongoing strategies for coordinating
statewide efforts to eliminate the achievement gap and reduce student
dropout rates; and
(c) Enable the state of Washington to continue to implement an
evolving program of basic education.
(2) The council may request updates and progress reports from the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, the state board of
education, the professional educator standards board, and the
department of early learning on the work of the agencies as well as
educational working groups established by the legislature.
(3) The chair of the council shall be selected from the
councilmembers. The council shall be composed of the following
members:
(a) Four members of the house of representatives, with two members
representing each of the major caucuses and appointed by the speaker of
the house of representatives;
(b) Four members of the senate, with two members representing each
of the major caucuses and appointed by the president of the senate; and
(c) One representative each from the office of the governor, office
of the superintendent of public instruction, state board of education,
professional educator standards board, and department of early
learning.
(4) In the 2009 fiscal year, the council shall meet as often as
necessary as determined by the chair. In subsequent years, the council
shall meet no more than four times a year.
(5)(a) The council shall submit an initial report to the governor
and the legislature by January 1, 2010, detailing its recommendations,
including recommendations for resolving issues or decisions requiring
legislative action during the 2010 legislative session, and
recommendations for any funding necessary to continue development and
implementation of chapter 548, Laws of 2009.
(b) The initial report shall, at a minimum, include:
(i) Consideration of how to establish a statewide beginning teacher
mentoring and support system;
(ii) Recommendations for a program of early learning for at-risk
children;
(iii) A recommended schedule for the concurrent phase-in of the
changes to the instructional program of basic education and the
implementation of the funding formulas and allocations to support the
new instructional program of basic education as established under
chapter 548, Laws of 2009. The phase-in schedule shall have full
implementation completed by September 1, 2018; and
(iv) A recommended schedule for phased-in implementation of the new
distribution formula for allocating state funds to school districts for
the transportation of students to and from school, with phase-in
beginning no later than September 1, 2013.
(6) By December 1, 2010, the council must:
(a) Evaluate the effectiveness of the beginning educator support
team program, and if effective recommend to the legislature to phased-in funding for the program beginning in the 2011-12 school year in an
amount sufficient to cover all first-year teachers and increased until
an amount sufficient to serve all teachers in their initial three years
of teaching;
(b) Monitor progress of the K-12 data governance group and provide
input to the group so that the final report fully addresses the data
needed for financial and program accountability;
(c) Develop and recommend to the legislature a process for how to
adequately fund and use research-based, empirical data analysis to
analyze and drive evidence-based practices through the education data
center and the data governance group.
(7) The council shall be staffed by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction and the office of financial
management. Additional staff support shall be provided by the state
entities with representatives on the committee. Senate committee
services and the house of representatives office of program research
may provide additional staff support.
(((7))) (8) Legislative members of the council shall serve without
additional compensation but may be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 44.04.120 while attending sessions of the council
or on official business authorized by the council. Nonlegislative
members of the council may be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 28A.160
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop,
implement, and provide a copy of the rules specifying the student
transportation reporting requirements to the legislature and school
districts no later than December 1, 2010.
(2) Beginning in December 2010, and continuing until December 2014,
the superintendent shall provide quarterly updates and progress reports
to the fiscal committees of the legislature on the implementation and
testing of the distribution formula.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2015.

Sec. 10 RCW 28A.150.410 and 2007 c 403 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature shall establish for each school year in the
appropriations act a statewide salary allocation schedule, for
allocation purposes only, to be used to distribute funds for basic
education certificated instructional staff salaries under RCW
28A.150.260. For the purposes of this section, the staff allocations
for classroom teachers, teacher librarians, professional development
coaches, guidance counselors, and student health services staff under
RCW 28A.150.260 are considered allocations for certificated
instructional staff.
(2) Salary allocations for state-funded basic education
certificated instructional staff shall be calculated by the
superintendent of public instruction by determining the district's
average salary for certificated instructional staff, using the
statewide salary allocation schedule and related documents, conditions,
and limitations established by the omnibus appropriations act.
(3) Beginning January 1, 1992, no more than ninety college quarter-hour credits received by any employee after the baccalaureate degree
may be used to determine compensation allocations under the state
salary allocation schedule and LEAP documents referenced in the omnibus
appropriations act, or any replacement schedules and documents, unless:
(a) The employee has a master's degree; or
(b) The credits were used in generating state salary allocations
before January 1, 1992.
(4) Beginning in the 2007-08 school year, the calculation of years
of service for occupational therapists, physical therapists, speech-language pathologists, audiologists, nurses, social workers,
counselors, and psychologists regulated under Title 18 RCW may include
experience in schools and other nonschool positions as occupational
therapists, physical therapists, speech-language pathologists,
audiologists, nurses, social workers, counselors, or psychologists.
The calculation shall be that one year of service in a nonschool
position counts as one year of service for purposes of this chapter, up
to a limit of two years of nonschool service. Nonschool years of
service included in calculations under this subsection shall not be
applied to service credit totals for purposes of any retirement benefit
under chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW, or any other state retirement
system benefits.

Sec. 11 2009 c 548 s 805 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
Sections 304 through 311 of this act take effect September 1,
((2013)) 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 2009 c 548 s 112, as amended by section 5
of this act, is codified as a section in chapter 28A.290 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 RCW 43.41.398 is recodified as a section in
chapter 28A.400 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 3, 4, and 10 of this act take
effect September 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Sections 6 and 7 of this act are necessary
for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety,
or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect immediately.

--- END ---