BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.21C.031 and 1995 c 347 s 203 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) An environmental impact statement (the detailed statement
required by RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c)) shall be prepared on proposals for
legislation and other major actions having a probable significant,
adverse environmental impact. The environmental impact statement may
be combined with the recommendation or report on the proposal or issued
as a separate document. The substantive decisions or recommendations
shall be clearly identifiable in the combined document. Actions
categorically exempt under RCW 43.21C.110(1)(a) do not require
environmental review or the preparation of an environmental impact
statement under this chapter. This subsection does not impose the
requirements of RCW 43.21C.030 or this section upon actions that are
statutorily exempt from this chapter's environmental review
requirements. Proposals, or parts of proposals, that are so closely
related as to be in effect a single course of action must be evaluated
in the same environmental document if the:
(i) Proposal, or parts of the proposal, cannot or will not proceed
unless implemented simultaneously; or
(ii) Larger proposal is necessary for justification or
implementation of parts of the proposal. In a county, city, or town
planning under RCW 36.70A.040, a planned action, as provided for in
subsection (2) of this section, does not require a threshold
determination or the preparation of an environmental impact statement
under this chapter, but is subject to environmental review and
mitigation as provided in this chapter.
(b) An environmental impact statement is required to analyze only
those probable adverse environmental impacts which are significant.
Beneficial environmental impacts may be discussed. The responsible
official shall consult with agencies and the public to identify such
impacts and limit the scope of an environmental impact statement. The
subjects listed in RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c) need not be treated as separate
sections of an environmental impact statement. Discussions of
significant short-term and long-term environmental impacts, including
cumulative impacts, significant irrevocable commitments of natural
resources, significant alternatives including mitigation measures, and
significant environmental impacts which cannot be mitigated should be
consolidated or included, as applicable, in those sections of an
environmental impact statement where the responsible official decides
they logically belong.
(2)(a) For purposes of this section, a planned action means one or
more types of project action that:
(i) Are designated planned actions by an ordinance or resolution
adopted by a county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040;
(ii) Have had the significant impacts adequately addressed in an
environmental impact statement prepared in conjunction with (A) a
comprehensive plan or subarea plan adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW, or
(B) a fully contained community, a master planned resort, a master
planned development, or a phased project;
(iii) Are subsequent or implementing projects for the proposals
listed in (a)(ii) of this subsection;
(iv) Are located within an urban growth area, as defined in RCW
36.70A.030;
(v) Are not essential public facilities, as defined in RCW
36.70A.200; and
(vi) Are consistent with a comprehensive plan adopted under chapter
36.70A RCW.
(b) A county, city, or town shall limit planned actions to certain
types of development or to specific geographical areas that are less
extensive than the jurisdictional boundaries of the county, city, or
town and may limit a planned action to a time period identified in the
environmental impact statement or the ordinance or resolution adopted
under this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When an agency initiates a proposal, that agency is the lead
agency for that proposal for purposes of compliance with the
environmental review requirements of RCW 43.21C.030 and 43.21C.031. If
two or more agencies share in the implementation of a proposal, the
agencies shall by agreement determine which agency will be the lead
agency. For the purposes of this section, a proposal by an agency does
not include proposals to license private activity.
(2) Whenever possible, the agency staff carrying out the
environmental review procedures of RCW 43.21C.030 and 43.21C.031 must
be different from the agency staff developing the proposal.

--- END ---