BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.56.110 and 2004 c 185 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Interest on judgments shall accrue as follows:
(1) Judgments founded on written contracts, providing for the
payment of interest until paid at a specified rate, shall bear interest
at the rate specified in the contracts: PROVIDED, That said interest
rate is set forth in the judgment.
(2) All judgments for unpaid child support that have accrued under
a superior court order or an order entered under the administrative
procedure act shall bear interest at the rate of twelve percent.
(3) Judgments founded on the tortious conduct of ((individuals or
other entities, whether acting in their personal or representative
capacities,)) a nonprofit or charitable organization employing fewer
than fifty people, a business employing fewer than fifty people, or a
"public agency" as defined in RCW 42.30.020 shall bear interest from
the date of entry at two percentage points above the equivalent coupon
issue yield, as published by the board of governors of the federal
reserve system, of the average bill rate for twenty-six week treasury
bills as determined at the first bill market auction conducted during
the calendar month immediately preceding the date of entry. In any
case where a court is directed on review to enter judgment on a verdict
or in any case where a judgment entered on a verdict is wholly or
partly affirmed on review, interest on the judgment or on that portion
of the judgment affirmed shall date back to and shall accrue from the
date the verdict was rendered.
(4) Except as provided under subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this
section, judgments shall bear interest from the date of entry at the
maximum rate permitted under RCW 19.52.020 on the date of entry
thereof. In any case where a court is directed on review to enter
judgment on a verdict or in any case where a judgment entered on a
verdict is wholly or partly affirmed on review, interest on the
judgment or on that portion of the judgment affirmed shall date back to
and shall accrue from the date the verdict was rendered. The method
for determining an interest rate prescribed by this subsection is also
the method for determining the "rate applicable to civil judgments" for
purposes of RCW 10.82.090.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act may be known and cited as the
appellate congestion reduction act.

--- END ---