BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.44.036 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 64 s 8 are each
amended to read as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 46.44.037, it is unlawful for any person
to operate upon the public highways of this state any combination of
vehicles consisting of more than ((two)) three vehicles. For the
purposes of this section a truck tractor-semitrailer or pole trailer
combination will be considered as two vehicles but the addition of
another axle to the tractor of a truck tractor-semitrailer or pole
trailer combination in such a way that it supports a proportional share
of the load of the semitrailer or pole trailer shall not be deemed a
separate vehicle but shall be considered a part of the truck tractor.
For the purposes of this section a converter gear used in converting a
semitrailer to a full trailer shall not be deemed a separate vehicle
but shall be considered a part of the trailer.

--- END ---