BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.144.010 and 2008 c 108 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Adjustable rate mortgage" or "ARM" means a payment option ARM
or a hybrid ARM (commonly known as a 2/28 or 3/27 loan).
(2) "Application" means the same as in Regulation X, Real Estate
Settlement Procedures, 24 C.F.R. Sec. 3500, as used in an application
for a residential mortgage loan.
(3) "Borrower" means any person who consults with or retains a
person subject to this chapter in an effort to seek information about
obtaining a residential mortgage loan, regardless of whether that
person actually obtains such a loan.
(4) "Department" means the department of financial institutions.
(5) "Director" means the director of the department of financial
institutions.
(6) "Financial institution" means commercial banks and alien banks
subject to regulation under Title 30 RCW, savings banks subject to
regulation under Title 32 RCW, savings associations subject to
regulation under Title 33 RCW, credit unions subject to regulation
under chapter 31.12 RCW, consumer loan companies subject to regulation
under chapter 31.04 RCW, and mortgage brokers and lenders subject to
regulation under chapter 19.146 RCW.
(7) "Fully indexed rate" means the index rate prevailing at the
time a residential mortgage loan is made, plus the margin that will
apply after the expiration of an introductory interest rate.
(8) "Negative amortization" means an increase in the principal
balance of a loan caused when the loan agreement allows the borrower to
make payments less than the amount needed to pay all the interest that
has accrued on the loan. The unpaid interest is added to the loan
balance and becomes part of the principal.
(9) "Person" means individuals, partnerships, associations, limited
liability companies, limited liability partnerships, trusts,
corporations, and all other legal entities.
(10) "Residential mortgage loan" means an extension of credit
secured by residential real property located in this state upon which
is constructed or intended to be constructed, a single-family dwelling
or multiple-family dwelling of four or less units. It does not include
a reverse mortgage or a borrower credit transaction that is secured by
rental property. It does not include a bridge loan. It does not
include loans to individuals making or acquiring a residential mortgage
loan solely with his or her own funds for his or her own investment.
For purposes of this subsection, a "bridge loan" is any temporary loan,
having a maturity of one year or less, for the purpose of acquisition
or construction of a dwelling intended to become the borrower's
principal dwelling.
(11) "The interagency guidance on nontraditional mortgage product
risks" means the guidance document issued in September 2006 by the
office of the comptroller of the currency, the board of governors of
the federal reserve system, the federal deposit insurance corporation,
the office of thrift supervision, and the national credit union
administration, and the guidance on nontraditional mortgage product
risks released in November 2006 by the conference of state bank
supervisors and the American association of residential mortgage
regulators.
(12) "The statement on subprime mortgage lending" means the
guidance document issued in June 2007 by the office of the comptroller
of the currency, the board of governors of the federal reserve system,
the federal deposit insurance corporation, the office of thrift
supervision, and the national credit union administration, and the
statement on subprime mortgage lending released in July 2007 by the
conference of state bank supervisors, the American association of
residential mortgage regulators, and the national association of
consumer credit administrators.
(13) "Third-party residential mortgage loan modification services"
means residential mortgage loan modification services offered or
performed by any person other than the owner or servicer of the loan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.144 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to any other requirements under federal or state
law, a residential mortgage loan modification may not be made unless a
disclosure summary of all material terms, as adopted by the department
in subsection (2) of this section, is placed on a separate sheet of
paper and has been provided by a financial institution or a person who
provides third-party residential mortgage loan modification services to
the borrower thirty days prior to the first payment of the loan
modification.
(2) The department shall adopt by rule a disclosure summary form
with a content and format containing simple, plain-language terms that
are reasonably understandable to the average person without the aid of
third-party resources and must include, but not be limited to, the
following items: The length and term of the residential mortgage loan
modification; whether the modification is on a temporary or trial
basis; and a statement that a residential mortgage loan modification
may negatively impact the homeowner's credit score.
(3) The director may require by rule other information relating to
a residential mortgage loan modification to be included in the
disclosure summary if the director determines that it is necessary to
protect consumers. The director may adopt rules creating a standard
form of disclosure summary to be used as a guide by financial
institutions and individuals offering third-party residential mortgage
loan modification services in fulfilling the requirements of this
section.

--- END ---