BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.59.020 and 1999 c 333 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the board of occupational therapy practice.
(2) "Occupational therapy" is the scientifically based use of
purposeful activity with individuals who are limited by physical injury
or illness, psychosocial dysfunction, developmental or learning
disabilities, or the aging process in order to maximize independence,
prevent disability, and maintain health. The practice encompasses
evaluation, treatment, and consultation. Specific occupational therapy
services include but are not limited to: Using specifically designed
activities and exercises to enhance neurodevelopmental, cognitive,
perceptual motor, sensory integrative, and psychomotor functioning;
administering and interpreting tests such as manual muscle and sensory
integration; teaching daily living skills; developing prevocational
skills and play and avocational capabilities; designing, fabricating,
or applying selected orthotic and prosthetic devices or selected
adaptive equipment; wound care management to include sharp debridement
as provided in section 3 of this act; and adapting environments for
((the handicapped)) persons with disabilities. These services are
provided individually, in groups, or through social systems.
(3) "Occupational therapist" means a person licensed to practice
occupational therapy under this chapter.
(4) "Occupational therapy assistant" means a person licensed to
assist in the practice of occupational therapy under the supervision or
with the regular consultation of an occupational therapist.
(5) "Occupational therapy aide" means a person who is trained to
perform specific occupational therapy techniques under professional
supervision as defined by the board but who does not perform activities
that require advanced training in the sciences or practices involved in
the profession of occupational therapy.
(6) "Occupational therapy practitioner" means a person who is
credentialed as an occupational therapist or occupational therapy
assistant.
(7) "Person" means any individual, partnership, unincorporated
organization, or corporate body, except that only an individual may be
licensed under this chapter.
(8) "Department" means the department of health.
(9) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.
(10) "Sharp debridement" means the removal of devitalized tissue
from a wound with scissors, scalpel, and tweezers without anesthesia.
"Sharp debridement" does not mean surgical debridement.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.59.160 and 2009 c 68 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
An occupational therapist licensed under this chapter may purchase,
store, and administer topical and transdermal medications such as
hydrocortisone, dexamethasone, fluocinonide, topical anesthetics,
lidocaine, magnesium sulfate, and other similar medications for the
practice of occupational therapy as prescribed by a health care
provider with prescribing authority as authorized in RCW 18.59.100.
Administration of medication must be documented in the patient's
medical record. Some medications may be applied by the use of
iontophoresis and phonophoresis. An occupational therapist may not
purchase, store, or administer controlled substances. A pharmacist who
dispenses such drugs to a licensed occupational therapist is not liable
for any adverse reactions caused by any method of use by the
occupational therapist. ((Application of a prescribed medication to a
wound as authorized in this statute does not constitute wound care
management.)) Application of a topical medication to a wound is subject
to section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.59 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) An occupational therapist licensed under this chapter may
provide wound care management in the course of occupational therapy
treatment to return patients to functional performance in their
everyday occupations under the referral and direction of a physician or
other authorized healthcare provider listed in RCW 18.59.100 in
accordance with their scope of practice. The referring provider must
evaluate the patient prior to referral to an occupational therapist for
wound care.
(b) For the purposes of this section, "wound care management" means
a part of occupational therapy treatment that facilitates healing,
prevents edema, infection, and excessive scar formation, and minimizes
wound complications. Treatment may include: Assessment of wound
healing status, patient education, selection and application of
dressings, cleansing of the wound and surrounding areas, application of
topical medications, as provided under subsection (2) of this section,
use of physical agent modalities, application of pressure garments and
nonweight-bearing orthotic devices, excluding high-temperature custom
foot orthotics made from a mold, and pressure garments, sharp
debridement of devitalized tissue, debridement of devitalized tissue
with other agents; and adapting activities of daily living to promote
independence during wound healing.
(c) For the purposes of this section, "wound care services" may
only be provided by occupational therapy assistants under the direct
supervision of occupational therapists. For the purposes of this
section, "direct supervision" means supervision of an occupational
therapy assistant by an occupational therapist that is on the premises
and is quickly and easily available, and where the patient has been
examined by the occupational therapist at such time as acceptable
occupational therapy practice requires, consistent with the delegated
health care task. Wound care services are limited to: Patient
education; application of dressings; cleansing of the wound and
surrounding areas; application of topical medications, as provided
under subsection (2) of this section; use of physical agent modalities;
application of pressure garments and nonweight bearing orthotic
devices, excluding high-temperature custom foot orthotics made from a
mold; and adapting activities of daily living to promote independence
during wound healing. Occupational therapists may not delegate sharp
debridement.
(2)(a) Debridement is not an entry-level skill and requires
specialized training, which must include: Indications and
contraindications for the use of debridement; appropriate selection and
use of clean and sterile techniques; selection of appropriate tools,
such as scissors, forceps, or scalpel; identification of viable and
devitalized tissues; and conditions which require referral back to the
referring provider. Training may be provided through entry-level or
continuing education, mentoring, cotreatment, and observation.
Consultation with the referring provider is required if the wound
exposes anatomical structures underlying the skin, such as tendon,
muscle, or bone, or if there is an obvious worsening of the condition,
or signs of infection.
(b)(i) Occupational therapists may perform wound care, including
sharp debridement, upon showing evidence of adequate education and
training by submitting an affidavit to the department attesting to
their education and training as follows:
(A) For occupational therapists performing wound care, including
the use of scissors and tweezers for the removal of loosely adherent
tissue, a minimum of fifteen hours of mentored training is required to
be documented in the affidavit. Mentored training includes
observation, cotreatment, and supervised treatment. Fifteen hours
mentored training in a clinical setting must include a case mix similar
to the occupational therapist's expected practice. In addition, the
training must include conditions which necessitate referral back to the
referring provider;
(B) For occupational therapists performing sharp debridement with
a scalpel, an additional minimum of fifteen hours of mentored sharp
debridement training, to include the use of a scalpel, is required to
be documented in the affidavit. Mentored training includes
observation, cotreatment, and supervised treatment. Fifteen hours
mentored training in a clinical setting must include a case mix similar
to the occupational therapist's expected practice. In addition, the
training must include conditions which necessitate referral back to the
referring provider.
(ii) Certification as a certified hand therapist by the hand
therapy certification commission or as a wound care specialist by the
American academy of wound management, the national alliance of wound
care, or equivalent organization approved by the board is sufficient to
meet the requirements of (b)(i) of this subsection.
(c) Therapists whose current practice meets the requirement for the
affidavit shall submit the affidavit to the department by July 1, 2011.

--- END ---