BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that Washington's workers' compensation
system is a complex system that has several unique features not
commonly found in the workers' compensation systems of other
governments. The legislature acknowledges that there have been calls
for systematic reform of Washington's workers' compensation system in
order to bring the system more in line with the systems of other
states. However, the legislature recognizes that the fundamental
purpose of the workers' compensation system is to provide sure and
certain relief for workers injured in their work and that proposals for
systematic reform need deliberate, collaborative, and thoughtful
evaluation in order to ensure changes have no adverse impact on worker
outcomes, accountability, system efficiency, or cost predictability.
The legislature therefore directs the department of labor and
industries to convene a task force to evaluate and recommend methods to
improve the coordination and provision of quality, timely medical
treatment; methods to improve outcomes for, and shorten the duration
of, long-term disability claims; and methods to refine and resolve
systemic liabilities and long-term pension trends.
The task force consists of eight members appointed by the director
upon consultation with the workers' compensation advisory committee and
the governor. Three of the members must be labor representatives, one
of which is a member of the workers' compensation advisory committee;
and three of the members must be business representatives, one of which
is a member of the workers' compensation advisory committee. One
member must be a representative of the governor, and one member must be
a representative of the department. The legislature encourages the
director to appoint individuals with practical experience or expertise
in workers compensation who are willing to maintain focus on the goals
of the task force, as described in this section, and provide
consistency and transparency to the development of recommendations.
The department shall convene the first meeting of the task force
and provide ongoing administrative support to the task force. At the
first meeting, the task force shall select a member or members to serve
as a chair or cochairs of the task force, as determined by the task
force. Subject to funding provided for in the omnibus appropriations
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, the department may
contract for an individual to serve as a facilitator for the task
force.
The task force must periodically report to the director, the
workers' compensation advisory committee, and the appropriate standing
committees of the legislature. The task force must prepare a final
report to submit to the legislature in December 2010. The final report
must include task force recommendations for changes to the workers'
compensation system that will improve positive outcomes for workers,
increase accountability and system efficiency, and improve cost
predictability.
Nonlegislative members, except those representing an employer or
organization, are entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
This section expires January 1, 2011.

--- END ---