BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that providing for
long-term stewardship of nonindustrial forests and woodlands is an
important factor in maintaining Washington's special character and
quality of life.
(2) The legislature further finds that in order to encourage and
maintain nonindustrial forests and woodlands for their present and
future benefit to all citizens, Washington's nonindustrial forest and
woodland owners' long-term commitments to stewardship of forest
resources must be recognized and supported by the citizens of the
state.
(3) The legislature further finds that the adoption of forest
practices rules consistent with the forests and fish report, as defined
in RCW 76.09.020, has imposed substantial financial burdens on small
forest landowners.
(4) The legislature further finds that forest practices rules
adopted since the forests and fish report have not provided small
forest landowners with the alternate plan processes or alternate
harvest restrictions that were intended by the legislature to lower the
overall cost of regulation to small forest landowners while meeting the
public resource protection standard set forth in RCW 76.09.370(3).
(5) The legislature further finds that in order to maintain the
economic viability of eighty-nine thousand family forest owners,
managing five million acres of forest land across the state, small
forest landowners must be provided with incentives to keep their land
in long-term forestry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The joint work group on small forest
landowner sustainability is established. Utilizing research conducted
by the school of forest resources at the University of Washington, the
joint work group shall report to the legislature, the commissioner of
public lands, and the governor on ways to remove regulatory barriers
and disincentives in order to encourage small forest landownership for
generations to come without reducing protection to public resources.
(2) The joint work group on small forest landowner sustainability
consists of the members of the house of representatives agriculture and
natural resources committee and the senate natural resources, ocean,
and recreation committee. The joint work group shall consult with
stakeholders and experts in the fields of forestry, tax policy,
transfer of development rights, fish, and ecosystem service payments.
The joint work group may also request assistance from the department of
natural resources, the department of ecology, the department of fish
and wildlife, federal experts on the state habitat conservation plan,
representatives of native American tribes, the environmental community,
and the house of representatives office of program research and senate
committee services.
(3) The joint work group will utilize existing legislative staff
and resources and utilize teleconferencing and other communications
methods to minimize travel and per diem expenditures for legislators
and staff.
(4) In developing recommendations, the joint work group shall
review and build upon reports related to small forest landowner
economic viability, including reports completed for or by the rural
technology initiative and the Northwest environmental forum.
(5) In developing recommendations, the joint work group shall
consider:
(a) The long-term sustainability of the forestry riparian easement
program defined in RCW 76.13.120 and ways to reform that program.
(b) Recommendations on how to address issues unique to small forest
lands east of the Cascade mountains, including periodic insect and
disease attacks, catastrophic wildfire, and replacement of historic
species by shade tolerant species.
(c) Whether, how, and to what extent the department of natural
resources has evaluated the cumulative impact of small forest landowner
alternate management plans or alternate harvest restrictions on
essential riparian functions as required by RCW 76.13.110.
(d) Whether, how, and to what extent the department of natural
resources and the forest practices board have developed alternate plans
or alternate harvest restrictions that meet riparian functions while
requiring less costly regulatory prescriptions for small forest
landowners, including recognition of or credit for improving the
condition of public resources.
(e) The complexity of administrative rules for small harvests and
relatively short stream reaches.
(f) Recommendations on ways the forest practices board and the
legislature could provide more effective incentives to encourage
continued management of nonindustrial forests and woodlands for
forestry.
(g) Ways to address conversion pressures, global competition, and
the gap between appraised values of forest land and the value for the
same land for development.
(h) The possibility of a pilot program for ecosystem service
payments and technical funding assistance for small forest landowners.
(6) The joint work group on small forest landowner sustainability
shall deliver its report to the legislature, the commissioner of public
lands, and the governor by September 15, 2010, including implementing
legislation as necessary.

--- END ---