BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the higher
education coordinating board has established minimum standards for
admission to a public four-year institution of higher education in
Washington. The legislature further finds that, with only minor
supplementation, all of the four-year institutions rely on these
standards when it comes to minimum requirements for admission.
Therefore, if the state's four-year colleges and universities consider
the standards adopted by the higher education coordinating board to be
sufficiently rigorous for admission, the legislature finds that
students who can meet and exceed these standards should qualify for a
high school diploma.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
As an alternative to the high school graduation requirements
established under RCW 28A.230.090 and 28A.655.061, and any additional
local graduation requirements established by school districts, any
student who meets the following requirements shall receive a high
school diploma:
(1) Successfully completes the minimum credits for admission to a
public four-year institution of higher education adopted by the higher
education coordinating board under RCW 28B.76.290, which includes
meeting the required college academic distribution requirements;
(2) Successfully complete one occupational credit as defined in WAC
180-51-060;
(3) Earns a cumulative average grade of at least a three on a four-point scale, as determined by the school district, for the courses
required under subsection (1) of this section; and
(4) Completes a culminating project and a high school and beyond
plan according to rules adopted by the state board of education.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.230.090 and 2009 c 548 s 111 and 2009 c 223 s 2
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in section 2 of this act, the state board of
education shall establish high school graduation requirements or
equivalencies for students, except those equivalencies established by
local high schools or school districts under RCW 28A.230.097. The
purpose of a high school diploma is to declare that a student is ready
for success in postsecondary education, gainful employment, and
citizenship, and is equipped with the skills to be a lifelong learner.
(a) Any course in Washington state history and government used to
fulfill high school graduation requirements shall consider including
information on the culture, history, and government of the American
Indian peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state.
(b) Except for students meeting the requirements of section 2 of
this act, the certificate of academic achievement requirements under
RCW 28A.655.061 or the certificate of individual achievement
requirements under RCW 28A.155.045 are required for graduation from a
public high school but are not the only requirements for graduation.
(c) Any decision on whether a student has met the state board's
high school graduation requirements for a high school and beyond plan
shall remain at the local level.
(2)(a) In recognition of the statutory authority of the state board
of education to establish and enforce minimum high school graduation
requirements, the state board shall periodically reevaluate the
graduation requirements and shall report such findings to the
legislature in a timely manner as determined by the state board.
(b) The state board shall reevaluate the graduation requirements
for students enrolled in vocationally intensive and rigorous career and
technical education programs, particularly those programs that lead to
a certificate or credential that is state or nationally recognized.
The purpose of the evaluation is to ensure that students enrolled in
these programs have sufficient opportunity to earn a certificate of
academic achievement, complete the program and earn the program's
certificate or credential, and complete other state and local
graduation requirements.
(c) The state board shall forward any proposed changes to the high
school graduation requirements to the education committees of the
legislature for review and to the quality education council established
under RCW 28A.290.010. The legislature shall have the opportunity to
act during a regular legislative session before the changes are adopted
through administrative rule by the state board. Changes that have a
fiscal impact on school districts, as identified by a fiscal analysis
prepared by the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
shall take effect only if formally authorized and funded by the
legislature through the omnibus appropriations act or other enacted
legislation.
(3) Pursuant to any requirement for instruction in languages other
than English established by the state board of education or a local
school district, or both, for purposes of high school graduation,
students who receive instruction in American sign language or one or
more American Indian languages shall be considered to have satisfied
the state or local school district graduation requirement for
instruction in one or more languages other than English.
(4) If requested by the student and his or her family, a student
who has completed high school courses before attending high school
shall be given high school credit which shall be applied to fulfilling
high school graduation requirements if:
(a) The course was taken with high school students, if the academic
level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth
grade classes, and the student has successfully passed by completing
the same course requirements and examinations as the high school
students enrolled in the class; or
(b) The academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for
seventh and eighth grade classes and the course would qualify for high
school credit, because the course is similar or equivalent to a course
offered at a high school in the district as determined by the school
district board of directors.
(5) Students who have taken and successfully completed high school
courses under the circumstances in subsection (4) of this section shall
not be required to take an additional competency examination or perform
any other additional assignment to receive credit.
(6) At the college or university level, five quarter or three
semester hours equals one high school credit.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.230.120 and 2008 c 185 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) School districts shall issue diplomas to students signifying
graduation from high school upon the students' satisfactory completion
of all local and state graduation requirements or upon completion of
the requirements in section 2 of this act. Districts shall grant
students the option of receiving a final transcript in addition to the
regular diploma.
(2) School districts or schools of attendance shall establish
policies and procedures to notify senior students of the transcript
option and shall direct students to indicate their decisions in a
timely manner. School districts shall make appropriate provisions to
assure that students who choose to receive a copy of their final
transcript shall receive such transcript after graduation.
(3)(a) A school district may issue a high school diploma to a
person who:
(i) Is an honorably discharged member of the armed forces of the
United States; and
(ii) Left high school before graduation to serve in World War II,
the Korean conflict, or the Vietnam era as defined in RCW 41.04.005.
(b) A school district may issue a diploma to or on behalf of a
person otherwise eligible under (a) of this subsection notwithstanding
the fact that the person holds a high school equivalency certification
or is deceased.
(c) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt a form for
a diploma application to be used by a veteran or a person acting on
behalf of a deceased veteran under this subsection (3). The
superintendent of public instruction shall specify what constitutes
acceptable evidence of eligibility for a diploma.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.655.061 and 2009 c 524 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The high school assessment system shall include but need not be
limited to the Washington assessment of student learning, opportunities
for a student to retake the content areas of the assessment in which
the student was not successful, and if approved by the legislature
pursuant to subsection (10) of this section, one or more objective
alternative assessments for a student to demonstrate achievement of
state academic standards. The objective alternative assessments for
each content area shall be comparable in rigor to the skills and
knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the Washington
assessment of student learning for each content area.
(2) Subject to the conditions in this section, a certificate of
academic achievement shall be obtained by most students at about the
age of sixteen, and is evidence that the students have successfully met
the state standard in the content areas included in the certificate.
With the exception of students satisfying the provisions of RCW
28A.155.045 ((or)), 28A.655.0611, or section 2 of this act, acquisition
of the certificate is required for graduation from a public high school
but is not the only requirement for graduation.
(3) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008, with the exception
of students satisfying the provisions of RCW 28A.155.045, a student who
meets the state standards on the reading, writing, and mathematics
content areas of the high school Washington assessment of student
learning shall earn a certificate of academic achievement. If a
student does not successfully meet the state standards in one or more
content areas required for the certificate of academic achievement,
then the student may retake the assessment in the content area up to
four times at no cost to the student. If the student successfully
meets the state standards on a retake of the assessment then the
student shall earn a certificate of academic achievement. Once
objective alternative assessments are authorized pursuant to subsection
(10) of this section, a student may use the objective alternative
assessments to demonstrate that the student successfully meets the
state standards for that content area if the student has taken the
Washington assessment of student learning at least once. If the
student successfully meets the state standards on the objective
alternative assessments then the student shall earn a certificate of
academic achievement.
(4) Beginning no later than with the graduating class of 2013, a
student must meet the state standards in science in addition to the
other content areas required under subsection (3) of this section on
the Washington assessment of student learning or the objective
alternative assessments in order to earn a certificate of academic
achievement. The state board of education may adopt a rule that
implements the requirements of this subsection (4) beginning with a
graduating class before the graduating class of 2013, if the state
board of education adopts the rule by September 1st of the freshman
school year of the graduating class to which the requirements of this
subsection (4) apply. The state board of education's authority under
this subsection (4) does not alter the requirement that any change in
performance standards for the tenth grade assessment must comply with
RCW 28A.305.130.
(5) The state board of education may not require the acquisition of
the certificate of academic achievement for students in home-based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW, for students enrolled in private
schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or for students satisfying the
provisions of RCW 28A.155.045.
(6) A student may retain and use the highest result from each
successfully completed content area of the high school assessment.
(7) School districts must make available to students the following
options:
(a) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a public school; or
(b) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a high school completion
program at a community or technical college. The superintendent of
public instruction and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall jointly identify means by which students in these
programs can be assessed.
(8) Students who achieve the standard in a content area of the high
school assessment but who wish to improve their results shall pay for
retaking the assessment, using a uniform cost determined by the
superintendent of public instruction.
(9) Opportunities to retake the assessment at least twice a year
shall be available to each school district.
(10)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall develop options for implementing objective alternative
assessments, which may include an appeals process for students' scores,
for students to demonstrate achievement of the state academic
standards. The objective alternative assessments shall be comparable
in rigor to the skills and knowledge that the student must demonstrate
on the Washington assessment of student learning and be objective in
its determination of student achievement of the state standards.
Before any objective alternative assessments in addition to those
authorized in RCW 28A.655.065 or (b) of this subsection are used by a
student to demonstrate that the student has met the state standards in
a content area required to obtain a certificate, the legislature shall
formally approve the use of any objective alternative assessments
through the omnibus appropriations act or by statute or concurrent
resolution.
(b)(i) A student's score on the mathematics, reading or English, or
writing portion of the SAT or the ACT may be used as an objective
alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating that a
student has met or exceeded the state standards for the certificate of
academic achievement. The state board of education shall identify the
scores students must achieve on the relevant portion of the SAT or ACT
to meet or exceed the state standard in the relevant content area on
the Washington assessment of student learning. The state board of
education shall identify the first scores by December 1, 2007. After
the first scores are established, the state board may increase but not
decrease the scores required for students to meet or exceed the state
standards.
(ii) Until August 31, 2008, a student's score on the mathematics
portion of the PSAT may be used as an objective alternative assessment
under this section for demonstrating that a student has met or exceeded
the state standard for the certificate of academic achievement. The
state board of education shall identify the score students must achieve
on the mathematics portion of the PSAT to meet or exceed the state
standard in that content area on the Washington assessment of student
learning.
(iii) A student who scores at least a three on the grading scale of
one to five for selected AP examinations may use the score as an
objective alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating
that a student has met or exceeded state standards for the certificate
of academic achievement. A score of three on the AP examinations in
calculus or statistics may be used as an alternative assessment for the
mathematics portion of the Washington assessment of student learning.
A score of three on the AP examinations in English language and
composition may be used as an alternative assessment for the writing
portion of the Washington assessment of student learning. A score of
three on the AP examinations in English literature and composition,
macroeconomics, microeconomics, psychology, United States history,
world history, United States government and politics, or comparative
government and politics may be used as an alternative assessment for
the reading portion of the Washington assessment of student learning.
(11) By December 15, 2004, the house of representatives and senate
education committees shall obtain information and conclusions from
recognized, independent, national assessment experts regarding the
validity and reliability of the high school Washington assessment of
student learning for making individual student high school graduation
determinations.
(12) To help assure continued progress in academic achievement as
a foundation for high school graduation and to assure that students are
on track for high school graduation, each school district shall prepare
plans for and notify students and their parents or legal guardians as
provided in this subsection (12).
(a) Student learning plans are required for eighth through twelfth
grade students who were not successful on any or all of the content
areas of the Washington assessment for student learning during the
previous school year or who may not be on track to graduate due to
credit deficiencies or absences. The parent or legal guardian shall be
notified about the information in the student learning plan, preferably
through a parent conference and at least annually. To the extent
feasible, schools serving English language learner students and their
parents shall translate the plan into the primary language of the
family. The plan shall include the following information as
applicable:
(i) The student's results on the Washington assessment of student
learning;
(ii) If the student is in the transitional bilingual program, the
score on his or her Washington language proficiency test II;
(iii) Any credit deficiencies;
(iv) The student's attendance rates over the previous two years;
(v) The student's progress toward meeting state and local
graduation requirements;
(vi) The courses, competencies, and other steps needed to be taken
by the student to meet state academic standards and stay on track for
graduation;
(vii) Remediation strategies and alternative education options
available to students, including informing students of the option to
continue to receive instructional services after grade twelve or until
the age of twenty-one;
(viii) The alternative assessment options available to students
under this section and RCW 28A.655.065;
(ix) School district programs, high school courses, and career and
technical education options available for students to meet graduation
requirements; and
(x) Available programs offered through skill centers or community
and technical colleges, including the college high school diploma
options under RCW 28B.50.535.
(b) All fifth grade students who were not successful in one or more
of the content areas of the fourth grade Washington assessment of
student learning shall have a student learning plan.
(i) The parent or guardian of the student shall be notified,
preferably through a parent conference, of the student's results on the
Washington assessment of student learning, actions the school intends
to take to improve the student's skills in any content area in which
the student was unsuccessful, and provide strategies to help them
improve their student's skills.
(ii) Progress made on the student plan shall be reported to the
student's parents or guardian at least annually and adjustments to the
plan made as necessary.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.655.0611 and 2009 c 17 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008 and through no
later than the graduating class of 2012, students may graduate from
high school without earning a certificate of academic achievement or a
certificate of individual achievement if they:
(a) Have not successfully met the mathematics standard on the high
school Washington assessment of student learning, an approved objective
alternative assessment, or an alternate assessment developed for
eligible special education students;
(b) Have successfully met the state standard in the other content
areas required for a certificate under RCW 28A.655.061 or 28A.155.045;
(c) Have met all other state and school district graduation
requirements; and
(d)(i) For the graduating class of 2008, successfully earn one high
school mathematics credit or career and technical course equivalent,
including courses offered at skill centers, after the student's
eleventh grade year intended to increase the student's mathematics
proficiency toward meeting or exceeding the mathematics standards
assessed on the high school Washington assessment of student learning;
and
(ii) For the remaining graduating classes under this section,
successfully earn two mathematics credits or career and technical
course equivalent, including courses offered at skill centers, after
the student's tenth grade year intended to increase the student's
mathematics proficiency toward meeting or exceeding the mathematics
standards assessed on the high school Washington assessment of student
learning.
(2) The state board of education may adopt a rule that ends the
application of this section with a graduating class before the
graduating class of 2012, if the state board of education adopts the
rule by September 1st of the freshman school year of the graduating
class to which the provisions of this section no longer apply. The
state board of education's authority under this section does not alter
the requirement that any change in performance standards for the tenth
grade assessment must comply with RCW 28A.305.130.
(3) This section does not apply to students who meet the
requirements of section 2 of this act.
(4) This section expires August 31, 2013.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.155.045 and 2007 c 354 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Beginning with the graduating class of 2008, students served under
this chapter, who are not appropriately assessed by the high school
Washington assessment system as defined in RCW 28A.655.061, even with
accommodations, may earn a certificate of individual achievement. The
certificate may be earned using multiple ways to demonstrate skills and
abilities commensurate with their individual education programs. The
determination of whether the high school assessment system is
appropriate shall be made by the student's individual education program
team. Except as provided in RCW 28A.655.0611 and section 2 of this
act, for these students, the certificate of individual achievement is
required for graduation from a public high school, but need not be the
only requirement for graduation. When measures other than the high
school assessment system as defined in RCW 28A.655.061 are used, the
measures shall be in agreement with the appropriate educational
opportunity provided for the student as required by this chapter. The
superintendent of public instruction shall develop the guidelines for
determining which students should not be required to participate in the
high school assessment system and which types of assessments are
appropriate to use.
When measures other than the high school assessment system as
defined in RCW 28A.655.061 are used for high school graduation
purposes, the student's high school transcript shall note whether that
student has earned a certificate of individual achievement.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to deny a student the
right to participation in the high school assessment system as defined
in RCW 28A.655.061, and, upon successfully meeting the high school
standard, receipt of the certificate of academic achievement.

--- END ---