BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) The state recognizes the importance of meeting the health and
welfare needs of persons with developmental disabilities who are
transferred between residential habilitation centers, or discharged
from a residential habilitation center to the community.
(b) People with disabilities share, with all Washingtonians, the
desire to live full, productive lives in proximity to those who care
about and love them.
(c) Due to limited resources, many people with developmental
disabilities who reside with family members or on their own do not
receive adequate supports to help maintain their lives in the
community.
(d) People with developmental disabilities in residential
habilitation centers and state-operated living arrangements benefit
from the dedicated state employees who work with and on their behalf.
(e) There is a shortage of certain key services and resources for
people with developmental disabilities in the community, and the
state's residential habilitation centers have employees whose
specialized knowledge and expertise would greatly benefit community-based programs and the people they serve.
(f) The people who dedicate their lives to serving people with
disabilities deserve positions that pay a living wage and promote
stable and secure lives for both employees and clients.
(2) The legislature intends that:
(a) A person with a developmental disability may not be moved from
an institutional to a community setting until sufficient services and
support arrangements are authorized and funded to assure the
individual's assessed health and welfare needs are met and the person
has opportunities for continued growth and development in a stable
community setting.
(b) The rights, health, and safety of all persons with
developmental disabilities be secure, and adequate support and services
to meet the needs of these individuals be provided.
(c) The network of high-quality, efficient, and cost-effective
publicly operated programs be expanded to serve residential
habilitation center clients in the community.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) By November 1, 2010, the department of
social and health services shall submit to the appropriate committees
of the legislature its implementation plan, with timelines and
estimated costs, to fulfill the requirements of this act. In
developing the plan, the department shall seek input from stakeholders,
including families of clients, advocates, and labor organizations. The
implementation plan shall determine how, within six years, the
department shall:
(a) Establish state-operated living arrangements to serve clients
transitioning from residential habilitation centers, as well as other
waiver-eligible clients;
(b) Assess the needs of each person residing in a residential
habilitation center using a state standardized assessment tool;
(c) Transition people residing in residential habilitation centers
to community settings with support tailored to meet their needs;
(d) Minimize disruption in people's lives by:
(i) Offering to place all residents of residential habilitation
centers placement on the appropriate home and community-based waiver
and provide continued access to these services that meet their assessed
needs, for so long as the resident or his or her guardian consents to
their provision;
(ii) Preparing clients and their families for the transition to the
community, including visits to community living settings;
(iii) Providing choice of community living options and providers,
consistent with federal requirements;
(iv) Restricting the ability of private and publicly operated
community living settings to reject clients; and
(v) Supporting continued family involvement;
(e) Maximize federal funding, including the roads to community
living grant;
(f) Maximize state employment for employees of residential
habilitation centers;
(g) Provide opportunities for staff-client relationships
established in the residential habilitation centers to continue in
community settings;
(h) Coordinate with the housing trust fund to obtain funding for
the development or purchase of homes for community living arrangements;
(i) Improve the efficient use of state funds and use any savings
achieved through efficiencies to extend services to people with
developmental disabilities currently receiving limited or no services.
(2) The plan must describe how the department shall, by December
31, 2011:
(a) Assess and return all children currently living at residential
habilitation centers to their families with intensive supports or
otherwise to children's intensive care in community settings;
(b) Expand capacity in the community to enable people transitioning
from residential habilitation centers to live stably in the community
or with their families;
(c) Provide quality assurance and follow-up for existing
residential habilitation center residents who will be transitioned to
the community; and
(d) Using the specialized skills and expertise in the residential
habilitation centers, develop at least two state-operated regional
resources that provide: (i) Crisis beds accepting people in crisis or
people residing in a hospital while awaiting community placement; (ii)
respite beds; and (iii) skilled nursing services. There shall be at
least one community resource team east and one west of the Cascade
mountains. Teams must be composed of staff with specialized expertise
in the treatment of people with developmental disabilities, including
professionals licensed under chapters 18.32, 18.35, 18.59, 18.71,
18.74, and 18.79 RCW, adaptive equipment specialists, and staff trained
in evidence-based treatment of autism spectrum disorders.
(3) The plan must describe how the department shall, by December
31, 2012:
(a) Close Frances Haddon Morgan Center and vacate the campus;
(b) Close portions of other residential habilitation centers;
(c) Work with local elected officials to identify suitable uses for
excess portions of the properties.
(4) The plan must describe how the department shall, by December
31, 2016:
(a) Close remaining residential habilitation center facilities,
except for any portions required to implement the requirements in
subsection (2)(d) of this section; and
(b) Maintain or establish a small number of skilled nursing
facility beds, allowing current residential habilitation residents
whose medical needs require twenty-four hour skilled nursing to age in
place.
(5) The department shall implement the provisions of this plan,
upon approval of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Beginning November 1, 2011, and annually
through November 1, 2013, the department of social and health services
shall submit information to the appropriate committees of the
legislature that includes cumulative data and analysis and
recommendations. The report must include at least the following:
(1) Progress toward meeting the requirements of this act;
(2) Satisfaction levels for clients transitioned to the community
and their guardians;
(3) Stability of placement and provider turnover;
(4) Safety and health outcomes, including incidents,
hospitalizations, and mortality;
(5) Sufficiency and quality of services, including:
(a) Employment and day activities;
(b) Community involvement; and
(c) Accessibility of former residents to family, friends, and
guardians.

Sec. 4 RCW 71A.16.040 and 1989 c 175 s 141 are each amended to
read as follows:
Until the legislature approves the department of social and health
services' implementation plan, described in section 2 of this act, the
secretary has the following duties:
(1) On receipt of an application for services submitted under RCW
71A.16.030, the secretary in a timely manner shall make a written
determination as to whether the applicant is eligible for services
provided under this title for persons with developmental disabilities.
(2) The secretary shall give notice of the secretary's
determination on eligibility to the person who submitted the
application and to the applicant, if the applicant is a person other
than the person who submitted the application for services. The notice
shall also include a statement advising the recipient of the right to
an adjudicative proceeding under RCW 71A.10.050 and the right to
judicial review of the secretary's final decision.
(3) The secretary may establish rules for redetermination of
eligibility for services under this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 71A.20.020 (Residential habilitation centers) and 1994 c
215 s 1 & 1988 c 176 s 702; and
(2) RCW 71A.20.080 (Return of resident to community -- Notice--Adjudicative proceeding -- Judicial review -- Effect of appeal) and 1989 c
175 s 143 & 1988 c 176 s 708.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 5 of this act takes effect June 30,
2012.

--- END ---