BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Building" includes, but is not limited to, any structure or
separate part or portion thereof, whether permanent or not, or the
ground itself.
(2) "Criminal street gang activity" means a pattern of criminal
street gang activity as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Every building or unit within a building
used for the purpose of aiding, promoting, or conducting criminal
street gang activity, and every building or unit within a building
wherein or upon which such acts take place, is a nuisance that shall be
enjoined, abated, and prevented, whether it is a public or private
nuisance. In a multiunit building, only the offending unit shall be
declared a nuisance, and only the offending unit shall be enjoined,
abated, and prevented.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Any person with legal standing and who
resides, works in, or owns property in the same multifamily building,
apartment complex, or within a one-block radius may bring an action as
provided for in section 2 of this act by filing a complaint with a law
enforcement agency in the county in which the property is located. The
action shall be commenced by the filing of a complaint alleging the
facts constituting the nuisance. The action may also be commenced by
any public agency.
(2) Any complaint filed under this chapter shall be verified or
accompanied by affidavit. A copy of the complaint and affidavit must
be served on the legal owner of the property, if different from the
current occupant. For purposes of showing that the owner or his or her
agent has had an opportunity to abate the nuisance, the affidavit shall
contain a description of all attempts by the applicant to notify and
locate the owner of the property or the owner's agent, including at
least one attempt to notify the owner or owner's agent by registered
mail.
(3) In addition, the affidavit shall describe in detail the adverse
impact associated with the property on the surrounding neighborhood.
Adverse impact includes, but is not limited to, the following: Any
recent search warrants served on the property where evidence of
criminal street gang activity was seized; recent arrests of persons who
frequent the property for purposes of criminal street gang activity; a
recent increase in the number of complaints made to law enforcement of
illegal activity associated with the property which result in arrests
for criminal street gang activity; recent increases in arrests for
weapons violations of persons who frequent the property; and recent
increases in graffiti or garbage in the immediate vicinity.
(4) Upon receipt of the complaint, the law enforcement agency shall
conduct an investigation into the allegations and, if probable cause is
found that a violation of this chapter is occurring, the complaint and
results of the investigation shall be filed in the county superior
court. After receiving the complaint, the court shall grant a hearing
within five business days or seven calendar days.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Upon application for a temporary
restraining order or preliminary injunction, the court may, upon a
showing of good cause, issue an ex parte restraining order or
preliminary injunction, preventing the defendant and all other persons,
other than the legal owner, from removing or in any manner interfering
with the personal property and contents of the place where the nuisance
is alleged to exist and may grant preliminary equitable relief as is
necessary to prevent the continuance or recurrence of the nuisance
pending final resolution of the matter on the merits. Pending the
decision, the stock in trade may not be so restrained, but an inventory
and full accounting of all business transactions may be required.
(2) The restraining order or preliminary injunction may be served
by handing to and leaving a copy with any person in charge of the place
or residing in the place, or by posting a copy in a conspicuous place
at or upon one or more of the principal doors or entrances to the
place, or by both delivery and posting. The officer serving the order
or injunction shall forthwith make and return into court an inventory
of the personal property and contents situated in and used in
conducting or maintaining the nuisance. Additionally, a copy of the
restraining order or preliminary injunction must be sent by registered
mail to the owner of the building.
(3) Any violation of the order or injunction is a contempt of
court, and where the order or injunction is posted, mutilation or
removal thereof while the same remains in force is a contempt of court
if the posted order or injunction contains a notice to that effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A temporary restraining order or preliminary
injunction shall not be issued under this chapter except upon the
giving of a bond or security by the applicant, in the sum that the
court deems proper, but not less than one thousand dollars, for the
payment of such costs and damages as may be incurred or suffered by any
party who is found to have been wrongfully restrained or enjoined. A
bond or security shall not be required of the state of Washington,
municipal corporations, or political subdivisions of the state of
Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 An action under this chapter shall have
precedence over all other actions, except prior matters of the same
character, actions under chapter 7.43 RCW, criminal proceedings,
election contests, hearings on temporary restraining orders and
injunctions, foreclosures by a legal owner, and actions to forfeit
vehicles used in violation of the uniform controlled substances act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) If the complaint under this chapter is
filed by a citizen, the complaint shall not be dismissed by the citizen
for want of prosecution except upon a sworn statement made by the
citizen and the citizen's attorney, if the citizen has one. The
statement shall set forth the reasons why the action should be
dismissed. The case shall only be dismissed if so ordered by the
court.
(2) In case of failure to prosecute the action with reasonable
diligence, or at the request of the plaintiff, the court, in its
discretion, may substitute any other citizen consenting to be
substituted for the plaintiff.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A copy of the complaint, together with a
notice of the time and place of the hearing of the action, shall be
served upon the defendant at least three business days before the
hearing. Service may also be made by posting the papers in the same
manner as is provided for in section 4 of this act. In addition to
service by posting, a copy of the complaint must be sent by registered
mail to the owner of the building or the agent of the owner. If the
hearing is then continued at the request of any defendant, all
temporary orders and injunctions shall be extended as a matter of
course.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, if the existence of the nuisance is established in the
action, an order of abatement shall be entered as part of the final
judgment in the case. The plaintiff's costs in the action, including
those of abatement, are a lien upon the building or unit within a
building, subject to the lien of the legal owner. The lien is
enforceable and collectible by execution issued by order of the court.
(2) If the court finds and concludes that the owner of the building
or unit within a building:
(a) Had no knowledge of the existence of the nuisance or has been
making reasonable efforts to abate the nuisance;
(b) Has not been guilty of any contempt of court in the
proceedings; and
(c) Will immediately abate any such nuisance that may exist at the
building or unit within a building and prevent it from being a nuisance
within a period of one year thereafter, the court shall, if satisfied
with the owner's good faith, order the building or unit within a
building to be delivered to the owner, and no order of abatement shall
be entered. If an order of abatement has been entered and the owner
subsequently meets the requirements of this subsection, the order of
abatement shall be canceled.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Any final order of abatement issued under
this chapter shall:
(1) Direct the removal of all personal property subject to seizure
and forfeiture under RCW 69.50.505 from the building or unit within a
building, and direct the commencement of proceedings to forfeit the
property under the forfeiture provisions of RCW 69.50.505;
(2) If the building or unit is not subject to the interests of
innocent legal owners, provide for the immediate closure of the
building or unit within a building against its use for any purpose, and
for keeping it closed for a period of one year unless released sooner
as provided in this chapter; and
(3) State that while the order of abatement remains in effect, the
building or unit within a building shall remain in the custody of the
court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 In all actions brought under this chapter,
the proceeds and all moneys forfeited under the forfeiture provisions
of RCW 69.50.505 shall be applied as follows:
(1) First, to the fees and costs of the removal and sale;
(2) Second, to the allowances and costs of closing and keeping
closed the building or unit within a building;
(3) Third, to the payment of the plaintiff's costs in the action;
and
(4) Fourth, the balance, if any, to the owner of the property.
If the proceeds of the sale of items subject to seizure and
forfeiture do not fully discharge all of the costs, fees, and
allowances, the building or unit within a building shall then also be
sold under execution issued upon the order of the court, and the
proceeds of the sale shall be applied in a like manner.
A building or unit within a building shall not be sold under this
section unless the court finds and concludes by clear and convincing
evidence that the owner of the building or unit within a building had
actual or constructive knowledge or notice of the existence of the
nuisance. However, this shall not be construed as limiting or
prohibiting the entry of any final order of abatement as provided in
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 An intentional violation of a restraining
order, preliminary injunction, or order of abatement under this chapter
is a contempt of court as provided in chapter 7.21 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Whenever the owner of a building or unit
within a building upon which the act or acts constituting the contempt
have been committed, or the owner of any interest in the building or
unit has been found in contempt of court, and fined in any proceedings
under this chapter, the fine is a lien upon the building or unit within
a building to the extent of the owner's interest, subject to the lien
of the legal owner. The lien is enforceable and collectible by
execution issued by order of the court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The abatement of a nuisance under this
chapter does not prejudice the right of any person to recover damages
for its past existence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Sections 1 through 15 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 7 RCW.

--- END ---