BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The conditions imposed under this
chapter supplement but do not supplant provisions of law allowing the
imposition of conditions to assure the appearance of the defendant at
trial or to prevent interference with the administration of justice.
In cases where the accused is charged with a capital offense or an
offense which may result in a life sentence without possibility of
release, a judicial officer must make a determination of conditions, if
any, upon pretrial release. The judicial officer must release the
accused on his or her own personal recognizance unless:
(a) The court determines that such recognizance will not reasonably
assure the accused's appearance, when required, or
(b) There is shown a likely danger that the accused will:
(i) Commit a violent crime; or
(ii) Seek to intimidate witnesses, or otherwise unlawfully
interfere with the administration of justice.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "violent crimes" are not
limited to crimes defined as violent offenses in RCW 9.94A.030. In
making the determination, the court shall consider the relevant facts
including, but not limited to:
(a) The nature and circumstances of the offense, in particular,
whether it is an offense that is violent or nonviolent in nature;
(b) The weight of the evidence against the person;
(c) The history and characteristics of the person, such as:
(i) Character, including physical and mental condition, family
ties, employment, financial resources, length of time in the community,
community ties, past conduct history relating to drug or alcohol abuse,
criminal history, and record of court appearances; and
(ii) Whether, at the time of the current offense or arrest, the
person was on probation, parole, or other release pending trial,
sentencing, appeal, or completion of a sentence for an offense under
federal, state, or local law; and
(d) The nature and seriousness of the danger to any person or to
the community that would be posed by the person's release. The factors
used to determine danger include the defendant's criminal history,
threats of violence, noncriminal destructive acts, or any articulable
demonstration of threat.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If a judicial officer finds that no
condition or combination of conditions will reasonably assure the
safety of any other person and the community, the judicial officer must
order the detention of the person before trial. The detainee is
entitled to expedited review of the detention order by the court of
appeals under the writ provided in RCW 7.36.160.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Nothing in this chapter may be construed as
modifying or limiting the presumption of innocence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 10 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect January 1, 2011, if
the proposed amendment to Article I, section 20 of the state
Constitution proposed in Senate Joint Resolution No. 8218 is validly
submitted to and is approved and ratified by the voters at the next
general election. If the proposed amendment is not approved and
ratified, this act is void in its entirety.

--- END ---