BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.330.090 and 2009 c 151 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To the extent that funds are appropriated, the department
((shall)) must work with private sector organizations, industry and
sector associations, federal agencies, state agencies that use a
sector-based approach to service delivery, local governments, local
associate development organizations, and higher education and training
institutions in the development of industry sector-based strategies to
diversify the economy, facilitate technology transfer and diffusion,
and increase value-added production. The industry sectors targeted by
the department may include, but are not limited to, aerospace,
agriculture, food processing, forest products, marine services, health
and biomedical, software, digital and interactive media, transportation
and distribution, and microelectronics. The department ((shall)) must,
on a continuing basis, evaluate the potential return to the state from
devoting additional resources to an industry sector-based approach to
economic development and identifying and assisting additional sectors.
(2) The department's sector-based strategies ((shall)) must include
subject to the appropriation of funding for these strategies, but not
be limited to, cluster-based strategies that focus on assisting
regional industry sectors and related firms and institutions that meet
the definition of an industry cluster in this section and based on
criteria identified by the working group ((established in)) convened by
the state economic development commission and the workforce training
and education coordinating board under this chapter.
(3)(((a) The department shall promote, market, and encourage growth
in the production of films and videos, as well as television
commercials within the state; to this end the department is directed to
assist in the location of a film and video production studio within the
state.
(b) The department may, in carrying out its efforts to encourage
film and video production in the state, solicit and receive gifts,
grants, funds, fees, and endowments, in trust or otherwise, from
tribal, local, or other governmental entities, as well as private
sources, and may expend the same or any income therefrom for the
encouragement of film and video production. All revenue received for
such purposes shall be deposited into the film and video promotion
account created in RCW 43.330.092.
(4))) In assisting in the development of regional and statewide
industry cluster-based strategies and subject to the appropriation of
funds for these activities, the department's activities ((shall)) must
include, but are not limited to:
(a) Facilitating regional focus group discussions and conducting
studies to identify industry clusters, appraise the current information
linkages within a cluster, ((and)) identify issues of common concern
within a cluster, and promote industry cluster involvement in the
application process for designation of innovation partnership zones;
(b) Supporting industry and cluster associations, publications of
association and cluster directories, and related efforts to create or
expand the activities of industry and cluster associations including
their involvement with innovation partnership zones;
(c) Administering a competitive grant program to fund economic
development activities designed to further regional cluster growth and
to integrate its sector-based and cluster-based strategies with its
support for the development of innovation partnership zones. In
administering the program, the department ((shall)) must work with ((an
industry cluster advisory committee with equal representation from))
the economic development commission((,)) and the workforce training and
education coordinating board((, the state board for community and
technical colleges, the employment security department, business, and
labor)) to develop criteria for rewarding grants.
(i) ((The industry cluster advisory committee shall recommend
criteria for evaluating applications for grant funds and recommend
applicants for receipt of grant funds. Criteria shall include not
duplicating)) Grant recipients must provide matching funds equal to the
size of the grant.
(ii) Grants may be awarded to support the formation of sector
associations or cluster associations, the identification of the
technology and commercialization needs of a sector or cluster,
facilitating working relationships between a sector association or
cluster association and an innovation partnership zone, expanding the
operations of an innovation partnership zone, and developing and
implementing plans to meet the technology development and
commercialization needs of industry sectors, industry clusters, and
innovation partnership zones. The projects receiving grants must not
duplicate the purpose or efforts of industry skill panels but priority
must be given to applicants that complement industry skill panels and
will use the grant funds to build linkages and joint projects.
(((ii) Applicants must include organizations from at least two
counties and participants from the local business community. Eligible
organizations include, but are not limited to, local governments,
economic development councils, chambers of commerce, federally
recognized Indian tribes, workforce development councils, and
educational institutions.
(iii) Applications must evidence financial participation of the
partner organizations.
(iv) Eligible activities include the formation of cluster economic
development partnerships, research and analysis of economic development
needs of the cluster, the development of a plan to meet the economic
development needs of the cluster, and activities to implement the plan.
(v) Priority shall be given to applicants that complement industry
skill panels and will use the grant funds to build linkages and joint
projects.
(vi))) (iii) The maximum amount of a grant is ((one hundred))
seventy-five thousand dollars.
(((vii) A maximum of one hundred thousand dollars total can go to
King, Pierce, Kitsap, and Snohomish counties combined.
(viii))) (iv) No more than ten percent of funds received for the
grant program may be used by the department for administrative costs.
(((5))) (4) As used in this chapter, "industry cluster" means a
geographic concentration of interconnected companies in a single
industry, related businesses in other industries, including suppliers
and customers, and associated institutions, including government and
education.

--- END ---