BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The Washington institute for public
policy shall, in collaboration with the department of social and health
services and other applicable entities, undertake a search for a
validated mental health assessment tool or combination of tools to be
used by designated mental health professionals when undertaking
assessments of individuals for detention, commitment, and revocation
under the involuntary treatment act pursuant to chapter 71.05 RCW.
(2) This section expires June 30, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 71.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In determining whether a person is gravely disabled or presents
a likelihood of serious harm, the court or evaluating designated mental
health professional must consider the symptoms and behavior of the
respondent in light of all available evidence or information concerning
the respondent's historical behavior, as disclosed by the clinical
record or credible witnesses with knowledge of the respondent.
(2) Symptoms or behavior which standing alone would not justify
civil commitment may support an inference of grave disability or
likelihood of serious harm when: (a) Such symptoms or behavior are
substantially similar to those which preceded and led to a past
involuntary hospitalization, incident of severe deterioration, or one
or more violent acts; and (b) unless treated, the respondent will
continue with reasonable medical probability to physically or mentally
deteriorate so that the person will become gravely disabled or present
a likelihood of serious harm.

--- END ---