BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 89.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds there are several state agencies
implementing programs providing incentive programs for landowners to
assist them in managing private lands to minimize impacts to the
state's natural resources. These programs provide benefits not only to
the people of the state through the protection and improvement of
shared resources, but also allow private landowners to continue
managing their lands. These incentive programs also create
opportunities to enhance state natural resource values in an approach
that engages landowners as key participants in supporting these
activities. Because of the number of incentive programs offered to
landowners by state, federal, local, and other entities, the
opportunities can be confusing for landowners and these services may
not be provided in the most efficient manner possible. Furthermore,
the implementation of these programs should be conducted in a manner
that ensures these incentive programs resources are improving natural
resource conditions. The state conservation commission and
conservation districts are ideally situated to coordinate the service
delivery of incentive-based natural resources programs to forestry,
agricultural, and small acreage landowners in a manner that supports
and better uses existing programs at various agencies in a more
efficient, targeted, and accountable approach.
(2)(a) As the state conservation commission implements existing
authority in RCW 89.08.070(6) for the coordination of agricultural
landowner incentive programs in the state and seeks incentives
information for forest landowners, the commission is directed to work
with state, federal, local, and tribal governments, and with
nongovernmental organizations, to identify methods and opportunities to
more efficiently and effectively implement landowner incentive
programs. The commission shall also work with forestry and
agricultural landowners, including small acreage landowners, on the
incentive programs available for the protection, restoration, and
enhancement of the state's natural resources. State agencies shall
coordinate with the commission and districts when developing and
implementing programs that address agricultural landowners and
agricultural landowner impacts on natural resources and shall assist
the commission in the implementation of RCW 89.08.070(8).
(b) When implementing this section, the commission shall consider
approaches that will:
(i) More efficiently use limited state resources;
(ii) Improve the effectiveness of new and existing programs to
achieve natural resources improvements while maintaining or enhancing
the potential of working lands in the state;
(iii) Provide for accountability in the cost efficiency and
resource effectiveness of the coordination of these programs; and
(iv) Better target and coordinate these programs to address
critical natural resources issues in the state.
(c) When implementing this section, the commission shall:
(i) Use the resources and skills of the various conservation
districts throughout the state to engage participation of local
landowners in these activities;
(ii) Coordinate with existing collaborative programs including, but
not limited to, the salmon recovery funding board, the recreation and
conservation funding board, local watershed coordinating entities,
local salmon recovery organizations, the Puget Sound partnership, and
the governor's natural resources cabinet;
(iii) Identify opportunities to target the delivery of incentive
programs to specific geographic areas to address specific natural
resources issues and concerns; and
(iv) Identify and coordinate multiagency discussions that will lead
to improvements to incentive programs.
(3)(a) The commission shall periodically report to the legislature
and governor on the status of this section. This report must include
information on:
(i) Activities relating to the coordination of incentive programs;
(ii) Progress on implementing programs on the ground;
(iii) The effectiveness of the coordinated approach for improving
natural resources;
(iv) Program efficiencies through improved coordination;
(v) Landowner engagement and participation in these programs; and
(vi) Other information the commission deems necessary and
appropriate for the successful implementation of this section.
(b) The commission shall also provide recommendations to the
legislature and governor for any program improvements to accomplish the
objectives of this section.

--- END ---