BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Home care agencies that provide in-home personal care or
respite services under chapter 70.127 RCW, Title 71A RCW, or chapter
74.39 RCW, currently provide proper and accurate verification of agency
employee hours.
(2) The technology currently available from vendors providing
electronic timekeeping software does not provide an electronic
timekeeping solution when the beneficiary does not use a land-based
telephone line.
(3) On average, no more than sixty percent of a home care agency's
state paid beneficiary caseload have access to a land-based telephone
line. As a result, home care agencies continue to use a paper-based
time sheet verification process for at least forty percent of their
state paid beneficiary caseload.
(4) Home care agencies are expected to bear significant costs
associated with the implementation of the electronic timekeeping
requirement, including costs to train agency employees, customize
electronic timekeeping software, and create required policies and
procedures and other documentation.
(5) The electronic timekeeping requirement only applies to home
care agencies who provide less than a third of the total state paid
beneficiary personal care and respite services, while two-thirds of
personal care and respite services, provided to state paid
beneficiaries through the individual provider system, are not required
to provide verification of employee hours worked through either an
electronic timekeeping system or any other system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.39A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2010, the department shall conduct an
electronic timekeeping study, in conjunction with home care agencies,
to determine best practices for the implementation of the verification
of employee hours worked, using an electronic timekeeping system.
(2) The electronic timekeeping study must be conducted from July 1,
2010, through December 31, 2010. The best practices required by
subsection (1) of this section must be released to the home care
agencies via management bulletin not later than January 31, 2011.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2011, the department shall not pay a home
care agency licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW for in-home personal care
or respite services provided under this chapter, Title 71A RCW, or
chapter 74.39 RCW, if the home care agency does not verify agency
employee hours by electronic timekeeping.
(4) For purposes of this section, "electronic timekeeping" means an
electronic, verifiable method of recording an employee's presence in
the client's home at the beginning and end of the employee's client
visit workday.

--- END ---