BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.32.220 and 2003 c 111 s 814 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Not later than ninety days before the publication and
distribution of a local voters' pamphlet by a county, the county
auditor shall notify each city, town, or special taxing district
located wholly within that county that a pamphlet will be produced.
(2) ((If)) For counties with a population of one hundred thousand
or greater, a voters' pamphlet ((is)) shall be published by the county
for a primary, special, or general election((,)). The pamphlet shall
be published for the elective offices and ballot measures of the county
and for the elective offices and ballot measures of each unit of local
government located entirely within the county which will appear on the
ballot at that primary, special, or general election. However, the
offices and measures of a first-class or code city shall not be
included in the pamphlet if the city publishes and distributes its own
voters' pamphlet for the primary, special, or general election for its
offices and measures. The offices and measures of any other town or
city are not required to appear in the county's pamphlet if the town or
city is obligated by ordinance or charter to publish and distribute a
voters' pamphlet for the primary, special, or general election for its
offices and measures and it does so.
((If the required appearance in a county's voters' pamphlet of the
offices or measures of a unit of local government would create undue
financial hardship for the unit of government, the legislative
authority of the unit may petition the legislative authority of the
county to waive this requirement. The legislative authority of the
county may provide such a waiver if it does so not later than sixty
days before the publication of the pamphlet and it finds that the
requirement would create such hardship.))
(3) If a city, town, or district is located within more than one
county, the respective county auditors may enter into an interlocal
agreement to permit the distribution of each county's local voters'
pamphlet into those parts of the city, town, or district located
outside of that county.
(4) If a first-class or code city authorizes the production and
distribution of a local voters' pamphlet, the city clerk of that city
shall notify any special taxing district located wholly within that
city that a pamphlet will be produced. Notification shall be provided
in the manner required or provided for in subsection (1) of this
section.
(5) A unit of local government located within a county and the
county may enter into an interlocal agreement for the publication of a
voters' pamphlet for offices or measures not required by subsection (2)
of this section to appear in a county's pamphlet.

--- END ---