BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the work of the
achievement gap oversight and accountability committee and plans to
implement recommendations submitted by the committee to further the
goal of closing the achievement gap in schools. The legislature is
aware that achievement gap data is currently being collected and that
cultural competence standards are being prepared for implementation.
However, the legislature intends to formalize reporting and
implementation standards so that the momentum is not lost in closing
the achievement gap.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By December 1, 2010, and annually thereafter, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall report to the achievement
gap oversight and accountability committee information regarding data
collected and progress achieved in closing the achievement gap.
(2) The equity and civil rights office for the office of the
superintendent of public instruction and the professional educator
standards board shall work in collaboration with other state entities
and stakeholders to develop state policy to support the successful
implementation of the cultural competence standards developed by the
professional educator standards board pursuant to RCW 28A.410.260.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
professional educator standards board shall work in collaboration to
establish rules and procedures, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW,
to implement the cultural competence standards, as identified by the
professional educator standards board pursuant to RCW 28A.410.260,
across the continuum of educator preparation and continuing
professional development.
(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
professional educator standards board shall, within the scope of each
agency's statutory authority, ensure the implementation of the cultural
competence standards by November 1, 2017.

--- END ---