BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.640
RCW to read as follows:
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall have
authority to review, process, and refer appropriate complaints from
victims of discrimination in public schools based on state laws
prohibiting discrimination including sex, race, creed, color, national
origin, marital status, sexual orientation as defined in RCW 49.60.040,
age, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or
the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a
disability, as well as federal laws prohibiting discrimination
including Title VI of the civil rights act of 1964, as amended (42
U.S.C. Secs. 2000d et seq.), Title IX of the education amendments of
1972, as amended (20 U.S.C. Secs. 1681 et seq.), section 504 of the
rehabilitation act of 1973, as amended (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794), the age
discrimination act of 1975, as amended (42 U.S.C. Secs. 6101 et seq.),
and the boy scouts of America equal access act of 2001 (20 U.S.C. Sec.
7905). Complaints referred by the office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall be submitted to the appropriate state or
federal investigative and enforcement agency.

--- END ---