BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) RCW 28B.50.901 assigns responsibility for the north Snohomish,
Island, and Skagit counties' higher education consortium to Everett
Community College. In April of 2009, Everett Community College opened
Gray Wolf Hall, the new home of the University Center of North Puget
Sound. The University Center currently offers over twenty bachelor's
and master's degrees from six partner universities.
(2) Although Everett Community College offers an associate degree
nursing program that graduates approximately seventy to ninety students
per year, the University Center does not offer a bachelor of science in
nursing. Some graduates of the Everett Community College program are
able to articulate to the bachelor of science in nursing program
offered by the University of Washington-Bothell at its Bothell campus
or in Mt. Vernon but current capacity is not sufficient for all of the
graduates who are both interested and qualified.
(3) Despite recent growth in nursing education capacity, shortages
still persist for registered nurses. According to a June 2007 study by
the Washington, Wyoming, Alaska, Montana, and Idaho center for health
workforce studies, the average age of Washington's registered nurses
was forty-eight years. More than a third were fifty-five years of age
or older. Consequently, the high rate of registered nurses retiring
from nursing practice over the next two decades will significantly
reduce the supply. This reduction comes at the same time as the
state's population grows and ages. The registered nurse education
capacity in Washington has a large impact on the supply of registered
nurses in the state. If the rate of graduation in registered nursing
does not increase, projections show that supply in Washington will
begin to decline by 2015. In contrast, if graduation rates increased
by four hundred per year, the supply of registered nurses would meet
estimated demand by the year 2021.
(4) Subject to specific funding to support fifty full-time
equivalent students in a bachelor of nursing program, the University
Center at Everett Community College, in partnership with the University
of Washington-Bothell, shall offer a bachelor of science in nursing
program with capacity for at least fifty full-time students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2010, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---