BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.162 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission must develop a biennial budget request for
approval by the office of financial management. The commission must
adopt an annual budget and work plan in accordance with the omnibus
appropriations bill approved by the legislature.
(2) Of state appropriated funds for the operation of the
commission, the state agency serving as the commission's fiscal agent
may use no more than ten percent of funds appropriated for commission
personnel costs and no more than three percent of funds in the
Washington state economic development commission account to cover
administrative expenses.
(3) The commission may accept gifts, grants, donations,
sponsorships, or contributions from any federal, state, or local
governmental agency or program, or any private source, and expend the
same for any purpose consistent with this chapter.
(4) The Washington state economic development commission account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from
gifts, grants, donations, sponsorships, or contributions must be
deposited into the account. State appropriated funds may not be
deposited into the account. The account is subject to the allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for purposes related to carrying out the mission, roles, and
responsibilities of the commission. Only the commission, or the
commission's designee, may authorize expenditures from the account.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2009 c 87 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the toll collection
account, the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the
Washington state economic development commission account, the energy
account, the fair fund, the family leave insurance account, the food
animal veterinarian conditional scholarship account, the fruit and
vegetable inspection account, the future teachers conditional
scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the GET ready
for math and science scholarship account, the grain inspection
revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive account, the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local
tourism promotion account, the pilotage account, the produce railcar
pool account, the regional transportation investment district account,
the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center
account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, the children's
trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred
owners' bonus fund and breeder awards account, the Washington horse
racing commission class C purse fund account, the individual
development account program account, the Washington horse racing
commission operating account (earnings from the Washington horse racing
commission operating account must be credited to the Washington horse
racing commission class C purse fund account), the life sciences
discovery fund, the Washington state heritage center account, the
reduced cigarette ignition propensity account, and the reading
achievement account. However, the earnings to be distributed shall
first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service
fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right-of-way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

--- END ---