BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.15.210 and 2009 c 499 s 1 and 2009 c 497 s 6019
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
((Within thirty-five days from the date of collection thereof,))
All building fees at the University of Washington, including building
fees to be charged students registering in the schools of medicine and
dentistry, shall be ((paid into the state treasury and credited as
follows:
One-half or such larger portion as may be necessary to prevent a
default in the payments required to be made out of the bond retirement
fund to the "University of Washington bond retirement fund" and the
remainder thereof to the "University of Washington building account."
The sum so credited to the University of Washington building account
shall be used exclusively for the purpose of erecting, altering,
maintaining, equipping, or furnishing buildings, and for certificates
of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW, except for any sums
transferred as authorized in RCW 28B.20.725(3). The sum so credited to
the University of Washington bond retirement fund shall be used for the
payment of principal of and interest on bonds outstanding as provided
by chapter 28B.20 RCW except for any sums transferred as authorized in
RCW 28B.20.725(5). During the 2009-2011 biennium, sums credited to the
University of Washington building account shall also be used for
routine facility maintenance and utility costs)) applied by the
university for university building purposes. "University building
purposes" means to pay or finance costs of acquiring, erecting,
altering, maintaining, equipping, furnishing, or operating buildings,
including without limitation payment of principal of and interest on
bonds authorized pursuant to section 5029, chapter 497, Laws of 2009,
and certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW. The
university shall continue to support minor capital works and deferred
maintenance from building fees at or above the university's 2009-2011
biennial contribution.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.20.382 and 1999 c 346 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Until authorized by statute of the legislature, the board of
regents of the university, with respect to the university tract, shall
not sell the land or any part thereof or any improvement thereon, or
lease the land or any part thereof or any improvement thereon or renew
or extend any lease thereof for a term of more than eighty years. Any
sale of the land or any part thereof or any improvement thereon, or any
lease or renewal or extension of any lease of the land or any part
thereof or any improvement thereon for a term of more than eighty years
made or attempted to be made by the board of regents shall be null and
void until the same has been approved or ratified and confirmed by
legislative act.
(2) The board of regents shall have power from time to time to
lease the land, or any part thereof or any improvement thereon for a
term of not more than eighty years. Any and all records, books,
accounts, and agreements of any lessee or sublessee under this section,
pertaining to compliance with the terms and conditions of such lease or
sublease, shall be open to inspection by the board of regents, the ways
and means committee of the senate, the appropriations committee of the
house of representatives, and the joint legislative audit and review
committee or any successor committees. It is not intended that
unrelated records, books, accounts, and agreements of lessees,
sublessees, or related companies be open to such inspection. The board
of regents shall make a full, detailed report of all leases and
transactions pertaining to the land or any part thereof or any
improvement thereon to the joint legislative audit and review
committee, including one copy to the staff of the committee, during
odd-numbered years.
(3) The net proceeds from the sale or lease of land in the
university tract, or any part thereof or any improvement thereon, shall
be ((deposited into the University of Washington facilities bond
retirement account hereby established outside the state treasury as a
nonappropriated local fund to be)) used by the university exclusively
for the purpose of ((erecting, altering, maintaining, equipping, or
furnishing buildings at the University of Washington. The board of
regents shall transfer from the University of Washington facilities
bond retirement account to the University of Washington building
account under RCW 43.79.080 any funds in excess of amounts reasonably
necessary for payment of debt service in combination with other
nonappropriated local funds related to capital projects for which debt
service is required under section 4, chapter 380, Laws of 1999)) (a)
payment of debt service in combination with other nonappropriated local
funds related to capital projects for which debt service is required
under section 4, chapter 380, Laws of 1999, and (b) for university
building purposes as defined in RCW 28B.15.210.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.20.720 and 2009 c 499 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purpose of paying and securing the payment of the principal
of and interest on the bonds as the same shall become due, there is
created in the custody of the state treasurer a special trust fund to
be known as the University of Washington bond retirement fund. An
appropriation is not required for expenditures from the fund. There
shall be paid into the fund, the following:
(1) ((One-half of such building fees as the board may from time to
time determine, or such larger portion as may be necessary to prevent
default in the payments required to be made out of the bond retirement
fund;
(2))) Any gifts, bequests, or grants which may be made, or may
become available, for the purpose of furthering the construction of any
authorized projects, or for the repayment of the costs thereof;
(((3))) (2) Such additional funds as the legislature may provide.
While any bonds issued in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter or any interest thereon remain unpaid, the bond retirement fund
shall be available solely for the payment thereof ((except as provided
in RCW 28B.20.725(5). As a part of the contract of sale of such bonds,
the board undertakes to charge and collect building fees and to deposit
the portion of such fees in the bond retirement fund in amounts which
will be sufficient to pay the principal of, and interest on all such
bonds outstanding)).

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.20.721 and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.721 are each
amended to read as follows:
All moneys received from the lease or rental of lands set apart by
the enabling act for university purposes; all interest or income
arising from the proceeds of the sale of such lands or of the timber,
fallen timber, stone, gravel, or other valuable material thereon; and
all moneys received as interest on deferred payments on contracts for
the sale of such lands shall be ((deposited in the "University of
Washington bond retirement fund" to be expended for the purposes set
forth in RCW 28B.20.720)) paid to the university to be used for
university building purposes as defined in RCW 28B.15.210.

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.20.725 and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.725 are each
amended to read as follows:
The board is hereby empowered:
(1) To reserve the right to issue bonds later on a parity with any
bonds being issued;
(2) To authorize the investing of moneys in the bond retirement
fund and any reserve account therein;
(3) To authorize the transfer of money ((from the University of
Washington building account)) to the bond retirement fund when
necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out
of such fund; and
(4) To create a reserve account or accounts in the bond retirement
fund to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on any
bonds((;
(5) To authorize the transfer to the University of Washington
building account of any money on deposit in the bond retirement fund in
excess of debt service for a period of three years from the date of
such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of such fund)).

Sec. 6 RCW 28B.20.800 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 97 are each amended
to read as follows:
All moneys hereafter received from the lease or rental of lands set
apart for the University of Washington by chapter 91, Laws of 1903 and
section 9, chapter 122, Laws of 1893, and all interest or income
arising from the proceeds of the sale of such land, less the allocation
to the state treasurer's service ((account [fund])) fund pursuant to
RCW 43.08.190 and the state investment board expense account pursuant
to RCW 43.33A.160, and all proceeds from the sale of timber, fallen
timber, stone, gravel, or other valuable material and all other
receipts therefrom shall be ((deposited to the credit of the
"University of Washington bond retirement fund" to be expended for the
purposes set forth in RCW 28B.20.720)) paid to the university to be
used for university building purposes as defined in RCW 28B.15.210.
All proceeds of sale of such lands, exclusive of investment income,
shall be deposited to the credit of the state university permanent
fund, shall be retained therein and shall not be transferred to any
other fund or account. All interest earned or income received from the
investment of the money in the state university permanent fund ((shall
be deposited to the credit of the University of Washington bond
retirement fund)) less the allocations to the state treasurer's service
fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190 and the state investment board expense
account pursuant to RCW 43.33A.160, shall be paid to the university to
be used for university building purposes as defined in RCW 28B.15.210.
((As a part of the contract of sale of bonds payable out of the
University of Washington bond retirement fund, the board of regents of
the University of Washington may covenant that all moneys derived from
the above provided sources, which are required to be paid into the bond
retirement fund, shall continue to be paid into such bond retirement
fund for as long as any of such bonds are outstanding.))

Sec. 7 RCW 28B.20.810 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 78 are each amended
to read as follows:
The board of regents of the University of Washington is empowered
to authorize from time to time the transfer from the state university
permanent fund ((to be held in reserve in the bond retirement fund
created by RCW 28B.20.720)) any unobligated funds and investments
derived from lands set apart for the support of the university by
chapter 91, Laws of 1903 and section 9, chapter 122, Laws of 1893, ((to
the extent required to comply with bond covenants regarding principal
and interest payments and reserve requirements for bonds payable out of
the bond retirement fund up to a total amount of five million dollars,
and to transfer any or all of said unobligated funds and investments in
excess of five million dollars)) to the university ((building account
created by RCW 43.79.330(22). Any funds transferred to the bond
retirement fund pursuant to this section shall be replaced by moneys
first available out of the moneys required to be deposited in such fund
pursuant to RCW 28B.20.800)) for university building purposes as
defined in RCW 28B.15.210. The board is further empowered to direct
the state finance committee to convert any investments in such
permanent fund acquired with funds derived from such lands into cash or
obligations of or guaranteed by the United States of America prior to
the transfer of such funds and investments to ((such reserve account or
building account)) the university.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.79.080 and 1985 c 57 s 36 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be in the state treasury a fund known and designated as
the "University of Washington building account(("))." All amounts on
deposit in the University of Washington building account on the
effective date of this section shall be transferred to the university
to be applied for university building purposes as defined in RCW
28B.15.210.

--- END ---