BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the critical
importance of infrastructure to the development of industrial,
commercial, and residential properties and finds that infill
development is often limited by the lack of infrastructure. The
legislature further finds that in many areas, public funding to extend
infrastructure is not available. It is the purpose of this act to
allow private utilities to provide infrastructure needed for economic
development in a manner that minimizes development sprawl.

Sec. 2 RCW 80.04.010 and 1995 c 243 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this title, unless specifically defined otherwise or
unless the context indicates otherwise:
(1) "Automatic location identification" means a system by which
information about a caller's location, including the seven-digit number
or ten-digit number used to place a 911 call or a different seven-digit
number or ten-digit number to which a return call can be made from the
public switched network, is forwarded to a public safety answering
point for display.
(2) "Automatic number identification" means a system that allows
for the automatic display of the seven-digit or ten-digit number used
to place a 911 call.
(3) "Commission" means the utilities and transportation commission.
(4) "Commissioner" means one of the members of such commission.
(5) "Competitive telecommunications company" means a
telecommunications company which has been classified as such by the
commission pursuant to RCW 80.36.320.
(6) "Competitive telecommunications service" means a service which
has been classified as such by the commission pursuant to RCW
80.36.330.
(7) "Corporation" includes a corporation, company, association or
joint stock association.
(8) "Person" includes an individual, a firm or partnership.
(9) "Gas plant" includes all real estate, fixtures and personal
property, owned, leased, controlled, used or to be used for or in
connection with the transmission, distribution, sale or furnishing of
natural gas, or the manufacture, transmission, distribution, sale or
furnishing of other type gas, for light, heat or power.
(10) "Gas company" includes every corporation, company,
association, joint stock association, partnership and person, their
lessees, trustees or receiver appointed by any court whatsoever, and
every city or town, owning, controlling, operating or managing any gas
plant within this state.
(11) "Electric plant" includes all real estate, fixtures and
personal property operated, owned, used or to be used for or in
connection with or to facilitate the generation, transmission,
distribution, sale or furnishing of electricity for light, heat, or
power for hire; and any conduits, ducts or other devices, materials,
apparatus or property for containing, holding or carrying conductors
used or to be used for the transmission of electricity for light, heat
or power.
(12) "Electrical company" includes any corporation, company,
association, joint stock association, partnership and person, their
lessees, trustees or receivers appointed by any court whatsoever (other
than a railroad or street railroad company generating electricity
solely for railroad or street railroad purposes or for the use of its
tenants and not for sale to others), and every city or town owning,
operating or managing any electric plant for hire within this state.
"Electrical company" does not include a company or person employing a
cogeneration facility solely for the generation of electricity for its
own use or the use of its tenants or for sale to an electrical company,
state or local public agency, municipal corporation, or quasi municipal
corporation engaged in the sale or distribution of electrical energy,
but not for sale to others, unless such company or person is otherwise
an electrical company.
(13) "LATA" means a local access transport area as defined by the
commission in conformance with applicable federal law.
(14) "Private telecommunications system" means a telecommunications
system controlled by a person or entity for the sole and exclusive use
of such person, entity, or affiliate thereof, including the provision
of private shared telecommunications services by such person or entity.
"Private telecommunications system" does not include a system offered
for hire, sale, or resale to the general public.
(15) "Private shared telecommunications services" includes the
provision of telecommunications and information management services and
equipment within a user group located in discrete private premises in
building complexes, campuses, or high-rise buildings, by a commercial
shared services provider or by a user association, through privately
owned customer premises equipment and associated data processing and
information management services and includes the provision of
connections to the facilities of a local exchange and to interexchange
telecommunications companies.
(16) "Private switch automatic location identification service"
means a service that enables automatic location identification to be
provided to a public safety answering point for 911 calls originating
from station lines served by a private switch system.
(17) "Radio communications service company" includes every
corporation, company, association, joint stock association,
partnership, and person, their lessees, trustees, or receivers
appointed by any court, and every city or town making available
facilities to provide radio communications service, radio paging, or
cellular communications service for hire, sale, or resale.
(18) "Telecommunications company" includes every corporation,
company, association, joint stock association, partnership and person,
their lessees, trustees or receivers appointed by any court whatsoever,
and every city or town owning, operating or managing any facilities
used to provide telecommunications for hire, sale, or resale to the
general public within this state.
(19) "Noncompetitive telecommunications service" means any service
which has not been classified as competitive by the commission.
(20) "Facilities" means lines, conduits, ducts, poles, wires,
cables, cross-arms, receivers, transmitters, instruments, machines,
appliances, instrumentalities and all devices, real estate, easements,
apparatus, property and routes used, operated, owned or controlled by
any telecommunications company to facilitate the provision of
telecommunications service.
(21) "Telecommunications" is the transmission of information by
wire, radio, optical cable, electromagnetic, or other similar means.
As used in this definition, "information" means knowledge or
intelligence represented by any form of writing, signs, signals,
pictures, sounds, or any other symbols.
(22) "Water system" includes all real estate, easements, fixtures,
personal property, dams, dikes, head gates, weirs, canals, reservoirs,
flumes or other structures or appliances operated, owned, used or to be
used for or in connection with or to facilitate the supply, storage,
distribution, sale, furnishing, diversion, carriage, apportionment or
measurement of water for power, irrigation, reclamation, manufacturing,
municipal, domestic or other beneficial uses for hire.
(23)(a) "Water company" includes every corporation, company,
association, joint stock association, partnership and person, their
lessees, trustees or receivers appointed by any court whatsoever, and
every city or town owning, controlling, operating, or managing any
water system for hire within this state((: PROVIDED, That)).
(b) For purposes of commission jurisdiction ((it shall)), "water
company" does not include any water system serving less than one
hundred customers where the average annual gross revenue per customer
does not exceed three hundred dollars per year, which revenue figure
may be increased annually by the commission by rule adopted pursuant to
chapter 34.05 RCW to reflect the rate of inflation as determined by the
implicit price deflator of the United States department of commerce((:
AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That such)). The measurement of customers or
revenues ((shall)) under this subsection must include all portions of
water companies having common ownership or control, regardless of
location or corporate designation.
(c) "Control" as used ((herein shall be)) in this subsection is
defined by the commission by rule and ((shall)) does not include
management by a satellite agency as defined in chapter 70.116 RCW if
the satellite agency is not an owner of the water company.
(d) "Water company" also includes, for auditing purposes only,
nonmunicipal water systems which are referred to the commission
pursuant to an administrative order from the department, or the city or
county as provided in RCW 80.04.110. ((However,))
(e) Water companies exempt from commission regulation ((shall be))
are subject to the provisions of chapter 19.86 RCW. A water company
cannot be removed from regulation except with the approval of the
commission. Water companies subject to regulation may petition the
commission for removal from regulation if the number of customers falls
below one hundred or the average annual revenue per customer falls
below three hundred dollars. The commission is authorized to maintain
continued regulation if it finds that the public interest so requires.
(24) "Cogeneration facility" means any machinery, equipment,
structure, process, or property, or any part thereof, installed or
acquired for the primary purpose of the sequential generation of
electrical or mechanical power and useful heat from the same primary
energy source or fuel.
(25) "Public service company" includes every gas company,
electrical company, telecommunications company, wastewater company, and
water company. Ownership or operation of a cogeneration facility does
not, by itself, make a company or person a public service company.
(26) "Local exchange company" means a telecommunications company
providing local exchange telecommunications service.
(27) "Department" means the department of health.
((The term)) (28) "Service" is used in this title in its broadest
and most inclusive sense.
(29)(a) "Wastewater company" means an individual, partnership, or
corporation that installs or operates a system of sewerage as defined
in RCW 36.94.010 that serves one hundred or more customers.
(b) For purposes of commission jurisdiction, wastewater company
does not include (i) municipal, county, or other publicly owned
wastewater system or companies that contract with such entities for
wastewater treatment services; or (ii) wastewater companies servicing
customers outside of an urban growth area as defined in RCW 36.70A.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 80.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A wastewater company shall not operate a system of sewerage for
compensation without first having obtained from the commission a
certificate declaring that the public convenience and necessity
requires such operation.
(2) Issuance of the certificate of public convenience and necessity
must be determined on, but not limited to, the following factors:
(a) A comprehensive business plan detailing the design,
construction, operation, and maintenance of the proposed service
system;
(b) Demonstration of sufficient financial resources to properly
operate and maintain the proposed system, and to replace and upgrade
capital assets;
(c) The need to develop a new stand alone system instead of
connecting to an existing system;
(d) A statement of prior experience, if any, in such field by the
petitioner, set out in an affidavit or declaration.
(3) The commission may, with or without a hearing, issue
certificates, or for good cause shown refuse to issue them, or issue
them for the partial exercise only of the privilege sought, and may
attach to the exercise of the rights granted such terms and conditions
as, in its judgment, the public convenience and necessity may require.
(4) Any right, privilege, certificate held, owned, or obtained by
a wastewater company may be sold, assigned, leased, transferred, or
inherited as other property, only if authorized by the commission.
(5) Prior to the commission approving a wastewater company to
provide new service or extend existing service, the wastewater company
must file and continuously maintain in effect, a bond, or equivalent
surety as determined by the commission, with the commission to ensure
that there are sufficient funds to properly design, construct, operate,
and maintain the proposed system, and to replace and upgrade capital
assets as required by federal or state law, department of health, or
department of ecology order or additional connections to the system.
(6) For purposes of issuing certificates under this chapter, the
commission may adopt rules to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 80.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The commission is authorized and empowered to adopt and issue rules
and regulations establishing fees necessary to recover the actual and
reasonable costs of supervising and regulating wastewater companies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 80.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If the commission determines, after providing notice and
opportunity for a hearing in the manner required for complaints under
RCW 80.04.110, that a wastewater company is unfit to provide wastewater
service on any wastewater system under its ownership, the commission
may order the transfer of any such system or systems to a capable
wastewater company.
(2) In determining whether a wastewater company is unfit to provide
wastewater service on a wastewater system, the commission may consider
the company's technical and managerial expertise to operate the
wastewater system, the company's financial soundness and the company's
willingness and ability to make ongoing investments necessary to
maintain compliance with statutory and regulatory standards for the
safety, adequacy, efficiency, and reasonableness of the service
provided.
(3) Before ordering the transfer of a wastewater system owned by a
wastewater company that is unfit to provide service, the commission
must first determine that:
(a) Alternatives to the transfer are impractical or not
economically feasible;
(b) The acquiring wastewater company is willing and able to acquire
the wastewater system or systems, financially sound, and has the
technical and managerial expertise to operate the wastewater system or
systems in compliance with applicable statutory and regulatory
standards; and
(c) Rates paid by customers served by the acquiring wastewater
company will not increase unreasonably because of the acquisition of
the wastewater system, or because of expenditures that may be necessary
to assure compliance with applicable statutory and regulatory standards
for the safety, adequacy, efficiency, and reasonableness of the service
provided.
(4) The sale price for the unfit wastewater company's wastewater
system or systems assets shall be determined by agreement between the
unfit wastewater company and the acquiring capable wastewater company
subject to a finding by the commission that the agreed price is
reasonable. A price is deemed reasonable if it does not exceed the
original cost of plant in service, minus accumulated depreciation,
minus contributions in aid to construction. If the unfit wastewater
company and the acquiring capable wastewater company are unable to
agree on the sale price or the commission finds that the agreed sale
price is not reasonable, the commission may institute a condemnation
proceeding in superior court in the manner provided by chapter 8.04 RCW
to determine the compensation to be paid by the acquiring capable
wastewater company for the failed wastewater system or systems assets.
The commission may prosecute the condemnation action in the name of the
state of Washington, however, compensation shall be paid by, and title
to the property shall vest in, the acquiring capable wastewater
company.
(5) The capable wastewater company acquiring an unfit wastewater
company's system or systems shall have the same limited immunity from
liability as wastewater companies assuming substandard systems as set
forth in RCW 80.28.275.
(6) The commission must provide copies of the notice required by
subsection (1) of this section to the department of health and all
proximate public entities providing wastewater utility service.
(7) Any capable wastewater company approved by the commission to
acquire the wastewater system or systems of an unfit wastewater company
shall submit to the commission, for approval, a financial plan,
including a timetable, for bringing the acquired wastewater system
assets into compliance with applicable statutory and regulatory
standards. The capable wastewater company shall also provide a copy of
the plan to the department of health and other state or local agency as
the commission may direct. The commission shall give the department of
health adequate opportunity to comment on the plan and shall consider
any comments submitted in deciding whether or not to approve the plan.

Sec. 6 RCW 80.04.110 and 1995 c 376 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Complaint may be made by the commission of its own motion or
by any person or corporation, chamber of commerce, board of trade, or
any commercial, mercantile, agricultural or manufacturing society, or
any body politic or municipal corporation, or by the public counsel
section of the office of the attorney general, or its successor, by
petition or complaint in writing, setting forth any act or thing done
or omitted to be done by any public service corporation in violation,
or claimed to be in violation, of any provision of law or of any order
or rule of the commission((: PROVIDED, That)).
(b) No complaint ((shall)) may be entertained by the commission
except upon its own motion, as to the reasonableness of the schedule of
the rates or charges of any gas company, electrical company, water
company, wastewater company, or telecommunications company, unless the
same be signed by the mayor, council or commission of the city or town
in which the company complained of is engaged in business, or not less
than twenty-five consumers or purchasers of such gas, electricity,
water, wastewater, or telecommunications service, or at least twenty-five percent of the consumers or purchasers of the company's service((:
PROVIDED, FURTHER, That)).
(c) When two or more public service corporations, (meaning to
exclude municipal and other public corporations) are engaged in
competition in any locality or localities in the state, either may make
complaint against the other or others that the rates, charges, rules,
regulations or practices of such other or others with or in respect to
which the complainant is in competition, are unreasonable,
unremunerative, discriminatory, illegal, unfair or intending or tending
to oppress the complainant, to stifle competition, or to create or
encourage the creation of monopoly, and upon such complaint or upon
complaint of the commission upon its own motion, the commission ((shall
have)) has power, after notice and hearing as in other cases, to, by
its order, subject to appeal as in other cases, correct the abuse
complained of by establishing such uniform rates, charges, rules,
regulations or practices in lieu of those complained of, to be observed
by all of such competing public service corporations in the locality or
localities specified as shall be found reasonable, remunerative,
nondiscriminatory, legal, and fair or tending to prevent oppression or
monopoly or to encourage competition, and upon any such hearing it
shall be proper for the commission to take into consideration the
rates, charges, rules, regulations and practices of the public service
corporation or corporations complained of in any other locality or
localities in the state.
(2) All matters upon which complaint may be founded may be joined
in one hearing, and no motion ((shall)) may be entertained against a
complaint for misjoinder of complaints or grievances or misjoinder of
parties; and in any review of the courts of orders of the commission
the same rule shall apply and pertain with regard to the joinder of
complaints and parties as herein provided((: PROVIDED,)). However,
all grievances to be inquired into ((shall)) must be plainly set forth
in the complaint. No complaint ((shall)) may be dismissed because of
the absence of direct damage to the complainant.
(3) Upon the filing of a complaint, the commission ((shall)) must
cause a copy thereof to be served upon the person or corporation
complained of, which shall be accompanied by a notice fixing the time
when and place where a hearing will be had upon such complaint. The
time fixed for such hearing ((shall)) may not be less than ten days
after the date of the service of such notice and complaint, excepting
as herein provided. The commission ((shall)) must enter its final
order with respect to a complaint filed by any entity or person other
than the commission within ten months from the date of filing of the
complaint, unless the date is extended for cause. Rules of practice
and procedure not otherwise provided for in this title may be
prescribed by the commission. Such rules may include the requirement
that a complainant use informal processes before filing a formal
complaint.
(4)(a) The commission ((shall)) must, as appropriate, audit a
nonmunicipal water system upon receipt of an administrative order from
the department, or the city or county in which the water system is
located, finding that the water delivered by a system does not meet
state board of health standards adopted under RCW 43.20.050(2)(a) or
standards adopted under chapters 70.116 and 70.119A RCW, and the
results of the audit ((shall)) must be provided to the requesting
department, city, or county. However, the number of nonmunicipal water
systems referred to the commission in any one calendar year shall not
exceed twenty percent of the water companies subject to commission
regulation as defined in RCW 80.04.010.
(b) Every nonmunicipal water system referred to the commission for
audit under this section shall pay to the commission an audit fee in an
amount, based on the system's twelve-month audited period, equal to the
fee required to be paid by regulated companies under RCW 80.24.010.
(5) Any customer or purchaser of service from a water system or
company that is subject to commission regulation may file a complaint
with the commission if he or she has reason to believe that the water
delivered by the system to the customer does not meet state drinking
water standards under chapter 43.20 or 70.116 RCW. The commission
((shall)) must investigate such a complaint, and ((shall)) must request
that the state department of health or local health department of the
county in which the system is located test the water for compliance
with state drinking water standards, and provide the results of such
testing to the commission. The commission may decide not to
investigate the complaint if it determines that the complaint has been
filed in bad faith, or for the purpose of harassment of the water
system or company, or for other reasons has no substantial merit. The
water system or company ((shall)) may bear the expense for the testing.
After the commission has received the complaint from the customer and
during the pendency of the commission investigation, the water system
or company ((shall)) may not take any steps to terminate service to the
customer or to collect any amounts alleged to be owed to the company by
the customer. The commission may issue an order or take any other
action to ensure that no such steps are taken by the system or company.
The customer may, at the customer's option and expense, obtain a water
quality test by a licensed or otherwise qualified water testing
laboratory, of the water delivered to the customer by the water system
or company, and provide the results of such a test to the commission.
If the commission determines that the water does not meet state
drinking water standards, it ((shall)) must exercise its authority over
the system or company as provided in this title, and may, where
appropriate, order a refund to the customer on a pro rata basis for the
substandard water delivered to the customer, and ((shall)) must order
reimbursement to the customer for the cost incurred by the customer, if
any, in obtaining a water quality test.

Sec. 7 RCW 80.04.130 and 2008 c 181 s 401 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, whenever
any public service company ((shall)) must file with the commission any
schedule, classification, rule, or regulation, the effect of which is
to change any rate, charge, rental, or toll theretofore charged, the
commission ((shall have)) has power, either upon its own motion or upon
complaint, upon notice, to enter upon a hearing concerning such
proposed change and the reasonableness and justness thereof. Pending
such hearing and the decision thereon, the commission may suspend the
operation of such rate, charge, rental, or toll for a period not
exceeding ten months from the time the same would otherwise go into
effect. After a full hearing, the commission may make such order in
reference thereto as would be provided in a hearing initiated after the
same had become effective.
(2)(a) The commission ((shall)) may not suspend a tariff that makes
a decrease in a rate, charge, rental, or toll filed by a
telecommunications company pending investigation of the fairness,
justness, and reasonableness of the decrease when the filing does not
contain any offsetting increase to another rate, charge, rental, or
toll and the filing company agrees to not file for an increase to any
rate, charge, rental, or toll to recover the revenue deficit that
results from the decrease for a period of one year.
(i) The filing company ((shall)) must file with any decrease
sufficient information as the commission by rule may require to
demonstrate the decreased rate, charge, rental, or toll is above the
long run incremental cost of the service. A tariff decrease that
results in a rate that is below long run incremental cost, or is
contrary to commission rule or order, or the requirements of this
chapter, ((shall)) must be rejected for filing and returned to the
company.
(ii) The commission may prescribe a different rate to be effective
on the prospective date stated in its final order after its
investigation, if it concludes based on the record that the originally
filed and effective rate is unjust, unfair, or unreasonable.
(b) The commission ((shall)) may not suspend a promotional tariff.
For the purposes of this section, "promotional tariff" means a tariff
that, for a period of up to ninety days, waives or reduces charges or
conditions of service for existing or new subscribers for the purpose
of retaining or increasing the number of customers who subscribe to or
use a service.
(3) The commission may suspend the initial tariff filing of any
water company or wastewater company removed from and later subject to
commission jurisdiction because of the number of customers or the
average annual gross revenue per customer provisions of RCW 80.04.010.
The commission may allow temporary rates during the suspension period.
These rates ((shall)) may not exceed the rates charged when the company
was last regulated. Upon a showing of good cause by the company, the
commission may establish a different level of temporary rates.
(4) At any hearing involving any change in any schedule,
classification, rule, or regulation the effect of which is to increase
any rate, charge, rental, or toll theretofore charged, the burden of
proof to show that such increase is just and reasonable ((shall be
upon)) is on the public service company.
(5) The implementation of mandatory local measured
telecommunications service is a major policy change in available
telecommunications service. The commission shall not accept for filing
a price list, nor shall it accept for filing or approve, prior to June
1, 2004, a tariff filed by a telecommunications company which imposes
mandatory local measured service on any customer or class of customers,
except that, upon finding that it is in the public interest, the
commission may accept for filing a price list or it may accept for
filing and approve a tariff that imposes mandatory measured service for
a telecommunications company's extended area service or foreign
exchange service. This subsection does not apply to land, air, or
marine mobile service, or to pay telephone service, or to any service
which has been traditionally offered on a measured service basis.
(6) The implementation of Washington telephone assistance program
service is a major policy change in available telecommunications
service. The implementation of Washington telephone assistance program
service will aid in achieving the stated goal of universal telephone
service.
(7) If a utility claims a sales or use tax exemption on the
pollution control equipment for an electrical generation facility and
abandons the generation facility before the pollution control equipment
is fully depreciated, any tariff filing for a rate increase to recover
abandonment costs for the pollution control equipment ((shall be)) is
considered unjust and unreasonable for the purposes of this section.
(8) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12),
the governor may waive or suspend the operation or enforcement of this
section or any portion of this section or under any administrative
rule, and issue any orders to facilitate the operation of state or
local government or to promote and secure the safety and protection of
the civilian population.

Sec. 8 RCW 80.04.160 and 1961 c 14 s 80.04.160 are each amended
to read as follows:
The commission is hereby authorized and empowered to adopt,
promulgate and issue rules and regulations covering the transmission
and delivery of messages and conversations, and the furnishing and
supply of gas, electricity, wastewater, and water, and any and all
services concerning the same, or connected therewith; and generally
such rules as pertain to the comfort and convenience of the public
concerning the subjects treated of in this title. Such rules and
regulations ((shall)) must be promulgated and issued by the commission
on its own motion, and ((shall)) must be served on the public service
company affected thereby as other orders of the commission are served.
Any public service company affected thereby, and deeming such rules and
regulations, or any of them, improper, unjust, unreasonable, or
contrary to law, may within twenty days from the date of service of
such order upon it file objections thereto with the commission,
specifying the particular grounds of such objections. The commission
((shall)) must, upon receipt of such objections, fix a time and place
for hearing the same, and after a full hearing may make such changes or
modifications thereto, if any, as the evidence may justify. The
commission ((shall have)) has, and it is hereby given, power to adopt
rules to govern its proceedings, and to regulate the mode and manner of
all investigations and hearings((: PROVIDED,)). However, no person
desiring to be present at such hearing ((shall)) may be denied
permission. Actions may be instituted to review rules and regulations
promulgated under this section as in the case of orders of the
commission.

Sec. 9 RCW 80.04.250 and 1991 c 122 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission ((shall have)) has power upon complaint or upon
its own motion to ascertain and determine the fair value for rate
making purposes of the property of any public service company used and
useful for service in this state and ((shall)) must exercise such power
whenever it shall deem such valuation or determination necessary or
proper under any of the provisions of this title. In determining what
property is used and useful for providing electric, gas, wastewater, or
water service, the commission may include the reasonable costs of
construction work in progress to the extent that the commission finds
that inclusion is in the public interest.
(2) The commission ((shall have)) has the power to make
revaluations of the property of any public service company from time to
time.
(3) The commission ((shall)) must, before any hearing is had,
notify the complainants and the public service company concerned of the
time and place of such hearing by giving at least thirty days' written
notice thereof, specifying that at the time and place designated a
hearing will be held for the purpose of ascertaining the value of the
company's property, used and useful as aforesaid, which notice
((shall)) must be sufficient to authorize the commission to inquire
into and pass upon the matters designated in this section.

Sec. 10 RCW 80.04.500 and 1985 c 450 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
Nothing in this title ((shall)) authorizes the commission to make
or enforce any order affecting rates, tolls, rentals, contracts or
charges or service rendered, or the adequacy or sufficiency of the
facilities, equipment, instrumentalities or buildings, or the
reasonableness of rules or regulations made, furnished, used, supplied
or in force affecting any telecommunications line, gas plant,
electrical plant, wastewater system, or water system owned and operated
by any city or town, or to make or enforce any order relating to the
safety of any telecommunications line, electrical plant or water system
owned and operated by any city or town, but all other provisions
enumerated herein ((shall)) apply to public utilities owned by any city
or town.

Sec. 11 RCW 80.28.010 and 2008 c 299 s 35 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All charges made, demanded or received by any gas company,
electrical company, wastewater company, or water company for gas,
electricity or water, or for any service rendered or to be rendered in
connection therewith, shall be just, fair, reasonable and sufficient.
Reasonable charges necessary to cover the cost of administering the
collection of voluntary donations for the purposes of supporting the
development and implementation of evergreen community management plans
and ordinances under RCW 80.28.300 ((shall)) must be deemed as prudent
and necessary for the operation of a utility.
(2) Every gas company, electrical company, wastewater company, and
water company ((shall)) must furnish and supply such service,
instrumentalities and facilities as shall be safe, adequate and
efficient, and in all respects just and reasonable.
(3) All rules and regulations issued by any gas company, electrical
company, wastewater company, or water company, affecting or pertaining
to the sale or distribution of its product, ((shall)) must be just and
reasonable.
(4) Utility service for residential space heating shall not be
terminated between November 15 through March 15 if the customer:
(a) Notifies the utility of the inability to pay the bill,
including a security deposit. This notice should be provided within
five business days of receiving a payment overdue notice unless there
are extenuating circumstances. If the customer fails to notify the
utility within five business days and service is terminated, the
customer can, by paying reconnection charges, if any, and fulfilling
the requirements of this section, receive the protections of this
chapter;
(b) Provides self-certification of household income for the prior
twelve months to a grantee of the department of ((community, trade, and
economic development)) commerce, which administers federally funded
energy assistance programs. The grantee ((shall)) must determine that
the household income does not exceed the maximum allowed for
eligibility under the state's plan for low-income energy assistance
under 42 U.S.C. 8624 and ((shall)) must provide a dollar figure that is
seven percent of household income. The grantee may verify information
provided in the self-certification;
(c) Has applied for home heating assistance from applicable
government and private sector organizations and certifies that any
assistance received will be applied to the current bill and future
utility bills;
(d) Has applied for low-income weatherization assistance to the
utility or other appropriate agency if such assistance is available for
the dwelling;
(e) Agrees to a payment plan and agrees to maintain the payment
plan. The plan will be designed both to pay the past due bill by the
following October 15th and to pay for continued utility service. If
the past due bill is not paid by the following October 15, the customer
((shall)) is not ((be)) eligible for protections under this chapter
until the past due bill is paid. The plan ((shall)) may not require
monthly payments in excess of seven percent of the customer's monthly
income plus one-twelfth of any arrearage accrued from the date
application is made and thereafter during November 15 through March 15.
A customer may agree to pay a higher percentage during this period, but
shall not be in default unless payment during this period is less than
seven percent of monthly income plus one-twelfth of any arrearage
accrued from the date application is made and thereafter. If
assistance payments are received by the customer subsequent to
implementation of the plan, the customer ((shall)) must contact the
utility to reformulate the plan; and
(f) Agrees to pay the moneys owed even if he or she moves.
(5) The utility shall:
(a) Include in any notice that an account is delinquent and that
service may be subject to termination, a description of the customer's
duties in this section;
(b) Assist the customer in fulfilling the requirements under this
section;
(c) Be authorized to transfer an account to a new residence when a
customer who has established a plan under this section moves from one
residence to another within the same utility service area;
(d) Be permitted to disconnect service if the customer fails to
honor the payment program. Utilities may continue to disconnect
service for those practices authorized by law other than for nonpayment
as provided for in this subsection. Customers who qualify for payment
plans under this section who default on their payment plans and are
disconnected can be reconnected and maintain the protections afforded
under this chapter by paying reconnection charges, if any, and by
paying all amounts that would have been due and owing under the terms
of the applicable payment plan, absent default, on the date on which
service is reconnected; and
(e) Advise the customer in writing at the time it disconnects
service that it will restore service if the customer contacts the
utility and fulfills the other requirements of this section.
(6) A payment plan implemented under this section is consistent
with RCW 80.28.080.
(7) Every gas company and electrical company shall offer
residential customers the option of a budget billing or equal payment
plan. The budget billing or equal payment plan shall be offered low-income customers eligible under the state's plan for low-income energy
assistance prepared in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 8624(C)(1) without
limiting availability to certain months of the year, without regard to
the length of time the customer has occupied the premises, and without
regard to whether the customer is the tenant or owner of the premises
occupied.
(8) Every gas company, electrical company, wastewater company, and
water company ((shall)) must construct and maintain such facilities in
connection with the manufacture and distribution of its product, or
provision of its services, as will be efficient and safe to its
employees and the public.
(9) An agreement between the customer and the utility, whether oral
or written, ((shall)) does not waive the protections afforded under
this chapter.
(10) In establishing rates or charges for water service, water
companies as defined in RCW 80.04.010 may consider the achievement of
water conservation goals and the discouragement of wasteful water use
practices.

Sec. 12 RCW 80.28.020 and 1961 c 14 s 80.28.020 are each amended
to read as follows:
Whenever the commission shall find, after a hearing had upon its
own motion, or upon complaint, that the rates or charges demanded,
exacted, charged or collected by any gas company, electrical company,
wastewater company, or water company, for gas, electricity, sewerage,
or water, or in connection therewith, or that the rules, regulations,
practices or contracts affecting such rates or charges are unjust,
unreasonable, unjustly discriminatory or unduly preferential, or in any
wise in violation of the provisions of the law, or that such rates or
charges are insufficient to yield a reasonable compensation for the
service rendered, the commission ((shall)) must determine the just,
reasonable, or sufficient rates, charges, regulations, practices or
contracts to be thereafter observed and in force, and ((shall)) must
fix the same by order.

Sec. 13 RCW 80.28.022 and 1991 c 150 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In determining the rates to be charged by each wastewater company
or water company subject to its jurisdiction, the commission may
provide for the funding of a reserve account exclusively for the
purpose of making capital improvements approved by the department of
health as a part of a long-range plan, or required by the department to
assure compliance with federal or state drinking water regulations, or
to perform construction or maintenance required by the department of
ecology to secure safety to life and property under RCW 43.21A.064(2).
Expenditures from the fund ((shall be)) are subject to prior approval
by the commission, and ((shall)) must be treated for rate-making
purposes as customer contributions.

Sec. 14 RCW 80.28.030 and 1989 c 207 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever the commission ((shall)) finds, after such hearing,
that the illuminating or heating power, purity or pressure of gas, the
efficiency of electric lamp supply, the voltage of the current supplied
for light, heat or power, the quality of wastewater discharge, or the
purity, quality, volume, and pressure of water, supplied by any gas
company, electrical company, wastewater company, or water company, as
the case may be, is insufficient, impure, inadequate or inefficient, it
((shall)) must order such improvement in the manufacture, distribution
or supply of gas, in the manufacture, transmission or supply of
electricity, in the operation of the wastewater facilities, or in the
storage, distribution or supply of water, or in the methods employed by
such gas company, electrical company, wastewater company, or water
company, as will in its judgment be efficient, adequate, just and
reasonable. Failure of a water company to comply with state board of
health standards adopted under RCW 43.20.050(2)(a) or department
standards adopted under chapter 70.116 RCW for purity, volume, and
pressure ((shall be)) is prima facie evidence that the water supplied
is insufficient, impure, inadequate, or inefficient.
(2) In ordering improvements in the storage, distribution, or
supply of water, or the operations of a wastewater facility, the
commission ((shall)) must consult and coordinate with the department.
In the event that a wastewater company or water company fails to comply
with an order of the commission in a timely fashion, the commission may
request that the department petition the court to place the company in
receivership.

Sec. 15 RCW 80.28.040 and 1989 c 207 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever the commission ((shall)) finds, after hearing, that
any rules, regulations, measurements or the standard thereof,
practices, acts or services of any such gas company, electrical
company, wastewater company, or water company are unjust, unreasonable,
improper, insufficient, inefficient or inadequate, or that any service
which may be reasonably demanded is not furnished, the commission
((shall)) must fix the reasonable rules, regulations, measurements or
the standard thereof, practices, acts or service to be thereafter
furnished, imposed, observed and followed, and ((shall)) must fix the
same by order or rule.
(2) In ordering improvements to the service of any wastewater
company or water company, the commission ((shall)) must consult and
coordinate with the department. In the event that a wastewater company
or water company fails to comply with an order of the commission within
the deadline specified in the order, the commission may request that
the department petition the court to place the company in receivership.

Sec. 16 RCW 80.28.050 and 1961 c 14 s 80.28.050 are each amended
to read as follows:
Every gas company, electrical company, wastewater company, and
water company ((shall)) must file with the commission and ((shall))
must print and keep open to public inspection schedules in such form as
the commission may prescribe, showing all rates and charges made,
established or enforced, or to be charged or enforced, all forms of
contract or agreement, all rules and regulations relating to rates,
charges or service, used or to be used, and all general privileges and
facilities granted or allowed by such gas company, electrical company,
wastewater company, or water company.

Sec. 17 RCW 80.28.060 and 2008 c 181 s 402 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Unless the commission otherwise orders, no change ((shall)) may
be made in any rate or charge or in any form of contract or agreement
or in any rule or regulation relating to any rate, charge or service,
or in any general privilege or facility which shall have been filed and
published by a gas company, electrical company, wastewater company, or
water company in compliance with the requirements of RCW 80.28.050
except after thirty days' notice to the commission and publication for
thirty days, which notice ((shall)) must plainly state the changes
proposed to be made in the schedule then in force and the time when the
change will go into effect and all proposed changes ((shall)) must be
shown by printing, filing and publishing new schedules, or shall be
plainly indicated upon the schedules in force at the time and kept open
to public inspection. Proposed changes may be suspended by the
commission within thirty days or before the stated effective date of
the proposed change, whichever is later. The commission, for good
cause shown, may allow changes without requiring the thirty days'
notice by duly filing, in such manner as it may direct, an order
specifying the changes so to be made and the time when it ((shall))
takes effect. All such changes ((shall)) must be immediately indicated
upon its schedules by the company affected. When any change is made in
any rate or charge, form of contract or agreement, or any rule or
regulation relating to any rate or charge or service, or in any general
privilege or facility, the effect of which is to increase any rate or
charge, then in existence, attention ((shall)) must be directed on the
copy filed with the commission to such increase by some character
immediately preceding or following the item in such schedule, such
character to be in form as designated by the commission.
(2) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12),
the governor may waive or suspend the operation or enforcement of this
section or any portion of this section or under any administrative
rule, and issue any orders to facilitate the operation of state or
local government or to promote and secure the safety and protection of
the civilian population.

Sec. 18 RCW 80.28.070 and 1961 c 14 s 80.28.070 are each amended
to read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter ((shall be taken to)) prohibits a gas
company, electrical company, wastewater company, or water company from
establishing a sliding scale of charges, whereby a greater charge is
made per unit for a lesser than a greater quantity for gas,
electricity, sewerage, or water, or any service rendered or to be
rendered.

Sec. 19 RCW 80.28.080 and 1985 c 427 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided otherwise in this subsection, no gas
company, electrical company, wastewater company, or water company
((shall)) may charge, demand, collect or receive a greater or less or
different compensation for any service rendered or to be rendered than
the rates and charges applicable to such service as specified in its
schedule filed and in effect at the time, nor ((shall)) may any such
company directly or indirectly refund or remit in any manner or by any
device any portion of the rates or charges so specified, or furnish its
product at free or reduced rates except to its employees and their
families, and its officers, attorneys, and agents; to hospitals,
charitable and eleemosynary institutions and persons engaged in
charitable and eleemosynary work; to indigent and destitute persons; to
national homes or state homes for disabled volunteer soldiers and
soldiers' and sailors' homes((: PROVIDED, That the term)).
For the purposes of this subsection (1):
(i) "Employees" ((as used in this paragraph shall)) includes
furloughed, pensioned and superannuated employees, persons who have
become disabled or infirm in the service of any such company; and ((the
term))
(ii) "Families((,))" ((as used in this paragraph, shall)) includes
the families of those persons named in this proviso, the families of
persons killed or dying in the service, also the families of persons
killed, and the surviving spouse prior to remarriage, and the minor
children during minority of persons who died while in the service of
any of the companies named in this ((paragraph: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That)) subsection (1).
(b) Water companies may furnish free or at reduced rates water for
the use of the state, or for any project in which the state is
interested((: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That)).
(c) Gas companies, electrical companies, wastewater companies, and
water companies may charge the defendant for treble damages awarded in
lawsuits successfully litigated under RCW 80.28.240.
(2) No gas company, electrical company, wastewater company, or
water company ((shall)) may extend to any person or corporation any
form of contract or agreement or any rule or regulation or any
privilege or facility except such as are regularly and uniformly
extended to all persons and corporations under like circumstances.

Sec. 20 RCW 80.28.090 and 1961 c 14 s 80.28.090 are each amended
to read as follows:
No gas company, electrical company, wastewater company, or water
company ((shall)) may make or grant any undue or unreasonable
preference or advantage to any person, corporation, or locality, or to
any particular description of service in any respect whatsoever, or
subject any particular person, corporation or locality or any
particular description of service to any undue or unreasonable
prejudice or disadvantage in any respect whatsoever.

Sec. 21 RCW 80.28.100 and 1961 c 14 s 80.28.100 are each amended
to read as follows:
No gas company, electrical company, wastewater company, or water
company ((shall)) may, directly or indirectly, or by any special rate,
rebate, drawback or other device or method, charge, demand, collect or
receive from any person or corporation a greater or less compensation
for gas, electricity, wastewater services, or water, or for any service
rendered or to be rendered, or in connection therewith, except as
authorized in this chapter, than it charges, demands, collects or
receives from any other person or corporation for doing a like or
contemporaneous service with respect thereto under the same or
substantially similar circumstances or conditions.

Sec. 22 RCW 80.28.110 and 1990 c 132 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every gas company, electrical company, wastewater company, or water
company, engaged in the sale and distribution of gas, electricity or
water or the provision of wastewater services, ((shall)) must, upon
reasonable notice, furnish to all persons and corporations who may
apply therefor and be reasonably entitled thereto, suitable facilities
for furnishing and furnish all available gas, electricity, wastewater
services, and water as demanded, except that a water company ((shall))
may not furnish water contrary to the provisions of water system plans
approved under chapter 43.20 or 70.116 RCW.

Sec. 23 RCW 80.28.120 and 1961 c 14 s 80.28.120 are each amended
to read as follows:
Every gas, water, wastewater, or electrical company owning,
operating or managing a plant or system for the distribution and sale
of gas, water or electricity, or the provision of wastewater services
to the public for hire ((shall be)) is, and ((be)) is held to be, a
public service company as to such plant or system and as to all gas,
water, wastewater services, or electricity distributed or furnished
therefrom, whether such gas, water, wastewater services, or electricity
be sold wholesale or retail or be distributed wholly to the general
public or in part as surplus gas, water or electricity to manufacturing
or industrial concerns or to other public service companies or
municipalities for redistribution. Nothing in this title ((shall)) may
be construed to prevent any gas company, electrical company or water
company from continuing to furnish its product or the use of its lines,
equipment or service under any contract or contracts in force on June
7, 1911, at the rates fixed in such contract or contracts((: PROVIDED,
That)). However, the commission ((shall have)) has power, in its
discretion, to direct by order that such contract or contracts
((shall)) must be terminated by the company party thereto and thereupon
such contract or contracts ((shall)) must be terminated by such company
as and when directed by such order.

Sec. 24 RCW 80.28.130 and 1961 c 14 s 80.28.130 are each amended
to read as follows:
Whenever the commission ((shall)) finds, after hearing had upon its
own motion or upon complaint, that repairs or improvements, to, or
changes in, any gas plant, electrical plant, wastewater facility, or
water system ought to be made, or that any additions or extensions
should reasonably be made thereto, in order to promote the security or
convenience of the public or employees, or in order to secure adequate
service or facilities for manufacturing, distributing or supplying gas,
electricity, wastewater services, or water, the commission may enter an
order directing that such reasonable repairs, improvements, changes,
additions or extensions of such gas plant, electrical plant, wastewater
facility, or water system be made.

Sec. 25 RCW 80.28.140 and 1961 c 14 s 80.28.140 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The commission may appoint inspectors of wastewater measuring
devices and gas and water meters whose duty it ((shall be)) is when
required by the commission to inspect, examine, prove and ascertain the
accuracy of any and all wastewater measuring devices and gas and water
meters used or intended to be used for measuring or ascertaining the
flow or volume of wastewater, the quantity of gas for light, heat or
power, or the quantity of water furnished for any purpose by any public
service company to or for the use of any person or corporation, and
when found to be or made to be correct such inspectors ((shall)) must
seal all such devices or meters and each of them with some suitable
device to be prescribed by the commission.
(2) No public service company ((shall)) may thereafter furnish, set
or put in use any wastewater measurement device or gas or water meter
((which shall not have)) that has not been inspected, proved and sealed
by an inspector of the commission under such rules and regulations as
the commission may prescribe.

Sec. 26 RCW 80.28.160 and 1961 c 14 s 80.28.160 are each amended
to read as follows:
Every gas company, electrical company, wastewater company, and
water company ((shall)) must prepare and maintain such suitable
premises, apparatus and facilities as may be required and approved by
the commission for testing and proving the accuracy of gas, electric or
water meters, or wastewater measurement devices furnished for use by it
by which apparatus every meter or device may be tested.

Sec. 27 RCW 80.28.170 and 1961 c 14 s 80.28.170 are each amended
to read as follows:
If any consumer to whom a meter or measurement device has been
furnished ((shall)) requests the commission in writing to inspect such
meter or device, the commission ((shall)) must have the same inspected
and tested, and if the same, on being so tested, ((shall be)) is found
to be more than four percent if an electric meter, or more than two
percent if a gas meter, or more than two percent if a wastewater
measurement device or more than two percent if a water meter, defective
or incorrect to the prejudice of the consumer, the expense of such
inspection and test ((shall)) must be borne by the gas company,
electrical company, wastewater company, or water company, and if the
same, on being so tested ((shall be)) is found to be correct within the
limits of error prescribed by the provisions of this section, the
expense of such inspection and test ((shall)) must be borne by the
consumer.

Sec. 28 RCW 80.28.185 and 1989 c 207 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission may develop and enter into an agreement with a
county to carry out the regulatory functions of this chapter with
regard to water companies or wastewater companies located within the
boundary of that county. The duration of the agreement, the duties to
be performed, and the remuneration to be paid by the commission are
subject to agreement by the commission and the county.

Sec. 29 RCW 80.28.240 and 1989 c 11 s 30 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A utility may bring a civil action for damages against any
person who commits, authorizes, solicits, aids, abets, or attempts to:
(a) Divert, or cause to be diverted, utility services by any means
whatsoever;
(b) Make, or cause to be made, any connection or reconnection with
property owned or used by the utility to provide utility service
without the authorization or consent of the utility;
(c) Prevent any utility meter or other device used in determining
the charge for utility services from accurately performing its
measuring function by tampering or by any other means;
(d) Tamper with any property owned or used by the utility to
provide utility services; or
(e) Use or receive the direct benefit of all or a portion of the
utility service with knowledge of, or reason to believe that, the
diversion, tampering, or unauthorized connection existed at the time of
the use or that the use or receipt was without the authorization or
consent of the utility.
(2) In any civil action brought under this section, the utility may
recover from the defendant as damages three times the amount of actual
damages, if any, plus the cost of the suit and reasonable attorney's
fees, plus the costs incurred on account of the bypassing, tampering,
or unauthorized reconnection, including but not limited to costs and
expenses for investigation, disconnection, reconnection, service calls,
and expert witnesses.
(3) Any damages recovered under this section in excess of the
actual damages sustained by the utility may be taken into account by
the utilities and transportation commission or other applicable rate-making agency in establishing utility rates.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) "Customer" means the person in whose name a utility service is
provided;
(b) "Divert" means to change the intended course or path of
electricity, gas, or water without the authorization or consent of the
utility;
(c) "Person" means any individual, partnership, firm, association,
or corporation or government agency;
(d) "Reconnection" means the commencement of utility service to a
customer or other person after service has been lawfully disconnected
by the utility;
(e) "Tamper" means to rearrange, injure, alter, interfere with, or
otherwise prevent from performing the normal or customary function;
(f) "Utility" means any electrical company, gas company, wastewater
company, or water company as those terms are defined in RCW 80.04.010,
and includes any electrical, gas, or water system operated by any
public agency; and
(g) "Utility service" means the provision of electricity, gas,
water, or any other service or commodity furnished by the utility for
compensation.

Sec. 30 RCW 80.28.270 and 1991 c 101 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission's jurisdiction over the rates, charges, practices,
acts or services of any water company ((shall)) or wastewater company
include any aspect of line extension, service installation, or service
connection. If the charges for such services are not set forth by
specific amount in the company's tariff filed with the commission
pursuant to RCW 80.28.050, the commission ((shall)) must determine the
fair, just, reasonable, and sufficient charge for such extension,
installation, or connection. In any such proceeding in which there is
no specified tariffed rate, the burden ((shall be)) is on the company
to prove that its proposed charges are fair, just, reasonable, and
sufficient.

Sec. 31 RCW 80.28.275 and 1994 c 292 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
A water company or a wastewater company assuming responsibility for
a water or wastewater system that is not in compliance with state or
federal requirements for public drinking water systems, and its agents
and employees, are immune from lawsuits or causes of action, based on
noncompliance with state or federal requirements for public drinking
water systems, which predate the date of assuming responsibility and
continue after the date of assuming responsibility, provided that the
water company or wastewater company has submitted and is complying with
a plan and schedule of improvements approved by the department of
health. This immunity ((shall)) expires on the earlier of the date the
plan of improvements is completed or four years from the date of
assuming responsibility. This immunity does not apply to intentional
injuries, fraud, or bad faith.

Sec. 32 RCW 80.28.303 and 1994 c 268 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An electrical, gas, wastewater, or water company may file a
conservation service tariff with the commission. The tariff ((shall))
must provide:
(a) The terms and conditions upon which the company will offer the
conservation measures and services specified in the tariff;
(b) The period of time during which the conservation measures and
services will be offered; and
(c) The maximum amount of expenditures to be made during a
specified time period by the company on conservation measures and
services specified in the tariff.
(2) The commission has the same authority with respect to a
proposed conservation service tariff as it has with regard to any other
schedule or classification the effect of which is to change any rate or
charge, including, without limitation, the power granted by RCW
80.04.130 to conduct a hearing concerning a proposed conservation
service tariff and the reasonableness and justness thereof, and pending
such hearing and the decision thereon the commission may suspend the
operation of the tariff for a period not exceeding ten months from the
time the tariff would otherwise go into effect.
(3) An electrical, gas, wastewater, or water company may from time
to time apply to the commission for a determination that specific
expenditures may under its tariff constitute bondable conservation
investment. A company may request this determination by the commission
in separate proceedings for this purpose or in connection with a
general rate case. The commission may designate the expenditures as
bondable conservation investment as defined in RCW 80.28.005(1) if it
finds that such designation is in the public interest.
(4) The commission ((shall)) must include in rate base all bondable
conservation investment. The commission ((shall)) must approve rates
for service by electrical, gas, wastewater, and water companies at
levels sufficient to recover all of the expenditures of the bondable
conservation investment included in rate base and the costs of equity
and debt capital associated therewith, including, without limitation,
the payment of principal, premium, if any, and interest on conservation
bonds. The rates so determined may be included in general rate
schedules or may be expressed in one or more separate rate schedules.
The commission ((shall)) may not revalue bondable conservation
investment for rate-making purposes, to determine that revenues
required to recover bondable conservation investment and associated
equity and debt capital costs are unjust, unreasonable, or in any way
impair or reduce the value of conservation investment assets or that
would impair the timing or the amount of revenues arising with respect
to conservation investment assets that have been pledged to secure
conservation bonds.
(5) Nothing in this chapter precludes the commission from adopting
or continuing other conservation policies and programs intended to
provide incentives for and to encourage utility investment in improving
the efficiency of energy or water end use. However, the policies or
programs shall not impair conservation investment assets. This chapter
is not intended to be an exclusive or mandatory approach to
conservation programs for electrical, gas, wastewater, and water
companies, and no such company is obligated to file conservation
service tariffs under this chapter, to apply to the commission for a
determination that conservation costs constitute bondable conservation
investment within the meaning of this chapter, or to issue conservation
bonds.
(6)(a) If a customer of an electrical, gas, wastewater, or water
company for whose benefit the company made expenditures for
conservation measures or services ceases to be a customer of such
company for one or more of the following reasons, the commission may
require that the portion of such conservation expenditures that had
been included in rate base but not theretofore recovered in the rates
of such company be removed from the rate base of the company:
(i) The customer ceases to be a customer of the supplier of energy,
wastewater services, or water, and the customer repays to the company
the portion of the conservation expenditures made for the benefit of
such customer that has not theretofore been recovered in rates of the
company; or
(ii) The company sells its property used to serve such customer and
the customer ceases to be a customer of the company as a result of such
action.
(b) An electrical, gas, wastewater, or water company may include in
a contract for a conservation measure or service, and the commission
may by rule or order require to be included in such contracts, a
provision requiring that, if the customer ceases to be a customer of
that supplier of energy or water or wastewater services, the customer
((shall)) must repay to the company the portion of the conservation
expenditures made for the benefit of such customer that has not
theretofore been recovered in rates of the company.

Sec. 33 RCW 80.28.306 and 1994 c 268 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Electrical, gas, wastewater, and water companies, or finance
subsidiaries, may issue conservation bonds upon approval by the
commission.
(2) Electrical, gas, wastewater, and water companies, or finance
subsidiaries may pledge conservation investment assets as collateral
for conservation bonds by obtaining an order of the commission
approving an issue of conservation bonds and providing for a security
interest in conservation investment assets. A security interest in
conservation investment assets is created and perfected only upon entry
of an order by the commission approving a contract governing the
granting of the security interest and the filing with the department of
licensing of a UCC-1 financing statement, showing such pledgor as
"debtor" and identifying such conservation investment assets and the
bondable conservation investment associated therewith. The security
interest is enforceable against the debtor and all third parties,
subject to the rights of any third parties holding security interests
in the conservation investment assets perfected in the manner described
in this section, if value has been given by the purchasers of
conservation bonds. An approved security interest in conservation
investment assets is a continuously perfected security interest in all
revenues and proceeds arising with respect to the associated bondable
conservation investment, whether or not such revenues have accrued.
Upon such approval, the priority of such security interest ((shall))
must be as set forth in the contract governing the conservation bonds.
Conservation investment assets constitute property for the purposes of
contracts securing conservation bonds whether or not the related
revenues have accrued.
(3) The relative priority of a security interest created under this
section is not defeated or adversely affected by the commingling of
revenues arising with respect to conservation investment assets with
other funds of the debtor. The holders of conservation bonds ((shall))
have a perfected security interest in all cash and deposit accounts of
the debtor in which revenues arising with respect to conservation
investment assets pledged to such holders have been commingled with
other funds, but such perfected security interest is limited to an
amount not greater than the amount of such revenues received by the
debtor within twelve months before (a) any default under the
conservation bonds held by the holders or (b) the institution of
insolvency proceedings by or against the debtor, less payments from
such revenues to the holders during such twelve-month period. If an
event of default occurs under an approved contract governing
conservation bonds, the holders of conservation bonds or their
authorized representatives, as secured parties, may foreclose or
otherwise enforce the security interest in the conservation investment
assets securing the conservation bonds, subject to the rights of any
third parties holding prior security interests in the conservation
investment assets perfected in the manner provided in this section.
Upon application by the holders ((of [or])) or their representatives,
without limiting their other remedies, the commission ((shall)) must
order the sequestration and payment to the holders or their
representatives of revenues arising with respect to the conservation
investment assets pledged to such holders. Any such order ((shall))
must remain in full force and effect notwithstanding any bankruptcy,
reorganization, or other insolvency proceedings with respect to the
debtor. Any surplus in excess of amounts necessary to pay principal,
premium, if any, interest, and expenses arising under the contract
governing the conservation bonds ((shall)) must be remitted to the
debtor electrical, gas, wastewater, or water company or the debtor
finance subsidiary.
(4) The granting, perfection, and enforcement of security interests
in conservation investment assets to secure conservation bonds is
governed by this chapter rather than by chapter ((62A.9)) 62A.9A RCW.
(5) A transfer of conservation investment assets by an electrical,
gas, wastewater, or water company to a finance subsidiary, which such
parties have in the governing documentation expressly stated to be a
sale or other absolute transfer, in a transaction approved in an order
issued by the commission and in connection with the issuance by such
finance subsidiary of conservation bonds, ((shall)) must be treated as
a true sale, and not as a pledge or other financing, of such
conservation investment assets. According the holders of conservation
bonds a preferred right to revenues of the electrical, gas, wastewater,
or water company, or the provision by such company of other credit
enhancement with respect to conservation bonds, does not impair or
negate the characterization of any such transfer as a true sale.
(6) Any successor to an electrical, gas, wastewater, or water
company pursuant to any bankruptcy, reorganization, or other insolvency
proceeding ((shall)) must perform and satisfy all obligations of the
company under an approved contract governing conservation bonds, in the
same manner and to the same extent as such company before any such
proceeding, including, without limitation, collecting and paying to the
bondholders or their representatives revenues arising with respect to
the conservation investment assets pledged to secure the conservation
bonds.

Sec. 34 RCW 36.94.110 and 1967 c 72 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
After adoption of the sewerage and/or water general plan, all
municipal corporations and private utilities within the plan area
((shall)) must abide by and adhere to the plan for the future
development of their systems. A municipal corporation or private
utility, including a wastewater company as defined in RCW 80.04.010,
may petition for amendments to the plan. Whenever the governing
authority of any county or counties or any municipal corporation deems
it to be for the public interest to amend the sewerage and/or water
general plan for such county or counties, notice shall be filed with
the board or boards of county commissioners. Upon such notice, the
board or boards ((shall)) must initiate consideration of any amendment
requested relating to the plan and proceed as provided in this chapter
for the adoption of an original plan.

--- END ---