BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.60A RCW
to read as follows:
The director is required to carry out a pilot program to assess the
benefits, feasibility, and advisability of using service dogs for the
treatment or rehabilitation of veterans with physical or mental
injuries or disabilities, including posttraumatic stress disorder.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.60A RCW
to read as follows:
The director shall carry out the pilot program by partnering with
nonprofit organizations that:
(1) Have experience providing service dogs to individuals with
injuries or disabilities;
(2) Do not charge fees for the dogs, services, or lodging that the
nonprofit organizations provide; and
(3) Are accredited by a generally accepted, industry-standard
accrediting institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.60A RCW
to read as follows:
The director shall reimburse partners for costs relating to the
pilot program as follows:
(1) For the first fifty service dogs provided under the pilot
program, all costs relating to the provision of the dogs.
(2) For any service dogs provided under the pilot program after the
first fifty service dogs are provided, all costs relating to the
provision of every other dog.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.60A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As part of the pilot program, the director must provide a
service dog to a number of veterans with physical or mental injuries or
disabilities that is greater than or equal to the greater of:
(a) Two hundred; or
(b) The minimum number of such veterans required to produce
scientifically valid results with respect to assessing the benefits and
costs of the use of the service dogs for the treatment or
rehabilitation of such veterans.
(2) The director shall ensure that:
(a) Half of the participants in the pilot program are veterans who
suffer primarily from a mental health injury or disability; and
(b) Half of the participants in the pilot program are veterans who
suffer primarily from a physical injury or disability.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.60A RCW
to read as follows:
In carrying out the pilot program, the director shall conduct a
scientifically valid research study of the costs and benefits
associated with the use of service dogs for the treatment or
rehabilitation of veterans with physical or mental injuries or
disabilities. The matters studied must include the following:
(1) The therapeutic benefits to such veterans, including the
quality of life benefits reported by such veterans partaking in the
pilot program.
(2) The economic benefits of using service dogs for the treatment
or rehabilitation of such veterans, including:
(a) Savings on health care costs, including savings relating to
reductions in hospitalization and reduction in the use of prescription
drugs; and
(b) Productivity and employment gains for such veterans; and
(3) The effectiveness of using service dogs to prevent suicide.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.60A RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning by July 1, 2011, and by every July 1st thereafter, the
director shall submit to the appropriate committees of the legislature
a report on the findings of the director with respect to the pilot
program.

--- END ---