BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.03.015 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 5 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(2) "Director" means the director of ecology.
(3) "Municipal water supplier" means an entity that supplies water
for municipal water supply purposes.
(4) "Municipal water supply purposes" means a beneficial use of
water: (a) For residential purposes through fifteen or more
residential service connections or for providing residential use of
water for a nonresidential population that is, on average, at least
twenty-five people for at least sixty days a year; (b) for governmental
or governmental proprietary purposes by a city, town, public utility
district, port district, county, sewer district, or water district; or
(c) indirectly for the purposes in (a) or (b) of this subsection
through the delivery of treated or raw water to a public water system
for such use. If water is beneficially used under a water right for
the purposes listed in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection, any other
beneficial use of water under the right generally associated with the
use of water within a municipality is also for "municipal water supply
purposes," including, but not limited to, beneficial use for
commercial, industrial, irrigation of parks and open spaces,
institutional, landscaping, fire flow, water system maintenance and
repair, or related purposes. If a governmental entity holds a water
right that is for the purposes listed in (a), (b), or (c) of this
subsection, its use of water or its delivery of water for any other
beneficial use generally associated with the use of water within a
municipality is also for "municipal water supply purposes," including,
but not limited to, beneficial use for commercial, industrial,
irrigation of parks and open spaces, institutional, landscaping, fire
flow, water system maintenance and repair, or related purposes.
(5) "Person" means any firm, association, water users' association,
corporation, irrigation district, or municipal corporation, as well as
an individual.

--- END ---