BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.113 and 2008 c 139 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of licensing shall provide a statement whereby the
licensee may certify his or her unwillingness to make an anatomical
gift under RCW 68.64.030, as now or hereafter amended. The department
shall provide the statement and ensure that the opt-out anatomical gift
under this section is clear, visible, and prominently displayed in at
least one of the following ways:
(1) On each driver's license; or
(2) With each driver's license; or
(3) With each in-person driver's license application.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.1131 and 2008 c 139 s 28 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall electronically transfer the information of all
persons who upon application for a driver's license or identicard
volunteer to donate organs or tissue to a registry created in RCW
68.64.200, and any subsequent changes to the applicant's donor status
when the applicant renews a driver's license or identicard or applies
for a new driver's license or identicard. The department shall assume
that all persons who apply for a driver's license or identicard are
willing to be organ and tissue donors, unless the applicant indicates
otherwise as provided in RCW 46.20.113.

Sec. 3 RCW 68.64.040 and 2008 c 139 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A donor may make an anatomical gift:
(a) By authorizing a statement or symbol indicating that the donor
has made an anatomical gift to be imprinted on the donor's driver's
license or identification card. An anatomical gift is assumed to have
been made by all driver's license and identification card holders
unless otherwise indicated as provided in RCW 46.20.113;
(b) In a will;
(c) During a terminal illness or injury of the donor, by any form
of communication addressed to at least two adults, at least one of whom
is a disinterested witness; or
(d) As provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) A donor or other person authorized to make an anatomical gift
under RCW 68.64.030 may make a gift by a donor card or other record
signed by the donor or other person making the gift or by authorizing
that a statement or symbol indicating that the donor has made an
anatomical gift be included on a donor registry. If the donor or other
person is physically unable to sign a record, the record may be signed
by another individual at the direction of the donor or other person and
must:
(a) Be witnessed by at least two adults, at least one of whom is a
disinterested witness, who have signed at the request of the donor or
the other person; and
(b) State that it has been signed and witnessed as provided in (a)
of this subsection.
(3) Revocation, suspension, expiration, or cancellation of a
driver's license or identification card through which an anatomical
gift has been made does not invalidate the gift.
(4) An anatomical gift made by will takes effect upon the donor's
death whether or not the will is probated. Invalidation of the will
after the donor's death does not invalidate the gift.

--- END ---