BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.64.120 and 2006 c 164 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the employer and
ferry system employee organizations, through their collective
bargaining representatives, shall meet at reasonable times((,)) to
negotiate in good faith with respect to wages, hours, working
conditions, and insurance, ((and health care benefits as limited by RCW
47.64.270,)) and other matters mutually agreed upon. Employer funded
retirement benefits shall be provided under the public employees
retirement system under chapter 41.40 RCW and shall not be included in
the scope of collective bargaining. Except as provided under RCW
47.64.270, the employer is not required to bargain over health care
benefits.
(2) Upon ratification of bargaining agreements, ferry employees are
entitled to an amount equivalent to the interest earned on retroactive
compensation increases. For purposes of this section, the interest
earned on retroactive compensation increases is the same monthly rate
of interest that was earned on the amount of the compensation increases
while held in the state treasury. The interest will be computed for
each employee until the date the retroactive compensation is paid, and
must be allocated in accordance with appropriation authority. The
interest earned on retroactive compensation is not considered part of
the ongoing compensation obligation of the state and is not
compensation earnable for the purposes of chapter 41.40 RCW.
Negotiations shall also include grievance procedures for resolving any
questions arising under the agreement, which shall be embodied in a
written agreement and signed by the parties.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, if a conflict
exists between an executive order, administrative rule, or agency
policy relating to wages, hours, and terms and conditions of employment
and a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this chapter,
the collective bargaining agreement shall prevail. A provision of a
collective bargaining agreement that conflicts with the terms of a
statute is invalid and unenforceable.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.64.270 and 2006 c 164 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The employer and one coalition of all the exclusive bargaining
representatives subject to this chapter and chapter 41.80 RCW shall
conduct negotiations regarding the dollar amount expended on behalf of
each employee for health care benefits.
(2) Absent a collective bargaining agreement to the contrary, the
department of transportation shall provide contributions to insurance
and health care plans for ferry system employees and dependents, as
determined by the state health care authority, under chapter 41.05
RCW((; and)).
(3) The employer and employee organizations may collectively
bargain for ((other)) insurance ((and health care)) plans other than
health care benefits, and employer contributions may exceed that of
other state agencies as provided in RCW 41.05.050. ((To the extent
that ferry employees by bargaining unit have absorbed the required
offset of wage increases by the amount that the employer's contribution
for employees' and dependents' insurance and health care plans exceeds
that of other state general government employees in the 1985-87 fiscal
biennium, employees shall not be required to absorb a further offset
except to the extent the differential between employer contributions
for those employees and all other state general government employees
increases during any subsequent fiscal biennium. If such differential
increases in the 1987-89 fiscal biennium or the 1985-87 offset by
bargaining unit is insufficient to meet the required deduction, the
amount available for compensation shall be reduced by bargaining unit
by the amount of such increase or the 1985-87 shortage in the required
offset. Compensation shall include all wages and employee benefits.))

Sec. 3 RCW 47.64.320 and 2006 c 164 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The mediator, arbitrator, or arbitration panel may consider
only matters that are subject to bargaining under this chapter, except
that health care benefits are not subject to interest arbitration.
(2) The decision of an arbitrator or arbitration panel is not
binding on the legislature and, if the legislature does not approve the
funds necessary to implement provisions pertaining to compensation and
fringe benefit provisions of an arbitrated collective bargaining
agreement, is not binding on the state, the department of
transportation, or the ferry employee organization.
(3) In making its determination, the arbitrator or arbitration
panel shall be mindful of the legislative purpose under RCW 47.64.005
and 47.64.006 and, as additional standards or guidelines to aid it in
reaching a decision, shall take into consideration the following
factors:
(a) Past collective bargaining contracts between the parties
including the bargaining that led up to the contracts;
(b) The constitutional and statutory authority of the employer;
(c) Stipulations of the parties;
(d) The results of the salary survey as required in RCW 47.64.220;
(e) Comparison of wages, hours, employee benefits, and conditions
of employment of the involved ferry employees with those of public and
private sector employees in states along the west coast of the United
States, including Alaska, and in British Columbia doing directly
comparable but not necessarily identical work, giving consideration to
factors peculiar to the area and the classifications involved;
(f) Changes in any of the foregoing circumstances during the
pendency of the proceedings;
(g) The limitations on ferry toll increases and operating subsidies
as may be imposed by the legislature; and
(h) Other factors that are normally or traditionally taken into
consideration in the determination of matters that are subject to
bargaining under this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.80.020 and 2002 c 354 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the matters
subject to bargaining include wages, hours, and other terms and
conditions of employment, and the negotiation of any question arising
under a collective bargaining agreement.
(2) The employer is not required to bargain over matters pertaining
to:
(a) Health care benefits or other employee insurance benefits,
except as required in subsection (3) of this section;
(b) Any retirement system or retirement benefit; or
(c) Rules of the director of personnel or the Washington personnel
resources board adopted under section 203, chapter 354, Laws of 2002.
(3) Matters subject to bargaining include the number of names to be
certified for vacancies, promotional preferences, and the dollar amount
expended on behalf of each employee for health care benefits. However,
except as provided otherwise in this subsection for institutions of
higher education, negotiations regarding the number of names to be
certified for vacancies, promotional preferences, and the dollar amount
expended on behalf of each employee for health care benefits shall be
conducted between the employer and one coalition of all the exclusive
bargaining representatives subject to this chapter. The exclusive
bargaining representatives for employees that are subject to chapter
47.64 RCW shall bargain the dollar amount expended on behalf of each
employee for health care benefits with the employer as part of the
coalition under this subsection. Any such provision agreed to by the
employer and the coalition shall be included in all master collective
bargaining agreements negotiated by the parties. For institutions of
higher education, promotional preferences and the number of names to be
certified for vacancies shall be bargained under the provisions of RCW
41.80.010(4).
(4) The employer and the exclusive bargaining representative shall
not agree to any proposal that would prevent the implementation of
approved affirmative action plans or that would be inconsistent with
the comparable worth agreement that provided the basis for the salary
changes implemented beginning with the 1983-1985 biennium to achieve
comparable worth.
(5) The employer and the exclusive bargaining representative shall
not bargain over matters pertaining to management rights established in
RCW 41.80.040.
(6) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, if a conflict
exists between an executive order, administrative rule, or agency
policy relating to wages, hours, and terms and conditions of employment
and a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this chapter,
the collective bargaining agreement shall prevail. A provision of a
collective bargaining agreement that conflicts with the terms of a
statute is invalid and unenforceable.
(7) This section does not prohibit bargaining that affects
contracts authorized by RCW 41.06.142.

--- END ---