BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The department of transportation shall
review its administrative rules that pertain to transporting farm
implements, with special attention to WAC 468-38-290(3)(b) that
establishes a blanket restriction on transporting farm implements over
fourteen feet in height on the holder of a farm implement special
permit. In conducting this review, the department shall invite
representatives of farmers, farm equipment dealers, the Washington
state patrol's commercial vehicle enforcement office, and other
interested stakeholders to participate. The department shall consider
whether there are specific areas in the state where there is a need for
transporting farm implements that exceed fourteen feet in height, and
an ability to provide an exception to the fourteen-foot height
limitation without causing damage to road overpasses and other overhead
obstructions. The department is encouraged to conduct this review in
a timely manner so that any rule changes can be implemented
expeditiously.
The department shall provide a written report of the findings and
conclusions of its review to the legislative committees with
jurisdiction over transportation and agricultural issues by December 1,
2010.

--- END ---