BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that out-of-state
businesses that do not have a physical presence in Washington earn
significant income from Washington residents from providing services or
collecting royalties on the use of intangible property in this state.
The legislature further finds that these businesses receive significant
benefits and opportunities provided by the state, such as: Laws
providing protection of business interests or regulating consumer
credit; access to courts and judicial process to enforce business
rights, including debt collection and intellectual property rights; an
orderly and regulated marketplace; and police and fire protection and
a transportation system benefiting in-state agents and other
representatives of out-of-state businesses. Therefore, the legislature
intends to extend the state's business and occupation tax to these
companies to ensure that they pay their fair share of the cost of
services that this state renders and the infrastructure it provides.
(2)(a) The legislature also finds that the current cost
apportionment method in RCW 82.04.460(1) for apportioning most service
income has been difficult for both taxpayers and the department to
apply due in large part (i) to the difficulty in assigning certain
costs of doing business inside or outside of this state, and (ii) to
its dissimilarity with the apportionment methods used in other states
for their business activity taxes.
(b) The legislature further finds that there is a trend among
states to adopt a single factor apportionment formula based on sales.
The legislature recognizes that adoption of a sales factor only
apportionment method has the advantages of simplifying apportionment
and making Washington a more attractive place for businesses to expand
their property and payroll. For these reasons, the legislature adopts
single factor sales apportionment for purposes of apportioning royalty
income and certain service income.
(c) Nothing in this act may be construed, however, to authorize
apportionment of the gross income or value of products taxable under
the following business and occupation tax classifications: Retailing,
wholesaling, manufacturing, processing for hire, extracting, extracting
for hire, printing, government contracting, public road construction,
the classifications in RCW 82.04.280 (2), (4), (6), and (7), and any
other activity not specifically included in the definition of
apportionable activities in RCW 82.04.460.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.220 and 1961 c 15 s 82.04.220 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) There is levied and ((shall be)) collected from every person
that has substantial nexus with this state a tax for the act or
privilege of engaging in business activities. ((Such)) The tax ((shall
be)) is measured by the application of rates against value of products,
gross proceeds of sales, or gross income of the business, as the case
may be.
(2) A person who has substantial nexus with this state in any tax
year will be deemed to have substantial nexus with this state for the
following four tax years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Engaging within this state" and "engaging within the state," when
used in connection with any apportionable activity as defined in RCW
82.04.460, means that a person generates gross income of the business
from sources within this state, such as customers or intangible
property located in this state, regardless of whether the person is
physically present in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person engaging in business is deemed to have substantial
nexus with this state if the person is:
(a) An individual and is a resident or domiciliary of this state;
(b) A business entity and is organized or commercially domiciled in
this state; or
(c) A nonresident individual or a business entity that is organized
or commercially domiciled outside this state, and in any tax year the
person has:
(i) More than fifty thousand dollars of property in this state;
(ii) More than fifty thousand dollars of payroll in this state;
(iii) More than five hundred thousand dollars of receipts from this
state; or
(iv) At least twenty-five percent of the person's total property,
total payroll, or total receipts in this state.
(2)(a) Property counting toward the thresholds in subsection
(1)(c)(i) and (iv) of this section is the average value of the
taxpayer's property, including intangible property, owned or rented and
used in this state during the tax year.
(b)(i) Property owned by the taxpayer, other than loans and credit
card receivables owned by the taxpayer, is valued at its original cost
basis. Loans and credit card receivables owned by the taxpayer are
valued at their outstanding principal balance, without regard to any
reserve for bad debts. However, if a loan or credit card receivable is
charged off in whole or in part for federal income tax purposes, the
portion of the loan or credit card receivable charged off is deducted
from the outstanding principal balance.
(ii) Property rented by the taxpayer is valued at eight times the
net annual rental rate. For purposes of this subsection, "net annual
rental rate" means the annual rental rate paid by the taxpayer less any
annual rental rate received by the taxpayer from subrentals.
(c) The average value of property must be determined by averaging
the values at the beginning and ending of the tax year; but the
department may require the averaging of monthly values during the tax
year if reasonably required to properly reflect the average value of
the taxpayer's property.
(d)(i) For purposes of this subsection (2), loans and credit card
receivables are deemed owned and used in this state as follows:
(A) Loans secured by real property, personal property, or both real
and personal property, are deemed owned and used in the state if the
real property or personal property securing the loan is located within
this state. If the property securing the loan is located both within
this state and one or more other states, the loan is deemed owned and
used in this state if more than fifty percent of the fair market value
of the real or personal property is located within this state. If more
than fifty percent of the fair market value of the real or personal
property is not located within any one state, then the loan is deemed
owned and used in this state if the borrower is located in this state.
The determination of whether the real or personal property securing a
loan is located within this state must be made, as of the time the
original agreement was made, and any and all subsequent substitutions
of collateral must be disregarded.
(B) Loans not secured by real or personal property are deemed owned
and used in this state if the borrower is located in this state.
(C) Credit card receivables are deemed owned and used in this state
if the billing address of the cardholder is in this state.
(ii) The definitions in section 6 of this act apply to this
subsection.
(e) Notwithstanding anything else to the contrary in this
subsection, property counting toward the thresholds in subsection
(1)(c)(i) and (iv) of this section does not include a person's
ownership of, or rights in, computer software as defined in RCW
82.04.215, including computer software used in providing a digital
automated service; master copies of software; and digital goods and
digital codes residing on servers located in this state.
(3)(a) Payroll counting toward the thresholds in subsection
(1)(c)(ii) and (iv) of this section is the total amount paid by the
taxpayer for compensation in this state during the tax year plus
nonemployee compensation paid to representative third parties in this
state. Nonemployee compensation paid to representative third parties
includes the gross amount paid to nonemployees who represent the
taxpayer in interactions with the taxpayer's clients and includes sales
commissions.
(b) Compensation is paid in this state if the compensation is
properly reportable to this state for unemployment compensation tax
purposes, regardless of whether the compensation was actually reported
to this state.
(c) Nonemployee compensation is paid in this state if the service
performed by the representative third party occurs entirely or
primarily within this state.
(d) For purposes of this subsection, "compensation" means wages,
salaries, commissions, and any other form of remuneration paid to
employees and defined as gross income under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 61 of the
federal internal revenue code of 1986, as existing on July 1, 2010.
(4) Receipts counting toward the thresholds in subsection
(1)(c)(iii) and (iv) of this section are those amounts included in the
numerator of the receipts factor under sections 5 and 6 of this act.
(5)(a) Each December, the department must review the cumulative
percentage change in the consumer price index. The department must
adjust the thresholds in subsection (1)(c)(i) through (iii) of this
section if the consumer price index has changed by five percent or more
since the later of July 1, 2010, or the date that the thresholds were
last adjusted under this subsection. For purposes of determining the
cumulative percentage change in the consumer price index, the
department must compare the consumer price index available as of
December 1st of the current year with the consumer price index as of
the later of July 1, 2010, or the date that the thresholds were last
adjusted under this subsection. The thresholds must be adjusted to
reflect that cumulative percentage change in the consumer price index.
The adjusted thresholds must be rounded to the nearest one thousand
dollars. Any adjustment will apply to tax periods that begin after the
adjustment is made.
(b) As used in this subsection, "consumer price index" means the
consumer price index for all urban consumers (CPI-U) available from the
bureau of labor statistics of the United States department of labor.
(6) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, a
person is not subject to taxes imposed under this chapter on any
activity not included in the definition of apportionable activities in
RCW 82.04.460, unless the person has a physical presence in this state,
which need only be demonstrably more than a slightest presence. For
purposes of this subsection, a person is physically present in this
state if the person has property or employees in this state or the
person, either directly or through an agent or other representative,
engages in activities in this state that are significantly associated
with the person's ability to establish or maintain a market for its
products in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The apportionable income of a person within the scope of RCW
82.04.460(1) is apportioned to Washington by multiplying its
apportionable income by the receipts factor. Persons who are subject
to tax under more than one of the tax classifications enumerated in RCW
82.04.460(3)(a) (i) through (ix) must calculate a separate receipts
factor for each tax classification that the person is taxable under.
(2) For purposes of subsection (1) of this section, the receipts
factor is a fraction and is calculated as provided in subsections (3)
and (4) of this section and section 6 of this act.
(3)(a) The numerator of the receipts factor is the total gross
income of the business of the taxpayer attributable to this state
during the tax year from engaging in an apportionable activity. The
denominator of the receipts factor is the total gross income of the
business of the taxpayer from engaging in an apportionable activity
everywhere in the world during the tax year.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, for purposes of
computing the receipts factor, gross income of the business generated
from each apportionable activity is attributable to the state:
(i) Where the customer received the benefit of the taxpayer's
service or, in the case of gross income from royalties, where the
customer used the taxpayer's intangible property.
(ii) If the customer received the benefit of the service or used
the intangible property in more than one state, gross income of the
business must be attributed to the state in which the benefit of the
service was primarily received or in which the intangible property was
primarily used.
(iii) If the taxpayer is unable to attribute gross income of the
business under the provisions of (b)(i) or (ii) of this subsection (3),
gross income of the business must be attributed to the state from which
the customer ordered the service or, in the case of royalties, the
office of the customer from which the royalty agreement with the
taxpayer was negotiated.
(iv) If the taxpayer is unable to attribute gross income of the
business under the provisions of (b)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this
subsection (3), gross income of the business must be attributed to the
state to which the billing statements or invoices are sent to the
customer by the taxpayer.
(v) If the taxpayer is unable to attribute gross income of the
business under the provisions of (b)(i), (ii), (iii), or (iv) of this
subsection (3), gross income of the business must be attributed to the
state from which the customer sends payment to the taxpayer.
(vi) If the taxpayer is unable to attribute gross income of the
business under the provisions of (b)(i), (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of
this subsection (3), gross income of the business must be attributed to
the state where the customer is located as indicated by the customer's
address: (A) Shown in the taxpayer's business records maintained in
the regular course of business; or (B) obtained during consummation of
the sale or the negotiation of the contract for services or for the use
of the taxpayer's intangible property, including any address of a
customer's payment instrument when readily available to the taxpayer
and no other address is available.
(vii) If the taxpayer is unable to attribute gross income of the
business under the provisions of (b)(i), (ii), (iii), (iv), (v), or
(vi) of this subsection (3), gross income of the business must be
attributed to the commercial domicile of the taxpayer.
(viii) For purposes of this subsection (3)(b), "customer" means a
person or entity to whom the taxpayer makes a sale or renders services
or from whom the taxpayer otherwise receives gross income of the
business. "Customer" includes anyone who pays royalties or charges in
the nature of royalties for the use of the taxpayer's intangible
property.
(c) Gross income of the business from engaging in an apportionable
activity must be excluded from the denominator of the receipts factor
if, in respect to such activity, at least some of the activity is
performed in this state, and the gross income is attributable under (b)
of this subsection (3) to a state in which the taxpayer is not taxable.
For purposes of this subsection (3)(c), "not taxable" means that the
taxpayer is not subject to a business activities tax by that state,
except that a taxpayer is taxable in a state in which it would be
deemed to have substantial nexus with that state under the standards in
section 4(1) of this act regardless of whether that state imposes such
a tax. "Business activities tax" means a tax measured by the amount
of, or economic results of, business activity conducted in a state.
The term includes taxes measured in whole or in part on net income or
gross income or receipts. "Business activities tax" does not include
a sales tax, use tax, or a similar transaction tax, imposed on the sale
or acquisition of goods or services, whether or not denominated a gross
receipts tax or a tax imposed on the privilege of doing business.
(d) This subsection (3) does not apply to financial institutions
with respect to apportionable income taxable under RCW 82.04.290.
Financial institutions must calculate the receipts factor as provided
in section 6 of this act and subsection (4) of this section with
respect to apportionable income taxable under RCW 82.04.290. For
purposes of this subsection, "financial institution" has the same
meaning as in section 6 of this act.
(4) A taxpayer may calculate the receipts factor for the current
tax year based on the most recent calendar year for which information
is available for the full calendar year. If a taxpayer does not
calculate the receipts factor for the current tax year based on
previous calendar year information as authorized in this subsection,
the business must use current year information to calculate the
receipts factor for the current tax year. In either case, a taxpayer
must correct the reporting for the current tax year when complete
information is available to calculate the receipts factor for that
year, but not later than October 31st of the following tax year.
Interest will apply to any additional tax due on a corrected tax
return. Interest must be assessed at the rate provided for delinquent
excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, retroactively to the date the
original return was due, and will accrue until the additional taxes are
paid. Penalties as provided in RCW 82.32.090 will apply to any such
additional tax due only if the current tax year reporting is not
corrected and the additional tax is not paid by October 31st of the
following tax year. Interest as provided in RCW 82.32.060 will apply
to any tax paid in excess of that properly due on a return as a result
of a taxpayer using previous calendar year data or incomplete current-year data to calculate the receipts factor.
(5) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this section.
(a) "Apportionable activities" and "apportionable income" have the
same meaning as in RCW 82.04.460.
(b) "State" has the same meaning as in section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A financial institution must, for purposes of apportioning
gross income of the business taxable under RCW 82.04.290 using the
apportionment method provided in section 5(1) of this act, calculate
the receipts factor as provided in this section and section 5(4) of
this act. Financial institutions that are subject to tax under any
other tax classification enumerated in RCW 82.04.460(3)(a) (i) through
(v) and (vii) through (ix) must calculate a separate receipts factor,
as provided in section 5 of this act, for each of the other tax
classifications that the financial institution is taxable under.
(2)(a)(i) The numerator of the receipts factor includes gross
income from interest, fees, and penalties on loans secured by real
property, personal property, or both real and personal property, if the
real or personal property is located within this state. If the
property securing the loan is located both within this state and one or
more other states, the income described in this subsection (2)(a)(i) is
included in the numerator of the receipts factor if more than fifty
percent of the fair market value of the real or personal property is
located within this state. If more than fifty percent of the fair
market value of the real or personal property is not located within any
one state, then the income described in this subsection (2)(a)(i) is
included in the numerator of the receipts factor if the borrower is
located in this state.
(ii) The denominator of the receipts factor includes gross income
from interest, fees, and penalties on loans secured by real property,
personal property, or both real and personal property, wherever the
property is located.
(iii) The determination of whether the real or personal property
securing a loan is located within this state must be made as of the
time the original agreement was made and any and all subsequent
substitutions of collateral must be disregarded.
(b) The numerator of the receipts factor includes gross income from
interest, fees, and penalties on loans not secured by real or personal
property if the borrower is located in this state. The denominator of
the receipts factor includes gross income from interest, fees, and
penalties on loans that are not secured by real or personal property,
regardless of where the borrower is located.
(c) The receipts factor includes gross income from net gains, which
may not be less than zero, on the sale of loans. Net gains on the sale
of loans includes income recorded under the coupon stripping rules of
26 U.S.C. Sec. 1286 of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as
existing on July 1, 2010.
(i) The amount of net gains, which may not be less than zero, on
the sale of loans secured by real property, personal property, or both
real and personal property, included in the numerator of the receipts
factor is determined by multiplying such net gains by a fraction. The
numerator of the fraction is the amount included in the numerator of
the receipts factor under (a) of this subsection (2). The denominator
of the fraction is the amount included in the denominator of the
receipts factor under (a) of this subsection (2).
(ii) The amount of net gains, which may not be less than zero, from
the sale of loans not secured by real or personal property included in
the numerator of the receipts factor is determined by multiplying such
net gains by a fraction. The numerator of the fraction is the amount
included in the numerator of the receipts factor under (b) of this
subsection (2). The denominator of the fraction is the amount included
in the denominator of the receipts factor under (b) of this subsection
(2).
(iii) The denominator of the receipts factor includes gross income
from net gains, which may not be less than zero, on all sales of loans.
(d) Loan servicing fees are included in the receipts factor as
provided in (d)(i) and (ii) of this subsection (2).
(i)(A)(I) The numerator of the receipts factor includes gross
income from loan servicing fees derived from loans secured by real
property, personal property, or both real and personal property,
multiplied by a fraction. The numerator of the fraction is the amount
included in the numerator of the receipts factor under (a) of this
subsection (2). The denominator of the fraction is the amount included
in the denominator of the receipts factor under (a) of this subsection
(2).
(II) The denominator of the receipts factor includes gross income
from all loan servicing fees derived from loans secured by real
property, personal property, or both real and personal property.
(B)(I) The numerator of the receipts factor includes gross income
from loan servicing fees derived from loans not secured by real or
personal property multiplied by a fraction. The numerator of the
fraction is the amount included in the numerator of the receipts factor
under (b) of this subsection (2). The denominator of the fraction is
the amount included in the denominator of the receipts factor under (b)
of this subsection (2).
(II) The denominator of the receipts factor includes gross income
from all loan servicing fees derived from loans not secured by real or
personal property.
(ii) If the financial institution receives loan servicing fees for
servicing either the secured or the unsecured loans of another, the
numerator of the receipts factor includes such fees if the borrower is
located in this state. The denominator of the receipts factor includes
all such fees.
(e)(i) Interest, dividends, net gains (which may not be less than
zero), and other income from investment assets and activities and from
trading assets and activities, as provided in this subsection (2)(e),
are included in the receipts factor. Investment assets and activities
and trading assets and activities include but are not limited to:
Investment securities; trading account assets; federal funds;
securities purchased and sold under agreements to resell or repurchase;
options; futures contracts; forward contracts; notional principal
contracts such as swaps; equities; and foreign currency transactions.
(ii) The numerator of the receipts factor includes gross income
from interest, dividends, net gains (which may not be less than zero),
and other receipts from investment assets and activities and from
trading assets and activities described in (e)(i) of this subsection
(2) that are attributable to this state. The denominator of the
receipts factor includes all such gross income wherever earned.
(A) The amount of interest, dividends, net gains (which may not be
less than zero), and other income from investment assets and activities
in the investment account to be attributed to this state and included
in the numerator of the receipts factor is determined by multiplying
all such income from such assets and activities by a fraction. The
numerator of the fraction is the average value of such assets that are
properly assigned to a regular place of business of the financial
institution within this state. The denominator of the fraction is the
average value of all such assets.
(B)(I) The amount of interest from federal funds sold and purchased
and from securities purchased under resale agreements and securities
sold under repurchase agreements attributable to this state and
included in the numerator of the receipts factor is determined by
multiplying the amount described in (e)(ii)(B)(II) of this subsection
(2) from such funds and such securities by a fraction. The numerator
of the fraction is the average value of federal funds sold and
securities purchased under agreements to resell that are properly
assigned to a regular place of business of the financial institution
within this state. The denominator of the fraction is the average
value of all such funds and such securities.
(II) The amount used for purposes of making the calculation in
(e)(ii)(B)(I) of this subsection (2) is the amount by which interest
from federal funds sold and securities purchased under resale
agreements exceeds interest expense on federal funds purchased and
securities sold under repurchase agreements.
(C)(I) The amount of interest, dividends, gains and other income
from trading assets and activities, including but not limited to assets
and activities in the matched book, in the arbitrage book, and foreign
currency transactions, but excluding amounts described in (e)(ii)(A) or
(B) of this subsection (2), attributable to this state and included in
the numerator of the receipts factor is determined by multiplying the
amount described in (e)(ii)(C)(II) of this subsection (2) by a
fraction. The numerator of the fraction is the average value of such
trading assets that are properly assigned to a regular place of
business of the financial institution within this state. The
denominator of the fraction is the average value of all such assets.
(II) The amount used for purposes of making the calculation in
(e)(ii)(C)(I) of this subsection (2) is the amount by which interest,
dividends, gains and other receipts from trading assets and activities,
including but not limited to assets and activities in the matched book,
in the arbitrage book, and foreign currency transactions, exceed
amounts paid in lieu of interest, amounts paid in lieu of dividends,
and losses from such assets and activities.
(D) For purposes of this subsection (2)(e)(ii), average value must
be determined using the rules for determining the average value of
property set forth in section 4(2) of this act.
(iii) In lieu of using the method set forth in (e)(ii) of this
subsection (2), the financial institution may elect, or the department
may require, in order to fairly represent the business activity of the
financial institution in this state, the use of the method set forth in
this subsection (2)(e)(iii).
(A) The amount of interest, dividends, net gains (which may not be
less than zero), and other income from investment assets and activities
in the investment account to be attributed to this state and included
in the numerator of the receipts factor is determined by multiplying
all such income from such assets and activities by a fraction. The
numerator of the fraction is the gross income from such assets and
activities that are properly assigned to a regular place of business of
the financial institution within this state. The denominator of the
fraction is the gross income from all such assets and activities.
(B) The amount of interest from federal funds sold and purchased
and from securities purchased under resale agreements and securities
sold under repurchase agreements attributable to this state and
included in the numerator of the receipts factor is determined by
multiplying the amount described in (e)(ii)(B)(II) of this subsection
(2) from such funds and such securities by a fraction. The numerator
of the fraction is the gross income from such funds and such securities
that are properly assigned to a regular place of business of the
financial institution within this state. The denominator of the
fraction is the gross income from all such funds and such securities.
(C) The amount of interest, dividends, gains and other receipts
from trading assets and activities, including but not limited to assets
and activities in the matched book, in the arbitrage book, and foreign
currency transactions, but excluding amounts described in (e)(ii)(A) or
(B) of this subsection (2), attributable to this state and included in
the numerator of the receipts factor is determined by multiplying the
amount described in (e)(ii)(C)(II) of this subsection (2) by a
fraction. The numerator of the fraction is the gross income from such
trading assets and activities that are properly assigned to a regular
place of business of the financial institution within this state. The
denominator of the fraction is the gross income from all such assets
and activities.
(iv) If the financial institution elects or is required by the
department to use the method set forth in (e)(iii) of this subsection
(2), it must use this method for subsequent tax returns unless the
financial institution receives prior permission from the department to
use, or the department requires, a different method.
(v) The financial institution has the burden of proving that an
investment asset or activity or trading asset or activity was properly
assigned to a regular place of business outside of this state by
demonstrating that the day-to-day decisions regarding the asset or
activity occurred at a regular place of business outside this state.
If the day-to-day decisions regarding an investment asset or activity
or trading asset or activity occur at more than one regular place of
business and one such regular place of business is in this state and
one such regular place of business is outside this state, such asset or
activity is considered to be located at the regular place of business
of the financial institution where the investment or trading policies
or guidelines with respect to the asset or activity are established.
Such policies and guidelines are presumed, subject to rebuttal by
preponderance of the evidence, to be established at the commercial
domicile of the financial institution.
(f) The numerator of the receipts factor includes gross income from
interest, fees, and penalties on credit card receivables, and gross
income from fees charged to cardholders, such as annual fees, if the
billing address of the cardholder is in this state. The denominator of
the receipts factor includes gross income from interest, fees, and
penalties on all credit card receivables, and gross income from fees
charged to all cardholders, such as annual fees.
(g)(i) The numerator of the receipts factor includes gross income
from net gains, which may not be less than zero, from the sale of
credit card receivables multiplied by a fraction. The numerator of the
fraction is the amount included in the numerator of the receipts factor
under (f) of this subsection (2). The denominator of the fraction is
the amount included in the denominator of the receipts factor under (f)
of this subsection (2).
(ii) The denominator of the receipts factor includes gross income
from net gains, which may not be less than zero, from all sales of
credit card receivables.
(h)(i) The numerator of the receipts factor includes gross income
from all credit card issuer's reimbursement fees multiplied by a
fraction. The numerator of the fraction is the amount included in the
numerator of the receipts factor under (f) of this subsection (2). The
denominator of the fraction is the amount included in the denominator
of the receipts factor under (f) of this subsection (2).
(ii) The denominator of the receipts factor includes gross income
from all credit card issuer's reimbursement fees.
(i) The numerator of the receipts factor includes gross income from
merchant discounts if the commercial domicile of the merchant is in
this state. The denominator of the receipts factor includes gross
income from all merchant discounts. For purposes of this subsection
(2)(i), gross income must be computed net of any cardholder charge
backs but may not be reduced by any interchange transaction fees or by
any issuer's reimbursement fees paid to another for charges made by its
cardholders.
(j) Apportionable income that would be attributable under this
subsection (2) to a state in which the financial institution is not
taxable must be excluded from the denominator of the receipts factor if
at least some of the activity that generated the income is performed in
this state, and the gross income is attributable under this subsection
(2) to a state in which the taxpayer is not taxable. For purposes of
this subsection (2)(j), "not taxable" has the same meaning as in
section 5 of this act.
(k)(i) The numerator of the receipts factor includes apportionable
income taxable under RCW 82.04.290 and not otherwise included in the
receipts factor under this subsection (2) if the activity producing the
apportionable income is performed in this state. If the activity is
performed both inside and outside this state, the numerator of the
receipts factor includes apportionable income taxable under RCW
82.04.290 and not otherwise included in the receipts factor under this
subsection (2) if a greater proportion of the activity producing the
apportionable income is performed in this state based on cost of
performance.
(ii) The denominator of the receipts factor includes apportionable
income taxable under RCW 82.04.290 from activities performed
everywhere, where the apportionable income taxable under RCW 82.04.290
is not otherwise included in the receipts factor under this subsection
(2).
(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section,
the definitions in the multistate tax commission's recommended formula
for the apportionment and allocation of net income of financial
institutions, adopted November 17, 1994, as existing on the effective
date of this act, apply to this section.
(4) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this section.
(a) "Apportionable income" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.04.460.
(b) "Credit card" means a card or device existing for the purpose
of obtaining money, property, labor, or services on credit.
(c) "Financial institution" has the same meaning as in WAC 458-20-14601. However, the department may not make any substantive changes to
the definition of "financial institution" in WAC 458-20-14601 unless
the changes implement a legislative amendment to this definition of
financial institution.
(d) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of
Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, any territory or possession
of the United States, or any foreign country or political subdivision
of a foreign country.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.04.2907 and 2009 c 535 s 407 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
receiving income from royalties ((or charges in the nature of royalties
for the granting of intangible rights, such as copyrights, licenses,
patents, or franchise fees)), the amount of tax with respect to
((such)) the business ((shall be)) is equal to the gross income from
royalties ((or charges in the nature of royalties from the business))
multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "gross income from royalties"
means compensation for the use of intangible property, ((such as))
including charges in the nature of royalties, regardless of where the
intangible property will be used. For purposes of this subsection,
"intangible property" includes copyrights, patents, licenses,
franchises, trademarks, trade names, and similar items. ((It)) "Gross
income from royalties" does not include compensation for any natural
resource, the licensing of prewritten computer software to the end
user, or the licensing ((or use)) of digital goods, digital codes, or
digital automated services to the end user as defined in RCW
82.04.190(11).

Sec. 8 RCW 82.04.460 and 2004 c 174 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, any person
((rendering services)) earning apportionable income taxable under ((RCW
82.04.290 or 82.04.2908)) this chapter and ((maintaining places of
business both within and without this state which contribute to the
rendition of such services shall)) also taxable in another state, must,
for the purpose of computing tax liability under ((RCW 82.04.290 or
82.04.2908)) this chapter, apportion to this state, in accordance with
section 5 of this act, that portion of the person's ((gross))
apportionable income ((which is)) derived from ((services rendered))
business activities performed within this state. ((Where such
apportionment cannot be accurately made by separate accounting methods,
the taxpayer shall apportion to this state that proportion of the
taxpayer's total income which the cost of doing business within the
state bears to the total cost of doing business both within and without
the state.))
(2) ((Notwithstanding the provision of subsection (1) of this
section, persons doing business both within and without the state who
receive gross income from service charges, as defined in RCW 63.14.010
(relating to amounts charged for granting the right or privilege to
make deferred or installment payments) or who receive gross income from
engaging in business as financial institutions within the scope of
chapter 82.14A RCW (relating to city taxes on financial institutions)
shall apportion or allocate gross income taxable under RCW 82.04.290 to
this state pursuant to rules promulgated by the department consistent
with uniform rules for apportionment or allocation developed by the
states.
(3))) The department ((shall)) may by rule provide a method or
methods of apportioning or allocating gross income derived from sales
of telecommunications service and competitive telephone service((s))
taxed under this chapter, if the gross proceeds of sales subject to tax
under this chapter do not fairly represent the extent of the taxpayer's
income attributable to this state. ((The rules shall be, so far as
feasible, consistent with the methods of apportionment contained in
this section and shall require the consideration of those facts,
circumstances, and apportionment factors as will result in an equitable
and constitutionally permissible division of the services.)) The rule
must provide for an equitable and constitutionally permissible division
of the tax base.
(3) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply
unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Apportionable income" means gross income of the business
generated from engaging in apportionable activities, including income
received from apportionable activities performed outside this state if
the income would be taxable under this chapter if received from
activities in this state, less the exemptions and deductions allowable
under this chapter. For purposes of this subsection, "apportionable
activities" means only those activities taxed under:
(i) RCW 82.04.255;
(ii) RCW 82.04.260 (3), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), (10), and (13);
(iii) RCW 82.04.280(5);
(iv) RCW 82.04.285;
(v) RCW 82.04.286;
(vi) RCW 82.04.290;
(vii) RCW 82.04.2907;
(viii) RCW 82.04.2908; and
(ix) RCW 82.04.260(14), 82.04.263, and 82.04.280(1), but only to
the extent of any activity that would be taxable under any of the
provisions enumerated under (a)(i) through (viii) of this subsection
(3) if the tax classifications in RCW 82.04.260(14), 82.04.263, and
82.04.280(1) did not exist.
(b)(i) "Taxable in another state" means that the taxpayer is
subject to a business activities tax by another state on its income
received from engaging in apportionable activities; or the taxpayer is
not subject to a business activities tax by another state on its income
received from engaging in apportionable activities, but any other state
has jurisdiction to subject the taxpayer to a business activities tax
on such income under the substantial nexus standards in section 4(1) of
this act.
(ii) For purposes of this subsection (3)(b):
(A) "Business activities tax" has the same meaning as in section 5
of this act; and
(B) "State" has the same meaning as in section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, if any provision of this act or its application to any
person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the
application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not
affected.
(2) If a court of competent jurisdiction, in a final judgment not
subject to appeal, adjudges any provision of section 4(1)(c) of this
act unconstitutional or otherwise invalid, this act is null and void in
its entirety.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act applies with respect to gross
income of the business, as defined in RCW 82.04.080, including gross
income from royalties as defined in RCW 82.04.2907, generated on and
after July 1, 2010. For purposes of calculating the thresholds in
section 4(1)(c) of this act for the 2010 tax year, property, payroll,
and receipts are based on the entire 2010 tax year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---