BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that recently adopted
energy efficiency standards for residential structures
disproportionately and negatively impact small businesses supporting
the construction industry in this state. These standards are complex
and will be challenging for building code officials and contractors to
implement. The legislature further finds that the cost of compliance
with these new residential standards is excessive, especially in this
difficult economic climate, and that the proposed benefits of these
standards do not outweigh the costs. Finally, the legislature is
concerned that these standards may subject the state to litigation risk
due to questions raised about federal preemption. Therefore, for the
following reasons, the legislature intends to nullify the state
building code council's recently adopted rules for residential
structures, WAC 51-11-0900 and 51-11-0901, including table 9-1 which
are amendments to the state energy code for residential structures.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.27A.020 and 2009 c 423 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in section 3 of this act, the state building
code council shall adopt rules to be known as the Washington state
energy code as part of the state building code.
(2) The council shall follow the legislature's standards set forth
in this section to adopt rules to be known as the Washington state
energy code. The Washington state energy code shall be designed to:
(a) Construct increasingly energy efficient homes and buildings
that help achieve the broader goal of building zero fossil-fuel
greenhouse gas emission homes and buildings by the year 2031;
(b) Require new buildings to meet a certain level of energy
efficiency, but allow flexibility in building design, construction, and
heating equipment efficiencies within that framework; and
(c) Allow space heating equipment efficiency to offset or
substitute for building envelope thermal performance.
(3) The Washington state energy code shall take into account
regional climatic conditions. Climate zone 1 shall include all
counties not included in climate zone 2. Climate zone 2 includes:
Adams, Chelan, Douglas, Ferry, Grant, Kittitas, Lincoln, Okanogan, Pend
Oreille, Spokane, Stevens, and Whitman counties.
(4) The Washington state energy code for residential buildings
shall be the 2006 edition of the Washington state energy code, or as
amended by rule by the council.
(5) The minimum state energy code for new nonresidential buildings
shall be the Washington state energy code, 2006 edition, or as amended
by the council by rule.
(6)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the Washington
state energy code for residential structures shall preempt the
residential energy code of each city, town, and county in the state of
Washington.
(b) The state energy code for residential structures does not
preempt a city, town, or county's energy code for residential
structures which exceeds the requirements of the state energy code and
which was adopted by the city, town, or county prior to March 1, 1990.
Such cities, towns, or counties may not subsequently amend their energy
code for residential structures to exceed the requirements adopted
prior to March 1, 1990.
(7) The state building code council shall consult with the
department of ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce
as provided in RCW 34.05.310 prior to publication of proposed rules.
The director of the department of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce shall recommend to the state building code
council any changes necessary to conform the proposed rules to the
requirements of this section.
(8) The state building code council shall evaluate and consider
adoption of the international energy conservation code in Washington
state in place of the existing state energy code.
(9) The definitions in RCW 19.27A.140 apply throughout this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 19.27A RCW
to read as follows:
WAC 51-11-0900 and 51-11-0901 requiring additional residential
energy efficiency requirements for dwellings as adopted by the state
building code council on November 20, 2009, are null and void and do
not take effect on or after July 1, 2010.

--- END ---