BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.14.370 and 2009 c 511 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a rural county may impose a sales
and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is
in addition to other taxes authorized by law and ((shall)) must be
collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event
within the county. The rate of tax ((shall)) may not exceed 0.09
percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of the
article used in the case of a use tax, except that for rural counties
with population densities between sixty and one hundred persons per
square mile, the rate ((shall)) may not exceed 0.04 percent before
January 1, 2000.
(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section ((shall))
must be deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be
collected or paid over to the department ((of revenue)) under chapter
82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department ((of revenue shall)) must perform
the collection of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the
county.
(3)(a) Moneys collected under this section ((shall)) may only be
used to finance public facilities serving economic development purposes
in rural counties and finance personnel in economic development
offices. The public facility must be listed as an item in the
officially adopted county overall economic development plan, or the
economic development section of the county's comprehensive plan, or the
comprehensive plan of a city or town located within the county for
those counties planning under RCW 36.70A.040. For those counties that
do not have an adopted overall economic development plan and do not
plan under the growth management act, the public facility must be
listed in the county's capital facilities plan or the capital
facilities plan of a city or town located within the county.
(b) In implementing this section, the county ((shall)) must consult
with cities, towns, and port districts located within the county and
the associate development organization serving the county to ensure
that the expenditure meets the goals of chapter 130, Laws of 2004 and
the requirements of (a) of this subsection. Each county collecting
money under this section ((shall)) must report, as follows, to the
office of the state auditor, within one hundred fifty days after the
close of each fiscal year: (i) A list of new projects begun during the
fiscal year, showing that the county has used the funds for those
projects consistent with the goals of chapter 130, Laws of 2004 and the
requirements of (a) of this subsection; and (ii) expenditures during
the fiscal year on projects begun in a previous year. Any projects
financed prior to June 10, 2004, from the proceeds of obligations to
which the tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section has been
pledged ((shall)) are not ((be)) deemed to be new projects under this
subsection. No new projects funded with money collected under this
section may be for justice system facilities.
(c) The definitions in this section apply throughout this section.
(i) "Public facilities" means bridges, roads, domestic and
industrial water facilities, sanitary sewer facilities, earth
stabilization, storm sewer facilities, railroad, electricity, natural
gas, buildings, structures, telecommunications infrastructure,
transportation infrastructure, or commercial infrastructure, and port
facilities in the state of Washington.
(ii) "Economic development purposes" means those purposes which
facilitate the creation or retention of businesses and jobs in a
county.
(iii) "Economic development office" means an office of a county,
port districts, or an associate development organization as defined in
RCW 43.330.010, which promotes economic development purposes within the
county.
(4) No tax may be collected under this section before July 1, 1998.
(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, no tax may be
collected under this section by a county more than twenty-five years
after the date that a tax is first imposed under this section.
(b) For counties imposing the tax at the rate of 0.09 percent
before August 1, 2009, the tax expires on the date that is twenty-five
years after the date that the 0.09 percent tax rate was first imposed
by that county.
(5) For purposes of this section, "rural county" means a county
with a population density of less than one hundred persons per square
mile or a county smaller than two hundred twenty-five square miles as
determined by the office of financial management and published each
year by the department for the period July 1st to June 30th.
(6) The funding mechanism under this section is known as, and cited
as, the "state rural county credit." After the effective date of this
act, the department and counties, must refer to the funding mechanism
under this section in any forms, publications, or any other documents,
either newly created or updated, by the term "state rural county
credit."

Sec. 2 RCW 82.14.0485 and 1995 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 101 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a county with a population of one
million or more may impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the
terms of this chapter. The tax is in addition to other taxes
authorized by law and ((shall)) must be collected from those persons
who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon
the occurrence of any taxable event within the county. The rate of tax
((shall)) may not exceed 0.017 percent of the selling price in the case
of a sales tax or value of the article used in the case of a use tax.
(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section ((shall))
must be deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be
collected or paid over to the department of revenue under chapter 82.08
or 82.12 RCW. The department ((of revenue shall)) must perform the
collection of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the
county.
(3) Moneys collected under this section ((shall)) may only be used
for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments on bonds
issued by a county to construct a baseball stadium.
(4) No tax may be collected under this section before January 1,
1996, and no tax may be collected under this section unless the taxes
under RCW 82.14.360 are being collected. The tax imposed in this
section ((shall)) expires when the bonds issued for the construction of
the baseball stadium are retired, but not more than twenty years after
the tax is first collected.
(5) As used in this section, "baseball stadium" means a baseball
stadium with natural turf and a retractable roof or canopy, together
with associated parking facilities, constructed in the largest city in
a county with a population of one million or more.
(6) The funding mechanism under this section is known as, and cited
as, the "state baseball stadium credit." After the effective date of
this act, the department and counties must refer to the funding
mechanism under this section in any forms, publications, or any other
documents, either newly created or updated, by the term "state baseball
stadium credit."

Sec. 3 RCW 82.14.390 and 2008 c 48 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, the
governing body of a public facilities district (a) created before July
31, 2002, under chapter 35.57 or 36.100 RCW that commences construction
of a new regional center, or improvement or rehabilitation of an
existing new regional center, before January 1, 2004; (b) created
before July 1, 2006, under chapter 35.57 RCW in a county or counties in
which there are no other public facilities districts on June 7, 2006,
and in which the total population in the public facilities district is
greater than ninety thousand that commences construction of a new
regional center before February 1, 2007; (c) created under the
authority of RCW 35.57.010(1)(d); or (d) created before September 1,
2007, under chapter 35.57 or 36.100 RCW, in a county or counties in
which there are no other public facilities districts on July 22, 2007,
and in which the total population in the public facilities district is
greater than seventy thousand, that commences construction of a new
regional center before January 1, 2009, or before January 1, 2011, in
the case of a new regional center in a county designated by the
president as a disaster area in December 2007, may impose a sales and
use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is in
addition to other taxes authorized by law and ((shall)) must be
collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event
within the public facilities district. The rate of tax ((shall)) may
not exceed 0.033 percent of the selling price in the case of a sales
tax or value of the article used in the case of a use tax.
(2)(a) The governing body of a public facilities district imposing
a sales and use tax under the authority of this section may increase
the rate of tax up to 0.037 percent if, within three fiscal years of
July 1, 2008, the department determines that, as a result of RCW
82.14.490 and the chapter 6, Laws of 2007 amendments to RCW 82.14.020,
a public facilities district's sales and use tax collections for fiscal
years after July 1, 2008, have been reduced by a net loss of at least
0.50 percent from the fiscal year before July 1, 2008. The fiscal year
in which this section becomes effective is the first fiscal year after
July 1, 2008.
(b) The department ((shall)) must determine sales and use tax
collection net losses under this section as provided in RCW 82.14.500
(2) and (3). The department ((shall)) must provide written notice of
its determinations to public facilities districts. Determinations by
the department of a public facilities district's sales and use tax
collection net losses as a result of RCW 82.14.490 and the chapter 6,
Laws of 2007 amendments to RCW 82.14.020 are final and not appealable.
(c) A public facilities district may increase its rate of tax after
it has received written notice from the department as provided in (b)
of this subsection. The increase in the rate of tax must be made in
0.001 percent increments and must be the least amount necessary to
mitigate the net loss in sales and use tax collections as a result of
RCW 82.14.490 and the chapter 6, Laws of 2007 amendments to RCW
82.14.020. The increase in the rate of tax is subject to RCW
82.14.055.
(3) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section ((shall))
must be deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be
collected or paid over to the department ((of revenue)) under chapter
82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department ((of revenue shall)) must perform
the collection of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the
public facilities district.
(4) No tax may be collected under this section before August 1,
2000. The tax imposed in this section ((shall)) expires when the bonds
issued for the construction of the regional center and related parking
facilities are retired, but not more than twenty-five years after the
tax is first collected.
(5) Moneys collected under this section ((shall)) may only be used
for the purposes set forth in RCW 35.57.020 and must be matched with an
amount from other public or private sources equal to thirty-three
percent of the amount collected under this section, provided that
amounts generated from nonvoter approved taxes authorized under chapter
35.57 RCW or nonvoter approved taxes authorized under chapter 36.100
RCW ((shall)) do not constitute a public or private source. For the
purpose of this section, public or private sources includes, but is not
limited to cash or in-kind contributions used in all phases of the
development or improvement of the regional center, land that is donated
and used for the siting of the regional center, cash or in-kind
contributions from public or private foundations, or amounts attributed
to private sector partners as part of a public and private partnership
agreement negotiated by the public facilities district.
(6) The combined total tax levied under this section ((shall)) may
not be greater than 0.037 percent. If both a public facilities
district created under chapter 35.57 RCW and a public facilities
district created under chapter 36.100 RCW impose a tax under this
section, the tax imposed by a public facilities district created under
chapter 35.57 RCW ((shall)) must be credited against the tax imposed by
a public facilities district created under chapter 36.100 RCW.
(7) A public facilities district created under chapter 36.100 RCW
is not eligible to impose the tax under this section if the legislative
authority of the county where the public facilities district is located
has imposed a sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.0485 or 82.14.0494.
(8) The funding mechanism under this section is known as, and cited
as, the "state public facilities district credit." After the effective
date of this act, the department and public facilities districts, must
refer to the funding mechanism under this section in any forms,
publications, or any other documents, either newly created or updated,
by the term "state public facilities district credit."

Sec. 4 RCW 82.14.0494 and 1997 c 220 s 204 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a county that has created a public
stadium authority to develop a stadium and exhibition center under RCW
36.102.050 may impose a sales and use tax in accordance with this
chapter. The tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by law and
((shall)) must be collected from those persons who are taxable by the
state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any
taxable event within the county. The rate of tax ((shall be)) is 0.016
percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of the
article used in the case of a use tax.
(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section ((shall))
must be deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be
collected or paid over to the department ((of revenue)) under chapter
82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department ((of revenue shall)) must perform
the collection of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the
county.
(3) Before the issuance of bonds in RCW 43.99N.020, all revenues
collected on behalf of the county under this section ((shall)) must be
transferred to the public stadium authority. After bonds are issued
under RCW 43.99N.020, all revenues collected on behalf of the county
under this section ((shall)) must be deposited in the stadium and
exhibition center account under RCW 43.99N.060.
(4) The definitions in RCW 36.102.010 apply to this section.
(5) This section expires on the earliest of the following dates:
(a) December 31, 1999, if the conditions for issuance of bonds
under RCW 43.99N.020 have not been met before that date;
(b) The date on which all bonds issued under RCW 43.99N.020 have
been retired; or
(c) Twenty-three years after the date the tax under this section is
first imposed.
(6) The funding mechanism under this section is known as, and cited
as, the "state stadium and exhibition center credit." After the
effective date of this act, the department, any counties, and a public
stadium authority must refer to the funding mechanism under this
section in any forms, publications, or any other documents, either
newly created or updated, by the term "state stadium and exhibition
center credit."

Sec. 5 RCW 82.14.415 and 2009 c 550 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of any city that is located in a
county with a population greater than six hundred thousand that annexes
an area consistent with its comprehensive plan required by chapter
36.70A RCW((,)) may impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the
terms of this chapter. The tax is in addition to other taxes
authorized by law and ((shall)) must be collected from those persons
who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon
the occurrence of any taxable event within the city. The tax may only
be imposed by a city if:
(a) The city has commenced annexation of an area having a
population of at least ten thousand people, or four thousand in the
case of a city described under subsection (3)(a)(i) of this section,
prior to January 1, 2015; and
(b) The city legislative authority determines by resolution or
ordinance that the projected cost to provide municipal services to the
annexation area exceeds the projected general revenue that the city
would otherwise receive from the annexation area on an annual basis.
(2) The tax authorized under this section is a credit against the
state tax under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department ((of
revenue shall)) must perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of
the city at no cost to the city and ((shall)) must remit the tax to the
city as provided in RCW 82.14.060.
(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the maximum
rate of tax any city may impose under this section is:
(i) 0.1 percent for each annexed area in which the population is
greater than ten thousand and less than twenty thousand. The ten
thousand population threshold in this subsection (3)(a)(i) is four
thousand for a city with a population between one hundred fifteen
thousand and one hundred forty thousand and located within a county
with a population over one million five hundred thousand; and
(ii) 0.2 percent for an annexed area in which the population is
greater than twenty thousand.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2011, the maximum rate of tax imposed under
this section is 0.85 percent for an annexed area in which the
population is greater than eighteen thousand if the annexed area was,
prior to November 1, 2008, officially designated as a potential
annexation area by more than one city, one of which has a population
greater than four hundred thousand.
(4)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the maximum
cumulative rate of tax a city may impose under subsection (3)(a) of
this section is 0.2 percent for the total number of annexed areas the
city may annex.
(b) The maximum cumulative rate of tax a city may impose under
subsection (3)(a) of this section is 0.3 percent, beginning July 1,
2011, if the city commenced annexation of an area, prior to January 1,
2010, that would have otherwise allowed the city to increase the rate
of tax imposed under this section absent the rate limit imposed in (a)
of this subsection.
(c) The maximum cumulative rate of tax a city may impose under
subsection (3)(b) of this section is 0.85 percent for the single
annexed area the city may annex and the amount of tax distributed to a
city under subsection (3)(b) of this section ((shall)) may not exceed
five million dollars per fiscal year.
(5) The tax imposed by this section ((shall)) may only be imposed
at the beginning of a fiscal year and ((shall)) continues for no more
than ten years from the date that each increment of the tax is first
imposed. Tax rate increases due to additional annexed areas ((shall
be)) are effective on July 1st of the fiscal year following the fiscal
year in which the annexation occurred, provided that notice is given to
the department as set forth in subsection (9) of this section.
(6) All revenue collected under this section ((shall)) must be used
solely to provide, maintain, and operate municipal services for the
annexation area.
(7) The revenues from the tax authorized in this section may not
exceed that which the city deems necessary to generate revenue equal to
the difference between the city's cost to provide, maintain, and
operate municipal services for the annexation area and the general
revenues that the cities would otherwise expect to receive from the
annexation during a year. If the revenues from the tax authorized in
this section and the revenues from the annexation area exceed the costs
to the city to provide, maintain, and operate municipal services for
the annexation area during a given year, the city ((shall)) must notify
the department and the tax distributions authorized in this section
((shall)) must be suspended for the remainder of the year.
(8) No tax may be imposed under this section before July 1, 2007.
Before imposing a tax under this section, the legislative authority of
a city ((shall)) must adopt an ordinance that includes the following:
(a) A certification that the amount needed to provide municipal
services to the annexed area reflects the city's true and actual costs;
(b) The rate of tax under this section that ((shall be)) is imposed
within the city; and
(c) The threshold amount for the first fiscal year following the
annexation and passage of the ordinance.
(9) The tax ((shall)) must cease to be distributed to the city for
the remainder of the fiscal year once the threshold amount has been
reached. No later than March 1st of each year, the city ((shall)) must
provide the department with a certification of the city's true and
actual costs to provide municipal services to the annexed area, a new
threshold amount for the next fiscal year, and notice of any applicable
tax rate changes. Distributions of tax under this section ((shall))
begin again on July 1st of the next fiscal year and continue until the
new threshold amount has been reached or June 30th, whichever is
sooner. Any revenue generated by the tax in excess of the threshold
amount ((shall)) belongs to the state of Washington. Any amount
resulting from the threshold amount less the total fiscal year
distributions, as of June 30th, ((shall)) may not be carried forward to
the next fiscal year.
(10) The tax ((shall)) must cease to be distributed to a city
imposing the tax under subsection (3)(b) of this section for the
remainder of the fiscal year, if the total distributions to the city
imposing the tax exceed five million dollars for the fiscal year.
(11) The following definitions apply throughout this section unless
the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Annexation area" means an area that has been annexed to a city
under chapter 35.13 or 35A.14 RCW. "Annexation area" includes all
territory described in the city resolution.
(b) "Commenced annexation" means the initiation of annexation
proceedings has taken place under the direct petition method or the
election method under chapter 35.13 or 35A.14 RCW.
(c) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(d) "Municipal services" means those services customarily provided
to the public by city government.
(e) "Fiscal year" means the year beginning July 1st and ending the
following June 30th.
(f) "Potential annexation area" means one or more geographic areas
that a city has officially designated for potential future annexation,
as part of its comprehensive plan adoption process under the state
growth management act, chapter 36.70A RCW.
(g) "Threshold amount" means the maximum amount of tax
distributions as determined by the city in accordance with subsection
(7) of this section that the department ((shall)) distributes to the
city generated from the tax imposed under this section in a fiscal
year.
(12) The funding mechanism under this section is known as, and
cited as, the "state annexation credit." After the effective date of
this act, the department and cities must refer to the funding mechanism
under this section in any forms, publications, or any other documents,
either newly created or updated, by the term "state annexation credit."

Sec. 6 RCW 82.14.465 and 2009 c 535 s 1109 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A city, town, or county that creates a benefit zone and
finances public improvements pursuant to chapter 39.100 RCW may impose
a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter and
subject to the criteria set forth in this section. Except as provided
in this section, the tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by
law and ((shall)) must be collected from those persons who are taxable
by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of
any taxable event within the taxing jurisdiction of the city, town, or
county. The rate of tax ((shall)) may not exceed the rate provided in
RCW 82.08.020(1) in the case of a sales tax or a use tax, less the
aggregate rates of any other taxes imposed on the same events that are
credited against the state taxes imposed under chapters 82.08 and 82.12
RCW. The tax rate ((shall)) must be no higher than what is reasonably
necessary for the local government to receive its entire annual state
contribution in a ten-month period of time.
(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section ((shall))
must be deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be
collected or paid over to the department under chapter 82.08 or 82.12
RCW. The department ((shall)) must perform the collection of such
taxes on behalf of the city, town, or county at no cost to the city,
town, or county.
(3) No tax may be imposed under this section before July 1, 2007.
Before imposing a tax under this section, the city, town, or county
((shall)) must first have received tax allocation revenues during the
preceding calendar year. The tax imposed under this section ((shall))
expires on the earlier of the date: (a) The tax allocation revenues
are no longer used for public improvements and public improvement
costs; (b) the bonds issued under the authority of chapter 39.100 RCW
are retired, if the bonds are issued; or (c) that is thirty years after
the tax is first imposed.
(4) An ordinance adopted by the legislative authority of a city,
town, or county imposing a tax under this section ((shall)) must
provide that:
(a) The tax ((shall)) must first be imposed on the first day of a
fiscal year;
(b) The amount of tax received by the local government in any
fiscal year ((shall)) may not exceed the amount of the state
contribution;
(c) The tax ((shall)) must cease to be distributed for the
remainder of any fiscal year in which either:
(i) The amount of tax distributions totals the amount of the state
contribution;
(ii) The amount of tax distributions totals the amount of local
public sources, dedicated in the previous calendar year to finance
public improvements authorized under chapter 39.100 RCW, expended in
the previous year for public improvement costs or used to pay for other
bonds issued to pay for public improvements; or
(iii) The amount of revenue from taxes imposed under this section
by all cities, towns, and counties totals the annual state credit limit
as provided in RCW 82.32.700(3);
(d) The tax ((shall)) must be distributed again, should it cease to
be distributed for any of the reasons provided in (c) of this
subsection, at the beginning of the next fiscal year, subject to the
restrictions in this section; and
(e) Any revenue generated by the tax in excess of the amounts
specified in (b) and (c) of this subsection ((shall)) belongs to the
state of Washington.
(5) If both a county and a city or town impose a tax under this
section, the tax imposed by the city, town, or county ((shall)) must be
credited as follows:
(a) If the county has created a benefit zone before the city or
town, the tax imposed by the county ((shall)) must be credited against
the tax imposed by the city or town, the purpose of such credit is to
give priority to the county tax; and
(b) If the city or town has created a benefit zone before the
county, the tax imposed by the city or town ((shall)) must be credited
against the tax imposed by the county, the purpose of such credit is to
give priority to the city or town tax.
(6) The department ((shall)) must determine the amount of tax
distributions attributable to each city, town, and county imposing a
sales and use tax under this section and ((shall)) must advise a city,
town, or county when the tax will cease to be distributed for the
remainder of the fiscal year as provided in subsection (4)(c) of this
section. Determinations by the department of the amount of taxes
attributable to a city, town, or county are final and ((shall)) may not
be used to challenge the validity of any tax imposed under this
section. The department ((shall)) must remit any tax revenues in
excess of the amounts specified in subsection (4)(b) and (c) of this
section to the state treasurer who ((shall)) must deposit the moneys in
the general fund.
(7) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section and RCW 82.14.470 unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(a) "Base year" means the calendar year immediately following the
creation of a benefit zone.
(b) "Benefit zone" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
39.100.010.
(c) "Excess local excise taxes" has the same meaning as provided in
RCW 39.100.050.
(d) "Excess state excise taxes" means the amount of excise taxes
received by the state during the measurement year from taxable activity
within the benefit zone over and above the amount of excise taxes
received by the state during the base year from taxable activity within
the benefit zone. However, if a local government creates the benefit
zone and reasonably determines that no activity subject to tax under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW occurred in the twelve months immediately
preceding the creation of the benefit zone within the boundaries of the
area that became the benefit zone, "excess state excise taxes" means
the entire amount of state excise taxes the state receives during a
calendar year period beginning with the calendar year immediately
following the creation of the benefit zone and continuing with each
measurement year thereafter.
(e) "State excise taxes" means revenues derived from state retail
sales and use taxes under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW, less the amount
of tax distributions from all local retail sales and use taxes imposed
on the same taxable events that are credited against the state retail
sales and use taxes under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW except for the
local tax authorized in this section.
(f) "Fiscal year" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
39.100.030.
(g) "Measurement year" means a calendar year, beginning with the
calendar year following the base year and each calendar year
thereafter, that is used annually to measure the amount of excess state
excise taxes and excess local excise taxes.
(h) "State contribution" means the lesser of two million dollars or
an amount equal to excess state excise taxes received by the state
during the preceding calendar year.
(i) "Tax allocation revenues" has the same meaning as provided in
RCW 39.100.010.
(j) "Public improvements" and "public improvement costs" have the
same meanings as provided in RCW 39.100.010.
(k) "Local public sources" includes, but is not limited to, private
monetary contributions, assessments, dedicated local government funds,
and tax allocation revenues. "Local public sources" does not include
local government funds derived from any state loan or state grant, any
local tax that is credited against the state sales and use taxes, or
any other state funds.
(8) The funding mechanism under this section is known as, and cited
as, the "state hospital benefit zone credit." After the effective date
of this act, the department and any cities, towns, or counties, must
refer to the funding mechanism under this section in any forms,
publications, or any other documents, either newly created or updated,
by the term "state hospital benefit zone credit."

Sec. 7 RCW 67.28.180 and 2007 c 189 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the conditions set forth in subsections (2) and (3)
of this section, the legislative body of any county or any city, is
authorized to levy and collect a special excise tax of not to exceed
two percent on the sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging
that is subject to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW.
(2) Any levy authorized by this section ((shall be)) is subject to
the following:
(a) Any county ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to this
section ((shall)) must contain, in addition to all other provisions
required to conform to this chapter, a provision allowing a credit
against the county tax for the full amount of any city tax imposed
pursuant to this section upon the same taxable event.
(b)(i) In the event that any county has levied the tax authorized
by this section and has, prior to June 26, 1975, either pledged the tax
revenues for payment of principal and interest on city revenue or
general obligation bonds authorized and issued pursuant to RCW
67.28.150 through 67.28.160 or has authorized and issued revenue or
general obligation bonds pursuant to the provisions of RCW 67.28.150
through 67.28.160, such county ((shall be)) is exempt from the
provisions of (a) of this subsection, to the extent that the tax
revenues are pledged for payment of principal and interest on bonds
issued at any time pursuant to the provisions of RCW 67.28.150 through
67.28.160: PROVIDED, That so much of such pledged tax revenues,
together with any investment earnings thereon, not immediately
necessary for actual payment of principal and interest on such bonds
may be used: (((i))) (A) In any county with a population of one
million or more, for repayment either of limited tax levy general
obligation bonds or of any county fund or account from which a loan was
made, the proceeds from the bonds or loan being used to pay for
constructing, installing, improving, and equipping stadium capital
improvement projects, and to pay for any engineering, planning,
financial, legal and professional services incident to the development
of such stadium capital improvement projects, regardless of the date
the debt for such capital improvement projects was or may be incurred;
(((ii))) (B) in any county with a population of one million or more,
for repayment or refinancing of bonded indebtedness incurred prior to
January 1, 1997, for any purpose authorized by this section or relating
to stadium repairs or rehabilitation, including but not limited to the
cost of settling legal claims, reimbursing operating funds, interest
payments on short-term loans, and any other purpose for which such debt
has been incurred if the county has created a public stadium authority
to develop a stadium and exhibition center under RCW 36.102.030; or
(((iii))) (C) in other counties, for county-owned facilities for
agricultural promotion until January 1, 2009, and thereafter for any
purpose authorized in this chapter.
(ii) A county is exempt under this subsection with respect to city
revenue or general obligation bonds issued after April 1, 1991, only if
such bonds mature before January 1, 2013. If any county located east
of the crest of the Cascade mountains has levied the tax authorized by
this section and has, prior to June 26, 1975, pledged the tax revenue
for payment of principal and interest on city revenue or general
obligation bonds, the county is exempt under this subsection with
respect to revenue or general obligation bonds issued after January 1,
2007, only if the bonds mature before January 1, 2021. Such a county
may only use funds under this subsection (2)(b) for constructing or
improving facilities authorized under this chapter, including county-
owned facilities for agricultural promotion, and must perform an annual
financial audit of organizations receiving funding on the use of the
funds.
(iii) As used in this subsection (2)(b), "capital improvement
projects" may include, but not be limited to a stadium restaurant
facility, restroom facilities, artificial turf system, seating
facilities, parking facilities and scoreboard and information system
adjacent to or within a county owned stadium, together with equipment,
utilities, accessories and appurtenances necessary thereto. The
stadium restaurant authorized by this subsection (2)(b) ((shall)) must
be operated by a private concessionaire under a contract with the
county.
(c)(i) No city within a county exempt under subsection (2)(b) of
this section may levy the tax authorized by this section so long as
said county is so exempt.
(ii) If bonds have been issued under RCW 43.99N.020 and any
necessary property transfers have been made under RCW 36.102.100, no
city within a county with a population of one million or more may levy
the tax authorized by this section before January 1, 2021.
(iii) However, in the event that any city in a county described in
(i) or (ii) of this subsection (2)(c) has levied the tax authorized by
this section and has, prior to June 26, 1975, authorized and issued
revenue or general obligation bonds pursuant to the provisions of RCW
67.28.150 through 67.28.160, such city may levy the tax so long as the
tax revenues are pledged for payment of principal and interest on bonds
issued at any time pursuant to the provisions of RCW 67.28.150 through
67.28.160.
(3) Any levy authorized by this section by a county that has levied
the tax authorized by this section and has, prior to June 26, 1975,
either pledged the tax revenues for payment of principal and interest
on city revenue or general obligation bonds authorized and issued
pursuant to RCW 67.28.150 through 67.28.160 or has authorized and
issued revenue or general obligation bonds pursuant to the provisions
of RCW 67.28.150 through 67.28.160 ((shall be)) is subject to the
following:
(a) Taxes collected under this section in any calendar year before
2013 in excess of five million three hundred thousand dollars ((shall))
must only be used as follows:
(i) Seventy-five percent from January 1, 1992, through December 31,
2000, and seventy percent from January 1, 2001, through December 31,
2012, for art museums, cultural museums, heritage museums, the arts,
and the performing arts. Moneys spent under this subsection (3)(a)(i)
((shall)) must be used for the purposes of this subsection (3)(a)(i) in
all parts of the county.
(ii) Twenty-five percent from January 1, 1992, through December 31,
2000, and thirty percent from January 1, 2001, through December 31,
2012, for the following purposes and in a manner reflecting the
following order of priority: Stadium purposes as authorized under
subsection (2)(b) of this section; acquisition of open space lands;
youth sports activities; and tourism promotion. If all or part of the
debt on the stadium is refinanced, all revenues under this subsection
(3)(a)(ii) ((shall)) must be used to retire the debt.
(b) From January 1, 2013, through December 31, 2015, in a county
with a population of one million or more, all revenues under this
section ((shall)) must be used to retire the debt on the stadium, or
deposited in the stadium and exhibition center account under RCW
43.99N.060 after the debt on the stadium is retired.
(c) From January 1, 2016, through December 31, 2020, in a county
with a population of one million or more, all revenues under this
section ((shall)) must be deposited in the stadium and exhibition
center account under RCW 43.99N.060.
(d) At least seventy percent of moneys spent under (a)(i) of this
subsection for the period January 1, 1992, through December 31, 2000,
((shall)) must be used only for the purchase, design, construction, and
remodeling of performing arts, visual arts, heritage, and cultural
facilities, and for the purchase of fixed assets that will benefit art,
heritage, and cultural organizations. For purposes of this subsection,
fixed assets are tangible objects such as machinery and other equipment
intended to be held or used for ten years or more. Moneys received
under this subsection (3)(d) may be used for payment of principal and
interest on bonds issued for capital projects. Qualifying
organizations receiving moneys under this subsection (3)(d) must be
financially stable and have at least the following:
(i) A legally constituted and working board of directors;
(ii) A record of artistic, heritage, or cultural accomplishments;
(iii) Been in existence and operating for at least two years;
(iv) Demonstrated ability to maintain net current liabilities at
less than thirty percent of general operating expenses;
(v) Demonstrated ability to sustain operational capacity subsequent
to completion of projects or purchase of machinery and equipment; and
(vi) Evidence that there has been independent financial review of
the organization.
(e) At least forty percent of the revenues distributed pursuant to
(a)(i) of this subsection for the period January 1, 2001, through
December 31, 2012, ((shall)) must be deposited in an account and
((shall)) must be used to establish an endowment. Principal in the
account ((shall)) must remain permanent and irreducible. The earnings
from investments of balances in the account may only be used for the
purposes of (a)(i) of this subsection.
(f) School districts and schools ((shall)) may not receive revenues
distributed pursuant to (a)(i) of this subsection.
(g) Moneys distributed to art museums, cultural museums, heritage
museums, the arts, and the performing arts, and moneys distributed for
tourism promotion ((shall)) must be in addition to and may not be used
to replace or supplant any other funding by the legislative body of the
county.
(h) As used in this section, "tourism promotion" includes
activities intended to attract visitors for overnight stays, arts,
heritage, and cultural events, and recreational, professional, and
amateur sports events. Moneys allocated to tourism promotion in a
class AA county ((shall)) must be allocated to nonprofit organizations
formed for the express purpose of tourism promotion in the county.
Such organizations ((shall)) must use moneys from the taxes to promote
events in all parts of the class AA county.
(i) No taxes collected under this section may be used for the
operation or maintenance of a public stadium that is financed directly
or indirectly by bonds to which the tax is pledged. Expenditures for
operation or maintenance include all expenditures other than
expenditures that directly result in new fixed assets or that directly
increase the capacity, life span, or operating economy of existing
fixed assets.
(j) No ad valorem property taxes may be used for debt service on
bonds issued for a public stadium that is financed by bonds to which
the tax is pledged, unless the taxes collected under this section are
or are projected to be insufficient to meet debt service requirements
on such bonds.
(k) If a substantial part of the operation and management of a
public stadium that is financed directly or indirectly by bonds to
which the tax is pledged is performed by a nonpublic entity or if a
public stadium is sold that is financed directly or indirectly by bonds
to which the tax is pledged, any bonds to which the tax is pledged
((shall)) must be retired. This subsection (3)(k) does not apply in
respect to a public stadium under chapter 36.102 RCW transferred to,
owned by, or constructed by a public facilities district under chapter
36.100 RCW or a stadium and exhibition center.
(l) The county ((shall)) may not lease a public stadium that is
financed directly or indirectly by bonds to which the tax is pledged
to, or authorize the use of the public stadium by, a professional major
league sports franchise unless the sports franchise gives the right of
first refusal to purchase the sports franchise, upon its sale, to local
government. This subsection (3)(l) does not apply to contracts in
existence on April 1, 1986.
(4) If a court of competent jurisdiction declares any provision of
((this)) subsection (3) of this act invalid, then that invalid
provision ((shall be)) is null and void and the remainder of this
section is not affected.
(5) The funding mechanism under this section is known as, and cited
as, the "state hotel/motel credit." After the effective date of this
act, the department and any county must refer to the funding mechanism
under this section in any forms, publications, or any other documents,
either newly created or updated, by the term "state hotel/motel
credit."

Sec. 8 RCW 82.14.480 and 2007 c 251 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a local jurisdiction that has
created a health sciences and services authority under RCW 35.104.030
may impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this
chapter. The tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by law and
((shall)) must be collected from those persons who are taxable by the
state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any
taxable event within the local jurisdiction. The rate of the tax
((shall)) may not exceed 0.020 percent of the selling price in the case
of a sales tax or the value of the article used in the case of a use
tax.
(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section ((shall))
must be deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be
collected or paid over to the department under chapter 82.08 or 82.12
RCW. The department ((of revenue shall)) must perform the collection
of the tax on behalf of the authority at no cost to the authority.
(3) The amounts received under this section may only be used in
accordance with RCW 35.104.060 or to finance and retire the
indebtedness incurred pursuant to RCW 35.104.070, in whole or in part.
(4) The funding mechanism under this section is known as, and cited
as, the "state health science and services credit." After the
effective date of this act, the department and any counties, cities, or
towns, must refer to the funding mechanism under this section in any
forms, publications, or any other documents, either newly created or
updated, by the term "state health science and services credit."
(5) This section expires January 1, 2023.

Sec. 9 RCW 82.14.475 and 2009 c 267 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A sponsoring local government, and any cosponsoring local
government, that has been approved by the board to use local
infrastructure financing may impose a sales and use tax in accordance
with the terms of this chapter and subject to the criteria set forth in
this section. Except as provided in this section, the tax is in
addition to other taxes authorized by law and ((shall)) must be
collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event
within the taxing jurisdiction of the sponsoring local government or
cosponsoring local government.
(2) The tax authorized under subsection (1) of this section
((shall)) must be credited against the state taxes imposed under RCW
82.08.020(1) and 82.12.020 at the rate provided in RCW 82.08.020(1).
The department ((shall)) must perform the collection of such taxes on
behalf of the sponsoring local government or cosponsoring local
government at no cost to the sponsoring local government or
cosponsoring local government and ((shall)) must remit the taxes as
provided in RCW 82.14.060.
(3) The aggregate rate of tax imposed by the sponsoring local
government, and any cosponsoring local government, must not exceed the
lesser of:
(a) The rate provided in RCW 82.08.020(1) less:
(i) The aggregate rates of all other local sales and use taxes
imposed by any taxing authority on the same taxable events;
(ii) The aggregate rates of all taxes under RCW 82.14.465 and this
section that are authorized to be imposed on the same taxable events
but have not yet been imposed by a sponsoring local government or
cosponsoring local government that has been approved by the department
or the community economic revitalization board to receive a state
contribution under chapter((s [chapter])) 39.100 or 39.102 RCW; and
(iii) The percentage amount of distributions required under RCW
82.08.020(5) multiplied by the rate of state taxes imposed under RCW
82.08.020(1); and
(b) The rate, as determined by the sponsoring local government, and
any cosponsoring local government, in consultation with the department,
reasonably necessary to receive the state contribution over ten months.
(4) Sponsoring local governments that have been approved before
October 1, 2008, by the community economic revitalization board for a
state contribution must select the rate of tax under this section no
later than September 1, 2009.
(5) The department, upon request, must assist a sponsoring local
government and cosponsoring local government in establishing their tax
rate in accordance with subsection (3) of this section. Once the rate
of tax is selected, it may not be increased.
(6)(a) No tax may be imposed under the authority of this section:
(i) Before July 1, 2008;
(ii) Before July 1st of the second calendar year following the year
approval by the board under RCW 39.102.040 was made; and
(iii) Before the state excise tax allocation revenues and state
property tax allocation revenues for the preceding calendar year equal
or exceed the amount of project award approved by the board under RCW
39.102.040.
(b) The tax imposed under this section ((shall)) expires when all
indebtedness issued under the authority of RCW 39.102.150 is retired
and all other contractual obligations relating to the financing of
public improvements under chapter 39.102 RCW are satisfied, but not
more than twenty-five years after the tax is first imposed.
(7) An ordinance adopted by the legislative authority of a
sponsoring local government or cosponsoring local government imposing
a tax under this section ((shall)) must provide that:
(a) The tax ((shall)) must first be imposed on the first day of a
fiscal year;
(b) The cumulative amount of tax received by the sponsoring local
government, and any cosponsoring local government, in any fiscal year
((shall)) may not exceed the amount of the state contribution;
(c) The tax ((shall)) must cease to be distributed for the
remainder of any fiscal year in which either:
(i) The amount of tax received by the sponsoring local government,
and any cosponsoring local government, equals the amount of the state
contribution;
(ii) The amount of revenue from taxes imposed under this section by
all sponsoring and cosponsoring local governments equals the annual
state contribution limit; or
(iii) The amount of tax received by the sponsoring local government
equals the amount of project award granted in the approval notice
described in RCW 39.102.040;
(d) Neither the local excise tax allocation revenues nor the local
property tax allocation revenues may constitute more than eighty
percent of the total local funds as described in RCW 39.102.020(28)(b).
This requirement applies beginning January 1st of the fifth calendar
year after the calendar year in which the sponsoring local government
begins allocating local excise tax allocation revenues under RCW
39.102.110;
(e) The tax ((shall)) must be distributed again, should it cease to
be distributed for any of the reasons provided in (c) of this
subsection, at the beginning of the next fiscal year, subject to the
restrictions in this section; and
(f) Any revenue generated by the tax in excess of the amounts
specified in (c) of this subsection ((shall)) belongs to the state of
Washington.
(8) If a county and city cosponsor a revenue development area, the
combined amount of distributions received by both the city and county
may not exceed the state contribution.
(9) The department ((shall)) must determine the amount of tax
receipts distributed to each sponsoring local government, and any
cosponsoring local government, imposing sales and use tax under this
section and ((shall)) must advise a sponsoring or cosponsoring local
government when tax distributions for the fiscal year equal the amount
of state contribution for that fiscal year as provided in subsection
(11) of this section. Determinations by the department of the amount
of tax distributions attributable to each sponsoring or cosponsoring
local government are final and ((shall)) may not be used to challenge
the validity of any tax imposed under this section. The department
((shall)) must remit any tax receipts in excess of the amounts
specified in subsection (7)(c) of this section to the state treasurer
who ((shall)) must deposit the money in the general fund.
(10) If a sponsoring or cosponsoring local government fails to
comply with RCW 39.102.140, no tax may be distributed in the subsequent
fiscal year until such time as the sponsoring or cosponsoring local
government complies and the department calculates the state
contribution amount for such fiscal year.
(11) Each year, the amount of taxes approved by the department for
distribution to a sponsoring or cosponsoring local government in the
next fiscal year ((shall)) must be equal to the state contribution and
((shall)) may be no more than the total local funds as described in RCW
39.102.020(28)(b). The department ((shall)) must consider information
from reports described in RCW 39.102.140 when determining the amount of
state contributions for each fiscal year. A sponsoring or cosponsoring
local government ((shall)) may not receive, in any fiscal year, more
revenues from taxes imposed under the authority of this section than
the amount approved annually by the department. The department
((shall)) may not approve the receipt of more distributions of sales
and use tax under this section to a sponsoring or cosponsoring local
government than is authorized under subsection (7) of this section.
(12) The amount of tax distributions received from taxes imposed
under the authority of this section by all sponsoring and cosponsoring
local governments is limited annually to not more than seven million
five hundred thousand dollars.
(13) The definitions in RCW 39.102.020 apply to this section unless
the context clearly requires otherwise.
(14) If a sponsoring local government is a federally recognized
Indian tribe, the distribution of the sales and use tax authorized
under this section ((shall)) must be authorized through an interlocal
agreement pursuant to chapter 39.34 RCW.
(15) Subject to RCW 39.102.195, the tax imposed under the authority
of this section may be applied either to provide for the payment of
debt service on bonds issued under RCW 39.102.150 by the sponsoring
local government or to pay public improvement costs on a pay-as-you-go
basis, or both.
(16) The tax imposed under the authority of this section ((shall))
must cease to be imposed if the sponsoring local government or
cosponsoring local government fails to issue indebtedness under the
authority of RCW 39.102.150, and fails to commence construction on
public improvements, by June 30th of the fifth fiscal year in which the
local tax authorized under this section is imposed.
(17) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Local sales and use taxes" means sales and use taxes imposed
by cities, counties, public facilities districts, and other local
governments under the authority of this chapter, chapter 67.28 or
67.40 RCW, or any other chapter, and that are credited against the
state sales and use taxes.
(b) "State sales and use taxes" means the tax imposed in RCW
82.08.020(1) and the tax imposed in RCW 82.12.020 at the rate provided
in RCW 82.08.020(1).
(18) The funding mechanism under this section is known as, and
cited as, the "state local infrastructure financing credit." After the
effective date of this act, the department or any local government,
must refer to the funding mechanism under this section in any forms,
publications, or any other documents, either newly created or updated,
by the term "state local infrastructure financing credit."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Section 9 of this act expires June 30,
2039.

--- END ---