BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that well managed
forest lands are an important part of the ecosystem that help to
provide fish and wildlife habitat, clean water, and other environmental
amenities. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature that the
forestry riparian easement program be utilized to assist small forest
landowners who have been financially impacted as a direct result of
adoption of forest practices rules consistent with the forests and fish
report, as defined in RCW 76.09.020, in order to facilitate ongoing
forest land ownership.

Sec. 2 RCW 76.13.120 and 2004 c 102 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the state should acquire easements
along riparian and other sensitive aquatic areas from small forest
landowners willing to sell or donate such easements to the state
provided that the state will not be required to acquire such easements
if they are subject to unacceptable liabilities and that the state may
not acquire such easements if:
(a) The harvest limitations are or would be a result of the
requirements of the federal clean water act or the requirements of the
shoreline management act established in chapter 90.58 RCW;
(b) Such easement is eligible for compensation under the riparian
open space program established in RCW 76.09.040 or the Washington
wildlife and recreation program whose primary purpose is to acquire
habitat conservation and outdoor recreation land as specified in
chapter 79A.15 RCW;
(c) Any parcel subject to the easement has not received a current
use classification as specified under chapter 84.34 RCW; and
(d) Any parcel subject to the easement qualifies for alternative
management plans as specified under RCW 76.13.130. The legislature
therefore establishes a forestry riparian easement program.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section and RCW 76.13.100 and 76.13.110 unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(a) "Forestry riparian easement" means an easement covering
qualifying timber granted voluntarily to the state by a small forest
landowner.
(b) "Qualifying timber" means those trees along riparian and other
sensitive aquatic areas covered by a forest practices application that
the small forest landowner is required to leave unharvested under the
rules adopted under RCW 76.09.055 and 76.09.370 or that is made
uneconomic to harvest by those rules, and for which the small landowner
is willing to grant the state a forestry riparian easement.
"Qualifying timber" is timber within or bordering a commercially
reasonable harvest unit as determined under rules adopted by the forest
practices board, or timber for which an approved forest practices
application for timber harvest cannot be obtained because of
restrictions under the forest practices rules.
(c) "Forest land" has the same meaning as the term "timber land" as
defined in RCW 84.34.020 and shall not qualify for alternative
management plans as specified under RCW 76.13.130.
(d) "Small forest landowner" means: (i) A landowner ((meeting all
of the following characteristics: (i) A forest landowner as defined in
RCW 76.09.020 whose interest in the land and timber is in fee or)) who
owns no more than one thousand acres of forest land in the state and
who has rights to the timber to be included in the forestry riparian
easement that extend at least fifty years from the date the forest
practices application associated with the easement is submitted; and
(ii) an entity that has harvested from its own lands in this state
during the three years prior to the year of application an average
timber volume that would qualify the owner as a small harvester under
RCW 84.33.035((; and (iii) an entity that certifies at the time of
application that it does not expect to harvest from its own lands more
than the volume allowed by RCW 84.33.035 during the ten years following
application. If a landowner's prior three-year average harvest exceeds
the limit of RCW 84.33.035, or the landowner expects to exceed this
limit during the ten years following application, and that landowner
establishes to the department of natural resources' reasonable
satisfaction that the harvest limits were or will be exceeded to raise
funds to pay estate taxes or equally compelling and unexpected
obligations such as court-ordered judgments or extraordinary medical
expenses, the landowner shall be deemed to be a small forest
landowner)).
For purposes of determining whether a person qualifies as a small
forest landowner, the small forest landowner office, created in RCW
76.13.110, shall evaluate the landowner under this definition, pursuant
to RCW 76.13.160((, as of the date that the forest practices
application is submitted or the date the landowner notifies the
department that the harvest is to begin with which the forestry
riparian easement is associated)). A small forest landowner must have
had legal ownership of the parcel subject to the easement prior to
adoption of forest practices rules consistent with the forests and fish
report as defined in RCW 76.09.020 and can include an individual,
partnership, corporate, or other nongovernmental legal entity((. If a
landowner grants timber rights to another entity for less than five
years, the landowner may still qualify as a small forest landowner
under this section)), provided that the partnership, corporate, or
other nongovernmental legal entity was established for the purposes of
long-term commercial timber production. A small forest landowner shall
not have any outstanding violations of the forest practices act as
specified in chapter 76.09 RCW, shall not be in default on a financial
obligation to an agency of the state including noncompliance with a
child support order under RCW 74.20A.320, and shall not have received
compensation under the forestry riparian easement program in the
previous three biennia. If a landowner is unable to obtain an approved
forest practices application for timber harvest for any of his or her
land because of restrictions under the forest practices rules, the
landowner may still qualify as a small forest landowner under this
section.
(d) "Completion of harvest" means that the trees have been
harvested from an area and that further entry into that area by
mechanized logging or slash treating equipment is not expected.
(3) The department of natural resources is authorized and directed
to accept and hold in the name of the state of Washington forestry
riparian easements granted by small forest landowners covering
qualifying timber and to pay compensation to such landowners in
accordance with subsections (6) ((and (7))) through (9) of this
section. The department of natural resources may not transfer the
easements to any entity other than another state agency.
(4) Forestry riparian easements shall be effective for fifty years
from the date the forest practices application associated with the
qualifying timber is submitted to the department of natural resources,
unless the easement is terminated earlier by the department of natural
resources voluntarily, based on a determination that termination is in
the best interest of the state, or under the terms of a termination
clause in the easement. For parcels subject to the easement, if at any
time during the term of the easement a small forest landowner changes
the current use classification as specified in chapter 84.34 RCW or any
information contained in the application is determined by the small
forest landowner office to be false, the small forest landowner shall,
in addition to penalties incurred in RCW 84.34.070, refund the total
compensation received for the easement plus, a twenty percent penalty.
This refund and penalty shall be considered a lien upon the land as
specified in RCW 84.34.090.
(5) Forestry riparian easements shall be restrictive only, and
shall preserve all lawful uses of the easement premises by the
landowner that are consistent with the terms of the easement and the
requirement to protect riparian functions during the term of the
easement, subject to the restriction that the leave trees required by
the rules to be left on the easement premises may not be cut during the
term of the easement. No right of public access to or across, or any
public use of the easement premises is created by this statute or by
the easement. Forestry riparian easements shall not be deemed to
trigger the compensating tax of or otherwise disqualify land from being
taxed under chapter 84.33 or 84.34 RCW.
(6) Beginning in calendar year 2010, the small forest landowner
office as created in RCW 76.13.110 shall solicit applications for the
forestry riparian easement program. For applications that have been
previously submitted to the small forest landowner office but have not
received funding, the small forest landowner office shall obtain from
the landowner any supplemental information necessary to verify the
landowners' qualifications to participate in the program. The date
upon which the supplemental information is received shall constitute
the date of application. The small forest landowner office, along with
the small forest landowner advisory committee, shall prioritize
submitted applications: (a) First in descending order based on the
ratio of qualifying timber impacted as a direct result of adoption of
forest practices rules consistent with the forest and fish report, as
defined in RCW 76.09.020, to the total merchantable stand of timber on
the parcels subject to the easement; and (b) second in descending order
according to development potential. In October of every even-numbered
year, the small forest landowner office shall submit the prioritized
list of applications to the governor, the office of financial
management, and the legislature for funding consideration in the
biennial budget.
(7) Upon application of a small forest landowner for a riparian
easement that is associated with a forest practices application and the
landowner's marking of the qualifying timber on the qualifying lands,
the small forest landowner office shall determine the compensation to
be offered to the small forest landowner as provided for in this
section and final compensation must be based on the market value of
timber at the time of harvest. The small forest landowner office shall
also determine the compensation to be offered to a small forest
landowner for qualifying timber for which an approved forest practices
application for timber harvest cannot be obtained because of
restrictions under the forest practices rules and final compensation
must be based on the market value of timber at the time the application
receives funding. The legislature recognizes that there is not readily
available market transaction evidence of value for easements of this
nature, and thus establishes the following methodology to ascertain the
value for forestry riparian easements. Values so determined shall not
be considered competent evidence of value for any other purpose.
The small forest landowner office shall establish the volume of the
qualifying timber. Based on that volume and using data obtained or
maintained by the department of revenue under RCW 84.33.074 and
84.33.091, the small forest landowner office shall attempt to determine
the fair market value of the qualifying timber as of the ((date the
forest practices application associated with the qualifying timber was
submitted or the date the landowner notifies the department that the
harvest is to begin)) dates specified in this section. Removal of any
qualifying timber before the expiration of the easement must be in
accordance with the forest practices rules and the terms of the
easement. There shall be no reduction in compensation for reentry.
(((7))) (8) Except as provided in subsection (((8))) (9) of this
section, the small forest landowner office shall, subject to available
funding, offer compensation to the small forest landowner in the amount
of fifty percent of the value determined in subsection (((6))) (7) of
this section((, plus the compliance and reimbursement costs as
determined in accordance with RCW 76.13.140)). If the landowner
accepts the offer for qualifying timber that will be harvested pursuant
to an approved forest practices application, the department of natural
resources shall pay the compensation promptly upon (a) completion of
harvest in the area covered by the forestry riparian easement; (b)
verification that there has been compliance with the rules requiring
leave trees in the easement area; and (c) execution and delivery of the
easement to the department of natural resources. If the landowner
accepts the offer for qualifying timber for which an approved forest
practices application for timber harvest cannot be obtained because of
restrictions under the forest practices rules, the department of
natural resources shall pay the compensation promptly upon (i)
verification that there has been compliance with the rules requiring
leave trees in the easement area; and (ii) execution and delivery of
the easement to the department of natural resources. Upon donation or
payment of compensation, the department of natural resources may record
the easement.
(((8) For approved forest practices applications where the
regulatory impact is greater than the average percentage impact for all
small landowners as determined by the department of natural resources
analysis under the regulatory fairness act, chapter 19.85 RCW, the
compensation offered will be increased to one hundred percent for that
portion of the regulatory impact that is in excess of the average.
Regulatory impact includes trees left in buffers, special management
zones, and those rendered uneconomic to harvest by these rules. A
separate average or high impact regulatory threshold shall be
established for western and eastern Washington. Criteria for these
measurements and payments shall be established by the small forest
landowner office.))
(9) Applications that are not funded in the biennial budget shall
be reconsidered and reprioritized by the small forest landowner office
and the small forest landowner advisory committee for the following
biennium.
(10) An application for inclusion in the forestry riparian easement
program shall include an affidavit signed by the small forest landowner
that includes a list of all parcels in the state owned by the landowner
that have received a current use classification as specified in chapter
84.34 RCW and the total acres within each parcel.
(11) The forest practices board shall adopt rules under the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, to implement the
forestry riparian easement program, including the following:
(a) A standard version or versions of all documents necessary or
advisable to create the forestry riparian easements as provided for in
this section;
(b) Standards for descriptions of the easement premises with a
degree of precision that is reasonable in relation to the values
involved;
(c) Methods and standards for cruises and valuation of forestry
riparian easements for purposes of establishing the compensation. The
department of natural resources shall perform the timber cruises of
forestry riparian easements required under this chapter and chapter
76.09 RCW. Any rules concerning the methods and standards for
valuations of forestry riparian easements shall apply only to the
department of natural resources, small forest landowners, and the small
forest landowner office;
(d) A method to determine that a forest practices application
involves a commercially reasonable harvest, and adopt criteria for
entering into a forest riparian easement where a commercially
reasonable harvest is not possible or a forest practices application
that has been submitted cannot be approved because of restrictions
under the forest practices rules;
(e) A method to address blowdown of qualified timber falling
outside the easement premises;
(f) A formula for sharing of proceeds in relation to the
acquisition of qualified timber covered by an easement through the
exercise or threats of eminent domain by a federal or state agency with
eminent domain authority, based on the present value of the department
of natural resources' and the landowner's relative interests in the
qualified timber;
(g) ((High impact regulatory thresholds;
(h))) A method to determine timber that is qualifying timber
because it is rendered uneconomic to harvest by the rules adopted under
RCW 76.09.055 and 76.09.370; and
(((i))) (h) A method for internal department of natural resources
review of small forest landowner office compensation decisions under
subsection (((7))) (8) of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 76.13.140 and 2002 c 120 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
In order to assist small forest landowners to remain economically
viable, the legislature intends that the small forest landowners be
able to net fifty percent of the value of the trees left in the buffer
areas. ((The amount of compensation offered in RCW 76.13.120 shall
also include the compliance costs for participation in the riparian
easement program. For purposes of this section, "compliance costs"
includes the cost of preparing and recording the easement, and any
business and occupation tax and real estate excise tax imposed because
of entering into the easement.)) The office may contract with private
consultants that the office finds qualified to perform timber cruises
of forestry riparian easements or to lay out streamside buffers and
comply with other forest and fish regulatory requirements related to
the forest riparian easement program. ((The department shall reimburse
small forest landowners for the actual costs incurred for laying out
the streamside buffers and marking the qualifying timber once a
contract has been executed for the forestry riparian easement program.
Reimbursement is subject to the work being acceptable to the
department. The small forest landowner office shall determine how the
reimbursement costs will be calculated.))

--- END ---