BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 66.44 RCW
to read as follows:
A retail liquor licensee is subject to a penalty as follows if the
licensee or an employee of the licensee is cited by the board for sale
of alcohol to a person under twenty-one years of age:
(1) For a first offense, the penalty is a written warning;
(2) For a second offense in a two-year period, the penalty is a
written warning and an order that the individual who made the sale
attend mandatory alcohol service training;
(3) For a third, fourth, or fifth offense in a two-year period, the
penalty is suspension of the liquor license or a monetary penalty, the
length of suspension and amount of the monetary penalty to increase for
each offense, as established by the board;
(4) For a sixth offense in a two-year period, the penalty is
cancellation of the liquor license.

--- END ---