BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds in order to carry out
the intent of decedents in the construction of wills and trusts, and in
order to promote judicial economy in the administration of trusts and
estates, that it is necessary to construe certain formula clauses to
refer to federal estate and generation-skipping transfer tax rules
applicable to estates of decedents dying on December 31, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 11.108 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A will or trust of a decedent who dies after December 31, 2009,
and before January 1, 2011, is deemed to refer to the federal estate
and generation-skipping transfer tax laws as they applied with respect
to estates of decedents dying on December 31, 2009, if the will or
trust contains a formula that:
(a) Refers to any of the following: "Unified credit," "estate tax
exemption," "applicable exemption amount," "applicable credit amount,"
"applicable exclusion amount," "generation-skipping transfer tax
exemption," "marital deduction," "maximum marital deduction," or
"unlimited marital deduction;"
(b) Measures a share of an estate or trust based on the amount that
can pass free of federal estate taxes or the amount that can pass free
of federal generation-skipping transfer taxes; or
(c) Is otherwise based on a provision of federal estate tax or
federal generation-skipping transfer tax law similar to the provisions
in (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(2) This section is presumed to not apply with respect to a will or
trust that (a) is executed or amended after December 31, 2009, or (b)
clearly manifests an intent that a contrary rule applies in cases where
the decedent dies on a date on which there is no then-applicable
federal estate or federal generation-skipping transfer tax and such tax
has been permanently repealed and not merely temporarily repealed for
calendar year 2010.
(3) The reference to January 1, 2011, in this section refers, if
the federal estate and generation-skipping transfer tax becomes
effective before that date, to the first date on which such tax becomes
legally effective.
(4) Construction of a will or trust under this section may be
confirmed pursuant to the procedures set forth in the trust and estate
dispute resolution act in chapter 11.96A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 11.108 RCW
to read as follows:
The personal representative, trustee, or any affected beneficiary
under a will or trust may bring a proceeding under the trust and estate
dispute resolution act in chapter 11.96A RCW, to determine whether the
decedent intended that the references under section 2 of this act be
construed with respect to the federal law as it existed after December
31, 2009. Such a proceeding must be commenced within twelve months
following the death of the testator or grantor, and not thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The provisions of this act are effective
retroactive to December 31, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is remedial in nature and must be
applied and construed liberally in order to carry out its intent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---