BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the significant
financial benefits realized by the state through consolidated cash
management activities. It is the intent of this act to encourage and,
when financially advantageous, to expand those activities.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.08.190 and 2009 c 564 s 926 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby created a fund within the state treasury to be
known as the "state treasurer's service fund." Such fund shall be used
solely for the payment of costs and expenses incurred in the operation
and administration of the state treasurer's office.
Moneys shall be allocated monthly and placed in the state
treasurer's service fund equivalent to a maximum of one percent of the
trust and treasury average daily cash balances from the earnings
generated under the authority of RCW 43.79A.040 and 43.84.080 other
than earnings generated from investment of balances in funds and
accounts specified in RCW 43.79A.040 ((or 43.84.092(4))) (4)(c). The
allocation shall precede the distribution of the remaining earnings as
prescribed under RCW 43.79A.040 and 43.84.092. The state treasurer
shall establish a uniform allocation rate ((based on the appropriations
for the treasurer's office)) for all funds and accounts; except that
the state treasurer may negotiate a different allocation rate with any
state agency that has independent authority over funds not statutorily
required to be held in the state treasury or in the custody of the
state treasurer. In no event shall the rate be less than the actual
costs incurred by the state treasurer's office. If no rate is
separately negotiated, the default rate for any funds held shall be the
rate set for funds held pursuant to statute.
During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
from the state treasurer's service fund to the state general fund such
amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2009 c 87 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury, and may be commingled with moneys in the state treasury
for cash management and cash balance purposes.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) ((and)), (c), and (d) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the toll collection
account, the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the
energy account, the fair fund, the family leave insurance account, the
food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship account, the fruit and
vegetable inspection account, the future teachers conditional
scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the GET ready
for math and science scholarship account, the grain inspection
revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive account, the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local
tourism promotion account, the pilotage account, the produce railcar
pool account, the regional transportation investment district account,
the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center
account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, the children's
trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred
owners' bonus fund and breeder awards account, the Washington horse
racing commission class C purse fund account, the individual
development account program account, the Washington horse racing
commission operating account (earnings from the Washington horse racing
commission operating account must be credited to the Washington horse
racing commission class C purse fund account), the life sciences
discovery fund, the Washington state heritage center account, the
reduced cigarette ignition propensity account, and the reading
achievement account. ((However, the earnings to be distributed shall
first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service
fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.))
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right-of-way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(d) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts
or funds not statutorily required to be held in the custody of the
state treasurer that deposits funds into a fund or account in the
custody of the state treasurer pursuant to an agreement with the office
of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for
the period.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.84.092 and 2009 c 479 s 31, 2009 c 472 s 5, and
2009 c 451 s 8 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the
aircraft search and rescue account, the budget stabilization account,
the capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University
capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and
reformatory institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the
Columbia river basin water supply development account, the common
school construction fund, the county arterial preservation account, the
county criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use
tax equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of licensing services
account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the
developmental disabilities community trust account, the drinking water
assistance account, the drinking water assistance administrative
account, the drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern
Washington University capital projects account, the education
construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the election
account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account,
the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College
capital projects account, the federal forest revolving account, the
ferry bond retirement fund, the freight congestion relief account, the
freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal
account, the grade crossing protective fund, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health
services account, the high capacity transportation account, the state
higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway
infrastructure account, the highway safety account, the high occupancy
toll lanes operations account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account,
the mobile home park relocation fund, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle safety education account, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding
stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance
account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the
public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account,
the public facilities construction loan revolving account beginning
July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account, the public
transportation systems account, the public works assistance account,
the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry
operations account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real
estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account,
the regional mobility grant program account, the resource management
cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural Washington
loan fund, the site closure account, the small city pavement and
sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife
account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees'
insurance reserve account, the state investment board expense account,
the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state
patrol highway account, the state route number 520 corridor account,
the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge
account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco
prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the
transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account,
the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation
partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition
recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund,
the University of Washington building account, the urban arterial trust
account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and
pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve
officers' administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account,
the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety
employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. ((All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.))
(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts
or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that
deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to
an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW
to read as follows:
By October 31st of each odd-numbered year, the state treasurer
shall provide to the office of financial management and the appropriate
fiscal committees of the legislature a list of any funds or accounts in
the state treasury or in the custody of the state treasurer that he or
she believes to be obsolete. The list must include the standard or
process the treasurer used to determine whether an account is believed
to be obsolete.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 By June 1, 2010, the office of financial
management shall provide the state treasurer with a list of all funds
or accounts held locally by any state agency. By October 31, 2010, the
state treasurer, working with the office of financial management, shall
review all locally held accounts, other than those held by institutions
of higher education, and determine whether it would be financially
advantageous to the state for those accounts to instead be held in the
state treasury or in the custody of the state treasurer. When the
treasurer deems it financially advantageous for local accounts to be
held in the custody of the state treasurer or in the state treasury, he
or she is encouraged to propose executive request legislation to effect
those changes.

--- END ---