BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 34.05.240 and 1988 c 288 s 204 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any person may petition an agency for a declaratory order with
respect to the applicability to specified circumstances of a rule,
order, or statute enforceable by the agency. The petition shall set
forth facts and reasons on which the petitioner relies to show:
(a) That uncertainty necessitating resolution exists;
(b) That there is actual controversy arising from the uncertainty
such that a declaratory order will not be merely an advisory opinion;
(c) That the uncertainty adversely affects the petitioner;
(d) That the adverse effect of uncertainty on the petitioner
outweighs any adverse effects on others or on the general public that
may likely arise from the order requested; and
(e) That the petition complies with any additional requirements
established by the agency under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) Each agency may adopt rules that provide for: (a) The form,
contents, and filing of petitions for a declaratory order; (b) the
procedural rights of persons in relation thereto; and (c) the
disposition of those petitions. These rules may include a description
of the classes of circumstances in which the agency will not enter a
declaratory order and shall be consistent with the public interest and
with the general policy of this chapter to facilitate and encourage
agencies to provide reliable advice.
(3) Within fifteen days after receipt of a petition for a
declaratory order, the agency shall give notice of the petition to all
persons to whom notice is required by law, and may give notice to any
other person it deems desirable.
(4) RCW 34.05.410 through 34.05.494 apply to agency proceedings for
declaratory orders only to the extent an agency so provides by rule or
order.
(5) Within thirty days after receipt of a petition for a
declaratory order an agency, in writing, shall do one of the following:
(a) Enter an order declaring the applicability of the statute,
rule, or order in question to the specified circumstances;
(b) Set the matter for specified proceedings to be held no more
than ninety days after receipt of the petition;
(c) Set a specified time no more than ninety days after receipt of
the petition by which it will enter a declaratory order; or
(d) Decline to enter a declaratory order, stating the reasons for
its action.
(6) The time limits of subsection (5) (b) and (c) of this section
may be extended by the agency for good cause.
(7) An agency may not enter a declaratory order that would
substantially prejudice the rights of a person not joined as a party to
the administrative proceeding who would be a necessary party and who
does not consent in writing to the determination of the matter by a
declaratory order proceeding.
(8) A declaratory order has the same status as any other order
entered in an agency adjudicative proceeding. Each declaratory order
shall contain the names of all parties to the proceeding on which it is
based, the particular facts on which it is based, and the reasons for
its conclusions.

--- END ---