BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.30.020 and 1985 c 366 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter unless the context indicates otherwise:
(1)(a) "Public agency" means:
(((a))) (i) Any state board, commission, committee, department,
educational institution, or other state agency which is created by or
pursuant to statute, other than courts and the legislature;
(((b))) (ii) Any county, city, school district, special purpose
district, or other municipal corporation or political subdivision of
the state of Washington;
(((c))) (iii) Any subagency of a public agency which is created by
or pursuant to statute, ordinance, or other legislative act, including
but not limited to planning commissions, library or park boards,
commissions, and agencies;
(((d))) (iv) Any policy group whose membership includes
representatives of publicly owned utilities formed by or pursuant to
the laws of this state when meeting together as or on behalf of
participants who have contracted for the output of generating plants
being planned or built by an operating agency.
(b) "Public agency" does not include private nonprofit membership
organizations whose members include local public agencies.
(2) "Governing body" means the multimember board, commission,
committee, council, or other policy or rule-making body of a public
agency, or any committee thereof when the committee acts on behalf of
the governing body, conducts hearings, or takes testimony or public
comment.
(3) "Action" means the transaction of the official business of a
public agency by a governing body including but not limited to receipt
of public testimony, deliberations, discussions, considerations,
reviews, evaluations, and final actions. "Final action" means a
collective positive or negative decision, or an actual vote by a
majority of the members of a governing body when sitting as a body or
entity, upon a motion, proposal, resolution, order, or ordinance.
(4) "Meeting" means meetings at which action is taken.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.56.010 and 2007 c 197 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agency" includes all state agencies and all local agencies.
"State agency" includes every state office, department, division,
bureau, board, commission, or other state agency. "Local agency"
includes every county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose district, or any office,
department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency thereof, or
other local public agency. "Agency" does not include private nonprofit
membership organizations whose members include local agencies.
(2) "Public record" includes any writing containing information
relating to the conduct of government or the performance of any
governmental or proprietary function prepared, owned, used, or retained
by any state or local agency regardless of physical form or
characteristics. For the office of the secretary of the senate and the
office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives, public
records means legislative records as defined in RCW 40.14.100 and also
means the following: All budget and financial records; personnel
leave, travel, and payroll records; records of legislative sessions;
reports submitted to the legislature; and any other record designated
a public record by any official action of the senate or the house of
representatives.
(3) "Writing" means handwriting, typewriting, printing,
photostating, photographing, and every other means of recording any
form of communication or representation including, but not limited to,
letters, words, pictures, sounds, or symbols, or combination thereof,
and all papers, maps, magnetic or paper tapes, photographic films and
prints, motion picture, film and video recordings, magnetic or punched
cards, discs, drums, diskettes, sound recordings, and other documents
including existing data compilations from which information may be
obtained or translated.

--- END ---