BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that
numerous state statutes authorize local governments and private land
owners to condemn state lands, including state lands granted by the
federal government for the benefit of common schools, institutions of
higher education, and other beneficiaries. The majority of these
statutes were enacted more than seventy-five years ago when the state
population was less than one quarter of its current size. With
increasing population density and environmental pressures, the state
must manage state trust lands for the long-term benefit of the trust
beneficiaries specified in the state's enabling act. The legislature
intends to fulfill this responsibility by prohibiting condemnation of
state trust lands. This will facilitate land use decisions that
consider the values of the broader landscape and return the maximum
value to the citizens of the state and beneficiaries of granted lands.

Sec. 2 RCW 8.08.010 and 1949 c 79 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
Every county is hereby authorized and empowered to condemn land and
property within the county for public use; whenever the board of county
commissioners deems it necessary for county purposes to acquire such
land, real estate, premises or other property, and is unable to agree
with the owner or owners thereof for its purchase, it shall be the duty
of the prosecuting attorney to present to the superior court of the
county in which said land, real estate, premises, or other property so
sought to be acquired or appropriated shall be situated, a petition in
which the land, real estate, premises, or other property sought to be
appropriated shall be described with reasonable certainty, and setting
forth the name of each and every owner, encumbrancer, or other person
or party interested in the same, or any part thereof, so far as the
same can be ascertained from the public records, the object for which
the land is sought to be appropriated, and praying that a jury be
impaneled to ascertain and determine the compensation to be made in
money to such owner or owners respectively, and to all tenants,
encumbrancers, or others interested, for taking such lands, real
estate, premises, or other property, or in case a jury be waived, as in
other civil cases in courts of record, in the manner prescribed by law,
then that the compensation to be made as aforesaid be ascertained or
determined by the court or the judge thereof. Property held in trust
by the state is not subject to condemnation by a political subdivision
of the state under this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 8.12.030 and 1915 c 154 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every city and town and each unclassified city and town within the
state of Washington, is hereby authorized and empowered to condemn land
and property, including state, county and school lands and property for
streets, avenues, alleys, highways, bridges, approaches, culverts,
drains, ditches, public squares, public markets, city and town halls,
jails and other public buildings, and for the opening and widening,
widening and extending, altering and straightening of any street,
avenue, alley or highway, and to damage any land or other property for
any such purpose or for the purpose of making changes in the grade of
any street, avenue, alley or highway, or for the construction of slopes
or retaining walls for cuts and fills upon real property abutting on
any street, avenue, alley or highway now ordered to be, or such as
shall hereafter be ordered to be opened, extended, altered,
straightened or graded, or for the purpose of draining swamps, marshes,
tidelands, tide flats or ponds, or filling the same, within the limits
of such city, and to condemn land or property, or to damage the same,
either within or without the limits of such city for public parks,
drives and boulevards, hospitals, pesthouses, drains and sewers,
garbage crematories and destructors and dumping grounds for the
destruction, deposit or burial of dead animals, manure, dung, rubbish,
and other offal, and for aqueducts, reservoirs, pumping stations and
other structures for conveying into and through such city a supply of
fresh water, and for the purpose of protecting such supply of fresh
water from pollution, and to condemn land and other property and damage
the same for such and for any other public use after just compensation
having been first made or paid into court for the owner in the manner
prescribed by this chapter. Property held in trust by the state is not
subject to condemnation by a political subdivision of the state under
this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 8.16.010 and 1909 p 372 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever any school district shall select any real estate as a site
for a schoolhouse, or as additional grounds to an existing schoolhouse
site, within the district, and the board of school directors of such
district and the owner or owners of the site or any part thereof, or
addition thereto selected, shall be unable to agree upon the
compensation to be paid by such school district to the owner or owners
thereof, such school district shall have the right to take and acquire
title to such real estate for use as a schoolhouse site or additional
site, upon first paying to the owner or owners thereof therefor the
value thereof, to be ascertained in the manner hereinafter provided.
Property held in trust by the state is not subject to condemnation
under this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 8.20.010 and 1890 p 294 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any corporation authorized by law to appropriate land, real estate,
premises or other property for right-of-way or any other corporate
purposes, may present to the superior court of the county in which any
land, real estate, premises or other property sought to be appropriated
shall be situated, or to the judge of such superior court in any county
where he has jurisdiction or is holding court, a petition in which the
land, real estate, premises or other property sought to be appropriated
shall be described with reasonable certainty, and setting forth the
name of each and every owner, encumbrancer or other person or party
interested in the same, or any part thereof, so far as the same can be
ascertained from the public records, the object for which the land is
sought to be appropriated, and praying that a jury be impaneled to
ascertain and determine the compensation to be made in money,
irrespective of any benefit from any improvement proposed by such
corporation, to such owner or owners, respectively, and to all tenants,
encumbrancers and others interested, for the taking or injuriously
affecting such lands, real estate, premises or other property, or in
case a jury be waived as in other civil cases in courts of record in
the manner prescribed by law, then that the compensation to be made, as
aforesaid, be ascertained and determined by the court, or judge
thereof. Property held in trust by the state is not subject to
condemnation under this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 8.24.010 and 1913 c 133 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
An owner, or one entitled to the beneficial use, of land which is
so situate with respect to the land of another that it is necessary for
its proper use and enjoyment to have and maintain a private way of
necessity or to construct and maintain any drain, flume or ditch, on,
across, over or through the land of such other, for agricultural,
domestic or sanitary purposes, may condemn and take lands of such other
sufficient in area for the construction and maintenance of such private
way of necessity, or for the construction and maintenance of such
drain, flume or ditch, as the case may be. The term "private way of
necessity," as used in this chapter, shall mean and include a right-of-way on, across, over or through the land of another for means of
ingress and egress, and the construction and maintenance thereon of
roads, logging roads, flumes, canals, ditches, tunnels, tramways and
other structures upon, over and through which timber, stone, minerals
or other valuable materials and products may be transported and
carried. Property held in trust by the state is not subject to
condemnation under this section.

Sec. 7 RCW 8.28.050 and 1909 c 16 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
That any municipal corporation of any state adjoining the state of
Washington may acquire title to any land or water right within the
state of Washington, by purchase or condemnation, which lies within any
watershed from which said municipal corporation obtains or desires to
obtain its water supply. Property held in trust by the state is not
subject to condemnation under this section.

Sec. 8 RCW 14.07.020 and 1941 c 21 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Such municipalities may also acquire by purchase, condemnation or
lease, lands and other property for said purpose and dispose of such
lands and other property, including property acquired by tax
foreclosure proceedings, by sale or gift for public use to any city,
town, port district, county, the state of Washington or the United
States of America. Any city, town, port district and county is hereby
empowered to acquire lands and other property for said purpose by the
exercise of the power of eminent domain under the procedure that is or
shall be provided by law for the condemnation and appropriation of
private property for any of their respective corporate uses, and no
property shall be exempt from such condemnation, appropriation or
disposition by reason of the same having been or being dedicated,
appropriated, or otherwise held to public use: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That
nothing in this chapter shall authorize or entitle any city, town, port
district or county to acquire by eminent domain any site or other
facilities for landings, terminals, housing, repair and care of
dirigibles, airplanes, and seaplanes for aerial transportation of
persons, property, mail or military or naval aircraft, now or hereafter
owned by any other city, town, port district or county. Property held
in trust by the state is not subject to condemnation by a political
subdivision of the state under this section.

Sec. 9 RCW 17.28.160 and 1981 c 156 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A mosquito control district organized under this chapter may:
(1) Take all necessary or proper steps for the extermination of
mosquitoes.
(2) Subject to the paramount control of the county or city in which
they exist, abate as nuisances all stagnant pools of water and other
breeding places for mosquitoes.
(3) If necessary or proper, in the furtherance of the objects of
this chapter, build, construct, repair, and maintain necessary dikes,
levees, cuts, canals, or ditches upon any land, and acquire by
purchase, condemnation, or by other lawful means, in the name of the
district, any lands, rights-of-way, easements, property, or material
necessary for any of those purposes.
(4) Make contracts to indemnify or compensate any owner of land or
other property for any injury or damage necessarily caused by the use
or taking of property for dikes, levees, cuts, canals, or ditches.
(5) Enter upon without hindrance any lands within the district for
the purpose of inspection to ascertain whether breeding places of
mosquitoes exist upon such lands; or to abate public nuisances in
accordance with this chapter; or to ascertain if notices to abate the
breeding of mosquitoes upon such lands have been complied with; or to
treat with oil or other larvicidal material any breeding places of
mosquitoes upon such lands.
(6) Sell or lease any land, rights-of-way, easements, property or
material acquired by the district.
(7) Issue warrants payable at the time stated therein to evidence
the obligation to repay money borrowed or any other obligation incurred
by the district, warrants so issued to draw interest at a rate fixed by
the board payable annually or semiannually as the board may prescribe.
(8) Make contracts with the United States, or any state,
municipality, or any department of those entities for carrying out the
general purpose for which the district is formed.
(9) Acquire by gift, devise, bequest, lease, or purchase, real and
personal property necessary or convenient for its purposes.
(10) Make contracts, employ engineers, health officers,
sanitarians, physicians, laboratory personnel, attorneys, and other
technical or professional assistants; and publish information or
literature and do any and all other things necessary or incident to the
powers granted by, and to carry out the projects specified in this
chapter. Property held in trust by the state is not subject to
condemnation by a political subdivision of the state under this
section.

Sec. 10 RCW 22.16.010 and 1919 c 98 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The right of eminent domain is hereby extended to corporations
incorporated or that may hereafter be incorporated under the laws of
this state, or of any other state or territory and qualified to
transact business in this state for the purpose of acquiring, owning or
operating public warehouses or elevators for storing and handling
grain, produce and other agricultural commodities which may desire to
secure warehouse or elevator sites or rights-of-way for roadways
leading to and from the same or for wharves or boat landings on
navigable waters and all other purposes incident to and connected with
the business conducted by such warehouse or elevator. Property held in
trust by the state is not subject to condemnation under this section.

Sec. 11 RCW 28A.335.220 and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.070 are
each amended to read as follows:
The board of directors of any school district may proceed to
condemn and appropriate not more than fifteen acres of land for any
elementary school purpose; not more than twenty-five acres for any
junior high school purpose; not more than forty acres for any senior
high school purpose; except as otherwise provided by law, not more than
seventy-five acres for any vocational technical school purpose; and not
more than fifteen acres for any other school district purpose. Such
condemnation proceedings shall be in accordance with chapters 8.16 and
8.25 RCW and such other laws of this state providing for appropriating
private property for public use by school districts. Property held in
trust by the state is not subject to condemnation under this section.

Sec. 12 RCW 43.52.300 and 1977 ex.s. c 184 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
An operating agency formed under RCW 43.52.360 shall have
authority:
(1) To generate, produce, transmit, deliver, exchange, purchase or
sell electric energy and to enter into contracts for any or all such
purposes.
(2) To construct, condemn, purchase, lease, acquire, add to,
extend, maintain, improve, operate, develop and regulate plants, works
and facilities for the generation and/or transmission of electric
energy, either within or without the state of Washington, and to take,
condemn, purchase, lease and acquire any real or personal, public or
private property, franchise and property rights, including but not
limited to ((state,)) county and school lands and properties, for any
of the purposes herein set forth and for any facilities or works
necessary or convenient for use in the construction, maintenance or
operation of any such works, plants and facilities; provided that an
operating agency shall not be authorized to acquire by condemnation any
plants, works and facilities owned and operated by any city or
district, or by a privately owned public utility. An operating agency
shall be authorized to contract for and to acquire by lease or purchase
from the United States or any of its agencies, any plants, works or
facilities for the generation and transmission of electricity and any
real or personal property necessary or convenient for use in connection
therewith. Property held in trust by the state is not subject to
condemnation under this section.
(3) To negotiate and enter into contracts with the United States or
any of its agencies, with any state or its agencies, with Canada or its
agencies or with any district or city of this state, for the lease,
purchase, construction, extension, betterment, acquisition, operation
and maintenance of all or any part of any electric generating and
transmission plants and reservoirs, works and facilities or rights
necessary thereto, either within or without the state of Washington,
and for the marketing of the energy produced therefrom. Such
negotiations or contracts shall be carried on and concluded with due
regard to the position and laws of the United States in respect to
international agreements.
(4) To negotiate and enter into contracts for the purchase, sale,
exchange, transmission or use of electric energy or falling water with
any person, firm or corporation, including political subdivisions and
agencies of any state of Canada, or of the United States, at fair and
nondiscriminating rates.
(5) To apply to the appropriate agencies of the state of
Washington, the United States or any thereof, and to Canada and/or to
any other proper agency for such permits, licenses or approvals as may
be necessary, and to construct, maintain and operate works, plants and
facilities in accordance with such licenses or permits, and to obtain,
hold and use such licenses and permits in the same manner as any other
person or operating unit.
(6) To establish rates for electric energy sold or transmitted by
the operating agency. When any revenue bonds or warrants are
outstanding the operating agency shall have the power and shall be
required to establish and maintain and collect rates or charges for
electric energy, falling water and other services sold, furnished or
supplied by the operating agency which shall be fair and
nondiscriminatory and adequate to provide revenues sufficient for the
payment of the principal and interest on such bonds or warrants and all
payments which the operating agency is obligated to set aside in any
special fund or funds created for such purposes, and for the proper
operation and maintenance of the public utility owned by the operating
agency and all necessary repairs, replacements and renewals thereof.
(7) To act as agent for the purchase and sale at wholesale of
electricity for any city or district whenever requested so to do by
such city or district.
(8) To contract for and to construct, operate and maintain
fishways, fish protective devices and facilities and hatcheries as
necessary to preserve or compensate for projects operated by the
operating agency.
(9) To construct, operate and maintain channels, locks, canals and
other navigational, reclamation, flood control and fisheries facilities
as may be necessary or incidental to the construction of any electric
generating project, and to enter into agreements and contracts with any
person, firm or corporation, including political subdivisions of any
state, of Canada or the United States for such construction, operation
and maintenance, and for the distribution and payment of the costs
thereof.
(10) To employ legal, engineering and other professional services
and fix the compensation of a managing director and such other
employees as the operating agency may deem necessary to carry on its
business, and to delegate to such manager or other employees such
authority as the operating agency shall determine. Such manager and
employees shall be appointed for an indefinite time and be removable at
the will of the operating agency.
(11) To study, analyze and make reports concerning the development,
utilization and integration of electric generating facilities and
requirements within the state and without the state in that region
which affects the electric resources of the state.
(12) To acquire any land bearing coal, uranium, geothermal, or
other energy resources, within or without the state, or any rights
therein, for the purpose of assuring a long-term, adequate supply of
coal, uranium, geothermal, or other energy resources to supply its
needs, both actual and prospective, for the generation of power and may
make such contracts with respect to the extraction, sale, or disposal
of such energy resources that it deems proper.

Sec. 13 RCW 53.08.010 and 1983 c 24 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A port district may acquire by purchase, for cash or on deferred
payments for a period not exceeding twenty years, or by condemnation,
or both, all lands, property, property rights, leases, or easements
necessary for its purposes and may exercise the right of eminent domain
in the acquirement or damaging of all such lands, property, and
property rights, and may levy and collect assessments upon property for
the payment of all damages and compensation in carrying out its
purposes, and such right shall be exercised in the same manner and by
the same procedure as provided for cities of the first class insofar as
consistent with this title, and in connection therewith the county
treasurer shall perform the duties of the treasurers of such cities.
Property held in trust by the state is not subject to condemnation
under this section.

Sec. 14 RCW 53.08.020 and 1963 c 147 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A port district may construct, condemn, purchase, acquire, add to,
maintain, conduct, and operate sea walls, jetties, piers, wharves,
docks, boat landings, and other harbor improvements, warehouses,
storehouses, elevators, grain-bins, cold storage plants, terminal icing
plants, bunkers, oil tanks, ferries, canals, locks, tidal basins,
bridges, subways, tramways, cableways, conveyors, administration
buildings, fishing terminals, together with modern appliances and
buildings for the economical handling, packaging, storing, and
transporting of freight and handling of passenger traffic, rail and
motor vehicle transfer and terminal facilities, water transfer and
terminal facilities, air transfer and terminal facilities, and any
combination of such transfer and terminal facilities, commercial
transportation, transfer, handling, storage and terminal facilities,
and improvements relating to industrial and manufacturing activities
within the district, and in connection with the operation of the
facilities and improvements of the district, it may perform all
customary services including the handling, weighing, measuring and
reconditioning of all commodities received. A port district may also
construct, condemn, purchase, acquire, add to and maintain facilities
for the freezing or processing of goods, agricultural products, meats
or perishable commodities. A port district may also construct,
purchase and operate belt line railways, but shall not acquire the same
by condemnation. Property held in trust by the state is not subject to
condemnation under this section.

Sec. 15 RCW 53.34.170 and 1959 c 236 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
In the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, improvement,
extension, or betterment of any project or projects authorized under
the provisions of this chapter any port district creating and
establishing any such project or projects may have and exercise all of
the powers heretofore or hereafter granted to port districts for
corporate purposes and, in addition thereto, may acquire by gift or
grant, lease, purchase, or condemnation any public and private
property, franchises and property rights, including ((state,))
county((,)) and school lands and property, and littoral and water
rights whether or not any such property is then devoted to public or
quasi public proprietary or governmental use: PROVIDED, That the court
shall find that the proposed condemnation of any property already
devoted to a public use is for a higher public use, and may by
appropriate contracts with any city, county, or other political
subdivision of the state, with the state and any department of the
government of the state (hereinafter referred to collectively as public
agencies), or with any department, instrumentality or agency of the
United States, acquire title to or the use of existing roads, streets,
parkways, avenues, or highways or the closing of any roads, streets,
parkways, avenues, or highways as may be necessary or convenient to the
acquisition, construction, or operation of any such project or projects
under such terms and conditions as may be mutually agreed upon. All
public agencies are authorized to enter into contracts with port
districts for the aforesaid purposes. Property held in trust by the
state is not subject to condemnation under this section.

Sec. 16 RCW 54.16.020 and 1955 c 390 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A district may construct, condemn and purchase, purchase, acquire,
lease, add to, maintain, operate, develop, and regulate all lands,
property, property rights, water, water rights, dams, ditches, flumes,
aqueducts, pipes and pipe lines, water power, leases, easements,
rights-of-way, franchises, plants, plant facilities, and systems for
generating electric energy by water power, steam, or other methods;
plants, plant facilities, and systems for developing, conserving, and
distributing water for domestic use and irrigation; buildings,
structures, poles and pole lines, and cables and conduits and any and
all other facilities; and may exercise the right of eminent domain to
effectuate the foregoing purposes or for the acquisition and damaging
of such property and rights, or property of any kind appurtenant
thereto, and for the purpose of acquiring the right to make physical
connection with plants and plant facilities of all persons and
municipalities. The right of eminent domain shall be exercised
pursuant to resolution of the commission and conducted in the same
manner and by the same procedure as is provided for the exercise of
that power by cities and towns of the state in the acquisition of like
property and property rights. It shall be no defense to a condemnation
proceeding that a portion of the electric current generated or sold by
the district will be applied to private purposes, if the principal uses
intended are public: PROVIDED, That no public utility owned by a city
or town shall be condemned, and none shall be purchased without
submission of the question to the voters of the utility district. In
a condemnation proceeding, the court shall submit to the jury the
values placed upon the property by the taxing authority for taxation
purposes, and in respect to property, plants, and facilities of persons
using public highways for furnishing public service without franchises,
shall consider in determining the value thereof the fact that the
property, plants, and facilities are subject to be removed from the
highways by reason of being so operated without a franchise. Property
held in trust by the state is not subject to condemnation under this
section.

Sec. 17 RCW 57.08.005 and 2009 c 253 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A district shall have the following powers:
(1) To acquire by purchase or condemnation, or both, all lands,
property and property rights, and all water and water rights, both
within and without the district, necessary for its purposes. The right
of eminent domain shall be exercised in the same manner and by the same
procedure as provided for cities and towns, insofar as consistent with
this title, except that all assessment or reassessment rolls to be
prepared and filed by eminent domain commissioners or commissioners
appointed by the court shall be prepared and filed by the district, and
the duties devolving upon the city treasurer are imposed upon the
county treasurer. Property held in trust by the state is not subject
to condemnation under this section;
(2) To lease real or personal property necessary for its purposes
for a term of years for which that leased property may reasonably be
needed;
(3) To construct, condemn and purchase, add to, maintain, and
supply waterworks to furnish the district and inhabitants thereof and
any other persons, both within and without the district, with an ample
supply of water for all uses and purposes public and private with full
authority to regulate and control the use, content, distribution, and
price thereof in such a manner as is not in conflict with general law
and may construct, acquire, or own buildings and other necessary
district facilities. Where a customer connected to the district's
system uses the water on an intermittent or transient basis, a district
may charge for providing water service to such a customer, regardless
of the amount of water, if any, used by the customer. District
waterworks may include facilities which result in combined water supply
and electric generation, if the electricity generated thereby is a
by-product of the water supply system. That electricity may be used by
the district or sold to any entity authorized by law to use or
distribute electricity. Electricity is deemed a by-product when the
electrical generation is subordinate to the primary purpose of water
supply. For such purposes, a district may take, condemn and purchase,
acquire, and retain water from any public or navigable lake, river or
watercourse, or any underflowing water, and by means of aqueducts or
pipeline conduct the same throughout the district and any city or town
therein and carry it along and upon public highways, roads, and
streets, within and without such district. For the purpose of
constructing or laying aqueducts or pipelines, dams, or waterworks or
other necessary structures in storing and retaining water or for any
other lawful purpose such district may occupy the beds and shores up to
the high water mark of any such lake, river, or other watercourse, and
may acquire by purchase or condemnation such property or property
rights or privileges as may be necessary to protect its water supply
from pollution. For the purposes of waterworks which include
facilities for the generation of electricity as a by-product, nothing
in this section may be construed to authorize a district to condemn
electric generating, transmission, or distribution rights or facilities
of entities authorized by law to distribute electricity, or to acquire
such rights or facilities without the consent of the owner;
(4) To purchase and take water from any municipal corporation,
private person, or entity. A district contiguous to Canada may
contract with a Canadian corporation for the purchase of water and for
the construction, purchase, maintenance, and supply of waterworks to
furnish the district and inhabitants thereof and residents of Canada
with an ample supply of water under the terms approved by the board of
commissioners;
(5) To construct, condemn and purchase, add to, maintain, and
operate systems of sewers for the purpose of furnishing the district,
the inhabitants thereof, and persons outside the district with an
adequate system of sewers for all uses and purposes, public and
private, including but not limited to on-site sewage disposal
facilities, approved septic tanks or approved septic tank systems, on-site sanitary sewerage systems, inspection services and maintenance
services for private and public on-site systems, point and nonpoint
water pollution monitoring programs that are directly related to the
sewerage facilities and programs operated by a district, other
facilities, programs, and systems for the collection, interception,
treatment, and disposal of wastewater, and for the control of pollution
from wastewater with full authority to regulate the use and operation
thereof and the service rates to be charged. Under this chapter, after
July 1, 1998, any requirements for pumping the septic tank of an on-site sewage system should be based, among other things, on actual
measurement of accumulation of sludge and scum by a trained inspector,
trained owner's agent, or trained owner. Training must occur in a
program approved by the state board of health or by a local health
officer. Sewage facilities may include facilities which result in
combined sewage disposal or treatment and electric or methane gas
generation, except that the electricity or methane gas generated
thereby is a by-product of the system of sewers. Such electricity or
methane gas may be used by the district or sold to any entity
authorized by law to distribute electricity or methane gas.
Electricity and methane gas are deemed by-products when the electrical
or methane gas generation is subordinate to the primary purpose of
sewage disposal or treatment. The district may also sell surplus
methane gas, which may be produced as a by-product. For such purposes
a district may conduct sewage throughout the district and throughout
other political subdivisions within the district, and construct and lay
sewer pipe along and upon public highways, roads, and streets, within
and without the district, and condemn and purchase or acquire land and
rights-of-way necessary for such sewer pipe. A district may erect
sewage treatment plants within or without the district, and may
acquire, by purchase or condemnation, properties or privileges
necessary to be had to protect any lakes, rivers, or watercourses and
also other areas of land from pollution from its sewers or its sewage
treatment plant. For the purposes of sewage facilities which include
facilities that result in combined sewage disposal or treatment and
electric generation where the electric generation is a by-product,
nothing in this section may be construed to authorize a district to
condemn electric generating, transmission, or distribution rights or
facilities of entities authorized by law to distribute electricity, or
to acquire such rights or facilities without the consent of the owners;
(6) The authority to construct, condemn and purchase, add to,
maintain, and operate systems of reclaimed water as authorized by
chapter 90.46 RCW for the purpose of furnishing the district and the
inhabitants thereof with reclaimed water for all authorized uses and
purposes, public and private, including with full authority to regulate
the use and operation thereof and the service rates to be charged. In
compliance with other sections of this chapter, a district may also
provide reclaimed water services to persons outside the district;
(7)(a) To construct, condemn and purchase, add to, maintain, and
operate systems of drainage for the benefit and use of the district,
the inhabitants thereof, and persons outside the district with an
adequate system of drainage, including but not limited to facilities
and systems for the collection, interception, treatment, and disposal
of storm or surface waters, and for the protection, preservation, and
rehabilitation of surface and underground waters, and drainage
facilities for public highways, streets, and roads, with full authority
to regulate the use and operation thereof and, except as provided in
(b) of this subsection, the service rates to be charged.
(b) The rate a district may charge under this section for storm or
surface water sewer systems or the portion of the rate allocable to the
storm or surface water sewer system of combined sanitary sewage and
storm or surface water sewer systems shall be reduced by a minimum of
ten percent for any new or remodeled commercial building that utilizes
a permissive rainwater harvesting system. Rainwater harvesting systems
shall be properly sized to utilize the available roof surface of the
building. The jurisdiction shall consider rate reductions in excess of
ten percent dependent upon the amount of rainwater harvested.
(c) Drainage facilities may include natural systems. Drainage
facilities may include facilities which result in combined drainage
facilities and electric generation, except that the electricity
generated thereby is a by-product of the drainage system. Such
electricity may be used by the district or sold to any entity
authorized by law to distribute electricity. Electricity is deemed a
by-product when the electrical generation is subordinate to the primary
purpose of drainage collection, disposal, and treatment. For such
purposes, a district may conduct storm or surface water throughout the
district and throughout other political subdivisions within the
district, construct and lay drainage pipe and culverts along and upon
public highways, roads, and streets, within and without the district,
and condemn and purchase or acquire land and rights-of-way necessary
for such drainage systems. A district may provide or erect facilities
and improvements for the treatment and disposal of storm or surface
water within or without the district, and may acquire, by purchase or
condemnation, properties or privileges necessary to be had to protect
any lakes, rivers, or watercourses and also other areas of land from
pollution from storm or surface waters. For the purposes of drainage
facilities which include facilities that also generate electricity as
a by-product, nothing in this section may be construed to authorize a
district to condemn electric generating, transmission, or distribution
rights or facilities of entities authorized by law to distribute
electricity, or to acquire such rights or facilities without the
consent of the owners;
(8) To construct, condemn, acquire, and own buildings and other
necessary district facilities;
(9) To compel all property owners within the district located
within an area served by the district's system of sewers to connect
their private drain and sewer systems with the district's system under
such penalty as the commissioners shall prescribe by resolution. The
district may for such purpose enter upon private property and connect
the private drains or sewers with the district system and the cost
thereof shall be charged against the property owner and shall be a lien
upon property served;
(10) Where a district contains within its borders, abuts, or is
located adjacent to any lake, stream, groundwater as defined by RCW
90.44.035, or other waterway within the state of Washington, to provide
for the reduction, minimization, or elimination of pollutants from
those waters in accordance with the district's comprehensive plan, and
to issue general obligation bonds, revenue bonds, local improvement
district bonds, or utility local improvement bonds for the purpose of
paying all or any part of the cost of reducing, minimizing, or
eliminating the pollutants from these waters;
(11) Subject to subsection (7) of this section, to fix rates and
charges for water, sewer, reclaimed water, and drain service supplied
and to charge property owners seeking to connect to the district's
systems, as a condition to granting the right to so connect, in
addition to the cost of the connection, such reasonable connection
charge as the board of commissioners shall determine to be proper in
order that those property owners shall bear their equitable share of
the cost of the system. For the purposes of calculating a connection
charge, the board of commissioners shall determine the pro rata share
of the cost of existing facilities and facilities planned for
construction within the next ten years and contained in an adopted
comprehensive plan and other costs borne by the district which are
directly attributable to the improvements required by property owners
seeking to connect to the system. The cost of existing facilities
shall not include those portions of the system which have been donated
or which have been paid for by grants. The connection charge may
include interest charges applied from the date of construction of the
system until the connection, or for a period not to exceed ten years,
whichever is shorter, at a rate commensurate with the rate of interest
applicable to the district at the time of construction or major
rehabilitation of the system, or at the time of installation of the
lines to which the property owner is seeking to connect. In lieu of
requiring the installation of permanent local facilities not planned
for construction by the district, a district may permit connection to
the water and/or sewer systems through temporary facilities installed
at the property owner's expense, provided the property owner pays a
connection charge consistent with the provisions of this chapter and
agrees, in the future, to connect to permanent facilities when they are
installed; or a district may permit connection to the water and/or
sewer systems through temporary facilities and collect from property
owners so connecting a proportionate share of the estimated cost of
future local facilities needed to serve the property, as determined by
the district. The amount collected, including interest at a rate
commensurate with the rate of interest applicable to the district at
the time of construction of the temporary facilities, shall be held for
contribution to the construction of the permanent local facilities by
other developers or the district. The amount collected shall be deemed
full satisfaction of the proportionate share of the actual cost of
construction of the permanent local facilities. If the permanent local
facilities are not constructed within fifteen years of the date of
payment, the amount collected, including any accrued interest, shall be
returned to the property owner, according to the records of the county
auditor on the date of return. If the amount collected is returned to
the property owner, and permanent local facilities capable of serving
the property are constructed thereafter, the property owner at the time
of construction of such permanent local facilities shall pay a
proportionate share of the cost of such permanent local facilities, in
addition to reasonable connection charges and other charges authorized
by this section. A district may permit payment of the cost of
connection and the reasonable connection charge to be paid with
interest in installments over a period not exceeding fifteen years.
The county treasurer may charge and collect a fee of three dollars for
each year for the treasurer's services. Those fees shall be a charge
to be included as part of each annual installment, and shall be
credited to the county current expense fund by the county treasurer.
Revenues from connection charges excluding permit fees are to be
considered payments in aid of construction as defined by department of
revenue rule. Rates or charges for on-site inspection and maintenance
services may not be imposed under this chapter on the development,
construction, or reconstruction of property.
Before adopting on-site inspection and maintenance utility
services, or incorporating residences into an on-site inspection and
maintenance or sewer utility under this chapter, notification must be
provided, prior to the applicable public hearing, to all residences
within the proposed service area that have on-site systems permitted by
the local health officer. The notice must clearly state that the
residence is within the proposed service area and must provide
information on estimated rates or charges that may be imposed for the
service.
A water-sewer district shall not provide on-site sewage system
inspection, pumping services, or other maintenance or repair services
under this section using water-sewer district employees unless the on-site system is connected by a publicly owned collection system to the
water-sewer district's sewerage system, and the on-site system
represents the first step in the sewage disposal process.
Except as otherwise provided in RCW 90.03.525, any public entity
and public property, including the state of Washington and state
property, shall be subject to rates and charges for sewer, water, storm
water control, drainage, and street lighting facilities to the same
extent private persons and private property are subject to those rates
and charges that are imposed by districts. In setting those rates and
charges, consideration may be made of in-kind services, such as stream
improvements or donation of property;
(12) To contract with individuals, associations and corporations,
the state of Washington, and the United States;
(13) To employ such persons as are needed to carry out the
district's purposes and fix salaries and any bond requirements for
those employees;
(14) To contract for the provision of engineering, legal, and other
professional services as in the board of commissioner's discretion is
necessary in carrying out their duties;
(15) To sue and be sued;
(16) To loan and borrow funds and to issue bonds and instruments
evidencing indebtedness under chapter 57.20 RCW and other applicable
laws;
(17) To transfer funds, real or personal property, property
interests, or services subject to RCW 57.08.015;
(18) To levy taxes in accordance with this chapter and chapters
57.04 and 57.20 RCW;
(19) To provide for making local improvements and to levy and
collect special assessments on property benefitted thereby, and for
paying for the same or any portion thereof in accordance with chapter
57.16 RCW;
(20) To establish street lighting systems under RCW 57.08.060;
(21) To exercise such other powers as are granted to water-sewer
districts by this title or other applicable laws; and
(22) To exercise any of the powers granted to cities and counties
with respect to the acquisition, construction, maintenance, operation
of, and fixing rates and charges for waterworks and systems of sewerage
and drainage.

Sec. 18 RCW 81.36.010 and 1961 c 14 s 81.36.010 are each amended
to read as follows:
Every corporation organized for the construction of any railway,
macadamized road, plank road, clay road, canal or bridge, is hereby
authorized and empowered to appropriate, by condemnation, land and any
interest in land or contract right relating thereto, including any
leasehold interest therein and any rights-of-way for tunnels beneath
the surface of the land, and any elevated rights-of-way above the
surface thereof((, including lands granted to the state for university,
school or other purposes, and also tide and shore lands belonging to
the state (but not including harbor areas),)) which may be necessary
for the line of such road, railway or canal, or site of such bridge,
not exceeding two hundred feet in width, besides a sufficient quantity
thereof for toll houses, workshops, materials for construction,
excavations and embankments and a right-of-way over adjacent lands or
property, to enable such corporation to construct and prepare its road,
railway, canal or bridge, and to make proper drains; and in case of a
canal, whenever the court shall deem it necessary, to appropriate a
sufficient quantity of land, ((including lands granted to the state for
university, school or other purposes,)) in addition to that before
specified in this section, for the construction and excavation of such
canal and of the slopes and bermes thereof, not exceeding one thousand
feet in total width; and in case of a railway to appropriate a
sufficient quantity of any such land, ((including lands granted to the
state for university, schools and other purposes and also tide and
shore lands belonging to the state (but not including harbor areas)))
in addition to that before specified in this section, for the necessary
side tracks, depots and water stations, and the right to conduct water
thereto by aqueduct, and for yards, terminal, transfer and switching
grounds, docks and warehouses required for receiving, delivering,
storage and handling of freight, and such land, or any interest
therein, as may be necessary for the security and safety of the public
in the construction, maintenance and operation of its railways;
compensation therefor to be made to the owner thereof irrespective of
any benefit from any improvement proposed by such corporation, in the
manner provided by law: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That if such corporation
locate the bed of such railway or canal upon any part of the track now
occupied by any established state or county road, said corporation
shall be responsible to the state or county in which such state or
county road so appropriated is located, for all expenses incurred by
the state or county in relocating and opening the part of such road so
appropriated. The term land as herein used includes tide and shore
lands but not harbor areas; it also includes any interest in land or
contract right relating thereto, including any leasehold interest
therein. Property held in trust by the state is not subject to
condemnation under this section.

Sec. 19 RCW 85.06.070 and 1919 c 179 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
All drainage districts organized or that may hereafter be organized
under the provisions of this chapter or the acts amendatory thereof
shall have the right of eminent domain, with the power by and through
its board of commissioners, to cause to be condemned and appropriated
private property for the use of said corporation in the construction
and maintenance of a system or systems of drainage, and make just
compensation therefor, and such right of eminent domain may be
exercised either within or without the boundaries of such districts,
and may be exercised with respect to rights-of-way for ditches, drains,
dams, outlets or any other necessary appliances or structures and
whether for the original system or any additions, enlargements or
extensions thereof or for additional outlets or systems of drainage:
PROVIDED, That the property of private corporations may be subjected to
the same rights of eminent domain as that of private individuals:
PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the said board of commissioners shall have the
power to acquire by purchase all the real property necessary to make
the improvements herein provided for. Property held in trust by the
state is not subject to condemnation under this title.

Sec. 20 RCW 86.09.202 and 1937 c 72 s 68 are each amended to read
as follows:
The taking and damaging of property or rights therein or thereto by
a flood control district to construct an improvement or to fully carry
out the purposes of its organization are hereby declared to be for a
public use, and any district organized under the provisions of this
chapter, shall have and exercise the power of eminent domain to acquire
any property or rights therein or thereto either inside or outside the
operation of the district and outside the state of Washington, if
necessary, for the use of the district. Property held in trust by the
state is not subject to condemnation under this title.

Sec. 21 RCW 87.03.018 and 1984 c 168 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Two or more irrigation districts may create a separate legal
authority to carry out any or all of the powers described in RCW
87.03.015. To enable such a legal authority to carry out its delegated
powers, the irrigation districts creating the authority may assign,
convey, or otherwise transfer to it any or all of their respective
property, rights, or obligations, including, without limitation, the
power to issue revenue obligations and the power of condemnation. Such
a legal authority shall be created and organized by contract in the
manner described in chapter 39.34 RCW and shall be a separate legal
entity. Property held in trust by the state is not subject to
condemnation under this section.
A separate legal authority shall only have power to incur
indebtedness that is repayable from rates, tolls, charges, or contract
payments for services or electricity provided by the authority and to
pledge such revenues for the payment and retirement of indebtedness
issued for the construction or acquisition of hydroelectric facilities.
An authority shall not have power to levy taxes or to impose
assessments for the payment of obligations of the authority. Every
bond or other evidence of indebtedness issued by an authority shall
provide (1) that repayment shall be limited solely to the revenues of
the authority; and (2) that no member of the authority shall be
obligated to repay directly or indirectly any obligation of the
authority except to the extent of fair value for services actually
received from the authority. No member may pledge its revenues to
support the issuance of revenue bonds or other indebtedness of an
authority.

Sec. 22 RCW 89.30.130 and 1927 c 254 s 44 are each amended to
read as follows:
Said reclamation districts shall have full authority to carry out
the objects of their creation and to that end are authorized to
acquire, purchase, hold, lease, manage, occupy, and sell real and
personal property or any interest therein, to enter into and perform
any and all necessary contracts, to appoint and employ the necessary
officers, agents and employees, to sue and be sued, to exercise the
right of eminent domain, to levy and enforce the collection of taxes
and special assessments in the manner herein provided against the lands
within the district, for district revenues, and to do any and all
lawful acts required and expedient to carry out the purpose of this
chapter. Property held in trust by the state is not subject to
condemnation under this section.

--- END ---