BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.08.050 and 2005 c 151 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board, subject to the provisions of this title and the rules,
shall:
(1) Determine the localities within which state liquor stores shall
be established throughout the state, and the number and situation of
the stores within each locality;
(2) Appoint in cities and towns and other communities, in which no
state liquor store is located, contract liquor stores. In addition,
the board may appoint, in its discretion, a manufacturer that also
manufactures liquor products other than wine under a license under this
title, as a contract liquor store for the purpose of sale of liquor
products of its own manufacture on the licensed premises only. Such
contract liquor stores shall be authorized to sell liquor under the
guidelines provided by law, rule, or contract, and such contract liquor
stores shall be subject to such additional rules and regulations
consistent with this title as the board may require;
(3) Establish all necessary warehouses for the storing and
bottling, diluting and rectifying of stocks of liquors for the purposes
of this title;
(4) Beginning on the effective date of this act, provide for the
leasing for periods not to exceed ((ten)) three years of all premises
required for the conduct of the business; and for remodeling the same,
and the procuring of their furnishings, fixtures, and supplies; and for
obtaining options of renewal of such leases by the lessee. The terms
of such leases in all other respects shall be subject to the direction
of the board;
(5) Determine the nature, form and capacity of all packages to be
used for containing liquor kept for sale under this title;
(6) Execute or cause to be executed, all contracts, papers, and
documents in the name of the board, under such regulations as the board
may fix;
(7) Pay all customs, duties, excises, charges and obligations
whatsoever relating to the business of the board;
(8) Require bonds from all employees in the discretion of the
board, and to determine the amount of fidelity bond of each such
employee;
(9) Perform services for the state lottery commission to such
extent, and for such compensation, as may be mutually agreed upon
between the board and the commission;
(10) Accept and deposit into the general fund-local account and
disburse, subject to appropriation, federal grants or other funds or
donations from any source for the purpose of improving public awareness
of the health risks associated with alcohol consumption by youth and
the abuse of alcohol by adults in Washington state. The board's
alcohol awareness program shall cooperate with federal and state
agencies, interested organizations, and individuals to effect an active
public beverage alcohol awareness program;
(11) Perform all other matters and things, whether similar to the
foregoing or not, to carry out the provisions of this title, and shall
have full power to do each and every act necessary to the conduct of
its business, including all buying, selling, preparation and approval
of forms, and every other function of the business whatsoever, subject
only to audit by the state auditor: PROVIDED, That the board shall
have no authority to regulate the content of spoken language on
licensed premises where wine and other liquors are served and where
there is not a clear and present danger of disorderly conduct being
provoked by such language.

--- END ---