BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The intent of this act is to identify and
fund a project of significance in the Snohomish region.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall develop a project summary and subsequently
begin the environmental planning process as required under chapter
43.21C RCW, or the national environmental policy act if applicable, for
the state route number 9/state route number 204 intersection project.
In conjunction with the environmental planning process, the department
shall prepare a final design for the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of five million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium ending
June 30, 2011, from the motor vehicle account to the department of
transportation for the purposes of section 2 of this act.

--- END ---