BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 67.70.044 and 2009 c 576 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Pursuant to RCW 67.70.040(1)(a), the commission may enter into
the multistate agreement establishing a shared game lottery known as
"The Big Game," that was entered into by party state lotteries in
August 1996 and subsequently amended and a shared game lottery known as
"Powerball."
(2) The shared game lottery account is created ((as a separate
account outside)) in the custody of the state ((treasury)) treasurer.
All moneys received by the commission or any employee thereof, except
for change funds and an amount of petty cash as fixed by the commission
within the authority of law must be deposited each day into a
depository approved by the state treasurer and transferred to the state
treasurer to be credited to the shared game lottery account. The
account ((is managed, maintained, and controlled by the commission
and)) consists of all revenues received from the sale of shared game
lottery tickets or shares, and all other moneys credited or transferred
to it from any other fund or source under law. ((The account is
allotted according to chapter 43.88 RCW.)) Only the commission may
authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.

Sec. 2 RCW 67.70.230 and 1985 c 375 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
((There is hereby created and established a separate account, to be
known as)) The state lottery account((. Such account shall be managed,
maintained, and controlled by the commission and shall)) is created in
the custody of the state treasurer. All moneys received by the
commission or any employee thereof, except for change funds and an
amount of petty cash as fixed by the commission within the authority of
law must be deposited each day into a depository approved by the state
treasurer and transferred to the state treasurer to be credited to the
state lottery account. The account consists of all revenues received
from the sale of lottery tickets or shares, and all other moneys
credited or transferred thereto from any other fund or source pursuant
to law. ((The account shall be a separate account outside the state
treasury. No appropriation is required to permit expenditures and
payment of obligations from the account.)) Only the commission may
authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.

Sec. 3 RCW 67.70.260 and 2002 c 371 s 919 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby created the lottery administrative account in the
state treasury. The account ((shall)) must be managed, controlled, and
maintained by the director. The legislature may appropriate from the
account for the payment of costs incurred in the operation and
administration of the lottery. ((During the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium,
the legislature may transfer from the lottery administrative account to
the state general fund such amounts as reflect the appropriations
reductions made by the 2002 supplemental appropriations act for
administrative efficiencies and savings.))

Sec. 4 RCW 67.70.190 and 2009 c 564 s 949 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unclaimed prizes ((shall)) must be retained in the state lottery
account for the person entitled thereto for one hundred eighty days
after the drawing in which the prize is won, or after the official end
of the game for instant prizes. If no claim is made for the prize
within this time, all rights to the prize shall be extinguished, ((and
the prize shall be retained in the state lottery fund for further use
as prizes, except that)) one-third of all unclaimed prize money
((shall)) must be deposited in the economic development strategic
reserve account created in RCW 43.330.250 and the remainder must be
deposited into the education legacy trust account created in RCW
83.100.230.
((On July 1, 2009, June 30, 2010, and June 30, 2011, all unclaimed
prize money retained in the state lottery fund [account] in excess of
three million dollars, excluding amounts distributed to the economic
development strategic reserve account, shall be transferred into the
state general fund.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 No later than July 1, 2010, the state
lottery commission must transfer to the newly created accounts in RCW
67.70.044 and 67.70.230 all unobligated balances of the shared game
lottery account and the state lottery accounts outside of the state
treasury, as of June 30, 2010.

--- END ---