BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.88 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The office of financial management's operating budget
instructions to agencies must include collecting additional information
for proposed information technology projects. Agencies must submit the
following information about specific projects:
(a) Estimated project implementation costs by staffing, contracted
services, hardware purchase and maintenance, software license purchase
and maintenance, hardware lease or finance, maintenance and operations,
training, and travel;
(b) Estimated project maintenance costs by staffing, contracted
services, hardware purchase and maintenance, software license purchase
and maintenance, hardware lease or finance, maintenance and operations,
training, and travel;
(c) All project expenditures in previous biennia;
(d) Oversight level as determined by the information services
board, if available;
(e) Estimated project duration and start date;
(f) Estimated ongoing operating savings or other benefits resulting
from the project;
(g) An explanation of the purpose and benefits of the project; and
(h) An explanation of reengineering and streamlining of the
underlying business process, if pursuing the development or purchase of
new software. An explanation of efforts to gather business and
technical requirements must also be provided.
(2) The governor's budget must include an information technology
plan which will include a list of all the proposed projects, their next
biennium costs by funding source, projected costs over the two biennia
succeeding the next biennium by funding source, and a statement of the
purpose of the project. This information must also be submitted
electronically, in a format to be determined by the office of financial
management and the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee.
(3) The office of financial management shall also institute a
method of accounting for information technology-related expenditures,
including creating common definitions for what constitutes an
information technology investment. The director of financial
management shall report total state expenditures on information
technology by funding source and by object of expenditure to the
chairs, ranking minority members, and staff coordinators of the
appropriations committees of the senate and house of representatives
for each biennium. The first report is due by January 15, 2013.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.88.560 and 1992 c 20 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director of financial management shall establish policies and
standards governing the funding of major information technology
projects as required under RCW 43.105.190(2). The director of
financial management shall also direct the collection of additional
information on information technology projects and submit an
information technology plan as required under section 1 of this act.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.105.041 and 2009 c 486 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall have the following powers and duties related to
information services:
(a) To develop standards and procedures governing the acquisition
and disposition of equipment, proprietary software and purchased
services, licensing of the radio spectrum by or on behalf of state
agencies, and confidentiality of computerized data. The board shall
coordinate with the office of financial management to develop
contracting standards for information technology acquisition and
purchased services and will work with state agencies to ensure
deployment of standardized contracts;
(b) To purchase, lease, rent, or otherwise acquire, dispose of, and
maintain equipment, proprietary software, and purchased services, or to
delegate to other agencies and institutions of state government, under
appropriate standards, the authority to purchase, lease, rent, or
otherwise acquire, dispose of, and maintain equipment, proprietary
software, and purchased services: PROVIDED, That, agencies and
institutions of state government are expressly prohibited from
acquiring or disposing of equipment, proprietary software, and
purchased services without such delegation of authority. The
acquisition and disposition of equipment, proprietary software, and
purchased services is exempt from RCW 43.19.1919 and, as provided in
RCW 43.19.1901, from the provisions of RCW 43.19.190 through 43.19.200,
except that the board, the department, and state agencies, as
delegated, must post notices of technology procurement bids on the
state's common vendor registration and bid notification system. This
subsection (1)(b) does not apply to the legislative branch;
(c) To develop statewide or interagency technical policies,
standards, and procedures;
(d) To review and approve standards and common specifications for
new or expanded telecommunications networks proposed by agencies,
public postsecondary education institutions, educational service
districts, or statewide or regional providers of K-12 information
technology services, and to assure the cost-effective development and
incremental implementation of a statewide video telecommunications
system to serve: Public schools; educational service districts;
vocational-technical institutes; community colleges; colleges and
universities; state and local government; and the general public
through public affairs programming;
(e) To provide direction concerning strategic planning goals and
objectives for the state. The board shall seek input from the
legislature and the judiciary;
(f) To develop and implement a process for the resolution of
appeals by:
(i) Vendors concerning the conduct of an acquisition process by an
agency or the department; or
(ii) A customer agency concerning the provision of services by the
department or by other state agency providers;
(g) To establish policies for the periodic review by the department
of agency performance which may include but are not limited to analysis
of:
(i) Planning, management, control, and use of information services;
(ii) Training and education; and
(iii) Project management;
(h) To set its meeting schedules and convene at scheduled times, or
meet at the request of a majority of its members, the chair, or the
director;
(i) To review and approve that portion of the department's budget
requests that provides for support to the board; and
(j) To develop procurement policies and procedures, such as
unbundled contracting and subcontracting, that encourage and facilitate
the purchase of products and services by state agencies and
institutions from Washington small businesses to the maximum extent
practicable and consistent with international trade agreement
commitments.
(2) Statewide technical standards to promote and facilitate
electronic information sharing and access are an essential component of
acceptable and reliable public access service and complement content-related standards designed to meet those goals. The board shall:
(a) Establish technical standards to facilitate electronic access
to government information and interoperability of information systems,
including wireless communications systems. Local governments are
strongly encouraged to follow the standards established by the board;
and
(b) Require agencies to consider electronic public access needs
when planning new information systems or major upgrades of systems.
In developing these standards, the board is encouraged to include
the state library, state archives, and appropriate representatives of
state and local government.
(3)(a) The board, in consultation with the K-20 board, has the duty
to govern, operate, and oversee the technical design, implementation,
and operation of the K-20 network including, but not limited to, the
following duties: Establishment and implementation of K-20 network
technical policy, including technical standards and conditions of use;
review and approval of network design; procurement of shared network
services and equipment; and resolving user/provider disputes concerning
technical matters. The board shall delegate general operational and
technical oversight to the K-20 network technical steering committee as
appropriate.
(b) The board has the authority to adopt rules under chapter 34.05
RCW to implement the provisions regarding the technical operations and
conditions of use of the K-20 network.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.105.180 and 1999 c 80 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Upon request of the office of financial management,)) The
department, in coordination with the information services board and the
office of financial management, shall evaluate agency budget requests
for major information technology projects identified under RCW
43.105.190, including those proposed by the superintendent of public
instruction, in conjunction with educational service districts, or
statewide or regional providers of K-12 education information
technology services. The department shall submit recommendations for
funding all or part of such requests to the office of financial
management and to the chairs, ranking minority members, and staff
coordinators of the appropriations committees of the senate and house
of representatives. The department shall also submit recommendations
regarding consolidation of similar proposals or other efficiencies it
finds in reviewing proposals.
The department, with the advice and approval of the office of
financial management and the information services board, shall
establish criteria, consistent with portfolio-based information
technology management, for the evaluation of agency budget requests
under this section. These budget requests shall be made in the context
of an agency's information technology portfolio; technology initiatives
underlying budget requests are subject to board review. Criteria shall
include, but not be limited to: Feasibility of the proposed projects,
consistency with the state strategic information technology plan,
consistency with information technology portfolios, appropriate
provision for public electronic access to information, evidence of
business process streamlining and gathering of business and technical
requirements, and services, costs, and benefits.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.105.160 and 2005 c 319 s 110 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall prepare a state strategic information
technology plan which shall establish a statewide mission, goals, and
objectives for the use of information technology, including goals for
electronic access to government records, information, and services.
The plan shall be developed in accordance with the standards and
policies established by the board and shall be submitted to the board
for review, modification as necessary, and approval. The department
shall seek the advice of the board in the development of this plan.
The plan approved under this section shall be updated as necessary
and submitted to the governor and the chairs and ranking minority
members of the appropriations committees of the senate and the house of
representatives.
(2) The department shall prepare a biennial state performance
report on information technology based on agency performance reports
required under RCW 43.105.170 and other information deemed appropriate
by the department. The report shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) An analysis, based upon agency portfolios, of the state's
information technology infrastructure, including its value, condition,
and capacity;
(b) An evaluation of performance relating to information
technology;
(c) An assessment of progress made toward implementing the state
strategic information technology plan, including progress toward
electronic access to public information and enabling citizens to have
two-way access to public records, information, and services;
(d) An analysis of the success or failure, feasibility, progress,
costs, and timeliness of implementation of major information technology
projects under RCW 43.105.190((;
(e))). At a minimum, the portion of the report regarding major
technology projects must include:
(i) Final budget broken down by staffing costs, contracted service,
hardware purchase or lease, software purchase or lease, travel, and
training. The original budget must also be shown for comparison;
(ii) The original proposed project schedule and the final actual
project schedule;
(iii) Data regarding progress towards meeting the original goals
and performance measures of the project, particularly as it relates to
operating budget savings;
(iv) Discussion of lessons learned on the project, performance of
any contractors used, and reasons for project delays or cost increases;
and
(v) Identification of benefits, cost avoidance, and cost savings
generated by major information technology projects developed under RCW
43.105.190; and
(((f))) (e) An inventory of state information services, equipment,
and proprietary software.
Copies of the report shall be distributed biennially to the
governor and the chairs and ranking minority members of the
appropriations committees of the senate and the house of
representatives. The major technology section of the report must
examine major information technology projects completed in the previous
biennium. The report must also examine projects two years after
completion for progress toward meeting performance goals and operating
budget savings. The first report is due December 15, 2011, and every
two years thereafter.

--- END ---