BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.14B.010 and 1991 c 54 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that the state and counties should be
provided with an additional revenue source to fund enhanced 911
emergency communications systems throughout the state on a
multicounty((,)) or countywide((, or district-wide)) basis. The
legislature further finds that the most efficient and appropriate
method of deriving additional revenue for this purpose is to impose an
excise tax on the use of switched access lines, radio access lines, and
interconnected voice over internet protocol service lines.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.14B.020 and 2007 c 54 s 16 and 2007 c 6 s 1009 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Emergency services communication system" means a
multicounty((,)) or countywide((, or districtwide radio or landline))
communications network, including an enhanced 911 ((telephone))
emergency communications system, which provides rapid public access for
coordinated dispatching of services, personnel, equipment, and
facilities for police, fire, medical, or other emergency services.
(2) "Enhanced 911 ((telephone)) emergency communications system"
means a public ((telephone)) communications system consisting of a
network, database, and on-premises equipment that is accessed by
dialing or accessing 911 and that enables reporting police, fire,
medical, or other emergency situations to a public safety answering
point. The system includes the capability to selectively route
incoming 911 ((calls)) voice or data to the appropriate public safety
answering point that operates in a defined 911 service area and the
capability to automatically display the name, address, and telephone
number of incoming 911 ((calls)) voice or data at the appropriate
public safety answering point. "Enhanced 911 emergency communications
system" includes the modernization to next generation 911 systems.
(3) "Interconnected voice over internet protocol service" has the
same meaning as provided by the federal communications commission in 47
C.F.R. Sec. 9.3 on January 1, 2009, or a subsequent date determined by
the department.
(4) "Interconnected voice over internet protocol service line"
means an interconnected voice over internet protocol service that
offers an active telephone number or successor dialing protocol
assigned by a voice over internet protocol provider to a voice over
internet protocol service customer that has inbound and outbound
calling capability, which can directly access a public safety answering
point when such a voice over internet protocol service customer has a
place of primary use in the state.
(5) "Switched access line" means the telephone service line which
connects a subscriber's main telephone(s) or equivalent main
telephone(s) to the local exchange company's switching office.
(((4))) (6) "Local exchange company" has the meaning ascribed to it
in RCW 80.04.010.
(((5))) (7) "Radio access line" means the telephone number assigned
to or used by a subscriber for two-way local wireless voice service
available to the public for hire from a radio communications service
company. Radio access lines include, but are not limited to, radio-telephone communications lines used in cellular telephone service,
personal communications services, and network radio access lines, or
their functional and competitive equivalent. Radio access lines do not
include lines that provide access to one-way signaling service, such as
paging service, or to communications channels suitable only for data
transmission, or to nonlocal radio access line service, such as
wireless roaming service, or to a private telecommunications system.
(((6))) (8) "Radio communications service company" has the meaning
ascribed to it in RCW 80.04.010, except that it does not include radio
paging providers. It does include those persons or entities that
provide commercial mobile radio services, as defined by 47 U.S.C. Sec.
332(d)(1), and both facilities-based and nonfacilities-based resellers.
(((7))) (9) "Private telecommunications system" has the meaning
ascribed to it in RCW 80.04.010.
(((8))) (10) "Subscriber" means the retail purchaser of
((telephone)) telecommunications service ((as telephone service is
defined in RCW 82.16.010)), a competitive telephone service, or
interconnected voice over internet protocol service.
(((9))) (11) "Place of primary use" ((has the meaning ascribed to
it in RCW 82.04.065)) means the street address representative of where
the subscriber's use of the radio access line or interconnected voice
over internet protocol service line occurs, which must be:
(a) The residential street address or primary business street
address of the subscriber; and
(b) In the case of radio access lines, within the licensed service
area of the home service provider.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.14B.030 and 2007 c 54 s 17 and 2007 c 6 s 1024 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a county may impose a county
enhanced 911 excise tax on the use of switched access lines in an
amount not exceeding ((fifty)) seventy cents per month for each
switched access line. The amount of tax ((shall)) must be uniform for
each switched access line. Each county ((shall)) must provide notice
of ((such)) the tax to all local exchange companies serving in the
county at least sixty days in advance of the date on which the first
payment is due. The tax imposed under this subsection must be remitted
to the department by local exchange companies on a tax return provided
by the department. The tax must be deposited in the county enhanced 911
excise tax account as provided in section 4 of this act.
(2) The legislative authority of a county may also impose a county
enhanced 911 excise tax on the use of radio access lines whose place of
primary use is located within the county in an amount not exceeding
((fifty)) seventy cents per month for each radio access line. The
amount of tax ((shall)) must be uniform for each radio access line.
The county ((shall)) must provide notice of ((such)) the tax to all
radio communications service companies serving in the county at least
sixty days in advance of the date on which the first payment is due.
((Any county imposing this tax shall include in its ordinance a refund
mechanism whereby the amount of any tax ordered to be refunded by the
judgment of a court of record, or as a result of the resolution of any
appeal therefrom, shall be refunded to the radio communications service
company or local exchange company that collected the tax, and those
companies shall reimburse the subscribers who paid the tax. The
ordinance shall further provide that to the extent the subscribers who
paid the tax cannot be identified or located, the tax paid by those
subscribers shall be returned to the county.)) The tax imposed under
this section must be remitted to the department by radio communications
service companies, including those companies that resell radio access
lines, on a tax return provided by the department. The tax must be
deposited in the county enhanced 911 excise tax account as provided in
section 4 of this act.
(3)(a) The legislative authority of a county may impose a county
enhanced 911 excise tax on the use of interconnected voice over
internet protocol service lines in an amount not exceeding seventy
cents per month for each interconnected voice over internet protocol
service line. The amount of tax must be uniform for each line and must
be levied on no more than the number of voice over internet protocol
service lines on an account that are capable of simultaneous
unrestricted outward calling to the public switched telephone network.
(b) The interconnected voice over internet protocol service company
must use the place of primary use of the subscriber to determine which
county's enhanced 911 excise tax applies to the service provided to the
subscriber.
(c) The tax imposed under this section must be remitted to the
department by interconnected voice over internet protocol service
companies on a tax return provided by the department.
(d) The tax must be deposited in the county enhanced 911 excise tax
account as provided in section 4 of this act.
(e) To the extent that a local exchange carrier and an
interconnected voice over internet protocol service company
contractually jointly provide a single service line, only one service
company is responsible for remitting the enhanced 911 excise taxes, and
nothing in this section precludes service companies who jointly provide
service from agreeing by contract which of them shall remit the taxes
collected.
(4) Counties imposing a county enhanced 911 excise tax must provide
an annual update to the enhanced 911 coordinator detailing the
proportion of their county enhanced 911 excise tax that is being spent
on:
(a) Efforts to modernize their existing enhanced 911 communications
system; and
(b) Enhanced 911 operational costs.
(5) A state enhanced 911 excise tax is imposed on all switched
access lines in the state. The amount of tax ((shall)) may not exceed
twenty-five cents per month for each switched access line. The tax
((shall)) must be uniform for each switched access line. The tax
imposed under this subsection ((shall)) must be remitted to the
department ((of revenue)) by local exchange companies on a tax return
provided by the department. Tax proceeds ((shall)) must be deposited
by the treasurer in the enhanced 911 account created in RCW 38.52.540.
(((4))) (6) A state enhanced 911 excise tax is imposed on all radio
access lines whose place of primary use is located within the state in
an amount of twenty-five cents per month for each radio access line.
The tax ((shall)) must be uniform for each radio access line. The tax
imposed under this section ((shall)) must be remitted to the department
((of revenue)) by radio communications service companies, including
those companies that resell radio access lines, on a tax return
provided by the department. Tax proceeds ((shall)) must be deposited
by the treasurer in the enhanced 911 account created in RCW 38.52.540.
The tax imposed under this section is not subject to the state sales
and use tax or any local tax.
(7) A state enhanced 911 excise tax is imposed on all
interconnected voice over internet protocol service lines in the state.
The amount of tax may not exceed twenty-five cents per month for each
interconnected voice over internet protocol service line whose place of
primary use is located in the state. The amount of tax must be uniform
for each line and must be levied on no more than the number of voice
over internet protocol service lines on an account that are capable of
simultaneous unrestricted outward calling to the public switched
telephone network. The tax imposed under this subsection must be
remitted to the department by interconnected voice over internet
protocol service companies on a tax return provided by the department.
Tax proceeds must be deposited by the treasurer in the enhanced 911
account created in RCW 38.52.540.
(((5))) (8) For calendar year 2011, the taxes imposed by
subsections (5) and (7) of this section must be set at their maximum
rate. By August 31, 2011, and by August 31st of each year thereafter,
the state enhanced 911 coordinator ((shall)) must recommend the level
for the next year of the state enhanced 911 excise tax imposed by
subsections (((3))) (5) and (7) of this section, based on a systematic
cost and revenue analysis, to the utilities and transportation
commission. The commission ((shall)) must by the following October
31st determine the level of the state enhanced 911 excise ((tax)) taxes
imposed by subsections (5) and (7) of this section for the following
year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.14B RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Counties imposing the enhanced 911 excise tax under RCW
82.14B.030 must contract with the department for the administration and
collection of the tax. The department may deduct a percentage amount,
as provided by contract, of no more than two percent of the enhanced
911 excise taxes collected to cover administration and collection
expenses incurred by the department. If a county imposes an enhanced
911 excise tax with an effective date of January 1, 2011, the county
must contract with the department for the administration and collection
of the tax by October 15, 2010.
(2) The remainder of any portion of the county enhanced 911 excise
tax under RCW 82.14B.030 that is collected by the department must be
deposited in the county enhanced 911 excise tax account hereby created
in the custody of the state treasurer. Expenditures from the account
may be used only for distribution to counties imposing the enhanced 911
excise tax. Only the director of the department or his or her designee
may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is not
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, and an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.14B RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All moneys that accrue in the county enhanced 911 excise tax
account created in section 4 of this act must be distributed monthly to
the counties in the amount of the taxes collected on behalf of each
county, minus the administration and collection fee retained by the
department as provided in section 4 of this act.
(2) If a county imposes by resolution or ordinance an enhanced 911
excise tax that is in excess of the maximum allowable county enhanced
911 excise tax provided in RCW 82.14B.030, the ordinance or resolution
may not be considered void in its entirety, but only with respect to
that portion of the enhanced 911 excise tax that is in excess of the
maximum allowable tax.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.14B.040 and 2002 c 341 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state enhanced 911 excise tax and the county enhanced 911
excise tax on switched access lines ((shall)) must be collected from
the subscriber by the local exchange company providing the switched
access line.
(2) The state enhanced 911 excise tax and the county enhanced 911
excise tax on radio access lines ((shall)) must be collected from the
subscriber by the radio communications service company, including those
companies that resell radio access lines, providing the radio access
line to the subscriber.
(3) The state and county enhanced 911 excise taxes on
interconnected voice over internet protocol service lines must be
collected from the subscriber by the interconnected voice over internet
protocol service company providing the interconnected voice over
internet protocol service line to the subscriber.
(4) The amount of the tax ((shall)) must be stated separately on
the billing statement which is sent to the subscriber.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.14B.042 and 2009 c 563 s 208 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state and county enhanced 911 excise taxes imposed by this
chapter must be paid by the subscriber to the local exchange company
providing the switched access line ((or)), the radio communications
service company providing the radio access line, ((and)) or the
interconnected voice over internet protocol service company providing
the interconnected voice over internet protocol service line. Each
local exchange company ((and)), each radio communications service
company ((shall)), and each interconnected voice over internet protocol
service company must collect from the subscriber the full amount of the
taxes payable. The state and county enhanced 911 excise taxes required
by this chapter to be collected by ((the local exchange company or the
radio communications service)) a company are deemed to be held in trust
by the ((local exchange company or the radio communications service))
company until paid to the department. Any local exchange company
((or)), radio communications service company, or interconnected voice
over internet protocol service company that appropriates or converts
the tax collected to its own use or to any use other than the payment
of the tax to the extent that the money collected is not available for
payment on the due date as prescribed in this chapter is guilty of a
gross misdemeanor.
(2) If any local exchange company ((or)), radio communications
service company, or interconnected voice over internet protocol service
company fails to collect the state or county enhanced 911 excise tax
or, after collecting the tax, fails to pay it to the department in the
manner prescribed by this chapter, whether such failure is the result
of its own act or the result of acts or conditions beyond its control,
the ((local exchange company or the radio communications service))
company is personally liable to the state for the amount of the tax,
unless the ((local exchange company or the radio communications
service)) company has taken from the buyer in good faith documentation,
in a form and manner prescribed by the department, stating that the
buyer is not a subscriber or is otherwise not liable for the state or
county enhanced 911 excise tax.
(3) The amount of tax, until paid by the subscriber to the local
exchange company, the radio communications service company, the
interconnected voice over internet protocol service company, or to the
department, constitutes a debt from the subscriber to the ((local
exchange company or the radio communications service)) company. Any
((local exchange company or radio communications service)) company that
fails or refuses to collect the tax as required with intent to violate
the provisions of this chapter or to gain some advantage or benefit,
either direct or indirect, and any subscriber who refuses to pay any
tax due under this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor. The state and
county enhanced 911 excise taxes required by this chapter to be
collected by the local exchange company ((or the)), radio
communications service company, or interconnected voice over internet
protocol service company must be stated separately on the billing
statement that is sent to the subscriber.
(4) If a subscriber has failed to pay to the local exchange company
((or the)), radio communications service company, or interconnected
voice over internet protocol service company the state or county
enhanced 911 excise taxes imposed by this chapter and the ((local
exchange company or the radio communications service)) company has not
paid the amount of the tax to the department, the department may, in
its discretion, proceed directly against the subscriber for collection
of the tax, in which case a penalty of ten percent may be added to the
amount of the tax for failure of the subscriber to pay the tax to the
((local exchange company or the radio communications service)) company,
regardless of when the tax is collected by the department. Tax under
this chapter is due as provided under RCW 82.14B.061.

Sec. 8 RCW 82.14B.060 and 1998 c 304 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
A county legislative authority imposing a tax under this chapter
((shall)) must establish by ordinance all necessary and appropriate
procedures for the administration ((and collection of the tax, which
ordinance shall provide for reimbursement to the telephone companies
for actual costs of administration and collection of the tax imposed.
The ordinance shall also provide that the due date for remittance of
the tax collected shall be on or before the last day of the month
following the month in which the tax liability accrues)) of the county
enhanced 911 excise taxes by the department. A county legislative
authority imposing a tax under this chapter must provide the department
notification of the imposition of the tax or a change in the tax no
less than seventy-five days before the effective date of the imposition
of the tax or the change in the tax.

Sec. 9 RCW 82.14B.061 and 2002 c 341 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department ((of revenue shall)) must administer and
((shall)) adopt ((such)) rules as may be necessary to enforce and
administer the state and county enhanced 911 excise taxes imposed or
authorized by this chapter. Chapter 82.32 RCW, with the exception of
RCW 82.32.045, 82.32.145, and 82.32.380, applies to the administration,
collection, and enforcement of the state and county enhanced 911 excise
taxes.
(2) The state and county enhanced 911 excise taxes imposed or
authorized by this chapter, along with reports and returns on forms
prescribed by the department, are due at the same time the taxpayer
reports other taxes under RCW 82.32.045. If no other taxes are
reported under RCW 82.32.045, the taxpayer ((shall)) must remit tax on
an annual basis in accordance with RCW 82.32.045.
(3) The department ((of revenue)) may relieve any taxpayer or class
of taxpayers from the obligation of remitting monthly and may require
the return to cover other longer reporting periods, but in no event may
returns be filed for a period greater than one year.
(4) The state and county enhanced 911 excise taxes imposed or
authorized by this chapter are in addition to any taxes imposed upon
the same persons under chapters 82.08 ((and)), 82.12, and 82.14 RCW.

Sec. 10 RCW 82.14B.150 and 2004 c 153 s 309 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A local exchange company ((or)), radio communications service
company ((shall)), or interconnected voice over internet protocol
service company must file tax returns on a cash receipts or accrual
basis according to which method of accounting is regularly employed in
keeping the books of the company. A ((local exchange company or radio
communications service)) company filing returns on a cash receipts
basis is not required to pay tax on debt subject to credit or refund
under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) A local exchange company ((or)), radio communications service
company, or interconnected voice over internet protocol service company
is entitled to a credit or refund for state and county enhanced 911
excise taxes previously paid on bad debts, as that term is used in 26
U.S.C. Sec. 166, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2003.

Sec. 11 RCW 82.14B.160 and 1998 c 304 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
The taxes imposed or authorized by this chapter do not apply to any
activity that the state or county is prohibited from taxing under the
Constitution of this state or the Constitution or laws of the United
States.

Sec. 12 RCW 82.14B.200 and 2009 c 563 s 209 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Unless a local exchange company ((or a)), radio communications
service company, or interconnected voice over internet protocol service
company has taken from the buyer documentation, in a form and manner
prescribed by the department, stating that the buyer is not a
subscriber or is otherwise not liable for the tax, the burden of
proving that a sale of the use of a switched access line ((or)), radio
access line, or interconnected voice over internet protocol service
line was not a sale to a subscriber or was not otherwise subject to the
tax is upon the person who made the sale.
(2) If a local exchange company ((or a)), radio communications
service company, or interconnected voice over internet protocol service
company does not receive documentation, in a form and manner prescribed
by the department, stating that the buyer is not a subscriber or is
otherwise not liable for the tax at the time of the sale, have such
documentation on file at the time of the sale, or obtain such
documentation from the buyer within a reasonable time after the sale,
the local exchange company ((or the)), radio communications service
company, or interconnected voice over internet protocol service company
remains liable for the tax as provided in RCW 82.14B.042, unless the
local exchange company ((or the)), radio communications service
company, or interconnected voice over internet protocol service company
can demonstrate facts and circumstances according to rules adopted by
the department ((of revenue)) that show the sale was properly made
without payment of the state or county enhanced 911 excise tax.
(3) The penalty imposed by RCW 82.32.291 may not be assessed on
state or county enhanced 911 excise taxes due but not paid as a result
of the improper use of documentation stating that the buyer is not a
subscriber or is otherwise not liable for the state or county enhanced
911 excise tax. This subsection does not prohibit or restrict the
application of other penalties authorized by law.

Sec. 13 RCW 82.32.010 and 1998 c 304 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter ((shall)) apply with respect to the
taxes imposed under chapters 82.04 through 82.14 RCW, under chapter
82.14B RCW ((82.14B.030(3))), under chapters 82.16 through 82.29A RCW
of this title, under chapter 84.33 RCW, and under other titles,
chapters, and sections in such manner and to such extent as indicated
in each such title, chapter, or section.

Sec. 14 RCW 38.52.510 and 1991 c 54 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
((By December 31, 1998,)) Each county, singly or in combination
with one or more adjacent counties, ((shall)) must implement
((district-wide,)) countywide((,)) or multicounty-wide enhanced 911
emergency communications systems so that enhanced 911 is available
throughout the state. The county ((shall)) must provide funding for
the enhanced 911 communications system in the county ((or district)) in
an amount equal to the amount the maximum tax under RCW 82.14B.030(1)
would generate in the county ((or district)) less any applicable
administrative fee charged by the department of revenue or the amount
necessary to provide full funding of the system in the county ((or
district, whichever is less)). The state enhanced 911 coordination
office established by RCW 38.52.520 ((shall)) must assist and
facilitate enhanced 911 implementation throughout the state.

Sec. 15 RCW 38.52.520 and 1991 c 54 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
A state enhanced 911 coordination office, headed by the state
enhanced 911 coordinator, is established in the emergency management
division of the department. Duties of the office ((shall)) include:
(1) Coordinating and facilitating the implementation and operation
of enhanced 911 emergency communications systems throughout the state;
(2) Seeking advice and assistance from, and providing staff support
for, the enhanced 911 advisory committee; ((and))
(3) Recommending to the utilities and transportation commission by
August 31st of each year the level of the state enhanced 911 excise tax
for the following year;
(4) Considering base needs of individual counties for specific
assistance, specify rules defining the purposes for which available
state enhanced 911 funding may be expended, with the advice and
assistance of the enhanced 911 advisory committee; and
(5) Providing an annual update to the enhanced 911 advisory
committee on how much money each county has spent on:
(a) Efforts to modernize their existing enhanced 911 emergency
communications system; and
(b) Enhanced 911 operational costs.

Sec. 16 RCW 38.52.530 and 2006 c 210 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The enhanced 911 advisory committee is created to advise and assist
the state enhanced 911 coordinator in coordinating and facilitating the
implementation and operation of enhanced 911 throughout the state. The
director shall appoint members of the committee who represent diverse
geographical areas of the state and include state residents who are
members of the national emergency number association, the
((associated)) association of public communications officers Washington
chapter, the Washington state fire chiefs association, the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the Washington state council
of firefighters, the Washington state council of police officers, the
Washington ambulance association, the state fire protection policy
board, the Washington fire commissioners association, the Washington
state patrol, the association of Washington cities, the Washington
state association of counties, the utilities and transportation
commission or commission staff, a representative of a voice over
internet protocol service company, and an equal number of
representatives of large and small local exchange telephone companies
and large and small radio communications service companies offering
commercial mobile radio service in the state. ((This section expires
December 31, 2011.))

Sec. 17 RCW 38.52.532 and 2006 c 210 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
On an annual basis, the enhanced 911 advisory committee ((shall))
must provide an update on the status of enhanced 911 service in the
state to the appropriate committees in the legislature. The update
must include progress by counties towards creating greater efficiencies
in enhanced 911 operations including, but not limited to,
regionalization of facilities, centralization of equipment, and
statewide purchasing.

Sec. 18 RCW 38.52.540 and 2002 c 371 s 905 and 2002 c 341 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The enhanced 911 account is created in the state treasury. All
receipts from the state enhanced 911 excise taxes imposed by RCW
82.14B.030 ((shall)) must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the
account ((shall)) must be used only to support the statewide
coordination and management of the enhanced 911 system, for the
implementation of wireless enhanced 911 statewide, for the
modernization of enhanced 911 emergency communications systems
statewide, and to help supplement, within available funds, the
operational costs of the system, including adequate funding of counties
to enable implementation of wireless enhanced 911 service and
reimbursement of radio communications service companies for costs
incurred in providing wireless enhanced 911 service pursuant to
negotiated contracts between the counties or their agents and the radio
communications service companies. A county must show just cause,
including but not limited to a true and accurate accounting of the
funds expended, for any inability to provide reimbursement to radio
communications service companies of costs incurred in providing
enhanced 911 service.
(2) Funds generated by the enhanced 911 excise tax imposed by RCW
82.14B.030(((3) shall)) (5) may not be distributed to any county that
has not imposed the maximum county enhanced 911 excise tax allowed
under RCW 82.14B.030(1). Funds generated by the enhanced 911 excise
tax imposed by RCW 82.14B.030(((4) shall)) (6) may not be distributed
to any county that has not imposed the maximum county enhanced 911
excise tax allowed under RCW 82.14B.030(2).
(3) The state enhanced 911 coordinator, with the advice and
assistance of the enhanced 911 advisory committee, is authorized to
enter into statewide agreements to improve the efficiency of enhanced
911 services for all counties and shall specify by rule the additional
purposes for which moneys, if available, may be expended from this
account.
(((4) During the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the enhanced 911 account to the state general fund such
amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.))

Sec. 19 RCW 38.52.545 and 2001 c 128 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
In specifying rules defining the purposes for which available state
enhanced 911 moneys may be expended, the state enhanced 911
coordinator, with the advice and assistance of the enhanced 911
advisory committee, ((shall)) must consider base needs of individual
counties for specific assistance. Priorities for available enhanced
911 funding are as follows:
(1) To assure that 911 dialing is operational statewide;
(2) To assist counties as necessary to assure that they can achieve
a basic service level for 911 operations; and
(3) To assist counties as practicable to acquire items of a capital
nature appropriate to ((increasing)) modernize 911 systems and increase
911 effectiveness.

Sec. 20 RCW 38.52.550 and 2002 c 341 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
A telecommunications company, ((or)) radio communications service
company, or interconnected voice over internet protocol service
company, providing emergency communications systems or services or a
business or individual providing database information to enhanced 911
emergency communications ((system)) personnel ((shall)) is not ((be))
liable for civil damages caused by an act or omission of the company,
business, or individual in the:
(1) Good faith release of information not in the public record,
including unpublished or unlisted subscriber information to emergency
service providers responding to calls placed to ((a 911 or)) an
enhanced 911 emergency communications service; or
(2) Design, development, installation, maintenance, or provision of
consolidated ((911 or)) enhanced 911 emergency communications systems
or services other than an act or omission constituting gross negligence
or wanton or willful misconduct.

Sec. 21 RCW 38.52.561 and 2002 c 341 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state enhanced 911 coordinator, with the advice and assistance
of the enhanced 911 advisory committee, ((shall)) must set
nondiscriminatory, uniform technical and operational standards
consistent with the rules of the federal communications commission for
the transmission of 911 calls from radio communications service
companies and interconnected voice over internet protocol service
companies to enhanced 911 emergency communications systems. These
standards must not exceed the requirements set by the federal
communications commission. The authority given to the state enhanced
911 coordinator in this section is limited to setting standards as set
forth in this section and does not constitute authority to regulate
radio communications service companies or interconnected voice over
internet protocol service companies.

Sec. 22 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2009 c 87 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund ((shall)) must be set aside in an account in the treasury trust
fund to be known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments ((shall)) must occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer ((shall)) must distribute the
earnings credited to the investment income account to the state general
fund except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds ((shall)) must receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the county
enhanced 911 excise tax account, the Washington international exchange
scholarship endowment fund, the toll collection account, the
developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account,
the fair fund, the family leave insurance account, the food animal
veterinarian conditional scholarship account, the fruit and vegetable
inspection account, the future teachers conditional scholarship
account, the game farm alternative account, the GET ready for math and
science scholarship account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the
juvenile accountability incentive account, the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism
promotion account, the pilotage account, the produce railcar pool
account, the regional transportation investment district account, the
rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center
account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, the children's
trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred
owners' bonus fund and breeder awards account, the Washington horse
racing commission class C purse fund account, the individual
development account program account, the Washington horse racing
commission operating account (earnings from the Washington horse racing
commission operating account must be credited to the Washington horse
racing commission class C purse fund account), the life sciences
discovery fund, the Washington state heritage center account, the
reduced cigarette ignition propensity account, and the reading
achievement account. However, the earnings to be distributed shall
first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service
fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds ((shall)) must receive eighty
percent of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each
account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced
right-of-way revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation
revolving account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving
fund, the federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high
occupancy vehicle account, the local rail service assistance account,
and the miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 82.14B.070 (Emergency service communication districts--Authorized -- Consolidation -- Dissolution) and 1994 c 54 s 1 & 1987 c 17
s 1;
(2) RCW 82.14B.090 (Emergency service communication districts--Emergency service communication system -- Financing -- Excise tax) and 1991
c 54 s 13 & 1987 c 17 s 3; and
(3) RCW 82.14B.100 (Emergency service communication districts--Application of RCW 82.14B.040 through 82.14B.060) and 1991 c 54 s 14 &
1987 c 17 s 4.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 A new section is added to chapter 82.14B
RCW to read as follows:
For the time period from July 1, 2007, until the effective date of
section 3 of this act, counties and the state are authorized to accept
and use funds and any accrued interest voluntarily remitted by
interconnected voice over internet protocol service companies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 The office of the code reviser may
alphabetize the accounts and funds listed in RCW 43.79A.040(4)(b).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 (1) Except as otherwise provided in this
section, this act takes effect October 1, 2010.
(2) Sections 1 through 3, 5 through 7, 10 through 21, and 23 of
this act take effect January 1, 2011.

--- END ---