BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 76.09.065 and 2000 c 11 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Effective July 1, 1997, an applicant shall pay an application
fee and a recording fee, if applicable, at the time an application or
notification is submitted to the department or to the local
governmental entity as provided in this chapter.
(2) For applications and notifications submitted to the department,
the application fee shall be one hundred fifty dollars for class II,
III, and IV forest practices applications or notifications relating to
the commercial harvest of timber. However, the fee shall be one
thousand five hundred dollars for class IV forest practices
applications on lands being converted to other uses or on lands which
are not to be reforested because of the likelihood of future conversion
to urban development or on lands that are contained within "urban
growth areas," designated pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW, except the
fee shall be fifty dollars on those lands where the forest landowner
provides:
(a) A written statement of intent signed by the forest landowner
not to convert to a use other than commercial forest product operations
for ten years, accompanied by either a written forest management plan
acceptable to the department or documentation that the land is enrolled
under the provisions of chapter 84.33 RCW; or
(b) A conversion option harvest plan approved by the local
governmental entity and submitted to the department as part of the
forest practices application.
All money collected from fees under this subsection shall be deposited
in the state general fund.
(3) For applications submitted to the local governmental entity,
the fee shall be five hundred dollars for class IV forest practices on
lands being converted to other uses or lands that are contained within
"urban growth areas," designated pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW, except
as otherwise provided in this section, unless a different fee is
otherwise provided by the local governmental entity.
(4) Recording fees shall be as provided in chapter 36.18 RCW.
(5) An application fee under subsection (2) of this section shall
be refunded or credited to the applicant if either the application or
notification is disapproved by the department or the application or
notification is withdrawn by the applicant due to restrictions imposed
by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---