BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that accurate
forecasts of revenues and caseloads are essential to developing state
budgets. The legislature further finds that, over time, the
responsibilities for these forecasting and data analyses functions have
been dispersed among several agencies. Therefore, the legislature
concludes that these functions should be consolidated into a single
forecasting agency to create efficiencies, simplify forecasting,
simplify analysis, and enhance collaboration.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.480 and 2002 c 290 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A current, newly created or reworked judgment and sentence
document for each felony sentencing shall record any and all
recommended sentencing agreements or plea agreements and the sentences
for any and all felony crimes kept as public records under RCW
9.94A.475 shall contain the clearly printed name and legal signature of
the sentencing judge. The judgment and sentence document as defined in
this section shall also provide additional space for the sentencing
judge's reasons for going either above or below the presumptive
sentence range for any and all felony crimes covered as public records
under RCW 9.94A.475. Both the sentencing judge and the prosecuting
attorney's office shall each retain or receive a completed copy of each
sentencing document as defined in this section for their own records.
(2) The ((sentencing guidelines commission)) economic and revenue
forecast council shall be sent a completed copy of the judgment and
sentence document upon conviction for each felony sentencing under
subsection (1) of this section and shall compile a yearly and
cumulative judicial record of each sentencing judge in regards to his
or her sentencing practices for any and all felony crimes involving:
(a) Any violent offense as defined in this chapter;
(b) Any most serious offense as defined in this chapter;
(c) Any felony with any deadly weapon special verdict under RCW
((9.94A.602)) 9.94A.825;
(d) Any felony with any deadly weapon enhancements under RCW
9.94A.533 (3) or (4), or both; and/or
(e) The felony crimes of possession of a machine gun, possessing a
stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful
possession of a firearm in the first or second degree, and/or use of a
machine gun in a felony.
(3) The ((sentencing guidelines commission)) economic and revenue
forecast council shall compare each individual judge's sentencing
practices to the standard or presumptive sentence range for any and all
felony crimes listed in subsection (2) of this section for the
appropriate offense level as defined in RCW 9.94A.515 or 9.94A.518,
offender score as defined in RCW 9.94A.525, and any applicable deadly
weapon enhancements as defined in RCW 9.94A.533 (3) or (4), or both.
These comparative records shall be retained and made available to the
public for review in a current, newly created or reworked official
published document by the ((sentencing guidelines commission)) economic
and revenue forecast council.
(4) Any and all felony sentences which are either above or below
the standard or presumptive sentence range in subsection (3) of this
section shall also mark whether the prosecuting attorney in the case
also recommended a similar sentence, if any, which was either above or
below the presumptive sentence range and shall also indicate if the
sentence was in conjunction with an approved alternative sentencing
option including a first-time offender waiver, sex offender sentencing
alternative, or other prescribed sentencing option.
(5) If any completed judgment and sentence document as defined in
subsection (1) of this section is not sent to the ((sentencing
guidelines commission)) economic and revenue forecast council as
required in subsection (2) of this section, the ((sentencing guidelines
commission)) economic and revenue forecast council shall have the
authority and shall undertake reasonable and necessary steps to assure
that all past, current, and future sentencing documents as defined in
subsection (1) of this section are received by the ((sentencing
guidelines commission)) economic and revenue forecast council.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.850 and 2009 c 375 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A sentencing guidelines commission is established as an agency
of state government.
(2) The ((legislature finds that the commission, having
accomplished its original statutory directive to implement this
chapter, and having expertise in sentencing practice and policies,))
sentencing guidelines commission shall:
(a) Evaluate state sentencing policy, to include whether the
sentencing ranges and standards are consistent with and further:
(i) The purposes of this chapter as defined in RCW 9.94A.010; and
(ii) The intent of the legislature to emphasize confinement for the
violent offender and alternatives to confinement for the nonviolent
offender.
The commission shall provide the governor and the legislature with
its evaluation and recommendations under this subsection not later than
December 1, 1996, and every two years thereafter;
(b) Recommend to the legislature revisions or modifications to the
standard sentence ranges, state sentencing policy, prosecuting
standards, and other standards. If implementation of the revisions or
modifications would result in exceeding the capacity of correctional
facilities, then the commission shall accompany its recommendation with
an additional list of standard sentence ranges which are consistent
with correction capacity;
(c) Study the existing criminal code and from time to time make
recommendations to the legislature for modification;
(d)(((i) Serve as a clearinghouse and information center for the
collection, preparation, analysis, and dissemination of information on
state and local adult and juvenile sentencing practices; (ii) develop
and maintain a computerized adult and juvenile sentencing information
system by individual superior court judge consisting of offender,
offense, history, and sentence information entered from judgment and
sentence forms for all adult felons; and (iii) conduct ongoing research
regarding adult and juvenile sentencing guidelines, use of total
confinement and alternatives to total confinement, plea bargaining, and
other matters relating to the improvement of the adult criminal justice
system and the juvenile justice system;
(e))) Assume the powers and duties of the juvenile disposition
standards commission after June 30, 1996; and
(((f) Evaluate the effectiveness of existing disposition standards
and related statutes in implementing policies set forth in RCW
13.40.010 generally, specifically review the guidelines relating to the
confinement of minor and first-time offenders as well as the use of
diversion, and review the application of current and proposed juvenile
sentencing standards and guidelines for potential adverse impacts on
the sentencing outcomes of racial and ethnic minority youth;
(g))) (e) Solicit the comments and suggestions of the juvenile
justice community concerning disposition standards, and make
recommendations to the legislature regarding revisions or modifications
of the standards. The evaluations shall be submitted to the
legislature on December 1 of each odd-numbered year. The department of
social and health services shall provide the commission with available
data concerning the implementation of the disposition standards and
related statutes and their effect on the performance of the
department's responsibilities relating to juvenile offenders, and with
recommendations for modification of the disposition standards. The
administrative office of the courts shall provide the commission with
available data on diversion, including the use of youth court programs,
and dispositions of juvenile offenders under chapter 13.40 RCW((; and
(h) Not later than December 1, 1997, and at least every two years
thereafter, based on available information, report to the governor and
the legislature on:
(i) Racial disproportionality in juvenile and adult sentencing,
and, if available, the impact that diversions, such as youth courts,
have on racial disproportionality in juvenile prosecution,
adjudication, and sentencing;
(ii) The capacity of state and local juvenile and adult facilities
and resources; and
(iii) Recidivism information on adult and juvenile offenders)).
(3) Each of the commission's recommended standard sentence ranges
shall include one or more of the following: Total confinement, partial
confinement, community supervision, community restitution, and a fine.
(4) The standard sentence ranges of total and partial confinement
under this chapter, except as provided in RCW 9.94A.517, are subject to
the following limitations:
(a) If the maximum term in the range is one year or less, the
minimum term in the range shall be no less than one-third of the
maximum term in the range, except that if the maximum term in the range
is ninety days or less, the minimum term may be less than one-third of
the maximum;
(b) If the maximum term in the range is greater than one year, the
minimum term in the range shall be no less than seventy-five percent of
the maximum term in the range, except that for murder in the second
degree in seriousness level XIV under RCW 9.94A.510, the minimum term
in the range shall be no less than fifty percent of the maximum term in
the range; and
(c) The maximum term of confinement in a range may not exceed the
statutory maximum for the crime as provided in RCW 9A.20.021.
(5) The sentencing guidelines commission shall exercise its duties
under this section in conformity with chapter 34.05 RCW. The
commission shall review the monetary threshold amounts differentiating
the various degrees of property crimes in Washington state to determine
whether such amounts should be modified. The sentencing guidelines
commission shall report to the legislature with its recommendations by
November 1, 2014, and every five years thereafter.

Sec. 4 RCW 10.98.140 and 1987 c 462 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The section, the department, and the office of financial
management shall be the primary sources of information for criminal
justice forecasting. The information maintained by these agencies
shall be complete, accurate, and sufficiently timely to support state
criminal justice forecasting.
(2) The office of financial management shall be the official state
agency for the sentenced felon jail forecast. This forecast shall
provide at least a six-year projection and shall be published by
December 1 of every even-numbered year beginning with 1986. The office
of financial management shall seek advice regarding the assumptions in
the forecast from criminal justice agencies and associations.
(3) The ((sentencing guidelines commission)) economic and revenue
forecast council shall keep records on all sentencings above or below
the standard range defined by chapter 9.94A RCW. As a minimum, the
records shall include the name of the offender, the crimes for which
the offender was sentenced, the name and county of the sentencing
judge, and the deviation from the standard range. Such records shall
be made available to public officials upon request.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.06.087 and 1997 c 168 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the exemptions set forth in RCW 41.06.070, this
chapter does not apply to the economic and revenue forecast supervisor
and staff employed under RCW 82.33.010 ((or the caseload forecast
supervisor and staff employed under RCW 43.88C.010)).

Sec. 6 RCW 43.88.030 and 2006 c 334 s 43 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director of financial management shall provide all agencies
with a complete set of instructions for submitting biennial budget
requests to the director at least three months before agency budget
documents are due into the office of financial management. The budget
document or documents shall consist of the governor's budget message
which shall be explanatory of the budget and shall contain an outline
of the proposed financial policies of the state for the ensuing fiscal
period, as well as an outline of the proposed six-year financial
policies where applicable, and shall describe in connection therewith
the important features of the budget. The biennial budget document or
documents shall also describe performance indicators that demonstrate
measurable progress towards priority results. The message shall set
forth the reasons for salient changes from the previous fiscal period
in expenditure and revenue items and shall explain any major changes in
financial policy. Attached to the budget message shall be such
supporting schedules, exhibits and other explanatory material in
respect to both current operations and capital improvements as the
governor shall deem to be useful to the legislature. The budget
document or documents shall set forth a proposal for expenditures in
the ensuing fiscal period, or six-year period where applicable, based
upon the estimated revenues and caseloads as approved by the economic
and revenue forecast council ((and caseload forecast council)) or upon
the estimated revenues and caseloads of the office of financial
management for those funds, accounts, sources, and programs for which
the forecast ((councils do)) council does not prepare an official
forecast. Revenues shall be estimated for such fiscal period from the
source and at the rates existing by law at the time of submission of
the budget document, including the supplemental budgets submitted in
the even-numbered years of a biennium. However, the estimated revenues
and caseloads for use in the governor's budget document may be adjusted
to reflect budgetary revenue transfers and revenue and caseload
estimates dependent upon budgetary assumptions of enrollments,
workloads, and caseloads. All adjustments to the approved estimated
revenues and caseloads must be set forth in the budget document. The
governor may additionally submit, as an appendix to each supplemental,
biennial, or six-year agency budget or to the budget document or
documents, a proposal for expenditures in the ensuing fiscal period
from revenue sources derived from proposed changes in existing
statutes.
The budget document or documents shall also contain:
(a) Revenues classified by fund and source for the immediately past
fiscal period, those received or anticipated for the current fiscal
period, and those anticipated for the ensuing biennium;
(b) The undesignated fund balance or deficit, by fund;
(c) Such additional information dealing with expenditures,
revenues, workload, performance, and personnel as the legislature may
direct by law or concurrent resolution;
(d) Such additional information dealing with revenues and
expenditures as the governor shall deem pertinent and useful to the
legislature;
(e) Tabulations showing expenditures classified by fund, function,
and agency;
(f) The expenditures that include nonbudgeted, nonappropriated
accounts outside the state treasury;
(g) Identification of all proposed direct expenditures to implement
the Puget Sound water quality plan under chapter 90.71 RCW, shown by
agency and in total; and
(h) Tabulations showing each postretirement adjustment by
retirement system established after fiscal year 1991, to include, but
not be limited to, estimated total payments made to the end of the
previous biennial period, estimated payments for the present biennium,
and estimated payments for the ensuing biennium.
(2) The budget document or documents shall include detailed
estimates of all anticipated revenues applicable to proposed operating
or capital expenditures and shall also include all proposed operating
or capital expenditures. The total of beginning undesignated fund
balance and estimated revenues less working capital and other reserves
shall equal or exceed the total of proposed applicable expenditures.
The budget document or documents shall further include:
(a) Interest, amortization and redemption charges on the state
debt;
(b) Payments of all reliefs, judgments, and claims;
(c) Other statutory expenditures;
(d) Expenditures incident to the operation for each agency;
(e) Revenues derived from agency operations;
(f) Expenditures and revenues shall be given in comparative form
showing those incurred or received for the immediately past fiscal
period and those anticipated for the current biennium and next ensuing
biennium;
(g) A showing and explanation of amounts of general fund and other
funds obligations for debt service and any transfers of moneys that
otherwise would have been available for appropriation;
(h) Common school expenditures on a fiscal-year basis;
(i) A showing, by agency, of the value and purpose of financing
contracts for the lease/purchase or acquisition of personal or real
property for the current and ensuing fiscal periods; and
(j) A showing and explanation of anticipated amounts of general
fund and other funds required to amortize the unfunded actuarial
accrued liability of the retirement system specified under chapter
41.45 RCW, and the contributions to meet such amortization, stated in
total dollars and as a level percentage of total compensation.
(3) The governor's operating budget document or documents shall
reflect the statewide priorities as required by RCW 43.88.090.
(4) The governor's operating budget document or documents shall
identify activities that are not addressing the statewide priorities.
(5) A separate capital budget document or schedule shall be
submitted that will contain the following:
(a) A statement setting forth a long-range facilities plan for the
state that identifies and includes the highest priority needs within
affordable spending levels;
(b) A capital program consisting of proposed capital projects for
the next biennium and the two biennia succeeding the next biennium
consistent with the long-range facilities plan. Insomuch as is
practical, and recognizing emergent needs, the capital program shall
reflect the priorities, projects, and spending levels proposed in
previously submitted capital budget documents in order to provide a
reliable long-range planning tool for the legislature and state
agencies;
(c) A capital plan consisting of proposed capital spending for at
least four biennia succeeding the next biennium;
(d) A strategic plan for reducing backlogs of maintenance and
repair projects. The plan shall include a prioritized list of specific
facility deficiencies and capital projects to address the deficiencies
for each agency, cost estimates for each project, a schedule for
completing projects over a reasonable period of time, and
identification of normal maintenance activities to reduce future
backlogs;
(e) A statement of the reason or purpose for a project;
(f) Verification that a project is consistent with the provisions
set forth in chapter 36.70A RCW;
(g) A statement about the proposed site, size, and estimated life
of the project, if applicable;
(h) Estimated total project cost;
(i) For major projects valued over five million dollars, estimated
costs for the following project components: Acquisition, consultant
services, construction, equipment, project management, and other costs
included as part of the project. Project component costs shall be
displayed in a standard format defined by the office of financial
management to allow comparisons between projects;
(j) Estimated total project cost for each phase of the project as
defined by the office of financial management;
(k) Estimated ensuing biennium costs;
(l) Estimated costs beyond the ensuing biennium;
(m) Estimated construction start and completion dates;
(n) Source and type of funds proposed;
(o) Estimated ongoing operating budget costs or savings resulting
from the project, including staffing and maintenance costs;
(p) For any capital appropriation requested for a state agency for
the acquisition of land or the capital improvement of land in which the
primary purpose of the acquisition or improvement is recreation or
wildlife habitat conservation, the capital budget document, or an
omnibus list of recreation and habitat acquisitions provided with the
governor's budget document, shall identify the projected costs of
operation and maintenance for at least the two biennia succeeding the
next biennium. Omnibus lists of habitat and recreation land
acquisitions shall include individual project cost estimates for
operation and maintenance as well as a total for all state projects
included in the list. The document shall identify the source of funds
from which the operation and maintenance costs are proposed to be
funded;
(q) Such other information bearing upon capital projects as the
governor deems to be useful;
(r) Standard terms, including a standard and uniform definition of
normal maintenance, for all capital projects;
(s) Such other information as the legislature may direct by law or
concurrent resolution.
For purposes of this subsection (5), the term "capital project"
shall be defined subsequent to the analysis, findings, and
recommendations of a joint committee comprised of representatives from
the house capital appropriations committee, senate ways and means
committee, legislative evaluation and accountability program committee,
and office of financial management.
(6) No change affecting the comparability of agency or program
information relating to expenditures, revenues, workload, performance
and personnel shall be made in the format of any budget document or
report presented to the legislature under this section or RCW
43.88.160(1) relative to the format of the budget document or report
which was presented to the previous regular session of the legislature
during an odd-numbered year without prior legislative concurrence.
Prior legislative concurrence shall consist of (a) a favorable majority
vote on the proposal by the standing committees on ways and means of
both houses if the legislature is in session or (b) a favorable
majority vote on the proposal by members of the legislative evaluation
and accountability program committee if the legislature is not in
session.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.88.120 and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 13 are each amended
to read as follows:
Each agency engaged in the collection of revenues shall prepare
estimated revenues and estimated receipts for the current and ensuing
biennium and shall submit the estimates to the director of financial
management and the director of revenue at times and in the form
specified by the directors, along with any other information which the
directors may request. For those agencies required to develop six-year
programs and financial plans ((under RCW 44.40.070)), six-year revenue
estimates shall be submitted to the director of financial management
and the transportation committees of the senate and the house of
representatives unless the responsibility for reporting these revenue
estimates is assumed elsewhere.
A copy of such revenue estimates shall be simultaneously submitted
to the economic and revenue forecast work group when required by the
office of the economic and revenue forecast council.

Sec. 8 RCW 74.09.470 and 2009 c 463 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Consistent with the goals established in RCW 74.09.402, through
the apple health for kids program authorized in this section, the
department shall provide affordable health care coverage to children
under the age of nineteen who reside in Washington state and whose
family income at the time of enrollment is not greater than two hundred
fifty percent of the federal poverty level as adjusted for family size
and determined annually by the federal department of health and human
services, and effective January 1, 2009, and only to the extent that
funds are specifically appropriated therefor, to children whose family
income is not greater than three hundred percent of the federal poverty
level. In administering the program, the department shall take such
actions as may be necessary to ensure the receipt of federal financial
participation under the medical assistance program, as codified at
Title XIX of the federal social security act, the state children's
health insurance program, as codified at Title XXI of the federal
social security act, and any other federal funding sources that are now
available or may become available in the future. The department and
the ((caseload)) economic and revenue forecast council shall estimate
the anticipated caseload and costs of the program established in this
section.
(2) The department shall accept applications for enrollment for
children's health care coverage; establish appropriate minimum-enrollment periods, as may be necessary; and determine eligibility
based on current family income. The department shall make eligibility
determinations within the time frames for establishing eligibility for
children on medical assistance, as defined by RCW 74.09.510. The
application and annual renewal processes shall be designed to minimize
administrative barriers for applicants and enrolled clients, and to
minimize gaps in eligibility for families who are eligible for
coverage. If a change in family income results in a change in the
source of funding for coverage, the department shall transfer the
family members to the appropriate source of funding and notify the
family with respect to any change in premium obligation, without a
break in eligibility. The department shall use the same eligibility
redetermination and appeals procedures as those provided for children
on medical assistance programs. The department shall modify its
eligibility renewal procedures to lower the percentage of children
failing to annually renew. The department shall manage its outreach,
application, and renewal procedures with the goals of: (a) Achieving
year by year improvements in enrollment, enrollment rates, renewals,
and renewal rates; (b) maximizing the use of existing program databases
to obtain information related to earned and unearned income for
purposes of eligibility determination and renewals, including, but not
limited to, the basic food program, the child care subsidy program,
federal social security administration programs, and the employment
security department wage database; (c) streamlining renewal processes
to rely primarily upon data matches, online submissions, and telephone
interviews; and (d) implementing any other eligibility determination
and renewal processes to allow the state to receive an enhanced federal
matching rate and additional federal outreach funding available through
the federal children's health insurance program reauthorization act of
2009 by January 2010. The department shall advise the governor and the
legislature regarding the status of these efforts by September 30,
2009. The information provided should include the status of the
department's efforts, the anticipated impact of those efforts on
enrollment, and the costs associated with that enrollment.
(3) To ensure continuity of care and ease of understanding for
families and health care providers, and to maximize the efficiency of
the program, the amount, scope, and duration of health care services
provided to children under this section shall be the same as that
provided to children under medical assistance, as defined in RCW
74.09.520.
(4) The primary mechanism for purchasing health care coverage under
this section shall be through contracts with managed health care
systems as defined in RCW 74.09.522, subject to conditions,
limitations, and appropriations provided in the biennial appropriations
act. However, the department shall make every effort within available
resources to purchase health care coverage for uninsured children whose
families have access to dependent coverage through an employer-sponsored health plan or another source when it is cost-effective for
the state to do so, and the purchase is consistent with requirements of
Title XIX and Title XXI of the federal social security act. To the
extent allowable under federal law, the department shall require
families to enroll in available employer-sponsored coverage, as a
condition of participating in the program established under this
section, when it is cost-effective for the state to do so. Families
who enroll in available employer-sponsored coverage under this section
shall be accounted for separately in the annual report required by RCW
74.09.053.
(5)(a) To reflect appropriate parental responsibility, the
department shall develop and implement a schedule of premiums for
children's health care coverage due to the department from families
with income greater than two hundred percent of the federal poverty
level. For families with income greater than two hundred fifty percent
of the federal poverty level, the premiums shall be established in
consultation with the senate majority and minority leaders and the
speaker and minority leader of the house of representatives. Premiums
shall be set at a reasonable level that does not pose a barrier to
enrollment. The amount of the premium shall be based upon family
income and shall not exceed the premium limitations in Title XXI of the
federal social security act. Premiums shall not be imposed on children
in households at or below two hundred percent of the federal poverty
level as articulated in RCW 74.09.055.
(b) Beginning no later than January 1, 2010, the department shall
offer families whose income is greater than three hundred percent of
the federal poverty level the opportunity to purchase health care
coverage for their children through the programs administered under
this section without an explicit premium subsidy from the state. The
design of the health benefit package offered to these children should
provide a benefit package substantially similar to that offered in the
apple health for kids program, and may differ with respect to cost-sharing, and other appropriate elements from that provided to children
under subsection (3) of this section including, but not limited to,
application of preexisting conditions, waiting periods, and other
design changes needed to offer affordable coverage. The amount paid by
the family shall be in an amount equal to the rate paid by the state to
the managed health care system for coverage of the child, including any
associated and administrative costs to the state of providing coverage
for the child. Any pooling of the program enrollees that results in
state fiscal impact must be identified and brought to the legislature
for consideration.
(6) The department shall undertake and continue a proactive,
targeted outreach and education effort with the goal of enrolling
children in health coverage and improving the health literacy of youth
and parents. The department shall collaborate with the department of
health, local public health jurisdictions, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, the department of early learning,
health educators, health care providers, health carriers, community-based organizations, and parents in the design and development of this
effort. The outreach and education effort shall include the following
components:
(a) Broad dissemination of information about the availability of
coverage, including media campaigns;
(b) Assistance with completing applications, and community-based
outreach efforts to help people apply for coverage. Community-based
outreach efforts should be targeted to the populations least likely to
be covered;
(c) Use of existing systems, such as enrollment information from
the free and reduced-price lunch program, the department of early
learning child care subsidy program, the department of health's women,
infants, and children program, and the early childhood education and
assistance program, to identify children who may be eligible but not
enrolled in coverage;
(d) Contracting with community-based organizations and government
entities to support community-based outreach efforts to help families
apply for coverage. These efforts should be targeted to the
populations least likely to be covered. The department shall provide
informational materials for use by government entities and community-based organizations in their outreach activities, and should identify
any available federal matching funds to support these efforts;
(e) Development and dissemination of materials to engage and inform
parents and families statewide on issues such as: The benefits of
health insurance coverage; the appropriate use of health services,
including primary care provided by health care practitioners licensed
under chapters 18.71, 18.57, 18.36A, and 18.79 RCW, and emergency
services; the value of a medical home, well-child services and
immunization, and other preventive health services with linkages to
department of health child profile efforts; identifying and managing
chronic conditions such as asthma and diabetes; and the value of good
nutrition and physical activity;
(f) An evaluation of the outreach and education efforts, based upon
clear, cost-effective outcome measures that are included in contracts
with entities that undertake components of the outreach and education
effort;
(g) An implementation plan to develop online application capability
that is integrated with the department's automated client eligibility
system, and to develop data linkages with the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for free and reduced-price lunch
enrollment information and the department of early learning for child
care subsidy program enrollment information.
(7) The department shall take action to increase the number of
primary care physicians providing dental disease preventive services
including oral health screenings, risk assessment, family education,
the application of fluoride varnish, and referral to a dentist as
needed.
(8) The department shall monitor the rates of substitution between
private-sector health care coverage and the coverage provided under
this section and shall report to appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 2010.

Sec. 9 RCW 82.33.010 and 1990 c 229 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The economic and revenue forecast council is hereby created.
The council shall consist of ((two)) three individuals appointed by the
governor and four individuals, one of whom is appointed by the
chairperson of each of the two largest political caucuses in the senate
and house of representatives. The chair of the council shall be
selected from among the four caucus appointees. The council may select
such other officers as the members deem necessary.
(2) The council shall employ an economic and revenue forecast
supervisor to supervise the preparation of all ((economic and revenue))
forecasts. As used in this chapter, "supervisor" means the economic
and revenue forecast supervisor. Approval by an affirmative vote of at
least ((five)) six members of the council is required for any decisions
regarding employment of the supervisor. Employment of the supervisor
shall terminate after each term of three years. At the end of the
first year of each three-year term the council shall consider extension
of the supervisor's term by one year. The council ((may)) shall fix
the compensation of the supervisor, subject to approval by the
legislature in the omnibus appropriations act. The supervisor shall
employ staff sufficient to accomplish the purposes of this section.
(3) The ((economic and revenue)) forecast council shall oversee the
preparation of and approve, by an affirmative vote of at least ((four))
five members, the official, optimistic, and pessimistic state economic
and revenue forecasts and caseload forecasts prepared under RCW
82.33.020. If the council is unable to approve a forecast before a
date required in RCW 82.33.020, the supervisor shall submit the
forecast without approval and the forecast shall have the same effect
as if approved by the council.
(4) A councilmember who does not cast an affirmative vote for
approval of the official economic and revenue forecast may request, and
the supervisor shall provide, an alternative economic and revenue
forecast based on assumptions specified by the member.
(5) Members of the economic and revenue forecast council shall
serve without additional compensation but shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120 while attending
sessions of the council or on official business authorized by the
council. Nonlegislative members of the council shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(6) "Caseload," as used in this chapter, means the number of
persons expected to meet entitlement requirements and require the
services of public assistance programs, state correctional
institutions, state correctional noninstitutional supervision, state
institutions for juvenile offenders, the common school system, long-term care, medical assistance, foster care, and adoption support.
(7) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
provided in RCW 43.88.020 apply to this chapter.

Sec. 10 RCW 82.33.020 and 2005 c 319 s 137 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Four times each year the supervisor shall prepare, subject to
the approval of the economic and revenue forecast council under RCW
82.33.010:
(a) An official state economic and revenue forecast;
(b) An unofficial state economic and revenue forecast based on
optimistic economic and revenue projections; and
(c) An unofficial state economic and revenue forecast based on
pessimistic economic and revenue projections.
(2) In consultation with the caseload forecast work group
established under section 11 of this act, and subject to the approval
of the forecast council, the supervisor shall prepare:
(a) An official state caseload forecast; and
(b) Other caseload forecasts based on alternative assumptions as
the council may determine.
(3) The supervisor shall submit forecasts prepared under this
section, along with any unofficial forecasts provided under RCW
82.33.010, to the governor and the members of the committees on ways
and means and the chairs of the committees on transportation of the
senate and house of representatives, including one copy to the staff of
each of the committees((,)). Revenue and economic forecasts shall be
submitted on or before November 20th, February 20th in the even-numbered years, March 20th in the odd-numbered years, June 20th, and
September 20th. All revenue and economic forecasts shall include both
estimated receipts and estimated revenues in conformance with generally
accepted accounting principles as provided by RCW 43.88.037. The
supervisor shall submit caseload forecasts prepared under this section,
along with any unofficial forecasts as provided for under RCW
82.33.010, to the governor and the members of the legislative fiscal
committees, including one copy to the staff of each of the committees.
The forecasts shall be submitted at least three times each year and on
such dates as the council determines will facilitate the development of
budget proposals by the governor and the legislature.
(((3))) (4) All agencies of state government shall provide to the
supervisor immediate access to all information relating to ((economic
and revenue)) forecasts. Revenue collection information shall be
available to the supervisor the first business day following the
conclusion of each collection period.
(((4))) (5) The ((economic and revenue forecast)) supervisor and
staff shall ((co-locate and)) share information, data, and files with
the tax research section of the department of revenue but shall not
duplicate the duties and functions of one another.
(((5))) (6) As part of its forecasts under subsection (1) of this
section, the supervisor shall provide estimated revenue from tuition
fees as defined in RCW 28B.15.020.
(7) The administrator of the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee may request, and the supervisor shall
provide, alternative caseload forecasts based on assumptions specified
by the administrator.
(8) The official state caseload forecast under this section shall
be the basis of the governor's budget document as provided in RCW
43.88.030 and utilized by the legislature in the development of the
omnibus biennial appropriations act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 82.33 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To promote the free flow of information and to promote
legislative and executive input in the development of assumptions and
preparation of forecasts, immediate access to all information and
statistical models relating to caseload forecasts shall be available to
the caseload forecast work group, hereby created. Each state agency
affected by caseloads shall submit caseload reports and data to the
council as soon as the reports and data are available and shall provide
to the council and the supervisor such additional raw, program-level
data or information as may be necessary for discharge of their
respective duties.
(2) The caseload forecast work group shall consist of one staff
member selected by the executive head or chairperson of each of the
following agencies, programs, or committees:
(a) Office of financial management;
(b) Ways and means committee, or its successor, of the senate;
(c) Ways and means committee, or its successor, of the house of
representatives;
(d) Legislative evaluation and accountability program committee;
and
(e) Each state program for which the council forecasts the
caseload.
(3) The caseload forecast work group shall provide technical
support to the forecast council. Meetings of the caseload forecast
work group may be called by any member of the group for the purpose of
assisting the council, reviewing forecasts, or for any other purpose
that may assist the council.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 82.33 RCW
to read as follows:
The economic and revenue forecast council shall also conduct
analysis of sentencing practices and their impact on correctional
caseloads. To that end, the forecast council shall:
(1)(a) Serve as a clearinghouse and information center for the
collection, preparation, analysis, and dissemination of information on
state and local adult and juvenile sentencing practices; (b) develop
and maintain a computerized adult and juvenile sentencing information
system by individual superior court judge consisting of offender,
offense, history, and sentence information entered from judgment and
sentence forms for all adult felons; and (c) conduct ongoing research
regarding adult and juvenile sentencing guidelines, use of total
confinement and alternatives to total confinement, plea bargaining, and
other matters relating to the improvement of the adult criminal justice
system and the juvenile justice system;
(2) Not later than December 1, 2011, and at least every two years
thereafter, based on available information, report to the governor and
the legislature on:
(a) Racial disproportionality in juvenile and adult sentencing and,
if available, the impact that diversions, such as youth courts, have on
racial disproportionality in juvenile prosecution, adjudication, and
sentencing;
(b) The capacity of state and local juvenile and adult facilities
and resources; and
(c) Recidivism information on adult and juvenile offenders.

Sec. 13 RCW 74.09.470 and 2009 c 463 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Consistent with the goals established in RCW 74.09.402, through
the apple health for kids program authorized in this section, the
department shall provide affordable health care coverage to children
under the age of nineteen who reside in Washington state and whose
family income at the time of enrollment is not greater than two hundred
fifty percent of the federal poverty level as adjusted for family size
and determined annually by the federal department of health and human
services, and effective January 1, 2009, and only to the extent that
funds are specifically appropriated therefor, to children whose family
income is not greater than three hundred percent of the federal poverty
level. In administering the program, the department shall take such
actions as may be necessary to ensure the receipt of federal financial
participation under the medical assistance program, as codified at
Title XIX of the federal social security act, the state children's
health insurance program, as codified at Title XXI of the federal
social security act, and any other federal funding sources that are now
available or may become available in the future. The department and
the ((caseload)) economic and revenue forecast council shall estimate
the anticipated caseload and costs of the program established in this
section.
(2) The department shall accept applications for enrollment for
children's health care coverage; establish appropriate minimum-enrollment periods, as may be necessary; and determine eligibility
based on current family income. The department shall make eligibility
determinations within the time frames for establishing eligibility for
children on medical assistance, as defined by RCW 74.09.510. The
application and annual renewal processes shall be designed to minimize
administrative barriers for applicants and enrolled clients, and to
minimize gaps in eligibility for families who are eligible for
coverage. If a change in family income results in a change in the
source of funding for coverage, the department shall transfer the
family members to the appropriate source of funding and notify the
family with respect to any change in premium obligation, without a
break in eligibility. The department shall use the same eligibility
redetermination and appeals procedures as those provided for children
on medical assistance programs. The department shall modify its
eligibility renewal procedures to lower the percentage of children
failing to annually renew. The department shall manage its outreach,
application, and renewal procedures with the goals of: (a) Achieving
year by year improvements in enrollment, enrollment rates, renewals,
and renewal rates; (b) maximizing the use of existing program databases
to obtain information related to earned and unearned income for
purposes of eligibility determination and renewals, including, but not
limited to, the basic food program, the child care subsidy program,
federal social security administration programs, and the employment
security department wage database; (c) streamlining renewal processes
to rely primarily upon data matches, online submissions, and telephone
interviews; and (d) implementing any other eligibility determination
and renewal processes to allow the state to receive an enhanced federal
matching rate and additional federal outreach funding available through
the federal children's health insurance program reauthorization act of
2009 by January 2010. The department shall advise the governor and the
legislature regarding the status of these efforts by September 30,
2009. The information provided should include the status of the
department's efforts, the anticipated impact of those efforts on
enrollment, and the costs associated with that enrollment.
(3) To ensure continuity of care and ease of understanding for
families and health care providers, and to maximize the efficiency of
the program, the amount, scope, and duration of health care services
provided to children under this section shall be the same as that
provided to children under medical assistance, as defined in RCW
74.09.520.
(4) The primary mechanism for purchasing health care coverage under
this section shall be through contracts with managed health care
systems as defined in RCW 74.09.522, subject to conditions,
limitations, and appropriations provided in the biennial appropriations
act. However, the department shall make every effort within available
resources to purchase health care coverage for uninsured children whose
families have access to dependent coverage through an employer-sponsored health plan or another source when it is cost-effective for
the state to do so, and the purchase is consistent with requirements of
Title XIX and Title XXI of the federal social security act. To the
extent allowable under federal law, the department shall require
families to enroll in available employer-sponsored coverage, as a
condition of participating in the program established under this
section, when it is cost-effective for the state to do so. Families
who enroll in available employer-sponsored coverage under this section
shall be accounted for separately in the annual report required by RCW
74.09.053.
(5)(a) To reflect appropriate parental responsibility, the
department shall develop and implement a schedule of premiums for
children's health care coverage due to the department from families
with income greater than two hundred percent of the federal poverty
level. For families with income greater than two hundred fifty percent
of the federal poverty level, the premiums shall be established in
consultation with the senate majority and minority leaders and the
speaker and minority leader of the house of representatives. Premiums
shall be set at a reasonable level that does not pose a barrier to
enrollment. The amount of the premium shall be based upon family
income and shall not exceed the premium limitations in Title XXI of the
federal social security act. Premiums shall not be imposed on children
in households at or below two hundred percent of the federal poverty
level as articulated in RCW 74.09.055.
(b) Beginning no later than January 1, 2010, the department shall
offer families whose income is greater than three hundred percent of
the federal poverty level the opportunity to purchase health care
coverage for their children through the programs administered under
this section without an explicit premium subsidy from the state. The
design of the health benefit package offered to these children should
provide a benefit package substantially similar to that offered in the
apple health for kids program, and may differ with respect to cost-sharing, and other appropriate elements from that provided to children
under subsection (3) of this section including, but not limited to,
application of preexisting conditions, waiting periods, and other
design changes needed to offer affordable coverage. The amount paid by
the family shall be in an amount equal to the rate paid by the state to
the managed health care system for coverage of the child, including any
associated and administrative costs to the state of providing coverage
for the child. Any pooling of the program enrollees that results in
state fiscal impact must be identified and brought to the legislature
for consideration.
(6) The department shall undertake and continue a proactive,
targeted outreach and education effort with the goal of enrolling
children in health coverage and improving the health literacy of youth
and parents. The department shall collaborate with the department of
health, local public health jurisdictions, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, the department of early learning,
health educators, health care providers, health carriers, community-based organizations, and parents in the design and development of this
effort. The outreach and education effort shall include the following
components:
(a) Broad dissemination of information about the availability of
coverage, including media campaigns;
(b) Assistance with completing applications, and community-based
outreach efforts to help people apply for coverage. Community-based
outreach efforts should be targeted to the populations least likely to
be covered;
(c) Use of existing systems, such as enrollment information from
the free and reduced-price lunch program, the department of early
learning child care subsidy program, the department of health's women,
infants, and children program, and the early childhood education and
assistance program, to identify children who may be eligible but not
enrolled in coverage;
(d) Contracting with community-based organizations and government
entities to support community-based outreach efforts to help families
apply for coverage. These efforts should be targeted to the
populations least likely to be covered. The department shall provide
informational materials for use by government entities and community-based organizations in their outreach activities, and should identify
any available federal matching funds to support these efforts;
(e) Development and dissemination of materials to engage and inform
parents and families statewide on issues such as: The benefits of
health insurance coverage; the appropriate use of health services,
including primary care provided by health care practitioners licensed
under chapters 18.71, 18.57, 18.36A, and 18.79 RCW, and emergency
services; the value of a medical home, well-child services and
immunization, and other preventive health services with linkages to
department of health child profile efforts; identifying and managing
chronic conditions such as asthma and diabetes; and the value of good
nutrition and physical activity;
(f) An evaluation of the outreach and education efforts, based upon
clear, cost-effective outcome measures that are included in contracts
with entities that undertake components of the outreach and education
effort;
(g) An implementation plan to develop online application capability
that is integrated with the department's automated client eligibility
system, and to develop data linkages with the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for free and reduced-price lunch
enrollment information and the department of early learning for child
care subsidy program enrollment information.
(7) The department shall take action to increase the number of
primary care physicians providing dental disease preventive services
including oral health screenings, risk assessment, family education,
the application of fluoride varnish, and referral to a dentist as
needed.
(8) The department shall monitor the rates of substitution between
private-sector health care coverage and the coverage provided under
this section and shall report to appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 9.94A.855 (Sentencing guidelines commission -- Research
staff -- Data, information, assistance -- Bylaws -- Salary of executive
officer) and 2005 c 282 s 20, 1999 c 143 s 10, 1982 c 192 s 3, & 1981
c 137 s 5;
(2) RCW 9.94A.863 (Monetary threshold amounts of property crimes--Review -- Report) and 2009 c 431 s 2;
(3) RCW 43.88C.010 (Caseload forecast council -- Caseload forecast
supervisor -- Oversight and approval of official caseload forecast--Alternative forecast -- Travel reimbursement -- Definitions) and 2000 c 90
s 1 & 1997 c 168 s 1;
(4) RCW 43.88C.020 (Preparation and submittal of caseload
forecasts--Cooperation of state agencies--Official state caseload
forecast) and 1997 c 168 s 2; and
(5) RCW 43.88C.030 (Caseload forecast work group -- Submittal of data
by state agencies -- Meetings) and 1997 c 168 s 3.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---