BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The manufacturing sales and use tax
incentive has not met its full potential as an economic development
tool in Washington state. With manufacturing growth at risk
nationally, Washington needs an economic development plan to retain,
attract, and grow a core industry to our economy while using this model
to promote other industry segments. The legislature intends to affirm
and improve the manufacturing sales and use tax incentive as a primary
economic development tool for our state. The exemption for the
manufacturing sector from sales taxes on purchases of machinery and
equipment and related structures provides an important incentive to
invest. This investment creates additional capacity in the economy
which generates new final demand, household income, and tax revenue.
Importantly, this investment is a catalyst for job creation in all
sectors of the economy. The legislature intends to provide the
broadest application of the incentive by expanding the existing
machinery and equipment tax incentive to include other consumables that
go into business inputs and extending the sales tax exemption on
machinery and equipment to additional capital-intensive industries.
The legislature believes extending the sales tax exemption for
purchases of machinery and equipment to other industries, including
consumables in the exemption, and eliminating restrictive regulatory
interpretations will provide significant benefits to the Washington
economy in terms of increased economic output, income generation, and
job creation and enhanced tax revenue.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.02565 and 2009 c 535 s 510 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to a
manufacturer or processor for hire of machinery and equipment used
((directly)) in a manufacturing operation or research and development
operation, to sales to a person engaged in testing for a manufacturer
or processor for hire of machinery and equipment used ((directly)) in
a testing operation, or to sales of or charges made for labor and
services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning,
altering, or improving the machinery and equipment, but only when the
purchaser provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form
and manner prescribed by the department by rule. The seller must
retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.
(2) For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.02565:
(a) "Machinery and equipment" means industrial fixtures, devices,
and support facilities, and tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component thereof, including repair parts and replacement
parts. "Machinery and equipment" includes:
(i) Pollution control equipment installed and used in a
manufacturing operation, testing operation, or research and development
operation to prevent air pollution, water pollution, or contamination
that might otherwise result from the manufacturing operation, testing
operation, or research and development operation((. "Machinery and
equipment" also includes));
(ii) Prototype equipment that produces another item of tangible
personal property for use in the manufacturing operation, testing
operation, or research and development operation; and
(iii) Digital goods.
(b) "Machinery and equipment" does not include((:
(i))) hand-powered tools((;
(ii) Property with a useful life of less than one year;
(iii) Buildings, other than machinery and equipment that is
permanently affixed to or becomes a physical part of a building; and
(iv) Building fixtures that are not integral to the manufacturing
operation, testing operation, or research and development operation
that are permanently affixed to and become a physical part of a
building, such as utility systems for heating, ventilation, air
conditioning, communications, plumbing, or electrical)).
(c) Machinery and equipment is "used ((directly))" in a
manufacturing operation, testing operation, or research and development
operation if the machinery and equipment((:
(i) Acts upon or interacts with an item of tangible personal
property;
(ii) Conveys, transports, handles, or temporarily stores an item of
tangible personal property at the manufacturing site or testing site;
(iii) Controls, guides, measures, verifies, aligns, regulates, or
tests tangible personal property at the site or away from the site;
(iv) Provides physical support for or access to tangible personal
property;
(v) Produces power for, or lubricates machinery and equipment;
(vi) Produces another item of tangible personal property for use in
the manufacturing operation, testing operation, or research and
development operation;
(vii) Places tangible personal property in the container, package,
or wrapping in which the tangible personal property is normally sold or
transported; or
(viii) Is integral to research and development as defined in RCW
82.63.010)) is involved in any part of the manufacturing operation,
testing operation, or research and development operation.
(d) "Manufacturing operation" means the manufacturing of articles,
substances, or commodities for sale as tangible personal property or
when installed into or on real property. A manufacturing operation
begins at the point where the raw materials enter the manufacturing
site and ends at the point where the processed material leaves the
manufacturing site. The term also includes that portion of a
cogeneration project that is used to generate power for consumption
within the manufacturing site of which the cogeneration project is an
integral part. The term does not include the production of electricity
by a light and power business as defined in RCW 82.16.010 or the
preparation of food products on the premises of a person selling food
products at retail.
(e) "Cogeneration" means the simultaneous generation of electrical
energy and low-grade heat from the same fuel.
(f) "Research and development operation" means engaging in research
and development as defined in RCW 82.63.010 by a manufacturer or
processor for hire.
(g) "Testing" means activities performed to establish or determine
the properties, qualities, and limitations of tangible personal
property.
(h) "Testing operation" means the testing of tangible personal
property for a manufacturer or processor for hire. A testing operation
begins at the point where the tangible personal property enters the
testing site and ends at the point where the tangible personal property
leaves the testing site. The term also includes that portion of a
cogeneration project that is used to generate power for consumption
within the site of which the cogeneration project is an integral part.
The term does not include the production of electricity by a light and
power business as defined in RCW 82.16.010 or the preparation of food
products on the premises of a person selling food products at retail.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.12.02565 and 2003 c 5 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this chapter ((shall)) do not apply in respect to
the use by a manufacturer or processor for hire of machinery and
equipment used ((directly)) in a manufacturing operation or research
and development operation, to the use by a person engaged in testing
for a manufacturer or processor for hire of machinery and equipment
used ((directly)) in a testing operation, or to the use of labor and
services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning,
altering, or improving the machinery and equipment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An exemption from the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 is provided
for sales to qualifying businesses of eligible server equipment to be
installed, without intervening use, in an eligible computer data
center, and to charges made for labor and services rendered in respect
to installing eligible server equipment. The exemption also applies to
sales to qualifying businesses of eligible power infrastructure,
including labor and services rendered in respect to constructing,
installing, repairing, altering, or improving eligible power
infrastructure.
(2)(a) In order to claim the exemption under this section, a
qualifying business must submit an application to the department for an
exemption certificate. The application must include the information
necessary, as required by the department, to determine that a business
qualifies for the exemption under this section. The department must
issue exemption certificates to qualifying businesses. The department
may assign a unique identification number to each exemption certificate
issued under this section.
(b) A qualifying business claiming the exemption under this section
must present the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and
manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of
the certificate for the seller's files.
(3) For purposes of this section the following definitions apply
unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a)(i) "Computer data center" means a facility comprised of one or
more buildings constructed or refurbished specifically, and used
primarily, to house working servers, where the facility has the
following characteristics: (A) Uninterruptible power supplies,
generator backup power, or both; (B) sophisticated fire suppression and
prevention systems; and (C) enhanced physical security, such as:
Restricted access to the facility to selected personnel; permanent
security guards; video camera surveillance; an electronic system
requiring passcodes, keycards, or biometric scans, such as hand scans
and retinal or fingerprint recognition; or similar security features.
(ii) For a computer data center comprised of multiple buildings,
each separate building constructed or refurbished specifically, and
used primarily, to house working servers is considered a computer data
center if it has all of the characteristics listed in (a)(i)(A) through
(C) of this subsection (3).
(b) "Electronic data storage and data management services" include,
but are not limited to: Providing data storage and backup services,
providing computer processing power, hosting enterprise software
applications, and hosting web sites. The term also includes providing
services such as e-mail, web browsing and searching, media
applications, and other online services, regardless of whether a charge
is made for such services.
(c) "Eligible computer data center" means a computer data center:
(i) Located in a rural county as defined in RCW 82.14.370;
(ii) Having at least twenty thousand square feet dedicated to
housing working servers, where the server space has not previously been
dedicated to housing working servers; and
(iii) For which the commencement of construction occurs after March
31, 2010, and before July 1, 2011. For purposes of this section,
"commencement of construction" means the date that a building permit is
issued under the building code adopted under RCW 19.27.031 for
construction of the computer data center. The construction of a
computer data center includes the expansion, renovation, or other
improvements made to existing facilities, including leased or rented
space. "Commencement of construction" does not include soil testing,
site clearing and grading, site preparation, or any other related
activities that are initiated before the issuance of a building permit
for the construction of the foundation of a computer data center.
(d) "Eligible power infrastructure" means all fixtures and
equipment necessary for the transformation, distribution, or management
of electricity that is required to operate eligible server equipment
within an eligible computer data center. The term includes electrical
substations, generators, wiring, and cogeneration equipment.
(e) "Eligible server equipment" means the original server equipment
installed in an eligible computer data center on or after April 1,
2010, and replacement server equipment. For purposes of this
subsection (3)(e), "replacement server equipment" means server
equipment that: (i) Replaces existing server equipment, if the sale or
use of the server equipment to be replaced qualified for an exemption
under this section or section 5 of this act; and (ii) is installed and
put into regular use before April 1, 2018.
(f) "Qualifying business" means a business entity that exists for
the primary purpose of engaging in commercial activity for profit and
that is the owner or lessee of an eligible computer data center. The
term does not include the state or federal government or any of their
departments, agencies, and institutions; tribal governments; political
subdivisions of this state; or any municipal, quasi-municipal, public,
or other corporation created by the state or federal government, tribal
government, municipality, or political subdivision of the state.
(g) "Server" means blade or rack-mount server computers used in a
computer data center exclusively to provide electronic data storage and
data management services for internal use by the owner or lessee of the
computer data center, for clients of the owner or lessee of the
computer data center, or both. "Server" does not include personal
computers.
(h) "Server equipment" means the server chassis and all computer
hardware and software contained within the server chassis. "Server
equipment" does not include the racks upon which the server chassis is
installed, and computer peripherals such as keyboards, monitors,
printers, mice, and other devices that work outside of the computer.
(4) This section expires April 1, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An exemption from the tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020 is provided
for the use by qualifying businesses of eligible server equipment to be
installed, without intervening use, in an eligible computer data
center, and to the use of labor and services rendered in respect to
installing such server equipment. The exemption also applies to the
use of power infrastructure, including labor and services rendered in
respect to installing, repairing, altering, or improving such
infrastructure.
(2) A qualifying business is not eligible for the exemption under
this section unless the department issued an exemption certificate to
the qualifying business for the exemption provided in section 2 of this
act.
(3) The definitions in section 4 of this act apply to this section.
(4) This section expires April 1, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to sales of
electricity made by a light and power business to an integrated
software developer and online service provider for use in a computer
data center located in a rural county as defined in RCW 82.14.370(5) or
a provider of competitive telecommunications service or network
telephone service.
(2) The exemption provided for in this section does not apply to
amounts received from the remarketing or resale of electricity
originally obtained by contract for operation of a computer data
center.
(3) In order to claim an exemption under this section, the
integrated software developer and online service provider must provide
the light and power business with an exemption certificate in a form
and manner prescribed by the department.
(4) The definitions in section 4 of this act apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
diesel fuel to an integrated software developer and online service
provider for use in an eligible computer data center facility or a
provider of competitive telecommunications service or network telephone
service. This exemption is available only if the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department.
(2) The definitions in section 4 of this act apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to the use of
diesel fuel by an integrated software developer and online service
provider for use in an eligible computer data center facility or a
provider of competitive telecommunications service or network telephone
service.
(2) The definitions in section 4 of this act apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 82.63 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may adopt rules as may be necessary to administer
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 No taxes may be exempted under this act
prior to July 1, 2010.

--- END ---