BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.36.010 and 2004 c 236 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All property belonging exclusively to the United States, the
state, or any county or municipal corporation; all property belonging
exclusively to any federally recognized Indian tribe located in the
state, if that property is used exclusively for essential government
services; all state route number 16 corridor transportation systems and
facilities constructed under chapter 47.46 RCW; ((and)) all property
under a financing contract pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW or recorded
agreement granting immediate possession and use to the public bodies
listed in this section or under an order of immediate possession and
use pursuant to RCW 8.04.090; and, for a period of forty years from
acquisition, all property of a community center; is exempt from
taxation. All property belonging exclusively to a foreign national
government is exempt from taxation if that property is used exclusively
as an office or residence for a consul or other official representative
of the foreign national government, and if the consul or other official
representative is a citizen of that foreign nation.
(2) For the purposes of this section((,)) the following definitions
apply unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Community center" means property, including a building or
buildings, determined to be surplus to the needs of a district by a
local school board, and purchased or acquired by a nonprofit
organization for the purposes of converting them into community
facilities for the delivery of nonresidential coordinated services for
community members. The community center may make space available to
businesses, individuals, or other parties through the loan or rental of
space in or on the property.
(b) "Essential government services" means services such as tribal
administration, public facilities, fire, police, public health,
education, sewer, water, environmental and land use, transportation,
and utility services.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.29A.010 and 1999 c 220 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The legislature hereby recognizes that properties of the
state of Washington, counties, school districts, and other municipal
corporations are exempted by Article 7, section 1 of the state
Constitution from property tax obligations, but that private lessees of
such public properties receive substantial benefits from governmental
services provided by units of government.
(b) The legislature further recognizes that a uniform method of
taxation should apply to such leasehold interests in publicly owned
property.
(c) The legislature finds that lessees of publicly owned property
or community centers are entitled to those same governmental services
and does hereby provide for a leasehold excise tax to fairly compensate
governmental units for services rendered to such lessees of publicly
owned property or community centers. For the purposes of this
subsection, "community center" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
84.36.010.
(2) The legislature further finds that experience gained by
lessors, lessees, and the department of revenue since enactment of the
leasehold excise tax under this chapter has shed light on areas in the
leasehold excise statutes that need explanation and clarification. The
purpose of chapter 220, Laws of 1999 is to make those changes.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.29A.030 and 1983 2nd ex.s. c 3 s 18 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) There is ((hereby)) levied and ((shall be)) collected a
leasehold excise tax on the act or privilege of occupying or using
publicly owned real or personal property or real or personal property
of a community center through a leasehold interest on and after January
1, 1976, at a rate of twelve percent of taxable rent((: PROVIDED,
That)). However, after the computation of the tax ((there shall be))
a credit is allowed ((credit)) for any tax collected pursuant to RCW
82.29A.040.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "community center" has the
same meaning as provided in RCW 84.36.010.
(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW
82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2011 and thereafter.

--- END ---