BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the system of
financing K-12 public schools could be made more equitable by enhancing
basic education and making school districts less reliant on local levy
funding. The purpose of this act is to remedy the situation by
removing transportation and school district maintenance, supplies, and
operation costs that have been financed with local levy dollars and
replacing them with state dollars. Given the changes in the
educational system since the basic education act was enacted, these
items should be enhanced to meet the state obligation to amply fund
what it determines to be a basic education. By financing these items
through predictable state support, the state intends to fulfill its
constitutional obligation for a general and uniform system of education
and ensure that state basic education is financed by taxpayers across
the state on an equitable level, rather than the disparate burden
imposed at the local level. This act is the latest effort by the
legislature to constantly review and evaluate whether its definition of
basic education and the associated finance system is providing the
structure for equal educational opportunity for students.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.160.192 and 2009 c 548 s 311 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1))) The superintendent of public instruction shall ((phase-in
the implementation of)) implement the distribution formula under this
chapter for allocating state funds to school districts for the
transportation of students to and from school((. The phase-in shall be
according to the implementation schedule adopted by the legislature and
shall begin no later than the 2013-14)) beginning in the 2011-12 school
year.
(((a))) (1) The formula must be developed and revised on an ongoing
basis using the major cost factors in student transportation, including
basic and special student loads, school district land area, average
distance to school, roadway miles, and number of locations served.
Factors must include all those site characteristics that are
statistically significant after analysis of the data required by the
revised reporting process.
(((b))) (2) The formula must allocate funds to school districts
based on the average predicted costs of transporting students to and
from school, using a regression analysis.
(((2) During the phase-in period, funding provided to school
districts for student transportation operations shall be distributed on
the following basis:
(a) Annually, each school district shall receive the lesser of the
previous school year's pupil transportation operations allocation, or
the total of allowable pupil transportation expenditures identified on
the previous school year's final expenditure report to the state plus
district indirect expenses using the state recovery rate identified by
the superintendent; and
(b) Annually, any funds appropriated by the legislature in excess
of the maintenance level funding amount for student transportation
shall be distributed among school districts on a prorated basis using
the difference between the amount identified in (a) of this subsection
and the amount determined under the formula in RCW 28A.160.180.
(3) The superintendent shall develop, implement, and provide a copy
of the rules specifying the student transportation reporting
requirements to the legislature and school districts no later than
December 1, 2009.
(4) Beginning in December 2009, and continuing until December 2014,
the superintendent shall provide quarterly updates and progress reports
to the fiscal committees of the legislature on the implementation and
testing of the distribution formula.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.160
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop,
implement, and provide a copy of the rules specifying the student
transportation reporting requirements to the legislature and school
districts no later than December 1, 2010.
(2) Beginning in December 2010, and continuing until December 2014,
the superintendent shall provide quarterly updates and progress reports
to the fiscal committees of the legislature on the implementation and
testing of the distribution formula.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2015.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.150.260 and 2009 c 548 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
The purpose of this section is to provide for the allocation of
state funding that the legislature deems necessary to support school
districts in offering the minimum instructional program of basic
education under RCW 28A.150.220. The allocation shall be determined as
follows:
(1) The governor shall and the superintendent of public instruction
may recommend to the legislature a formula for the distribution of a
basic education instructional allocation for each common school
district.
(2) The distribution formula under this section shall be for
allocation purposes only. Except as may be required under chapter
28A.165, 28A.180, or 28A.155 RCW, or federal laws and regulations,
nothing in this section requires school districts to use basic
education instructional funds to implement a particular instructional
approach or service. Nothing in this section requires school districts
to maintain a particular classroom teacher-to-student ratio or other
staff-to-student ratio or to use allocated funds to pay for particular
types or classifications of staff. Nothing in this section entitles an
individual teacher to a particular teacher planning period.
(3)(a) To the extent the technical details of the formula have been
adopted by the legislature, the distribution formula for the basic
education instructional allocation shall be based on minimum staffing
and nonstaff costs the legislature deems necessary to support
instruction and operations in prototypical schools serving high,
middle, and elementary school students as provided in this section.
The use of prototypical schools for the distribution formula does not
constitute legislative intent that schools should be operated or
structured in a similar fashion as the prototypes. Prototypical
schools illustrate the level of resources needed to operate a school of
a particular size with particular types and grade levels of students
using commonly understood terms and inputs, such as class size, hours
of instruction, and various categories of school staff. It is the
intent that the funding allocations to school districts be adjusted
from the school prototypes based on the actual number of annual average
full-time equivalent students in each grade level at each school in the
district and not based on the grade-level configuration of the school
to the extent that data is available. The allocations shall be further
adjusted from the school prototypes with minimum allocations for small
schools and to reflect other factors identified in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(b) For the purposes of this section, prototypical schools are
defined as follows:
(i) A prototypical high school has six hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades nine through twelve;
(ii) A prototypical middle school has four hundred thirty-two
average annual full-time equivalent students in grades seven and eight;
and
(iii) A prototypical elementary school has four hundred average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through
six.
(c) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school
shall be based on the number of full-time equivalent classroom teachers
needed to provide instruction over the minimum required annual
instructional hours under RCW 28A.150.220 and provide at least one
teacher planning period per school day, and based on an average class
size as specified in the omnibus appropriations act. The omnibus
appropriations act shall at a minimum specify:
(i) Basic average class size;
(ii) Basic average class size in schools where more than fifty
percent of the students are eligible for free and reduced-price meals;
(iii) Average class size for exploratory and preparatory career and
technical education, laboratory science, advanced placement, and
international baccalaureate courses; and
(iv) Average class size in grades kindergarten through three.
(d) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school
shall include allocations for the following types of staff in addition
to classroom teachers:
(i) Principals, including assistant principals, and other
certificated building-level administrators;
(ii) Teacher librarians, performing functions including information
literacy, technology, and media to support school library media
programs;
(iii) Student health services, a function that includes school
nurses, whether certificated instructional or classified employee, and
social workers;
(iv) Guidance counselors, performing functions including parent
outreach and graduation advisor;
(v) Professional development coaches;
(vi) Teaching assistance, which includes any aspect of educational
instructional services provided by classified employees;
(vii) Office support, technology support, and other
noninstructional aides;
(viii) Custodians, warehouse, maintenance, laborer, and
professional and technical education support employees; and
(ix) Classified staff providing student and staff safety.
(4)(a) The minimum allocation for each school district shall
include allocations per annual average full-time equivalent student for
the following materials, supplies, and operating costs((: Student
technology; utilities; curriculum, textbooks, library materials, and
instructional supplies; instructional professional development for both
certificated and classified staff; other building-level costs including
maintenance, custodial, and security; and central office
administration.)), which beginning in the 2011-12 school year shall be
as follows:
(i) Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . $113.80
(ii) Utilities and insurance . . . . . . . . . . . . $309.21
(iii) Curriculum and textbooks . . . . . . . . . . . . $122.17
(iv) Other supplies and library materials . . . . . . . . . . . . $259.39
(v) Instructional professional development for both
certificated and classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $18.89
(vi) Facilities maintenance . . . . . . . . . . . . $153.18
(vii) Security and central office administration . . . . . . . . . . . . $106.12
(b) Beginning in the 2012-13 school year, the allocations
identified in (a) of this subsection shall be adjusted annually for
inflation as specified in the omnibus appropriations act.
(c) The annual average full-time equivalent student amounts in (a)
of this subsection shall be enhanced based on full-time equivalent
student enrollment in exploratory career and technical education
courses for students in grades seven through twelve; laboratory science
courses for students in grades nine through twelve; preparatory career
and technical education courses for students in grades nine through
twelve offered in a high school; and preparatory career and technical
education courses for students in grades eleven and twelve offered
through a skill center.
(5) The allocations provided under subsections (3) and (4) of this
section shall be enhanced as follows to provide additional allocations
for classroom teachers and maintenance, supplies, and operating costs:
(a) To provide supplemental instruction and services for
underachieving students through the learning assistance program under
RCW 28A.165.005 through 28A.165.065, allocations shall be based on the
percent of students in each school who are eligible for free and
reduced-price meals. The minimum allocation for the learning
assistance program shall provide an extended school day and extended
school year for each level of prototypical school and a per student
allocation for maintenance, supplies, and operating costs.
(b) To provide supplemental instruction and services for students
whose primary language is other than English, allocations shall be
based on the number of students in each school who are eligible for and
enrolled in the transitional bilingual instruction program under RCW
28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080. The minimum allocation for each level
of prototypical school shall provide for supplemental instruction based
on percent of the school day a student is assumed to receive
supplemental instruction and a per student allocation for maintenance,
supplies, and operating costs.
(6) The allocations provided under subsections (3) and (4) of this
section shall be enhanced to provide additional allocations to support
programs for highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010 through
28A.185.030, based on two and three hundred fourteen one-thousandths
percent of each school district's full-time equivalent enrollment. The
minimum allocation for the programs shall provide an extended school
day and extended school year for each level of prototypical school and
a per student allocation for maintenance, supplies, and operating
costs.
(7) The allocations under subsections (3)(b), (c)(i), and (d), (4),
and (8) of this section shall be enhanced as provided under RCW
28A.150.390 on an excess cost basis to provide supplemental
instructional resources for students with disabilities.
(8) The distribution formula shall include allocations to school
districts to support certificated and classified staffing of central
office administration. The minimum allocation shall be calculated as
a percentage, identified in the omnibus appropriations act, of the
total allocations for staff under subsections (3) and (6) of this
section for all schools in the district.
(9)(a) For the purposes of allocations for prototypical high
schools and middle schools under subsections (3) and (5) of this
section that are based on the percent of students in the school who are
eligible for free and reduced-price meals, the actual percent of such
students in a school shall be adjusted by a factor identified in the
omnibus appropriations act to reflect underreporting of free and
reduced-price meal eligibility among middle and high school students.
(b) Allocations or enhancements provided under subsections (3) and
(4) of this section for exploratory and preparatory career and
technical education courses shall be provided only for courses approved
by the office of the superintendent of public instruction under chapter
28A.700 RCW.
(10)(a) This formula for distribution of basic education funds
shall be reviewed biennially by the superintendent and governor. The
recommended formula shall be subject to approval, amendment or
rejection by the legislature.
(b) In the event the legislature rejects the distribution formula
recommended by the governor, without adopting a new distribution
formula, the distribution formula for the previous school year shall
remain in effect.
(c) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average
number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as
provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the first school day of each
month, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW
28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing
school district. The definition of full-time equivalent student shall
be determined by rules of the superintendent of public instruction and
shall be included as part of the superintendent's biennial budget
request. The definition shall be based on the minimum instructional
hour offerings required under RCW 28A.150.220. Any revision of the
present definition shall not take effect until approved by the house
ways and means committee and the senate ways and means committee.
(d) The office of financial management shall make a monthly review
of the superintendent's reported full-time equivalent students in the
common schools in conjunction with RCW 43.62.050.

Sec. 5 RCW 84.52.0531 and 2009 c 4 s 908 are each amended to read
as follows:
The maximum dollar amount which may be levied by or for any school
district for maintenance and operation support under the provisions of
RCW 84.52.053 shall be determined as follows:
(1) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1997, the
maximum dollar amount shall be calculated pursuant to the laws and
rules in effect in November 1996.
(2) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, the maximum dollar amount shall be the sum of (a) plus or
minus (b) and (c) of this subsection minus (d) of this subsection:
(a) The district's levy base as defined in subsections (3) ((and)),
(4), and (5) of this section multiplied by the district's maximum levy
percentage as defined in subsection (((5))) (6) of this section;
(b) For districts in a high/nonhigh relationship, the high school
district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the nonhigh school
district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount equal to
the estimated amount of the nonhigh payment due to the high school
district under RCW 28A.545.030(3) and 28A.545.050 for the school year
commencing the year of the levy;
(c) For districts in an interdistrict cooperative agreement, the
nonresident school district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and
the resident school district's maximum levy amount shall be increased
by an amount equal to the per pupil basic education allocation included
in the nonresident district's levy base under subsection (3) of this
section multiplied by:
(i) The number of full-time equivalent students served from the
resident district in the prior school year; multiplied by:
(ii) The serving district's maximum levy percentage determined
under subsection (((5))) (6) of this section; increased by:
(iii) The percent increase per full-time equivalent student as
stated in the state basic education appropriation section of the
biennial budget between the prior school year and the current school
year divided by fifty-five percent;
(d) The district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced by the
maximum amount of state matching funds for which the district is
eligible under RCW 28A.500.010.
(3) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 2005 and
thereafter, a district's levy base shall be the sum of allocations in
(a) through (c) of this subsection received by the district for the
prior school year and the amounts determined under subsections (4) and
(5) of this section, including allocations for compensation increases,
plus the sum of such allocations multiplied by the percent increase per
full time equivalent student as stated in the state basic education
appropriation section of the biennial budget between the prior school
year and the current school year and divided by fifty-five percent. A
district's levy base shall not include local school district property
tax levies or other local revenues, or state and federal allocations
not identified in (a) through (c) of this subsection.
(a) The district's basic education allocation as determined
pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350;
(b) State and federal categorical allocations for the following
programs:
(i) Pupil transportation;
(ii) Special education;
(iii) Education of highly capable students;
(iv) Compensatory education, including but not limited to learning
assistance, migrant education, Indian education, refugee programs, and
bilingual education;
(v) Food services; and
(vi) Statewide block grant programs; and
(c) Any other federal allocations for elementary and secondary
school programs, including direct grants, other than federal impact aid
funds and allocations in lieu of taxes.
(4) For levy collections in calendar years 2005 through ((2011))
2017, in addition to the allocations included under subsection (3)(a)
through (c) of this section, a district's levy base shall also include
the following:
(a) The difference between the allocation rate the district would
have received in the ((current)) prior school year ((had RCW 84.52.068
not been amended by chapter 19, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess.)) using the
Initiative 728 base and the allocation rate the district received in
the ((current)) prior school year pursuant to RCW ((84.52.068. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall offset the
amount added to a district's levy base pursuant to this subsection
(4)(a) by any additional per student allocations included in a
district's levy base pursuant to the enactment of an initiative to the
people subsequent to June 10, 2004)) 28A.505.220 multiplied by the
full-time equivalent student enrollment used to calculate the
Initiative 728 allocation for the prior school year; and
(b) The difference between the allocations the district would have
received the prior school year ((had RCW 28A.400.205 not been amended
by chapter 20, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess.)) using the Initiative 732
base and the allocations the district actually received the prior
school year pursuant to RCW 28A.400.205. ((The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall offset the amount added to
a district's levy base pursuant to this subsection (4)(b) by any
additional salary increase allocations included in a district's levy
base pursuant to the enactment of an initiative to the people
subsequent to June 10, 2004.))
(5) For levy collections in calendar years 2011 through 2017, in
addition to the allocations included under subsections (3)(a) through
(c) and (4) of this section, a district's levy base shall also include
the difference between an allocation of fifty-three and two-tenths
certificated instructional staff units per thousand full-time
equivalent students in grades kindergarten through four enrolled in the
prior school year and the allocation of certificated instructional
staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades
kindergarten through four that the district actually received in the
prior school year, except that the levy base for a school district
whose allocation in the 2009-10 school year was less than fifty-three
and two-tenths certificated instructional staff units per thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through four shall
include the difference between the allocation the district actually
received in the 2009-10 school year and the allocation the district
actually received in the prior school year.
(6) A district's maximum levy percentage shall be ((twenty-two
percent in 1998 and twenty-four percent in 1999)) twelve percent in
2011 and every year thereafter; plus, for qualifying districts, the
grandfathered percentage determined as follows:
(a) For 1997, the difference between the district's 1993 maximum
levy percentage and twenty percent; and
(b) For 1998 and thereafter, the percentage calculated as follows:
(i) Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior year times
the district's levy base determined under subsection (3) of this
section;
(ii) Reduce the result of (b)(i) of this subsection by any levy
reduction funds as defined in subsection (((6))) (7) of this section
that are to be allocated to the district for the current school year;
(iii) Divide the result of (b)(ii) of this subsection by the
district's levy base; and
(iv) Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated in
(b)(iii) of this subsection.
(((6))) (7) "Levy reduction funds" shall mean increases in state
funds from the prior school year for programs included under
subsections (3) ((and)), (4), and (5) of this section: (a) That are
not attributable to enrollment changes, compensation increases, or
inflationary adjustments; and (b) that are or were specifically
identified as levy reduction funds in the appropriations act. If levy
reduction funds are dependent on formula factors which would not be
finalized until after the start of the current school year, the
superintendent of public instruction shall estimate the total amount of
levy reduction funds by using prior school year data in place of
current school year data. Levy reduction funds shall not include
moneys received by school districts from cities or counties.
(((7) For the purposes of this section,)) (8) The definitions in
this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Prior school year" means the most recent school year completed
prior to the year in which the levies are to be collected.
(((8) For the purposes of this section,)) (b) "Current school year"
means the year immediately following the prior school year.
(c) "Initiative 728 base" means the allocation to the student
achievement fund for the prior year that would have been made under
chapter 3, Laws of 2001, if all annual adjustments to the initial 2001
allocation had been made in previous years and in each subsequent year
as provided for under chapter 3, Laws of 2001.
(d) "Initiative 732 base" means the prior year's state allocation
for annual salary cost-of-living increases for district employees in
the state-funded salary base as it would have been calculated under
chapter 4, Laws of 2001, if each annual cost-of-living increase
allocation had been provided in previous years and in each subsequent
year.
(9) Funds collected from transportation vehicle fund tax levies
shall not be subject to the levy limitations in this section.
(10) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop rules
((and regulations)) and inform school districts of the pertinent data
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
(11) For calendar year 2009, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall recalculate school district levy authority to
reflect levy rates certified by school districts for calendar year
2009.

Sec. 6 RCW 84.52.0531 and 1997 c 259 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The maximum dollar amount which may be levied by or for any school
district for maintenance and operation support under the provisions of
RCW 84.52.053 shall be determined as follows:
(1) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1997, the
maximum dollar amount shall be calculated pursuant to the laws and
rules in effect in November 1996.
(2) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, the maximum dollar amount shall be the sum of (a) plus or
minus (b) and (c) of this subsection minus (d) of this subsection:
(a) The district's levy base as defined in subsection (3) of this
section multiplied by the district's maximum levy percentage as defined
in subsection (4) of this section;
(b) For districts in a high/nonhigh relationship, the high school
district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the nonhigh school
district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount equal to
the estimated amount of the nonhigh payment due to the high school
district under RCW 28A.545.030(3) and 28A.545.050 for the school year
commencing the year of the levy;
(c) For districts in an interdistrict cooperative agreement, the
nonresident school district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and
the resident school district's maximum levy amount shall be increased
by an amount equal to the per pupil basic education allocation included
in the nonresident district's levy base under subsection (3) of this
section multiplied by:
(i) The number of full-time equivalent students served from the
resident district in the prior school year; multiplied by:
(ii) The serving district's maximum levy percentage determined
under subsection (4) of this section; increased by:
(iii) The percent increase per full-time equivalent student as
stated in the state basic education appropriation section of the
biennial budget between the prior school year and the current school
year divided by fifty-five percent;
(d) The district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced by the
maximum amount of state matching funds for which the district is
eligible under RCW 28A.500.010.
(3) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, a district's levy base shall be the sum of allocations in
(a) through (c) of this subsection received by the district for the
prior school year, including allocations for compensation increases,
plus the sum of such allocations multiplied by the percent increase per
full time equivalent student as stated in the state basic education
appropriation section of the biennial budget between the prior school
year and the current school year and divided by fifty-five percent. A
district's levy base shall not include local school district property
tax levies or other local revenues, or state and federal allocations
not identified in (a) through (c) of this subsection.
(a) The district's basic education allocation as determined
pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350;
(b) State and federal categorical allocations for the following
programs:
(i) Pupil transportation;
(ii) Special education;
(iii) Education of highly capable students;
(iv) Compensatory education, including but not limited to learning
assistance, migrant education, Indian education, refugee programs, and
bilingual education;
(v) Food services; and
(vi) Statewide block grant programs; and
(c) Any other federal allocations for elementary and secondary
school programs, including direct grants, other than federal impact aid
funds and allocations in lieu of taxes.
(4) A district's maximum levy percentage shall be ((twenty-two
percent in 1998 and twenty-four percent in 1999)) twelve percent in
2011 and every year thereafter; plus, for qualifying districts, the
grandfathered percentage determined as follows:
(a) For 1997, the difference between the district's 1993 maximum
levy percentage and twenty percent; and
(b) For 1998 and thereafter, the percentage calculated as follows:
(i) Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior year times
the district's levy base determined under subsection (3) of this
section;
(ii) Reduce the result of (b)(i) of this subsection by any levy
reduction funds as defined in subsection (5) of this section that are
to be allocated to the district for the current school year;
(iii) Divide the result of (b)(ii) of this subsection by the
district's levy base; and
(iv) Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated in
(b)(iii) of this subsection.
(5) "Levy reduction funds" shall mean increases in state funds from
the prior school year for programs included under subsection (3) of
this section: (a) That are not attributable to enrollment changes,
compensation increases, or inflationary adjustments; and (b) that are
or were specifically identified as levy reduction funds in the
appropriations act. If levy reduction funds are dependent on formula
factors which would not be finalized until after the start of the
current school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall
estimate the total amount of levy reduction funds by using prior school
year data in place of current school year data. Levy reduction funds
shall not include moneys received by school districts from cities or
counties.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "prior school year" means the
most recent school year completed prior to the year in which the levies
are to be collected.
(7) For the purposes of this section, "current school year" means
the year immediately following the prior school year.
(8) Funds collected from transportation vehicle fund tax levies
shall not be subject to the levy limitations in this section.
(9) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop rules
((and regulations)) and inform school districts of the pertinent data
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 84.52 RCW
to read as follows:
For taxes levied for collection in 2011, the state must levy for
collection an additional levy rate of eighty-eight cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value upon the assessed valuation of all taxable
property within the state above the levy amount that would otherwise be
allowed under this chapter adjusted to the state equalized value in
accordance with the indicated ratio fixed by the department for the
support of common schools. After a levy authorized pursuant to this
section is made, the dollar amount of such levy must be used for the
purpose of computing the limitations in RCW 84.55.0101 for taxes levied
for collection under RCW 84.52.065 in calendar year 2012 and
thereafter.
As used in this section, "the support of common schools" has the
same definition as used in RCW 84.52.065.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
For school year 2011-12 and thereafter, the legislature shall
appropriate funds for distribution to school districts to ensure that
no school district receives total revenue that, as a result of chapter
. . ., Laws of 2010 (this act), is less than the total revenue from the
following sources received by the school district in school year 2010-11:
(1) Levies imposed under RCW 84.52.0531;
(2) State matching funds under RCW 28A.500.010;
(3) State funds for transportation under RCW 28A.160.192; and
(4) State funds for materials, supplies, and operating costs under
RCW 28A.150.260.

Sec. 9 2006 c 119 s 3 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
This act expires January 1, ((2012)) 2017.

Sec. 10 2009 c 4 s 909 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
Section 908 of this act expires January 1, ((2012)) 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Section 5 of this act expires January 1,
2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Section 6 of this act takes effect January
1, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Section 4 of this act takes effect
September 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 2009 c 548 s 805 (uncodified) is repealed.

--- END ---