BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that technological
changes have decreased the need for a central state printer.
Information to citizens is increasingly being provided in electronic
formats, which is both cost-effective and saves natural resources.
Additionally, as printing technologies have changed, they have become
within the reach of most agencies to conduct their own printing. The
legislature also finds that printing is not a core state service and
would be better handled within the private sector. To that end, the
legislature is eliminating the state printer.

Sec. 2 RCW 1.08.039 and 1955 c 235 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The committee may enter into contracts or otherwise arrange for the
publication and/or distribution, provided for in RCW 1.08.038, with or
without calling for bids((, by the public printer or by private
printer,)) upon specifications formulated under the authority of RCW
1.08.037, and upon such basis as the committee deems to be most
expeditious and economical. Any such contract may be upon such terms
as the committee deems to be most advantageous to the state and to
potential purchasers of such publications. The committee shall fix
terms and prices for such publications.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.300.040 and 2009 c 556 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to any other powers and duties as provided by law, the
powers and duties of the superintendent of public instruction shall be:
(1) To have supervision over all matters pertaining to the public
schools of the state;
(2) To report to the governor and the legislature such information
and data as may be required for the management and improvement of the
schools;
(3) To prepare and have printed such forms, registers, courses of
study, rules for the government of the common schools, and such other
material and books as may be necessary for the discharge of the duties
of teachers and officials charged with the administration of the laws
relating to the common schools, and to distribute the same to
educational service district superintendents;
(4) To travel, without neglecting his or her other official duties
as superintendent of public instruction, for the purpose of attending
educational meetings or conventions, of visiting schools, and of
consulting educational service district superintendents or other school
officials;
(5) To prepare and from time to time to revise a manual of the
Washington state common school code, copies of which shall be made
available online and which shall be sold at approximate actual cost of
publication and distribution per volume to public and nonpublic
agencies or individuals, said manual to contain Titles 28A and 28C RCW,
rules related to the common schools, and such other matter as the state
superintendent or the state board of education shall determine((.
Proceeds of the sale of such code shall be transmitted to the public
printer who shall credit the state superintendent's account within the
state printing plant revolving fund by a like amount));
(6) To file all papers, reports and public documents transmitted to
the superintendent by the school officials of the several counties or
districts of the state, each year separately. Copies of all papers
filed in the superintendent's office, and the superintendent's official
acts, may, or upon request, shall be certified by the superintendent
and attested by the superintendent's official seal, and when so
certified shall be evidence of the papers or acts so certified to;
(7) To require annually, on or before the 15th day of August, of
the president, manager, or principal of every educational institution
in this state, a report as required by the superintendent of public
instruction; and it is the duty of every president, manager, or
principal, to complete and return such forms within such time as the
superintendent of public instruction shall direct;
(8) To keep in the superintendent's office a record of all teachers
receiving certificates to teach in the common schools of this state;
(9) To issue certificates as provided by law;
(10) To keep in the superintendent's office at the capital of the
state, all books and papers pertaining to the business of the
superintendent's office, and to keep and preserve in the
superintendent's office a complete record of statistics, as well as a
record of the meetings of the state board of education;
(11) With the assistance of the office of the attorney general, to
decide all points of law which may be submitted to the superintendent
in writing by any educational service district superintendent, or that
may be submitted to the superintendent by any other person, upon appeal
from the decision of any educational service district superintendent;
and the superintendent shall publish his or her rulings and decisions
from time to time for the information of school officials and teachers;
and the superintendent's decision shall be final unless set aside by a
court of competent jurisdiction;
(12) To administer oaths and affirmations in the discharge of the
superintendent's official duties;
(13) To deliver to his or her successor, at the expiration of the
superintendent's term of office, all records, books, maps, documents
and papers of whatever kind belonging to the superintendent's office or
which may have been received by the superintendent's for the use of the
superintendent's office;
(14) To administer family services and programs to promote the
state's policy as provided in RCW 74.14A.025;
(15) To promote the adoption of school-based curricula and policies
that provide quality, daily physical education for all students, and to
encourage policies that provide all students with opportunities for
physical activity outside of formal physical education classes;
(16) To perform such other duties as may be required by law.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.10.029 and 2004 c 167 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An institution of higher education may exercise independently
those powers otherwise granted to the director of general
administration in chapter 43.19 RCW in connection with the purchase and
disposition of all material, supplies, services, and equipment needed
for the support, maintenance, and use of the respective institution of
higher education. Property disposition policies followed by
institutions of higher education shall be consistent with policies
followed by the department of general administration. Purchasing
policies and procedures followed by institutions of higher education
shall be in compliance with chapters 39.19, 39.29, and 43.03 RCW, and
RCW 43.19.1901, 43.19.1906, 43.19.1911, 43.19.1917, 43.19.1937,
43.19.534, 43.19.685, 43.19.700 through 43.19.704, and 43.19.560
through 43.19.637. The community and technical colleges shall comply
with RCW 43.19.450. Except for the University of Washington,
institutions of higher education shall comply with RCW 43.41.310,
43.41.290, and 43.41.350. If an institution of higher education can
satisfactorily demonstrate to the director of the office of financial
management that the cost of compliance is greater than the value of
benefits from any of the following statutes, then it shall be exempt
from them: RCW 43.19.685; 43.19.534; and 43.19.637. Any institution
of higher education that chooses to exercise independent purchasing
authority for a commodity or group of commodities shall notify the
director of general administration. Thereafter the director of general
administration shall not be required to provide those services for that
institution for the duration of the general administration contract
term for that commodity or group of commodities.
(2) The council of presidents and the state board for community and
technical colleges shall convene its correctional industries business
development advisory committee, and work collaboratively with
correctional industries, to:
(a) Reaffirm purchasing criteria and ensure that quality, service,
and timely delivery result in the best value for expenditure of state
dollars;
(b) Update the approved list of correctional industries products
from which higher education shall purchase; and
(c) Develop recommendations on ways to continue to build
correctional industries' business with institutions of higher
education.
(3) Higher education and correctional industries shall develop a
plan to build higher education business with correctional industries to
increase higher education purchases of correctional industries
products, based upon the criteria established in subsection (2) of this
section. The plan shall include the correctional industries'
production and sales goals for higher education and an approved list of
products from which higher education institutions shall purchase, based
on the criteria established in subsection (2) of this section. Higher
education and correctional industries shall report to the legislature
regarding the plan and its implementation no later than January 30,
2005.
(4) Institutions of higher education shall set as a target to
contract, beginning not later than June 30, 2006, to purchase one
percent of the total goods and services required by the institutions
each year produced or provided in whole or in part from class II inmate
work programs operated by the department of corrections. Institutions
of higher education shall set as a target to contract, beginning not
later than June 30, 2008, to purchase two percent of the total goods
and services required by the institutions each year produced or
provided in whole or in part from class II inmate work programs
operated by the department of corrections.
(((5) An institution of higher education may exercise independently
those powers otherwise granted to the public printer in chapter 43.78
RCW in connection with the production or purchase of any printing and
binding needed by the respective institution of higher education.
Purchasing policies and procedures followed by institutions of higher
education shall be in compliance with chapter 39.19 RCW. Any
institution of higher education that chooses to exercise independent
printing production or purchasing authority shall notify the public
printer. Thereafter the public printer shall not be required to
provide those services for that institution.))

Sec. 5 RCW 40.04.090 and 1995 c 24 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The house and senate journals shall be distributed and sold by the
chief clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary of the
senate as follows:
(1) Subject to subsection (5) of this section, sets shall be
distributed as follows: One to each requesting official whose office
is created by the Constitution, and one to each requesting state
department director; two copies to the state library; ten copies to the
state law library; two copies to the University of Washington library;
one to the King county law library; one to the Washington State
University library; one to the library of each of the regional
universities and to The Evergreen State College; one each to the law
library of any accredited law school in this state; and one to each
free public library in the state that requests it.
(2) House and senate journals of the preceding regular session
during an odd- or even-numbered year, and of any intervening special
session, shall be provided for use of legislators and legislative staff
in such numbers as directed by the chief clerk of the house of
representatives and secretary of the senate.
(3) Surplus sets of the house and senate journals shall be sold and
delivered by the chief clerk of the house of representatives and the
secretary of the senate at a price set by them after ((consulting with
the state printer to determine)) determining reasonable costs
associated with the production of the journals, and the proceeds
therefrom shall be paid to the state treasurer for the general fund.
(4) The chief clerk of the house of representatives and the
secretary of the senate may exchange copies of the house and senate
journals for similar journals of other states, territories, and
governments, or for other legal materials, and make such other and
further distribution of them as in their judgment seems proper.
(5) Periodically the chief clerk of the house of representatives
and the secretary of the senate may canvas those entitled to receive
copies under this section, and may reduce or eliminate the number of
copies distributed to anyone who so concurs.

Sec. 6 RCW 40.06.030 and 2006 c 199 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every state agency shall promptly submit to the state library
copies of published information that are state publications.
(a) For state publications available only in print format, each
state agency shall deposit, at a minimum, two copies of each of its
publications with the state library. For the purposes of broad public
access, state agencies may deposit additional copies with the state
library for distribution to additional depository libraries.
(b) For state publications available only in electronic format,
each state agency shall deposit one copy of each of its publications
with the state library.
(c) For state publications available in both print and electronic
format, each state agency shall deposit two print copies and one
electronic copy of the publication with the state library.
(2) Annually, each state agency shall provide the state library
with a listing of all its publications made available to state
government and the public during the preceding year, including those
published in electronic form. The secretary of state shall, by rule,
establish the annual date by which state agencies must provide the list
of its publications to the state library.
(3) In the interest of economy and efficiency, the state librarian
may specifically or by general rule exempt a given state publication or
class of publications from the requirements of this section in full or
in part.
(((4) Upon consent of the issuing state agency, such state
publications as are printed by the public printer shall be delivered
directly to the center.))

Sec. 7 RCW 41.06.070 and 2009 c 33 s 36 and 2009 c 5 s 1 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
(a) The members of the legislature or to any employee of, or
position in, the legislative branch of the state government including
members, officers, and employees of the legislative council, joint
legislative audit and review committee, statute law committee, and any
interim committee of the legislature;
(b) The justices of the supreme court, judges of the court of
appeals, judges of the superior courts or of the inferior courts, or to
any employee of, or position in the judicial branch of state
government;
(c) Officers, academic personnel, and employees of technical
colleges;
(d) The officers of the Washington state patrol;
(e) Elective officers of the state;
(f) The chief executive officer of each agency;
(g) In the departments of employment security and social and health
services, the director and the director's confidential secretary; in
all other departments, the executive head of which is an individual
appointed by the governor, the director, his or her confidential
secretary, and his or her statutory assistant directors;
(h) In the case of a multimember board, commission, or committee,
whether the members thereof are elected, appointed by the governor or
other authority, serve ex officio, or are otherwise chosen:
(i) All members of such boards, commissions, or committees;
(ii) If the members of the board, commission, or committee serve on
a part-time basis and there is a statutory executive officer: The
secretary of the board, commission, or committee; the chief executive
officer of the board, commission, or committee; and the confidential
secretary of the chief executive officer of the board, commission, or
committee;
(iii) If the members of the board, commission, or committee serve
on a full-time basis: The chief executive officer or administrative
officer as designated by the board, commission, or committee; and a
confidential secretary to the chair of the board, commission, or
committee;
(iv) If all members of the board, commission, or committee serve ex
officio: The chief executive officer; and the confidential secretary
of such chief executive officer;
(i) The confidential secretaries and administrative assistants in
the immediate offices of the elective officers of the state;
(j) Assistant attorneys general;
(k) Commissioned and enlisted personnel in the military service of
the state;
(l) Inmate, student, part-time, or temporary employees, and part-time professional consultants, as defined by the Washington personnel
resources board;
(m) ((The public printer or to any employees of or positions in the
state printing plant;
(n))) Officers and employees of the Washington state fruit
commission;
(((o))) (n) Officers and employees of the Washington apple
commission;
(((p))) (o) Officers and employees of the Washington state dairy
products commission;
(((q))) (p) Officers and employees of the Washington tree fruit
research commission;
(((r))) (q) Officers and employees of the Washington state beef
commission;
(((s))) (r) Officers and employees of the Washington grain
commission;
(((t))) (s) Officers and employees of any commission formed under
chapter 15.66 RCW;
(((u))) (t) Officers and employees of agricultural commissions
formed under chapter 15.65 RCW;
(((v))) (u) Officers and employees of the nonprofit corporation
formed under chapter 67.40 RCW;
(((w))) (v) Executive assistants for personnel administration and
labor relations in all state agencies employing such executive
assistants including but not limited to all departments, offices,
commissions, committees, boards, or other bodies subject to the
provisions of this chapter and this subsection shall prevail over any
provision of law inconsistent herewith unless specific exception is
made in such law;
(((x))) (w) In each agency with fifty or more employees: Deputy
agency heads, assistant directors or division directors, and not more
than three principal policy assistants who report directly to the
agency head or deputy agency heads;
(((y))) (x) All employees of the marine employees' commission;
(((z))) (y) Staff employed by the department of ((community, trade,
and economic development)) commerce to administer energy policy
functions and manage energy site evaluation council activities under
RCW 43.21F.045(2)(m);
(((aa))) (z) Staff employed by Washington State University to
administer energy education, applied research, and technology transfer
programs under RCW 43.21F.045 as provided in RCW 28B.30.900(5).
(2) The following classifications, positions, and employees of
institutions of higher education and related boards are hereby exempted
from coverage of this chapter:
(a) Members of the governing board of each institution of higher
education and related boards, all presidents, vice presidents, and
their confidential secretaries, administrative, and personal
assistants; deans, directors, and chairs; academic personnel; and
executive heads of major administrative or academic divisions employed
by institutions of higher education; principal assistants to executive
heads of major administrative or academic divisions; other managerial
or professional employees in an institution or related board having
substantial responsibility for directing or controlling program
operations and accountable for allocation of resources and program
results, or for the formulation of institutional policy, or for
carrying out personnel administration or labor relations functions,
legislative relations, public information, development, senior computer
systems and network programming, or internal audits and investigations;
and any employee of a community college district whose place of work is
one which is physically located outside the state of Washington and who
is employed pursuant to RCW 28B.50.092 and assigned to an educational
program operating outside of the state of Washington;
(b) The governing board of each institution, and related boards,
may also exempt from this chapter classifications involving research
activities, counseling of students, extension or continuing education
activities, graphic arts or publications activities requiring
prescribed academic preparation or special training as determined by
the board: PROVIDED, That no nonacademic employee engaged in office,
clerical, maintenance, or food and trade services may be exempted by
the board under this provision;
(c) Printing craft employees in the department of printing at the
University of Washington.
(3) In addition to the exemptions specifically provided by this
chapter, the director of personnel may provide for further exemptions
pursuant to the following procedures. The governor or other
appropriate elected official may submit requests for exemption to the
director of personnel stating the reasons for requesting such
exemptions. The director of personnel shall hold a public hearing,
after proper notice, on requests submitted pursuant to this subsection.
If the director determines that the position for which exemption is
requested is one involving substantial responsibility for the
formulation of basic agency or executive policy or one involving
directing and controlling program operations of an agency or a major
administrative division thereof, the director of personnel shall grant
the request and such determination shall be final as to any decision
made before July 1, 1993. The total number of additional exemptions
permitted under this subsection shall not exceed one percent of the
number of employees in the classified service not including employees
of institutions of higher education and related boards for those
agencies not directly under the authority of any elected public
official other than the governor, and shall not exceed a total of
twenty-five for all agencies under the authority of elected public
officials other than the governor.
The salary and fringe benefits of all positions presently or
hereafter exempted except for the chief executive officer of each
agency, full-time members of boards and commissions, administrative
assistants and confidential secretaries in the immediate office of an
elected state official, and the personnel listed in subsections (1)(j)
through (((v))) (u) and (((y))) (x) and (2) of this section, shall be
determined by the director of personnel. Changes to the classification
plan affecting exempt salaries must meet the same provisions for
classified salary increases resulting from adjustments to the
classification plan as outlined in RCW 41.06.152.
For the twelve months following February 18, 2009, a salary or wage
increase shall not be granted to any position exempt from
classification under this chapter.
Any person holding a classified position subject to the provisions
of this chapter shall, when and if such position is subsequently
exempted from the application of this chapter, be afforded the
following rights: If such person previously held permanent status in
another classified position, such person shall have a right of
reversion to the highest class of position previously held, or to a
position of similar nature and salary.
Any classified employee having civil service status in a classified
position who accepts an appointment in an exempt position shall have
the right of reversion to the highest class of position previously
held, or to a position of similar nature and salary.
A person occupying an exempt position who is terminated from the
position for gross misconduct or malfeasance does not have the right of
reversion to a classified position as provided for in this section.

Sec. 8 RCW 41.06.142 and 2008 c 267 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any department, agency, or institution of higher education may
purchase services, including services that have been customarily and
historically provided by employees in the classified service under this
chapter, by contracting with individuals, nonprofit organizations,
businesses, employee business units, or other entities if the following
criteria are met:
(a) The invitation for bid or request for proposal contains
measurable standards for the performance of the contract;
(b) Employees in the classified service whose positions or work
would be displaced by the contract are provided an opportunity to offer
alternatives to purchasing services by contract and, if these
alternatives are not accepted, compete for the contract under
competitive contracting procedures in subsection (4) of this section;
(c) The contract with an entity other than an employee business
unit includes a provision requiring the entity to consider employment
of state employees who may be displaced by the contract;
(d) The department, agency, or institution of higher education has
established a contract monitoring process to measure contract
performance, costs, service delivery quality, and other contract
standards, and to cancel contracts that do not meet those standards;
and
(e) The department, agency, or institution of higher education has
determined that the contract results in savings or efficiency
improvements. The contracting agency must consider the consequences
and potential mitigation of improper or failed performance by the
contractor.
(2) Any provision contrary to or in conflict with this section in
any collective bargaining agreement in effect on July 1, 2005, is not
effective beyond the expiration date of the agreement.
(3) Contracting for services that is expressly mandated by the
legislature or was authorized by law prior to July 1, 2005, including
contracts and agreements between public entities, shall not be subject
to the processes set forth in subsections (1), (4), and (5) of this
section.
(4) Competitive contracting shall be implemented as follows:
(a) At least ninety days prior to the date the contracting agency
requests bids from private entities for a contract for services
provided by classified employees, the contracting agency shall notify
the classified employees whose positions or work would be displaced by
the contract. The employees shall have sixty days from the date of
notification to offer alternatives to purchasing services by contract,
and the agency shall consider the alternatives before requesting bids.
(b) If the employees decide to compete for the contract, they shall
notify the contracting agency of their decision. Employees must form
one or more employee business units for the purpose of submitting a bid
or bids to perform the services.
(c) The director of personnel, with the advice and assistance of
the department of general administration, shall develop and make
available to employee business units training in the bidding process
and general bid preparation.
(d) The director of general administration, with the advice and
assistance of the department of personnel, shall, by rule, establish
procedures to ensure that bids are submitted and evaluated in a fair
and objective manner and that there exists a competitive market for the
service. Such rules shall include, but not be limited to: (i)
Prohibitions against participation in the bid evaluation process by
employees who prepared the business unit's bid or who perform any of
the services to be contracted; (ii) provisions to ensure no bidder
receives an advantage over other bidders and that bid requirements are
applied equitably to all parties; and (iii) procedures that require the
contracting agency to receive complaints regarding the bidding process
and to consider them before awarding the contract. Appeal of an
agency's actions under this subsection is an adjudicative proceeding
and subject to the applicable provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, the
administrative procedure act, with the final decision to be rendered by
an administrative law judge assigned under chapter 34.12 RCW.
(e) An employee business unit's bid must include the fully
allocated costs of the service, including the cost of the employees'
salaries and benefits, space, equipment, materials, and other costs
necessary to perform the function. An employee business unit's cost
shall not include the state's indirect overhead costs unless those
costs can be attributed directly to the function in question and would
not exist if that function were not performed in state service.
(f) A department, agency, or institution of higher education may
contract with the department of general administration to conduct the
bidding process.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) "Employee business unit" means a group of employees who perform
services to be contracted under this section and who submit a bid for
the performance of those services under subsection (4) of this section.
(b) "Indirect overhead costs" means the pro rata share of existing
agency administrative salaries and benefits, and rent, equipment costs,
utilities, and materials associated with those administrative
functions.
(c) "Competitive contracting" means the process by which classified
employees of a department, agency, or institution of higher education
compete with businesses, individuals, nonprofit organizations, or other
entities for contracts authorized by subsection (1) of this section.
(6) The requirements of this section do not apply to RCW
74.13.031(5) or the acquisition of printing services by a state agency.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.08.061 and 1993 c 38 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The public printer shall print all state treasury warrants for
distribution as directed by the state treasurer.)) The state treasurer
is responsible for printing all state treasury warrants. All warrants
redeemed by the state treasurer shall be retained for a period of one
year, following their redemption, after which they may be destroyed
without regard to the requirements imposed for their destruction by
chapter 40.14 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 43.78.010 (Appointment of public printer) and 2009 c 549 s
5146, 1981 c 338 s 6, & 1965 c 8 s 43.78.010;
(2) RCW 43.78.020 (Bond) and 2009 c 549 s 5147 & 1965 c 8 s
43.78.020;
(3) RCW 43.78.030 (Duties -- Exceptions) and 1994 c 82 s 1, 1993 c
379 s 104, 1988 c 102 s 1, 1987 c 72 s 1, 1982 c 164 s 2, 1971 c 81 s
114, & 1965 c 8 s 43.78.030;
(4) RCW 43.78.040 (Requisitions) and 1965 c 8 s 43.78.040;
(5) RCW 43.78.050 (Itemized statement of charges) and 1965 c 8 s
43.78.050;
(6) RCW 43.78.070 (Use of state plant -- Conditions -- Public printer's
salary) and 2009 c 549 s 5148, 1979 c 151 s 134, & 1965 c 8 s
43.78.070;
(7) RCW 43.78.080 (Printing specifications) and 1972 ex.s. c 1 s 1,
1969 c 6 s 7, & 1965 c 8 s 43.78.080;
(8) RCW 43.78.090 (Reprinting) and 1965 c 8 s 43.78.090;
(9) RCW 43.78.100 (Stock to be furnished) and 1993 c 379 s 106 &
1965 c 8 s 43.78.100;
(10) RCW 43.78.105 (Printing for institutions of higher education--Interlocal agreements) and 1993 c 379 s 105;
(11) RCW 43.78.110 (Securing printing from private sources--Definitions) and 2009 c 486 s 12, 1993 c 379 s 107, 1982 c 164 s 3,
1969 c 79 s 1, & 1965 c 8 s 43.78.110;
(12) RCW 43.78.170 (Recycled copy and printing paper requirement)
and 2009 c 356 s 5, 1996 c 198 s 3, & 1991 c 297 s 10;
(13) RCW 15.24.085 (Promotional printing not restricted by public
printer laws) and 2002 c 313 s 121 & 1961 c 11 s 15.24.085;
(14) RCW 15.62.190 (Promotional printing and literature -- Exempt
from public printing requirements) and 1989 c 5 s 19;
(15) RCW 16.67.170 (Promotional printing not restricted by public
printer laws) and 1969 c 133 s 16;
(16) RCW 40.04.030 (Session laws, legislative journals, supreme
court and court of appeals reports -- Duties of public printer,
publisher) and 1995 c 24 s 1, 1971 c 42 s 2, & 1941 c 150 s 3; and
(17) RCW 40.07.050 (Prohibition of state publications not in
accordance with RCW 40.07.030 -- Exceptions) and 1986 c 158 s 5 & 1977
ex.s. c 232 s 5.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The printer shall coordinate with the
department of general administration to sell or surplus all equipment.
The department of general administration shall develop a plan for
disposing of or leasing the state plant building. This plan is due to
the legislature by December 15, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---