BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.40.150 and 1998 c 86 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In disposition hearings all relevant and material evidence,
including oral and written reports, may be received by the court and
may be relied upon to the extent of its probative value, even though
such evidence may not be admissible in a hearing on the information.
The youth or the youth's counsel and the prosecuting attorney shall be
afforded an opportunity to examine and controvert written reports so
received and to cross-examine individuals making reports when such
individuals are reasonably available, but sources of confidential
information need not be disclosed. The prosecutor and counsel for the
juvenile may submit recommendations for disposition.
(2) For purposes of disposition:
(a) Violations which are current offenses count as misdemeanors;
(b) Violations may not count as part of the offender's criminal
history;
(c) In no event may a disposition for a violation include
confinement.
(3) Before entering a dispositional order as to a respondent found
to have committed an offense, the court shall hold a disposition
hearing, at which the court shall:
(a) Consider the facts supporting the allegations of criminal
conduct by the respondent;
(b) Consider information and arguments offered by parties and their
counsel;
(c) Consider any predisposition reports;
(d) Consult with the respondent's parent, guardian, or custodian on
the appropriateness of dispositional options under consideration and
afford the respondent and the respondent's parent, guardian, or
custodian an opportunity to speak in the respondent's behalf;
(e) Allow the victim or a representative of the victim and an
investigative law enforcement officer to speak;
(f) Determine the amount of restitution owing to the victim, if
any, or set a hearing for a later date not to exceed one hundred eighty
days from the date of the disposition hearing to determine the amount,
except that the court may continue the hearing beyond the one hundred
eighty days for good cause;
(g) Determine the respondent's offender score;
(h) Consider whether or not any of the following mitigating factors
exist:
(i) The respondent's conduct neither caused nor threatened serious
bodily injury or the respondent did not contemplate that his or her
conduct would cause or threaten serious bodily injury;
(ii) The respondent acted under strong and immediate provocation;
(iii) The respondent was suffering from a mental or physical
condition that significantly reduced his or her culpability for the
offense though failing to establish a defense;
(iv) Prior to his or her detection, the respondent compensated or
made a good faith attempt to compensate the victim for the injury or
loss sustained; and
(v) There has been at least one year between the respondent's
current offense and any prior criminal offense;
(i) Consider whether or not any of the following aggravating
factors exist:
(i) In the commission of the offense, or in flight therefrom, the
respondent inflicted or attempted to inflict serious bodily injury to
another;
(ii) The offense was committed in an especially heinous, cruel, or
depraved manner;
(iii) The victim or victims were particularly vulnerable;
(iv) The respondent has a recent criminal history or has failed to
comply with conditions of a recent dispositional order or diversion
agreement;
(v) The current offense included a finding of sexual motivation
pursuant to RCW 13.40.135;
(vi) The respondent was the leader of a criminal enterprise
involving several persons;
(vii) There are other complaints which have resulted in diversion
or a finding or plea of guilty but which are not included as criminal
history; and
(viii) The standard range disposition is clearly too lenient
considering the seriousness of the juvenile's prior adjudications.
(4) The following factors may not be considered in determining the
punishment to be imposed:
(a) The sex of the respondent;
(b) The race or color of the respondent or the respondent's family;
(c) The creed or religion of the respondent or the respondent's
family;
(d) The economic or social class of the respondent or the
respondent's family; ((and))
(e) Factors indicating that the respondent may be or is a dependent
child within the meaning of this chapter; and
(f) The offender's primary need for inpatient or structured mental
health or chemical dependency treatment, other than for sex offender
treatment.
(5) A court may not commit a juvenile to a state institution solely
because of the lack of facilities, including treatment facilities,
existing in the community.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.40.160 and 2007 c 199 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The standard range disposition for a juvenile adjudicated of an
offense is determined according to RCW 13.40.0357.
(a) When the court sentences an offender to a local sanction as
provided in RCW 13.40.0357 option A, the court shall impose a
determinate disposition within the standard ranges, except as provided
in subsection (2), (3), (4), or (5)((, or (6))) of this section. The
disposition may be comprised of one or more local sanctions.
(b) When the court sentences an offender to a standard range as
provided in RCW 13.40.0357 option A that includes a term of confinement
exceeding thirty days, commitment shall be to the department for the
standard range of confinement, except as provided in subsection (2),
(3), (4), or (5)((, or (6))) of this section.
(2) If the court concludes, and enters reasons for its conclusion,
that disposition within the standard range would effectuate a manifest
injustice the court shall impose a disposition outside the standard
range, as indicated in option D of RCW 13.40.0357. The court's finding
of manifest injustice shall be supported by clear and convincing
evidence and cannot be based solely upon the offender's need for
inpatient, structured mental health or chemical dependency treatment,
other than sex offender treatment, unless the juvenile is being
sentenced in a rural area of the state in which there are no available
mental health or chemical dependency treatment resources.
A disposition outside the standard range shall be determinate and
shall be comprised of confinement or community supervision, or a
combination thereof. When a judge finds a manifest injustice and
imposes a sentence of confinement exceeding thirty days, the court
shall sentence the juvenile to a maximum term, and the provisions of
RCW 13.40.030(2) shall be used to determine the range. A disposition
outside the standard range is appealable under RCW 13.40.230 by the
state or the respondent. A disposition within the standard range is
not appealable under RCW 13.40.230.
(3) When a juvenile offender is found to have committed a sex
offense, other than a sex offense that is also a serious violent
offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030, and has no history of a prior sex
offense, the court, on its own motion or the motion of the state or the
respondent, may order an examination to determine whether the
respondent is amenable to treatment.
The report of the examination shall include at a minimum the
following: The respondent's version of the facts and the official
version of the facts, the respondent's offense history, an assessment
of problems in addition to alleged deviant behaviors, the respondent's
social, educational, and employment situation, and other evaluation
measures used. The report shall set forth the sources of the
evaluator's information.
The examiner shall assess and report regarding the respondent's
amenability to treatment and relative risk to the community. A
proposed treatment plan shall be provided and shall include, at a
minimum:
(a)(i) Frequency and type of contact between the offender and
therapist;
(ii) Specific issues to be addressed in the treatment and
description of planned treatment modalities;
(iii) Monitoring plans, including any requirements regarding living
conditions, lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by family members,
legal guardians, or others;
(iv) Anticipated length of treatment; and
(v) Recommended crime-related prohibitions.
The court on its own motion may order, or on a motion by the state
shall order, a second examination regarding the offender's amenability
to treatment. The evaluator shall be selected by the party making the
motion. The defendant shall pay the cost of any second examination
ordered unless the court finds the defendant to be indigent in which
case the state shall pay the cost.
After receipt of reports of the examination, the court shall then
consider whether the offender and the community will benefit from use
of this special sex offender disposition alternative and consider the
victim's opinion whether the offender should receive a treatment
disposition under this section. If the court determines that this
special sex offender disposition alternative is appropriate, then the
court shall impose a determinate disposition within the standard range
for the offense, or if the court concludes, and enters reasons for its
conclusions, that such disposition would cause a manifest injustice,
the court shall impose a disposition under option D, and the court may
suspend the execution of the disposition and place the offender on
community supervision for at least two years. As a condition of the
suspended disposition, the court may impose the conditions of community
supervision and other conditions, including up to thirty days of
confinement and requirements that the offender do any one or more of
the following:
(b)(i) Devote time to a specific education, employment, or
occupation;
(ii) Undergo available outpatient sex offender treatment for up to
two years, or inpatient sex offender treatment not to exceed the
standard range of confinement for that offense. A community mental
health center may not be used for such treatment unless it has an
appropriate program designed for sex offender treatment. The
respondent shall not change sex offender treatment providers or
treatment conditions without first notifying the prosecutor, the
probation counselor, and the court, and shall not change providers
without court approval after a hearing if the prosecutor or probation
counselor object to the change;
(iii) Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify
the court or the probation counselor prior to any change in the
offender's address, educational program, or employment;
(iv) Report to the prosecutor and the probation counselor prior to
any change in a sex offender treatment provider. This change shall
have prior approval by the court;
(v) Report as directed to the court and a probation counselor;
(vi) Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations, perform
community restitution, or any combination thereof;
(vii) Make restitution to the victim for the cost of any counseling
reasonably related to the offense;
(viii) Comply with the conditions of any court-ordered probation
bond; or
(ix) The court shall order that the offender shall not attend the
public or approved private elementary, middle, or high school attended
by the victim or the victim's siblings. The parents or legal guardians
of the offender are responsible for transportation or other costs
associated with the offender's change of school that would otherwise be
paid by the school district. The court shall send notice of the
disposition and restriction on attending the same school as the victim
or victim's siblings to the public or approved private school the
juvenile will attend, if known, or if unknown, to the approved private
schools and the public school district board of directors of the
district in which the juvenile resides or intends to reside. This
notice must be sent at the earliest possible date but not later than
ten calendar days after entry of the disposition.
The sex offender treatment provider shall submit quarterly reports
on the respondent's progress in treatment to the court and the parties.
The reports shall reference the treatment plan and include at a minimum
the following: Dates of attendance, respondent's compliance with
requirements, treatment activities, the respondent's relative progress
in treatment, and any other material specified by the court at the time
of the disposition.
At the time of the disposition, the court may set treatment review
hearings as the court considers appropriate.
Except as provided in this subsection (3), after July 1, 1991,
examinations and treatment ordered pursuant to this subsection shall
only be conducted by certified sex offender treatment providers or
certified affiliate sex offender treatment providers under chapter
18.155 RCW. A sex offender therapist who examines or treats a juvenile
sex offender pursuant to this subsection does not have to be certified
by the department of health pursuant to chapter 18.155 RCW if the court
finds that: (A) The offender has already moved to another state or
plans to move to another state for reasons other than circumventing the
certification requirements; (B) no certified sex offender treatment
providers or certified affiliate sex offender treatment providers are
available for treatment within a reasonable geographical distance of
the offender's home; and (C) the evaluation and treatment plan comply
with this subsection (3) and the rules adopted by the department of
health.
If the offender violates any condition of the disposition or the
court finds that the respondent is failing to make satisfactory
progress in treatment, the court may revoke the suspension and order
execution of the disposition or the court may impose a penalty of up to
thirty days' confinement for violating conditions of the disposition.
The court may order both execution of the disposition and up to thirty
days' confinement for the violation of the conditions of the
disposition. The court shall give credit for any confinement time
previously served if that confinement was for the offense for which the
suspension is being revoked.
For purposes of this section, "victim" means any person who has
sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to
person or property as a direct result of the crime charged. "Victim"
may also include a known parent or guardian of a victim who is a minor
child unless the parent or guardian is the perpetrator of the offense.
A disposition entered under this subsection (3) is not appealable
under RCW 13.40.230.
(4) If the juvenile offender is subject to a standard range
disposition of local sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has
not committed an A- or B+ offense, the court may impose the disposition
alternative under RCW 13.40.165.
(5) If a juvenile is subject to a commitment of 15 to 65 weeks of
confinement, the court may impose the disposition alternative under RCW
13.40.167.
(6) ((When the offender is subject to a standard range commitment
of 15 to 36 weeks and is ineligible for a suspended disposition
alternative, a manifest injustice disposition below the standard range,
special sex offender disposition alternative, chemical dependency
disposition alternative, or mental health disposition alternative, the
court in a county with a pilot program under RCW 13.40.169 may impose
the disposition alternative under RCW 13.40.169.
(7))) RCW 13.40.193 shall govern the disposition of any juvenile
adjudicated of possessing a firearm in violation of RCW
9.41.040(2)(a)(iii) or any crime in which a special finding is entered
that the juvenile was armed with a firearm.
(((8))) (7) RCW 13.40.308 shall govern the disposition of any
juvenile adjudicated of theft of a motor vehicle as defined under RCW
9A.56.065, possession of a stolen motor vehicle as defined under RCW
9A.56.068, taking a motor vehicle without permission in the first
degree under RCW 9A.56.070, and taking a motor vehicle without
permission in the second degree under RCW 9A.56.075.
(((9))) (8) Whenever a juvenile offender is entitled to credit for
time spent in detention prior to a dispositional order, the
dispositional order shall specifically state the number of days of
credit for time served.
(((10))) (9) Except as provided under subsection (3), (4), or
(5)((, or (6))) of this section, or option B of RCW 13.40.0357, or RCW
13.40.127, the court shall not suspend or defer the imposition or the
execution of the disposition.
(((11))) (10) In no case shall the term of confinement imposed by
the court at disposition exceed that to which an adult could be
subjected for the same offense.

Sec. 3 RCW 13.40.165 and 2004 c 120 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The purpose of this disposition alternative is to ensure that
successful treatment options to reduce recidivism are available to
eligible youth, pursuant to RCW 70.96A.520. The court must consider
eligibility for the chemical dependency disposition alternative when a
juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition of local
sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not committed an A-or B+ offense, other than a first time B+ offense under chapter 69.50
RCW. The court, on its own motion or the motion of the state or the
respondent if the evidence shows that the offender may be chemically
dependent or substance abusing, may order an examination by a chemical
dependency counselor from a chemical dependency treatment facility
approved under chapter 70.96A RCW to determine if the youth is
chemically dependent or substance abusing. The offender shall pay the
cost of any examination ordered under this subsection unless the court
finds that the offender is indigent and no third party insurance
coverage is available, in which case the state shall pay the cost.
(2) The report of the examination shall include at a minimum the
following: The respondent's version of the facts and the official
version of the facts, the respondent's offense history, an assessment
of drug-alcohol problems and previous treatment attempts, the
respondent's social, educational, and employment situation, and other
evaluation measures used. The report shall set forth the sources of
the examiner's information.
(3) The examiner shall assess and report regarding the respondent's
relative risk to the community. A proposed treatment plan shall be
provided and shall include, at a minimum:
(a) Whether inpatient and/or outpatient treatment is recommended;
(b) Availability of appropriate treatment;
(c) Monitoring plans, including any requirements regarding living
conditions, lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by family members,
legal guardians, or others;
(d) Anticipated length of treatment; and
(e) Recommended crime-related prohibitions.
(4) The court on its own motion may order, or on a motion by the
state or the respondent shall order, a second examination. The
evaluator shall be selected by the party making the motion. The
requesting party shall pay the cost of any examination ordered under
this subsection unless the requesting party is the offender and the
court finds that the offender is indigent and no third party insurance
coverage is available, in which case the state shall pay the cost.
(5)(a) After receipt of reports of the examination, the court shall
then consider whether the offender and the community will benefit from
use of this chemical dependency disposition alternative and consider
the victim's opinion whether the offender should receive a treatment
disposition under this section.
(b) If the court determines that this chemical dependency
disposition alternative is appropriate, then the court shall impose the
standard range for the offense, or if the court concludes, and enters
reasons for its conclusion, that such disposition would effectuate a
manifest injustice, the court shall impose a disposition above the
standard range as indicated in option D of RCW 13.40.0357 if the
disposition is an increase from the standard range and the confinement
of the offender does not exceed a maximum of fifty-two weeks, suspend
execution of the disposition, and place the offender on community
supervision for up to one year. The manifest injustice disposition
under this section shall not be based solely upon the likelihood that
the offender will not be successful under this disposition alternative
or upon the offender's need or continued need for inpatient or
structured substance abuse treatment, unless the juvenile is being
sentenced in a rural area of the state in which there are no available
mental health or chemical dependency treatment resources. As a
condition of the suspended disposition, the court shall require the
offender to undergo available outpatient drug/alcohol treatment and/or
inpatient drug/alcohol treatment. For purposes of this section,
inpatient treatment may not exceed ninety days. As a condition of the
suspended disposition, the court may impose conditions of community
supervision and other sanctions, including up to thirty days of
confinement, one hundred fifty hours of community restitution, and
payment of legal financial obligations and restitution.
(6) The drug/alcohol treatment provider shall submit monthly
reports on the respondent's progress in treatment to the court and the
parties. The reports shall reference the treatment plan and include at
a minimum the following: Dates of attendance, respondent's compliance
with requirements, treatment activities, the respondent's relative
progress in treatment, and any other material specified by the court at
the time of the disposition.
At the time of the disposition, the court may set treatment review
hearings as the court considers appropriate.
If the offender violates any condition of the disposition or the
court finds that the respondent is failing to make satisfactory
progress in treatment, the court may impose sanctions pursuant to RCW
13.40.200 or revoke the suspension and order execution of the
disposition. The court shall give credit for any confinement time
previously served if that confinement was for the offense for which the
suspension is being revoked.
(7) For purposes of this section, "victim" means any person who has
sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to
person or property as a direct result of the offense charged. "Victim"
may also include a known parent or guardian of a victim who is a minor
child or is not a minor child but is incapacitated, incompetent,
disabled, or deceased.
(8) Whenever a juvenile offender is entitled to credit for time
spent in detention prior to a dispositional order, the dispositional
order shall specifically state the number of days of credit for time
served.
(9) In no case shall the term of confinement imposed by the court
at disposition exceed that to which an adult could be subjected for the
same offense.
(10) A disposition under this section is not appealable under RCW
13.40.230.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW
to read as follows:
All offenders incarcerated in a facility operated by the department
who would not have been incarcerated but for a manifest injustice
finding based solely upon the juvenile's need for structured, inpatient
mental health or chemical dependency treatment shall be paroled as of
the effective date of this act if the juvenile has completed his or her
treatment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---