BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.23.035 and 2007 c 143 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services shall adopt rules
for the distribution of support money collected by the division of
child support. These rules shall:
(a) Comply with Title IV-D of the federal social security act as
amended by the personal responsibility and work opportunity
reconciliation act of 1996 and the federal deficit reduction act of
2005;
(b) Direct the division of child support to distribute support
money within eight days of receipt, unless one of the following
circumstances, or similar circumstances specified in the rules,
prevents prompt distribution:
(i) The location of the custodial parent is unknown;
(ii) The support debt is in litigation;
(iii) The division of child support cannot identify the responsible
parent or the custodian;
(c) Provide for proportionate distribution of support payments if
the responsible parent owes a support obligation or a support debt for
two or more Title IV-D cases; and
(d) Authorize the distribution of support money, except money
collected under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 664, to satisfy a support debt owed to
the IV-D custodian before the debt owed to the state when the custodian
stops receiving a public assistance grant.
(2) The division of child support may distribute support payments
to the payee under the support order or to another person who has
lawful physical custody of the child or custody with the payee's
consent. The payee may file an application for an adjudicative
proceeding to challenge distribution to such other person. Prior to
distributing support payments to any person other than the payee, the
registry shall:
(a) Obtain a written statement from the child's physical custodian,
under penalty of perjury, that the custodian has lawful custody of the
child or custody with the payee's consent;
(b) Mail to the responsible parent and to the payee at the payee's
last known address a copy of the physical custodian's statement and a
notice which states that support payments will be sent to the physical
custodian; and
(c) File a copy of the notice with the clerk of the court that
entered the original support order.
(3) If the Washington state support registry distributes a support
payment to a person in error, the registry may obtain restitution by
means of a set-off against future payments received on behalf of the
person receiving the erroneous payment, or may act according to RCW
74.20A.270 as deemed appropriate. Any set-off against future support
payments shall be limited to amounts collected on the support debt and
ten percent of amounts collected as current support.
(4) The division of child support shall ensure that the fifty
dollar pass through payment, as required by 42 U.S.C. Sec. 657 before
the adoption of P.L. 104-193, is terminated immediately upon July 27,
1997, and all rules to the contrary adopted before July 27, 1997, are
without force and effect.
(5) ((Effective October 1, 2008,)) Until June 30, 2013, consistent
with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 657(a) as amended by section 7301(b)(7)(B) of the
federal deficit reduction act of 2005, the department shall pass
through child support that does not exceed fifty dollars per month
collected on behalf of the family. The department has rule-making
authority to implement this subsection.
(6) After June 30, 2013, consistent with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 657(a) as
amended by section 7301(b)(7)(B) of the federal deficit reduction act
of 2005, the department shall pass through child support that does not
exceed one hundred dollars per month collected on behalf of a family,
or in the case of a family that includes two or more children, an
amount that is not more than two hundred dollars per month. The
department has rule-making authority to implement this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---