BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.09.050 and 2009 c 409 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Within forty-five days after the completion of any hearing held
pursuant to RCW 71.09.040, the court shall conduct a trial to determine
whether the person is a sexually violent predator. The trial may be
continued upon the request of either party and a showing of good cause,
or by the court on its own motion in the due administration of justice,
and when the respondent will not be substantially prejudiced. The
department is responsible for the cost of one expert or professional
person to conduct an evaluation on the prosecuting agency's behalf. At
all stages of the proceedings under this chapter, any person subject to
this chapter shall be entitled to the assistance of counsel, and if the
person is indigent, the court shall appoint counsel to assist him or
her. The person shall be confined in a secure facility for the
duration of the trial.
(2) Whenever any person is subjected to an ((examination))
evaluation under this chapter, ((he or she may retain)) the department
is responsible for the cost of one expert((s)) or professional
person((s to perform an examination)) to conduct an evaluation on
((their)) the person's behalf. When the person wishes to be
((examined)) evaluated by a qualified expert or professional person of
his or her own choice, ((such examiner shall)) the expert or
professional person must be permitted to have reasonable access to the
person for the purpose of such ((examination)) evaluation, as well as
to all relevant medical and psychological records and reports. In the
case of a person who is indigent, the court shall, upon the person's
request, assist the person in obtaining an expert or professional
person to perform an ((examination)) evaluation or participate in the
trial on the person's behalf. Nothing in this chapter precludes the
person from paying for additional expert services at his or her own
expense.
(3) The person, the prosecuting agency, or the judge shall have the
right to demand that the trial be before a twelve-person jury. If no
demand is made, the trial shall be before the court.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.09.090 and 2009 c 409 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the secretary determines that the person's condition has so
changed that either: (a) The person no longer meets the definition of
a sexually violent predator; or (b) conditional release to a less
restrictive alternative is in the best interest of the person and
conditions can be imposed that adequately protect the community, the
secretary shall authorize the person to petition the court for
conditional release to a less restrictive alternative or unconditional
discharge. The petition shall be filed with the court and served upon
the prosecuting agency responsible for the initial commitment. The
court, upon receipt of the petition for conditional release to a less
restrictive alternative or unconditional discharge, shall within forty-five days order a hearing.
(2)(a) Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit the person
from otherwise petitioning the court for conditional release to a less
restrictive alternative or unconditional discharge without the
secretary's approval. The secretary shall provide the committed person
with an annual written notice of the person's right to petition the
court for conditional release to a less restrictive alternative or
unconditional discharge over the secretary's objection. The notice
shall contain a waiver of rights. The secretary shall file the notice
and waiver form and the annual report with the court. If the person
does not affirmatively waive the right to petition, the court shall set
a show cause hearing to determine whether probable cause exists to
warrant a hearing on whether the person's condition has so changed
that: (i) He or she no longer meets the definition of a sexually
violent predator; or (ii) conditional release to a proposed less
restrictive alternative would be in the best interest of the person and
conditions can be imposed that would adequately protect the community.
(b) The committed person shall have a right to have an attorney
represent him or her at the show cause hearing, which may be conducted
solely on the basis of affidavits or declarations, but the person is
not entitled to be present at the show cause hearing. At the show
cause hearing, the prosecuting attorney or attorney general shall
present prima facie evidence establishing that the committed person
continues to meet the definition of a sexually violent predator and
that a less restrictive alternative is not in the best interest of the
person and conditions cannot be imposed that adequately protect the
community. In making this showing, the state may rely exclusively upon
the annual report prepared pursuant to RCW 71.09.070. The committed
person may present responsive affidavits or declarations to which the
state may reply.
(c) If the court at the show cause hearing determines that either:
(i) The state has failed to present prima facie evidence that the
committed person continues to meet the definition of a sexually violent
predator and that no proposed less restrictive alternative is in the
best interest of the person and conditions cannot be imposed that would
adequately protect the community; or (ii) probable cause exists to
believe that the person's condition has so changed that: (A) The
person no longer meets the definition of a sexually violent predator;
or (B) release to a proposed less restrictive alternative would be in
the best interest of the person and conditions can be imposed that
would adequately protect the community, then the court shall set a
hearing on either or both issues.
(d) If the court has not previously considered the issue of release
to a less restrictive alternative, either through a trial on the merits
or through the procedures set forth in RCW 71.09.094(1), the court
shall consider whether release to a less restrictive alternative would
be in the best interests of the person and conditions can be imposed
that would adequately protect the community, without considering
whether the person's condition has changed. The court may not find
probable cause for a trial addressing less restrictive alternatives
unless a proposed less restrictive alternative placement meeting the
conditions of RCW 71.09.092 is presented to the court at the show cause
hearing.
(3)(a) At the hearing resulting from subsection (1) or (2) of this
section, the committed person shall be entitled to be present and to
the benefit of all constitutional protections that were afforded to the
person at the initial commitment proceeding. The prosecuting agency
shall represent the state and shall have a right to a jury trial and to
have the committed person evaluated by experts chosen by the state.
The department is responsible for the cost of one expert or
professional person to conduct an evaluation on the prosecuting
agency's behalf. The committed person shall also have the right to a
jury trial and the right to have experts evaluate him or her on his or
her behalf and the court shall appoint an expert if the person is
indigent and requests an appointment.
(b) Whenever any person is subjected to an evaluation under (a) of
this subsection, the department is responsible for the cost of one
expert or professional person conducting an evaluation on the person's
behalf. When the person wishes to be evaluated by a qualified expert
or professional person of his or her own choice, such expert or
professional person must be permitted to have reasonable access to the
person for the purpose of such evaluation, as well as to all relevant
medical and psychological records and reports. In the case of a person
who is indigent, the court shall, upon the person's request, assist the
person in obtaining an expert or professional person to perform an
evaluation or participate in the hearing on the person's behalf.
Nothing in this chapter precludes the person from paying for additional
expert services at his or her own expense.
(c) If the issue at the hearing is whether the person should be
unconditionally discharged, the burden of proof shall be upon the state
to prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the committed person's
condition remains such that the person continues to meet the definition
of a sexually violent predator. Evidence of the prior commitment trial
and disposition is admissible. The recommitment proceeding shall
otherwise proceed as set forth in RCW 71.09.050 and 71.09.060.
(((c))) (d) If the issue at the hearing is whether the person
should be conditionally released to a less restrictive alternative, the
burden of proof at the hearing shall be upon the state to prove beyond
a reasonable doubt that conditional release to any proposed less
restrictive alternative either: (i) Is not in the best interest of the
committed person; or (ii) does not include conditions that would
adequately protect the community. Evidence of the prior commitment
trial and disposition is admissible.
(4)(a) Probable cause exists to believe that a person's condition
has "so changed," under subsection (2) of this section, only when
evidence exists, since the person's last commitment trial, or less
restrictive alternative revocation proceeding, of a substantial change
in the person's physical or mental condition such that the person
either no longer meets the definition of a sexually violent predator or
that a conditional release to a less restrictive alternative is in the
person's best interest and conditions can be imposed to adequately
protect the community.
(b) A new trial proceeding under subsection (3) of this section may
be ordered, or a trial proceeding may be held, only when there is
current evidence from a licensed professional of one of the following
and the evidence presents a change in condition since the person's last
commitment trial proceeding:
(i) An identified physiological change to the person, such as
paralysis, stroke, or dementia, that renders the committed person
unable to commit a sexually violent act and this change is permanent;
or
(ii) A change in the person's mental condition brought about
through positive response to continuing participation in treatment
which indicates that the person meets the standard for conditional
release to a less restrictive alternative or that the person would be
safe to be at large if unconditionally released from commitment.
(c) For purposes of this section, a change in a single demographic
factor, without more, does not establish probable cause for a new trial
proceeding under subsection (3) of this section. As used in this
section, a single demographic factor includes, but is not limited to,
a change in the chronological age, marital status, or gender of the
committed person.
(5) The jurisdiction of the court over a person civilly committed
pursuant to this chapter continues until such time as the person is
unconditionally discharged.

Sec. 3 RCW 71.09.110 and 1995 c 216 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of social and health services shall be responsible
for all costs relating to the evaluation and treatment of persons
committed to their custody whether in a secure facility or under a less
restrictive alternative under any provision of this chapter. The
secretary shall adopt rules to contain costs relating to reimbursement
for evaluation services. Reimbursement may be obtained by the
department for the cost of care and treatment of persons committed to
its custody whether in a secure facility or under a less restrictive
alternative pursuant to RCW 43.20B.330 through 43.20B.370.

Sec. 4 RCW 71.09.300 and 2003 c 216 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Secure community transition facilities shall meet the following
minimum staffing requirements:
(1)(((a) At any time the census of a facility that accepts its
first resident before July 1, 2003, is six or fewer residents, the
facility shall maintain a minimum staffing ratio of one staff per three
residents during normal waking hours and one awake staff per four
residents during normal sleeping hours. In no case shall the staffing
ratio permit less than two staff per housing unit.
(b) At any time the census of a facility that accepts its first
resident on or after July 1, 2003, is six or fewer residents, the
facility shall maintain a minimum staffing ratio of one staff per
resident during normal waking hours and two awake staff per three
residents during normal sleeping hours. In no case shall the staffing
ratio permit less than two staff per housing unit.
(2) At any time the census of a facility is six or fewer residents,
all staff shall be classified as residential rehabilitation counselor
II or have a classification that indicates an equivalent or higher
level of skill, experience, and training.
(3))) Before being assigned to a facility, all staff shall have
training in sex offender issues, self-defense, and crisis de-escalation
skills in addition to departmental orientation and, as appropriate,
management training. All staff with resident treatment or care duties
must participate in ongoing in-service training.
(((4))) (2) All staff must pass a departmental background check and
the check is not subject to the limitations in chapter 9.96A RCW. A
person who has been convicted of a felony, or any sex offense, may not
be employed at the secure community transition facility or be approved
as an escort for a resident of the facility.

--- END ---