BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.24.020 and 2009 c 479 s 66 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is levied and ((there shall be)) collected as provided in
this chapter, a tax upon the sale, use, consumption, handling,
possession, or distribution of all cigarettes, in an amount equal to
((one and fifteen one-hundredths)) 12.125 cents per cigarette. All
revenues collected from the tax in this section must be deposited into
the state general fund.
(2) ((An additional tax is imposed upon the sale, use, consumption,
handling, possession, or distribution of all cigarettes, in an amount
equal to five hundred twenty-five one-thousandths of a cent per
cigarette. All revenues collected during any month from this
additional tax shall be deposited in the state general fund by the
twenty-fifth day of the following month.
(3) An additional tax is imposed upon the sale, use, consumption,
handling, possession, or distribution of all cigarettes, in an amount
equal to two and five one-hundredths cents per cigarette. All revenues
collected during any month from this additional tax shall be deposited
in the state general fund by the twenty-fifth day of the following
month.
(4))) An additional tax is imposed upon the sale, use, consumption,
handling, possession, or distribution of all cigarettes at no cost, or
reduced cost where such offer is conditioned on the purchase of one or
more tobacco products in an amount equal to 9.125 cents per cigarette.
This applies to offers of "buy-one-get-one-free," "two for one," "fifty
percent off the purchase of two," and offers that are substantially
similar. Revenues collected from the tax in this subsection must be
deposited into the general fund.
(3) Wholesalers subject to the payment of this tax may, if they
wish, absorb five one-hundredths cents per cigarette of the tax and not
pass it on to purchasers without being in violation of this section or
any other act relating to the sale or taxation of cigarettes.
(((5))) (4) For purposes of this chapter, "possession" ((shall))
means both (a) physical possession by the purchaser and, (b) when
cigarettes are being transported to or held for the purchaser or his or
her designee by a person other than the purchaser, constructive
possession by the purchaser or his or her designee, which constructive
possession ((shall be)) is deemed to occur at the location of the
cigarettes being so transported or held.
(((6))) (5) In accordance with federal law and rules prescribed by
the department, an enrolled member of a federally recognized Indian
tribe may purchase cigarettes from an Indian tribal organization under
the jurisdiction of the member's tribe for the member's own use exempt
from the applicable taxes imposed by this chapter. Except as provided
in subsection (((7))) (6) of this section, any person, who purchases
cigarettes from an Indian tribal organization and who is not an
enrolled member of the federally recognized Indian tribe within whose
jurisdiction the sale takes place, is not exempt from the applicable
taxes imposed by this chapter.
(((7))) (6) If the state enters into a cigarette tax contract or
agreement with a federally recognized Indian tribe under chapter 43.06
RCW, the terms of the contract or agreement ((shall)) take precedence
over any conflicting provisions of this chapter while the contract or
agreement is in effect.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.24.026 and 2009 c 479 s 67 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the tax imposed upon the sale, use, consumption,
handling, possession, or distribution of cigarettes set forth in RCW
82.24.020, there is imposed a tax in an amount equal to three cents per
cigarette.
(2) The revenue collected under this section ((shall)) must be
deposited as follows:
(a) ((28.5)) 14 percent ((shall)) must be deposited into the
general fund.
(b) The remainder ((shall)) must be deposited into the education
legacy trust account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "nonparticipating manufacturer" means
a tobacco product manufacturer, as defined in RCW 70.157.010(i), that
is not a participating manufacturer within the meaning of section
II(jj) of the master settlement agreement, as defined in RCW
70.157.010(e).
(2) There is levied an equity assessment at the rate of 2.1 cents
on each cigarette for all cigarette packages of nonparticipating
manufacturers to which a stamp is affixed as required under RCW
82.24.030. The equity assessment imposed by this section is in
addition to all other assessments, fees, and taxes levied under
existing law, and shall be paid by affixing a stamp in the manner and
at the time described in RCW 82.24.030.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the equity
assessment shall be collected, paid, administered, and enforced in the
same manner as the taxes on cigarettes levied by this chapter.
(4) The purposes of this equity assessment are:
(a) To recover health care costs to the state imposed by
nonparticipating manufacturers;
(b) To prevent nonparticipating manufacturers from undermining the
states policy of reducing underage smoking by offering cigarettes for
sale substantially below the prices of other manufacturers;
(c) To protect funding, which is reduced as a result of the growth
of nonparticipating manufacturer cigarette sales for programs funded in
whole or in part by payments to the state under the master settlement
agreement as defined in RCW 70.157.010(e);
(d) To recoup settlement-payment revenue lost to the state as a
result of nonparticipating manufacturer cigarette sales; and
(e) To fund the enforcement and administration of:
(i) The stamping requirements of this chapter;
(ii) The escrow payment imposed by chapter 70.157 RCW; and
(iii) The equity assessment imposed in this chapter.
(5) Each manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler, or retail dealer
who under RCW 82.24.030 affixes a stamp to a package of cigarettes
shall report monthly to the department of revenue for each place of
business the number and denominations of stamps affixed to individual
packages of nonparticipating manufacturer cigarettes sold by the
manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler, or retail dealer in the
preceding month, including the manufacturer and brand family. A person
required to file a report under this section is subject to the penalty
provisions of this chapter for failing to file a report in a timely
manner, or for supplying false or fraudulent information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 82.24.027 (Additional tax imposed -- Rate -- Deposited into the
general fund) and 2009 c 479 s 68, 2008 c 86 s 303, 1999 c 309 s 925,
& 1986 c 3 s 12; and
(2) RCW 82.24.028 (Additional tax imposed -- Rate -- Deposited into the
general fund) and 2009 c 479 s 69, 2008 c 86 s 304, & 2002 c 2 s 3.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 70.47 RCW
to read as follows:
The basic health plan stabilization account is created in the state
treasury. Funds from the account must be used to fund enrollment in
the subsidized basic health plan under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The sum of eighty-five million six hundred
ninety-eight thousand dollars is appropriated from the general fund for
deposit into the basic health plan stabilization account for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2011. The funds used from this appropriation must
be used to support enrollment for approximately thirty-six thousand six
hundred low-income individuals in the subsidized basic health plan for
fiscal year 2011.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.135.035 and 2010 c ... (ESSB 6130 as amended by the
House) s 2 are each amended to read as follows:
(1) After July 1, 2011, any action or combination of actions by the
legislature that raises taxes may be taken only if approved by a
two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature, and then only if
state expenditures in any fiscal year, including the new revenue, will
not exceed the state expenditure limits established under this chapter.
Pursuant to the referendum power set forth in Article II, section 1(b)
of the state Constitution, tax increases may be referred to the voters
for their approval or rejection at an election.
(2)(a) If the legislative action under subsection (1) of this
section will result in expenditures in excess of the state expenditure
limit, then the action of the legislature ((shall)) may not take effect
until approved by a vote of the people at a November general election.
The state expenditure limit committee ((shall)) must adjust the state
expenditure limit by the amount of additional revenue approved by the
voters under this section. This adjustment ((shall)) may not exceed
the amount of revenue generated by the legislative action during the
first full fiscal year in which it is in effect. The state expenditure
limit ((shall)) must be adjusted downward upon expiration or repeal of
the legislative action.
(b) The ballot title for any vote of the people required under this
section shall be substantially as follows:

"Shall taxes be imposed on . . . . . . . in order to allow a
spending increase above last year's authorized spending adjusted for
personal income growth?"

(3)(a) The state expenditure limit may be exceeded upon declaration
of an emergency for a period not to exceed twenty-four months by a law
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and
signed by the governor. The law ((shall)) must set forth the nature of
the emergency, which is limited to natural disasters that require
immediate government action to alleviate human suffering and provide
humanitarian assistance. The state expenditure limit may be exceeded
for no more than twenty-four months following the declaration of the
emergency and only for the purposes contained in the emergency
declaration.
(b) Additional taxes required for an emergency under this section
may be imposed only until thirty days following the next general
election, unless an extension is approved at that general election.
The additional taxes ((shall)) expire upon expiration of the
declaration of emergency. The legislature ((shall)) may not impose
additional taxes for emergency purposes under this subsection unless
funds in the education construction fund have been exhausted.
(c) The state or any political subdivision of the state ((shall))
may not impose any tax on intangible property listed in RCW 84.36.070
as that statute exists on January 1, 1993.
(4) If the cost of any state program or function is shifted from
the state general fund to another source of funding, or if moneys are
transferred from the state general fund to another fund or account, the
state expenditure limit committee, acting pursuant to RCW
43.135.025(5), ((shall)) must lower the state expenditure limit to
reflect the shift. For the purposes of this section, a transfer of
money from the state general fund to another fund or account includes
any state legislative action taken that has the effect of reducing
revenues from a particular source, where such revenues would otherwise
be deposited into the state general fund, while increasing the revenues
from that particular source to another state or local government
account. This subsection does not apply to: (a) The dedication or use
of lottery revenues under RCW 67.70.240(3), in support of education or
education expenditures; ((or)) (b) a transfer of moneys to, or an
expenditure from, the budget stabilization account; or (c) the deposit
of funds to the basic health plan stabilization account under section
6 of this act or the appropriation of those funds.
(5) If the cost of any state program or function and the ongoing
revenue necessary to fund the program or function are shifted to the
state general fund on or after January 1, 2007, the state expenditure
limit committee, acting pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), ((shall)) must
increase the state expenditure limit to reflect the shift unless the
shifted revenue had previously been shifted from the general fund.
(6) For the purposes of chapter 1, Laws of 2008, "raises taxes"
means any action or combination of actions by the legislature that
increases state tax revenue deposited in any fund, budget, or account,
regardless of whether the revenues are deposited into the general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
June 1, 2010.

--- END ---