BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the economic
crisis has impacted the many Washington families which do not earn
enough annually to keep pace with increasing health care, child care,
and work-related expenses. The legislature further finds that revenues
are insufficient to maintain necessary funding for education, public
safety, health care, and safety net services for elderly, disabled, and
vulnerable people during the unprecedented economic crisis in the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature
to provide a means to stabilize revenue collections by imposing a
temporary sales and use tax. It is also the legislature's intent to
provide relief to lower-income working families in Washington in the
form of a sales and use tax exemption.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.020 and 2009 c 469 s 802 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is levied and ((there shall be)) collected a tax on each
retail sale in this state equal to six and five-tenths percent of the
selling price.
(2) There is levied and ((there shall be)) collected an additional
tax on each retail car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is
licensed in this state, equal to five and nine-tenths percent of the
selling price. The revenue collected under this subsection ((shall))
must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in
RCW 47.66.070.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2003, there is levied and collected an
additional tax of three-tenths of one percent of the selling price on
each retail sale of a motor vehicle in this state, other than retail
car rentals taxed under subsection (2) of this section. The revenue
collected under this subsection ((shall)) must be deposited in the
multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.
(4) For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, "motor vehicle"
has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but does not include farm
tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and 46.04.181,
off-road and nonhighway vehicles as defined in RCW 46.09.020, and
snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.10.010.
(5) From June 1, 2010, until June 30, 2013, in addition to the tax
imposed upon each retail sale in this state set forth in subsection (1)
of this section, there is imposed a tax in an amount equal to three-tenths of one percent of the selling price.
(6) Beginning on December 8, 2005, 0.16 percent of the taxes
collected under subsection (1) of this section ((shall)) must be
dedicated to funding comprehensive performance audits required under
RCW 43.09.470. The revenue identified in this subsection ((shall))
must be deposited in the performance audits of government account
created in RCW 43.09.475.
(((6))) (7) The taxes imposed under this chapter ((shall)) apply to
successive retail sales of the same property.
(((7))) (8)(a) Until January 1, 2011, the tax imposed in subsection
(3) of this section and the dedication of revenue provided for in
subsection (((5))) (6) of this section((,)) do not apply with respect
to the sales of new passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty
passenger vehicles, which utilize hybrid technology and have a United
States environmental protection agency estimated highway gasoline
mileage rating of at least forty miles per gallon.
(b) As used in this subsection, "hybrid technology" means
propulsion units powered by both electricity and gasoline.
(((8))) (9) The rates provided in this section apply to taxes
imposed under chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.08.020 and 2006 c 1 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) There is levied and ((there shall be)) collected a tax on each
retail sale in this state equal to six and five-tenths percent of the
selling price.
(2) There is levied and ((there shall be)) collected an additional
tax on each retail car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is
licensed in this state, equal to five and nine-tenths percent of the
selling price. The revenue collected under this subsection ((shall))
must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in
RCW 47.66.070.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2003, there is levied and collected an
additional tax of three-tenths of one percent of the selling price on
each retail sale of a motor vehicle in this state, other than retail
car rentals taxed under subsection (2) of this section. The revenue
collected under this subsection ((shall)) must be deposited in the
multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.
(4) For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, "motor vehicle"
has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but does not include farm
tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and 46.04.181,
off-road and nonhighway vehicles as defined in RCW 46.09.020, and
snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.10.010.
(5) From June 1, 2010, until June 30, 2013, in addition to the tax
imposed upon each retail sale in this state set forth in subsection (1)
of this section, there is imposed a tax in an amount equal to three-tenths of one percent of the selling price.
(6) Beginning on December 8, 2005, 0.16 percent of the taxes
collected under subsection (1) of this section ((shall)) must be
dedicated to funding comprehensive performance audits required under
RCW 43.09.470. The revenue identified in this subsection ((shall))
must be deposited in the performance audits of government account
created in RCW 43.09.475.
(((6))) (7) The taxes imposed under this chapter ((shall)) apply to
successive retail sales of the same property.
(((7))) (8) The rates provided in this section apply to taxes
imposed under chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The sum of three hundred thirteen million
three hundred seven thousand dollars, which reflects the increased
revenue receipts from additional taxes imposed in sections 2 and 3 of
this act, is appropriated for fiscal year ending June 30, 2011, from
the state general fund for deposit to the education legacy trust
account. The resources provided in this act will maintain support for
property-poor school districts through the state's levy equalization
program, provide funding for approximately sixteen thousand students to
continue to receive state-funded all-day kindergarten, and allow
approximately thirty-four thousand students to attend institutions of
higher education with the assistance of the state need grant.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.08.0206 and 2008 c 325 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A working families' tax exemption, in the form of a remittance
tax due under this chapter and chapter 82.12 RCW, is provided to
eligible low-income persons for sales taxes paid under this chapter
after ((January 1, 2008)) June 1, 2010.
(2) For purposes of the exemption in this section, an eligible low-income person is:
(a) An individual, or an individual and that individual's spouse if
they file a federal joint income tax return;
(b) (([An individual who])) An individual who is eligible for, and
is granted, the credit provided in ((Title)) 26 U.S.C. Sec. 32 of the
federal internal revenue code; and
(c) (([An individual who])) An individual who properly files a
federal income tax return as a Washington resident, and has been a
resident of the state of Washington more than one hundred eighty days
of the year for which the exemption is claimed.
(3)(a) For remittances made in ((2009 and 2010)) 2011, the working
families' tax exemption for the prior year is a retail sales tax
exemption equal to the greater of twenty-five dollars or five percent
of the credit granted as a result of ((Title)) 26 U.S.C. Sec. 32 of the
federal internal revenue code in the most recent year for which data is
available ((or twenty-five dollars)), adjusted by a proportionate
amount reflecting the seven months of increased tax imposed in sections
2 and 3 of this act in calendar year 2010.
(b) For remittances made in 2012, the working families' tax
exemption for the prior year is a retail sales tax exemption equal to
the greater of five percent of the credit granted as a result of 26
U.S.C. Sec. 32 of the federal internal revenue code in the most recent
year for which data is available or twenty-five dollars.
(c) For ((2011)) 2013 and thereafter, the working families' tax
exemption for the prior year is equal to the greater of ten percent of
the credit granted as a result of ((Title)) 26 U.S.C. Sec. 32 of the
federal internal revenue code in the most recent year for which data is
available or fifty dollars.
(4) For any fiscal period, the working families' tax exemption
authorized under this section ((shall)) must be approved by the
legislature in the state omnibus appropriations act before persons may
claim the exemption during the fiscal period.
(5) The working families' tax exemption ((shall)) must be
administered as provided in this subsection.
(a) An eligible low-income person claiming an exemption under this
section must pay the tax imposed under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14
RCW in the year for which the exemption is claimed. The eligible low-income person may then apply to the department for the remittance as
calculated under subsection (3) of this section.
(b) Application ((shall)) must be made to the department in a form
and manner determined by the department, ((but the)) except for the
following:
(i) The department must provide alternative filing methods for
applicants who do not have access to electronic filing; and
(ii) The department must allow joint filing for exemptions claimed
under this section in 2012 and thereafter with the federal joint income
tax return.
(c) Application for the exemption remittance under this section
must be made in the year following the year for which the federal
return was filed, but in no case may any remittance be provided for any
period before ((January 1, 2008)) June 1, 2010. The department may use
the best available data to process the exemption remittance. The
department ((shall)) must begin accepting applications ((October 1,
2009)) January 1, 2011.
(d) The department ((shall)) must review the application and
determine eligibility for the working families' tax exemption based on
information provided by the applicant and through audit and other
administrative records, including, when it deems it necessary,
verification through internal revenue service data.
(e) The department ((shall)) must remit the exempted amounts to
eligible low-income persons who submitted applications. Remittances
may be made by electronic funds transfer or other means.
(f) The department may, in conjunction with other agencies or
organizations, design and implement a public information campaign to
inform potentially eligible persons of the existence of and
requirements for this exemption.
(g) The department may contact persons who appear to be eligible
low-income persons as a result of information received from the
internal revenue service under such conditions and requirements as the
internal revenue service may by law require.
(6) The provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW apply to the exemption in
this section.
(7) The department may adopt rules necessary to implement this
section.
(8) For the remittances provided in fiscal year 2015 and
thereafter, the department ((shall)) must limit its ongoing costs
((for)) to administer the exemption program to ((the initial start-up
costs to implement the program. The state omnibus appropriations act
shall specify funding to be used for the ongoing administrative costs
of the program. These ongoing administrative costs include, but are
not limited to, costs for: The processing of internet and mail
applications, verification of application claims, compliance and
collections, additional full-time employees at the department's call
center, processing warrants, updating printed materials and web
information, media advertising, and support and maintenance of computer
systems)) no more than five percent of the total exemptions provided
each year.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.08.064 and 2003 c 361 s 304 and 2003 c 168 s 205
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A sales and use tax rate change under this chapter or chapter
82.12 RCW shall be imposed (a) no sooner than seventy-five days after
its enactment into law and (b) only on the first day of January, April,
July, or October.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to the tax rate
change in section 301, chapter 361, Laws of 2003 or to the tax rate
changes in sections 2 and 3 of this act.
(3)(a) A sales and use tax rate increase under this chapter or
chapter 82.12 RCW imposed on services applies to the first billing
period starting on or after the effective date of the increase.
(b) A sales and use tax rate decrease under this chapter or chapter
82.12 RCW imposed on services applies to bills rendered on or after the
effective date of the decrease.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (3), "services" means
retail services such as installing and constructing and retail services
such as telecommunications, but does not include services such as
tattooing.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.135.035 and 2010 c ... (ESSB 6130 as amended by the
House) s 2 are each amended to read as follows:
(1) After July 1, 2011, any action or combination of actions by the
legislature that raises taxes may be taken only if approved by a
two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature, and then only if
state expenditures in any fiscal year, including the new revenue, will
not exceed the state expenditure limits established under this chapter.
Pursuant to the referendum power set forth in Article II, section 1(b)
of the state Constitution, tax increases may be referred to the voters
for their approval or rejection at an election.
(2)(a) If the legislative action under subsection (1) of this
section will result in expenditures in excess of the state expenditure
limit, then the action of the legislature ((shall)) may not take effect
until approved by a vote of the people at a November general election.
The state expenditure limit committee ((shall)) must adjust the state
expenditure limit by the amount of additional revenue approved by the
voters under this section. This adjustment ((shall)) may not exceed
the amount of revenue generated by the legislative action during the
first full fiscal year in which it is in effect. The state expenditure
limit ((shall)) must be adjusted downward upon expiration or repeal of
the legislative action.
(b) The ballot title for any vote of the people required under this
section ((shall)) must be substantially as follows:

"Shall taxes be imposed on . . . . . . . in order to allow a
spending increase above last year's authorized spending adjusted for
personal income growth?"

(3)(a) The state expenditure limit may be exceeded upon declaration
of an emergency for a period not to exceed twenty-four months by a law
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and
signed by the governor. The law ((shall)) must set forth the nature of
the emergency, which is limited to natural disasters that require
immediate government action to alleviate human suffering and provide
humanitarian assistance. The state expenditure limit may be exceeded
for no more than twenty-four months following the declaration of the
emergency and only for the purposes contained in the emergency
declaration.
(b) Additional taxes required for an emergency under this section
may be imposed only until thirty days following the next general
election, unless an extension is approved at that general election.
The additional taxes ((shall)) expire upon expiration of the
declaration of emergency. The legislature ((shall)) may not impose
additional taxes for emergency purposes under this subsection unless
funds in the education construction fund have been exhausted.
(c) The state or any political subdivision of the state ((shall))
may not impose any tax on intangible property listed in RCW 84.36.070
as that statute exists on January 1, 1993.
(4) If the cost of any state program or function is shifted from
the state general fund to another source of funding, or if moneys are
transferred from the state general fund to another fund or account, the
state expenditure limit committee, acting pursuant to RCW
43.135.025(5), ((shall)) must lower the state expenditure limit to
reflect the shift. For the purposes of this section, a transfer of
money from the state general fund to another fund or account includes
any state legislative action taken that has the effect of reducing
revenues from a particular source, where such revenues would otherwise
be deposited into the state general fund, while increasing the revenues
from that particular source to another state or local government
account. This subsection does not apply to: (a) The dedication or use
of lottery revenues under RCW 67.70.240(3), in support of education or
education expenditures; ((or)) (b) a transfer of moneys to, or an
expenditure from, the budget stabilization account; or (c) the deposit
of funds to the education legacy trust account under section 4 of this
act or the appropriation of those funds.
(5) If the cost of any state program or function and the ongoing
revenue necessary to fund the program or function are shifted to the
state general fund on or after January 1, 2007, the state expenditure
limit committee, acting pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), ((shall)) must
increase the state expenditure limit to reflect the shift unless the
shifted revenue had previously been shifted from the general fund.
(6) For the purposes of chapter 1, Laws of 2008, "raises taxes"
means any action or combination of actions by the legislature that
increases state tax revenue deposited in any fund, budget, or account,
regardless of whether the revenues are deposited into the general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Section 2 of this act expires January 1,
2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Section 3 of this act takes effect January
1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Except for section 3 of this act, this act
is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing
public institutions, and takes effect June 1, 2010.

--- END ---