BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.90.140 and 1986 c 236 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((secretary)) local health jurisdiction shall enforce the rules
adopted under this chapter. The ((secretary)) local health
jurisdiction may develop joint plans of responsibility with any other
local health jurisdiction to administer this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.90.150 and 1986 c 236 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) Local health officers may establish and collect fees
sufficient to cover their costs incurred in carrying out their duties
under this chapter and the rules adopted under this chapter.
(((2) The department may establish and collect fees sufficient to
cover its costs incurred in carrying out its duties under this chapter.
The fees shall be deposited in the state general fund.
(3) A person shall not be required to submit fees at both the state
and local levels.))

Sec. 3 RCW 70.90.160 and 1987 c 222 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
A permit is required for any modification to or construction of any
recreational water contact facility after June 11, 1986, and for any
other water recreation facility after July 26, 1987. Water recreation
facilities existing on July 26, 1987, which do not comply with the
design and construction requirements established by the state board of
health under this chapter may continue to operate without modification
to or replacement of the existing physical plant, provided the water
quality, sanitation, and life saving equipment are in compliance with
the requirements established under this chapter. However, if any
modifications are made to the physical plant of an existing water
recreation facility the modifications shall comply with the
requirements established under this chapter. The plans and
specifications for the modification or construction shall be submitted
to the applicable local authority ((or the department as applicable,
but a person shall not be required to submit plans at both the state
and local levels or apply for both a state and local permit)). The
plans shall be reviewed and may be approved or rejected or
modifications or conditions imposed consistent with this chapter as the
public health or safety may require, and a permit shall be issued or
denied within thirty days of submittal.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.90.170 and 1987 c 222 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
An operating permit from the ((department or)) local health
officer((, as applicable,)) is required for each water recreation
facility operated in this state. The permit shall be renewed annually.
The permit shall be conspicuously displayed at the water recreation
facility.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.90.190 and 1987 c 222 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person operating a water recreation facility shall report to
the local health officer ((or the department)) any serious injury,
communicable disease, or death occurring at or caused by the water
recreation facility.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.90.200 and 1986 c 236 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
County, city, or town legislative authorities ((and the
secretary)), as applicable, may establish civil penalties for a
violation of this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter not
to exceed five hundred dollars. Each day upon which a violation occurs
constitutes a separate violation. A person violating this chapter may
be enjoined from continuing the violation.

Sec. 7 RCW 70.90.210 and 1991 c 3 s 354 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1) Any person aggrieved by an order of the department or by the
imposition of a civil fine by the department has the right to an
adjudicative proceeding. RCW 43.70.095 governs department notice of a
civil fine and a person's right to an adjudicative proceeding.
(2))) Any person aggrieved by an order of a local health officer or
by the imposition of a civil fine by the officer has the right to
appeal. The hearing is governed by the local health jurisdiction's
administrative appeals process. Notice shall be provided by the local
health jurisdiction consistent with its due process requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 RCW 70.90.125 (Regulation by local boards of
health) and 1987 c 222 s 6 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---