BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.83.023 and 2007 c 259 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department has the authority to collect a fee of ((three)) six
dollars and ((fifty)) forty cents from the parents or other responsible
party of each infant screened for congenital disorders as defined by
the state board of health under RCW 70.83.020 to fund specialty clinics
that provide treatment services for or education and outreach to those
with the defined disorders. The fee may be collected through the
facility where a screening specimen is obtained.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---