BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.43.838 and 2009 c 170 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After January 1, 1988, and notwithstanding any provision of RCW
43.43.700 through 43.43.810 to the contrary, the state patrol shall
furnish a transcript of the conviction record pertaining to any person
for whom the state patrol or the federal bureau of investigation has a
record upon the written request of:
(a) The subject of the inquiry;
(b) Any business or organization for the purpose of conducting
evaluations under RCW 43.43.832;
(c) The department of social and health services;
(d) Any law enforcement agency, prosecuting authority, or the
office of the attorney general;
(e) The department of social and health services for the purpose of
meeting responsibilities set forth in chapter 74.15, 18.51, 18.20, or
72.23 RCW, or any later-enacted statute which purpose is to regulate or
license a facility which handles vulnerable adults. However, access to
conviction records pursuant to this subsection (1)(e) does not limit or
restrict the ability of the department to obtain additional information
regarding conviction records and pending charges as set forth in RCW
74.15.030(2)(b); or
(f) The department of early learning for the purpose of meeting
responsibilities in chapter 43.215 RCW.
(2) The state patrol shall by rule establish fees for disseminating
records under this section to recipients identified in subsection
(1)(a) and (b) of this section. The state patrol shall also by rule
establish fees for disseminating records in the custody of the national
crime information center. The revenue from the fees shall cover, as
nearly as practicable, the direct and indirect costs to the state
patrol of disseminating the records. ((No fee shall be charged to a
nonprofit organization for the records check.)) Nonprofit organizations
requesting fifty or more record checks per fiscal year shall be charged
one dollar per check. Nonprofit organizations requesting fewer than
fifty record checks per fiscal year shall be charged five dollars per
check. Record checks requested by school districts and educational
service districts using only name and date of birth will be provided
free of charge.
(3) No employee of the state, employee of a business or
organization, or the business or organization is liable for defamation,
invasion of privacy, negligence, or any other claim in connection with
any lawful dissemination of information under RCW 43.43.830 through
43.43.840 or 43.43.760.
(4) Before July 26, 1987, the state patrol shall adopt rules and
forms to implement this section and to provide for security and privacy
of information disseminated under this section, giving first priority
to the criminal justice requirements of this chapter. The rules may
include requirements for users, audits of users, and other procedures
to prevent use of civil adjudication record information or criminal
history record information inconsistent with this chapter.
(5) Nothing in RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.840 shall authorize an
employer to make an inquiry not specifically authorized by this
chapter, or be construed to affect the policy of the state declared in
chapter 9.96A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---