BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.56.030 and 2007 c 184 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Public employer" means any officer, board, commission,
council, or other person or body acting on behalf of any public body
governed by this chapter, or any subdivision of such public body. For
the purposes of this section, the public employer of district court or
superior court employees for wage-related matters is the respective
county legislative authority, or person or body acting on behalf of the
legislative authority, and the public employer for nonwage-related
matters is the judge or judge's designee of the respective district
court or superior court.
(2) "Public employee" means any employee of a public employer
except any person (a) elected by popular vote, or (b) appointed to
office pursuant to statute, ordinance or resolution for a specified
term of office as a member of a multimember board, commission, or
committee, whether appointed by the executive head or body of the
public employer, or (c) whose duties as deputy, administrative
assistant or secretary necessarily imply a confidential relationship to
(i) the executive head or body of the applicable bargaining unit, or
(ii) any person elected by popular vote, or (iii) any person appointed
to office pursuant to statute, ordinance or resolution for a specified
term of office as a member of a multimember board, commission, or
committee, whether appointed by the executive head or body of the
public employer, or (d) who is a court commissioner or a court
magistrate of superior court, district court, or a department of a
district court organized under chapter 3.46 RCW, or (e) who is a
personal assistant to a district court judge, superior court judge, or
court commissioner. For the purpose of (e) of this subsection, no more
than one assistant for each judge or commissioner may be excluded from
a bargaining unit.
(3) "Bargaining representative" means any lawful organization which
has as one of its primary purposes the representation of employees in
their employment relations with employers.
(4) "Collective bargaining" means the performance of the mutual
obligations of the public employer and the exclusive bargaining
representative to meet at reasonable times, to confer and negotiate in
good faith, and to execute a written agreement with respect to
grievance procedures and collective negotiations on personnel matters,
including wages, hours and working conditions, which may be peculiar to
an appropriate bargaining unit of such public employer, except that by
such obligation neither party shall be compelled to agree to a proposal
or be required to make a concession unless otherwise provided in this
chapter.
(5) "Commission" means the public employment relations commission.
(6) "Executive director" means the executive director of the
commission.
(7) "Uniformed personnel" means: (a) Law enforcement officers as
defined in RCW 41.26.030 employed by the governing body of any city or
town with a population of two thousand five hundred or more and law
enforcement officers employed by the governing body of any county with
a population of ten thousand or more; (b) correctional employees who
are uniformed and nonuniformed, commissioned and noncommissioned
security personnel employed in a jail as defined in RCW
70.48.020(((5))) (9), by a county with a population of seventy thousand
or more, and who are trained for and charged with the responsibility of
controlling and maintaining custody of inmates in the jail and
safeguarding inmates from other inmates; (c) general authority
Washington peace officers as defined in RCW 10.93.020 employed by a
port district in a county with a population of one million or more; (d)
security forces established under RCW 43.52.520; (e) firefighters as
that term is defined in RCW 41.26.030; (f) employees of a port district
in a county with a population of one million or more whose duties
include crash fire rescue or other firefighting duties; (g) employees
of fire departments of public employers who dispatch exclusively either
fire or emergency medical services, or both; or (h) employees in the
several classes of advanced life support technicians, as defined in RCW
18.71.200, who are employed by a public employer.
(8) "Institution of higher education" means the University of
Washington, Washington State University, Central Washington University,
Eastern Washington University, Western Washington University, The
Evergreen State College, and the various state community colleges.
(9) (("Home care quality authority" means the authority under
chapter 74.39A RCW.
(10))) "Individual provider" means an individual provider as
defined in RCW 74.39A.240(4) who, solely for the purposes of collective
bargaining, is a public employee as provided in RCW 74.39A.270.
(((11))) (10) "Child care subsidy" means a payment from the state
through a child care subsidy program established pursuant to RCW
74.12.340 or 74.08A.340, 45 C.F.R. Sec. 98.1 through 98.17, or any
successor program.
(((12))) (11) "Family child care provider" means a person who: (a)
Provides regularly scheduled care for a child or children in the home
of the provider or in the home of the child or children for periods of
less than twenty-four hours or, if necessary due to the nature of the
parent's work, for periods equal to or greater than twenty-four hours;
(b) receives child care subsidies; and (c) is either licensed by the
state under RCW 74.15.030 or is exempt from licensing under chapter
74.15 RCW.
(((13))) (12) "Adult family home provider" means a provider as
defined in RCW 70.128.010 who receives payments from the medicaid and
state-funded long-term care programs.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.105.340 and 2008 c 151 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall coordinate among state agencies to develop
a consumer protection web site. The web site shall serve as a one-stop
web site for consumer information. At a minimum, the web site must
provide links to information on:
(a) Insurance information provided by the office of the insurance
commissioner, including information on how to file consumer complaints
against insurance companies, how to look up authorized insurers, and
how to learn more about health insurance benefits;
(b) Child care information provided by the department of early
learning, including how to select a child care provider, how child care
providers are rated, and information about product recalls;
(c) Financial information provided by the department of financial
institutions, including consumer information on financial fraud,
investing, credit, and enforcement actions;
(d) Health care information provided by the department of health,
including health care provider listings and quality assurance
information;
(e) ((Home care information provided by the home care quality
authority, including information to assist consumers in finding an in-home provider;
(f))) Licensing information provided by the department of
licensing, including information regarding business, vehicle, and
professional licensing; and
(((g))) (f) Other information available on existing state agency
web sites that could be a helpful resource for consumers.
(2) By July 1, 2008, state agencies shall report to the department
on whether they maintain resources for consumers that could be made
available through the consumer protection web site.
(3) By September 1, 2008, the department shall make the consumer
protection web site available to the public.
(4) After September 1, 2008, the department, in coordination with
other state agencies, shall develop a plan on how to build upon the
consumer protection web site to create a consumer protection portal.
The plan must also include an examination of the feasibility of
developing a toll-free information line to support the consumer
protection portal. The plan must be submitted to the governor and the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2008.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.39A.095 and 2009 c 580 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In carrying out case management responsibilities established
under RCW 74.39A.090 for consumers who are receiving services under the
medicaid personal care, community options programs entry system or
chore services program through an individual provider, each area agency
on aging shall provide oversight of the care being provided to
consumers receiving services under this section to the extent of
available funding. Case management responsibilities incorporate this
oversight, and include, but are not limited to:
(a) Verification that any individual provider ((who has not been
referred to a consumer by the authority)) has met any training
requirements established by the department;
(b) Verification of a sample of worker time sheets;
(c) Monitoring the consumer's plan of care to verify that it
adequately meets the needs of the consumer, through activities such as
home visits, telephone contacts, and responses to information received
by the area agency on aging indicating that a consumer may be
experiencing problems relating to his or her home care;
(d) Reassessing and reauthorizing services;
(e) Monitoring of individual provider performance. If, in the
course of its case management activities, the area agency on aging
identifies concerns regarding the care being provided by an individual
provider ((who was referred by the authority)), the area agency on
aging must notify the ((authority)) department regarding its concerns;
and
(f) Conducting criminal background checks or verifying that
criminal background checks have been conducted for any individual
provider ((who has not been referred to a consumer by the authority)).
Individual providers who are hired after January 1, 2012, are subject
to background checks under RCW 74.39A.055.
(2) The area agency on aging case manager shall work with each
consumer to develop a plan of care under this section that identifies
and ensures coordination of health and long-term care services that
meet the consumer's needs. In developing the plan, they shall utilize,
and modify as needed, any comprehensive community service plan
developed by the department as provided in RCW 74.39A.040. The plan of
care shall include, at a minimum:
(a) The name and telephone number of the consumer's area agency on
aging case manager, and a statement as to how the case manager can be
contacted about any concerns related to the consumer's well-being or
the adequacy of care provided;
(b) The name and telephone numbers of the consumer's primary health
care provider, and other health or long-term care providers with whom
the consumer has frequent contacts;
(c) A clear description of the roles and responsibilities of the
area agency on aging case manager and the consumer receiving services
under this section;
(d) The duties and tasks to be performed by the area agency on
aging case manager and the consumer receiving services under this
section;
(e) The type of in-home services authorized, and the number of
hours of services to be provided;
(f) The terms of compensation of the individual provider;
(g) A statement by the individual provider that he or she has the
ability and willingness to carry out his or her responsibilities
relative to the plan of care; and
(h)(i) Except as provided in (h)(ii) of this subsection, a clear
statement indicating that a consumer receiving services under this
section has the right to waive any of the case management services
offered by the area agency on aging under this section, and a clear
indication of whether the consumer has, in fact, waived any of these
services.
(ii) The consumer's right to waive case management services does
not include the right to waive reassessment or reauthorization of
services, or verification that services are being provided in
accordance with the plan of care.
(3) Each area agency on aging shall retain a record of each waiver
of services included in a plan of care under this section.
(4) Each consumer has the right to direct and participate in the
development of their plan of care to the maximum practicable extent of
their abilities and desires, and to be provided with the time and
support necessary to facilitate that participation.
(5) A copy of the plan of care must be distributed to the
consumer's primary care provider, individual provider, and other
relevant providers with whom the consumer has frequent contact, as
authorized by the consumer.
(6) The consumer's plan of care shall be an attachment to the
contract between the department, or their designee, and the individual
provider.
(7) If the department or area agency on aging case manager finds
that an individual provider's inadequate performance or inability to
deliver quality care is jeopardizing the health, safety, or well-being
of a consumer receiving service under this section, the department or
the area agency on aging may take action to terminate the contract
between the department and the individual provider. If the department
or the area agency on aging has a reasonable, good faith belief that
the health, safety, or well-being of a consumer is in imminent
jeopardy, the department or area agency on aging may summarily suspend
the contract pending a fair hearing. The consumer may request a fair
hearing to contest the planned action of the case manager, as provided
in chapter 34.05 RCW. ((When the department or area agency on aging
terminates or summarily suspends a contract under this subsection, it
must provide oral and written notice of the action taken to the
authority.)) The department may by rule adopt guidelines for
implementing this subsection.
(8) The department or area agency on aging may reject a request by
a consumer receiving services under this section to have a family
member or other person serve as his or her individual provider if the
case manager has a reasonable, good faith belief that the family member
or other person will be unable to appropriately meet the care needs of
the consumer. The consumer may request a fair hearing to contest the
decision of the case manager, as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW. The
department may by rule adopt guidelines for implementing this
subsection.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.39A.220 and 2002 c 3 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The people of the state of Washington find as follows:
(1) Thousands of Washington seniors and persons with disabilities
live independently in their own homes, which they prefer and is less
costly than institutional care such as nursing homes.
(2) Many Washington seniors and persons with disabilities currently
receive long-term in-home care services from individual providers hired
directly by them under the medicaid personal care, community options
programs entry system, or chore services program.
(3) Quality long-term in-home care services allow Washington
seniors, persons with disabilities, and their families the choice of
allowing seniors and persons with disabilities to remain in their
homes, rather than forcing them into institutional care such as nursing
homes. Long-term in-home care services are also less costly, saving
Washington taxpayers significant amounts through lower reimbursement
rates.
(4) The quality of long-term in-home care services in Washington
would benefit from improved regulation, higher standards, better
accountability, and improved access to such services. The quality of
long-term in-home care services would further be improved by a well-trained, stable individual provider workforce earning reasonable wages
and benefits.
(5) ((Washington seniors and persons with disabilities would
benefit from the establishment of an authority that has the power and
duty to regulate and improve the quality of long-term in-home care
services.
(6))) The ((authority)) state should ensure that the quality of
long-term in-home care services provided by individual providers is
improved through better regulation, higher standards, increased
accountability, and the enhanced ability to obtain services. The
((authority)) state should also encourage stability in the individual
provider workforce through collective bargaining and by providing
training opportunities.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.39A.240 and 2002 c 3 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 74.39A.030
((and)), 74.39A.095 ((and)), 74.39A.220 through 74.39A.300, and
41.56.026((, 70.127.041, and 74.09.740)) unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) (("Authority" means the home care quality authority.
(2) "Board" means the board created under RCW 74.39A.230.
(3))) "Consumer" means a person to whom an individual provider
provides any such services.
(((4))) (2) "Individual provider" means a person, including a
personal aide, who has contracted with the department to provide
personal care or respite care services to functionally disabled persons
under the medicaid personal care, community options program entry
system, chore services program, or respite care program, or to provide
respite care or residential services and support to persons with
developmental disabilities under chapter 71A.12 RCW, or to provide
respite care as defined in RCW 74.13.270.

Sec. 6 RCW 74.39A.260 and 2009 c 580 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department must perform criminal background checks for
individual providers and prospective individual providers ((and ensure
that the authority has ready access to any long-term care abuse and
neglect registry used by the department)). Individual providers who
are hired after January 1, 2012, are subject to background checks under
RCW 74.39A.055.

Sec. 7 RCW 74.39A.270 and 2007 c 361 s 7 and 2007 c 278 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Solely for the purposes of collective bargaining and as
expressly limited under subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the
governor is the public employer, as defined in chapter 41.56 RCW, of
individual providers, who, solely for the purposes of collective
bargaining, are public employees as defined in chapter 41.56 RCW. To
accommodate the role of the state as payor for the community-based
services provided under this chapter and to ensure coordination with
state employee collective bargaining under chapter 41.80 RCW and the
coordination necessary to implement RCW 74.39A.300, the public employer
shall be represented for bargaining purposes by the governor or the
governor's designee appointed under chapter 41.80 RCW. The governor or
governor's designee shall periodically consult with the ((authority))
department during the collective bargaining process to allow the
((authority)) department to communicate issues relating to the long-term in-home care services received by consumers. The governor or the
governor's designee shall consult the ((authority)) department on all
issues for which the exclusive bargaining representative requests to
engage in collective bargaining under subsections (5) and (6) ((and
(7))) of this section. The ((authority)) department shall work with
the developmental disabilities council, the governor's committee on
disability issues and employment, the state council on aging, and other
consumer advocacy organizations to obtain informed input from consumers
on their interests, including impacts on consumer choice, for all
issues proposed for collective bargaining under subsections (5) and (6)
((and (7))) of this section.
(2) Chapter 41.56 RCW governs the collective bargaining
relationship between the governor and individual providers, except as
otherwise expressly provided in this chapter and except as follows:
(a) The only unit appropriate for the purpose of collective
bargaining under RCW 41.56.060 is a statewide unit of all individual
providers;
(b) The showing of interest required to request an election under
RCW 41.56.060 is ten percent of the unit, and any intervener seeking to
appear on the ballot must make the same showing of interest;
(c) The mediation and interest arbitration provisions of RCW
41.56.430 through 41.56.470 and 41.56.480 apply, except that:
(i) With respect to commencement of negotiations between the
governor and the bargaining representative of individual providers,
negotiations shall be commenced by May 1st of any year prior to the
year in which an existing collective bargaining agreement expires; and
(ii) The decision of the arbitration panel is not binding on the
legislature and, if the legislature does not approve the request for
funds necessary to implement the compensation and fringe benefit
provisions of the arbitrated collective bargaining agreement, is not
binding on ((the authority or)) the state;
(d) Individual providers do not have the right to strike; and
(e) Individual providers who are related to, or family members of,
consumers or prospective consumers are not, for that reason, exempt
from this chapter or chapter 41.56 RCW.
(3) Individual providers who are public employees solely for the
purposes of collective bargaining under subsection (1) of this section
are not, for that reason, employees of the state, its political
subdivisions, or an area agency on aging for any purpose. Chapter
41.56 RCW applies only to the governance of the collective bargaining
relationship between the employer and individual providers as provided
in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(4) Consumers and prospective consumers retain the right to select,
hire, supervise the work of, and terminate any individual provider
providing services to them. ((Consumers may elect to receive long-term
in-home care services from individual providers who are not referred to
them by the authority.))
(5) ((In implementing and administering this chapter, neither the
authority nor any of its contractors may reduce or increase the hours
of service for any consumer below or above the amount determined to be
necessary under any assessment prepared by the department or an area
agency on aging.
(6))) Except as expressly limited in this section and RCW
74.39A.300, the wages, hours, and working conditions of individual
providers are determined solely through collective bargaining as
provided in this chapter. No agency or department of the state may
establish policies or rules governing the wages or hours of individual
providers. However, this subsection does not modify:
(a) The department's authority to establish a plan of care for each
consumer or its core responsibility to manage long-term in-home care
services under this chapter, including determination of the level of
care that each consumer is eligible to receive. However, at the
request of the exclusive bargaining representative, the governor or the
governor's designee appointed under chapter 41.80 RCW shall engage in
collective bargaining, as defined in RCW 41.56.030(4), with the
exclusive bargaining representative over how the department's core
responsibility affects hours of work for individual providers. This
subsection shall not be interpreted to require collective bargaining
over an individual consumer's plan of care;
(b) The department's authority to terminate its contracts with
individual providers who are not adequately meeting the needs of a
particular consumer, or to deny a contract under RCW 74.39A.095(8);
(c) The consumer's right to assign hours to one or more individual
providers selected by the consumer within the maximum hours determined
by his or her plan of care;
(d) The consumer's right to select, hire, terminate, supervise the
work of, and determine the conditions of employment for each individual
provider providing services to the consumer under this chapter;
(e) The department's obligation to comply with the federal medicaid
statute and regulations and the terms of any community-based waiver
granted by the federal department of health and human services and to
ensure federal financial participation in the provision of the
services; and
(f) The legislature's right to make programmatic modifications to
the delivery of state services under this title, including standards of
eligibility of consumers and individual providers participating in the
programs under this title, and the nature of services provided. The
governor shall not enter into, extend, or renew any agreement under
this chapter that does not expressly reserve the legislative rights
described in this subsection (((6))) (5)(f).
(((7))) (6) At the request of the exclusive bargaining
representative, the governor or the governor's designee appointed under
chapter 41.80 RCW shall engage in collective bargaining, as defined in
RCW 41.56.030(4), with the exclusive bargaining representative over
employer contributions to the training partnership for the costs of:
(a) Meeting all training and peer mentoring required under this
chapter; and (b) other training intended to promote the career
development of individual providers.
(((8)(a))) (7) The state, the department, ((the authority,)) the
area agencies on aging, or their contractors under this chapter may not
be held vicariously or jointly liable for the action or inaction of any
individual provider or prospective individual provider, whether or not
that individual provider or prospective individual provider was
included on the ((authority's)) referral registry or referred to a
consumer or prospective consumer. The existence of a collective
bargaining agreement, the placement of an individual provider on the
referral registry, or the development or approval of a plan of care for
a consumer who chooses to use the services of an individual provider
and the provision of case management services to that consumer, by the
department or an area agency on aging, does not constitute a special
relationship with the consumer.
(((b) The members of the board are immune from any liability
resulting from implementation of this chapter.
(9))) (8) Nothing in this section affects the state's
responsibility with respect to unemployment insurance for individual
providers. However, individual providers are not to be considered, as
a result of the state assuming this responsibility, employees of the
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The home care quality authority is
hereby abolished and its powers, duties, and functions are hereby
transferred to the department of social and health services. All
references to the home care quality authority in the Revised Code of
Washington shall be construed to mean the department of social and
health services.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the home care quality
authority shall be delivered to the custody of the department of social
and health services. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor
vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the home care quality
authority shall be made available to the department of social and
health services. All funds, credits, or other assets held by the home
care quality authority shall be assigned to the department of social
and health services.
(b) Any appropriations made to the home care quality authority
shall, on the effective date of this section, be transferred and
credited to the department of social and health services.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any funds, books,
documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible
property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance
of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial
management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and
certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All rules and all pending business before the home care quality
authority shall be continued and acted upon by the department of social
and health services. All existing contracts and obligations shall
remain in full force and shall be performed by the department of social
and health services.
(4) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the home care quality authority shall not affect the validity of any
act performed before the effective date of this section.
(5) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(6) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the public
employment relations commission as provided by law.

Sec. 9 RCW 74.39A.250 and 2002 c 3 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((authority)) department must carry out the following
duties:
(a) Establish qualifications and reasonable standards for
accountability for and investigate the background of individual
providers and prospective individual providers, except in cases where,
after the department has sought approval of any appropriate amendments
or waivers ((under RCW 74.09.740,)) federal law or regulation requires
that such qualifications and standards for accountability be
established by another entity in order to preserve eligibility for
federal funding. Qualifications established must include compliance
with the minimum requirements for training and satisfactory criminal
background checks as provided in RCW 74.39A.050 and confirmation that
the individual provider or prospective individual provider is not
currently listed on any long-term care abuse and neglect registry used
by the department at the time of the investigation;
(b) Undertake recruiting activities to identify and recruit
individual providers and prospective individual providers;
(c) Provide training opportunities, either directly or through
contract, for individual providers, prospective individual providers,
consumers, and prospective consumers;
(d) Provide assistance to consumers and prospective consumers in
finding individual providers and prospective individual providers
through the establishment of a referral registry of individual
providers and prospective individual providers. Before placing an
individual provider or prospective individual provider on the referral
registry, the ((authority)) department shall determine that:
(i) The individual provider or prospective individual provider has
met the minimum requirements for training set forth in RCW 74.39A.050;
(ii) The individual provider or prospective individual provider has
satisfactorily undergone a criminal background check conducted within
the prior twelve months; and
(iii) The individual provider or prospective individual provider is
not listed on any long-term care abuse and neglect registry used by the
department;
(e) Remove from the referral registry any individual provider or
prospective individual provider the ((authority)) department determines
not to meet the qualifications set forth in (d) of this subsection or
to have committed misfeasance or malfeasance in the performance of his
or her duties as an individual provider. The individual provider or
prospective individual provider, or the consumer to which the
individual provider is providing services, may request a fair hearing
to contest the removal from the referral registry, as provided in
chapter 34.05 RCW;
(f) Provide routine, emergency, and respite referrals of individual
providers and prospective individual providers to consumers and
prospective consumers who are authorized to receive long-term in-home
care services through an individual provider;
(g) Give preference in the recruiting, training, referral, and
employment of individual providers and prospective individual providers
to recipients of public assistance or other low-income persons who
would qualify for public assistance in the absence of such employment;
and
(h) Cooperate with ((the department,)) area agencies on aging((,))
and other federal, state, and local agencies to provide the services
described and set forth in this section. If, in the course of carrying
out its duties, the ((authority)) department identifies concerns
regarding the services being provided by an individual provider, the
((authority)) department must notify the relevant area agency or
department case manager regarding such concerns.
(2) In determining how best to carry out its duties, the
((authority)) department must identify existing individual provider
recruitment, training, and referral resources made available to
consumers by other state and local public, private, and nonprofit
agencies. The ((authority)) department may coordinate with the
agencies to provide a local presence for the ((authority)) department
and to provide consumers greater access to individual provider
recruitment, training, and referral resources in a cost-effective
manner. Using requests for proposals or similar processes, the
((authority)) department may contract with the agencies to provide
recruitment, training, and referral services if the ((authority))
department determines the agencies can provide the services according
to reasonable standards of performance determined by the ((authority))
department. The ((authority)) department must provide an opportunity
for consumer participation in the determination of the standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 RCW 74.39A.290 is decodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 70.127.041 (Home care quality authority not subject to
regulation) and 2002 c 3 s 13;
(2) RCW 74.39A.230 (Authority created) and 2002 c 3 s 2; and
(3) RCW 74.39A.280 (Powers) and 2002 c 3 s 7.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---