BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.22 RCW
to read as follows:
The county auditor shall charge a surcharge of eight dollars for
each document recorded, which is in addition to any other charge
allowed by law. The surcharge in this section applies only to
assignments or substitutions of previously recorded deeds of trust.
The funds collected under this section must be transmitted monthly to
the state treasurer who shall deposit sixty-seven percent of the funds
in the Washington state heritage center account created in RCW
43.07.129 and thirty-three percent of the funds in the local government
archives account created in RCW 40.14.024.

--- END ---