BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds there is a need to
consider the safety of other persons and the community in setting
nonfinancial pretrial conditions of release, and the need to permit the
pretrial detention of defendants as to whom no conditions of release
will assure the safety of the community or of other persons.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to enact a law governing
pretrial release or detention for the purpose of reasonably assuring
public safety pursuant to the proposed amendment to Article I, section
20 of the state Constitution set forth in House Joint Resolution No.
4220. Other provisions of law address matters relating to assuring the
appearance of the defendant at trial and preventing interference with
the administration of justice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Upon the appearance before a judicial
officer of a person charged with an offense, the judicial officer must
issue an order that, pending trial, the person be:
(1) Released on personal recognizance;
(2) Released on a condition or combination of conditions ordered
under section 3 of this act or other provision of law;
(3) Temporarily detained as allowed by law; or
(4) Detained as provided under section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) If the judicial officer determines that
the release of a defendant would endanger the safety of any other
person or the community, such judicial officer must order the pretrial
release of the person subject to the least restrictive further
condition, or combination of conditions, that such judicial officer
determines will reasonably assure the safety of any other person or the
community. The judicial officer may at any time amend the order to
impose additional or different conditions of release. The conditions
imposed under this chapter supplement but do not supplant provisions of
law allowing the imposition of conditions to assure the appearance of
the defendant at trial or to prevent interference with the
administration of justice.
(2) Appropriate conditions of release under this chapter include,
but are not limited to, the following:
(a) The defendant may be placed in the custody of a designated
person or organization agreeing to supervise the defendant;
(b) The defendant may have restrictions placed upon travel,
association, or place of abode during the period of release;
(c) The defendant may be required to comply with a specified
curfew;
(d) The defendant may be required to return to custody during
specified hours or to be placed on electronic monitoring, if available.
A defendant, if convicted, may not have the period of incarceration
reduced by the number of days spent on electronic home monitoring;
(e) The defendant may be prohibited from approaching or
communicating in any manner with particular persons or classes of
persons;
(f) The defendant may be prohibited from going to certain
geographical areas or premises;
(g) The defendant may be prohibited from possessing any dangerous
weapons or firearms;
(h) The defendant may be prohibited from possessing or consuming
any intoxicating liquors or drugs not prescribed to the defendant. The
defendant may be required to submit to testing to determine the
defendant's compliance with this condition;
(i) The defendant may be prohibited from operating a motor vehicle
that is not equipped with an ignition interlock device;
(j) The defendant may be required to report regularly to and remain
under the supervision of an officer of the court or other person or
agency; and
(k) The defendant may be prohibited from committing any violations
of criminal law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If a person is charged pursuant to section
7 of this act, and after a hearing pursuant to section 8 of this act,
the judicial officer finds that no condition or combination of
conditions will reasonably assure the safety of the community, such
judicial officer must order the detention of the person before trial.
The detainee is entitled to expedited review of the detention order by
the court of appeals under the writ provided in RCW 7.36.160.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The judicial officer must, in determining
whether there are conditions of release that will reasonably assure the
safety of any other person and the community, take into account the
available information concerning:
(1) The nature and circumstances of the offense charged, including
whether the offense is a crime of violence;
(2) The weight of the evidence against the defendant; and
(3) The history and characteristics of the defendant, including:
(a) The person's character, physical and mental condition, family
ties, employment, financial resources, length of residence in the
community, community ties, past conduct, history relating to drug or
alcohol abuse, criminal history, and record concerning appearance at
court proceedings;
(b) Whether, at the time of the current offense or arrest, the
defendant was on community supervision, probation, parole, or on other
release pending trial, sentencing, appeal, or completion of sentence
for an offense under federal, state, or local law; and
(c) The nature and seriousness of the danger to any person or the
community that would be posed by the defendant's release.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Subject to rebuttal by the person, it is
presumed that no condition or combination of conditions will reasonably
assure the safety of the community if the judicial officer finds that
there is probable cause to believe that the person committed an offense
for which the penalty is life imprisonment or death.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Any person charged with an offense or
attempted offense involving the intentional death of another,
intentional bodily harm of another, a choate sex offense that may
result in a sentence of life in prison, or an offense which may result
in a life sentence without the possibility of release may be ordered
detained without bail, unless the judicial officer finds that the
imposition of a condition or combination of conditions will reasonably
assure that the person will not pose a danger to the community.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The judicial officer must hold a hearing
to determine whether any condition or combination of conditions will
reasonably assure the safety of the community upon motion of the
attorney for the government.
(2) The hearing must be held immediately upon the defendant's first
appearance before the judicial officer unless the defendant, or the
attorney for the government, seeks a continuance. Except for good
cause, a continuance on motion of such person may not exceed five days
(not including any intermediate Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday),
and a continuance on motion of the attorney for the government may not
exceed three days (not including any intermediate Saturday, Sunday, or
legal holiday). During a continuance, such person must be detained.
(3) At the hearing, such defendant has the right to be represented
by counsel, and, if financially unable to obtain representation, to
have counsel appointed. The defendant must be afforded an opportunity
to testify, to present witnesses, to cross-examine witnesses who appear
at the hearing, and to present information by proffer or otherwise.
The rules concerning admissibility of evidence in criminal trials do
not apply to the presentation and consideration of information at the
hearing. The facts the judicial officer uses to support a finding that
no condition or combination of conditions will reasonably assure the
safety of any other person and the community must be supported by clear
and convincing evidence.
(4) The defendant may be detained pending completion of the
hearing. The hearing may be reopened, before or after a determination
by the judicial officer, at any time before trial if the judicial
officer finds that information exists that was not known to the movant
at the time of the hearing and that has a material bearing on the issue
whether there are conditions of release that will reasonably assure the
safety of any other person and the community.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 In a release order issued under section 3 of
this act the judicial officer must:
(1) Include a written statement that sets forth all the conditions
to which the release is subject, in a manner sufficiently clear and
specific to serve as a guide for the defendant's conduct; and
(2) Advise the defendant of:
(a) The penalties for violating a condition of release, including
the penalties for committing an offense while on pretrial release; and
(b) The consequences of violating a condition of release, including
the immediate issuance of a warrant for the defendant's arrest.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) In a detention order issued under
section 4 of this act, the judicial officer must:
(a) Include written findings of fact and a written statement of the
reasons for the detention;
(b) Direct that the person be committed to the custody of the
appropriate correctional authorities for confinement separate, to the
extent practicable, from persons awaiting or serving sentences or being
held in custody pending appeal; and
(c) Direct that the person be afforded reasonable opportunity for
private consultation with counsel.
(2) The judicial officer may, by subsequent order, permit the
temporary release of the person, in the custody of an appropriate law
enforcement officer or other appropriate person, to the extent that the
judicial officer determines such release to be necessary for
preparation of the person's defense or for another compelling reason.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Nothing in this chapter may be construed as
modifying or limiting the presumption of innocence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 1 through 11 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 10 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 This act takes effect January 1, 2011, if
the proposed amendment to Article I, section 20 of the state
Constitution proposed in House Joint Resolution No. 4220 is validly
submitted to and is approved and ratified by the voters at the next
general election. If the proposed amendment is not approved and
ratified, this act is void in its entirety.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 This act expires July 1, 2011.

--- END ---