BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 44.04.120 and 2009 c 549 s 6002 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each member of the senate or house of representatives when serving
on official legislative business shall be entitled to receive, in lieu
of per diem or any other payment, for each day or major portion thereof
in which he or she is actually engaged in legislative business or
business of the committee, commission, or council, notwithstanding any
laws to the contrary, an allowance in an amount fixed by the secretary
of the senate and chief clerk of the house, respectively, in accordance
with applicable rules and resolutions of each body. Such allowance
shall be reasonably calculated to reimburse expenses, exclusive of
mileage, which are ordinary and necessary in the conduct of legislative
business, recognizing cost variances which are encountered in different
locales. The allowance authorized shall not exceed the greater of
forty-four dollars per day or the maximum daily amount determined under
RCW 43.03.050, as now or hereafter amended. In addition, a mileage
allowance shall be paid at the rate per mile provided for in RCW
43.03.060, as now or hereafter amended, when authorized by the house,
committee, commission, or council of which he or she is a member and on
the business of which he or she is engaged.
During any special session of the legislature convened within
thirty days following a regular session of the legislature under
Article II, section 12 of the state Constitution, no member of the
legislature shall receive any allowances for per diem expenses under
Title 44 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---