BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.08.160 and 1947 c 134 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington state liquor board and the state finance
committee are ((hereby)) authorized to lease ((or)), purchase, or
acquire a site and erect a warehouse building in the city of Seattle,
and for that purpose may borrow money and may issue bonds in an amount
not to exceed one million five hundred thousand dollars to be amortized
from liquor revenues over a period of not to exceed ten years.
(2)(a) The board must within a commercially reasonable time sell
any warehouse building that: (i) Was purchased under subsection (1) of
this section; (ii) was purchased prior to the effective date of this
act; and (iii) is located on East Marginal Way.
(b) All funds derived from the sale, less the board's
administrative costs related to the sale, must be deposited in the
state general fund.
(c) Any sale of a warehouse building under this section is subject
to the competitive bidding process under RCW 43.19.1911.

--- END ---