BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the
Washington state health care freedom act of 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A law or rule pertaining to health care
shall not directly or indirectly compel any person, employer, or health
care provider to participate in any health care system.
(2) A person or employer may pay directly for lawful health care
services and shall not be required to pay any penalty, fine, or other
sanction for paying directly for lawful health care services.
(3) A health care provider may accept direct payment for lawful
health care services and shall not be required to pay any penalty,
fine, or other sanction for accepting direct payment from a person or
employer for lawful health care services.
(4) Subject to reasonable and necessary rules that do not
significantly and substantially limit a person's or employer's options
to participate in any health care system or obtain lawful health care
services, the purchase or sale of health insurance in private health
care systems shall not be prohibited by law or rule.
(5) The provisions of this section do not affect:
(a) Health care services a health care provider or facility is
required to perform or provide;
(b) Health care services permitted by law;
(c) The terms or conditions of any health care system to the extent
that those terms and conditions do not have the effect of sanctioning
a person or employer for paying directly for lawful health care
services or a health care provider or facility for accepting direct
payment from a person or employer for lawful health care services.
(6) No public official, law enforcement official, employee, or
agent of the state of Washington or any of its political subdivisions
shall act to impose, collect, enforce, or effectuate any civil or
criminal penalty as a result of any law or rule that violates the
provisions of this section.
(7) The attorney general shall take such action as is provided in
section 3 of this act, in the defense or prosecution of rights
protected under this section.
(8) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Compel" includes penalties, fines, or other sanctions.
(b) "Direct payment or pay directly" means payment for lawful
health care services without a public or private third party, not
including an employer, paying for any portion of the service.
(c) "Health care system" means any public or private entity whose
function or purpose is the management of, processing of, enrollment of
individuals for or payment for, in full or in part, health care
services or health care data or health care information for its
participants.
(d) "Lawful health care services" means any health-related service
or treatment to the extent that the service or treatment is permitted
or not prohibited by law or rule that may be provided by persons or
entities otherwise permitted or not prohibited by law to offer such
services.
(e) "Penalties, fines, or other sanctions" means any civil or
criminal penalty, fine, tax, salary or wage withholding, surcharge, or
any other sanction with a similar effect established by law or rule by
a government established, created, controlled, or regulated agency that
is used to sanction or discourage the exercise of rights protected
under this section.
(9) Any federal law, rule, order, or other act by the federal
government violating the provisions of this section is hereby declared
to be invalid in this state, is not recognized by and is specifically
rejected by this state, and is considered as null and void and of no
effect in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW
to read as follows:
The attorney general shall seek injunctive and any other
appropriate relief to preserve the rights of the citizens of Washington
state in the event that any law or regulation violating section 2 of
this act is enacted by any government, subdivision, or agency thereof.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 and 2 of this act are each added
to chapter 48.44 RCW.

--- END ---