BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature with this act intends to
provide an option for taxpayers to voluntarily contribute more to state
government. The legislature recognizes that citizens who desire to
contribute more to finance state government should have a convenient
way to do so and therefore the taxpayer choice account is created in
the state treasury.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW
to read as follows:
The taxpayer choice account is created in the state treasury. All
receipts from citizens' voluntary contributions, donations, gifts,
bequests, grants, or other sources granted or given for this account
must be deposited in the account. Money in the account may be spent
only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used
for any general fund or transportation purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act may be known and cited as the
taxpayer choice act.

--- END ---