BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this
section, the department must waive all penalties and interest otherwise
due under this chapter and that are unpaid as of the effective date of
this section, if all of the following circumstances are met:
(a) The penalties and interest are imposed with respect to: (i)
State business and occupation tax, state public utility tax, state or
local sales tax, or state or local use tax; and (ii) tax liability that
first became due to the department before February 1, 2011, which
includes taxes billed to the taxpayer, or disclosed by the taxpayer to
the department, on or after February 1, 2011, but that were required by
this chapter to have been reported and paid by the taxpayer before
February 1, 2011;
(b) The taxpayer must file with the department no later than April
18, 2011: (i) All outstanding tax returns for the taxes specified in
(a)(i) of this subsection (1); and (ii) any amended returns covering
tax liabilities with respect to which a penalty and interest waiver
under this section is requested;
(c) Before May 1, 2011, the taxpayer must remit full payment to the
department of the balance due on all tax liabilities for which a
penalty and interest waiver under this section is requested. If a
waiver is requested for penalties or interest associated with an
invoice that has been billed to the taxpayer, the taxpayer must remit
full payment to the department of the entire balance due on that
invoice other than any penalty and interest eligible for waiver under
this section, even if the invoice includes taxes not specified in
(a)(i) of this subsection (1). If the invoice is a tax warrant, the
taxpayer must also remit full payment to the department of any filing
or other fees added to the tax warrant, including the filing fees
provided in RCW 36.18.012 (2) and (10), the fee imposed in RCW
36.18.016(4), and the surcharge imposed in RCW 40.14.027;
(d) The taxpayer must file and pay in full by the due date all tax
returns that become due after January 31, 2011, and before May 1, 2011,
for all taxes administered by the department under this chapter;
(e) No later than April 18, 2011, the department must receive a
completed application for penalty and interest waiver under this
section in a form and manner prescribed by the department;
(f) The taxpayer must never have had an evasion penalty assessed
against the taxpayer by the department under RCW 82.32.090 or a penalty
assessed against the taxpayer by the department under RCW 82.32.291 for
misusing a reseller permit or resale certificate; and
(g) The taxpayer must never have been a defendant in a criminal
prosecution related to an offense involving the failure to collect or
pay the proper amount of any tax administered by the department under
this chapter.
(2) Taxpayers receiving penalty or interest relief under this
section may not seek a refund, or otherwise challenge the amount, of
any tax liability paid as required by subsection (1)(c) of this
section. This subsection (2) applies to refund requests or appeals
filed directly with the department and to proceedings brought in any
court or administrative tribunal.
(3) All tax liability reported and paid as required in subsection
(1)(b), (c) and (d) of this section is subject to verification by the
department as provided in RCW 82.32.050. This section does not
preclude the assessment of taxes, penalties, and interest with respect
to any amounts determined by the department to have been underpaid for
any tax period for which the taxpayer previously received penalty or
interest relief under this section.
(4) This section does not authorize the department to waive the
evasion penalty currently authorized by RCW 82.32.090(7) or the penalty
currently authorized by RCW 82.32.291 for misusing a reseller permit or
resale certificate.
(5) If taxpayers are current for tax returns due as of November 25,
2010, tax liability that accrues after that date would not qualify
under this section.
(6) Nothing in this section may be construed as requiring a
taxpayer to have first paid any penalty or interest for which a waiver
is sought under this section.
(7) Solely for purposes of determining whether a taxpayer qualifies
for a waiver of penalties or interest under this section with respect
to a balance owing as of the effective date of this section on any
invoice issued by the department, any payments made to the department
on that taxpayer's account before May 1, 2011, are deemed to have been
applied first to any of the taxes specified in subsection (1)(a)(i) of
this section, then to any other taxes, and then to penalties or
interest, if such payments were applied either:
(a) To that invoice; or
(b) Against any liability reflected in that invoice before that
invoice was issued by the department.
(8) A taxpayer in a bankruptcy proceeding is ineligible for relief
under this section to the extent that the payment of any tax debt by
the taxpayer to the department as required under this section violates
the federal bankruptcy code.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.32.080 and 2010 c 106 s 226 and 2010 c 111 s 304
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) When authorized by the department, payment of the tax may be
made by uncertified check under such rules as the department
prescribes, but, if a check so received is not paid by the bank on
which it is drawn, the taxpayer, by whom such check is tendered, will
remain liable for payment of the tax and for all legal penalties and
interest, the same as if such check had not been tendered.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, payment of
the tax must be made by electronic funds transfer, as defined in RCW
82.32.085, if the taxpayer is required to file and remit its taxes on
a monthly basis. As an alternative to electronic funds transfer, the
department may authorize other forms of electronic payment, such as
credit card and e-check. All taxes administered by this chapter are
subject to this requirement except the taxes authorized by chapters
82.14A, 82.14B, 82.24, 82.29A, and 84.33 RCW. It is the intent of this
subsection to require electronic payment for those taxes reported on
the department's combined excise tax return or any successor return.
The mandatory electronic payment requirement in this subsection also
applies to taxpayers who: (i) Are subject to the tax imposed in RCW
82.04.257 but for whom the department has authorized a tax reporting
frequency that is less frequent than monthly; or (ii) meet the
threshold for filing and remitting taxes on a monthly basis as
established by rule of the department but for whom the department has
authorized a less frequent reporting frequency, when such authorization
became effective on or after July 26, 2009.
(b) The department, for good cause, may waive the electronic
payment requirement in this subsection for any taxpayer. In the
discretion of the department, a waiver under this subsection may be
made temporary or permanent, and may be made on the department's own
motion.
(c) The department is authorized to accept payment of taxes by
electronic funds transfer or other acceptable forms of electronic
payment from taxpayers that are not subject to the mandatory electronic
payment requirements in this subsection.
(3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, returns
must be filed electronically using the department's online tax filing
service, if the taxpayer is required to file and remit its taxes on a
monthly basis. The mandatory electronic filing requirement in this
subsection also applies to taxpayers who: (i) Are subject to the tax
imposed in RCW 82.04.257 but for whom the department has authorized a
tax reporting frequency that is less frequent than monthly; or (ii)
meet the threshold for filing and remitting taxes on a monthly basis as
established by rule of the department but for whom the department has
authorized a less frequent reporting frequency, when such authorization
became effective on or after July 26, 2009.
(b) The department, for good cause, may waive the electronic filing
requirement in this subsection for any taxpayer. In the discretion of
the department, a waiver under this subsection may be made temporary or
permanent, and may be made on the department's own motion.
(c) The department is authorized to allow electronic filing of
returns from taxpayers that are not subject to the mandatory electronic
filing requirements in this subsection.
(4)(a)(i) The department, for good cause shown, may extend the time
for making and filing any return, and may grant such reasonable
additional time within which to make and file returns as it may deem
proper, but any permanent extension granting the taxpayer a reporting
date without penalty more than ten days beyond the due date, and any
extension in excess of thirty days must be conditional on deposit with
the department of an amount to be determined by the department which is
approximately equal to the estimated tax liability for the reporting
period or periods for which the extension is granted. In the case of
a permanent extension or a temporary extension of more than thirty days
the deposit must be deposited within the state treasury with other tax
funds and a credit recorded to the taxpayer's account which may be
applied to taxpayer's liability upon cancellation of the permanent
extension or upon reporting of the tax liability where an extension of
more than thirty days has been granted.
(ii) The department must review the requirement for deposit at
least annually and may require a change in the amount of the deposit
required when it believes that such amount does not approximate the tax
liability for the reporting period or periods for which the extension
is granted.
(b) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12),
the department, on its own motion or at the request of any taxpayer
affected by the emergency, may extend the time for making or filing any
return as the department deems proper. The department may not require
any deposit as a condition for granting an extension under this
subsection (4)(b).
(5) The department must keep full and accurate records of all funds
received and disbursed by it. Subject to the provisions of RCW
82.32.105, section 1 of this act, and 82.32.350, the department must
apply the payment of the taxpayer first against penalties and interest,
and then upon the tax, without regard to any direction of the taxpayer.
(6) The department may refuse to accept any return that is not
accompanied by a remittance of the tax shown to be due thereon or that
is not filed electronically as required in this section. When such
return is not accepted, the taxpayer is deemed to have failed or
refused to file a return and is subject to the procedures provided in
RCW 82.32.100 and to the penalties provided in RCW 82.32.090. The
above authority to refuse to accept a return may not apply when a
return is timely filed electronically and a timely payment has been
made by electronic funds transfer or other form of electronic payment
as authorized by the department.
(7) Except for returns and remittances required to be transmitted
to the department electronically under this section and except as
otherwise provided in this chapter, a return or remittance that is
transmitted to the department by United States mail is deemed filed or
received on the date shown by the post office cancellation mark stamped
upon the envelope containing it. A return or remittance that is
transmitted to the department electronically is deemed filed or
received according to procedures set forth by the department.
(8)(a) For purposes of subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
"good cause" means the inability of a taxpayer to comply with the
requirements of subsection (2) or (3) of this section because:
(i) The taxpayer does not have the equipment or software necessary
to enable the taxpayer to comply with subsection (2) or (3) of this
section;
(ii) The equipment or software necessary to enable the taxpayer to
comply with subsection (2) or (3) of this section is not functioning
properly;
(iii) The taxpayer does not have access to the internet using the
taxpayer's own equipment;
(iv) The taxpayer does not have a bank account or a credit card;
(v) The taxpayer's bank is unable to send or receive electronic
funds transfer transactions; or
(vi) Some other circumstance or condition exists that, in the
department's judgment, prevents the taxpayer from complying with the
requirements of subsection (2) or (3) of this section.
(b) "Good cause" also includes any circumstance that, in the
department's judgment, supports the efficient or effective
administration of the tax laws of this state, including providing
relief from the requirements of subsection (2) or (3) of this section
to any taxpayer that is voluntarily collecting and remitting this
state's sales or use taxes on sales to Washington customers but has no
legal requirement to be registered with the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
February 1, 2011.

--- END ---