BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.413.040 and 2018 c 153 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) A person working as a paraeducator for a school district before or during the 2017-18 school year must meet the requirements of subsection (2) of this section by the date of hire for the 2019-20 school year or any subsequent school year.

(b) A person who has not previously worked as a paraeducator for a school district must meet the requirements of subsection (2) of this section by the date of hire for the 2018-19 school year or any subsequent school year.

(2) The minimum employment requirements for paraeducators are as provided in this subsection. A paraeducator must:

(a) Be at least ((eighteen))18 years of age and hold a high school diploma or its equivalent; and

(b) Meet one of the following requirements:

(i) Have received a passing ((grade))score on ((the education testing service paraeducator assessment))one of the assessments approved by the board; ((or))

(ii) Hold an associate of arts degree; ((or))

(iii) Have earned ((seventy-two))72 quarter credits or ((forty-eight))48 semester credits at an institution of higher education; or

(iv) Have completed a registered apprenticeship program.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.413.030 and 2017 c 237 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The paraeducator board has the following powers and duties:

(a) Based on the recommendations of the paraeducator work group established in chapter 136, Laws of 2014, adopt: (i) Minimum employment requirements for paraeducators, as described in RCW 28A.413.040; and (ii) paraeducator standards of practice, as described in RCW 28A.413.050;

(b) Adopt one or more assessments that meet a rigorous standard of quality and can be used to demonstrate knowledge of, and the ability to assist in, instruction in reading, writing, and mathematics, as well as set a passing score for each assessment adopted. The board may develop assessments to meet the requirement of this subsection (1)(b);

(c) Establish requirements and policies for a general paraeducator certificate, as described in RCW 28A.413.070;

(((c)))(d) Based on the recommendations of the paraeducator work group established in chapter 136, Laws of 2014, establish requirements and policies for subject matter certificates in English language learner and special education, as described in RCW 28A.413.080;

(((d)))(e) Based on the recommendations of the paraeducator work group established in chapter 136, Laws of 2014, establish requirements and policies for an advanced paraeducator certificate, as described in RCW 28A.413.090;

(((e)))(f) By September 1, 2018, approve, and develop if necessary, courses required to meet the provisions of this chapter, where the courses are offered in a variety of means that will limit cost and improve access;

(((f)))(g) Make policy recommendations, as necessary, for a paraeducator career ladder that will increase opportunities for paraeducator advancement through advanced education, professional learning, and increased instructional responsibility;

(((g)))(h) Collaborate with the office of the superintendent of public instruction to adapt the electronic educator certification process to include paraeducator certificates; and

(((h)))(i) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW that are necessary for the effective and efficient implementation of this chapter.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall act as the administrator of any such rules and have the power to issue any paraeducator certificates and revoke the same in accordance with board rules.

--- END ---