BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28B.35 RCW to read as follows:

The board of trustees of the regional universities may offer applied, but not research, doctorate level degrees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 28B.35.215 (Doctorate level degrees in physical therapy) and 2012 c 229 s 812 & 2001 c 252 s 1;

(2) RCW 28B.35.216 (Doctorate level degrees in audiology) and 2013 c 281 s 1; and

(3) RCW 28B.35.218 (Doctorate level degrees in education) and 2020 c 15 s 1.

--- END ---