BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 1.60.030 and 2015 c 4 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The award will be presented by the governor of the state of Washington to the recipient or recipients ((only during a joint session of both houses of the legislature)).

(2) If the governor is unable to present the award ((due to the disability or illness of the governor)), the governor may delegate the presenting of the award to the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, or the chief justice of the supreme court.

--- END ---