BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) Code cities must adopt or amend by ordinance, and incorporate into their development regulations, zoning regulations, and other official controls the requirements of subsection (2) of this section by July 1, 2024.

(b) Beginning July 1, 2024, the requirements of subsection (2) of this section apply and take effect in any code city that has not adopted or amended ordinances, regulations, or other official controls as required under this section and supersede, preempt, and invalidate any conflicting local development regulations.

(2) Through ordinances, development regulations, zoning regulations, or other official controls as required under subsection (1) of this section, code cities may not:

(a) Impose a restriction on housing unit density that prevents the addition of housing units constructed entirely within an existing building envelope in a building located within a zone that permits multifamily housing, provided that generally applicable health and safety standards, including but not limited to building code standards and fire and life safety standards, can be met within the building;

(b) Impose parking requirements on the addition of dwelling units or living units added within an existing building;

(c) Impose permitting requirements on the use of an existing building for residential purposes beyond those requirements generally applicable to all residential development within the building's zone;

(d) Impose design standard requirements, including setbacks, lot coverage, and floor area ratio requirements, on the use of an existing building for residential purposes beyond those requirements generally applicable to all residential development within the building's zone;

(e) Impose exterior design or architectural requirements on the residential use of an existing building beyond those necessary for health and safety of the use of the interior of the building, unless the building is listed on a local historic register through a local preservation ordinance, the Washington heritage register as described in RCW 27.34.220, or the national register of historic places as defined in the national historic preservation act of 1966 (Title 1, Sec. 101, Public Law 89-665; 80 Stat. 915; 16 U.S.C. Sec. 470) as now or hereafter amended;

(f) Prohibit the addition of housing units in any specific part of a building, unless the addition of the units would violate applicable building codes or health and safety standards;

(g) Require a building used for residential purposes to meet the current energy code solely because of the addition of new dwelling units within the building;

(h) Deny a building permit application for the addition of housing units to an existing building due to the nonconformity of the existing structure including, but not limited to, nonconformity regarding parking, height, setbacks, elevator size for gurney transport, or modulation, unless the legislative authority of the code city makes written findings that the nonconformity is causing a significant detriment to the surrounding area; or

(i) Require a transportation concurrency study under RCW 36.70A.070 or an environmental study under chapter 43.21C RCW based on the addition of residential units within an existing building.

(3) Nothing in this section requires a code city to approve a building permit application for the addition of housing units constructed entirely within an existing building envelope in a building located within a zone that permits multifamily housing in cases in which the building cannot satisfy life safety standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) Cities must adopt or amend by ordinance, and incorporate into their development regulations, zoning regulations, and other official controls the requirements of subsection (2) of this section by July 1, 2024.

(b) Beginning July 1, 2024, the requirements of subsection (2) of this section apply and take effect in any city that has not adopted or amended ordinances, regulations, or other official controls as required under this section and supersede, preempt, and invalidate any conflicting local development regulations.

(2) Through ordinances, development regulations, zoning regulations, or other official controls as required under subsection (1) of this section, cities may not:

(a) Impose a restriction on housing unit density that prevents the addition of housing units constructed entirely within an existing building envelope in a building located within a zone that permits multifamily housing, provided that generally applicable health and safety standards, including but not limited to building code standards and fire and life safety standards, can be met within the building;

(b) Impose parking requirements on the addition of dwelling units or living units added within an existing building;

(c) Impose permitting requirements on the use of an existing building for residential purposes beyond those requirements generally applicable to all residential development within the building's zone;

(d) Impose design standard requirements, including setbacks, lot coverage, and floor area ratio requirements, on the use of an existing building for residential purposes beyond those requirements generally applicable to all residential development within the building's zone;

(e) Impose exterior design or architectural requirements on the residential use of an existing building beyond those necessary for health and safety of the use of the interior of the building, unless the building is listed on a local historic register through a local preservation ordinance, the Washington heritage register as described in RCW 27.34.220, or the national register of historic places as defined in the national historic preservation act of 1966 (Title 1, Sec. 101, Public Law 89-665; 80 Stat. 915; 16 U.S.C. Sec. 470) as now or hereafter amended;

(f) Prohibit the addition of housing units in any specific part of a building, unless the addition of the units would violate applicable building codes or health and safety standards;

(g) Require a building used for residential purposes to meet the current energy code solely because of the addition of new dwelling units within the building;

(h) Deny a building permit application for the addition of housing units to an existing building due to the nonconformity of an existing structure including, but not limited to, nonconformity regarding parking, height, setbacks, elevator size for gurney transport, or modulation, unless the legislative authority of the city makes written findings that the nonconformity is causing a significant detriment to the surrounding area; or

(i) Require a transportation concurrency study under RCW 36.70A.070 or an environmental study under chapter 43.21C RCW based on the addition of residential units within an existing building.

(3) Nothing in this section requires a city to approve a building permit application for the addition of housing units constructed entirely within an existing building envelope in a building located within a zone that permits multifamily housing in cases in which the building cannot satisfy life safety standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 19.27A RCW to read as follows:

By January 1, 2024, the state building code council shall adopt by rule an amendment to the current energy code that waives the requirement for an existing building used for residential purposes to meet the current energy code solely because of the addition of new dwelling units within the building.

--- END ---