BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 64.32 RCW to read as follows:

Except for occupancy limits on short-term rentals as defined in RCW 64.37.010, an association of apartment owners may not adopt or enforce a restriction, covenant, condition, bylaw, rule, regulation, provision of a governing document, or master that regulates or limits the number of unrelated persons that may occupy an apartment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 64.34 RCW to read as follows:

Except for occupancy limits on short-term rentals as defined in RCW 64.37.010, a unit owners' association may not adopt or enforce a restriction, covenant, condition, bylaw, rule, regulation, provision of a governing document, or master that regulates or limits the number of unrelated persons that may occupy a unit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW to read as follows:

Except for occupancy limits on short-term rentals as defined in RCW 64.37.010, a homeowners' association may not adopt or enforce a restriction, covenant, condition, bylaw, rule, regulation, provision of a governing document, or master that regulates or limits the number of unrelated persons that may occupy a lot.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 64.90 RCW to read as follows:

Except for occupancy limits on short-term rentals as defined in RCW 64.37.010, a unit owners association may not adopt or enforce a restriction, covenant, condition, bylaw, rule, regulation, provision of a governing document, or master that regulates or limits the number of unrelated persons that may occupy a unit.

--- END ---