BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.68A.040 and 1989 c 32 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty of sexual exploitation of a minor if the person:

(a) Compels a minor by threat or force to engage in sexually explicit conduct, knowing that such conduct will be photographed or part of a live performance;

(b) Aids, invites, employs, authorizes, or causes a minor to engage in sexually explicit conduct, knowing that such conduct will be photographed or part of a live performance; ((or))

(c) Being a parent, legal guardian, or person having custody or control of a minor, permits the minor to engage in sexually explicit conduct, knowing that the conduct will be photographed or part of a live performance; or

(d) Knowingly causes a minor to be photographed or part of a live performance which depicts the minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct where the minor is unconscious or unaware of the photograph or recording.

(2) It is not a violation of this section if an individual takes a photograph or video of a third party committing the offense under this section with a good faith intent to assist with an investigation or prosecution by documenting the offensive behavior.

(3) Sexual exploitation of a minor is a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

Sec. 2. RCW 9.68A.053 and 2019 c 128 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)(i) A person under the age of eighteen commits the crime of a minor dealing in depictions of another minor thirteen years of age or older engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the first degree when he or she knowingly distributes, publishes, transfers, disseminates, or exchanges a visual or printed matter that depicts another minor thirteen years of age or older engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (a) through (e).

(ii) Minor dealing in depictions of another minor thirteen years of age or older engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the first degree is a gross misdemeanor.

(b)(i) A person under the age of eighteen commits the crime of a minor dealing in depictions of another minor thirteen years of age or older engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the second degree when he or she knowingly distributes, publishes, transfers, disseminates, or exchanges a visual or printed matter that depicts another minor thirteen years of age or older engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (f) or (g).

(ii) Minor dealing in depictions of another minor thirteen years of age or older engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the second degree is a misdemeanor.

(2)(a) A person under age eighteen commits the crime of minor dealing in depictions of another minor twelve years of age or younger engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the first degree when he or she:

(i) Knowingly develops, duplicates, publishes, prints, disseminates, exchanges, finances, attempts to finance, or sells a visual or printed matter that depicts another minor twelve years of age or younger engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (a) through (e); or

(ii) Possesses with intent to develop, duplicate, publish, print, disseminate, exchange, or sell any visual or printed matter that depicts another minor twelve years of age or younger engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (a) through (e).

(b) Minor dealing in depictions of another minor twelve years of age or younger engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the first degree is a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(3)(a) A person under age eighteen commits the crime of minor dealing in depictions of another minor twelve years of age or younger engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the second degree when he or she:

(i) Knowingly develops, duplicates, publishes, prints, disseminates, exchanges, finances, attempts to finance, or sells any visual or printed matter that depicts another minor twelve years of age or younger engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (f) or (g); or

(ii) Possesses with intent to develop, duplicate, publish, print, disseminate, exchange, or sell any visual or printed matter that depicts another minor twelve years of age or younger engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (f) or (g).

(b) Minor dealing in depictions of a minor twelve years of age or younger engaged in sexually explicit conduct in the second degree is a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(4)(a) Any person under the age of eighteen commits the crime of minor financing or selling depictions of another minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct when he or she finances, attempts to finance, or sells a visual or printed matter that depicts a minor engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (a) through (g).

(b) Minor financing or selling depictions of another minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct is a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(5)(a) A person under the age of eighteen commits the crime of minor selling depictions of himself or herself engaged in sexually explicit conduct when he or she sells a visual or printed matter that depicts himself or herself engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) (a) through (g) and that visual or printed matter does not include any depiction of another minor engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4).

(b) Minor selling depictions of himself or herself engaged in sexually explicit conduct is a misdemeanor.

(6) This section does not apply to a person under eighteen years of age who finances, attempts to finance, develops, duplicates, publishes, prints, disseminates, exchanges, or possesses a visual or printed matter that depicts himself or herself engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4) and that visual or printed matter does not include any depiction of another minor engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct as defined in RCW 9.68A.011(4).

(7) For the purposes of determining the unit of prosecution under this section, each depiction or image of visual or printed matter constitutes a separate offense.

--- END ---