BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the commission shall contract with an expert or organization with expertise in interrogation tactics to develop, administer, and periodically revise a training in evidence-based, noncoercive interrogation techniques for law enforcement personnel.

(2) The training must include, but is not limited to, instruction on the use of the following interrogation techniques:

(a) The preparation and planning, engage and explain, account, closure and evaluate method;

(b) The strategic use of true evidence;

(c) The cognitive interview; and

(d) The trauma-informed interview.

(3) After development of the training is completed, the commission shall make the training available at no cost to all law enforcement personnel and law enforcement agencies in the state.

(4) The commission shall begin offering the training by July 1, 2025.

(5) Any law enforcement agency may contract for or otherwise receive training in evidence-based, noncoercive interrogation techniques from entities other than or in addition to the commission or the commission's contracted expert or organization, provided that any entity that the law enforcement agency contracts with or otherwise receives such training from must be certified in the techniques described under subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2024, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.

--- END ---