BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. RCW 1.08.025 directs the code reviser, with the approval of the statute law committee, to prepare legislation for submission to the legislature "concerning deficiencies, conflicts, or obsolete provisions" in statutes. This act makes technical, nonsubstantive amendments as follows:

(1) Part 1 of this act merges multiple amendments created when sections were amended without reference to other amendments made in the same session.

(2) Part 2 of this act updates references in the code to the "department of community, trade, and economic development" with the "department of commerce," in accordance with the renaming of that department by chapter 565, Laws of 2009.

(3) Section 3001 of this act adds an expiration date to amendments to RCW 51.32.099. The underlying section expired June 30, 2016, but expiration dates for three amendatory sections were apparently omitted in error.

(4) Section 3002 of this act repeals an expiration date for 2011 amendments to RCW 74.60.020 and 74.60.090. The repealed expiration date conflicts with the expiration date provided in RCW 74.60.901.

(5) Section 3003 of this act decodifies groups that are no longer active.

(6) Sections 3004 through 3006 of this act reorganize subsection numbering so that distinct criminal penalties are located in separate paragraphs.

(7) Sections 3007 through 3010 of this act correct terminology relating to behavioral health disorders in certain sex offense statutes.

(8) Section 3011 of this act updates a reference to a federal law which was reclassified and renumbered in 2017.

(9) Section 3012 of this act updates a subsection reference in RCW 9A.72.160.

(10) Sections 3013 through 3015 of this act replace instances of the word "marijuana" with "cannabis," in accordance with chapter 16, Laws of 2022.

(11) Section 3016 of this act corrects an erroneous section reference.

(12) Section 3017 of this act changes the term "apartment" to "lot" in a section of chapter 64.38 RCW, relating to homeowners' associations.

(13) Sections 3018 and 3019 of this act correct an erroneous subsection reference.

(14) Sections 3020 and 3021 of this act replace an erroneous usage of the word "county" with "country."

PART 1

MERGING MULTIPLE AMENDMENTS

Sec. 1001. RCW 10.99.030 and 2019 c 367 s 1 and 2019 c 110 s 2 are each reenacted to read as follows:

(1) The primary duty of peace officers, when responding to a domestic violence situation, is to enforce the laws allegedly violated and to protect the complaining party.

(2)(a) When a peace officer responds to a domestic violence call and has probable cause to believe that a crime has been committed, the peace officer shall exercise arrest powers with reference to the criteria in RCW 10.31.100. The officer shall notify the victim of the victim's right to initiate a criminal proceeding in all cases where the officer has not exercised arrest powers or decided to initiate criminal proceedings by citation or otherwise. The parties in such cases shall also be advised of the importance of preserving evidence.

(b) A peace officer responding to a domestic violence call shall take a complete offense report including the officer's disposition of the case.

(3)(a) A peace officer who responds to a domestic violence call and has probable cause to believe that a crime has been committed shall:

(i) Seize all firearms and ammunition the peace officer has reasonable grounds to believe were used or threatened to be used in the commission of the offense;

(ii) Seize all firearms in plain sight or discovered pursuant to a lawful search; and

(iii) Request consent to take temporary custody of any other firearms and ammunition to which the alleged abuser has access until a judicial officer has heard the matter.

(b) The peace officer shall separate the parties and then inquire of the victim: (i) If there are any firearms or ammunition in the home that are owned or possessed by either party; (ii) if the alleged abuser has access to any other firearms located off-site; and (iii) whether the alleged abuser has an active concealed pistol license, so that there is a complete record for future court proceedings. The inquiry should make clear to the victim that the peace officer is not asking only about whether a firearm was used at the time of the incident but also under other circumstances, such as whether the alleged abuser has kept a firearm in plain sight in a manner that is coercive, has threatened use of firearms in the past, or has additional firearms in a vehicle or other location. Law enforcement personnel may use a pictorial display of common firearms to assist the victim in identifying firearms.

(c) The peace officer shall document all information about firearms and concealed pistol licenses in the incident report. The incident report must be coded to indicate the presence of or access to firearms so that personal recognizance screeners, prosecutors, and judicial officers address the heightened risk to victim, family, and peace officer safety due to the alleged abuser's access to firearms.

(d) A law enforcement agency shall comply with the provisions of RCW 9.41.340 and 9.41.345 before the return of any firearm or ammunition seized under this subsection to the owner or individual from who the firearm or ammunition was obtained.

(4) When a peace officer responds to a domestic violence call:

(a) The officer shall advise victims of all reasonable means to prevent further abuse, including advising each person of the availability of a shelter or other services in the community, and giving each person immediate notice of the legal rights and remedies available. The notice shall include handing each person a copy of the following statement:

"IF YOU ARE THE VICTIM OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE, you can ask the city or county prosecuting attorney to file a criminal complaint. You also have the right to file a petition in superior, district, or municipal court requesting an order for protection from domestic abuse which could include any of the following: (a) An order restraining your abuser from further acts of abuse; (b) an order directing your abuser to leave your household; (c) an order preventing your abuser from entering your residence, school, business, or place of employment; (d) an order awarding you or the other parent custody of or visitation with your minor child or children; (e) an order restraining your abuser from molesting or interfering with minor children in your custody; and (f) an order requiring your abuser to turn in any firearms and concealed pistol license in the abuser's possession or control to law enforcement and prohibiting the abuser from possessing or accessing firearms or a concealed pistol license for the duration of the civil order. The forms you need to obtain a protection order are available in any municipal, district, or superior court.

Information about shelters and alternatives to domestic violence is available from a statewide twenty-four-hour toll-free hotline at (include appropriate phone number). The battered women's shelter and other resources in your area are . . . . . (include local information)"; and

(b) The officer is encouraged to inform victims that information on traumatic brain injury can be found on the statewide website developed under RCW 74.31.070.

(5) The peace officer may offer, arrange, or facilitate transportation for the victim to a hospital for treatment of injuries or to a place of safety or shelter.

(6) An appointed or elected public official, public employee, or public agency as defined in RCW 4.24.470, or units of local government and its employees, as provided in RCW 36.28A.010, are immune from civil liability for damages arising out of the seizure or lack of seizure of a firearm, unless it is shown that the official, employee, or agency acted with gross negligence or in bad faith.

Sec. 1002. RCW 10.99.033 and 2019 c 367 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All training relating to the handling of domestic violence complaints by law enforcement officers must stress enforcement of criminal laws in domestic situations, availability of community resources, and protection of the victim. Law enforcement agencies and community organizations with expertise in the issue of domestic violence shall cooperate in all aspects of such training.

(2) The criminal justice training commission shall implement by July 28, 2019, a course of instruction for the training of law enforcement officers in Washington in the handling of domestic violence complaints. The basic law enforcement curriculum of the criminal justice training commission must include at least twenty hours of basic training instruction on the law enforcement response to domestic violence. The course of instruction, the learning and performance objectives, and the standards for the training must be developed by the commission and focus on enforcing the criminal laws, safety of the victim, and holding the perpetrator accountable for the violence. The curriculum must include training on the extent and prevalence of domestic violence, the importance of criminal justice intervention, techniques for responding to incidents that minimize the likelihood of officer injury and that promote victim safety, investigation and interviewing skills, evidence gathering and report writing, assistance to and services for victims and children, understanding the risks of traumatic brain injury posed by domestic violence, verification and enforcement of court orders, liability, and any additional provisions that are necessary to carry out the intention of this subsection.

(3) The criminal justice training commission shall develop and update annually an in-service training program to familiarize law enforcement officers with domestic violence laws. The program must include techniques for handling incidents of domestic violence that minimize the likelihood of injury to the officer and that promote the safety of all parties. The commission shall make the training program available to all law enforcement agencies in the state.

(4) Development of the training in subsections (2) and (3) of this section must be conducted in conjunction with agencies having a primary responsibility for serving victims of domestic violence with emergency shelter and other services, and representatives to the statewide organization providing training and education to these organizations and to the general public.

Sec. 1003. RCW 10.99.080 and 2015 c 275 s 14 and 2015 c 265 s 24 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) All superior courts, and courts organized under Title 3 or 35 RCW, may impose a penalty of one hundred dollars, plus an additional fifteen dollars on any ((person))adult offender convicted of a crime involving domestic violence; in no case shall a penalty assessment exceed one hundred fifteen dollars on any adult offender convicted of a crime involving domestic violence. The assessment shall be in addition to, and shall not supersede, any other penalty, restitution, fines, or costs provided by law.

(2) Revenue from the:

(a) One hundred dollar assessment shall be used solely for the purposes of establishing and funding domestic violence advocacy and domestic violence prevention and prosecution programs in the city or county of the court imposing the assessment. Such revenue from the assessment shall not be used for indigent criminal defense. If the city or county does not have domestic violence advocacy or domestic violence prevention and prosecution programs, cities and counties may use the revenue collected from the assessment to contract with recognized community-based domestic violence program providers.

(b) Fifteen dollar assessment must be remitted monthly to the state treasury for deposit in the domestic violence prevention account.

(3) The one hundred dollar assessment imposed under this section shall not be subject to any state or local remittance requirements under chapter 3.46, 3.50, 3.62, 7.68, 10.82, or 35.20 RCW.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "convicted" includes a plea of guilty, a finding of guilt regardless of whether the imposition of the sentence is deferred or any part of the penalty is suspended, or the levying of a fine. For the purposes of this section, "domestic violence" has the same meaning as that term is defined under RCW 10.99.020 and includes violations of equivalent local ordinances.

(5) When determining whether to impose a penalty assessment under this section, judges are encouraged to solicit input from the victim or representatives for the victim in assessing the ability of the convicted offender to pay the penalty, including information regarding current financial obligations, family circumstances, and ongoing restitution.

Sec. 1004. RCW 28A.300.145 and 2013 c 85 s 1 and 2013 c 10 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington coalition of sexual assault programs, in consultation with the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, the Washington state school directors' association, the association of Washington school principals, the center for children and youth justice, youthcare, the committee for children, the department of ((early learning))children, youth, and families, the department of social and health services, the office of crime victims advocacy, other relevant organizations, and the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall by June 1, 2014, update existing educational materials made available throughout the state to inform parents, students, school districts, and other interested community members about:

(a) The laws related to sex offenses, including the legal elements of ((sexual [sex]))sex offenses under chapter 9A.44 RCW where a minor is a victim, the consequences upon conviction, and sex offender registration, community notification, and the classification of sex offenders based on an assessment of the risk of reoffending;

(b) How to recognize behaviors characteristic of sex offenses and sex offenders;

(c) How to prevent victimization, particularly that of young children;

(d) How to take advantage of community resources for victims of sexual assault;

(e) How to prevent children from being recruited into sex trafficking; and

(((6)))(f) Other information as deemed appropriate.

(2) By September 1, 2014, and biennially thereafter, the Washington coalition of sexual assault programs, in consultation with the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, and the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall review and update the educational materials developed under subsection (1) of this section to assure that they remain current and accurate, and are age-appropriate for a variety of ages.

(3) Every public school that offers sexual health education must assure that sexual health education complies with existing requirements in the January 2005 guidelines for sexual health information and disease prevention developed by the department of health and the superintendent of public instruction. Specifically, sexual health education must attempt to achieve the objective "take responsibility for and understand the consequences of their own behavior" and the objective "avoid exploitive or manipulative relationships." To do this, sexual health education programs should include age-appropriate information about the legal elements of ((sexual [sex]))sex offenses under chapter 9A.44 RCW where a minor is a victim and the consequences upon conviction, as well as the other information required to be included in informational materials prepared pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. Public schools that offer sexual health education are encouraged to incorporate the materials developed under subsection (1) of this section into the curriculum.

Sec. 1005. RCW 43.03.305 and 2011 c 254 s 1 and 2011 c 60 s 34 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

There is created a commission to be known as the Washington citizens' commission on salaries for elected officials, to consist of members appointed by the governor as provided in this section.

(1) One registered voter from each congressional district shall be selected by the secretary of state from among those registered voters eligible to vote at the time persons are selected for appointment to serve on the commission. The secretary shall establish policies and procedures for conducting the selection by lot. The policies and procedures shall include, but not be limited to, those for notifying persons selected and for providing a new selection from a congressional district if a person selected from the district declines appointment to the commission or if, following the person's appointment, the person's position on the commission becomes vacant before the end of the person's term of office.

(2) Seven commission members, all residents of this state, shall be selected jointly by the speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate. The persons selected under this subsection shall have had experience in the field of personnel management. Of these seven members, one shall be selected from each of the following five sectors in this state: Private institutions of higher education; business; professional personnel management; legal profession; and organized labor. Of the two remaining members, one shall be a person recommended to the speaker and the president by the chair of the Washington personnel resources board and one shall be a person recommended by majority vote of the presidents of the state's four-year institutions of higher education.

(3) The secretary of state shall forward the names of persons selected under subsection (1) of this section and the speaker of the house of representatives and president of the senate shall forward the names of persons selected under subsection (2) of this section to the governor who shall appoint these persons to the commission. Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, all members shall serve four-year terms and the names of the persons selected for appointment to the commission shall be forwarded to the governor not later than the first day of July every two years.

(4) No person may be appointed to more than two terms. No member of the commission may be removed by the governor during his or her term of office unless for cause of incapacity, incompetence, neglect of duty, or malfeasance in office or for a disqualifying change of residence.

The unexcused absence of any person who is a member of the commission from two consecutive meetings of the commission shall constitute the relinquishment of that person's membership on the commission. Such a relinquishment creates a vacancy in that person's position on the commission. A member's absence may be excused by the chair of the commission upon the member's written request if the chair believes there is just cause for the absence. Such a request must be received by the chair before the meeting for which the absence is to be excused. A member's absence from a meeting of the commission may also be excused during the meeting for which the member is absent by the affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the commission present at the meeting.

(5) No state official, public employee, or lobbyist, or immediate family member of the official, employee, or lobbyist, subject to the registration requirements of chapter ((42.17 or)) 42.17A RCW is eligible for membership on the commission.

As used in this subsection the phrase "immediate family" means the parents, spouse or domestic partner, siblings, children, or dependent relative of the official or lobbyist whether or not living in the household of the official or lobbyist, and the parent, spouse or domestic partner, sibling, child, or dependent relative of the employee, living in the household of the employee or who is dependent in whole or in part for his or her support upon the earnings of the state employee.

(6)(a) Upon a vacancy in any position on the commission, a successor shall be selected and appointed to fill the unexpired term. The selection and appointment shall be concluded within thirty days of the date the position becomes vacant and shall be conducted in the same manner as originally provided.

(b) Initial members appointed from congressional districts created after July 22, 2011, shall be selected and appointed in the manner provided in subsection (1) of this section. The selection and appointment must be concluded within ninety days of the date the district is created. The term of an initial member appointed under this subsection terminates July 1st of an even-numbered year so that at no point may the terms of more than one-half plus one of the members selected under subsection (1) of this section terminate in the same year.

Sec. 1006. RCW 43.185B.020 and 2022 c 266 s 3 and 2022 c 165 s 8 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall establish the affordable housing advisory board to consist of ((23))24 members.

(a) The following ((20))21 members shall be appointed by the governor:

(i) Two representatives of the residential construction industry;

(ii) Two representatives of the home mortgage lending profession;

(iii) One representative of the real estate sales profession;

(iv) One representative of the apartment management and operation industry;

(v) One representative of the for-profit housing development industry;

(vi) One representative of for-profit rental housing owners;

(vii) One representative of the nonprofit housing development industry;

(viii) One representative of homeless shelter operators;

(ix) One representative of lower-income persons;

(x) One representative of special needs populations;

(xi) One representative of public housing authorities as created under chapter 35.82 RCW;

(xii) Two representatives of the Washington association of counties, one representative shall be from a county that is located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains;

(xiii) Two representatives of the association of Washington cities, one representative shall be from a city that is located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains;

(xiv) One representative to serve as chair of the affordable housing advisory board;

(xv) One representative of organizations that operate site-based permanent supportive housing and deliver onsite supportive housing services; ((and))

(xvi) One representative at large; and

(((xvi)))(xvii) One representative from a unit owners' association as defined in RCW 64.34.020 or 64.90.010.

(b) The following three members shall serve as ex officio, nonvoting members:

(i) The director or the director's designee;

(ii) The executive director of the Washington state housing finance commission or the executive director's designee; and

(iii) The secretary of social and health services or the secretary's designee.

(2)(a) The members of the affordable housing advisory board appointed by the governor shall be appointed for four-year terms, except that the chair shall be appointed to serve a two-year term. The terms of five of the initial appointees shall be for two years from the date of appointment and the terms of six of the initial appointees shall be for three years from the date of appointment. The governor shall designate the appointees who will serve the two-year and three-year terms. The members of the advisory board shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(b) The governor, when making appointments to the affordable housing advisory board, shall make appointments that reflect the cultural diversity of the state of Washington.

(3) The affordable housing advisory board shall serve as the department's principal advisory body on housing and housing-related issues, and replaces the department's existing boards and task forces on housing and housing-related issues.

(4) The affordable housing advisory board shall meet regularly and may appoint technical advisory committees, which may include members of the affordable housing advisory board, as needed to address specific issues and concerns.

(5) The department, in conjunction with the Washington state housing finance commission and the department of social and health services, shall supply such information and assistance as are deemed necessary for the advisory board to carry out its duties under this section.

(6) The department shall provide administrative and clerical assistance to the affordable housing advisory board.

Sec. 1007. RCW 46.04.670 and 2019 c 214 s 7 and 2019 c 170 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) "Vehicle" means a device capable of being moved upon a public highway and in, upon, or by which any persons or property is or may be transported or drawn upon a public highway.

(2) "Vehicle" excludes:

(a) A power wheelchair or device other than a bicycle moved by human or animal power or used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks;

(b) A moped, for the purposes of chapter 46.70 RCW;

(c) A bicycle or a motorized foot scooter, for the purposes of chapter 46.12, 46.16A, or 46.70 RCW, or for RCW 82.12.045;

(d) An electric personal assistive mobility device or a motorized foot scooter, for the purposes of chapter 46.12, 46.16A, 46.29, 46.37, or 46.70 RCW;

(e) A golf cart, except for the purposes of chapter 46.61 RCW; and

(f) A personal delivery device as defined in RCW 46.75.010, except for the purposes of chapter 46.61 RCW.

Sec. 1008. RCW 46.25.010 and 2019 c 195 s 1 and 2019 c 44 s 3 are each reenacted to read as follows:

The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Alcohol" means any substance containing any form of alcohol, including but not limited to ethanol, methanol, propanol, and isopropanol.

(2) "Alcohol concentration" means:

(a) The number of grams of alcohol per one hundred milliliters of blood; or

(b) The number of grams of alcohol per two hundred ten liters of breath.

(3) "Commercial driver's license" (CDL) means a license issued to an individual under chapter 46.20 RCW that has been endorsed in accordance with the requirements of this chapter to authorize the individual to drive a class of commercial motor vehicle.

(4) The "commercial driver's license information system" (CDLIS) is the information system established pursuant to 49 U.S.C. Sec. 31309 to serve as a clearinghouse for locating information related to the licensing and identification of commercial motor vehicle drivers.

(5) "Commercial learner's permit" (CLP) means a permit issued under RCW 46.25.052 for the purposes of behind-the-wheel training.

(6) "Commercial motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle or combination of motor vehicles used in commerce to transport passengers or property if the motor vehicle:

(a) Has a gross combination weight rating or gross combination weight of 11,794 kilograms or more (26,001 pounds or more), whichever is greater, inclusive of any towed unit or units with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of more than 4,536 kilograms (10,000 pounds), whichever is greater; or

(b) Has a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of 11,794 kilograms or more (26,001 pounds or more), whichever is greater; or

(c) Is designed to transport sixteen or more passengers, including the driver; or

(d) Is of any size and is used in the transportation of hazardous materials as defined in this section; or

(e) Is a school bus regardless of weight or size.

(7) "Conviction" means an unvacated adjudication of guilt, or a determination that a person has violated or failed to comply with the law in a court of original jurisdiction or by an authorized administrative tribunal, an unvacated forfeiture of bail or collateral deposited to secure the person's appearance in court, a plea of guilty or nolo contendere accepted by the court, the payment of a fine or court cost, entry into a deferred prosecution program under chapter 10.05 RCW, or violation of a condition of release without bail, regardless of whether or not the penalty is rebated, suspended, or probated.

(8) "Disqualification" means a prohibition against driving a commercial motor vehicle.

(9) "Drive" means to drive, operate, or be in physical control of a motor vehicle in any place open to the general public for purposes of vehicular traffic. For purposes of RCW 46.25.100, 46.25.110, and 46.25.120, "drive" includes operation or physical control of a motor vehicle anywhere in the state.

(10) "Drugs" are those substances as defined by RCW 69.04.009, including, but not limited to, those substances defined by 49 C.F.R. Sec. 40.3.

(11) "Employer" means any person, including the United States, a state, or a political subdivision of a state, who owns or leases a commercial motor vehicle, or assigns a person to drive a commercial motor vehicle.

(12) "Gross vehicle weight rating" (GVWR) means the value specified by the manufacturer as the maximum loaded weight of a single vehicle. The GVWR of a combination or articulated vehicle, commonly referred to as the "gross combined weight rating" or GCWR, is the GVWR of the power unit plus the GVWR of the towed unit or units. If the GVWR of any unit cannot be determined, the actual gross weight will be used. If a vehicle with a GVWR of less than 11,794 kilograms (26,001 pounds or less) has been structurally modified to carry a heavier load, then the actual gross weight capacity of the modified vehicle, as determined by RCW 46.44.041 and 46.44.042, will be used as the GVWR.

(13) "Hazardous materials" means any material that has been designated as hazardous under 49 U.S.C. Sec. 5103 and is required to be placarded under subpart F of 49 C.F.R. Part 172 or any quantity of a material listed as a select agent or toxin in 42 C.F.R. Part 73.

(14) "Motor vehicle" means a vehicle, machine, tractor, trailer, or semitrailer propelled or drawn by mechanical power used on highways, or any other vehicle required to be registered under the laws of this state, but does not include a vehicle, machine, tractor, trailer, or semitrailer operated exclusively on a rail.

(15)(a) "Nondomiciled CLP or CDL" means a permit or license, respectively, issued under RCW 46.25.054 to a person who meets one of the following criteria:

(i) Is domiciled in a foreign country as provided in 49 C.F.R. Sec. 383.23(b)(1) as it existed on October 1, 2017, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section; or

(ii) Is domiciled in another state as provided in 49 C.F.R. Sec. 383.23(b)(2) as it existed on October 1, 2017, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section.

(b) The definition in this subsection (15) applies exclusively to the use of the term in this chapter and is not to be applied in any other chapter of the Revised Code of Washington.

(16) "Out-of-service order" means a declaration by an authorized enforcement officer of a federal, state, Canadian, Mexican, or local jurisdiction that a driver, a commercial motor vehicle, or a motor carrier operation is out-of-service pursuant to 49 C.F.R. Secs. 386.72, 392.5, 395.13, 396.9, or compatible laws, or the North American uniform out-of-service criteria.

(17) "Positive alcohol confirmation test" means an alcohol confirmation test that:

(a) Has been conducted by a breath alcohol technician under 49 C.F.R. Part 40; and

(b) Indicates an alcohol concentration of 0.04 or more.

A report that a person has refused an alcohol test, under circumstances that constitute the refusal of an alcohol test under 49 C.F.R. Part 40, will be considered equivalent to a report of a positive alcohol confirmation test for the purposes of this chapter.

(18) "School bus" means a commercial motor vehicle used to transport preprimary, primary, or secondary school students from home to school, from school to home, or to and from school-sponsored events. School bus does not include a bus used as a common carrier.

(19) "Serious traffic violation" means:

(a) Excessive speeding, defined as fifteen miles per hour or more in excess of the posted limit;

(b) Reckless driving, as defined under state or local law;

(c) Driving while using a personal electronic device, defined as a violation of RCW 46.61.672, which includes in the activities it prohibits driving while holding a personal electronic device in either or both hands and using a hand or finger for texting, or an equivalent administrative rule or local law, ordinance, rule, or resolution;

(d) A violation of a state or local law relating to motor vehicle traffic control, other than a parking violation, arising in connection with an accident or collision resulting in death to any person;

(e) Driving a commercial motor vehicle without obtaining a commercial driver's license;

(f) Driving a commercial motor vehicle without a commercial driver's license in the driver's possession; however, any individual who provides proof to the court by the date the individual must appear in court or pay any fine for such a violation, that the individual held a valid CDL on the date the citation was issued, is not guilty of a "serious traffic violation";

(g) Driving a commercial motor vehicle without the proper class of commercial driver's license endorsement or endorsements for the specific vehicle group being operated or for the passenger or type of cargo being transported; and

(h) Any other violation of a state or local law relating to motor vehicle traffic control, other than a parking violation, that the department determines by rule to be serious.

(20) "State" means a state of the United States and the District of Columbia.

(21) "Substance abuse professional" means an alcohol and drug specialist meeting the credentials, knowledge, training, and continuing education requirements of 49 C.F.R. Sec. 40.281.

(22) "Tank vehicle" means any commercial motor vehicle that is designed to transport any liquid or gaseous materials within a tank or tanks having an individual rated capacity of more than one hundred nineteen gallons and an aggregate rated capacity of one thousand gallons or more that is either permanently or temporarily attached to the vehicle or the chassis. A commercial motor vehicle transporting an empty storage container tank, not designed for transportation, with a rated capacity of one thousand gallons or more that is temporarily attached to a flatbed trailer is not considered a tank vehicle.

(23) "Type of driving" means one of the following:

(a) "Nonexcepted interstate," which means the CDL or CLP holder or applicant operates or expects to operate in interstate commerce, is both subject to and meets the qualification requirements under 49 C.F.R. Part 391 as it existed on April 30, 2019, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section, and is required to obtain a medical examiner's certificate under 49 C.F.R. Sec. 391.45 as it existed on April 30, 2019, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section;

(b) "Excepted interstate," which means the CDL or CLP holder or applicant operates or expects to operate in interstate commerce, but engages exclusively in transportation or operations excepted under 49 C.F.R. Secs. 390.3(f), 391.2, 391.68, or 398.3, as they existed on April 30, 2019, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section, from all or parts of the qualification requirements of 49 C.F.R. Part 391 as it existed on April 30, 2019, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section, and is required to obtain a medical examiner's certificate in accordance with procedures provided in 49 C.F.R. Sec. 391.45 as it existed on April 30, 2019, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section;

(c) "Nonexcepted intrastate," which means the CDL or CLP holder or applicant operates only in intrastate commerce and is required to obtain a medical examiner's certificate in accordance with procedures provided in 49 C.F.R. Sec. 391.45 as it existed on April 30, 2019, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section; or

(d) "Excepted intrastate," which means the CDL or CLP holder wishes to maintain a CDL or CLP but not operate a commercial motor vehicle without changing his or her self-certification type.

(24) "United States" means the fifty states and the District of Columbia.

(25) "Verified positive drug test" means a drug test result or validity testing result from a laboratory certified under the authority of the federal department of health and human services that:

(a) Indicates a drug concentration at or above the cutoff concentration established under 49 C.F.R. Sec. 40.87; and

(b) Has undergone review and final determination by a medical review officer.

A report that a person has refused a drug test, under circumstances that constitute the refusal of a federal department of transportation drug test under 49 C.F.R. Part 40, will be considered equivalent to a report of a verified positive drug test for the purposes of this chapter.

(26) "Collector truck" means a vehicle that:

(a) Has current registration;

(b) Is older than thirty years old;

(c) Is a vehicle that meets the weight criteria of subsection (6) of this section;

(d) Is capable of safely operating on the highway;

(e) Is used for occasional use to and from truck conventions, auto shows, circuses, parades, displays, special excursions, and antique vehicle club meetings;

(f) Is used for the pleasure of others without compensation; and

(g) Is not used in the operations of a common or contract motor carrier and not used for commercial purposes.

(27) "Collector truck operator" means an operator of a noncommercial vehicle that is being exclusively owned and operated as a collector truck.

Sec. 1009. RCW 46.68.340 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 35 s 14 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 986 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The ignition interlock device revolving account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from the fee assessed under RCW 46.20.385(6) must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used for administering and operating the ignition interlock device revolving account program ((and)), implementing effective strategies to reduce motor vehicle-related deaths and serious injuries, such as those found in the Washington state strategic highway safety plan: Target Zero, and during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the ignition interlock device revolving account for substance abuse programs for offenders.

Sec. 1010. RCW 53.08.370 and 2021 c 294 s 9 and 2021 c 293 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) A port district in existence on June 8, 2000, may construct, purchase, acquire, develop, finance, lease, license, handle, provide, add to, contract for, interconnect, alter, improve, repair, operate, and maintain any telecommunications facilities within or without the district's limits for the following purposes:

(a) For the district's own use;

(b) For the provision of wholesale telecommunications services within or without the district's limits; or

(c) For the provision of retail telecommunications services as authorized ((in))under this section.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, a port district providing wholesale or retail telecommunications services under this section shall ensure that rates, terms, and conditions for such services are not unduly or unreasonably discriminatory or preferential. Rates, terms, and conditions are discriminatory or preferential when a port district offering such rates, terms, and conditions to an entity for wholesale or retail telecommunications services does not offer substantially similar rates, terms, and conditions to all other entities seeking substantially similar services.

(3) When a port district establishes a separate utility function for the provision of wholesale or retail telecommunications services, it shall account for any and all revenues and expenditures related to its wholesale or retail telecommunications facilities and services separately from revenues and expenditures related to its internal telecommunications operations. Any revenues received from the provision of wholesale or retail telecommunications services must be dedicated to the utility function that includes the provision of wholesale or retail telecommunications services for costs incurred to build and maintain the telecommunications facilities until such time as any bonds or other financing instruments executed after June 8, 2000, and used to finance the telecommunications facilities are discharged or retired.

(4) When a port district establishes a separate utility function for the provision of wholesale or retail telecommunications services, all telecommunications services rendered by the separate function to the district for the district's internal telecommunications needs shall be charged at its true and full value. A port district may not charge its nontelecommunications operations rates that are preferential or discriminatory compared to those it charges entities purchasing wholesale or retail telecommunications services.

(5) A port district shall not exercise powers of eminent domain to acquire telecommunications facilities or contractual rights held by any other person or entity to telecommunications facilities.

(6) Except as otherwise specifically provided, a port district may exercise any of the powers granted to it under this title and other applicable laws in carrying out the powers authorized under this section. Nothing in chapter 81, Laws of 2000 limits any existing authority of a port district under this title.

(7) A port district with telecommunications facilities for use in the provision of wholesale or retail telecommunications in accordance with subsection (1) of this section may be subject to local leasehold excise taxes under RCW 82.29A.040.

(8)(a) A port district under this section may select a telecommunications company to operate all or a portion of the port district's telecommunications facilities.

(b) For the purposes of this section "telecommunications company" means any for-profit entity owned by investors that sells telecommunications services to end users.

(c) Nothing in this subsection (8) is intended to limit or otherwise restrict any other authority provided by law.

(9) A port district may provide retail telecommunications services within or without the district's limits.

(10)(a) A port district may provide retail telecommunications services to end users in unserved areas.

(b) A port district must notify and consult with the governor's statewide broadband office within 30 days of its decision to provide retail telecommunications services to unserved areas. The governor's statewide broadband office must post notices received from a port district pursuant to this subsection on its public website.

(c) Any port district that intends to provide retail telecommunications services to unserved areas must submit a telecommunications infrastructure and service plan to the governor's statewide broadband office that will be published on the office's website. Submission of plans will enable the governor's statewide broadband office: (i) To better understand infrastructure deployment; (ii) to potentially allocate funding for unserved areas; (iii) to advance the state policy objectives; (iv) to determine whether the plan aligns with state policy objectives and broadband priorities; (v) to measure progress toward serving those in unserved areas; (vi) to report on the feasibility and sustainability of the project; and (vii) to confirm that the project is within an unserved area. The telecommunications infrastructure and service plans shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(A) Map and description of how the deployment of proposed broadband infrastructure will achieve at a minimum 100 megabits per second download speed and at a minimum 20 megabits per second upload speed and then increases to be consistent with the stated long-term state broadband speed goals for unserved areas;

(B) Project timeline prioritization of unserved areas; and

(C) Description of potential state and federal funding available to provide service to the unserved area.

(d) A port district that exercises its authority under (a) of this subsection to provide retail telecommunications services may use state funds, federal funds appropriated through the state, or federal funds dedicated for projects in unserved areas to fund projects identified in the submitted telecommunications infrastructure and service plan required in (c) of this subsection.

(e) A port district providing retail telecommunications services under this subsection must operate an open access network.

(f) Provisions in this subsection do not apply to the provision of wholesale telecommunications services authorized in this section.

(g) For the purposes of this subsection:

(i) "Open access network" means a network that, during the useful life of the infrastructure, ensures service providers may use network services and facilities at rates, terms, and conditions that are not discriminatory or preferential between providers, and employs accountable interconnection arrangements published and available publicly.

(ii) "Unserved areas" means areas of Washington in which households and businesses lack access to broadband service of speeds at a minimum of 100 megabits per second download and at a minimum 20 megabits per second upload.

Sec. 1011. RCW 54.16.330 and 2021 c 294 s 2 and 2021 c 293 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) A public utility district in existence on June 8, 2000, may construct, purchase, acquire, develop, finance, lease, license, handle, provide, add to, contract for, interconnect, alter, improve, repair, operate, and maintain any telecommunications facilities within or without the district's limits for the following purposes:

(a) For the district's internal telecommunications needs;

(b) For the provision of wholesale telecommunications services as follows:

(i) Within the district and by contract with another public utility district;

(ii) Within an area in an adjoining county that is already provided electrical services by the district; or

(iii) Within an adjoining county that does not have a public utility district providing electrical or telecommunications services headquartered within the county's boundaries, but only if the district providing telecommunications services is not authorized to provide electrical services; or

(c) For the provision of retail telecommunications services as authorized in this section.

(2) A public utility district providing wholesale or retail telecommunications services shall ensure that rates, terms, and conditions for such services are not unduly or unreasonably discriminatory or preferential. Rates, terms, and conditions are discriminatory or preferential when a public utility district offering rates, terms, and conditions to an entity for wholesale or retail telecommunications services does not offer substantially similar rates, terms, and conditions to all other entities seeking substantially similar services.

(3) A public utility district providing wholesale or retail telecommunications services shall not be required to, but may, establish a separate utility system or function for such purpose. In either case, a public utility district providing wholesale or retail telecommunications services shall separately account for any revenues and expenditures for those services according to standards established by the state auditor pursuant to its authority in chapter 43.09 RCW and consistent with the provisions of this title. Any revenues received from the provision of wholesale or retail telecommunications services must be dedicated to costs incurred to build and maintain any telecommunications facilities constructed, installed, or acquired to provide such services, including payments on debt issued to finance such services, until such time as any bonds or other financing instruments executed after June 8, 2000, and used to finance such telecommunications facilities are discharged or retired.

(4) When a public utility district provides wholesale or retail telecommunications services, all telecommunications services rendered to the district for the district's internal telecommunications needs shall be allocated or charged at its true and full value. A public utility district may not charge its nontelecommunications operations rates that are preferential or discriminatory compared to those it charges entities purchasing wholesale or retail telecommunications services.

(5) If a person or entity receiving retail telecommunications services from a public utility district under this section has a complaint regarding the reasonableness of the rates, terms, conditions, or services provided, the person or entity may file a complaint with the district commission.

(6) A public utility district shall not exercise powers of eminent domain to acquire telecommunications facilities or contractual rights held by any other person or entity to telecommunications facilities.

(7) Except as otherwise specifically provided, a public utility district may exercise any of the powers granted to it under this title and other applicable laws in carrying out the powers authorized under this section. Nothing in chapter 81, Laws of 2000 limits any existing authority of a public utility district under this title.

(8) A public utility district may provide retail telecommunications services or telecommunications facilities within the district's limits or without the district's limits by contract with another public utility district, any political subdivision of the state authorized to provide retail telecommunications services in the state, or with any federally recognized tribe located in the state of Washington.

(((10)))(9)(a) A public utility district may provide retail telecommunications services to end users in unserved areas.

(b) A public utility district must notify and consult with the governor's statewide broadband office within 30 days of its decision to provide retail telecommunications services to unserved areas. The governor's statewide broadband office must post notices received from a public utility district pursuant to this subsection on its public website.

(c) Any public utility district that intends to provide retail telecommunications services to unserved areas must submit a telecommunications infrastructure and service plan to the governor's statewide broadband office that will be published on the office's website. Submission of plans will enable the governor's statewide broadband office: (i) To better understand infrastructure deployment; (ii) to potentially allocate funding for unserved areas; (iii) to advance the state policy objectives; (iv) to determine whether the plan aligns with state policy objectives and broadband priorities; (v) to measure progress toward serving those in unserved areas; (vi) to report on the feasibility and sustainability of the project; and (vii) to confirm that the project is within an unserved area. The telecommunications infrastructure and service plans shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(A) Map and description of how the deployment of proposed broadband infrastructure will achieve at a minimum 100 megabits per second download speed and at a minimum 20 megabits per second upload speed and then increases to be consistent with the stated long-term state broadband speed goals for unserved areas;

(B) Project timeline prioritization of unserved areas; and

(C) Description of potential state and federal funding available to provide service to the unserved area.

(d) A public utility district that exercises its authority under (a) of this subsection to provide retail telecommunications services may use state funds, federal funds appropriated through the state, or federal funds dedicated for projects in unserved areas to fund projects identified in the submitted telecommunications infrastructure and service plan required in (c) of this subsection.

(e) A public utility district providing retail telecommunications services under this subsection must operate an open access network.

(f) This section does not apply to retail internet services provided by a public utility district under RCW 54.16.420.

(g) Provisions in this subsection do not apply to the provision of wholesale telecommunications services authorized in this section.

(h) For the purposes of this subsection:

(i) "Open access network" means a network that, during the useful life of the infrastructure, ensures service providers may use network services and facilities at rates, terms, and conditions that are not discriminatory or preferential between providers, and employs accountable interconnection arrangements published and available publicly.

(ii) "Unserved areas" means areas of Washington in which households and businesses lack access to broadband service of speeds at a minimum of 100 megabits per second download and at a minimum 20 megabits per second upload.

Sec. 1012. RCW 66.24.210 and 2016 c 235 s 12 and 2016 c 225 s 1 are each reenacted to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby imposed upon all wines except cider sold to wine distributors within the state a tax at the rate of twenty and one-fourth cents per liter. Any domestic winery or certificate of approval holder acting as a distributor of its own production must pay taxes imposed by this section. There is hereby imposed on all cider sold to wine distributors within the state a tax at the rate of three and fifty-nine one-hundredths cents per liter. However, wine sold or shipped in bulk from one winery to another winery is not subject to such tax.

(a) The tax provided for in this section shall be collected by direct payments based on wine purchased by wine distributors.

(b) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, every person purchasing wine under the provisions of this section must on or before the twentieth day of each month report to the board all purchases during the preceding calendar month in such manner and upon such forms as may be prescribed by the board, and with such report must pay the tax due from the purchases covered by such report unless the same has previously been paid. Any such purchaser of wine whose applicable tax payment is not postmarked by the twentieth day following the month of purchase will be assessed a penalty at the rate of two percent a month or fraction thereof. The board may require that every such person shall execute to and file with the board a bond to be approved by the board, in such amount as the board may fix, securing the payment of the tax. If any such person fails to pay the tax when due, the board may suspend or cancel the license until all taxes are paid.

(c) Any licensed retailer authorized to purchase wine from a certificate of approval holder with a direct shipment endorsement or a domestic winery must make monthly reports to the liquor and cannabis board on wine purchased during the preceding calendar month in the manner and upon such forms as may be prescribed by the board.

(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW 82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this section. All revenues collected during any month from this additional tax must be transferred to the state general fund by the twenty-fifth day of the following month.

(3) An additional tax is imposed on wines subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section, at the rate of one-fourth of one cent per liter for wine sold after June 30, 1987. After June 30, 1996, such additional tax does not apply to cider. An additional tax of five one-hundredths of one cent per liter is imposed on cider sold after June 30, 1996. All revenues collected under this subsection (3) shall be disbursed quarterly to the Washington wine commission for use in carrying out the purposes of chapter 15.88 RCW.

(4) An additional tax is imposed on all wine subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section. The additional tax is equal to twenty-three and forty-four one-hundredths cents per liter on fortified wine as defined in RCW 66.04.010 when bottled or packaged by the manufacturer, one cent per liter on all other wine except cider, and eighteen one-hundredths of one cent per liter on cider. All revenues collected during any month from this additional tax shall be deposited in the state general fund by the twenty-fifth day of the following month.

(5)(a) An additional tax is imposed on all cider subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section. The additional tax is equal to two and four one-hundredths cents per liter of cider sold after June 30, 1996, and before July 1, 1997, and is equal to four and seven one-hundredths cents per liter of cider sold after June 30, 1997.

(b) All revenues collected from the additional tax imposed under this subsection (5) must be deposited in the state general fund.

(6) For the purposes of this section, "cider" means table wine that contains not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol by volume and not more than eight and one-half percent of alcohol by volume and is made from the normal alcoholic fermentation of the juice of sound, ripe apples or pears. "Cider" includes, but is not limited to, flavored, sparkling, or carbonated cider and cider made from condensed apple or pear must.

(7) For the purposes of this section, out-of-state wineries must pay taxes under this section on wine sold and shipped directly to Washington state residents in a manner consistent with the requirements of a wine distributor under subsections (1) through (4) of this section, except wineries shall be responsible for the tax and not the resident purchaser.

(8) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, any domestic winery or wine certificate of approval holder acting as a distributor of its own production that had total taxable sales of wine in Washington state of six thousand gallons or less during the calendar year preceding the date on which the tax would otherwise be due is not required to pay taxes under this section more often than annually.

Sec. 1013. RCW 66.24.495 and 2021 c 176 s 5234 and 2021 c 6 s 10 are each reenacted to read as follows:

(1)(a) There shall be a license to be designated as a nonprofit arts organization license. This shall be a special license to be issued to any nonprofit arts organization which sponsors and presents productions or performances of an artistic or cultural nature in a specific theater or other appropriate designated indoor premises approved by the board. The license shall permit the licensee to sell liquor to patrons of productions or performances for consumption on the premises at these events. The fee for the license shall be two hundred fifty dollars per annum.

(b) The annual fee in (a) of this subsection is waived during the 12-month period beginning with the second calendar month after February 28, 2021, for:

(i) Licenses that expire during the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (1)(b); and

(ii) Licenses issued to persons previously licensed under this section at any time during the 12-month period prior to the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (1)(b).

(c) The waiver in (b) of this subsection does not apply to any licensee that:

(i) Had their license suspended by the board for health and safety violations of state COVID-19 guidelines; or

(ii) Received an order of immediate restraint or citation from the department of labor and industries for allowing an employee to perform work where business activity was prohibited in violation of an emergency proclamation of the governor under RCW 43.06.220.

(d) Upon request of the department of revenue, the board and the department of labor and industries must both provide a list of persons that they have determined to be ineligible for a fee waiver under (b) of this subsection for the reasons described in (c) of this subsection. Unless otherwise agreed, any list must be received by the department of revenue no later than 15 calendar days after the request is made.

(2) For the purposes of this section, the term "nonprofit arts organization" means an organization which is organized and operated for the purpose of providing artistic or cultural exhibitions, presentations, or performances or cultural or art education programs, as defined in subsection (3) of this section, for viewing or attendance by the general public. The organization must be a not-for-profit corporation under chapter 24.03A RCW and managed by a governing board of not less than eight individuals none of whom is a paid employee of the organization or by a corporation sole under chapter 24.12 RCW. In addition, the corporation must satisfy the following conditions:

(a) No part of its income may be paid directly or indirectly to its members, stockholders, officers, directors, or trustees except in the form of services rendered by the corporation in accordance with its purposes and bylaws;

(b) Salary or compensation paid to its officers and executives must be only for actual services rendered, and at levels comparable to the salary or compensation of like positions within the state;

(c) Assets of the corporation must be irrevocably dedicated to the activities for which the license is granted and, on the liquidation, dissolution, or abandonment by the corporation, may not inure directly or indirectly to the benefit of any member or individual except a nonprofit organization, association, or corporation;

(d) The corporation must be duly licensed or certified when licensing or certification is required by law or regulation;

(e) The proceeds derived from sales of liquor, except for reasonable operating costs, must be used in furtherance of the purposes of the organization;

(f) Services must be available regardless of race, color, national origin, or ancestry; and

(g) The board shall have access to its books in order to determine whether the corporation is entitled to a license.

(3) The term "artistic or cultural exhibitions, presentations, or performances or cultural or art education programs" includes and is limited to:

(a) An exhibition or presentation of works of art or objects of cultural or historical significance, such as those commonly displayed in art or history museums;

(b) A musical or dramatic performance or series of performances; or

(c) An educational seminar or program, or series of such programs, offered by the organization to the general public on an artistic, cultural, or historical subject.

Sec. 1014. RCW 69.50.530 and 2022 c 169 s 1 and 2022 c 16 s 100 are each reenacted to read as follows:

The dedicated cannabis account is created in the state treasury. All moneys received by the board, or any employee thereof, from cannabis-related activities must be deposited in the account. Unless otherwise provided in chapter 4, Laws of 2015 2nd sp. sess., all cannabis excise taxes collected from sales of cannabis, useable cannabis, cannabis concentrates, and cannabis-infused products under RCW 69.50.535, and the license fees, penalties, and forfeitures derived under this chapter from cannabis producer, cannabis processor, cannabis researcher, and cannabis retailer licenses, must be deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may only be spent after appropriation.

Sec. 1015. RCW 69.50.540 and 2022 c 169 s 2 and 2022 c 16 s 102 are each reenacted to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of this subsection (1), the legislature must appropriate the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $12,500,000 annually to the board for administration of this chapter as appropriated in the omnibus appropriations act;

(b) $11,000,000 annually to the department of health for the following:

(i) Creation, implementation, operation, and management of a cannabis, vapor product, and commercial tobacco education and public health program that contains the following:

(A) A cannabis use public health hotline that provides referrals to substance abuse treatment providers, uses evidence-based or research-based public health approaches to minimizing the harms associated with cannabis use, and does not solely advocate an abstinence-only approach;

(B) Programs that support development and implementation of coordinated intervention strategies for the prevention and reduction of commercial tobacco, vapor product, and cannabis use by youth and cannabis cessation treatment services, including grant programs to local health departments or other local community agencies;

(C) Media-based education campaigns across television, internet, radio, print, and out-of-home advertising, separately targeting youth and adults, that provide medically and scientifically accurate information about the health and safety risks posed by cannabis use; and

(D) Outreach to priority populations regarding commercial tobacco, vapor product, and cannabis use, prevention, and cessation; and

(ii) The Washington poison control center;

(c)(i) $3,000,000 annually to the department of commerce to fund cannabis social equity grants under RCW 43.330.540; and

(ii) $200,000 annually to the department of commerce to fund technical assistance through a roster of mentors under RCW 43.330.540;

(d) $200,000 annually, until June 30, 2032, to the health care authority to contract with the Washington state institute for public policy to conduct the cost-benefit evaluations and produce the reports described in RCW 69.50.550;

(e) $25,000 annually to the University of Washington alcohol and drug abuse institute for the creation, maintenance, and timely updating of web-based public education materials providing medically and scientifically accurate information about the health and safety risks posed by cannabis use;

(f) $300,000 annually to the University of Washington and $175,000 annually to the Washington State University for research on the short-term and long-term effects of cannabis use to include, but not be limited to, formal and informal methods for estimating and measuring intoxication and impairments, and for the dissemination of such research;

(g) $550,000 annually to the office of the superintendent of public instruction to fund grants to building bridges programs under chapter 28A.175 RCW;

(h) $2,423,000 for fiscal year 2022 and $2,423,000 for fiscal year 2023 to the Washington state patrol for a drug enforcement task force;

(i) $270,000 for fiscal year 2022 and $290,000 for fiscal year 2023 to the department of ecology for implementation of accreditation of cannabis product testing laboratories;

(j) $800,000 for each of fiscal years 2020 through 2023 to the department of health for the administration of the cannabis authorization database; and

(k) $621,000 for fiscal year 2022 and $635,000 for fiscal year 2023 to the department of agriculture for compliance-based laboratory analysis of pesticides in cannabis.

(2) Subsections (1)(a) through (g) of this section must be adjusted annually based on the United States bureau of labor statistics' consumer price index for the Seattle area.

(3) After appropriation of the amounts identified in subsection (1) of this section, the legislature must annually appropriate such remaining amounts for the purposes listed in this subsection (3) as follows:

(a) Fifty-two percent to the state basic health plan trust account to be administered by the Washington basic health plan administrator and used as provided under chapter 70.47 RCW;

(b) Eleven percent to the health care authority to:

(i) Design and administer the Washington state healthy youth survey, analyze the collected data, and produce reports, in collaboration with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, department of health, department of commerce, family policy council, and board. The survey must be conducted at least every two years and include questions regarding, but not necessarily limited to, academic achievement, age at time of substance use initiation, antisocial behavior of friends, attitudes toward antisocial behavior, attitudes toward substance use, laws and community norms regarding antisocial behavior, family conflict, family management, parental attitudes toward substance use, peer rewarding of antisocial behavior, perceived risk of substance use, and rebelliousness. Funds disbursed under this subsection may be used to expand administration of the healthy youth survey to student populations attending institutions of higher education in Washington;

(ii) Develop, implement, maintain, and evaluate programs and practices aimed at the prevention or reduction of maladaptive substance use, substance use disorder, substance abuse or substance dependence, as these terms are defined in the diagnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders, among middle school and high school-age students, whether as an explicit goal of a given program or practice or as a consistently corresponding effect of its implementation, mental health services for children and youth, and services for pregnant and parenting women. In deciding which programs and practices to fund under this subsection (3)(b)(ii), the director of the health care authority must consult, at least annually, with the University of Washington's social development research group and the University of Washington's alcohol and drug abuse institute; and

(iii) Contract with community health centers to provide primary health and dental care services, migrant health services, and maternity health care services as provided under RCW 41.05.220;

(c)(i) One and one-half percent to counties, cities, and towns where licensed cannabis retailers are physically located. Each jurisdiction must receive a share of the revenue distribution under this subsection (3)(c)(i) based on the proportional share of the total revenues generated in the individual jurisdiction from the taxes collected under RCW 69.50.535, from licensed cannabis retailers physically located in each jurisdiction. For purposes of this subsection (3)(c), 100 percent of the proportional amount attributed to a retailer physically located in a city or town must be distributed to the city or town;

(ii) Three and one-half percent to counties, cities, and towns ratably on a per capita basis. Counties must receive 60 percent of the distribution based on each county's total proportional population. Funds may only be distributed to jurisdictions that do not prohibit the siting of any state licensed cannabis producer, processor, or retailer;

(iii) By September 15th of each year, the board must provide the state treasurer the annual distribution amount made under this subsection (3)(c), if any, for each county and city as determined in (c)(i) and (ii) of this subsection; and

(iv) Distribution amounts allocated to each county, city, and town in (c)(i) and (ii) of this subsection must be distributed in four installments by the last day of each fiscal quarter; and

(d) Thirty-two percent must be deposited in the state general fund.

Sec. 1016. RCW 70.47.020 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 83, 2011 1st sp.s. c 9 s 3, and 2011 c 284 s 1 are each reenacted to read as follows:

As used in this chapter:

(1) "Director" means the director of the Washington state health care authority.

(2) "Health coverage tax credit eligible enrollee" means individual workers and their qualified family members who lose their jobs due to the effects of international trade and are eligible for certain trade adjustment assistance benefits; or are eligible for benefits under the alternative trade adjustment assistance program; or are people who receive benefits from the pension benefit guaranty corporation and are at least fifty-five years old.

(3) "Health coverage tax credit program" means the program created by the Trade Act of 2002 (P.L. 107-210) that provides a federal tax credit that subsidizes private health insurance coverage for displaced workers certified to receive certain trade adjustment assistance benefits and for individuals receiving benefits from the pension benefit guaranty corporation.

(4) "Managed health care system" means: (a) Any health care organization, including health care providers, insurers, health care service contractors, health maintenance organizations, or any combination thereof, that provides directly or by contract basic health care services, as defined by the director and rendered by duly licensed providers, to a defined patient population enrolled in the plan and in the managed health care system; or (b) a self-funded or self-insured method of providing insurance coverage to subsidized enrollees provided under RCW 41.05.140 and subject to the limitations under RCW 70.47.100(9).

(5) "Nonparticipating provider" means a person, health care provider, practitioner, facility, or entity, acting within their authorized scope of practice or licensure, that does not have a written contract to participate in a managed health care system's provider network, but provides services to plan enrollees who receive coverage through the managed health care system.

(6) "Nonsubsidized enrollee" means an individual, or an individual plus the individual's spouse or dependent children: (a) Who is not eligible for medicare; (b) who is not confined or residing in a government-operated institution, unless he or she meets eligibility criteria adopted by the director; (c) who is accepted for enrollment by the director as provided in RCW 48.43.018, either because the potential enrollee cannot be required to complete the standard health questionnaire under RCW 48.43.018, or, based upon the results of the standard health questionnaire, the potential enrollee would not qualify for coverage under the Washington state health insurance pool; (d) who resides in an area of the state served by a managed health care system participating in the plan; (e) who chooses to obtain basic health care coverage from a particular managed health care system; and (f) who pays or on whose behalf is paid the full costs for participation in the plan, without any subsidy from the plan.

(7) "Premium" means a periodic payment, which an individual, their employer or another financial sponsor makes to the plan as consideration for enrollment in the plan as a subsidized enrollee, a nonsubsidized enrollee, or a health coverage tax credit eligible enrollee.

(8) "Rate" means the amount, negotiated by the director with and paid to a participating managed health care system, that is based upon the enrollment of subsidized, nonsubsidized, and health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees in the plan and in that system.

(9) "Subsidy" means the difference between the amount of periodic payment the director makes to a managed health care system on behalf of a subsidized enrollee plus the administrative cost to the plan of providing the plan to that subsidized enrollee, and the amount determined to be the subsidized enrollee's responsibility under RCW 70.47.060(2).

(10) "Subsidized enrollee" means:

(a) An individual, or an individual plus the individual's spouse or dependent children:

(i) Who is not eligible for medicare;

(ii) Who is not confined or residing in a government-operated institution, unless he or she meets eligibility criteria adopted by the director;

(iii) Who is not a full-time student who has received a temporary visa to study in the United States;

(iv) Who resides in an area of the state served by a managed health care system participating in the plan;

(v) Until March 1, 2011, whose gross family income at the time of enrollment does not exceed two hundred percent of the federal poverty level as adjusted for family size and determined annually by the federal department of health and human services;

(vi) Who chooses to obtain basic health care coverage from a particular managed health care system in return for periodic payments to the plan;

(vii) Who is not receiving or has not been determined to be currently eligible for federally financed categorically needy or medically needy programs under chapter 74.09 RCW, except as provided under RCW 70.47.110; and

(viii) After February 28, 2011, who is in the basic health transition eligibles population under 1115 medicaid demonstration project number 11-W-00254/10;

(b) An individual who meets the requirements in (a)(i) through (iv), (vi), and (vii) of this subsection and who is a foster parent licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW and whose gross family income at the time of enrollment does not exceed three hundred percent of the federal poverty level as adjusted for family size and determined annually by the federal department of health and human services; and

(c) To the extent that state funds are specifically appropriated for this purpose, with a corresponding federal match, an individual, or an individual's spouse or dependent children, who meets the requirements in (a)(i) through (iv), (vi), and (vii) of this subsection and whose gross family income at the time of enrollment is more than two hundred percent, but less than two hundred fifty-one percent, of the federal poverty level as adjusted for family size and determined annually by the federal department of health and human services.

(11) "Washington basic health plan" or "plan" means the system of enrollment and payment for basic health care services, administered by the plan director through participating managed health care systems, created by this chapter.

Sec. 1017. RCW 70A.15.3150 and 2021 c 317 s 24 and 2021 c 315 s 15 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person who knowingly violates any of the provisions of this chapter, chapter 70A.25, 70A.60, or 70A.535 RCW, or any ordinance, resolution, or regulation in force pursuant thereto is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars, or by imprisonment in the county jail for up to three hundred sixty-four days, or by both for each separate violation.

(2) Any person who negligently releases into the ambient air any substance listed by the department of ecology as a hazardous air pollutant, other than in compliance with the terms of an applicable permit or emission limit, and who at the time negligently places another person in imminent danger of death or substantial bodily harm is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars, or by imprisonment for up to three hundred sixty-four days, or both.

(3) Any person who knowingly releases into the ambient air any substance listed by the department of ecology as a hazardous air pollutant, other than in compliance with the terms of an applicable permit or emission limit, and who knows at the time that he or she thereby places another person in imminent danger of death or substantial bodily harm, is guilty of a class C felony and shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of not less than fifty thousand dollars, or by imprisonment for not more than five years, or both.

(4) Any person who knowingly fails to disclose a potential conflict of interest under RCW 70A.15.2000 is guilty of a gross misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars.

Sec. 1018. RCW 74.09.053 and 2009 c 568 s 6 and 2009 c 479 s 62 are each reenacted to read as follows:

(1) Beginning in November 2012, the department of social and health services, in coordination with the health care authority, shall by November 15th of each year report to the legislature:

(a) The number of medical assistance recipients who: (i) Upon enrollment or recertification had reported being employed, and beginning with the 2008 report, the month and year they reported being hired; or (ii) upon enrollment or recertification had reported being the dependent of someone who was employed, and beginning with the 2008 report, the month and year they reported the employed person was hired. For recipients identified under (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection, the department shall report the basis for their medical assistance eligibility, including but not limited to family medical coverage, transitional medical assistance, children's medical coverage, aged coverage, or coverage for persons with disabilities; member months; and the total cost to the state for these recipients, expressed as general fund-state and general fund-federal dollars. The information shall be reported by employer size for employers having more than fifty employees as recipients or with dependents as recipients. This information shall be provided for the preceding January and June of that year.

(b) The following aggregated information: (i) The number of employees who are recipients or with dependents as recipients by private and governmental employers; (ii) the number of employees who are recipients or with dependents as recipients by employer size for employers with fifty or fewer employees, fifty-one to one hundred employees, one hundred one to one thousand employees, one thousand one to five thousand employees and more than five thousand employees; and (iii) the number of employees who are recipients or with dependents as recipients by industry type.

(2) For each aggregated classification, the report will include the number of hours worked, the number of department of social and health services covered lives, and the total cost to the state for these recipients. This information shall be for each quarter of the preceding year.

Sec. 1019. RCW 79.64.100 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 928 and 2012 c 166 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) There is created a forest development account in the state treasury. The state treasurer shall keep an account of all sums deposited, expended, or withdrawn from the account.

(2)(a) Any sums placed in the forest development account shall be pledged for the purpose of:

(i) Paying interest and principal on the bonds issued by the department under RCW 79.22.080 and 79.22.090 and the provisions of this chapter; and

(ii) The purchase of land for growing timber.

(b) Any bonds issued shall constitute a first and prior claim and lien against the account for the payment of principal and interest.

(3) No sums for the purposes identified in subsection (2) of this section shall be withdrawn or paid out of the account except upon approval of the department.

(((4)))(a) Appropriations may be made by the legislature from the forest development account to the department for the purpose of:

(((a)))(i) Carrying on the activities of the department on state forestlands;

(((b)))(ii) Establishing a state forestland pool under RCW 79.22.140 and carrying on the activities of the department on lands included in the land pool;

(((c)))(iii) Carrying on the activities of the department on lands managed on a sustained yield basis as provided for in RCW 79.10.320; and

(((d)))(iv) Reimbursement of expenditures that have been made or may be made from the resource management cost account created in RCW 79.64.020 in the management of state forestlands.

(b) For the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, moneys from the forest development account shall be distributed as directed in section 706, chapter 7, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess. to the beneficiaries of the revenues derived from state forestlands. During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys in the forest development account to support emergency fire suppression activities in a manner that, at a maximum, represents the proportion of land that the department manages in comparison to the total land the department conducts emergency fire suppression activities on.

Sec. 1020. RCW 82.38.060 and 2013 c 225 s 107 and 2013 c 23 s 332 are each reenacted to read as follows:

If tax on fuel placed in the fuel supply tanks of motor vehicles for taxable use on Washington highways can be more accurately determined on a mileage basis the department is authorized to adopt such basis. In the absence of records showing the number of miles actually operated per gallon of fuel consumed, fuel consumption must be calculated by the department.

Sec. 1021. RCW 82.42.040 and 2013 c 225 s 304 and 2013 c 23 s 335 are each reenacted to read as follows:

(1) Application for a license must be made to the department. The application must be filed in a manner prescribed by the department and must contain information the department requires.

(2) For purposes of this section, the term "applicant" has the same meaning as provided for "person" in RCW 82.42.010.

(3) An application for a license must contain the following information to the extent it applies to the applicant:

(a) Proof, as the department may require, concerning the applicant's identity;

(b) The applicant's business structure and place of business, including proof the applicant is licensed to conduct business in this state;

(c) The employment history of the applicant and any partner, officer, or director of the applicant;

(d) A bank reference and whether the applicant or any partner, officer, or director of the applicant has ever been adjudged bankrupt or has an unsatisfied judgment;

(e) Whether the applicant has been adjudged guilty of a crime or suffered a civil judgment directly related to the distribution and sale of fuel within the last ten years;

(f) Each state, province, or country that the applicant intends to import fuel from by means other than bulk transfer. An applicant must also show proof that the applicant has maintained the appropriate license required of each state, province, or country; and

(g) Each state, province, or country that the applicant intends to export fuel to by means other than bulk transfer. An applicant must also show proof that the applicant has maintained the appropriate license required of each state, province, or country.

(4) An applicant must submit a surety bond in an amount, form, and manner set by the department. In lieu of a bond, an applicant may provide evidence to the department of sufficient assets to adequately meet tax payments, penalties, interest, or other obligations arising out of this chapter.

(5) For the purposes of considering any application for a license, the department may inspect, cause an inspection, investigate, or cause an investigation of the records of this or any other state, province, country, or the federal government to ascertain the veracity of the information on the application and the applicant's criminal, civil, and licensing history.

(6) An applicant who makes a false statement of a material fact on the application may be prosecuted for false swearing as defined by RCW 9A.72.040.

PART 2

CORRECTING REFERENCES TO THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Sec. 2001. RCW 7.68.360 and 2005 c 358 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) By July 1, 2005, the director of the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, or the director's designee, shall within existing resources convene and chair a work group to develop written protocols for delivery of services to victims of trafficking of humans. The director shall invite appropriate federal agencies to consult with the work group for the purpose of developing protocols that, to the extent possible, are in concert with federal statutes, regulations, and policies. In addition to the director of the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, the following shall be members of the work group: The secretary of the department of health, the secretary of the department of social and health services, the attorney general, the director of the department of labor and industries, the commissioner of the employment security department, a representative of the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, the chief of the Washington state patrol, two members selected by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, and five members, selected by the director of the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce from a list submitted by public and private sector organizations that provide assistance to persons who are victims of trafficking. The attorney general, the chief of the Washington state patrol, and the secretaries or directors may designate a person to serve in their place.

Members of the work group shall serve without compensation.

(2) The protocols must meet all of the following minimum standards:

(a) The protocols must apply to the following state agencies: The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, the department of health, the department of social and health services, the attorney general's office, the Washington state patrol, the department of labor and industries, and the employment security department;

(b) The protocols must provide policies and procedures for interagency coordinated operations and cooperation with government agencies and nongovernmental organizations, agencies, and jurisdictions, including law enforcement agencies and prosecuting attorneys;

(c) The protocols must include the establishment of a database electronically available to all affected agencies which contains the name, address, and telephone numbers of agencies that provide services to victims of human trafficking; and

(d) The protocols must provide guidelines for providing for the social service needs of victims of trafficking of humans, including housing, health care, and employment.

(3) By January 1, 2006, the work group shall finalize the written protocols and submit them with a report to the legislature and the governor.

(4) The protocols shall be reviewed on a biennial basis by the work group to determine whether revisions are appropriate. The director of the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, or the director's designee, shall within existing resources reconvene and chair the work group for this purpose.

Sec. 2002. RCW 18.85.285 and 2008 c 23 s 37 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Brokers and managing brokers must submit complete copies of their transactions to their firm. The designated broker shall keep adequate records of all real estate transactions handled by or through the firm or firms to which the designated broker is registered. The records shall include, but are not limited to, a copy of the purchase and sale agreement, earnest money receipt, and an itemization of the receipts and disbursements with each transaction. These records and all other records specified by the director by rule are open to inspection by the director or the director's authorized representatives.

(2) If any licensee exercises control over real estate transaction funds, those funds are considered trust funds.

(3) Every real estate licensee shall deliver or cause to be delivered to all parties signing the same, within a reasonable time after signing, purchase and sale agreements, listing agreements, and all other like or similar instruments signed by the parties.

(4) Every real estate firm that keeps separate real estate trust fund accounts must keep the accounts in a recognized Washington state depository. A real estate firm must maintain an adequate amount of funds in the trust fund accounts to facilitate the opening of the trust fund accounts or to prevent the closing of the trust fund accounts.

(5) All licensees shall keep separate and apart and physically segregated from the licensees' own funds, all funds or moneys including advance fees of clients that are being held by the licensees pending the closing of a real estate sale or transaction, or that have been collected for the clients and are being held for disbursement for or to the clients.

(6) A firm is not required to maintain a trust fund account for transactions concerning a purchase and sale agreement that instructs the broker to deliver the earnest money check directly to a named closing agent or to the seller.

(7) Brokers must deposit all funds into their firm's trust bank account the next banking day following receipt of the funds unless the purchase and sale agreement provides for deferred deposit or delivery. In that event, the broker must promptly deposit or deliver funds in accordance with the terms of the purchase and sale agreement.

(8)(a) If a real estate broker receives or maintains earnest money or client funds for deposit, the real estate firm shall maintain a pooled interest-bearing trust account for deposit of client funds, with the exception of property management trust accounts.

(b) The interest accruing on this account, net of any reasonable and appropriate financial institution service charges or fees, shall be paid to the state treasurer for deposit in the Washington housing trust fund created in RCW 43.185.030 and the real estate education program account created in RCW 18.85.321. Appropriate service charges or fees are those charges made by financial institutions on other demand deposit or "now" accounts. The firm or designated broker is not required to notify the client of the intended use of the funds.

(c) The department shall adopt rules that will serve as guidelines in the choice of an account specified in this subsection.

(9) If trust funds are claimed by more than one party, the designated broker or designated broker's delegate must promptly provide written notification to all contracting parties to a real estate transaction of the intent of the designated broker or designated broker's delegate to disburse client funds. The notification must include the names and addresses of all parties to the contract, the amount of money held and to whom it will be disbursed, and the date of disbursement that must occur no later than thirty consecutive days after the notification date.

(10) For an account created under subsection (8) of this section, the designated or managing broker shall direct the depository institution to:

(a) Remit interest or dividends, net of any reasonable and appropriate service charges or fees, on the average monthly balance in the account, or as otherwise computed in accordance with an institution's standard accounting practice, at least quarterly, to the state treasurer for deposit in the housing trust fund created by RCW 43.185.030 and the real estate education program account created in RCW 18.85.321; and

(b) Transmit to the director of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce a statement showing the name of the person or entity for whom the remittance is spent, the rate of interest applied, and the amount of service charges deducted, if any, and the account balance(s) of the period in which the report is made, with a copy of the statement to be transmitted to the depositing person or firm.

(11) The director of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall forward a copy of the reports required by subsection (10) of this section to the department to aid in the enforcement of the requirements of this section consistent with the normal enforcement and auditing practices of the department.

(12)(a) This section does not relieve any real estate broker, managing broker, or firm of any obligation with respect to the safekeeping of clients' funds.

(b) Any violation by real estate brokers, managing brokers, or firms of any of the provisions of this section, RCW 18.85.361, or chapter 18.235 RCW is grounds for disciplinary action against the licenses issued to the brokers, managing brokers, or firms.

Sec. 2003. RCW 19.27.190 and 1996 c 186 s 501 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Not later than January 1, 1991, the state building code council, in consultation with the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, shall establish interim requirements for the maintenance of indoor air quality in newly constructed residential buildings. In establishing the interim requirements, the council shall take into consideration differences in heating fuels and heating system types. These requirements shall be in effect July 1, 1991, through June 30, 1993.

(b) The interim requirements for new electrically space heated residential buildings shall include ventilation standards which provide for mechanical ventilation in areas of the residence where water vapor or cooking odors are produced. The ventilation shall be exhausted to the outside of the structure. The ventilation standards shall further provide for the capacity to supply outside air to each bedroom and the main living area through dedicated supply air inlet locations in walls, or in an equivalent manner. At least one exhaust fan in the home shall be controlled by a dehumidistat or clock timer to ensure that sufficient whole house ventilation is regularly provided as needed.

(c)(i) For new single-family residences with electric space heating systems, zero lot line homes, each unit in a duplex, and each attached housing unit in a planned unit development, the ventilation standards shall include fifty cubic feet per minute of effective installed ventilation capacity in each bathroom and one hundred cubic feet per minute of effective installed ventilation capacity in each kitchen.

(ii) For other new residential units with electric space heating systems the ventilation standards may be satisfied by the installation of two exhaust fans with a combined effective installed ventilation capacity of two hundred cubic feet per minute.

(iii) Effective installed ventilation capacity means the capability to deliver the specified ventilation rates for the actual design of the ventilation system. Natural ventilation and infiltration shall not be considered acceptable substitutes for mechanical ventilation.

(d) For new residential buildings that are space heated with other than electric space heating systems, the interim standards shall be designed to result in indoor air quality equivalent to that achieved with the interim ventilation standards for electric space heated homes.

(e) The interim requirements for all newly constructed residential buildings shall include standards for indoor air quality pollutant source control, including the following requirements: All structural panel components of the residence shall comply with appropriate standards for the emission of formaldehyde; the back-drafting of combustion by-products from combustion appliances shall be minimized through the use of dampers, vents, outside combustion air sources, or other appropriate technologies; and, in areas of the state where monitored data indicate action is necessary to inhibit indoor radon gas concentrations from exceeding appropriate health standards, entry of radon gas into homes shall be minimized through appropriate foundation construction measures.

(2) No later than January 1, 1993, the state building code council, in consultation with the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, shall establish final requirements for the maintenance of indoor air quality in newly constructed residences to be in effect beginning July 1, 1993. For new electrically space heated residential buildings, these requirements shall maintain indoor air quality equivalent to that provided by the mechanical ventilation and indoor air pollutant source control requirements included in the February 7, 1989, Bonneville power administration record of decision for the environmental impact statement on new energy efficient homes programs (DOE/EIS-0127F) built with electric space heating. In residential units other than single-family, zero lot line, duplexes, and attached housing units in planned unit developments, ventilation requirements may be satisfied by the installation of two exhaust fans with a combined effective installed ventilation capacity of two hundred cubic feet per minute. For new residential buildings that are space heated with other than electric space heating systems, the standards shall be designed to result in indoor air quality equivalent to that achieved with the ventilation and source control standards for electric space heated homes. In establishing the final requirements, the council shall take into consideration differences in heating fuels and heating system types.

Sec. 2004. RCW 24.46.010 and 1995 c 399 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the finding of the legislature that foreign trade zones serve an important public purpose by the creation of employment opportunities within the state and that the establishment of zones designed to accomplish this purpose is to be encouraged. It is the further intent of the legislature that the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce provide assistance to entities planning to apply to the United States for permission to establish such zones.

Sec. 2005. RCW 28A.160.090 and 1995 c 399 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

Each school district board shall determine its own policy as to whether or not its school buses will be rented or leased for the purposes of RCW 28A.160.080, and if the board decision is to rent or lease, under what conditions, subject to the following:

(1) Such renting or leasing may take place only after the director of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce or any of his or her agents so authorized has, at the request of an involved governmental agency, declared that an emergency exists in a designated area insofar as the need for additional transport is concerned.

(2) The agency renting or leasing the school buses must agree, in writing, to reimburse the school district for all costs and expenses related to their use and also must provide an indemnity agreement protecting the district against any type of claim or legal action whatsoever, including all legal costs incident thereto.

Sec. 2006. RCW 28A.515.320 and 1996 c 186 s 503 are each amended to read as follows:

The common school construction fund is to be used exclusively for the purpose of financing the construction of facilities for the common schools. The sources of said fund shall be: (1) Those proceeds derived from sale or appropriation of timber and other crops from school and state land other than those granted for specific purposes; (2) the interest accruing on the permanent common school fund less the allocations to the state treasurer's service ((account [fund]))fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190 and the state investment board expense account pursuant to RCW 43.33A.160 together with all rentals and other revenue derived therefrom and from land and other property devoted to the permanent common school fund; (3) all moneys received by the state from the United States under the provisions of section 191, Title 30, United States Code, Annotated, and under section 810, chapter 12, Title 16, (Conservation), United States Code, Annotated, except moneys received before June 30, 2001, and when thirty megawatts of geothermal power is certified as commercially available by the receiving utilities and the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, eighty percent of such moneys, under the Geothermal Steam Act of 1970 pursuant to RCW 43.140.030; and (4) such other sources as the legislature may direct. That portion of the common school construction fund derived from interest on the permanent common school fund may be used to retire such bonds as may be authorized by law for the purpose of financing the construction of facilities for the common schools.

The interest accruing on the permanent common school fund less the allocations to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190 and the state investment board expense account pursuant to RCW 43.33A.160 together with all rentals and other revenues accruing thereto pursuant to subsection (2) of this section prior to July 1, 1967, shall be exclusively applied to the current use of the common schools.

To the extent that the moneys in the common school construction fund are in excess of the amount necessary to allow fulfillment of the purpose of said fund, the excess shall be available for deposit to the credit of the permanent common school fund or available for the current use of the common schools, as the legislature may direct. Any money from the common school construction fund which is made available for the current use of the common schools shall be restored to the fund by appropriation, including interest income ((foregone [forgone]))forgone, before the end of the next fiscal biennium following such use.

Sec. 2007. RCW 28B.30.537 and 1998 c 245 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

The IMPACT center shall:

(1) Coordinate the teaching, research, and extension expertise of the college of agriculture and home economics at Washington State University to assist in:

(a) The design and development of information and strategies to expand the long-term international markets for Washington agricultural products; and

(b) The dissemination of such information and strategies to Washington exporters, overseas users, and public and private trade organizations;

(2) Research and identify current impediments to increased exports of Washington agricultural products, and determine methods of surmounting those impediments and opportunities for exporting new agricultural products and commodities to foreign markets;

(3) Prepare curricula to present and distribute information concerning international trade in agricultural commodities and products to students, exporters, international traders, and the public;

(4) Provide high quality research and graduate education and professional nondegree training in international trade in agricultural commodities in cooperation with other existing programs;

(5) Ensure that activities of the center adequately reflect the objectives for the state's agricultural market development programs established by the department of agriculture as the lead state agency for such programs under chapter 43.23 RCW; and

(6) Link itself through cooperative agreements with the center for international trade in forest products at the University of Washington, the state department of agriculture, the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, Washington's agriculture businesses and associations, and other state agency data collection, processing, and dissemination efforts.

Sec. 2008. RCW 28B.30.900 and 1996 c 186 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All powers, duties, and functions of the state energy office under RCW 43.21F.045 relating to implementing energy education, applied research, and technology transfer programs shall be transferred to Washington State University.

(2) The specific programs transferred to Washington State University shall include but not be limited to the following: Renewable energy, energy software, industrial energy efficiency, education and information, energy ideas clearinghouse, and telecommunications.

(3)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the state energy office pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be delivered to the custody of Washington State University. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, software, database, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the state energy office in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be made available to Washington State University.

(b) Any appropriations made to, any other funds provided to, or any grants made to or contracts with the state energy office for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on July 1, 1996, be transferred and credited to Washington State University.

(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, software, database, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, an arbitrator mutually agreed upon by the parties in dispute shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(d) All rules and all pending business before the state energy office pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be continued and acted upon by Washington State University. All existing contracts, grants, and obligations, excluding personnel contracts and obligations, shall remain in full force and shall be assigned to and performed by Washington State University.

(e) The transfer of the powers, duties, and functions of the state energy office does not affect the validity of any act performed before July 1, 1996.

(f) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this section, the director of the office of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation.

(4) Washington State University shall enter into an interagency agreement with the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce regarding the relationship between policy development and public outreach. The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall provide Washington State University available existing and future oil overcharge restitution and federal energy block funding for a minimum period of five years to carry out energy programs. Nothing in chapter 186, Laws of 1996 prohibits Washington State University from seeking grant funding for energy-related programs directly from other entities.

(5) Washington State University shall select and appoint existing state energy office employees to positions to perform the duties and functions transferred. Employees appointed by Washington State University are exempt from the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW unless otherwise designated by the institution. Any future vacant or new positions will be filled using Washington State University's standard hiring procedures.

Sec. 2009. RCW 28B.50.281 and 2017 c 39 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state board shall work with the leadership team, the Washington state apprenticeship and training council, and the office of the superintendent of public instruction to jointly develop, by June 30, 2010, curricula and training programs, to include on-the-job training, classroom training, and safety and health training, for the development of the skills and qualifications identified by the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce under section 7 of this act.

(2) The board shall target a portion of any federal stimulus funding received to ensure commensurate capacity for high employer-demand programs of study developed under this section. To that end, the state board must coordinate with the department, the leadership team, the workforce board, or another appropriate state agency in the application for and receipt of any funding that may be made available through the federal youthbuild program, workforce innovation and opportunity act, job corps, or other relevant federal programs.

(3) The board shall provide an interim report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2011, and a final report by December 1, 2013, detailing the effectiveness of, and any recommendations for improving, the worker training curricula and programs established in this section.

(4) Existing curricula and training programs or programs provided by community and technical colleges in the state developed under this section must be recognized as programs of study under RCW 28B.50.273.

(5) Subject to available funding, the board may grant enrollment priority to persons who qualify for a waiver under RCW 28B.15.522 and who enroll in curricula and training programs provided by community or technical colleges in the state that have been developed in accordance with this section.

(6) The college board may prioritize workforce training programs that lead to a credential, certificate, or degree in green economy jobs. For purposes of this section, green economy jobs include those in the primary industries of a green economy including clean energy, high-efficiency building, green transportation, and environmental protection. Prioritization efforts may include but are not limited to: (a) Prioritization of the use of high employer-demand funding for workforce training programs in green economy jobs, if the programs meet minimum criteria for identification as a high-demand program of study as defined by the state board for community and technical colleges, however any additional community and technical college high-demand funding authorized for the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium and thereafter may be subject to prioritization; (b) increased outreach efforts to public utilities, education, labor, government, and private industry to develop tailored, green job training programs; and (c) increased outreach efforts to target populations. Outreach efforts shall be conducted in partnership with local workforce development councils.

(7) The definitions in RCW 43.330.010 apply to this section and RCW 28B.50.282.

Sec. 2010. RCW 28C.18.130 and 2008 c 103 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to funding provided for the purposes of this section, the board, in consultation with the state board for community and technical colleges, the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, and the employment security department, shall allocate grants on a competitive basis to establish and support industry skill panels.

(2) Eligible applicants for the grants allocated under this section include, but are not limited to, workforce development councils, community and technical colleges, economic development councils, private career schools, chambers of commerce, trade associations, and apprenticeship councils.

(3) Entities applying for a grant under this section shall provide an employer match of at least twenty-five percent to be eligible. The local match may include in-kind services.

(4) It shall be the role of industry skill panels funded under this chapter to enable businesses in the industry to address workforce skill needs. Industry skill panels shall identify workforce strategies to meet the needs in order to benefit employers and workers across the industry. Examples of strategies include, but are not limited to: Developing career guidance materials; producing or updating skill standards and curricula; designing training programs and courses; developing technical assessments and certifications; arranging employer mentoring, tutoring, and internships; identifying private sector assistance in providing faculty or equipment to training providers; and organizing industry conferences disseminating best practices. The products and services of particular skill panels shall depend upon the needs of the industry.

Sec. 2011. RCW 28C.18.140 and 2008 c 103 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The board shall establish industry skill panel standards that identify the expectations for industry skill panel products and services. The board shall establish the standards in consultation with labor, the state board for community and technical colleges, the employment security department, the institute of workforce development and economic sustainability, and the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce. Continued funding of particular industry skill panels shall be based on meeting the standards established by the board under this section. Beginning December 1, 2008, the board shall report annually to the governor and the economic development and higher education committees of the legislature on the results of the industry skill panels funded under this chapter in meeting the standards.

Sec. 2012. RCW 31.24.030 and 2006 c 87 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

In furtherance of its purposes and in addition to the powers now or hereafter conferred on business corporations by Title 23B RCW and upon limited liability companies by chapter 25.15 RCW, as applicable, a business development company has, subject to the restrictions and limitations in this section, the following powers:

(1) To assess stockholders, or a class of stockholders, of the business development company, if authorized by the articles of incorporation and approved by the department pursuant to a plan of assessment as provided for in RCW 31.24.066;

(2) To make qualified loans to borrowers in relation to business development projects;

(3) To make qualified investments in businesses in relation to business development projects;

(4) To facilitate and arrange qualified participation loans by qualified loan participants to borrowers in relation to business development projects;

(5) To participate in the partial funding of qualified participation loans;

(6) To elect, appoint, and employ officers, agents, and employees;

(7) To make contracts and incur liabilities for any of the purposes of the business development company. However, a business development company shall not incur any secondary liability by way of guaranty or endorsement of the obligations of any person, firm, company, association, or trust, or in any other manner;

(8) To the extent permitted by other applicable law, to borrow money from the federal small business administration and any other similar federal or state agency, for any of the purposes of a business development company;

(9) To borrow money from a financial institution or other financial entity;

(10) To issue bonds, debentures, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness, whether secured or unsecured, and to secure the same by mortgage, pledge, deed of trust, or other lien on its property, franchises, rights, and privileges of every kind and nature or any part or interest therein, without securing stockholder approval;

(11) To purchase, receive, hold, lease, or otherwise acquire, and to sell, convey, transfer, lease, or otherwise dispose of real and personal property, together with such rights and privileges as may be incidental and appurtenant thereto and the use thereof, including, but not restricted to, any real or personal property acquired by the business development company in the satisfaction of debts or enforcement of obligations;

(12) To acquire the good will, business, rights, real and personal property, and other assets, or any part thereof, or interest therein, of any persons, firms, corporations, limited liability companies, partnerships, limited partnerships, associations, or trusts, and to assume, undertake, or pay the obligations, debts, and liabilities of any such person, firm, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership, association, or trust;

(13) To acquire improved or unimproved real estate for the purpose of constructing industrial plants or other business establishments thereon or for the purpose of disposing of such real estate to others for the construction of industrial plants or other business establishments; and to acquire, construct or reconstruct, alter, repair, maintain, operate, sell, convey, transfer, lease, or otherwise dispose of industrial plants or business establishments;

(14) To acquire, subscribe for, own, hold, sell, assign, transfer, mortgage, pledge, or otherwise dispose of the stock, shares, bonds, debentures, notes, or other securities and evidences of interest in, or indebtedness of, any person, firm, limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership, association, or trust, and while the owner or holder thereof to exercise all the rights, powers, and privileges of ownership, including the right to vote thereon;

(15) To mortgage, pledge, or otherwise encumber any property, right or things of value, acquired pursuant to the powers contained in subsections (11), (12), and (14) of this section, as security for the payment of any part of the purchase price thereof;

(16) To cooperate with and avail itself of the facilities and assistance programs of the United States department of commerce, the United States department of the treasury, the United States department of housing and urban development, the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, and any other similar state or federal governmental agencies; and to cooperate with and assist, and otherwise encourage organizations in the various communities of the state in the promotion, assistance, and development of the business prosperity and economic welfare of such communities or of this state or of any part thereof; and

(17) To do all acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly granted in this chapter.

Sec. 2013. RCW 34.05.330 and 1998 c 280 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person may petition an agency requesting the adoption, amendment, or repeal of any rule. The office of financial management shall prescribe by rule the format for such petitions and the procedure for their submission, consideration, and disposition and provide a standard form that may be used to petition any agency. Within sixty days after submission of a petition, the agency shall either (a) deny the petition in writing, stating (i) its reasons for the denial, specifically addressing the concerns raised by the petitioner, and, where appropriate, (ii) the alternative means by which it will address the concerns raised by the petitioner, or (b) initiate rule-making proceedings in accordance with RCW 34.05.320.

(2) If an agency denies a petition to repeal or amend a rule submitted under subsection (1) of this section, and the petition alleges that the rule is not within the intent of the legislature or was not adopted in accordance with all applicable provisions of law, the person may petition for review of the rule by the joint administrative rules review committee under RCW 34.05.655.

(3) If an agency denies a petition to repeal or amend a rule submitted under subsection (1) of this section, the petitioner, within thirty days of the denial, may appeal the denial to the governor. The governor shall immediately file notice of the appeal with the code reviser for publication in the Washington state register. Within forty-five days after receiving the appeal, the governor shall either (a) deny the petition in writing, stating (i) his or her reasons for the denial, specifically addressing the concerns raised by the petitioner, and, (ii) where appropriate, the alternative means by which he or she will address the concerns raised by the petitioner; (b) for agencies listed in RCW 43.17.010, direct the agency to initiate rule-making proceedings in accordance with this chapter; or (c) for agencies not listed in RCW 43.17.010, recommend that the agency initiate rule-making proceedings in accordance with this chapter. The governor's response to the appeal shall be published in the Washington state register and copies shall be submitted to the chief clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate.

(4) In petitioning for repeal or amendment of a rule under this section, a person is encouraged to address, among other concerns:

(a) Whether the rule is authorized;

(b) Whether the rule is needed;

(c) Whether the rule conflicts with or duplicates other federal, state, or local laws;

(d) Whether alternatives to the rule exist that will serve the same purpose at less cost;

(e) Whether the rule applies differently to public and private entities;

(f) Whether the rule serves the purposes for which it was adopted;

(g) Whether the costs imposed by the rule are unreasonable;

(h) Whether the rule is clearly and simply stated;

(i) Whether the rule is different than a federal law applicable to the same activity or subject matter without adequate justification; and

(j) Whether the rule was adopted according to all applicable provisions of law.

(5) The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce and the office of financial management shall coordinate efforts among agencies to inform the public about the existence of this rules review process.

(6) The office of financial management shall initiate the rule making required by subsection (1) of this section by September 1, 1995.

Sec. 2014. RCW 35.02.260 and 1995 c 399 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall identify federal, state, and local agencies that should receive notification that a new city or town is about to incorporate and shall assist newly formed cities and towns during the interim period before the official date of incorporation in providing such notification to the identified agencies.

Sec. 2015. RCW 35.13.171 and 2009 c 549 s 2010 are each amended to read as follows:

Within thirty days after the filing of a city's or town's annexation resolution pursuant to RCW 35.13.015 with the board of county commissioners or within thirty days after filing with the county commissioners a petition calling for an election on annexation, as provided in RCW 35.13.020, or within thirty days after approval by the legislative body of a city or town of a petition of property owners calling for annexation, as provided in RCW 35.13.130, the mayor of the city or town concerned that is not subject to the jurisdiction of a boundary review board under chapter 36.93 RCW, shall convene a review board composed of the following persons:

(1) The mayor of the city or town initiating the annexation by resolution, or the mayor in the event of a twenty percent annexation petition pursuant to RCW 35.13.020, or an alternate designated by the mayor;

(2) The chair of the board of county commissioners of the county wherein the property to be annexed is situated, or an alternate designated by him or her;

(3) The director of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, or an alternate designated by the director;

Two additional members to be designated, one by the mayor of the annexing city, which member shall be a resident property owner of the city, and one by the chair of the county legislative authority, which member shall be a resident of and a property owner or a resident or a property owner if there be no resident property owner in the area proposed to be annexed, shall be added to the original membership and the full board thereafter convened upon call of the mayor: PROVIDED FURTHER, That three members of the board shall constitute a quorum.

Sec. 2016. RCW 35.21.300 and 1995 c 399 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The lien for charges for service by a city waterworks, or electric light or power plant may be enforced only by cutting off the service until the delinquent and unpaid charges are paid, except that until June 30, 1991, utility service for residential space heating may be terminated between November 15 and March 15 only as provided in subsections (2) and (4) of this section. In the event of a disputed account and tender by the owner of the premises of the amount the owner claims to be due before the service is cut off, the right to refuse service to any premises shall not accrue until suit has been entered by the city and judgment entered in the case.

(2) Utility service for residential space heating shall not be terminated between November 15 through March 15 if the customer:

(a) Notifies the utility of the inability to pay the bill, including a security deposit. This notice should be provided within five business days of receiving a payment overdue notice unless there are extenuating circumstances. If the customer fails to notify the utility within five business days and service is terminated, the customer can, by paying reconnection charges, if any, and fulfilling the requirements of this section, receive the protections of this chapter;

(b) Provides self-certification of household income for the prior twelve months to a grantee of the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce which administers federally funded energy assistance programs. The grantee shall determine that the household income does not exceed the maximum allowed for eligibility under the state's plan for low-income energy assistance under 42 U.S.C. 8624 and shall provide a dollar figure that is seven percent of household income. The grantee may verify information in the self-certification;

(c) Has applied for home heating assistance from applicable government and private sector organizations and certifies that any assistance received will be applied to the current bill and future utility bills;

(d) Has applied for low-income weatherization assistance to the utility or other appropriate agency if such assistance is available for the dwelling;

(e) Agrees to a payment plan and agrees to maintain the payment plan. The plan will be designed both to pay the past due bill by the following October 15 and to pay for continued utility service. If the past due bill is not paid by the following October 15, the customer shall not be eligible for protections under this chapter until the past due bill is paid. The plan shall not require monthly payments in excess of seven percent of the customer's monthly income plus one-twelfth of any arrearage accrued from the date application is made and thereafter during November 15 through March 15. A customer may agree to pay a higher percentage during this period, but shall not be in default unless payment during this period is less than seven percent of monthly income plus one-twelfth of any arrearage accrued from the date application is made and thereafter. If assistance payments are received by the customer subsequent to implementation of the plan, the customer shall contact the utility to reformulate the plan; and

(f) Agrees to pay the moneys owed even if he or she moves.

(3) The utility shall:

(a) Include in any notice that an account is delinquent and that service may be subject to termination, a description of the customer's duties in this section;

(b) Assist the customer in fulfilling the requirements under this section;

(c) Be authorized to transfer an account to a new residence when a customer who has established a plan under this section moves from one residence to another within the same utility service area;

(d) Be permitted to disconnect service if the customer fails to honor the payment program. Utilities may continue to disconnect service for those practices authorized by law other than for nonpayment as provided for in this section. Customers who qualify for payment plans under this section who default on their payment plans and are disconnected can be reconnected and maintain the protections afforded under this chapter by paying reconnection charges, if any, and by paying all amounts that would have been due and owing under the terms of the applicable payment plan, absent default, on the date on which service is reconnected; and

(e) Advise the customer in writing at the time it disconnects service that it will restore service if the customer contacts the utility and fulfills the other requirements of this section.

(4) All municipal utilities shall offer residential customers the option of a budget billing or equal payment plan. The budget billing or equal payment plan shall be offered low-income customers eligible under the state's plan for low-income energy assistance prepared in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 8624(C)(1) without limiting availability to certain months of the year, without regard to the length of time the customer has occupied the premises, and without regard to whether the customer is the tenant or owner of the premises occupied.

(5) An agreement between the customer and the utility, whether oral or written, shall not waive the protections afforded under this chapter.

Sec. 2017. RCW 36.01.120 and 1995 c 399 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the finding of the legislature that foreign trade zones serve an important public purpose by the creation of employment opportunities within the state and that the establishment of zones designed to accomplish this purpose is to be encouraged. It is the further intent of the legislature that the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce provide assistance to entities planning to apply to the United States for permission to establish such zones.

Sec. 2018. RCW 36.70A.085 and 2022 c 252 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Comprehensive plans of cities that have a marine container port with annual operating revenues in excess of sixty million dollars within their jurisdiction must include a container port element.

(2) Comprehensive plans of cities that include all or part of a port district with annual operating revenues in excess of twenty million dollars may include a marine industrial port element. Prior to adopting a marine industrial port element under this subsection (2), the commission of the applicable port district must adopt a resolution in support of the proposed element.

(3) Port elements adopted under subsections (1) and (2) of this section must be developed collaboratively between the city, the applicable port, and the applicable tribe, which shall comply with RCW 36.70A.040(8), and must establish policies and programs that:

(a) Define and protect the core areas of port and port-related industrial uses within the city;

(b) Provide reasonably efficient access to the core area through freight corridors within the city limits; and

(c) Identify and resolve key land use conflicts along the edge of the core area, and minimize and mitigate, to the extent practicable, incompatible uses along the edge of the core area.

(4) Port elements adopted under subsections (1) and (2) of this section must be:

(a) Completed and approved by the city according to the schedule specified in RCW 36.70A.130; and

(b) Consistent with the economic development, transportation, and land use elements of the city's comprehensive plan, and consistent with the city's capital facilities plan.

(5) In adopting port elements under subsections (1) and (2) of this section, cities and ports must: Ensure that there is consistency between the port elements and the port comprehensive scheme required under chapters 53.20 and 53.25 RCW; and retain sufficient planning flexibility to secure emerging economic opportunities.

(6) In developing port elements under subsections (1) and (2) of this section, a city may utilize one or more of the following approaches:

(a) Creation of a port overlay district that protects container port uses;

(b) Use of industrial land banks;

(c) Use of buffers and transition zones between incompatible uses;

(d) Use of joint transportation funding agreements;

(e) Use of policies to encourage the retention of valuable warehouse and storage facilities;

(f) Use of limitations on the location or size, or both, of nonindustrial uses in the core area and surrounding areas; and

(g) Use of other approaches by agreement between the city and the port.

(7) The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce must provide matching grant funds to cities meeting the requirements of subsection (1) of this section to support development of the required container port element.

(8) Any planned improvements identified in port elements adopted under subsections (1) and (2) of this section must be transmitted by the city to the transportation commission for consideration of inclusion in the statewide transportation plan required under RCW 47.01.071.

Sec. 2019. RCW 36.70A.131 and 1998 c 286 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

As part of the review required by RCW 36.70A.130(1), a county or city shall review its mineral resource lands designations adopted pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170 and mineral resource lands development regulations adopted pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040 and 36.70A.060. In its review, the county or city shall take into consideration:

(1) New information made available since the adoption or last review of its designations or development regulations, including data available from the department of natural resources relating to mineral resource deposits; and

(2) New or modified model development regulations for mineral resource lands prepared by the department of natural resources, the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, or the Washington state association of counties.

Sec. 2020. RCW 36.70B.040 and 1997 c 429 s 46 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A proposed project's consistency with a local government's development regulations adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW, or, in the absence of applicable development regulations, the appropriate elements of the comprehensive plan adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW shall be decided by the local government during project review by consideration of:

(a) The type of land use;

(b) The level of development, such as units per acre or other measures of density;

(c) Infrastructure, including public facilities and services needed to serve the development; and

(d) The characteristics of the development, such as development standards.

(2) In deciding whether a project is consistent, the determinations made pursuant to RCW 36.70B.030(2) shall be controlling.

(3) For purposes of this section, the term "consistency" shall include all terms used in this chapter and chapter 36.70A RCW to refer to performance in accordance with this chapter and chapter 36.70A RCW, including but not limited to compliance, conformity, and consistency.

(4) Nothing in this section requires documentation, dictates an agency's procedures for considering consistency, or limits a city or county from asking more specific or related questions with respect to any of the four main categories listed in subsection (1)(a) through (d) of this section.

(5) The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce is authorized to develop and adopt by rule criteria to assist local governments planning under RCW 36.70A.040 to analyze the consistency of project actions. These criteria shall be jointly developed with the department of ecology.

Sec. 2021. RCW 36.70B.080 and 2004 c 191 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Development regulations adopted pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040 must establish and implement time periods for local government actions for each type of project permit application and provide timely and predictable procedures to determine whether a completed project permit application meets the requirements of those development regulations. The time periods for local government actions for each type of complete project permit application or project type should not exceed one hundred twenty days, unless the local government makes written findings that a specified amount of additional time is needed to process specific complete project permit applications or project types.

The development regulations must, for each type of permit application, specify the contents of a completed project permit application necessary for the complete compliance with the time periods and procedures.

(2)(a) Counties subject to the requirements of RCW 36.70A.215 and the cities within those counties that have populations of at least twenty thousand must, for each type of permit application, identify the total number of project permit applications for which decisions are issued according to the provisions of this chapter. For each type of project permit application identified, these counties and cities must establish and implement a deadline for issuing a notice of final decision as required by subsection (1) of this section and minimum requirements for applications to be deemed complete under RCW 36.70B.070 as required by subsection (1) of this section.

(b) Counties and cities subject to the requirements of this subsection also must prepare annual performance reports that include, at a minimum, the following information for each type of project permit application identified in accordance with the requirements of (a) of this subsection:

(i) Total number of complete applications received during the year;

(ii) Number of complete applications received during the year for which a notice of final decision was issued before the deadline established under this subsection;

(iii) Number of applications received during the year for which a notice of final decision was issued after the deadline established under this subsection;

(iv) Number of applications received during the year for which an extension of time was mutually agreed upon by the applicant and the county or city;

(v) Variance of actual performance, excluding applications for which mutually agreed time extensions have occurred, to the deadline established under this subsection during the year; and

(vi) The mean processing time and the number standard deviation from the mean.

(c) Counties and cities subject to the requirements of this subsection must:

(i) Provide notice of and access to the annual performance reports through the county's or city's website; and

(ii) Post electronic facsimiles of the annual performance reports through the county's or city's website. Postings on a county's or city's website indicating that the reports are available by contacting the appropriate county or city department or official do not comply with the requirements of this subsection.

If a county or city subject to the requirements of this subsection does not maintain a website, notice of the reports must be given by reasonable methods, including but not limited to those methods specified in RCW 36.70B.110(4).

(3) Nothing in this section prohibits a county or city from extending a deadline for issuing a decision for a specific project permit application for any reasonable period of time mutually agreed upon by the applicant and the local government.

(4) The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall work with the counties and cities to review the potential implementation costs of the requirements of subsection (2) of this section. The department, in cooperation with the local governments, shall prepare a report summarizing the projected costs, together with recommendations for state funding assistance for implementation costs, and provide the report to the governor and appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives by January 1, 2005.

Sec. 2022. RCW 36.93.080 and 1995 c 399 s 44 are each amended to read as follows:

Expenditures by the board shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 36.40 RCW and other statutes relating to expenditures by counties. The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall on a quarterly basis remit to each county one-half of the actual costs incurred by the county for the operation of the boundary review board within individual counties as provided for in this chapter. However, in the event no funds are appropriated to the said agency for this purpose, this shall not in any way affect the operation of the boundary review board.

Sec. 2023. RCW 36.110.030 and 1995 c 399 s 45 are each amended to read as follows:

A statewide jail industries board of directors is established. The board shall consist of the following members:

(1) One sheriff and one police chief, to be selected by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs;

(2) One county commissioner or one county councilmember to be selected by the Washington state association of counties;

(3) One city official to be selected by the association of Washington cities;

(4) Two jail administrators to be selected by the Washington state jail association, one of whom shall be from a county or a city with an established jail industries program;

(5) One prosecuting attorney to be selected by the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys;

(6) One administrator from a city or county corrections department to be selected by the Washington correctional association;

(7) One county clerk to be selected by the Washington association of county clerks;

(8) Three representatives from labor to be selected by the governor. The representatives may be chosen from a list of nominations provided by statewide labor organizations representing a cross section of trade organizations;

(9) Three representatives from business to be selected by the governor. The representatives may be chosen from a list of nominations provided by statewide business organizations representing a cross section of businesses, industries, and all sizes of employers;

(10) The governor's representative from the employment security department;

(11) One member representing crime victims, to be selected by the governor;

(12) One member representing online law enforcement officers, to be selected by the governor;

(13) One member from the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce to be selected by the governor;

(14) One member representing higher education, vocational education, or adult basic education to be selected by the governor; and

(15) The governor's representative from the correctional industries division of the state department of corrections shall be an ex officio member for the purpose of coordination and cooperation between prison and jail industries and to further a positive relationship between state and local government offender programs.

Sec. 2024. RCW 39.04.156 and 2000 c 138 s 104 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, in cooperation with the municipal research and services center, shall prepare a small works roster manual and periodically notify the different types of local government authorized to use a small works roster process about this authority.

Sec. 2025. RCW 39.19.240 and 2005 c 302 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The office shall, in consultation with the state treasurer and the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, compile information on minority and women's business enterprises that have received financial assistance through a qualified public depositary under the provisions of RCW 43.86A.060. The information shall include, but is not limited to:

(a) Name of the qualified public depositary;

(b) Geographic location of the minority or women's business enterprise;

(c) Name of the minority or women's business enterprise;

(d) Date of last certification by the office and certification number;

(e) Type of business;

(f) Amount and term of the loan to the minority or women's business enterprise; and

(g) Other information the office deems necessary for the implementation of this section.

(2) The office shall notify the state treasurer of minority or women's business enterprises that are no longer certified under the provisions of this chapter. The written notification shall contain information regarding the reason for the decertification and information on financing provided to the minority or women's business enterprise under RCW 43.86A.060.

(3) The office shall, in consultation with the state treasurer and the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, monitor the performance of loans made to minority and women-owned business enterprises under RCW 43.86A.060.

Sec. 2026. RCW 39.34.230 and 2008 c 181 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) During a covered emergency, the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce may enter into interlocal agreements under this chapter with one or more public agencies for the purposes of providing mutual aid and cooperation to any public agency affected by the cause of the emergency.

(2) All legal liability by a public agency and its employees for damage to property or injury or death to persons caused by acts done or attempted during, or while traveling to or from, a covered emergency, or in preparation for a covered emergency, pursuant to an interlocal agreement entered into under this section, or under the color of this section in a bona fide attempt to comply therewith, shall be the obligation of the state of Washington. Suits may be instituted and maintained against the state for the enforcement of such liability, or for the indemnification of any public agency or its employees for damage done to their private property, or for any judgment against them for acts done in good faith in compliance with this chapter: PROVIDED, That the foregoing shall not be construed to result in indemnification in any case of willful misconduct, gross negligence, or bad faith on the part of any public agency or any of a public agency's employees: PROVIDED, That should the United States or any agency thereof, in accordance with any federal statute, rule, or regulation, provide for the payment of damages to property and/or for death or injury as provided for in this section, then and in that event there shall be no liability or obligation whatsoever upon the part of the state of Washington for any such damage, death, or injury for which the United States government assumes liability.

(3) For purposes of this section, "covered emergency" means an emergency for which the governor has proclaimed a state of emergency under RCW 43.06.010, and for which the governor has authorized the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce to enter into interlocal agreements under this section.

(4) This section shall not affect the right of any person to receive benefits to which he or she would otherwise be entitled under the workers' compensation law, or under any pension or retirement law, nor the right of any such person to receive any benefits or compensation under any act of congress.

Sec. 2027. RCW 39.35D.080 and 2005 c 12 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as provided in this section, affordable housing projects funded out of the state capital budget are exempt from the provisions of this chapter. On or before July 1, 2008, the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall identify, implement, and apply a sustainable building program for affordable housing projects that receive housing trust fund (under chapter 43.185 RCW) funding in a state capital budget. The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall not develop its own sustainable building standard, but shall work with stakeholders to adopt an existing sustainable building standard or criteria appropriate for affordable housing. Any application of the program to affordable housing, including any monitoring to track the performance of either sustainable features or energy standards or both, is the responsibility of the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce. Beginning in 2009 and ending in 2016, the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall report to the department as required under RCW 39.35D.030(3)(b).

Sec. 2028. RCW 39.44.210 and 1995 c 399 s 54 are each amended to read as follows:

For each state or local government bond issued, the underwriter of the issue shall supply the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce with information on the bond issue within twenty days of its issuance. In cases where the issuer of the bond makes a direct or private sale to a purchaser without benefit of an underwriter, the issuer shall supply the required information. The bond issue information shall be provided on a form prescribed by the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce and shall include but is not limited to: (1) The par value of the bond issue; (2) the effective interest rates; (3) a schedule of maturities; (4) the purposes of the bond issue; (5) cost of issuance information; and (6) the type of bonds that are issued. A copy of the bond covenants shall be supplied with this information.

For each state or local government bond issued, the issuer's bond counsel promptly shall provide to the underwriter or to the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce information on the amount of any fees charged for services rendered with regard to the bond issue.

Each local government that issues any type of bond shall make a report annually to the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce that includes a summary of all the outstanding bonds of the local government as of the first day of January in that year. Such report shall distinguish the outstanding bond issues on the basis of the type of bond, as defined in RCW 39.44.200, and shall report the local government's outstanding indebtedness compared to any applicable limitations on indebtedness, including RCW 35.42.200, 39.30.010, and 39.36.020.

Sec. 2029. RCW 39.44.230 and 1995 c 399 s 55 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce may adopt rules and regulations pursuant to the administrative procedure act to require (1) the submission of bond issuance information by underwriters and bond counsel to the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce in a timely manner and (2) the submission of additional information on bond issues by state and local governments, including summaries of outstanding bond issues.

Sec. 2030. RCW 39.84.090 and 1998 c 245 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Prior to issuance of any revenue bonds, each public corporation shall submit a copy of its enabling ordinance and charter, a description of any industrial development facility proposed to be undertaken, and the basis for its qualification as an industrial development facility to the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce.

(2) If the industrial development facility is not eligible under this chapter, the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall give notice to the public corporation, in writing and by certified mail, within twelve working days of receipt of the description.

(3) The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall provide such advice and assistance to public corporations and municipalities which have created or may wish to create public corporations as the public corporations or municipalities request and the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce considers appropriate.

Sec. 2031. RCW 40.10.020 and 1995 c 399 s 58 are each amended to read as follows:

The state archivist is authorized to reproduce those documents designated as essential records by the several elected and appointed officials of the state and local government by microfilm or other miniature photographic process and to assist and cooperate in the storage and safeguarding of such reproductions in such place as is recommended by the state archivist with the advice of the director of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce. The state archivist shall coordinate the essential records protection program and shall carry out the provisions of the state emergency plan as they relate to the preservation of essential records. The state archivist is authorized to charge the several departments of the state and local government the actual cost incurred in reproducing, storing and safeguarding such documents: PROVIDED, That nothing herein shall authorize the destruction of the originals of such documents after reproduction thereof.

Sec. 2032. RCW 41.06.072 and 1995 c 399 s 59 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the exemptions set forth in this chapter, this chapter shall not apply within the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce to the director, one confidential secretary, the deputy directors, all assistant directors, the state historic preservation officer, and up to two professional staff members within the emergency management program.

Sec. 2033. RCW 43.20A.037 and 1995 c 399 s 65 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall identify and catalog real property that is no longer required for department purposes and is suitable for the development of affordable housing for very low-income, and moderate-income households as defined in RCW 43.63A.510. The inventory shall include the location, approximate size, and current zoning classification of the property. The department shall provide a copy of the inventory to the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce by November 1, 1993, and every November 1 thereafter.

(2) By November 1 of each year, beginning in 1994, the department shall purge the inventory of real property of sites that are no longer available for the development of affordable housing. The department shall include an updated listing of real property that has become available since the last update. As used in this section, "real property" means buildings, land, or buildings and land.

Sec. 2034. RCW 43.20A.790 and 1999 c 267 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall collaborate with the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce in the development of the coordinated and comprehensive plan for homeless families with children required under RCW 43.63A.650, which designates the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce as the state agency with primary responsibility for providing shelter and housing services to homeless families with children. In fulfilling its responsibilities to collaborate with the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce pursuant to RCW 43.63A.650, the department shall develop, administer, supervise, and monitor its portion of the plan. The department's portion of the plan shall contain at least the following elements:

(a) Coordination or linkage of services with shelter and housing;

(b) Accommodation and addressing the needs of homeless families in the design and administration of department programs;

(c) Participation of the department's local offices in the identification, assistance, and referral of homeless families; and

(d) Ongoing monitoring of the efficiency and effectiveness of the plan's design and implementation.

(2) The department shall include community organizations involved in the delivery of services to homeless families with children, and experts in the development and ongoing evaluation of the plan.

(3) The duties under this section shall be implemented within amounts appropriated for that specific purpose by the legislature in the operating and capital budgets.

Sec. 2035. RCW 43.21A.510 and 1995 c 399 s 66 are each amended to read as follows:

In order to assist the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce in providing information to businesses interested in locating in Washington state, the department shall develop an environmental profile of the state. This profile shall identify the state's natural resources and describe how these assets are valuable to industry. Examples of information to be included are water resources and quality, air quality, and recreational opportunities related to natural resources.

Sec. 2036. RCW 43.21A.515 and 1995 c 399 s 67 are each amended to read as follows:

In order to emphasize the importance of the state's environmental laws and regulations and to facilitate compliance with them, the department of ecology shall provide assistance to businesses interested in locating in Washington state. When the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce receives a query from an interested business through its industrial marketing activities, it shall arrange for the department of ecology to provide information on the state's environmental laws and regulations and methods of compliance. This section shall facilitate compliance with state environmental laws and regulations and shall not weaken their application or effectiveness.

Sec. 2037. RCW 43.21A.612 and 1995 c 399 s 68 are each amended to read as follows:

Before the director shall construct said steam generating facility within the state, or make application for any permit, license or other right necessary thereto, the director shall give notice thereof by publishing once a week for four consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or counties in which such project is located a statement of intention setting forth the general nature, extent and location of the project. If any public utility in the state or any operating agency desires to construct such facility, such utility or operating agency shall notify the director thereof within ten days after the last date of publication of such notice. If the director determines that it is in the best public interest that the director proceed with such construction rather than the public utility or operating agency, the director shall so notify the director of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, who shall set a date for hearing thereon. If after considering the evidence introduced the director of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce finds that the public utility or operating agency making the request intends to immediately proceed with such construction and is financially capable of carrying out such construction and further finds that the plan of such utility or operating agency is equally well adapted to serve the public interest, the director shall enter an order so finding and such order shall divest the director of authority to proceed further with such construction or acquisition until such time as the other public utility or agency voluntarily causes an assignment of its right or interest in the project to the director or fails to procure any further required governmental permit, license or authority or having procured such, has the same revoked or withdrawn, in accordance with the laws and regulations of such governmental entity, in which event the director shall have the same authority to proceed as though the director had originally entered an order so authorizing the director to proceed. If, after considering the evidence introduced, the director of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce finds that the public utility or agency making the request does not intend to immediately proceed with such construction or acquisition or is not financially capable of carrying out such construction or acquisition, or finds that the plan of such utility or operating agency is not equally well adapted to serve the public interest, the director shall then enter an order so finding and authorizing the director to proceed with the construction or acquisition of the facility.

Sec. 2038. RCW 43.21G.010 and 1996 c 186 s 507 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds that energy in various forms is increasingly subject to possible shortages and supply disruptions, to the point that there may be foreseen an emergency situation, and that without the ability to institute appropriate emergency measures to regulate the production, distribution, and use of energy, a severe impact on the public health, safety, and general welfare of our state's citizens may occur. The prevention or mitigation of such energy shortages or disruptions and their effects is necessary for preservation of the public health, safety, and general welfare of the citizens of this state.

It is the intent of this chapter to:

(1) Establish necessary emergency powers for the governor and define the situations under which such powers are to be exercised;

(2) Provide penalties for violations of this chapter.

It is further the intent of the legislature that in developing proposed orders under the powers granted in RCW 43.21G.040 as now or hereafter amended the governor may utilize, on a temporary or ad hoc basis, the knowledge and expertise of persons experienced in the technical aspects of energy supply, distribution, or use. Such utilization shall be in addition to support received by the governor from the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce under RCW 43.21F.045 and 43.21F.065 and from other state agencies.

Sec. 2039. RCW 43.21J.030 and 2007 c 341 s 62 and 2007 c 241 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) There is created the environmental enhancement and job creation task force within the office of the governor. The purpose of the task force is to provide a coordinated and comprehensive approach to implementation of chapter 516, Laws of 1993. The task force shall consist of the commissioner of public lands, the director of the department of fish and wildlife, the director of the department of ecology, the director of the parks and recreation commission, the timber team coordinator, the executive director of the workforce training and education coordinating board, and the executive director of the Puget Sound partnership, or their designees. The task force may seek the advice of the following agencies and organizations: The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, the conservation commission, the employment security department, the recreation and conservation office, appropriate federal agencies, appropriate special districts, the Washington state association of counties, the association of Washington cities, labor organizations, business organizations, timber-dependent communities, environmental organizations, and Indian tribes. The governor shall appoint the task force chair. Members of the task force shall serve without additional pay. Participation in the work of the committee by agency members shall be considered in performance of their employment. The governor shall designate staff and administrative support to the task force and shall solicit the participation of agency personnel to assist the task force.

(2) The task force shall have the following responsibilities:

(a) Soliciting and evaluating, in accordance with the criteria set forth in RCW 43.21J.040, requests for funds from the environmental and forest restoration account and making distributions from the account. The task force shall award funds for projects and training programs it approves and may allocate the funds to state agencies for disbursement and contract administration;

(b) Coordinating a process to assist state agencies and local governments to implement effective environmental and forest restoration projects funded under this chapter;

(c) Considering unemployment profile data provided by the employment security department.

(3) Beginning July 1, 1994, the task force shall have the following responsibilities:

(a) To solicit and evaluate proposals from state and local agencies, private nonprofit organizations, and tribes for environmental and forest restoration projects;

(b) To rank the proposals based on criteria developed by the task force in accordance with RCW 43.21J.040; and

(c) To determine funding allocations for projects to be funded from the account created in RCW 43.21J.020 and for projects or programs as designated in the omnibus operating and capital appropriations acts.

Sec. 2040. RCW 43.22.495 and 2007 c 432 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Beginning on July 1, 2007, the department of labor and industries shall perform all the consumer complaint and related functions of the state administrative agency that are required for purposes of complying with the regulations established by the federal department of housing and urban development for manufactured housing, including the preparation and submission of the state administrative plan.

The department of labor and industries may enter into state or local interagency agreements to coordinate site inspection activities with record monitoring and complaint handling. The interagency agreement may also provide for the reimbursement for cost of work that an agency performs. The department may include other related areas in any interagency agreements which are necessary for the efficient provision of services.

The directors of the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce and the department of labor and industries shall immediately take such steps as are necessary to ensure that chapter 432, Laws of 2007 is implemented on July 1, 2007.

Sec. 2041. RCW 43.22A.020 and 2007 c 432 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Beginning on July 1, 2007, the department shall perform all the consumer complaint and related functions of the state administrative agency that are required for purposes of complying with the regulations established by the federal department of housing and urban development for manufactured housing, including the preparation and submission of the state administrative plan.

The department may enter into state or local interagency agreements to coordinate site inspection activities with record monitoring and complaint handling. The interagency agreement may also provide for the reimbursement for cost of work that an agency performs. The department may include other related areas in any interagency agreements which are necessary for the efficient provision of services.

The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall transfer all records, files, books, and documents necessary for the department to assume these new functions.

The directors of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce and of labor and industries shall immediately take such steps as are necessary to ensure that chapter 432, Laws of 2007 is implemented on July 1, 2007.

Sec. 2042. RCW 43.23.035 and 1995 c 399 s 70 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of agriculture is hereby designated as the agency of state government for the administration and implementation of state agricultural market development programs and activities, both domestic and foreign, and shall, in addition to the powers and duties otherwise imposed by law, have the following powers and duties:

(1) To study the potential marketability of various agricultural commodities of this state in foreign and domestic trade;

(2) To collect, prepare, and analyze foreign and domestic market data;

(3) To establish a program to promote and assist in the marketing of Washington-bred horses: PROVIDED, That the department shall present a proposal to the legislature no later than December 1, 1986, that provides for the elimination of all state funding for the program after June 30, 1989;

(4) To encourage and promote the sale of Washington's agricultural commodities and products at the site of their production through the development and dissemination of referral maps and other means;

(5) To encourage and promote those agricultural industries, such as the wine industry, which attract visitors to rural areas in which other agricultural commodities and products are produced and are, or could be, made available for sale;

(6) To encourage and promote the establishment and use of public markets in this state for the sale of Washington's agricultural products;

(7) To maintain close contact with foreign firms and governmental agencies and to act as an effective intermediary between foreign nations and Washington traders;

(8) To publish and disseminate to interested citizens and others information which will aid in carrying out the purposes of chapters 43.23, 15.64, 15.65, and 15.66 RCW;

(9) To encourage and promote the movement of foreign and domestic agricultural goods through the ports of Washington;

(10) To conduct an active program by sending representatives to, or engaging representatives in, foreign countries to promote the state's agricultural commodities and products;

(11) To assist and to make Washington agricultural concerns more aware of the potentials of foreign trade and to encourage production of those commodities that will have high export potential and appeal;

(12) To coordinate the trade promotional activities of appropriate federal, state, and local public agencies, as well as civic organizations; and

(13) To develop a coordinated marketing program with the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, utilizing existing trade offices and participating in mutual trade missions and activities.

As used in this section, "agricultural commodities" includes products of both terrestrial and aquatic farming.

Sec. 2043. RCW 43.30.835 and 2009 c 163 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department may develop and implement forest biomass energy demonstration projects, one east of the crest of the Cascade mountains and one west of the crest of the Cascade mountains. The demonstration projects must be designed to:

(a) Reveal the utility of Washington's public and private forest biomass feedstock;

(b) Create green jobs and generate renewable energy;

(c) Generate revenues or improve asset values for beneficiaries of state lands and state forestlands;

(d) Improve forest health, reduce pollution, and restore ecological function; and

(e) Avoid interfering with the current working area for forest biomass collection surrounding an existing fixed location biomass energy production site.

(2) To develop and implement the forest biomass energy demonstration projects, the department may form forest biomass energy partnerships or cooperatives.

(3) The forest biomass energy partnerships or cooperatives are encouraged to be public-private partnerships focused on convening the entities necessary to grow, harvest, process, transport, and utilize forest biomass to generate renewable energy. Particular focus must be given to recruiting and employing emerging technologies that can locally process forest biomass feedstock to create local green jobs and reduce transportation costs.

(4) The forest biomass energy partnerships or cooperatives may include, but are not limited to: Entrepreneurs or organizations developing and operating emerging technology to process forest biomass; industrial electricity producers; contractors capable of providing the local labor needed to collect, process, and transport forest biomass feedstocks; tribes; federal land management agencies; county, city, and other local governments; the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce; state trust land managers; an organization dedicated to protecting and strengthening the jobs, rights, and working conditions of Washington's working families; accredited research institution representatives; an industrial timberland manager; a small forestland owner; and a not-for-profit conservation organization.

Sec. 2044. RCW 43.31.205 and 1993 c 280 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

In an effort to enhance the economy of the Tri-Cities area, the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce is directed to promote the existence of the lease between the state of Washington and the federal government executed September 10, 1964, covering one thousand acres of land lying within the Hanford reservation near Richland, Washington, and the opportunity of subleasing the land to entities for nuclear-related industry, in agreement with the terms of the lease. When promoting the existence of the lease, the department shall work in cooperation with any associate development organization located in or near the Tri-Cities area.

Sec. 2045. RCW 43.31.504 and 1993 c 280 s 45 are each amended to read as follows:

The child care facility fund committee is established within the business assistance center of the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce. The committee shall administer the child care facility fund, with review by the director of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce.

(1) The committee shall have five members. The director of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall appoint the members, who shall include:

(a) Two persons experienced in investment finance and having skills in providing capital to new businesses, in starting and operating businesses, and providing professional services to small or expanding businesses;

(b) One person representing a philanthropic organization with experience in evaluating funding requests;

(c) One child care services expert; and

(d) One early childhood development expert.

In making these appointments, the director shall give careful consideration to ensure that the various geographic regions of the state are represented and that members will be available for meetings and are committed to working cooperatively to address child care needs in Washington state.

(2) The committee shall elect officers from among its membership and shall adopt policies and procedures specifying the lengths of terms, methods for filling vacancies, and other matters necessary to the ongoing functioning of the committee.

(3) Committee members shall serve without compensation, but may request reimbursement for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(4) Committee members shall not be liable to the state, to the child care facility fund, or to any other person as a result of their activities, whether ministerial or discretionary, as members except for willful dishonesty or intentional violation of the law. The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce may purchase liability insurance for members and may indemnify these persons against the claims of others.

Sec. 2046. RCW 43.31.970 and 2009 c 459 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce must distribute to local governments model ordinances, model development regulations, and guidance for local governments for siting and installing electric vehicle infrastructure, and in particular battery charging stations, and appropriate handling, recycling, and storage of electric vehicle batteries and equipment, when available. The model ordinances, model development regulations, and guidance must be developed by a federal or state agency, or nationally recognized organizations with specific expertise in land-use regulations or electric vehicle infrastructure.

Sec. 2047. RCW 43.63A.115 and 1993 c 280 s 60 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The community action agency network, established initially under the federal economic opportunity act of 1964 and subsequently under the federal community services block grant program of 1981, as amended, shall be a delivery system for federal and state antipoverty programs in this state, including but not limited to the community services block grant program, the low-income energy assistance program, and the federal department of energy weatherization program.

(2) Local community action agencies comprise the community action agency network. The community action agency network shall serve low-income persons in the counties. Each community action agency and its service area shall be designated in the state federal community service block grant plan as prepared by the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce.

(3) Funds for antipoverty programs may be distributed to the community action agencies by the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce and other state agencies in consultation with the authorized representatives of community action agency networks.

Sec. 2048. RCW 43.63A.135 and 2006 c 371 s 234 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce must establish a competitive process to solicit proposals for and prioritize projects whose primary objective is to assist nonprofit youth organizations in acquiring, constructing, or rehabilitating facilities used for the delivery of nonresidential services, excluding outdoor athletic fields.

(2) The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce must establish a competitive process to prioritize applications for the assistance as follows:

(a) The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce must conduct a statewide solicitation of project applications from local governments, nonprofit organizations, and other entities, as determined by the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce. The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce must evaluate and rank applications in consultation with a citizen advisory committee using objective criteria. Projects must have a major recreational component, and must have either an educational or social service component. At a minimum, applicants must demonstrate that the requested assistance will increase the efficiency or quality of the services it provides to youth. The evaluation and ranking process must also include an examination of existing assets that applicants may apply to projects. Grant assistance under this section may not exceed twenty-five percent of the total cost of the project. The nonstate portion of the total project cost may include cash, the value of real property when acquired solely for the purpose of the project, and in-kind contributions.

(b) The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce must submit a prioritized list of recommended projects to the governor and the legislature in the department of ((community, trade, and economic development's))commerce's biennial capital budget request beginning with the 2005-2007 biennium and thereafter. The list must include a description of each project, the amount of recommended state funding, and documentation of nonstate funds to be used for the project. The total amount of recommended state funding for projects on a biennial project list must not exceed eight million dollars. The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce may not sign contracts or otherwise financially obligate funds under this section until the legislature has approved a specific list of projects.

(c) In contracts for grants authorized under this section the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce must include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee must repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

Sec. 2049. RCW 43.63A.155 and 1993 c 280 s 61 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall retain the bond information it receives under RCW 39.44.210 and 39.44.230 and shall publish summaries of local government bond issues at least once a year.

The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW to implement RCW 39.44.210 and 39.44.230.

Sec. 2050. RCW 43.63A.230 and 2005 c 136 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall provide technical assistance to cooperatives authorized under chapter 23.78 RCW and conduct educational programs on employee ownership and self-management. The department shall include information on the option of employee ownership wherever appropriate in its various programs.

Sec. 2051. RCW 43.63A.275 and 1993 c 280 s 67 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each biennium the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall distribute such funds as are appropriated for retired senior volunteer programs (RSVP) as follows:

(a) At least sixty-five percent of the moneys may be distributed according to formulae and criteria to be determined by the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce in consultation with the RSVP directors association.

(b) Up to twenty percent of the moneys may be distributed by competitive grant process to develop RSVP projects in counties not presently being served, or to expand existing RSVP services into counties not presently served.

(c) Ten percent of the moneys may be used by the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce for administration, monitoring of the grants, and providing technical assistance to the RSVP projects.

(d) Up to five percent of the moneys may be used to support projects that will benefit RSVPs statewide.

(2) Grants under subsection (1) of this section shall give priority to programs in the areas of education, tutoring, English as a second language, combating of and education on drug abuse, housing and homeless, and respite care, and shall be distributed in accordance with the following:

(a) None of the grant moneys may be used to displace any paid employee in the area being served.

(b) Grants shall be made for programs that focus on:

(i) Developing new roles for senior volunteers in nonprofit and public organizations with special emphasis on areas targeted in section 1, chapter 65, Laws of 1992. The roles shall reflect the diversity of the local senior population and shall respect their life experiences;

(ii) Increasing the expertise of volunteer managers and RSVP managers in the areas of communication, recruitment, motivation, and retention of today's over-sixty population;

(iii) Increasing the number of senior citizens recruited, referred, and placed with nonprofit and public organizations; and

(iv) Providing volunteer support such as: Mileage to and from the volunteer assignment, recognition, and volunteer insurance.

Sec. 2052. RCW 43.63A.400 and 1993 c 280 s 72 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall distribute grants to eligible public radio and television broadcast stations under RCW 43.63A.410 and 43.63A.420 to assist with programming, operations, and capital needs.

Sec. 2053. RCW 43.63A.410 and 1993 c 280 s 73 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Eligibility for grants under this section shall be limited to broadcast stations which are:

(a) Licensed to Washington state organizations, nonprofit corporations, or other entities under section 73.621 of the regulations of the federal communications commission; and

(b) Qualified to receive community service grants from the federally chartered corporation for public broadcasting. Eligibility shall be established as of February 28th of each year.

(2) The formula in this subsection shall be used to compute the amount of each eligible station's grant under this section.

(a) Appropriations under this section shall be divided into a radio fund, which shall be twenty-five percent of the total appropriation under this section, and a television fund, which shall be seventy-five percent of the total appropriation under this section. Each of the two funds shall be divided into a base grant pool, which shall be fifty percent of the fund, and an incentive grant pool, which shall be the remaining fifty percent of the fund.

(b) Each eligible participating public radio station shall receive an equal share of the radio base grant pool, plus a share of the radio incentive grant pool equal to the proportion its nonfederal financial support bears to the sum of all participating radio stations' nonfederal financial support as most recently reported to the corporation for public broadcasting.

(c) Each eligible participating public television station shall receive an equal share of the television base grant pool, plus a share of the television incentive grant pool equal to the proportion its nonfederal financial support bears to the sum of all participating television stations' nonfederal financial support as most recently reported to the corporation for public broadcasting.

(3) Annual financial reports to the corporation for public broadcasting by eligible stations shall also be submitted by the stations to the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce.

Sec. 2054. RCW 43.63A.720 and 1995 c 353 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

There is established in the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce a grant program to enhance funding for prostitution prevention and intervention services. Activities that can be funded through this grant program shall provide effective prostitution prevention and intervention services, such as counseling, parenting, housing relief, education, and vocational training, that:

(1) Comprehensively address the problems of persons who are prostitutes; and

(2) Enhance the ability of persons to leave or avoid prostitution.

Sec. 2055. RCW 43.63A.735 and 1995 c 353 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to funds appropriated by the legislature, including funds in the prostitution prevention and intervention account, the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall make awards under the grant program established by RCW 43.63A.720.

(2) Awards shall be made competitively based on the purposes of and criteria in RCW 43.63A.720 through 43.63A.730.

(3) Activities funded under this section may be considered for funding in future years, but shall be considered under the same terms and criteria as new activities. Funding of a program or activity under this chapter shall not constitute an obligation by the state of Washington to provide ongoing funding.

(4) The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce may receive such gifts, grants, and endowments from public or private sources as may be made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of the grant program established under RCW 43.63A.720 and expend the same or any income from these sources according to the terms of the gifts, grants, or endowments.

(5) The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce may expend up to five percent of the funds appropriated for the grant program for administrative costs and grant supervision.

Sec. 2056. RCW 43.63A.764 and 2008 c 327 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 43.63A.125, this section, and RCW 43.63A.766 and 43.63A.768 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Department" means the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce.

(2) "Distressed community" means: (a) A county that has an unemployment rate that is twenty percent above the state average for the immediately previous three years; (b) an area within a county that the department determines to be a low-income community, using as guidance the low-income community designations under the community development financial institutions fund's new markets tax credit program of the United States department of the treasury; or (c) a school district in which at least fifty percent of local elementary students receive free and reduced-price meals.

(3) "Nonprofit organization" means an organization that is tax exempt, or not required to apply for an exemption, under section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as amended.

(4) "Technical assistance" means professional services provided under contract to nonprofit organizations for feasibility studies, planning, and project management related to acquiring, constructing, or rehabilitating nonresidential community services facilities.

Sec. 2057. RCW 43.70.540 and 2005 c 282 s 45 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature recognizes that the state patrol, the administrative office of the courts, the sheriffs' and police chiefs' association, the department of social and health services, the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, the sentencing guidelines commission, the department of corrections, and the superintendent of public instruction each have comprehensive data and analysis capabilities that have contributed greatly to our current understanding of crime and violence, and their causes.

The legislature finds, however, that a single health-oriented agency must be designated to provide consistent guidelines to all these groups regarding the way in which their data systems collect this important data. It is not the intent of the legislature by RCW 43.70.545 to transfer data collection requirements from existing agencies or to require the addition of major new data systems. It is rather the intent to make only the minimum required changes in existing data systems to increase compatibility and comparability, reduce duplication, and to increase the usefulness of data collected by these agencies in developing more accurate descriptions of violence.

Sec. 2058. RCW 43.132.030 and 1995 c 399 s 80 are each amended to read as follows:

The director of financial management is hereby empowered to designate the director of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce as the official responsible for the preparation of fiscal notes authorized and required by this chapter. It is the intent of the legislature that when necessary the resources of other state agencies, appropriate legislative staffs, and the various associations of local government may be employed in the development of such fiscal notes.

Sec. 2059. RCW 43.132.810 and 2000 c 182 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The office of financial management, in consultation with the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, shall prepare a report for the legislature on or before December 31st of every even-numbered year on local government fiscal notes, and reports on the fiscal impacts on local governments arising from selected laws, that were prepared over the preceding two-year period.

Sec. 2060. RCW 43.133.030 and 1995 c 399 s 81 are each amended to read as follows:

The office of financial management and the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall, in cooperation with appropriate legislative committees and legislative staff, establish a procedure for the provision of sunrise notes on the expected impact of bills and resolutions that authorize the creation of new boards and new types of special purpose districts.

Sec. 2061. RCW 43.133.050 and 1995 c 399 s 82 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The office of financial management shall prepare sunrise notes for legislation concerning the creation of new boards. The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall prepare sunrise notes for legislation creating new types of special purpose districts.

(2) A sunrise note shall be prepared for all executive and agency request legislation that creates a board or special purpose district.

(3) The office of financial management or the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall also provide a sunrise note at the request of any committee of the legislature.

Sec. 2062. RCW 43.150.040 and 1995 c 399 s 84 are each amended to read as follows:

The governor may establish a statewide center for volunteerism and citizen service within the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce and appoint an executive administrator, who may employ such staff as necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW do not apply to the executive administrator and the staff.

Sec. 2063. RCW 43.163.020 and 1995 c 399 s 89 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington economic development finance authority is established as a public body corporate and politic, with perpetual corporate succession, constituting an instrumentality of the state of Washington exercising essential governmental functions. The authority is a public body within the meaning of RCW 39.53.010.

The authority shall consist of ((eighteen [seventeen]))17 members as follows: The director of the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, the director of the department of agriculture, the state treasurer, one member from each caucus in the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house, one member from each caucus in the senate appointed by the president of the senate, and ten public members with one representative of women-owned businesses and one representative of minority-owned businesses and with at least three of the members residing east of the Cascades. The public members shall be residents of the state appointed by the governor on the basis of their interest or expertise in trade, agriculture or business finance or jobs creation and development. One of the public members shall be appointed by the governor as chair of the authority and shall serve as chair of the authority at the pleasure of the governor. The authority may select from its membership such other officers as it deems appropriate.

The term of the persons appointed by the governor as public members of the authority, including the public member appointed as chair, shall be four years from the date of appointment, except that the term of three of the initial appointees shall be for two years from the date of appointment and the term of four of the initial appointees shall be for three years from the date of appointment. The governor shall designate the appointees who will serve the two-year and three-year terms.

In the event of a vacancy on the authority due to death, resignation or removal of one of the public members, or upon the expiration of the term of one of the public members, the governor shall appoint a successor for the remainder of the unexpired term. If either of the state offices is abolished, the resulting vacancy on the authority shall be filled by the state officer who shall succeed substantially to the power and duties of the abolished office.

Any public member of the authority may be removed by the governor for misfeasance, malfeasance or willful neglect of duty after notice and a public hearing, unless such notice and hearing shall be expressly waived in writing by the affected public member.

The state officials serving in ex officio capacity may each designate an employee of their respective departments to act on their behalf in all respects with regard to any matter to come before the authority. Such designations shall be made in writing in such manner as is specified by the rules of the authority.

The members of the authority shall serve without compensation but shall be entitled to reimbursement, solely from the funds of the authority, for expenses incurred in the discharge of their duties under this chapter. The authority may borrow funds from the department for the purpose of reimbursing members for expenses; however, the authority shall repay the department as soon as practicable.

A majority of the authority shall constitute a quorum.

Sec. 2064. RCW 43.163.120 and 1998 c 245 s 51 are each amended to read as follows:

The authority shall receive no appropriation of state funds. The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall provide staff to the authority, to the extent permitted by law, to enable the authority to accomplish its purposes; the staff from the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce may assist the authority in organizing itself and in designing programs, but shall not be involved in the issuance of bonds or in making credit decisions regarding financing provided to borrowers by the authority.

Sec. 2065. RCW 43.168.010 and 1999 c 164 s 501 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds that:

(1) The economic health and well-being of the state, particularly in areas of high unemployment, economic stagnation, and poverty, is of substantial public concern.

(2) The consequences of minimal economic activity and persistent unemployment and underemployment are serious threats to the safety, health, and welfare of residents of these areas, decreasing the value of private investments and jeopardizing the sources of public revenue.

(3) The economic and social interdependence of communities and the vitality of industrial and economic activity necessitates, and is in part dependent on preventing substantial dislocation of residents and rebuilding the diversification of the areas' economy.

(4) The ability to remedy problems in stagnant areas of the state is beyond the power and control of the regulatory process and influence of the state, and the ordinary operations of private enterprise without additional governmental assistance are insufficient to adequately remedy the problems of poverty and unemployment.

(5) The revitalization of depressed communities requires the stimulation of private investment, the development of new business ventures, the provision of capital to ventures sponsored by local organizations and capable of growth in the business markets, and assistance to viable, but under-financed, small businesses in order to create and preserve jobs that are sustainable in the local economy.

Therefore, the legislature declares there to be a substantial public purpose in providing capital to promote economic development and job creation in areas of economic stagnation, unemployment, and poverty. To accomplish this purpose, the legislature hereby creates the rural Washington loan fund and vests in the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce the authority to spend federal funds to stimulate the economy of distressed areas.

Sec. 2066. RCW 43.176.030 and 2004 c 237 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The small business incubator program is created in the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce to provide start-up and operating assistance to qualified small business incubators.

(2) The department shall award grants to qualified small business incubator organizations for:

(a) Construction and equipment costs, up to a maximum of three million dollars per recipient; and

(b) Provision of technical assistance to small businesses, up to a maximum of one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars per year per recipient.

(3) The department shall:

(a) Require a grant recipient to show that it has the resources to complete the project in a timely manner and the state grant is not the sole source of funds;

(b) Develop, in conjunction with the Washington association of small business incubators, criteria for receipt of grant funds, including criteria related to organizational capacity, community need, and the availability of other economic development resources;

(c) Accept and receive grants, gifts, and pledges of funds for the support of the small business incubator program, which shall be deposited in the small business incubator account established in RCW 43.176.040; and

(d) Integrate the promotion of small business incubators as economic development tools in its strategic plan.

Sec. 2067. RCW 43.176.901 and 2004 c 237 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall have no duty to provide services related to the small business incubator and entrepreneurship assistance act of 2004 unless and until the small business incubator program and related administrative expenses are funded by the legislature.

Sec. 2068. RCW 43.180.040 and 1995 c 399 s 98 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby established a public body corporate and politic, with perpetual corporate succession, to be known as the Washington state housing finance commission. The commission is an instrumentality of the state exercising essential government functions and, for purposes of the code, acts as a constituted authority on behalf of the state when it issues bonds pursuant to this chapter. The commission is a "public body" within the meaning of RCW 39.53.010.

(2) The commission shall consist of the following voting members:

(a) The state treasurer, ex officio;

(b) The director of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, ex officio;

(c) An elected local government official, ex officio, with experience in local housing programs, who shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate;

(d) A representative of housing consumer interests, appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate;

(e) A representative of labor interests, appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, after consultation with representatives of organized labor;

(f) A representative of low-income persons, appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate;

(g) Five members of the public appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, on the basis of geographic distribution and their expertise in housing, real estate, finance, energy efficiency, or construction, one of whom shall be appointed by the governor as chair of the commission and who shall serve on the commission and as chair of the commission at the pleasure of the governor.

The term of the persons appointed by the governor, other than the chair, shall be four years from the date of their appointment, except that the terms of three of the initial appointees shall be for two years from the date of their appointment. The governor shall designate the appointees who will serve the two-year terms. An appointee may be removed by the governor for cause pursuant to RCW 43.06.070 and 43.06.080. The governor shall fill any vacancy in an appointed position by appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term. If the department of ((community development))commerce is abolished, the resulting vacancy shall be filled by a state official who shall be appointed to the commission by the governor. If this official occupies an office or position for which senate confirmation is not required, then his or her appointment to the commission shall be subject to the consent of the senate. The members of the commission shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and may be reimbursed, solely from the funds of the commission, for expenses incurred in the discharge of their duties under this chapter, subject to the provisions of RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. A majority of the commission constitutes a quorum. Designees shall be appointed in such manner and shall exercise such powers as are specified by the rules of the commission.

(3) The commission may adopt an official seal and may select from its membership a vice chair, a secretary, and a treasurer. The commission shall establish rules concerning its exercise of the powers authorized by this chapter. The rules shall be adopted in conformance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 2069. RCW 43.180.200 and 1995 c 399 s 99 are each amended to read as follows:

For purposes of the code:

(1) The legislature reserves the right at any time to alter or change the structure, organization, programs, or activities of the commission and to terminate the commission, so long as the action does not impair any outstanding contracts entered into by the commission;

(2) Any net earnings of the commission beyond that necessary to retire its bonds and to carry out the purposes of this chapter shall not inure to the benefit of any person other than the state;

(3) Upon dissolution of the commission, title to all of its remaining property shall vest in the state;

(4) The commission constitutes the only housing finance agency of the state of Washington; and

(5) In order to take advantage of the maximum amount of tax exempt bonds for housing financing available pursuant to the code, any state ceiling with respect to housing shall be allocated in accordance with the following formula:

(a) Eighty percent of the state ceiling shall be allocated to the commission and twenty percent shall be allocated to the other issuing authorities in the state.

(b) The allocation to the issuing authorities other than the commission shall be distributed to such issuing authorities in amounts as determined following public notice by the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce pursuant to rules promulgated by it. The distribution shall be in response to applications received from such issuing authorities and shall be based on the following factors: (i) The amount of housing to be made available by such applicant; (ii) the population within the jurisdiction of the applicant; (iii) coordination with other applicable federal and state housing programs; (iv) the likelihood of implementing the proposed financing during that year; and (v) consistency with the plan of the commission. On or before February 1 of each year, the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall distribute the state ceiling allocation among such issuing authorities and any unused portion shall be added to the allocation of the commission. Each issuing authority other than the commission shall confirm its allocation distribution by providing to the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce no later than June 1 a copy of an executed bond purchase contract or alternative documentation deemed sufficient by the commission to evidence the reasonable likelihood of the allocation distribution being fully used. Any portion of such allocation not so confirmed shall be added to the allocation of the commission on July 1. Prior to July 1, the commission shall provide written notice of the allocation decrease to the affected issuing authority. The reallocation shall not limit the authority of the commission to assign a portion of its allocation pursuant to subsection (5)(c) of this section.

(c) The commission may assign a portion of its allocation to another issuing agency.

Sec. 2070. RCW 43.180.220 and 1994 c 235 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission, in cooperation with the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, and the state investment board, shall develop and implement a housing finance program that:

(1) Provides subsidized or unsubsidized mortgage financing for single-family homeownership, including a single condominium unit, located in the state of Washington;

(2) Requests the state investment board to make investments, within its policies and investment guidelines, in mortgage-backed securities that are collateralized by loans made within the state of Washington; and

(3) Provides flexible loan underwriting guidelines, including but not limited to provisions that will allow reduced downpayment requirements for the purchaser.

Sec. 2071. RCW 43.185A.100 and 2006 c 349 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The department, the housing finance commission, the affordable housing advisory board, and all local governments, housing authorities, and other nonprofits receiving state housing funds or financing through the housing finance commission shall, by December 31, 2006, and annually thereafter, review current housing reporting requirements related to housing programs and services and give recommendations to streamline and simplify all planning and reporting requirements to the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, which will compile and present the recommendations annually to the legislature. The entities listed in this section shall also give recommendations for additional legislative actions that could promote affordable housing and end homelessness.

Sec. 2072. RCW 43.185C.200 and 2007 c 483 s 604 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall establish a pilot program to provide grants to eligible organizations, as described in RCW 43.185.060, to provide transitional housing assistance to offenders who are reentering the community and are in need of housing.

(2) There shall be a minimum of two pilot programs established in two counties. The pilot programs shall be selected through a request for proposal process and in consultation with the department of corrections. The department shall select the pilot sites by January 1, 2008.

(3) The pilot program shall:

(a) Be operated in collaboration with the community justice center existing in the location of the pilot site;

(b) Offer transitional supportive housing that includes individual support and mentoring available on an ongoing basis, life skills training, and close working relationships with community justice centers and community corrections officers. Supportive housing services can be provided directly by the housing operator, or in partnership with community-based organizations;

(c) In providing assistance, give priority to offenders who are designated as high risk or high needs as well as those determined not to have a viable release plan by the department of corrections;

(d) Optimize available funding by utilizing cost-effective community-based shared housing arrangements or other noninstitutional living arrangements; and

(e) Provide housing assistance for a period of time not to exceed twelve months for a participating offender.

(4) The department may also use up to twenty percent of the funding appropriated in the operating budget for this section to support the development of additional supportive housing resources for offenders who are reentering the community.

(5) The department shall:

(a) Collaborate with the department of corrections in developing criteria to determine who will qualify for housing assistance; and

(b) Gather data, and report to the legislature by November 1, 2008, on the number of offenders seeking housing, the number of offenders eligible for housing, the number of offenders who receive the housing, and the number of offenders who commit new crimes while residing in the housing to the extent information is available.

(6) The department of corrections shall collaborate with organizations receiving grant funds to:

(a) Help identify appropriate housing solutions in the community for offenders;

(b) Where possible, facilitate an offender's application for housing prior to discharge;

(c) Identify enhancements to training provided to offenders prior to discharge that may assist an offender in effectively transitioning to the community;

(d) Maintain communication between the organization receiving grant funds, the housing provider, and corrections staff supervising the offender; and

(e) Assist the offender in accessing resources and services available through the department of corrections and a community justice center.

(7) The state, department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, department of corrections, local governments, local housing authorities, eligible organizations as described in RCW 43.185.060, and their employees are not liable for civil damages arising from the criminal conduct of an offender solely due to the placement of an offender in housing provided under this section or the provision of housing assistance.

(8) Nothing in this section allows placement of an offender into housing without an analysis of the risk the offender may pose to that particular community or other residents.

Sec. 2073. RCW 43.210.030 and 1998 c 109 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The small business export finance assistance center and its branches shall be governed and managed by a board of seven directors appointed by the governor, with the advice of the board, and confirmed by the senate. The directors shall serve terms of four years following the terms of service established by the initial appointments after June 11, 1998. Three appointees, including directors on June 11, 1998, who are reappointed, must serve initial terms of two years and, if a director is reappointed that director may serve a consecutive four-year term. Four appointees, including directors on June 11, 1998, who are reappointed, must serve initial terms of four years and, if a director is reappointed that director may serve a consecutive four-year term. After the initial appointments, directors may serve two consecutive terms. The directors may provide for the payment of their expenses. The directors shall include the director of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce or the director's designee; representatives of a large financial institution engaged in financing export transactions in the state of Washington; a small financial institution engaged in financing export transactions in the state of Washington; a large exporting company domiciled in the state of Washington; a small exporting company in the state of Washington; organized labor in a trade involved in international commerce; and a representative at large. To the extent possible, appointments to the board shall reflect geographical balance and the diversity of the state population. Any vacancies on the board due to the expiration of a term or for any other reason shall be filled by appointment by the governor for the unexpired term.

Sec. 2074. RCW 43.210.060 and 1995 c 399 s 108 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce or its statutory successor shall adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 2075. RCW 43.270.020 and 2001 c 48 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is established in the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce a grant program to provide incentive for and support for communities to develop targeted and coordinated strategies to reduce the incidence and impact of alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse, or violence.

(2) The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall make awards, subject to funds appropriated by the legislature, under the following terms:

(a) Starting July 1, 2001, funds will be available to countywide programs through a formula developed by the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce in consultation with program contractors, which will take into consideration county population size.

(b) In order to be eligible for consideration, applicants must demonstrate, at a minimum:

(i) That the community has developed and is committed to carrying out a coordinated strategy of prevention, treatment, and law enforcement activities;

(ii) That the community has considered research-based theory when developing its strategy;

(iii) That proposals submitted for funding are based on a local assessment of need and address specific objectives contained in a coordinated strategy of prevention, treatment, and law enforcement against alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse, or violence;

(iv) Evidence of active participation in preparation of the proposal and specific commitments to implementing the community-wide agenda by leadership from education, law enforcement, local government, tribal government, and treatment entities in the community, and the opportunity for meaningful involvement from others such as neighborhood and citizen groups, businesses, human service, health and job training organizations, and other key elements of the community, particularly those whose responsibilities in law enforcement, treatment, prevention, education, or other community efforts provide direct, ongoing contact with substance abusers or those who exhibit violent behavior, or those at risk for alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse, or violent behavior;

(v) Evidence of additional local resources committed to the applicant's strategy totaling at least twenty-five percent of funds awarded under this section. These resources may consist of public or private funds, donated goods or services, and other measurable commitments, including in-kind contributions such as volunteer services, materials, supplies, physical facilities, or a combination thereof; and

(vi) That the funds applied for, if received, will not be used to replace funding for existing activities.

(c) At a minimum, grant applications must include the following:

(i) A definition of geographic area;

(ii) A needs assessment describing the extent and impact of alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse, and violence in the community, including an explanation of those who are most severely impacted and those most at risk of substance abuse or violent behavior;

(iii) An explanation of the community-wide strategy for prevention, treatment, and law enforcement activities related to alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse, or violence, with particular attention to those who are most severely impacted and/or those most at risk of alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse, or violent behavior;

(iv) An explanation of who was involved in development of the strategy and what specific commitments have been made to carry it out;

(v) Identification of existing prevention, education, treatment, and law enforcement resources committed by the applicant, including financial and other support, and an explanation of how the applicant's strategy involves and builds on the efforts of existing organizations or coalitions that have been carrying out community efforts against alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse, or violence;

(vi) Identification of activities that address specific objectives in the strategy for which additional resources are needed;

(vii) Identification of additional local resources, including public or private funds, donated goods or services, and other measurable commitments, that have been committed to the activities identified in (c)(vi) of this subsection;

(viii) Identification of activities that address specific objectives in the strategy for which funding is requested;

(ix) For each activity for which funding is requested, an explanation in sufficient detail to demonstrate:

(A) Feasibility through deliberative design, specific objectives, and a realistic plan for implementation;

(B) A rationale for how this activity will achieve measurable results and how it will be evaluated;

(C) That funds requested are necessary and appropriate to effectively carry out the activity; and

(x) Identification of a contracting agent meeting state requirements for each activity proposed for funding.

Each contracting agent must execute a written agreement with its local community mobilization advisory board that reflects the duties and powers of each party.

(3) Activities that may be funded through this grant program include those that:

(a) Prevent alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse, or violence through educational efforts, development of positive alternatives, intervention with high-risk groups, and other prevention strategies;

(b) Support effective treatment by increasing access to and availability of treatment opportunities, particularly for underserved or highly impacted populations, developing aftercare and support mechanisms, and other strategies to increase the availability and effectiveness of treatment;

(c) Provide meaningful consequences for participation in illegal activity and promote safe and healthy communities through support of law enforcement strategies;

(d) Create or build on efforts by existing community programs, coordinate their efforts, and develop cooperative efforts or other initiatives to make most effective use of resources to carry out the community's strategy against alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse, or violence; and

(e) Other activities that demonstrate both feasibility and a rationale for how the activity will achieve measurable results in the strategy against alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse, or violence.

Sec. 2076. RCW 43.270.070 and 2001 c 48 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall ask communities for suggestions on state practices, policies, and priorities that would help communities implement their strategies against alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse, or violence. The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall review and respond to those suggestions making necessary changes where feasible, making recommendations to the legislature where appropriate, and providing an explanation as to why suggested changes cannot be accomplished, if the suggestions cannot be acted upon.

Sec. 2077. RCW 43.270.080 and 2001 c 48 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce may receive such gifts, grants, and endowments from public or private sources as may be made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of RCW 43.270.010 through 43.270.080 and expend the same or any income therefrom according to the terms of the gifts, grants, or endowments.

Sec. 2078. RCW 43.310.020 and 1995 c 399 s 116 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce may recommend existing programs or contract with either school districts or community organizations, or both, through a request for proposal process for the development, administration, and implementation in the county of community-based gang risk prevention and intervention pilot programs.

(2) Proposals by the school district for gang risk prevention and intervention pilot program grant funding shall begin with school years no sooner than the 1994-95 session, and last for a duration of two years.

(3) The school district or community organization proposal shall include:

(a) A description of the program goals, activities, and curriculum. The description of the program goals shall include a list of measurable objectives for the purpose of evaluation by the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce. To the extent possible, proposals shall contain empirical data on current problems, such as dropout rates and occurrences of violence on and off campus by school-age individuals.

(b) A description of the individual school or schools and the geographic area to be affected by the program.

(c) A demonstration of broad-based support for the program from business and community organizations.

(d) A clear description of the experience, expertise, and other qualifications of the community organizations to conduct an effective prevention and intervention program in cooperation with a school or a group of schools.

(e) A proposed budget for expenditure of the grant.

(4) Grants awarded under this section may not be used for the administrative costs of the school district or the individual school.

Sec. 2079. RCW 43.325.100 and 2007 c 348 s 403 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce and the department of ecology shall develop a framework for the state of Washington to participate in emerging regional, national, and to the extent possible, global markets to mitigate climate change, on a multisector basis. This framework must include, but not be limited to, credible, verifiable, replicable inventory and accounting methodologies for each sector involved, along with the completion of the stakeholder process identified in executive order number 07-02 creating the Washington state climate change challenge.

(2) The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce and the department of ecology shall include the forestry sector and work closely with the department of natural resources on those recommendations.

(3) The department must provide a report to the legislature by December 1, 2008. The report may be included within the report produced for executive order number 07-02.

Sec. 2080. RCW 43.325.110 and 2007 c 348 s 408 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The vehicle electrification demonstration grant program is established within the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce. The director may establish policies and procedures necessary for processing, reviewing, and approving applications made under this chapter.

(2) The director may approve an application for a vehicle electrification demonstration project only if the director finds:

(a) The applicant is a state agency, public school district, public utility district, or a political subdivision of the state, including port districts, counties, cities, towns, special purpose districts, and other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations or a state institution of higher education;

(b) The project partially funds the purchase of or conversion of existing vehicles to plug-in hybrid electric vehicles or battery electric vehicles for use in the applicant's fleet or operations;

(c) The project partners with an electric utility and demonstrates technologies to allow controlled vehicle charging, including the use of power electronics or wireless technologies, to regulate time-of-day and duration of charging;

(d) The project provides matching resources; and

(e) The project provides evaluation of fuel savings, greenhouse gas reductions, battery capabilities, energy management system, charge controlling technologies, and other relevant information determined on the advice of the vehicle electrification work group.

(3) The director may approve an application for a vehicle electrification demonstration project if the project, in addition to meeting the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, also demonstrates charging using on-site renewable resources or vehicle-to-grid capabilities that enable the vehicle to discharge electricity into the grid.

Sec. 2081. RCW 43.330.065 and 1996 c 253 s 303 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, in consultation with the office of protocol, the office of the secretary of state, the department of agriculture, and the employment security department shall identify up to fifteen countries that are of strategic importance to the development of Washington's international trade relations.

Sec. 2082. RCW 43.330.904 and 1996 c 186 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All powers, duties, and functions of the state energy office relating to energy resource policy and planning and energy facility siting are transferred to the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce. All references to the director or the state energy office in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the director or the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce when referring to the functions transferred in this section.

The director shall appoint an assistant director for energy policy, and energy policy staff shall have no additional responsibilities beyond activities concerning energy policy.

(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the state energy office pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, software, database, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the state energy office in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be made available to the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce.

(b) Any appropriations made to the state energy office for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on July 1, 1996, be transferred and credited to the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce.

(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, software, database, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All employees of the state energy office engaged in performing the powers, functions, and duties pertaining to the energy facility site evaluation council are transferred to the jurisdiction of the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce. All employees engaged in energy facility site evaluation council duties classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.

(4) All rules and all pending business before the state energy office pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce.

(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, and functions of the state energy office does not affect the validity of any act performed before July 1, 1996.

(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this section, the director of the office of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation.

(7) The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall direct the closure of the financial records of the state energy office.

(8) Responsibility for implementing energy education, applied research, and technology transfer programs rests with Washington State University. The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall provide Washington State University available existing and future oil overcharge restitution and federal energy block funding for a minimum period of five years to carry out energy programs under an interagency agreement with the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce. The interagency agreement shall also outline the working relationship between the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce and Washington State University as it pertains to the relationship between energy policy development and public outreach. Nothing in chapter 186, Laws of 1996 prohibits Washington State University from seeking grant, contract, or fee-for-service funding for energy or related programs directly from other entities.

Sec. 2083. RCW 43.332.010 and 2003 c 346 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The office of the Washington state trade representative is created in the office of the governor. The office shall serve as the state's official liaison with foreign governments on trade matters.

(2) The office shall:

(a) Work with the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, the department of agriculture, and other appropriate state agencies, and within the agencies' existing resources, review and analyze proposed and enacted international trade agreements and provide an assessment of the impact of the proposed or enacted agreement on Washington's businesses and firms;

(b) Provide input to the office of the United States trade representative in the development of international trade, commodity, and direct investment policies that reflect the concerns of the state of Washington;

(c) Serve as liaison to the legislature on matters of trade policy oversight including, but not limited to, updates to the legislature regarding the status of trade negotiations, trade litigation, and the impacts of trade policy on Washington state businesses;

(d) Work with the international trade division of the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce and the international marketing program of the Washington state department of agriculture to develop a statewide strategy designed to increase the export of Washington goods and services, particularly goods and services from small and medium-sized businesses; and

(e) Conduct other activities the governor deems necessary to promote international trade and foreign investment within the state.

(3) The office shall prepare and submit an annual report on its activities under subsection (2) of this section to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature.

Sec. 2084. RCW 47.01.440 and 2011 c 171 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To support the implementation of RCW 47.04.280 and 47.01.078(4), the department shall adopt broad statewide goals to reduce annual per capita vehicle miles traveled by 2050 consistent with the stated goals of executive order 07-02. Consistent with these goals, the department shall:

(((1)))(a) Establish the following benchmarks using a statewide baseline of seventy-five billion vehicle miles traveled less the vehicle miles traveled attributable to vehicles licensed under RCW 46.16A.455 and weighing ten thousand pounds or more, which are exempt from this section:

(((a)))(i) Decrease the annual per capita vehicle miles traveled by eighteen percent by 2020;

(((b)))(ii) Decrease the annual per capita vehicle miles traveled by thirty percent by 2035; and

(((c)))(iii) Decrease the annual per capita vehicle miles traveled by fifty percent by 2050;

(((2)))(b) By July 1, 2008, establish and convene a collaborative process to develop a set of tools and best practices to assist state, regional, and local entities in making progress towards the benchmarks established in (a) of this subsection (((1) of this section)). The collaborative process must provide an opportunity for public review and comment and must:

(((a)))(i) Be jointly facilitated by the department, the department of ecology, and the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce;

(((b)))(ii) Provide for participation from regional transportation planning organizations, the Washington state transit association, the Puget Sound clean air agency, a statewide business organization representing the sale of motor vehicles, at least one major private employer that participates in the commute trip reduction program, and other interested parties, including but not limited to parties representing diverse perspectives on issues relating to growth, development, and transportation;

(((c)))(iii) Identify current strategies to reduce vehicle miles traveled in the state as well as successful strategies in other jurisdictions that may be applicable in the state;

(((d)))(iv) Identify potential new revenue options for local and regional governments to authorize to finance vehicle miles traveled reduction efforts;

(((e)))(v) Provide for the development of measurement tools that can, with a high level of confidence, measure annual progress toward the benchmarks at the local, regional, and state levels, measure the effects of strategies implemented to reduce vehicle miles traveled and adequately distinguish between common travel purposes, such as moving freight or commuting to work, and measure trends of vehicle miles traveled per capita on a five-year basis;

(((f)))(vi) Establish a process for the department to periodically evaluate progress toward the vehicle miles traveled benchmarks, measure achieved and projected emissions reductions, and recommend whether the benchmarks should be adjusted to meet the state's overall goals for the reduction of greenhouse gas emissions;

(((g)))(vii) Estimate the projected reductions in greenhouse gas emissions if the benchmarks are achieved, taking into account the expected implementation of existing state and federal mandates for vehicle technology and fuels, as well as expected growth in population and vehicle travel;

(((h)))(viii) Examine access to public transportation for people living in areas with affordable housing to and from employment centers, and make recommendations for steps necessary to ensure that areas with affordable housing are served by adequate levels of public transportation; and

(((i)))(vix) By December 1, 2008, provide a report to the transportation committees of the legislature on the collaborative process and resulting recommended tools and best practices to achieve the reduction in annual per capita vehicle miles traveled goals.

(((3)))(2) Included in the December 1, 2008, report to the transportation committees of the legislature, the department shall identify strategies to reduce vehicle miles traveled in the state as well as successful strategies in other jurisdictions that may be applicable in the state that recognize the differing urban and rural transportation requirements.

(((4)))(3) Prior to implementation of the goals in this section, the department, in consultation with the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, cities, counties, local economic development organizations, and local and regional chambers of commerce, shall provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the anticipated impacts of the goals established in this section on the following:

(a) The economic hardship on small businesses as it relates to the ability to hire and retain workers who do not reside in the county in which they are employed;

(b) Impacts on low-income residents;

(c) Impacts on agricultural employers and their employees, especially on the migrant farmworker community;

(d) Impacts on distressed rural counties; and

(e) Impacts in counties with more than fifty percent of the land base of the county in public or tribal lands.

Sec. 2085. RCW 47.12.064 and 1995 c 399 s 121 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall identify and catalog real property that is no longer required for department purposes and is suitable for the development of affordable housing for very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income households as defined in RCW 43.63A.510. The inventory shall include the location, approximate size, and current zoning classification of the property. The department shall provide a copy of the inventory to the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce by November 1, 1993, and every November 1 thereafter.

(2) By November 1 of each year, beginning in 1994, the department shall purge the inventory of real property of sites that are no longer available for the development of affordable housing. The department shall include an updated listing of real property that has become available since the last update. As used in this section, "real property" means buildings, land, or buildings and land.

Sec. 2086. RCW 47.39.040 and 1995 c 399 s 122 are each amended to read as follows:

The establishment of planning and design standards for items provided for in RCW 47.39.050 shall be coordinated by the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce. The department of transportation, parks and recreation commission, and any other departments or commissions whose interests are affected shall prepare, submit, and file with the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce standards relating to the scenic and recreational highway system. If varying planning and design standards are filed, the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall consult with the submitting agencies on the merits of the several proposals and, based upon such consultation, establish a set of standards. Pursuant to the planning and design standards so established, the department of transportation and the parks and recreation commission shall develop the highways and areas adjacent thereto to accomplish the purposes of this chapter, but the department shall retain exclusive authority over the highway right-of-way.

Responsibility for construction and maintenance is hereby established between the department and the parks and recreation commission with the department responsible for activities financed with funds provided for under RCW 47.39.030(1) and the parks and recreation commission responsible for activities financed from other sources of funds. By mutual consent, responsibility for development and/or maintenance may be transferred between the two agencies.

Sec. 2087. RCW 47.39.069 and 1999 c 218 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department, in consultation with the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, the department of natural resources, the parks and recreation commission, affected cities, towns, and counties, federally recognized tribes, regional transportation planning organizations, Washington-based automobile clubs, statewide bicycling organizations, and other interested parties, shall develop by December 31, 1999, criteria for assessing scenic byways and heritage tour routes and an appropriate method of nomination and application for the designation and removal of the designation of the byways. Factors the department may take into consideration, but is not limited by, are: (a) Scenic quality of the byway; (b) natural aspects, such as geological formations, water bodies, vegetation, and wildlife; (c) historic elements; (d) cultural features such as the arts, crafts, music, customs, or traditions of a distinct group of people; (e) archaeological features; (f) recreational activities; (g) roadway safety including accommodations for bicycle and pedestrian travel, tour buses, and automobiles; (h) scenic byway and local and regional byway management plans; and (i) local public involvement and support for the byway.

(2) The criteria developed in subsection (1) of this section must not impose nor require regulation of privately owned lands or property rights.

(3) Any person may nominate a roadway, path, or trail for inclusion in the scenic byway program. The department shall assess nominations in accordance with the criteria developed under subsection (1) of this section. The department shall submit its recommendations for scenic byway and heritage tour route designations to the commission for its approval and official designation of the roadway, path, or trail as a scenic byway or a heritage tour route. All decisions made by the commission relating to scenic byway and heritage tour route designations are final.

(4) The department shall apply the criteria in subsection (1) of this section to state highways that are currently not a part of the designated scenic and recreational highway system. The department shall respond to local requests for route evaluation as defined in subsection (3) of this section.

(5) Once the commission has designated a roadway as a scenic byway, the department may submit an individual nomination to the federal highway administration for its consideration of whether the roadway qualifies to be designated as a national scenic byway or an All-American Roadway.

Sec. 2088. RCW 47.39.090 and 1995 c 399 s 123 are each amended to read as follows:

In developing the scenic and recreational highways program, the department shall consult with the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, the department of natural resources, the parks and recreation commission, affected cities, towns, and counties, regional transportation planning organizations, statewide bicycling organizations, and other interested parties. The scenic and recreational highways program may identify entire highway loops or similar tourist routes that could be developed to promote tourist activity and provide concurrent economic growth while protecting the scenic and recreational quality surrounding state highways.

Sec. 2089. RCW 47.50.090 and 1995 c 399 s 124 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall develop, adopt, and maintain an access control classification system for all routes on the state highway system, the purpose of which shall be to provide for the implementation and continuing applications of the provision of this chapter.

(2) The principal component of the access control classification system shall be access management standards, the purpose of which shall be to provide specific minimum standards to be adhered to in the planning for and approval of access to state highways.

(3) The control classification system shall be developed consistent with the following:

(a) The department shall, no later than January 1, 1993, adopt rules setting forth procedures governing the implementation of the access control classification system required by this chapter. The rule shall provide for input from the entities described in (b) of this subsection as well as for public meetings to discuss the access control classification system. Nothing in this chapter shall affect the validity of the department's existing or subsequently adopted rules concerning access to the state highway system. Such rules shall remain in effect until repealed or replaced by the rules required by this chapter.

(b) The access control classification system shall be developed in cooperation with counties, cities and towns, the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, regional transportation planning organizations, and other local governmental entities, and for city streets designated as state highways pursuant to chapter 47.24 RCW, adopted with the concurrence of the city design standards committee.

(c) The rule required by this section shall provide that assignment of a road segment to a specific access category be made in consideration of the following criteria:

(i) Local land use plans and zoning, as set forth in comprehensive plans;

(ii) The current functional classification as well as potential future functional classification of each road on the state highway system;

(iii) Existing and projected traffic volumes;

(iv) Existing and projected state, local, and metropolitan planning organization transportation plans and needs;

(v) Drainage requirements;

(vi) The character of lands adjoining the highway;

(vii) The type and volume of traffic requiring access;

(viii) Other operational aspects of access;

(ix) The availability of reasonable access by way of county roads and city streets to a state highway; and

(x) The cumulative effect of existing and projected connections on the state highway system's ability to provide for the safe and efficient movement of people and goods within the state.

(d) Access management standards shall include, but not be limited to, connection location standards, safety factors, design and construction standards, desired levels of service, traffic control devices, and effective maintenance of the roads. The standards shall also contain minimum requirements for the spacing of connections, intersecting streets, roads, and highways.

(e) An access control category shall be assigned to each segment of the state highway system by July 1, 1993.

Sec. 2090. RCW 47.76.230 and 2007 c 234 s 94 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of transportation shall continue its responsibility for the development and implementation of the state rail plan and programs, and the utilities and transportation commission shall continue its responsibility for railroad safety issues.

(2) The department of transportation shall maintain an enhanced data file on the rail system. Proprietary annual station traffic data from each railroad and the modal use of major shippers must be obtained to the extent that such information is available.

(3) The department of transportation shall provide technical assistance, upon request, to state agencies and local interests. Technical assistance includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(a) Rail project cost-benefit analyses conducted in accordance with methodologies recommended by the federal railroad administration;

(b) Assistance in the formation of county rail districts and port districts; and

(c) Feasibility studies for rail service continuation or rail service assistance, or both.

(4) With funding authorized by the legislature, the department of transportation, in collaboration with the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, and local economic development agencies, and other interested public and private organizations, shall develop a cooperative process to conduct community and business information programs and to regularly disseminate information on rail matters.

Sec. 2091. RCW 49.04.200 and 2009 c 536 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The council must evaluate the potential of existing apprenticeship and training programs that would produce workers with the skills needed to conduct energy audits and provide energy efficiency services and deliver its findings to the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, the leadership team, and the appropriate committees of the legislature as soon as possible, but no later than January 18, 2010.

(2) The council may prioritize workforce training programs that lead to apprenticeship programs in green economy jobs. For purposes of this section, green economy jobs include those in the primary industries of a green economy, including clean energy, the forestry industry, high-efficiency building, green transportation, and environmental protection. Prioritization efforts may include but are not limited to: (a) Prioritization of the use of high employer-demand funding for workforce training programs in green economy jobs; (b) increased outreach efforts to public utilities, education, labor, government, and private industry to develop tailored, green job training programs; and (c) increased outreach efforts to target populations. Outreach efforts shall be conducted in partnership with local workforce development councils.

(3) The definitions in RCW 43.330.010 apply to this section.

Sec. 2092. RCW 50.38.030 and 1995 c 399 s 142 are each amended to read as follows:

The employment security department shall consult with the following agencies prior to the issuance of the state occupational forecast:

(1) Office of financial management;

(2) Department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce;

(3) Department of labor and industries;

(4) State board for community and technical colleges;

(5) Superintendent of public instruction;

(6) Department of social and health services;

(7) Workforce training and education coordinating board; and

(8) Other state and local agencies as deemed appropriate by the commissioner of the employment security department.

These agencies shall cooperate with the employment security department, submitting information relevant to the generation of occupational forecasts.

Sec. 2093. RCW 50.72.030 and 1994 sp.s. c 3 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington youthbuild program is established within the department. The commissioner, in cooperation and consultation with the director of the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, shall:

(1) Make grants, up to the lesser of three hundred thousand dollars or twenty-five percent of the total costs of the youthbuild activities, to applicants eligible to provide education and employment training under federal or state employment training programs, for the purpose of carrying out a wide range of multidisciplinary activities and services to assist economically disadvantaged youth under the federal opportunities for youth: Youthbuild program (106 Stat. 3723; 42 U.S.C. Sec. 8011), or locally developed youthbuild-type programs for economically disadvantaged youth; and

(2) Coordinate youth employment and training efforts under the department's jurisdiction and cooperate with other agencies and departments providing youth services to ensure that funds appropriated for the purposes of this chapter will be used to supplement funding from federal, state, local, or private sources.

Sec. 2094. RCW 53.36.030 and 1996 c 66 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a port district may at any time contract indebtedness or borrow money for district purposes and may issue general obligation bonds therefor not exceeding an amount, together with any existing indebtedness of the district not authorized by the voters, of one-fourth of one percent of the value of the taxable property in the district.

(b) Port districts having less than eight hundred million dollars in value of taxable property during 1991 may at any time contract indebtedness or borrow money for port district purposes and may issue general obligation bonds therefor not exceeding an amount, combined with existing indebtedness of the district not authorized by the voters, of three-eighths of one percent of the value of the taxable property in the district. Prior to contracting for any indebtedness authorized by this subsection (1)(b), the port district must have a comprehensive plan for harbor improvements or industrial development and a long-term financial plan approved by the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce. The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce is immune from any liability for its part in reviewing or approving port district's improvement or development plans, or financial plans. Any indebtedness authorized by this subsection (1)(b) may be used only to acquire or construct a facility, and, prior to contracting for such indebtedness, the port district must have a lease contract for a minimum of five years for the facility to be acquired or constructed by the debt.

(2) With the assent of three-fifths of the voters voting thereon at a general or special port election called for that purpose, a port district may contract indebtedness or borrow money for district purposes and may issue general obligation bonds therefor provided the total indebtedness of the district at any such time shall not exceed three-fourths of one percent of the value of the taxable property in the district.

(3) In addition to the indebtedness authorized under subsections (1) and (2) of this section, port districts having less than two hundred million dollars in value of taxable property and operating a municipal airport may at any time contract indebtedness or borrow money for airport capital improvement purposes and may issue general obligation bonds therefor not exceeding an additional one-eighth of one percent of the value of the taxable property in the district without authorization by the voters; and, with the assent of three-fifths of the voters voting thereon at a general or special port election called for that purpose, may contract indebtedness or borrow money for airport capital improvement purposes and may issue general obligation bonds therefor for an additional three-eighths of one percent provided the total indebtedness of the district for all port purposes at any such time shall not exceed one and one-fourth percent of the value of the taxable property in the district.

(4) Any port district may issue general district bonds evidencing any indebtedness, payable at any time not exceeding fifty years from the date of the bonds. Any contract for indebtedness or borrowed money authorized by RCW 53.36.030(1)(b) shall not exceed twenty-five years. The bonds shall be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

(5) Elections required under this section shall be held as provided in RCW 39.36.050.

(6) For the purpose of this section, "indebtedness of the district" shall not include any debt of a countywide district with a population less than twenty-five hundred people when the debt is secured by a mortgage on property leased to the federal government; and the term "value of the taxable property" shall have the meaning set forth in RCW 39.36.015.

(7) This section does not apply to a loan made under a loan agreement under chapter 39.69 RCW, and a computation of indebtedness under this chapter must exclude the amount of a loan under such a loan agreement.

Sec. 2095. RCW 54.16.285 and 1995 c 399 s 144 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A district providing utility service for residential space heating shall not terminate such utility service between November 15 through March 15 if the customer:

(a) Notifies the utility of the inability to pay the bill, including a security deposit. This notice should be provided within five business days of receiving a payment overdue notice unless there are extenuating circumstances. If the customer fails to notify the utility within five business days and service is terminated, the customer can, by paying reconnection charges, if any, and fulfilling the requirements of this section, receive the protections of this chapter;

(b) Provides self-certification of household income for the prior twelve months to a grantee of the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce which administers federally funded energy assistance programs. The grantee shall determine that the household income does not exceed the maximum allowed for eligibility under the state's plan for low-income energy assistance under 42 U.S.C. 8624 and shall provide a dollar figure that is seven percent of household income. The grantee may verify information provided in the self-certification;

(c) Has applied for home heating assistance from applicable government and private sector organizations and certifies that any assistance received will be applied to the current bill and future utility bills;

(d) Has applied for low-income weatherization assistance to the utility or other appropriate agency if such assistance is available for the dwelling;

(e) Agrees to a payment plan and agrees to maintain the payment plan. The plan will be designed both to pay the past due bill by the following October 15 and to pay for continued utility service. If the past due bill is not paid by the following October 15, the customer shall not be eligible for protections under this chapter until the past due bill is paid. The plan shall not require monthly payments in excess of seven percent of the customer's monthly income plus one-twelfth of any arrearage accrued from the date application is made and thereafter during November 15 through March 15. A customer may agree to pay a higher percentage during this period, but shall not be in default unless payment during this period is less than seven percent of monthly income plus one-twelfth of any arrearage accrued from the date application is made and thereafter. If assistance payments are received by the customer subsequent to implementation of the plan, the customer shall contact the utility to reformulate the plan; and

(f) Agrees to pay the moneys owed even if he or she moves.

(2) The utility shall:

(a) Include in any notice that an account is delinquent and that service may be subject to termination, a description of the customer's duties in this section;

(b) Assist the customer in fulfilling the requirements under this section;

(c) Be authorized to transfer an account to a new residence when a customer who has established a plan under this section moves from one residence to another within the same utility service area;

(d) Be permitted to disconnect service if the customer fails to honor the payment program. Utilities may continue to disconnect service for those practices authorized by law other than for nonpayment as provided for in this section. Customers who qualify for payment plans under this section who default on their payment plans and are disconnected can be reconnected and maintain the protections afforded under this chapter by paying reconnection charges, if any, and by paying all amounts that would have been due and owing under the terms of the applicable payment plan, absent default, on the date on which service is reconnected; and

(e) Advise the customer in writing at the time it disconnects service that it will restore service if the customer contacts the utility and fulfills the other requirements of this section.

(3) All districts providing utility service for residential space heating shall offer residential customers the option of a budget billing or equal payment plan. The budget billing or equal payment plan shall be offered low-income customers eligible under the state's plan for low-income energy assistance prepared in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 8624(C)(1) without limiting availability to certain months of the year, without regard to the length of time the customer has occupied the premises, and without regard to whether the customer is the tenant or owner of the premises occupied.

(4) An agreement between the customer and the utility, whether oral or written, shall not waive the protections afforded under this chapter.

Sec. 2096. RCW 54.52.020 and 2007 c 132 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

All assistance provided under this chapter shall be disbursed by the grantee, charitable organization, or district. When applicable, the public utility district will be paid on behalf of the customer by the grantee or the charitable organization. When direct vendor payment is not feasible, a check will be issued jointly payable to the customer and the public utility district. The availability of funds for assistance to a district's low-income customers as a result of voluntary contributions shall not reduce the amount of assistance for which the district's customers are eligible under the federally funded energy assistance programs administered by the grantee of the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce within the district's service area. When applicable, the grantee or charitable organization shall provide the district with a quarterly report on January 15th, April 15th, July 15th, and October 15th which includes information concerning the total amount of funds received from the district, the names of all recipients of assistance from these funds, the amount received by each recipient, and the amount of funds received from the district currently on hand and available for future low-income assistance.

Sec. 2097. RCW 57.46.010 and 1996 c 230 s 1401 are each amended to read as follows:

A district may include along with, or as part of its regular customer billings, a request for voluntary contributions to assist qualified low-income residential customers of the district in paying their district bills. All funds received by the district in response to such requests shall be transmitted to the grantee of the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce which administers federally funded energy assistance programs for the state in the district's service area or to a charitable organization within the district's service area. All such funds shall be used solely to supplement assistance to low-income residential customers of the district in paying their district bills. The grantee or charitable organization shall be responsible to determine which of the district's customers are qualified for low-income assistance and the amount of assistance to be provided to those who are qualified.

Sec. 2098. RCW 57.46.020 and 1996 c 230 s 1402 are each amended to read as follows:

All assistance provided under this chapter shall be disbursed by the grantee or charitable organization. Where possible the district shall be paid on behalf of the customer by the grantee or the charitable organization. When direct vendor payment is not feasible, a check shall be issued jointly payable to the customer and the district. The availability of funds for assistance to a district's low-income customers as a result of voluntary contributions shall not reduce the amount of assistance for which the district's customers are eligible under the federally funded energy assistance programs administered by the grantee of the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce within the district's service area. The grantee or charitable organization shall provide the district with a quarterly report on January 15th, April 15th, July 15th, and October 15th which includes information concerning the total amount of funds received from the district, the names of all recipients of assistance from these funds, the amount received by each recipient, and the amount of funds received from the district currently on hand and available for future low-income assistance.

Sec. 2099. RCW 59.18.440 and 1997 c 452 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any city, town, county, or municipal corporation that is required to develop a comprehensive plan under RCW 36.70A.040(1) is authorized to require, after reasonable notice to the public and a public hearing, property owners to provide their portion of reasonable relocation assistance to low-income tenants upon the demolition, substantial rehabilitation whether due to code enforcement or any other reason, or change of use of residential property, or upon the removal of use restrictions in an assisted-housing development. No city, town, county, or municipal corporation may require property owners to provide relocation assistance to low-income tenants, as defined in this chapter, upon the demolition, substantial rehabilitation, upon the change of use of residential property, or upon the removal of use restrictions in an assisted-housing development, except as expressly authorized herein or when authorized or required by state or federal law. As used in this section, "assisted housing development" means a multifamily rental housing development that either receives government assistance and is defined as federally assisted housing in RCW 59.28.020, or that receives other federal, state, or local government assistance and is subject to use restrictions.

(2) As used in this section, "low-income tenants" means tenants whose combined total income per dwelling unit is at or below fifty percent of the median income, adjusted for family size, in the county where the tenants reside.

The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall adopt rules defining county median income in accordance with the definitions promulgated by the federal department of housing and urban development.

(3) A requirement that property owners provide relocation assistance shall include the amounts of such assistance to be provided to low-income tenants. In determining such amounts, the jurisdiction imposing the requirement shall evaluate, and receive public testimony on, what relocation expenses displaced tenants would reasonably incur in that jurisdiction including:

(a) Actual physical moving costs and expenses;

(b) Advance payments required for moving into a new residence such as the cost of first and last month's rent and security and damage deposits;

(c) Utility connection fees and deposits; and

(d) Anticipated additional rent and utility costs in the residence for one year after relocation.

(4)(a) Relocation assistance provided to low-income tenants under this section shall not exceed two thousand dollars for each dwelling unit displaced by actions of the property owner under subsection (1) of this section. A city, town, county, or municipal corporation may make future annual adjustments to the maximum amount of relocation assistance required under this subsection in order to reflect any changes in the housing component of the consumer price index as published by the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics.

(b) The property owner's portion of any relocation assistance provided to low-income tenants under this section shall not exceed one-half of the required relocation assistance under (a) of this subsection in cash or services.

(c) The portion of relocation assistance not covered by the property owner under (b) of this subsection shall be paid by the city, town, county, or municipal corporation authorized to require relocation assistance under subsection (1) of this section. The relocation assistance may be paid from proceeds collected from the excise tax imposed under RCW 82.46.010.

(5) A city, town, county, or municipal corporation requiring the provision of relocation assistance under this section shall adopt policies, procedures, or regulations to implement such requirement. Such policies, procedures, or regulations shall include provisions for administrative hearings to resolve disputes between tenants and property owners relating to relocation assistance or unlawful detainer actions during relocation, and shall require a decision within thirty days of a request for a hearing by either a tenant or property owner.

Judicial review of an administrative hearing decision relating to relocation assistance may be had by filing a petition, within ten days of the decision, in the superior court in the county where the residential property is located. Judicial review shall be confined to the record of the administrative hearing and the court may reverse the decision only if the administrative findings, inferences, conclusions, or decision is:

(a) In violation of constitutional provisions;

(b) In excess of the authority or jurisdiction of the administrative hearing officer;

(c) Made upon unlawful procedure or otherwise is contrary to law; or

(d) Arbitrary and capricious.

(6) Any city, town, county, or municipal corporation may require relocation assistance, under the terms of this section, for otherwise eligible tenants whose living arrangements are exempted from the provisions of this chapter under RCW 59.18.040(3) and if the living arrangement is considered to be a rental or lease not defined as a retail sale under RCW 82.04.050.

(7)(a) Persons who move from a dwelling unit prior to the application by the owner of the dwelling unit for any governmental permit necessary for the demolition, substantial rehabilitation, or change of use of residential property or prior to any notification or filing required for condominium conversion shall not be entitled to the assistance authorized by this section.

(b) Persons who move into a dwelling unit after the application for any necessary governmental permit or after any required condominium conversion notification or filing shall not be entitled to the assistance authorized by this section if such persons receive written notice from the property owner prior to taking possession of the dwelling unit that specifically describes the activity or condition that may result in their temporary or permanent displacement and advises them of their ineligibility for relocation assistance.

Sec. 2100. RCW 59.24.020 and 1995 c 399 s 157 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall establish the rental security deposit guarantee program. Through this program the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall provide grants and technical assistance to local governments or nonprofit corporations, including local housing authorities as defined in RCW 35.82.030, who operate emergency housing shelters or transitional housing programs. The grants are to be used for the payment of residential rental security deposits under this chapter. The technical assistance is to help the local government or nonprofit corporation apply for grants and carry out the program. In order to be eligible for grants under this program, the recipient local government or nonprofit corporation shall provide fifteen percent of the total amount needed for the security deposit. The security deposit may include last month's rent where such rent is required as a normal practice by the landlord.

(2) The grants and matching funds shall be placed by the recipient local government or nonprofit corporation in a revolving loan fund and deposited in a bank or savings institution in an account that is separate from all other funds of the recipient. The funds and interest earned on these funds shall be utilized only as collateral to guarantee the payment of a security deposit required by a residential rental property owner as a condition for entering into a rental agreement with a prospective tenant.

(3) Prospective tenants who are eligible to participate in the rental security deposit guarantee program shall be limited to homeless persons or families who are residing in an emergency shelter or transitional housing operated by a local government or a nonprofit corporation, or to families who are temporarily residing in a park, car, or are otherwise without adequate shelter. The local government or nonprofit corporation shall make a determination regarding the person's or family's eligibility to participate in this program and a determination that a local rental unit is available for occupation. A determination of eligibility shall include, but is not limited to: (a) A determination that the person or family is homeless or is in transitional housing; (b) a verification of income and that the person or family can reasonably make the monthly rental payment; and (c) a determination that the person or family does not have the financial resources to make the rental security deposit.

Sec. 2101. RCW 59.24.050 and 1995 c 399 s 158 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce may adopt rules to implement this chapter, including but not limited to: (1) The eligibility of and the application process for local governments and nonprofit corporations; (2) the criteria by which grants and technical assistance shall be provided to local governments and nonprofit corporations; and (3) the criteria local governments and nonprofit corporations shall use in entering into contracts with tenants and rental property owners.

Sec. 2102. RCW 59.24.060 and 1995 c 399 s 159 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce may receive such gifts, grants, or endowments from public or private sources, as may be made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, to be used by the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce for its programs, including the rental security deposit guarantee program. Funds from the housing trust fund, chapter 43.185 RCW, up to one hundred thousand dollars, may be used for the rental security deposit guarantee program by the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, local governments, and nonprofit organizations, provided all the requirements of this chapter and chapter 43.185 RCW are met.

Sec. 2103. RCW 59.28.030 and 2000 c 255 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This chapter shall not apply to the expiration or termination of a housing assistance contract between a public housing agency and an owner of existing housing participating in either the section 8 certificate or voucher program (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1437f).

(2) An owner of federally assisted housing shall not be required to give notice of a prepayment under this chapter, if the owner has: (a) Entered into an agreement with a federal, state, or local agency continuing existing, or imposing new, low-income use restrictions for at least twenty years that ensure that the tenants residing in the development at the time of prepayment are not involuntarily displaced except for good cause and that the housing will continue to serve very low and low-income families and persons in need of affordable housing; and (b) served notice of the agreement on the clerk of the city, or county if in an unincorporated area, in which the property is located, on any public housing agency that would be responsible for administering tenant-based rental assistance to persons who would otherwise be displaced from this housing, and on the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce by regular and certified mail and posted a copy of the agreement in a conspicuous place at the development where it is likely to be seen by the tenants. The posted agreement shall be maintained intact and in legible form for the life of the agreement.

(3) An owner of federally assisted housing is not required to give notice that a rental assistance contract is expiring if: (a) The owner has entered into an agreement with the United States department of housing and urban development or other federal, state, or local agency to renew the rental assistance contract for a minimum of five years subject to the availability of adequate appropriations; (b) the agreement itself does not expire in less than twelve months; and (c) the owner has served written notice of the agreement on the clerk of the city, or county if in an unincorporated area, in which the property is located, on any public housing agency that would be responsible for administering tenant-based rental assistance to persons who would otherwise be displaced from this housing, and on the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, by regular and certified mail and posted these notices in a conspicuous place at the development where they are likely to be seen by the tenants. The posted notices shall be maintained intact and in legible form for the life of the agreement to renew the rental assistance contract.

Sec. 2104. RCW 59.28.040 and 2002 c 30 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as provided in RCW 59.28.030, all owners of federally assisted housing shall, at least twelve months before the expiration of the rental assistance contract or prepayment of a mortgage or loan, serve a written notice of the anticipated expiration or prepayment date on each tenant household residing in the housing, on the clerk of the city, or clerk of the county legislative authority if in an unincorporated area, in which the property is located, on any public housing agency that would be responsible for administering tenant-based rental assistance to persons who would otherwise be displaced from this housing, and on the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, by regular and certified mail. All owners of federally assisted housing shall also serve written notice of the anticipated expiration or prepayment date on each tenant household that moves into the housing after the initial notice has been given, but before the expiration of the rental assistance contract or prepayment of the mortgage or loan. This notice shall be given before a new tenant is asked to execute a rental agreement or required to pay any deposits.

Sec. 2105. RCW 59.28.050 and 1995 c 399 s 161 are each amended to read as follows:

This chapter shall not in any way prohibit an owner of federally assisted housing from terminating a rental assistance contract or prepaying a mortgage or loan. The requirement in this chapter for notice shall not be construed as conferring any new or additional regulatory power upon the city or county clerk or upon the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce.

Sec. 2106. RCW 59.28.060 and 2000 c 255 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The notice to tenants required by RCW 59.28.040 shall state:

(a) Whether the owner (i) intends to prepay the mortgage or loan or allow the rental assistance contract to expire in order to operate the housing without any low-income use restrictions, (ii) plans on renewing the rental assistance contract subject to the availability of adequate appropriations, or (iii) is seeking additional financial incentives or higher rents as a condition of remaining in the federal program; (b) the reason the owner plans on taking this action; (c) the owner's plans for the project, including any timetables or deadlines for actions to be taken by the owner and any specific federal, state, or local agency approvals that the owner is required to obtain; (d) the anticipated date of the prepayment of the mortgage or loan or expiration of the rental assistance contract; (e) the effect, if any, that prepayment of the mortgage or loan or expiration of the rental assistance contract will have upon the tenants' rent and other terms of their rental agreement; and (f) that additional information will be served on the city or county, on the local public housing agency, and on the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce and will be posted at the development. The owner shall also include with the notice written information, prepared by the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce under RCW 59.28.120(1), concerning the legal rights, responsibilities, and options of owners and tenants when an owner intends to prepay a mortgage or loan or terminate a rental assistance contract.

(2) The notice to the city or county clerk and to the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce required by RCW 59.28.040 shall state: (a) The name, location, and project number of the federally assisted housing and the type of assistance received from the federal government; (b) the number and size of units; (c) the age, race, family size, and estimated incomes of the tenants who will be affected by the prepayment of the loan or mortgage or expiration of the federal assistance contract; (d) the current rents and projected rent increases for each affected tenant after the prepayment of the mortgage or loan or expiration of the rental assistance contract without disclosing the identities of the affected tenants; (e) the availability and type, if any, of rental assistance after the prepayment of the mortgage or loan or expiration of the rental assistance contract; and (f) the age, race, family size, and estimated incomes of any applicants on the project's waiting list without disclosing the identities of the applicants. The owner shall attach to this notice a copy of the notice the owner sends to the tenants under this chapter.

(3) All owners of federally assisted housing shall immediately post a copy of any notices they send the city or county clerk, any public housing agency, and the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, under RCW 59.28.040, in a conspicuous place at the development where they are likely to be seen by current and prospective tenants. The notices shall be maintained intact and in legible form for twelve months from the date they are posted.

All owners of federally assisted housing shall, upon request of any state or local agency, provide the agency with a copy of any rent comparability study, market analysis, or projected budget that they submit to the United States department of housing and urban development or other federal agency in conjunction with the prepayment of their mortgage or loan or in anticipation of the expiration of their rental assistance contract, together with any physical inspection reports or capital needs assessments completed by the owner or federal agency within the last three years.

Sec. 2107. RCW 59.28.120 and 2000 c 255 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall within ninety days after March 31, 2000, consult with all interested stakeholders and develop and provide to owners and tenants of federally assisted housing, state and local agencies, and other interested persons all of the following:

(1) Written information concerning the legal rights, responsibilities, and options of owners and tenants when an owner intends to prepay a mortgage or loan or terminate a rental assistance contract. This information shall include the name and telephone number of any qualified legal aid program that provides civil legal services to indigent persons and of any other state, regional, or local organization that can be contacted to request additional information about an owner's responsibilities and the rights and options of an affected tenant;

(2) Written information sufficient to enable an owner of federally assisted housing to comply with the notification requirements of this chapter, including the name and address of any public housing agency that would be responsible for administering tenant-based rental assistance to persons who would otherwise be displaced from federally assisted housing; and

(3) Any other information or technical assistance the department determines will further the purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 2108. RCW 64.34.442 and 2008 c 113 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All cities and counties planning under RCW 36.70A.040, which have allowed any conversion condominiums within the jurisdiction within the previous twelve-month period, must report annually to the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce the following information:

(a) The total number of apartment units converted into condominiums;

(b) The total number of conversion condominium projects; and

(c) The total number of apartment tenants who receive relocation assistance.

(2) Upon completion of a conversion condominium project, a city or county may require the declarant to provide the information described in subsection (1) of this section to the appropriately designated department or agency in the city or county for the purpose of complying with subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 2109. RCW 66.08.195 and 2001 c 8 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of this chapter:

(1) "Border area" means any incorporated city or town, or unincorporated area, located within seven miles of the Washington-Canadian border or any unincorporated area that is a point of land surrounded on three sides by salt water and adjacent to the Canadian border.

(2) "Border area per-capita law-enforcement spending" equals total per capita expenditures in a border area on: Law enforcement operating costs, court costs, law enforcement-related insurance, and detention expenses, minus funds allocated to a border area under RCW 66.08.190 and 66.08.196.

(3) "Border-crossing traffic total" means the number of vehicles, vessels, and aircraft crossing into the United States through a United States customs service border crossing that enter into the border area during a federal fiscal year, using border crossing statistics and criteria included in guidelines adopted by the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce.

(4) "Border-related crime statistic" means the sum of infractions and citations issued, and arrests of persons permanently residing outside Washington state in a border area during a calendar year.

Sec. 2110. RCW 66.08.198 and 1995 c 159 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall develop guidelines to determine the figures used under the three distribution factors defined in RCW 66.08.195. At the request of any border community, the department may review these guidelines once every three years.

Sec. 2111. RCW 67.28.8001 and 1997 c 452 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each municipality imposing a tax under chapter 67.28 RCW shall submit a report to the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce on October 1, 1998, and October 1, 2000. Each report shall include the following information:

(a) The rate of tax imposed under chapter 67.28 RCW;

(b) The total revenue received under chapter 67.28 RCW for each of the preceding six years;

(c) A list of projects and activities funded with revenue received under chapter 67.28 RCW; and

(d) The amount of revenue under chapter 67.28 RCW expended for each project and activity.

(2) The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall summarize and analyze the data received under subsection (1) of this section in a report submitted to the legislature on January 1, 1999, and January 1, 2001. The report shall include, but not be limited to, analysis of factors contributing to growth in revenue received under chapter 67.28 RCW and the effects of projects and activities funded with revenue received under chapter 67.28 RCW on tourism growth.

Sec. 2112. RCW 67.38.070 and 1995 c 399 s 167 are each amended to read as follows:

The comprehensive cultural arts, stadium and convention plan adopted by the district shall be reviewed by the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce to determine:

(1) Whether the plan will enhance the progress of the state and provide for the general welfare of the population; and

(2) Whether such plan is eligible for matching federal funds.

After reviewing the comprehensive cultural arts, stadium and convention plan, the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall have sixty days in which to approve such plan and to certify to the state treasurer that such district shall be eligible to receive funds. To be approved a plan shall provide for coordinated cultural arts, stadium and convention planning, and be consistent with the public cultural arts, stadium and convention coordination criteria in a manner prescribed by chapter 35.60 RCW. In the event such comprehensive plan is disapproved and ruled ineligible to receive funds, the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall provide written notice to the district within thirty days as to the reasons for such plan's disapproval and such ineligibility. The district may resubmit such plan upon reconsideration and correction of such deficiencies cited in such notice of disapproval.

Sec. 2113. RCW 70.62.290 and 1994 c 250 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Rules establishing fire and life safety requirements, not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, shall continue to be adopted by the director of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, through the director of fire protection.

Sec. 2114. RCW 70.114A.070 and 1995 c 220 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall contract with private, nonprofit corporations to provide technical assistance to any private individual or nonprofit organization wishing to construct temporary or permanent worker housing. The assistance may include information on state and local application and approval procedures, information or assistance in applying for federal, state, or local financial assistance, including tax incentives, information on cost-effective housing designs, or any other assistance the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce may deem helpful in obtaining the active participation of private individuals or groups in constructing or operating temporary or permanent worker housing.

Sec. 2115. RCW 70.136.030 and 1995 c 399 s 197 are each amended to read as follows:

The governing body of each applicable political subdivision of this state shall designate a hazardous materials incident command agency within its respective boundaries, and file this designation with the director of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce. In designating an incident command agency, the political subdivision shall consider the training, manpower, expertise, and equipment of various available agencies as well as the Uniform Fire Code and other existing codes and regulations. Along state and interstate highway corridors, the Washington state patrol shall be the designated incident command agency unless by mutual agreement that role has been assumed by another designated incident command agency. If a political subdivision has not designated an incident command agency within six months after July 26, 1987, the Washington state patrol shall then assume the role of incident command agency by action of the chief until a designation has been made.

Sec. 2116. RCW 70A.50.020 and 2009 c 379 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington State University extension energy program is authorized to implement grants for pilot programs providing community-wide urban residential and commercial energy efficiency upgrades. The Washington State University extension energy program must coordinate and collaborate with the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce on the design, administration, and implementation elements of the pilot program.

(1) There must be at least three grants for pilot programs, awarded on a competitive basis to sponsors for conducting direct outreach and delivering energy efficiency services that, to the extent feasible, ensure a balance of participation for: (a) Geographic regions in the state; (b) types of fuel used for heating; (c) owner-occupied and rental residences; (d) small commercial buildings; and (e) single-family and multifamily dwellings.

(2) The pilot programs must:

(a) Provide assistance for energy audits and energy efficiency-related improvements to structures owned by or used for residential, commercial, or nonprofit purposes in specified urban neighborhoods where the objective is to achieve a high rate of participation among building owners within the pilot area;

(b) Utilize volunteer support to reach out to potential customers through the use of community-based institutions;

(c) Employ qualified energy auditors and energy efficiency service providers to perform the energy audits using recognized energy efficiency and weatherization services that are cost-effective;

(d) Select and provide oversight of contractors to perform energy efficiency services. Sponsors shall require contractors to participate in quality control and efficiency training, use workers trained from workforce training and apprentice programs established under chapter 536, Laws of 2009 if these workers are available, pay prevailing wages under chapter 39.12 RCW, hire from the community in which the program is located, and create employment opportunities for veterans, members of the national guard, and low-income and disadvantaged populations; and

(e) Work with customers to secure financing for their portion of the project and apply for and administer utility, public, and charitable funding provided for energy audits and retrofits.

(3) The Washington State University extension energy program must give priority to sponsors that can secure a sponsor match of at least one dollar for each dollar awarded.

(a) A sponsor may use its own moneys, including corporate or ratepayer moneys, or moneys provided by landlords, charitable groups, government programs, the Bonneville power administration, or other sources to pay the sponsor match.

(b) A sponsor may meet its match requirement in whole or in part through providing labor, materials, or other in-kind expenditures.

(4)(a) Pilot programs receiving funding must report compliance with performance metrics for each sponsor receiving a grant award. The performance metrics include:

(i) Monetary and energy savings achieved;

(ii) Savings-to-investment ratio achieved for customers;

(iii) Wage levels of jobs created;

(iv) Utilization of preapprentice and apprenticeship programs; and

(v) Efficiency and speed of delivery of services.

(b) Pilot programs receiving funding under this section are required to report to the Washington State University ((energy)) extension (([extension energy]))energy program on compliance with the performance metrics every six months following the receipt of grants, with the last report submitted six months after program completion.

(c) The Washington State University extension energy program shall review the accuracy of these reports and provide a progress report on all grant pilot programs to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year.

(5)(a) By December 1, 2009, the Washington State University extension energy program shall provide a report to the governor and appropriate legislative committees on the: Number of grants awarded; number of jobs created or maintained; number and type of individuals trained through workforce training and apprentice programs; number of veterans, members of the national guard, and individuals of low-income and disadvantaged populations employed by pilot programs; and amount of funding provided through the grants as established in subsection (1) of this section and the performance metrics established in subsection (4) of this section.

(b) By December 1, 2010, the Washington State University extension energy program shall provide a final report to the governor and appropriate legislative committees on the: Number of grants awarded; number of jobs created or maintained; number and type of individuals trained through workforce training and apprentice programs; number of veterans, members of the national guard, and individuals of low-income and disadvantaged populations employed by pilot programs; and amount of funding provided through the grants as established in subsection (1) of this section and the performance metrics established in subsection (4) of this section.

Sec. 2117. RCW 70A.205.210 and 1995 c 399 s 189 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall in addition to its other powers and duties:

(1) Cooperate with the appropriate federal, state, interstate and local units of government and with appropriate private organizations in carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

(2) Coordinate the development of a solid waste management plan for all areas of the state in cooperation with local government, the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, and other appropriate state and regional agencies. The plan shall relate to solid waste management for twenty years in the future and shall be reviewed biennially, revised as necessary, and extended so that perpetually the plan shall look to the future for twenty years as a guide in carrying out a state coordinated solid waste management program. The plan shall be developed into a single integrated document and shall be adopted no later than October 1990. The plan shall be revised regularly after its initial completion so that local governments revising local comprehensive solid waste management plans can take advantage of the data and analysis in the state plan.

(3) Provide technical assistance to any person as well as to cities, counties, and industries.

(4) Initiate, conduct, and support research, demonstration projects, and investigations, and coordinate research programs pertaining to solid waste management systems.

(5) Develop statewide programs to increase public awareness of and participation in tire recycling, and to stimulate and encourage local private tire recycling centers and public participation in tire recycling.

(6) May, under the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, from time to time promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 2118. RCW 70A.205.710 and 1998 c 245 s 132 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to establish the feasibility of composting food and yard wastes, the department shall provide funds, as available, to local governments submitting a proposal to compost such wastes.

(2) The department, in cooperation with the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, may approve an application if the project can demonstrate the essential parameters for successful composting, including, but not limited to, cost-effectiveness, handling and safety requirements, and current and potential markets.

Sec. 2119. RCW 71.09.255 and 2002 c 68 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon receiving the notification required by RCW 71.09.250, counties must promptly notify the cities within the county of the maximum number of secure community transition facility beds that may be required and the projected number of beds to be needed in that county.

(2) The incentive grants and payments provided under this section are subject to the following provisions:

(a) Counties and the cities within the county must notify each other of siting plans to promote the establishment and equitable distribution of secure community transition facilities;

(b) Development regulations, ordinances, plans, laws, and criteria established for siting must be consistent with statutory requirements and rules applicable to siting and operating secure community transition facilities;

(c) The minimum size for any facility is three beds; and

(d) The department must approve any sites selected.

(3) Any county or city that makes a commitment to initiate the process to site one or more secure community transition facilities by one hundred twenty days after March 21, 2002, shall receive a planning grant as proposed and approved by the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce.

(4) Any county or city that has issued all necessary permits by May 1, 2003, for one or more secure community transition facilities that comply with the requirements of this section shall receive an incentive grant in the amount of fifty thousand dollars for each bed sited.

(5) To encourage the rapid permitting of sites, any county or city that has issued all necessary permits by January 1, 2003, for one or more secure community transition facilities that comply with the requirements of this section shall receive a bonus in the amount of twenty percent of the amount provided under subsection (4) of this section.

(6) Any county or city that establishes secure community transition facility beds in excess of the maximum number that could be required to be sited in that county shall receive a bonus payment of one hundred thousand dollars for each bed established in excess of the maximum requirement.

(7) No payment shall be made under subsection (4), (5), or (6) of this section until all necessary permits have been issued.

(8) The funds available to counties and cities under this section are contingent upon funds being appropriated by the legislature.

Sec. 2120. RCW 72.09.055 and 1995 c 399 s 202 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall identify and catalog real property that is no longer required for department purposes and is suitable for the development of affordable housing for very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income households as defined in RCW 43.63A.510. The inventory shall include the location, approximate size, and current zoning classification of the property. The department shall provide a copy of the inventory to the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce by November 1, 1993, and every November 1 thereafter.

(2) By November 1 of each year, beginning in 1994, the department shall purge the inventory of real property of sites that are no longer available for the development of affordable housing. The department shall include an updated listing of real property that has become available since the last update. As used in this section, "real property" means buildings, land, or buildings and land.

Sec. 2121. RCW 72.65.210 and 1998 c 245 s 142 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall establish, by rule, inmate eligibility standards for participation in the work release program.

(2) The department shall:

(a) Conduct an annual examination of each work release facility and its security procedures;

(b) Investigate and set standards for the inmate supervision policies of each work release facility;

(c) Establish physical standards for future work release structures to ensure the safety of inmates, employees, and the surrounding communities;

(d) Evaluate its recordkeeping of serious infractions to determine if infractions are properly and consistently assessed against inmates eligible for work release;

(e) ((The department shall establish))Establish a written treatment plan best suited to the inmate's needs, cost, and the relationship of community placement and community corrections officers to a system of case management;

(f) Adopt a policy to encourage businesses employing work release inmates to contact the appropriate work release facility whenever an inmate is absent from his or her work schedule. The department of corrections shall provide each employer with written information and instructions on who should be called if a work release employee is absent from work or leaves the jobsite without authorization; and

(g) Develop a siting policy, in conjunction with cities, counties, community groups, and the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce for the establishment of additional work release facilities. Such policy shall include at least the following elements: (i) Guidelines for appropriate site selection of work-release facilities; (ii) notification requirements to local government and community groups of intent to site a work release facility; and (iii) guidelines for effective community relations by the work release program operator.

The department shall comply with the requirements of this section by July 1, 1990.

Sec. 2122. RCW 76.56.020 and 1994 c 282 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The center shall:

(1) Coordinate the University of Washington's college of forest resources' faculty and staff expertise to assist in:

(a) The development of research and analysis for developing policies and strategies which will expand forest-based international trade, including a major focus on secondary manufacturing;

(b) The development of technology or commercialization support for manufactured products that will meet the evolving needs of international customers;

(c) The development of research and analysis on other factors critical to forest-based trade, including the quality and availability of raw wood resources; and

(d) The coordination, development, and dissemination of market and technical information relevant to international trade in forest products, including a major focus on secondary manufacturing;

(2) Further develop and maintain computer databases on worldwide forest products production and trade in order to monitor and report on trends significant to the Northwest forest products industry and support the center's research functions; and coordinate this system with state, federal, and private sector efforts to insure a cost-effective information resource that will avoid unnecessary duplication;

(3) Monitor international forest products markets and assess the status of the state's forest products industry, including the competitiveness of small and medium-sized secondary manufacturing firms in the forest products industry, which for the purposes of this chapter shall be firms with annual revenues of twenty-five million or less, and including the increased exports of Washington-produced products of small and medium-sized secondary manufacturing firms;

(4) Provide high quality research and graduate education and professional nondegree training in international trade in forest products in cooperation with the University of Washington's graduate school of business administration, the school of law, the Jackson school of international studies, the Northwest policy center of the graduate school of public administration, and other supporting academic units;

(5) Develop cooperative linkages with the international marketing program for agricultural commodities and trade at Washington State University, the international trade project of the United States forest service, the department of natural resources, the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, the small business export finance assistance center, and other state and federal agencies to avoid duplication of effort and programs;

(6) Cooperate with personnel from the state's community and technical colleges in their development of wood products manufacturing and wood technology curriculum and offer periodic workshops on wood products manufacturing, wood technology, and trade opportunities to community colleges and private educators and trainers;

(7) Provide for public dissemination of research, analysis, and results of the center's programs to all groups, including direct assistance groups, through technical workshops, short courses, international and national symposia, cooperation with private sector networks and marketing associations, or other means, including appropriate publications;

(8) Establish an executive policy board, including representatives of small and medium-sized businesses, with at least fifty percent of its business members representing small businesses with one hundred or fewer employees and medium-sized businesses with one hundred to five hundred employees. The executive policy board shall also include a representative of the community and technical colleges, representatives of state and federal agencies, and a representative of a wood products manufacturing network or trade association of small and medium-sized wood product manufacturers. The executive policy board shall provide advice on: Overall policy direction and program priorities, state and federal budget requests, securing additional research funds, identifying priority areas of focus for research efforts, selection of projects for research, and dissemination of results of research efforts; and

(9) Establish advisory or technical committees for each research program area, to advise on research program area priorities, consistent with the international trade opportunities achievable by the forest products sector of the state and region, to help ensure projects are relevant to industry needs, and to advise on and support effective dissemination of research results. Each advisory or technical committee shall include representatives of forest products industries that might benefit from this research.

Service on the committees and the executive policy board established in subsections (8) and (9) of this section shall be without compensation but actual travel expenses incurred in connection with service to the center may be reimbursed from appropriated funds in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 2123. RCW 79.105.600 and 2005 c 155 s 161 are each amended to read as follows:

After consultation with the director of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, the department may enter into agreements, leases, or other conveyances for archaeological activities on state-owned aquatic lands. The agreements, leases, or other conveyances may contain those conditions as are required for the department to comply with its legal rights and duties. All agreements, leases, or other conveyances, shall be issued in accordance with the terms of chapters 79.105 through 79.140 RCW.

Sec. 2124. RCW 79A.30.050 and 1995 c 200 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the authority and state agencies find it mutually beneficial to do so, they are authorized to collaborate and cooperate on projects of shared interest. Agencies authorized to collaborate with the authority include but are not limited to: The commission for activities and projects related to public recreation; the department of agriculture for projects related to the equine agricultural industry; the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce with respect to community and economic development and tourism issues associated with development of the state horse park; Washington State University with respect to opportunities for animal research, education, and extension; the department of ecology with respect to opportunities for making the state horse park's waste treatment facilities a demonstration model for the handling of waste to protect water quality; and with local community colleges with respect to programs related to horses, economic development, business, and tourism.

(2) The authority shall cooperate with 4-H clubs, pony clubs, youth groups, and local park departments to provide youth recreational activities. The authority shall also provide for preferential use of an area of the horse park facility for youth and ((the disabled))individuals with disabilities at nominal cost.

Sec. 2125. RCW 79A.50.100 and 1995 c 399 s 209 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A public hearing may be held prior to any withdrawal of state trust lands and shall be held prior to any revocation of withdrawal or modification of withdrawal of state trust lands used for recreational purposes by the department of natural resources or by other state agencies.

(2) The department shall cause notice of the withdrawal, revocation of withdrawal or modification of withdrawal of state trust lands as described in subsection (1) of this section to be published by advertisement once a week for four weeks prior to the public hearing in at least one newspaper published and of general circulation in the county or counties in which the state trust lands are situated, and by causing a copy of said notice to be posted in a conspicuous place in the department's Olympia office, in the district office in which the land is situated, and in the office of the county auditor in the county where the land is situated thirty days prior to the public hearing. The notice shall specify the time and place of the public hearing and shall describe with particularity each parcel of state trust lands involved in said hearing.

(3) The board of natural resources shall administer the hearing according to its prescribed rules and regulations.

(4) The board of natural resources shall determine the most beneficial use or combination of uses of the state trust lands. Its decision will be conclusive as to the matter: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That said decisions as to uses shall conform to applicable state plans and policy guidelines adopted by the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce.

Sec. 2126. RCW 79A.60.480 and 2002 c 86 s 327 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of licensing may issue a whitewater river outfitter's license to an applicant who submits a completed application, pays the required fee, and complies with the requirements of this section.

(2) An applicant for a whitewater river outfitter's license shall make application upon a form provided by the department of licensing. The form must be submitted annually and include the following information:

(a) The name, residence address, and residence telephone number, and the business name, address, and telephone number of the applicant;

(b) Certification that all employees, subcontractors, or independent contractors hired as guides meet training standards under RCW 79A.60.430 before carrying any passengers for hire;

(c) Proof that the applicant has liability insurance for a minimum of three hundred thousand dollars per claim for occurrences by the applicant and the applicant's employees that result in bodily injury or property damage. All guides must be covered by the applicant's insurance policy;

(d) Certification that the applicant will maintain the insurance for a period of not less than one year from the date of issuance of the license; and

(e) Certification by the applicant that for a period of not less than twenty-four months immediately preceding the application the applicant:

(i) Has not had a license, permit, or certificate to carry passengers for hire on a river revoked by another state or by an agency of the government of the United States due to a conviction for a violation of safety or insurance coverage requirements no more stringent than the requirements of this chapter; and

(ii) Has not been denied the right to apply for a license, permit, or certificate to carry passengers for hire on a river by another state.

(3) The department of licensing shall charge a fee for each application, to be set in accordance with RCW 43.24.086.

(4) Any person advertising or representing himself or herself as a whitewater river outfitter who is not currently licensed is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(5) The department of licensing shall submit annually a list of licensed persons and companies to the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce, tourism promotion division.

(6) If an insurance company cancels or refuses to renew insurance for a licensee, the insurance company shall notify the department of licensing in writing of the termination of coverage and its effective date not less than thirty days before the effective date of termination.

(a) Upon receipt of an insurance company termination notice, the department of licensing shall send written notice to the licensee that on the effective date of termination the department of licensing will suspend the license unless proof of insurance as required by this section is filed with the department of licensing before the effective date of the termination.

(b) If an insurance company fails to give notice of coverage termination, this failure shall not have the effect of continuing the coverage.

(c) The department of licensing may sanction a license under RCW 18.235.110 if the licensee fails to maintain in full force and effect the insurance required by this section.

(7) The state of Washington shall be immune from any civil action arising from the issuance of a license under this section.

Sec. 2127. RCW 80.36.440 and 2003 c 134 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission and the department may adopt any rules necessary to implement RCW 80.36.410 through 80.36.470.

(2) Rules necessary for the implementation of community service voice mail services shall be made by the commission and the department in consultation with the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce.

Sec. 2128. RCW 80.80.050 and 2007 c 307 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The energy policy division of the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall provide an opportunity for interested parties to comment on the development of a survey of new combined-cycle natural gas thermal electric generation turbines commercially available and offered for sale by manufacturers and purchased in the United States to determine the average rate of emissions of greenhouse gases for these turbines. The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall report the results of its survey to the legislature every five years, beginning June 30, 2013. The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall adopt by rule the average available greenhouse ((gases))gas emissions output every five years beginning five years after July 22, 2007.

Sec. 2129. RCW 80.80.080 and 2007 c 307 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of RCW 80.80.040 through 80.80.080 and 80.70.020, the department, in consultation with the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce energy policy division, the energy facility site evaluation council, the commission, and the governing boards of consumer-owned utilities, shall review the greenhouse ((gases))gas emissions performance standard established in this chapter to determine need, applicability, and effectiveness no less than every five years following July 22, 2007, or upon implementation of a federal or state law or rule regulating carbon dioxide emissions of electric utilities, and report to the legislature.

Sec. 2130. RCW 90.56.280 and 1995 c 399 s 218 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall be the duty of any person discharging oil or hazardous substances or otherwise causing, permitting, or allowing the same to enter the waters of the state, unless the discharge or entry was expressly authorized by the department prior thereto or authorized by operation of law under RCW 90.48.200, to immediately notify the coast guard and the division of emergency management. The notice to the division of emergency management within the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))commerce shall be made to the division's twenty-four hour statewide toll-free number established for reporting emergencies.

PART 3

OTHER PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3001. Section 4, chapter 137, Laws of 2015, section 1, chapter 326, Laws of 2013, and section 2, chapter 291, Laws of 2011 expire June 30, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3002. 2011 1st sp. sess. c 35 s 3 (uncodified) is repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3003. The following sections are decodified:

(1) RCW 28A.300.2851 (School bullying and harassment—Work group);

(2) RCW 28A.300.807 (Task force—Review of federal 2007 race and ethnicity reporting guidelines—Development of state guidelines);

(3) RCW 43.10.300 (Hate crime advisory working group);

(4) RCW 43.280.091 (Statewide coordinating committee on sex trafficking); and

(5) RCW 44.82.010 (Joint select committee on health care oversight).

Sec. 3004. RCW 9.41.280 and 2022 c 106 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for a person to knowingly carry onto, or to possess on, public or private elementary or secondary school premises, school-provided transportation, areas of facilities while being used exclusively by public or private schools, or areas of facilities while being used for official meetings of a school district board of directors:

(a) Any firearm;

(b) Any other dangerous weapon as defined in RCW 9.41.250;

(c) Any device commonly known as "nun-chu-ka sticks," consisting of two or more lengths of wood, metal, plastic, or similar substance connected with wire, rope, or other means;

(d) Any device, commonly known as "throwing stars," which are multipointed, metal objects designed to embed upon impact from any aspect;

(e) Any air gun, including any air pistol or air rifle, designed to propel a BB, pellet, or other projectile by the discharge of compressed air, carbon dioxide, or other gas; or

(f)(i) Any portable device manufactured to function as a weapon and which is commonly known as a stun gun, including a projectile stun gun which projects wired probes that are attached to the device that emit an electrical charge designed to administer to a person or an animal an electric shock, charge, or impulse; or

(ii) Any device, object, or instrument which is used or intended to be used as a weapon with the intent to injure a person by an electric shock, charge, or impulse.

(2)(a) Any such person violating subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) Second and subsequent violations of subsection (1) of this section are a gross misdemeanor.

(c) If any person is convicted of a violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section, the person shall have his or her concealed pistol license, if any revoked for a period of three years. Anyone convicted under this subsection is prohibited from applying for a concealed pistol license for a period of three years. The court shall send notice of the revocation to the department of licensing, and the city, town, or county which issued the license.

Any violation of subsection (1) of this section by elementary or secondary school students constitutes grounds for expulsion from the state's public schools in accordance with RCW 28A.600.010. An appropriate school authority shall promptly notify law enforcement and the student's parent or guardian regarding any allegation or indication of such violation.

Upon the arrest of a person at least twelve years of age and not more than twenty-one years of age for violating subsection (1)(a) of this section, the person shall be detained or confined in a juvenile or adult facility for up to seventy-two hours. The person shall not be released within the seventy-two hours until after the person has been examined and evaluated by the designated crisis responder unless the court in its discretion releases the person sooner after a determination regarding probable cause or on probation bond or bail.

Within twenty-four hours of the arrest, the arresting law enforcement agency shall refer the person to the designated crisis responder for examination and evaluation under chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW and inform a parent or guardian of the person of the arrest, detention, and examination. The designated crisis responder shall examine and evaluate the person subject to the provisions of chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW. The examination shall occur at the facility in which the person is detained or confined. If the person has been released on probation, bond, or bail, the examination shall occur wherever is appropriate.

Upon completion of any examination by the designated crisis responder, the results of the examination shall be sent to the court, and the court shall consider those results in making any determination about the person.

The designated crisis responder shall, to the extent permitted by law, notify a parent or guardian of the person that an examination and evaluation has taken place and the results of the examination. Nothing in this subsection prohibits the delivery of additional, appropriate mental health examinations to the person while the person is detained or confined.

If the designated crisis responder determines it is appropriate, the designated crisis responder may refer the person to the local behavioral health administrative services organization for follow-up services or other community providers for other services to the family and individual.

(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:

(a) Any student or employee of a private military academy when on the property of the academy;

(b) Any person engaged in military, law enforcement, or school district security activities. However, a person who is not a commissioned law enforcement officer and who provides school security services under the direction of a school administrator may not possess a device listed in subsection (1)(f) of this section unless he or she has successfully completed training in the use of such devices that is equivalent to the training received by commissioned law enforcement officers;

(c) Any person who is involved in a convention, showing, demonstration, lecture, or firearms safety course authorized by school authorities in which the firearms of collectors or instructors are handled or displayed;

(d) Any person while the person is participating in a firearms or air gun competition approved by the school or school district;

(e) Any person in possession of a pistol who has been issued a license under RCW 9.41.070, or is exempt from the licensing requirement by RCW 9.41.060, while:

(i) Picking up or dropping off a student; or

(ii) Attending official meetings of a school district board of directors held off school district-owned or leased property;

(f) Any nonstudent at least eighteen years of age legally in possession of a firearm or dangerous weapon that is secured within an attended vehicle or concealed from view within a locked unattended vehicle while conducting legitimate business at the school;

(g) Any nonstudent at least eighteen years of age who is in lawful possession of an unloaded firearm, secured in a vehicle while conducting legitimate business at the school; or

(h) Any law enforcement officer of the federal, state, or local government agency.

(4) Subsections (1)(c) and (d) of this section do not apply to any person who possesses nun-chu-ka sticks, throwing stars, or other dangerous weapons to be used in martial arts classes authorized to be conducted on the school premises.

(5) Subsection (1)(f)(i) of this section does not apply to any person who possesses a device listed in subsection (1)(f)(i) of this section, if the device is possessed and used solely for the purpose approved by a school for use in a school authorized event, lecture, or activity conducted on the school premises.

(6) Except as provided in subsection (3)(b), (c), (f), and (h) of this section, firearms are not permitted in a public or private school building.

(7) "GUN-FREE ZONE" signs shall be posted around school facilities giving warning of the prohibition of the possession of firearms on school grounds.

(8) A school district board of directors must post signs providing notice of the restrictions on possession of firearms and other weapons under this section at facilities being used for official meetings of the school district board of directors.

Sec. 3005. RCW 9.41.284 and 2022 c 106 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, it is unlawful for a person to knowingly carry onto, or to possess in, a ballot counting center, a voting center, a student engagement hub, or the county elections and voter registration office, or areas of facilities while being used as a ballot counting center, a voting center, a student engagement hub, or the county elections and voter registration office:

(a) Any firearm;

(b) Any other dangerous weapon as described in RCW 9.41.250;

(c) Any air gun, including any air pistol or air rifle, designed to propel a BB, pellet, or other projectile by the discharge of compressed air, carbon dioxide, or other gas;

(d)(i) Any portable device manufactured to function as a weapon and which is commonly known as a stun gun, including a projectile stun gun that projects wired probes that are attached to the device that emit an electrical charge designed to administer to a person or an animal an electric shock, charge, or impulse; or

(ii) Any device, object, or instrument that is used or intended to be used as a weapon with the intent to injure a person by an electric shock, charge, or impulse; or

(e) Any spring blade knife as defined in RCW 9.41.250.

(2)(a) A person who violates subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) Second and subsequent violations of this section are a gross misdemeanor.

(c) If a person is convicted of a violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section, the person shall have his or her concealed pistol license, if any, revoked for a period of three years. Anyone convicted under subsection (1)(a) of this section is prohibited from applying for a concealed pistol license for a period of three years from the date of conviction. The court shall order the person to immediately surrender any concealed pistol license, and within three business days notify the department of licensing in writing of the required revocation of any concealed pistol license held by the person. Upon receipt of the notification by the court, the department of licensing shall determine if the person has a concealed pistol license. If the person does have a concealed pistol license, the department of licensing shall immediately notify the license-issuing authority which, upon receipt of the notification, shall immediately revoke the license.

(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:

(a) Any law enforcement officer of a federal, state, or local government agency; or

(b) Any security personnel hired by a county and engaged in security specifically for a counting center, a voting center, a student engagement hub, or the county elections and voter registration office or areas of facilities used for such purposes. However, a person who is not a commissioned law enforcement officer and who provides elections and voter registration security services under the direction of a county may not possess a firearm or device listed in subsection (1)(d) of this section unless he or she has successfully completed training in the use of firearms or such devices that is equivalent to the training received by commissioned law enforcement officers.

(4) Subsection (1) of this section does not prohibit concealed carry of a pistol, by a person licensed to carry a concealed pistol pursuant to RCW 9.41.070, in any voting center, student engagement hub, county elections and voter registration office, or areas of facilities while being used as a voting center, student engagement hub, or county elections and voter registration office. However, no weapon restricted by this section, whether concealed or openly carried, may be possessed in any ballot counting center or areas of facilities while being used as a ballot counting center.

(5) Elections officers and officials must post signs providing notice of the restriction on possession of firearms and other weapons at each counting center, voting center, student engagement hub, or county elections and voter registration office, or areas of facilities while being used as a counting center, a voting center, a student engagement hub, or the county elections and voter registration office.

(6) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Ballot counting center" has the same meaning as "counting center" in RCW 29A.04.019;

(b) "Voting center" means a voting center as described in RCW 29A.40.160; and

(c) "Student engagement hub" means a student engagement hub as described in RCW 29A.40.180.

Sec. 3006. RCW 9.41.305 and 2022 c 106 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Unless exempt under subsection (3) of this section, it is unlawful for any person to knowingly open carry a firearm or other weapon, as defined in RCW 9.41.300(1)(b), while knowingly being in the following locations:

(a) The west state capitol campus grounds; any buildings on the state capitol grounds; any state legislative office; or any location of a public state legislative hearing or meeting during the hearing or meeting; or

(b) City, town, county, or other municipality buildings used in connection with meetings of the governing body of the city, town, county, or other municipality, or any location of a public meeting or hearing of the governing body of a city, town, county, or other municipality during the hearing or meeting.

(2) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Buildings on the state capitol grounds" means the following buildings located on the state capitol grounds, commonly known as Legislative, Temple of Justice, John L. O'Brien, John A. Cherberg, Irving R. Newhouse, Joel M. Pritchard, Helen Sommers, Insurance, Governor's Mansion, Visitor Information Center, Carlyon House, Ayer House, General Administration, 1500 Jefferson, James M. Dolliver, Old Capitol, Capitol Court, State Archives, Natural Resources, Office Building #2, Highway-License, Transportation, Employment Security, Child Care Center, Union Avenue, Washington Street, Professional Arts, State Farm, and Powerhouse Buildings.

(b) "Governing body" has the same meaning as in RCW 42.30.020.

(c) "West state capitol campus grounds" means areas of the campus south of Powerhouse Rd. SW, south of Union Avenue SW as extended westward to Powerhouse Rd. SW, west of Capitol Way, north of 15th Avenue SW between Capitol Way S. and Water Street SW, west of Water Street between 15th Avenue SW and 16th Avenue SW, north of 16th Avenue SW between Water Street SW and the east banks of Capitol Lake, and east of the banks of Capitol Lake.

(3) Duly authorized federal, state, or local law enforcement officers or personnel are exempt from this section when carrying a firearm or other weapon in conformance with their employing agency's policy. Members of the armed forces of the United States or the state of Washington are exempt from this section when carrying a firearm or other weapon in the discharge of official duty or traveling to or from official duty.

(4)(a) A person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) Second and subsequent violations of this section are a gross misdemeanor.

(5) Nothing in this section applies to the lawful concealed carry of a firearm by a person who has a valid concealed pistol license.

(6) A city, town, county, or other municipality must post signs providing notice of the restrictions on possession of firearms and other weapons under this section at any locations specified in subsection (1)(b) of this section.

Sec. 3007. RCW 9A.44.010 and 2020 c 312 s 707 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter:

(1) "Abuse of a supervisory position" means:

(a) To use a direct or indirect threat or promise to exercise authority to the detriment or benefit of a minor; or

(b) To exploit a significant relationship in order to obtain the consent of a minor.

(2) "Consent" means that at the time of the act of sexual intercourse or sexual contact there are actual words or conduct indicating freely given agreement to have sexual intercourse or sexual contact.

(3) "Forcible compulsion" means physical force which overcomes resistance, or a threat, express or implied, that places a person in fear of death or physical injury to herself or himself or another person, or in fear that she or he or another person will be kidnapped.

(4) "Frail elder or vulnerable adult" means a person sixty years of age or older who has the functional, mental, or physical inability to care for himself or herself. "Frail elder or vulnerable adult" also includes a person who has been placed under a guardianship under RCW 11.130.265 or a conservatorship under RCW 11.130.360, a person over eighteen years of age who has a developmental disability under chapter 71A.10 RCW, a person admitted to a long-term care facility that is licensed or required to be licensed under chapter 18.20, 18.51, 72.36, or 70.128 RCW, and a person receiving services from a home health, hospice, or home care agency licensed or required to be licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW.

(5) "Health care provider" for purposes of RCW 9A.44.050 and 9A.44.100 means a person who is, holds himself or herself out to be, or provides services as if he or she were: (a) A member of a health care profession under chapter 18.130 RCW; or (b) registered under chapter 18.19 RCW or licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW, regardless of whether the health care provider is licensed, certified, or registered by the state.

(6) "Married" means one who is legally married to another, but does not include a person who is living separate and apart from his or her spouse and who has filed in an appropriate court for legal separation or for dissolution of his or her marriage.

(7) "Mental incapacity" is that condition existing at the time of the offense which prevents a person from understanding the nature or consequences of the act of sexual intercourse whether that condition is produced by illness, defect, the influence of a substance or from some other cause.

(8) "Person with a ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder" for purposes of RCW 9A.44.050(1)(e) and 9A.44.100(1)(e) means a person ((who is "chemically dependent" as defined in RCW 70.96A.020))with a "substance use disorder" as defined in RCW 71.05.020.

(9) "Person with a developmental disability," for purposes of RCW 9A.44.050(1)(c) and 9A.44.100(1)(c), means a person with a developmental disability as defined in RCW 71A.10.020.

(10) "Person with a mental disorder" for the purposes of RCW 9A.44.050(1)(e) and 9A.44.100(1)(e) means a person with a "mental disorder" as defined in RCW 71.05.020.

(11) "Person with supervisory authority," for purposes of RCW 9A.44.050(1) (c) or (e) and 9A.44.100(1) (c) or (e), means any proprietor or employee of any public or private care or treatment facility who directly supervises developmentally disabled, mentally disordered, or chemically dependent persons at the facility.

(12) "Physically helpless" means a person who is unconscious or for any other reason is physically unable to communicate unwillingness to an act.

(13) "Sexual contact" means any touching of the sexual or other intimate parts of a person done for the purpose of gratifying sexual desire of either party or a third party.

(14) "Sexual intercourse" (a) has its ordinary meaning and occurs upon any penetration, however slight, and

(b) Also means any penetration of the vagina or anus however slight, by an object, when committed on one person by another, whether such persons are of the same or opposite sex, except when such penetration is accomplished for medically recognized treatment or diagnostic purposes, and

(c) Also means any act of sexual contact between persons involving the sex organs of one person and the mouth or anus of another whether such persons are of the same or opposite sex.

(15) "Significant relationship" means a situation in which the perpetrator is:

(a) A person who undertakes the responsibility, professionally or voluntarily, to provide education, health, welfare, or organized recreational activities principally for minors;

(b) A person who in the course of his or her employment supervises minors; or

(c) A person who provides welfare, health or residential assistance, personal care, or organized recreational activities to frail elders or vulnerable adults, including a provider, employee, temporary employee, volunteer, or independent contractor who supplies services to long-term care facilities licensed or required to be licensed under chapter 18.20, 18.51, 72.36, or 70.128 RCW, and home health, hospice, or home care agencies licensed or required to be licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, but not including a consensual sexual partner.

(16) "Treatment" for purposes of RCW 9A.44.050 and 9A.44.100 means the active delivery of professional services by a health care provider which the health care provider holds himself or herself out to be qualified to provide.

Sec. 3008. RCW 9A.44.050 and 2021 c 142 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty of rape in the second degree when, under circumstances not constituting rape in the first degree, the person engages in sexual intercourse with another person:

(a) By forcible compulsion;

(b) When the victim is incapable of consent by reason of being physically helpless or mentally incapacitated;

(c) When the victim is a person with a developmental disability and the perpetrator is a person who:

(i) Has supervisory authority over the victim; or

(ii) Was providing transportation, within the course of his or her employment, to the victim at the time of the offense;

(d) When the perpetrator is a health care provider, the victim is a client or patient, and the sexual intercourse occurs during a treatment session, consultation, interview, or examination. It is an affirmative defense that the defendant must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the client or patient consented to the sexual intercourse with the knowledge that the sexual intercourse was not for the purpose of treatment;

(e) When the victim is a resident of a facility for persons with a mental disorder or ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder and the perpetrator is a person who has supervisory authority over the victim; or

(f) When the victim is a frail elder or vulnerable adult and the perpetrator is a person who:

(i) Has a significant relationship with the victim; or

(ii) Was providing transportation, within the course of his or her employment, to the victim at the time of the offense.

(2) Rape in the second degree is a class A felony.

Sec. 3009. RCW 9A.44.100 and 2021 c 142 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty of indecent liberties when he or she knowingly causes another person to have sexual contact with him or her or another:

(a) By forcible compulsion;

(b) When the other person is incapable of consent by reason of being mentally defective, mentally incapacitated, or physically helpless;

(c) When the victim is a person with a developmental disability and the perpetrator is a person who:

(i) Has supervisory authority over the victim; or

(ii) Was providing transportation, within the course of his or her employment, to the victim at the time of the offense;

(d) When the perpetrator is a health care provider, the victim is a client or patient, and the sexual contact occurs during a treatment session, consultation, interview, or examination. It is an affirmative defense that the defendant must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the client or patient consented to the sexual contact with the knowledge that the sexual contact was not for the purpose of treatment;

(e) When the victim is a resident of a facility for persons with a mental disorder or ((chemical dependency))substance use disorder and the perpetrator is a person who has supervisory authority over the victim; or

(f) When the victim is a frail elder or vulnerable adult and the perpetrator is a person who:

(i) Has a significant relationship with the victim; or

(ii) Was providing transportation, within the course of his or her employment, to the victim at the time of the offense.

(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, indecent liberties is a class B felony.

(b) Indecent liberties by forcible compulsion is a class A felony.

Sec. 3010. RCW 9.94A.838 and 2006 c 122 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In a prosecution for rape in the first degree, rape in the second degree with forcible compulsion, indecent liberties with forcible compulsion, or kidnapping in the first degree with sexual motivation, the prosecuting attorney shall file a special allegation that the victim of the offense was, at the time of the offense, ((developmentally disabled, mentally disordered,))a person with a developmental disability or a mental disorder or a frail elder or vulnerable adult, whenever sufficient admissible evidence exists, which, when considered with the most plausible, reasonably foreseeable defense that could be raised under the evidence, would justify a finding by a reasonable and objective fact finder that the victim was, at the time of the offense, ((developmentally disabled, mentally disordered,))a person with a developmental disability or a mental disorder or a frail elder or vulnerable adult, unless the prosecuting attorney determines, after consulting with a victim, that filing a special allegation under this section is likely to interfere with the ability to obtain a conviction.

(2) Once a special allegation has been made under this section, the state has the burden to prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the victim was, at the time of the offense, ((developmentally disabled, mentally disordered,))a person with a developmental disability or a mental disorder or a frail elder or vulnerable adult. If a jury is had, the jury shall, if it finds the defendant guilty, also find a special verdict as to whether the victim was, at the time of the offense, ((developmentally disabled, mentally disordered,))a person with a developmental disability or a mental disorder or a frail elder or vulnerable adult. If no jury is had, the court shall make a finding of fact as to whether the victim was, at the time of the offense, ((developmentally disabled, mentally disordered,))a person with a developmental disability or a mental disorder or a frail elder or vulnerable adult.

(3) The prosecuting attorney shall not withdraw a special allegation filed under this section without the approval of the court through an order of dismissal of the allegation. The court may not dismiss the special allegation unless it finds that the order is necessary to correct an error in the initial charging decision or that there are evidentiary problems that make proving the special allegation doubtful.

(4) For purposes of this section, (("developmentally disabled," "mentally disordered,"))"person with a developmental disability," "person with a mental disorder," and "frail elder or vulnerable adult" have the same meaning as in RCW 9A.44.010.

Sec. 3011. RCW 9A.44.128 and 2015 c 261 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of RCW 9A.44.130 through 9A.44.145, 10.01.200, 43.43.540, 70.48.470, and 72.09.330, the following definitions apply:

(1) "Business day" means any day other than Saturday, Sunday, or a legal local, state, or federal holiday.

(2) "Conviction" means any adult conviction or juvenile adjudication for a sex offense or kidnapping offense.

(3) "Disqualifying offense" means a conviction for: Any offense that is a felony; a sex offense as defined in this section; a crime against children or persons as defined in RCW 43.43.830(7) and 9.94A.411(2)(a); an offense with a domestic violence designation as provided in RCW 10.99.020; permitting the commercial sexual abuse of a minor as defined in RCW 9.68A.103; or any violation of chapter 9A.88 RCW.

(4) "Employed" or "carries on a vocation" means employment that is full time or part time for a period of time exceeding fourteen days, or for an aggregate period of time exceeding thirty days during any calendar year. A person is employed or carries on a vocation whether the person's employment is financially compensated, volunteered, or for the purpose of government or educational benefit.

(5) "Fixed residence" means a building that a person lawfully and habitually uses as living quarters a majority of the week. Uses as living quarters means to conduct activities consistent with the common understanding of residing, such as sleeping; eating; keeping personal belongings; receiving mail; and paying utilities, rent, or mortgage. A nonpermanent structure including, but not limited to, a motor home, travel trailer, camper, or boat may qualify as a residence provided it is lawfully and habitually used as living quarters a majority of the week, primarily kept at one location with a physical address, and the location it is kept at is either owned or rented by the person or used by the person with the permission of the owner or renter. A shelter program may qualify as a residence provided it is a shelter program designed to provide temporary living accommodations for the homeless, provides an offender with a personally assigned living space, and the offender is permitted to store belongings in the living space.

(6) "In the community" means residing outside of confinement or incarceration for a disqualifying offense.

(7) "Institution of higher education" means any public or private institution dedicated to postsecondary education, including any college, university, community college, trade, or professional school.

(8) "Kidnapping offense" means:

(a) The crimes of kidnapping in the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree, and unlawful imprisonment, as defined in chapter 9A.40 RCW, where the victim is a minor and the offender is not the minor's parent;

(b) Any offense that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit an offense that is classified as a kidnapping offense under this subsection;

(c) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for: An offense for which the person would be required to register as a kidnapping offender if residing in the state of conviction; or, if not required to register in the state of conviction, an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a kidnapping offense under this subsection; and

(d) Any tribal conviction for an offense for which the person would be required to register as a kidnapping offender while residing in the reservation of conviction; or, if not required to register in the reservation of conviction, an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a kidnapping offense under this subsection.

(9) "Lacks a fixed residence" means the person does not have a living situation that meets the definition of a fixed residence and includes, but is not limited to, a shelter program designed to provide temporary living accommodations for the homeless, an outdoor sleeping location, or locations where the person does not have permission to stay.

(10) "Sex offense" means:

(a) Any offense defined as a sex offense by RCW 9.94A.030;

(b) Any violation under RCW 9A.44.096 (sexual misconduct with a minor in the second degree);

(c) Any violation under RCW 9A.40.100(1)(b)(ii) (trafficking);

(d) Any violation under RCW 9.68A.090 (communication with a minor for immoral purposes);

(e) A violation under RCW 9A.88.070 (promoting prostitution in the first degree) or RCW 9A.88.080 (promoting prostitution in the second degree) if the person has a prior conviction for one of these offenses;

(f) Any violation under RCW 9A.40.100(1)(a)(i)(A) (III) or (IV) or (a)(i)(B);

(g) Any gross misdemeanor that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit an offense that is classified as a sex offense under RCW 9.94A.030 or this subsection;

(h) Any out-of-state conviction for an offense for which the person would be required to register as a sex offender while residing in the state of conviction; or, if not required to register in the state of conviction, an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a sex offense under this subsection;

(i) Any federal conviction classified as a sex offense under 34 U.S.C. Sec. 20911 or, prior to September 1, 2017, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 16911 (SORNA);

(j) Any military conviction for a sex offense. This includes sex offenses under the uniform code of military justice, as specified by the United States secretary of defense;

(k) Any conviction in a foreign country for a sex offense if it was obtained with sufficient safeguards for fundamental fairness and due process for the accused under guidelines or regulations established pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 16912;

(l) Any tribal conviction for an offense for which the person would be required to register as a sex offender while residing in the reservation of conviction; or, if not required to register in the reservation of conviction, an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a sex offense under this subsection.

(11) "School" means a public or private school regulated under Title 28A RCW or chapter 72.40 RCW.

(12) "Student" means a person who is enrolled, on a full-time or part-time basis, in any school or institution of higher education.

Sec. 3012. RCW 9A.72.160 and 1985 c 327 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty of intimidating a judge if a person directs a threat to a judge because of a ruling or decision of the judge in any official proceeding, or if by use of a threat directed to a judge, a person attempts to influence a ruling or decision of the judge in any official proceeding.

(2) "Threat" as used in this section means:

(a) To communicate, directly or indirectly, the intent immediately to use force against any person who is present at the time; or

(b) Threats as defined in RCW 9A.04.110(((25)))(28).

(3) Intimidating a judge is a class B felony.

Sec. 3013. RCW 10.31.115 and 2021 c 311 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For all individuals who otherwise would be subject to arrest for possession of a counterfeit substance under RCW 69.50.4011, possession of a controlled substance under RCW 69.50.4013, possession of 40 grams or less of ((marijuana))cannabis under RCW 69.50.4014, or possession of a legend drug under RCW 69.41.030(2)(b), in lieu of jail booking and referral to the prosecutor, law enforcement shall offer a referral to assessment and services available pursuant to RCW 10.31.110 or other program or entity responsible for receiving referrals in lieu of legal system involvement, which may include the recovery navigator program established under RCW 71.24.115.

(2) If law enforcement agency records reflect that an individual has been diverted to referral for assessment and services twice or more previously, officers may, but are not required to, make additional diversion efforts.

(3) Nothing in this section precludes prosecutors from diverting or declining to file any charges for possession offenses that are referred under RCW 69.50.4011, 69.50.4013, 69.50.4014, or 69.41.030(2)(b) in the exercise of their discretion.

Sec. 3014. RCW 43.20A.715 and 2021 c 219 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Where the department is required to screen a long-term care worker, contracted provider, or licensee through a background check to determine whether the person has a history that would disqualify the person from having unsupervised access to, working with, or providing supervision, care, or treatment to vulnerable adults or children, the department may not automatically disqualify a person on the basis of a criminal record that includes a conviction of any of the following crimes once the specified amount of time has passed for the particular crime:

(a) Selling ((marijuana))cannabis to a person under RCW 69.50.401 after three years or more have passed between the most recent conviction and the date the background check is processed;

(b) Theft in the first degree under RCW 9A.56.030 after 10 years or more have passed between the most recent conviction and the date the background check is processed;

(c) Robbery in the second degree under RCW 9A.56.210 after five years or more have passed between the most recent conviction and the date the background check is processed;

(d) Extortion in the second degree under RCW 9A.56.130 after five years or more have passed between the most recent conviction and the date the background check is processed;

(e) Assault in the second degree under RCW 9A.36.021 after five years or more have passed between the most recent conviction and the date the background check is processed; and

(f) Assault in the third degree under RCW 9A.36.031 after five years or more have passed between the most recent conviction and the date the background check is processed.

(2) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section do not apply where the department is performing background checks for the department of children, youth, and families.

(3) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section do not apply to department employees or applicants for department positions except for positions in the state-operated community residential program.

(4) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, a long-term care worker, contracted provider, or licensee may not provide, or be paid to provide, care to children or vulnerable adults under the medicare or medicaid programs if the worker is excluded from participating in those programs by federal law.

(5) The department, a contracted provider, or a licensee, when conducting a character, competence, and suitability review for the purpose of hiring, licensing, certifying, contracting with, permitting, or continuing to permit a person to be employed in any position caring for or having unsupervised access to vulnerable adults or children, may, in its sole discretion, determine whether to consider any of the convictions identified in subsection (1) of this section. If the department or a consumer directed employer as defined in RCW 74.39A.009 determines that an individual with any of the convictions identified in subsection (1) of this section is qualified to provide services to a department client as an individual provider as defined in RCW 74.39A.240, the department or the consumer directed employer must provide the client, and their guardian if any, with the results of the state background check for their determination of character, suitability, and competence of the individual before the individual begins providing services. The department, a contracted provider, or a licensee, when conducting a character, competence, and suitability review for the purpose of hiring, licensing, certifying, contracting with, permitting, or continuing to permit a person to be employed in any position caring for or having unsupervised access to vulnerable adults or children, has a rebuttable presumption that its exercise of discretion under this section or the refusal to exercise such discretion was appropriate. This subsection does not create a duty for the department to conduct a character, competence, and suitability review.

(6) For the purposes of the section:

(a) "Contracted provider" means a provider, and its employees, contracted with the department or an area agency on aging to provide services to department clients under programs under chapter 74.09, 74.39, 74.39A, or 71A.12 RCW. "Contracted provider" includes area agencies on aging and their subcontractors who provide case management.

(b) "Licensee" means a nonstate facility or setting that is licensed or certified, or has applied to be licensed or certified, by the department and includes the licensee and its employees.

Sec. 3015. RCW 82.04.758 and 2022 c 119 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This chapter does not apply to any:

(a) Person performing custom farming services for a farmer, when the person performing the custom farming services is: (i) An eligible farmer; or (ii) at least 50 percent owned by an eligible farmer; or

(b) Person performing farm management services, contract labor services, services provided with respect to animals that are agricultural products, or any combination of these services, for a farmer or for a person performing custom farming services, when the person performing the farm management services, contract labor services, services with respect to animals, or any combination of these services, and the farmer or person performing custom farming services are related.

(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a)(i) "Custom farming services" means the performance of specific farming operations through the use of any farm machinery or equipment, farm implement, or draft animal, together with an operator, when: (A) The specific farming operation consists of activities directly related to the growing, raising, or producing of any agricultural product to be sold or consumed by a farmer; and (B) the performance of the specific farming operation is for, and under a contract with, or the direction or supervision of, a farmer. "Custom farming services" does not include the custom application of fertilizers, chemicals, or biologicals, or any services related to the growing, raising, or producing of ((marijuana))cannabis.

(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (2)(a), "specific farming operation" includes specific planting, cultivating, or harvesting activities, or similar specific farming operations. The term does not include veterinary services as defined in RCW 18.92.010; farrier, boarding, training, or appraisal services; artificial insemination or stud services, or agricultural consulting services; packing or processing of agricultural products; or pumping or other waste disposal services.

(b) "Eligible farmer" means a person who is eligible for an exemption certificate under RCW 82.08.855 at the time that the custom farming services are rendered, regardless of whether the person has applied for an exemption certificate under RCW 82.08.855.

(c) "Farm management services" means the consultative decisions made for the operations of the farm including, but not limited to, determining which crops to plant, the choice and timing of application of fertilizers and chemicals, the horticultural practices to apply, the marketing of crops and livestock, and the care and feeding of animals. "Farm management services" does not include any services related to the growing, raising, or producing of ((marijuana))cannabis.

(d) "Related" means having any of the relationships specifically described in section 267(b) (1), (2), and (4) through (13) of the internal revenue code, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2007.

Sec. 3016. RCW 43.41.425 and 2022 c 248 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The office shall:

(a) Develop a program for state agencies to certify employment for the purposes of the public service loan forgiveness program by July 1, 2023.

(b) Assist the student loan advocate in creating and distributing materials designed to increase awareness of the public service loan forgiveness program set forth in ((section 1 of this act))RCW 28B.77.009.

(c) Collaborate with the student achievement council, the employment security department, the department of retirement systems, nonprofit entities, local government representatives, and other public service employers in developing a statewide initiative to improve access and remove barriers to the public service loan forgiveness program for all public service employees. The program established for state agencies in this section and the certification process in RCW 41.04.045 may be considered in the development of the initiative. A plan for a statewide initiative must be developed and submitted to the higher education committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036.

(2) For purposes of this section, the definitions in this subsection apply:

(a) "Certifying employment" means either completing the employer sections of the public service loan forgiveness form or sharing data directly with the United States department of education that corresponds to the information required for the public service loan forgiveness form, as allowed by the United States department of education.

(b) "Public service employer" includes the following:

(i) Any governmental entity including state, county, city, or other local government entity including political subdivisions, such as office, department, independent agency, school district, public college or university system, public library system, authority, or other body including the legislature and the judiciary;

(ii) Any employer that has received designation as a tax-exempt organization pursuant to Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as amended;

(iii) Any other entities identified as a public service job in Title 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1087e(m).

(c) "Public service loan forgiveness program" means the federal loan forgiveness program established pursuant to Title 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1087e(m) and 34 C.F.R. Sec. 685.219.

(d) "State agency" or "agency" means departments, offices, agencies, or institutions of state government, the legislature, institutions of higher education, school districts, and educational service districts.

Sec. 3017. RCW 64.38.110 and 2021 c 227 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision in the governing documents, notice to the association of ((apartment))lot owners, board, or any ((apartment))lot owner or occupant of ((an apartment))a lot under this chapter shall be in writing and shall be provided to the recipient by personal delivery, public or private mail or delivery service, or by electronic transmission as provided in this section: PROVIDED, That if this chapter requires different or additional notice requirements for particular circumstances, those requirements shall apply.

(2) Notice in a tangible medium shall be provided as follows:

(a) Notice to the association or board shall be addressed to the association's registered agent at its registered office, to the association at its principal office shown in its most recent annual report, or to an address provided by the association to the ((apartment))lot owners.

(b) Notice to a lot owner or occupant shall be addressed to the lot address unless the owner has requested, in a writing delivered to the association, that notices be sent to an alternate address.

(3) Notice in an electronic transmission shall be provided as follows:

(a) Notice to the association, the board, or lot owners by electronic transmission is effective only upon those who have consented, in writing, to receive electronically transmitted notices under this chapter and have designated the address, location, or system to which such notices may be electronically transmitted, provided that such notice otherwise complies with any other requirements of this chapter and applicable law.

(b) Notice under this subsection includes any materials that accompany the notice.

(c) Owners who have consented to receipt of electronically transmitted notices may revoke this consent by delivering a revocation to the association in writing.

(d) The consent of any lot owner is revoked if the association is unable to electronically transmit two consecutive notices and this inability becomes known to the secretary of the association of ((apartment))lot owners or any other person responsible for giving the notice. The inadvertent failure by the association of ((apartment))lot owners to treat this inability as a revocation does not invalidate any meeting or other action.

(e) Notice to lot owners who have consented to receipt of electronically transmitted notices may be provided by posting the notice on an electronic network and delivering to the owner separate notice of the posting, together with comprehensible instructions regarding how to obtain access to the posting on the electronic network.

(4) Notice is effective as follows:

(a) Notice provided in a tangible medium is effective as of the date of hand delivery, deposit with the carrier, or when sent by fax.

(b) Notice provided in an electronic transmission is effective as of the date it:

(i) Is electronically transmitted to an address, location, or system designated by the recipient for that purpose; or

(ii) Has been posted on an electronic network and separate notice of the posting has been sent to the recipient containing instructions regarding how to obtain access to the posting on the electronic network.

(5) The ineffectiveness of a good faith effort to deliver notice by an authorized means does not invalidate action taken at or without a meeting.

(6) This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal electronic signatures in global and national commerce act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001(c) or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7003(b).

Sec. 3018. RCW 72.01.412 and 2021 c 206 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person in the custody of the department of children, youth, and families under RCW 72.01.410 is eligible for community transition services under the authority and supervision of the department of children, youth, and families:

(a) After the person's 25th birthday:

(i) If the person's earned release date is after the person's 25th birthday but on or before the person's 26th birthday; and

(ii) The department of children, youth, and families determines that placement in community transition services is in the best interests of the person and the community; or

(b) After 60 percent of their term of confinement has been served, and no less than 15 weeks of total confinement served including time spent in detention prior to sentencing or the entry of a dispositional order if:

(i) The person has an earned release date that is before their 26th birthday; and

(ii) The department of children, youth, and families determines that such placement and retention by the department of children, youth, and families is in the best interests of the person and the community.

(2) "Term of confinement" as used in subsection (((1)(a) [(1)(b)]))(1)(b) of this section means the term of confinement ordered, reduced by the total amount of earned time eligible for the offense.

(3) The department's determination under subsection (1)(a)(ii) and (b)(ii) of this section must include consideration of the person's behavior while in confinement and any disciplinary considerations.

(4) The department of children, youth, and families retains the authority to transfer the person to the custody of the department of corrections under RCW 72.01.410.

(5) A person may only be placed in community transition services under this section for the remaining 18 months of their term of confinement.

(6) A person placed in community transition services under this section must have access to appropriate treatment and programming as determined by the department of children, youth, and families, including but not limited to:

(a) Behavioral health treatment;

(b) Independent living;

(c) Employment;

(d) Education;

(e) Connections to family and natural supports; and

(f) Community connections.

(7) If the person has a sentence that includes a term of community custody, this term of community custody must begin after the current term of confinement has ended.

(8) If a person placed on community transition services under this section commits a violation requiring the return of the person to total confinement after the person's 25th birthday, the person must be transferred to the custody and supervision of the department of corrections for the remainder of the sentence.

(9) The following persons are not eligible for community transition services under this section:

(a) Persons with pending charges or warrants;

(b) Persons who will be transferred to the department of corrections, who are in the custody of the department of corrections, or who are under the supervision of the department of corrections;

(c) Persons who were adjudicated or convicted of the crime of murder in the first or second degree;

(d) Persons who meet the definition of a "persistent offender" as defined under RCW 9.94A.030;

(e) Level III sex offenders; and

(f) Persons requiring out-of-state placement.

(10) As used in this section, "community transition services" means a therapeutic and supportive community-based custody option in which:

(a) A person serves a portion of his or her term of confinement residing in the community, outside of the department of children, youth, and families institutions and community facilities;

(b) The department of children, youth, and families supervises the person in part through the use of technology that is capable of determining or identifying the monitored person's presence or absence at a particular location;

(c) The department of children, youth, and families provides access to developmentally appropriate, trauma-informed, racial equity-based, and culturally relevant programs to promote successful reentry; and

(d) The department of children, youth, and families prioritizes the delivery of available programming from individuals who share characteristics with the individual being served related to: Race; ethnicity; sexual identity; and gender identity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3019. Section 3018 of this act takes effect when section 2, chapter 206, Laws of 2021 takes effect.

Sec. 3020. RCW 88.02.620 and 2021 c 150 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A vessel owner who is a nonresident person must obtain a nonresident vessel permit on or before the sixty-first day of use in Washington state if the vessel:

(a) Is currently registered or numbered under the laws of the state or ((county [country]))country of principal operation, has been issued a valid number under federal law, or has a valid United States customs service cruising license issued under 19 C.F.R. Sec. 4.94; and

(b) Has been brought into Washington state for not more than six months in any continuous twelve-month period, and is used:

(i) For personal use; or

(ii) For the purposes of chartering a vessel with a captain or crew, as long as individual charters are for at least three or more consecutive days in duration. The permit also applies for the purposes of necessary transit to or from the start or end point of such a charter, but that transit time is not counted toward the duration of the charter.

(2) In addition to the requirements in subsection (1) of this section, a nonresident vessel owner that is not a natural person, or a nonresident vessel owner who is a natural person who intends to charter the vessel with a captain or crew as provided in subsection (1)(b)(ii) of this section, may only obtain a nonresident vessel permit if:

(a) The vessel is at least thirty feet in length, but no more than two hundred feet in length;

(b) No Washington state resident owns the vessel or is a principal, as defined in RCW 82.32.865, of the nonresident person which owns the vessel; and

(c) The department of revenue has provided the nonresident vessel owner written approval authorizing the permit as provided in RCW 82.32.865.

(3) A nonresident vessel permit:

(a) May be obtained from the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director;

(b) Must show the date the vessel first came into Washington state; and

(c) Is valid for two months.

(4) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director must collect the fee required in RCW 88.02.640(1)(i) when issuing nonresident vessel permits.

(5) A nonresident vessel permit is not required under this section if the vessel is used in conducting temporary business activity within Washington state.

(6) For any permits issued under this section to a nonresident vessel owner that is not a natural person, or for any permits issued to a natural person who intends to charter the vessel with a captain or crew as provided in subsection (1)(b)(ii) of this section, the department must maintain a record of the following information and provide it to the department of revenue quarterly or as otherwise mutually agreed to by the department and department of revenue:

(a) The name of the record owner of the vessel;

(b) The vessel's hull identification number;

(c) The amount of the fee paid under RCW 88.02.640(5);

(d) The date the vessel first entered the waters of this state;

(e) The expiration date for the permit; and

(f) Any other information mutually agreed to by the department and department of revenue.

(7) The department must adopt rules to implement this section, including rules on issuing and displaying the nonresident vessel permit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3021. Section 3020 of this act expires January 1, 2029.

--- END ---