BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 64.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise prohibited by law, and subject to the limitations in subsection (2) of this section, an association of apartment owners may:

(a) Require any apartment owner intending to lease the owner's apartment to use a tenant screening service or obtain background information, including criminal history, on a prospective tenant, at the owner's sole cost and expense, prior to the owner entering into a lease agreement with a prospective tenant; and

(b) Require proof that the tenant screening requirement has been fulfilled or that the background information on a prospective tenant has been obtained by the owner intending to lease the owner's apartment.

(2) An association may not require that a copy of the tenant screening report or any background information pertaining to a tenant be furnished to the association.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 64.34 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise prohibited by law, and subject to the limitations in subsection (2) of this section, a unit owners' association may:

(a) Require any unit owner intending to lease the owner's unit to use a tenant screening service or obtain background information, including criminal history, on a prospective tenant, at the owner's sole cost and expense, prior to the owner entering into a lease agreement with a prospective tenant; and

(b) Require proof that the tenant screening requirement has been fulfilled or that the background information on a prospective tenant has been obtained by the owner intending to lease the owner's unit.

(2) An association may not require that a copy of the tenant screening report or any background information pertaining to a tenant be furnished to the association.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise prohibited by law, and subject to the limitations in subsection (2) of this section, a homeowners' association may:

(a) Require any lot owner intending to lease the owner's lot to use a tenant screening service or obtain background information, including criminal history, on a prospective tenant, at the owner's sole cost and expense, prior to the owner entering into a lease agreement with a prospective tenant; and

(b) Require proof that the tenant screening requirement has been fulfilled or that the background information on a prospective tenant has been obtained by the owner intending to lease the owner's lot.

(2) An association may not require that a copy of the tenant screening report or any background information pertaining to a tenant be furnished to the association.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 64.90 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise prohibited by law, and subject to the limitations in subsection (2) of this section, a unit owners association may:

(a) Require any unit owner intending to lease the owner's unit to use a tenant screening service or obtain background information, including criminal history, on a prospective tenant, at the owner's sole cost and expense, prior to the owner entering into a lease agreement with a prospective tenant; and

(b) Require proof that the tenant screening requirement has been fulfilled or that the background information on a prospective tenant has been obtained by the owner intending to lease the owner's unit.

(2) An association may not require that a copy of the tenant screening report or any background information pertaining to a tenant be furnished to the association.

--- END ---