BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 10.05.010 and 2019 c 263 s 701 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In a court of limited jurisdiction a person charged with a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor may petition the court to be considered for a deferred prosecution ((program)). The petition shall be filed with the court at least seven days before the date set for trial but, upon a written motion and affidavit establishing good cause for the delay and failure to comply with this section, the court may waive this requirement subject to the defendant's reimbursement to the court of the witness fees and expenses due for subpoenaed witnesses who have appeared on the date set for trial. A person charged with a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor shall not be eligible for a deferred prosecution unless the court makes specific findings pursuant to RCW 10.05.020.

(2) A person charged with a ((traffic infraction, misdemeanor, or gross misdemeanor under Title 46 RCW, or a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor domestic violence offense,))violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 shall not be eligible for a deferred prosecution ((program)) unless the court makes specific findings pursuant to RCW 10.05.020. A person ((may not participate in a deferred prosecution program for a traffic infraction, misdemeanor, or gross misdemeanor under Title 46 RCW if he or she has participated in a deferred prosecution program for a prior traffic infraction, misdemeanor, or gross misdemeanor under Title 46 RCW, and a person may not participate in a deferred prosecution program for a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor domestic violence offense if he or she has participated in a deferred prosecution program for a prior domestic violence offense))who petitions the court for the deferred prosecution and participates in the deferred prosecution under this chapter for his or her first violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 is eligible to petition the court for a second deferred prosecution for the person's next violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 when the person is assessed as eligible for treatment pursuant to RCW 10.05.020(1), specific findings are made pursuant to RCW 10.05.020(4), and the person has no prior out-of-state convictions defined as a "prior offense" under RCW 46.61.5055. Separate offenses committed more than seven days apart may not be consolidated in a single program.

(3) A person charged with a misdemeanor or a gross misdemeanor under chapter 9A.42 RCW shall not be eligible for a deferred prosecution ((program)) unless the court makes specific findings pursuant to RCW 10.05.020. Such person shall not be eligible for a deferred prosecution ((program)) more than once.

(4) A person is not eligible for a deferred prosecution ((program)) if the misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor domestic violence offense was originally charged as a felony offense in superior court.

(5) A person may petition a court for a second deferred prosecution while still under the jurisdiction of a court for the person's first deferred prosecution; however, the first deferred prosecution shall be revoked prior to the entry of the second deferred prosecution.

(6) A person may not be on two deferred prosecutions at the same time unless separate offenses are committed within seven days of each other and the person petitions to consolidate each offense into a single deferred prosecution.

(7) A person charged with a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor for a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 who does not participate in a deferred prosecution for his or her first violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 remains eligible to petition the court for a deferred prosecution pursuant to the terms of this section and specific findings made under RCW 10.05.020. Such person shall not be eligible for a deferred prosecution more than once.

Sec. 2. RCW 10.05.015 and 2019 c 263 s 702 are each amended to read as follows:

At the time of arraignment a person charged with a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor domestic violence offense may be given a statement by the court that explains the availability, operation, and effects of the deferred prosecution ((program)).

Sec. 3. RCW 10.05.020 and 2021 c 215 s 115 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the petitioner shall allege under oath in the petition that the wrongful conduct charged is the result of or caused by substance use disorders or mental ((problems))health disorders or domestic violence behavior problems for which the person is in need of treatment and unless treated the probability of future recurrence is great, along with a statement that the person agrees to pay the cost of a diagnosis and treatment of the alleged problem or problems if financially able to do so. The petition shall also contain a case history and written assessment prepared by an approved ((substance use disorder treatment program))behavioral health agency, approved for mental health services or substance use disorder services, as designated in chapter 71.24 RCW ((if the petition alleges a substance use disorder, by an approved mental health center if the petition alleges a mental problem,)) or by a state-certified domestic violence treatment provider pursuant to RCW 43.20A.735 ((if the petition alleges a domestic violence behavior problem)).

(2) In the case of a petitioner charged with a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor under chapter 9A.42 RCW, the petitioner shall allege under oath in the petition that the petitioner is the natural or adoptive parent of the alleged victim; that the wrongful conduct charged is the result of parenting problems for which the petitioner is in need of services; that the petitioner is in need of child welfare services under chapter 74.13 RCW to improve his or her parenting skills in order to better provide his or her child or children with the basic necessities of life; that the petitioner wants to correct his or her conduct to reduce the likelihood of harm to his or her minor children; that in the absence of child welfare services the petitioner may be unable to reduce the likelihood of harm to his or her minor children; and that the petitioner has cooperated with the department of ((social and health services))children, youth, and families to develop a plan to receive appropriate child welfare services; along with a statement that the person agrees to pay the cost of the services if he or she is financially able to do so. The petition shall also contain a case history and a written service plan from the department of ((social and health services))children, youth, and families.

(3) Before entry of an order deferring prosecution, a petitioner shall be advised of his or her rights as an accused and execute, as a condition of receiving treatment, a statement that contains: (a) An acknowledgment of his or her rights; (b) an acknowledgment and waiver of the right to testify, the right to a speedy trial, the right to call witnesses to testify, the right to present evidence in his or her defense, and the right to a jury trial; (c) a stipulation to the admissibility and sufficiency of the facts contained in the written police report; and (d) an acknowledgment that the statement will be entered and used to support a finding of guilty if the court finds cause to revoke the order granting deferred prosecution. The petitioner shall also be advised that he or she may, if he or she proceeds to trial and is found guilty, be allowed to seek suspension of some or all of the fines and incarceration that may be ordered upon the condition that he or she seek treatment and, further, that he or she may seek treatment from public and private agencies at any time without regard to whether or not he or she is found guilty of the offense charged. He or she shall also be advised that the court will not accept a petition for deferred prosecution from a person who: (i) Sincerely believes that he or she is innocent of the charges; (ii) sincerely believes that he or she does not, in fact, suffer from ((alcoholism, drug addiction, mental problems))a substance use disorder, a mental health disorder, or domestic violence behavior problems; or (iii) in the case of a petitioner charged under chapter 9A.42 RCW, sincerely believes that he or she does not need child welfare services.

(4) Before entering an order deferring prosecution, the court shall make specific findings that: (a) The petitioner has stipulated to the admissibility and sufficiency of the facts as contained in the written police report; (b) the petitioner has acknowledged the admissibility of the stipulated facts in any criminal hearing on the underlying offense or offenses held subsequent to revocation of the order granting deferred prosecution; (c) the petitioner has acknowledged and waived the right to testify, the right to a speedy trial, the right to call witnesses to testify, the right to present evidence in his or her defense, and the right to a jury trial; and (d) the petitioner's statements were made knowingly and voluntarily. Such findings shall be included in the order granting deferred prosecution.

Sec. 4. RCW 10.05.030 and 2021 c 215 s 116 are each amended to read as follows:

The arraigning judge upon consideration of the petition and with the concurrence of the prosecuting attorney may continue the arraignment and refer such person for a diagnostic investigation and evaluation to:

(1) ((An approved substance use disorder treatment program))A state-approved behavioral health agency, approved for substance use disorder services, as designated in chapter 71.24 RCW if the petition alleges a substance use disorder;

(2) ((An approved mental health center))A state-approved behavioral health agency, approved for mental health services, as designated in chapter 71.24 RCW, if the petition alleges a mental ((problem))health disorder;

(3) The department of ((social and health services))children, youth, and families if the petition is brought under RCW 10.05.020(2); or

(4) An approved state-certified domestic violence treatment provider pursuant to RCW 43.20A.735 if the petition alleges a domestic violence behavior problem.

Sec. 5. RCW 10.05.040 and 2018 c 201 s 9005 are each amended to read as follows:

The program to which such person is referred, or the department of ((social and health services))children, youth, and families if the petition is brought under RCW 10.05.020(2), shall conduct an investigation and examination to determine:

(1) Whether the person suffers from the problem described;

(2) Whether the problem is such that if not treated, or if no child welfare services are provided, there is a probability that similar misconduct will occur in the future;

(3) Whether extensive and long term treatment is required;

(4) Whether effective treatment or child welfare services for the person's problem are available; and

(5) Whether the person is ((amenable)): (a) Amenable to treatment as demonstrated by (i) completion of residential treatment; (ii) completion of a minimum of 18 hours of intensive outpatient treatment, for substance use disorder petitions; (iii) completion of a minimum of six mental health sessions, for mental health disorder petitions; or (iv) completion of a minimum of six domestic violence treatment sessions for domestic violence petitions; or (b) willing to cooperate with child welfare services. The requirement for completing a minimum number of sessions may be waived if the court finds good cause.

Sec. 6. RCW 10.05.050 and 2018 c 201 s 9006 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The program, or the department of ((social and health services))children, youth, and families if the petition is brought under RCW 10.05.020(2), shall make a written report to the court stating its findings and recommendations after the examination required by RCW 10.05.040. If its findings and recommendations support treatment or the implementation of a child welfare service plan, it shall also recommend a treatment or service plan setting out:

(a) The type;

(b) Nature;

(c) Length;

(d) A treatment or service time schedule; and

(e) Approximate cost of the treatment or child welfare services.

(2) In the case of a child welfare service plan, the plan shall be designed in a manner so that a parent who successfully completes the plan will not be likely to withhold the basic necessities of life from his or her child.

(3) The report with the treatment or service plan shall be filed with the court and a copy given to the petitioner and petitioner's counsel. A copy of the treatment or service plan shall be given to the prosecutor by petitioner's counsel at the request of the prosecutor. The evaluation facility, or the department of ((social and health services))children, youth, and families if the petition is brought under RCW 10.05.020(2), making the written report shall append to the report a commitment by the treatment program or the department of ((social and health services))children, youth, and families that it will provide the treatment or child welfare services in accordance with this chapter. The facility or the service provider shall agree to provide the court with a statement ((every three months for the first year and every six months for the second year))monthly regarding (a) the petitioner's cooperation with the treatment or child welfare service plan proposed and (b) the petitioner's progress or failure in treatment or child welfare services. These statements shall be made as a declaration by the person who is personally responsible for providing the treatment or services.

Sec. 7. RCW 10.05.060 and 2009 c 135 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

If the report recommends treatment, the court shall examine the treatment plan. If it approves the plan and the petitioner agrees to comply with its terms and conditions and agrees to pay the cost thereof, if able to do so, or arrange for the treatment, an entry shall be made upon the person's court docket showing that the person has been accepted for deferred prosecution. A copy of the treatment plan shall be filed with the court. If the charge be one that an abstract of the docket showing the charge, the date of the violation for which the charge was made, and the date of petitioner's acceptance is required to be sent to the department of licensing, an abstract shall be sent, and the department of licensing shall make an entry of the charge and of the petitioner's acceptance for deferred prosecution on the department's driving record of the petitioner. The entry is not a conviction for purposes of Title 46 RCW. Upon receipt of the abstract of the docket, the department shall issue the petitioner a probationary license in accordance with RCW 46.20.355, and the petitioner's driver's license shall be on probationary status for five years from the date of the violation that gave rise to the charge. The department shall maintain the record ((for ten years from date of entry of the order granting deferred prosecution))consistent with the requirements of RCW 46.01.260.

Sec. 8. RCW 10.05.090 and 2010 c 269 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

If a petitioner, who has been accepted for a deferred prosecution, fails or neglects to carry out and fulfill any term or condition of the petitioner's treatment plan or any term or condition imposed in connection with the installation of an interlock or other device under RCW 46.20.720, the facility, center, institution, or agency administering the treatment or the entity administering the use of the device, shall immediately report such breach to the court, the prosecutor, and the petitioner or petitioner's attorney of record, together with its recommendation. The court upon receiving such a report shall hold a hearing to determine whether the petitioner should be removed from the deferred prosecution ((program)). At the hearing, evidence shall be taken of the petitioner's alleged failure to comply with the treatment plan or device installation and the petitioner shall have the right to present evidence on his or her own behalf. The court shall either order that the petitioner continue on the treatment plan or be removed from deferred prosecution. If removed from deferred prosecution, the court shall enter judgment pursuant to RCW 10.05.020 and, if the charge for which the deferred prosecution was granted was a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor under Title 46 RCW, shall notify the department of licensing of the removal and entry of judgment.

Sec. 9. RCW 10.05.100 and 1998 c 208 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

If a petitioner is subsequently convicted of a similar offense that was committed while the petitioner was in a deferred prosecution ((program)), upon notice the court shall remove the petitioner's docket from the deferred prosecution file and the court shall enter judgment pursuant to RCW 10.05.020.

Sec. 10. RCW 10.05.120 and 2019 c 263 s 705 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Three years after receiving proof of successful completion of the ((two-year))approved treatment ((program))plan, and following proof to the court that the petitioner has complied with the conditions imposed by the court following successful completion of the ((two-year))approved treatment ((program))plan, but not before five years following entry of the order of deferred prosecution pursuant to a petition brought under RCW 10.05.020(1), the court shall dismiss the charges pending against the petitioner.

(2) When a deferred prosecution is ordered pursuant to a petition brought under RCW 10.05.020(2) and the court has received proof that the petitioner has successfully completed the child welfare service plan, or the plan has been terminated because the alleged victim has reached his or her majority and there are no other minor children in the home, the court shall dismiss the charges pending against the petitioner: PROVIDED, That in any case where the petitioner's parental rights have been terminated with regard to the alleged victim due to abuse or neglect that occurred during the pendency of the deferred prosecution, the termination shall be per se evidence that the petitioner did not successfully complete the child welfare service plan.

(((3) When a deferred prosecution is ordered for a petition brought under RCW 10.05.020(1) involving a domestic violence behavior problem and the court has received proof that the petitioner has successfully completed the domestic violence treatment plan, the court shall dismiss the charges pending against the petitioner.))

Sec. 11. RCW 10.05.140 and 2019 c 263 s 706 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As a condition of granting a deferred prosecution petition for a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the court shall order that the petitioner shall not operate a motor vehicle upon the public highways without a valid operator's license and proof of liability insurance. The amount of liability insurance shall be established by the court at not less than that established by RCW 46.29.490. As a condition of granting a deferred prosecution petition on any ((alcohol-dependency))substance use disorder-based case, the court shall also order the installation of an ignition interlock under RCW 46.20.720. The required periods of use of the interlock shall be not less than the periods provided for in RCW 46.20.720. As a condition of granting a deferred prosecution petition, the court may order the petitioner to make restitution and to pay costs as defined in RCW 10.01.160. To help ensure continued sobriety and reduce the likelihood of reoffense, the court may order reasonable conditions during the period of the deferred prosecution including, but not limited to, attendance at self-help recovery support groups for ((alcoholism or drugs))substance use disorder, complete abstinence from alcohol and all nonprescribed mind-altering drugs, periodic urinalysis or breath analysis, and maintaining law-abiding behavior. The court may terminate the deferred prosecution ((program)) upon violation of the deferred prosecution order.

(2) As a condition of granting a deferred prosecution petition for a case involving a domestic violence behavior problem:

(a) The court shall order the petitioner not to possess firearms and order the petitioner to surrender firearms under RCW 9.41.800; and

(b) The court may order the petitioner to make restitution and to pay costs as defined in RCW 10.01.160. In addition, to help ensure continued sobriety and reduce the likelihood of reoffense in co-occurring domestic violence and substance ((abuse))use disorder or mental health disorder cases, the court may order reasonable conditions during the period of the deferred prosecution including, but not limited to, attendance at self-help recovery support groups for ((alcoholism or drugs))substance use disorder, complete abstinence from alcohol and all nonprescribed mind-altering drugs, periodic urinalysis or breath analysis, and maintaining law-abiding behavior. The court may terminate the deferred prosecution ((program)) upon violation of the deferred prosecution order.

Sec. 12. RCW 10.05.150 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 527 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A deferred prosecution ((program)) for ((alcoholism))either substance use disorder or mental health co-occurring disorder shall be for a two-year period and shall include, but not be limited to, the following requirements:

(((1)))(a) Total abstinence from alcohol and all other nonprescribed mind-altering drugs;

(((2) Participation in an intensive inpatient or intensive outpatient program in a state-approved substance use disorder treatment program;

(3) Participation in a minimum of two meetings per week of an alcoholism self-help recovery support group, as determined by the assessing agency, for the duration of the treatment program;

(4) Participation in an alcoholism self-help recovery support group, as determined by the assessing agency, from the date of court approval of the plan to entry into intensive treatment;

(5) Not less than weekly approved outpatient counseling, group or individual, for a minimum of six months following the intensive phase of treatment;

(6) Not less than monthly outpatient contact, group or individual, for the remainder of the two-year deferred prosecution period;

(7) The decision to include the use of prescribed drugs, including disulfiram, as a condition of treatment shall be reserved to the treating facility and the petitioner's physician;

(8)))(b) All treatment within the purview of this section shall occur within or be approved by a state-approved ((substance use disorder treatment program))behavioral health agency as described in chapter ((70.96A))71.24 RCW;

(((9)))(c) Signature of the petitioner agreeing to the terms and conditions of the treatment program;

(d) Periodic, random urinalysis or breath analysis;

(e) If the petitioner fails to remain abstinent, a full substance use disorder reassessment and recommended treatment;

(f) No less than weekly approved outpatient counseling, whether group or individual, for a minimum of six months following the intensive phase of treatment;

(g) No less than monthly outpatient contact, whether group or individual, for the remainder of the two-year deferred prosecution period; and

(h) The decision to include the use of prescribed drugs, including disulfiram, as a condition of treatment shall be reserved to the treating facility and the petitioner's physician.

(2) A deferred prosecution for substance use disorder shall include the following requirements:

(a) Completion of an intensive outpatient treatment program or residential inpatient treatment program, depending on the severity of the diagnosis; and

(b) Participation in a minimum of two meetings per week of a substance use disorder self-help recovery support group, as determined by the assessing agency, for the duration of the treatment program.

(3) A deferred prosecution for mental health co-occurring disorder shall include the following requirements:

(a) Completion of the requirements described in subsection (2) of this section, or completion of an outpatient program as determined by the petitioner's diagnostic evaluation; and

(b) Completion of individual or group mental health services.

Sec. 13. RCW 10.05.155 and 2019 c 263 s 708 are each amended to read as follows:

A deferred prosecution ((program)) for domestic violence behavior, or domestic violence co-occurring with substance abuse or mental health, must include, but is not limited to, the following requirements:

(1) Completion of a risk assessment;

(2) Participation in the level of treatment recommended by the program as outlined in the current treatment plan;

(3) Compliance with the contract for treatment;

(4) Participation in any ancillary or co-occurring treatments that are determined to be necessary for the successful completion of the domestic violence intervention treatment including, but not limited to, mental health or substance use treatment;

(5) Domestic violence intervention treatment within the purview of this section to be completed with a state-certified domestic violence intervention treatment program;

(6) Signature of the petitioner agreeing to the terms and conditions of the treatment program;

(7) Proof of compliance with any active order to surrender weapons issued in this program or related civil protection orders or no-contact orders.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. A new section is added to chapter 10.05 RCW to read as follows:

A deferred prosecution for mental health disorder where the wrongful conduct did not involve, and was not caused by, alcohol, drugs, or a substance use disorder, shall include treatment recommended by a state-approved mental health provider.

Sec. 15. RCW 10.05.170 and 1991 c 247 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As a condition of granting deferred prosecution, the court may order supervision of the petitioner during the period of deferral and may levy a monthly assessment upon the petitioner as provided in RCW 10.64.120. In a jurisdiction with a probation department, the court may appoint the probation department to supervise the petitioner. In a jurisdiction without a probation department, the court may appoint an appropriate person or agency to supervise the petitioner. A supervisor appointed under this section shall be required to do at least the following:

(1) If the charge for which deferral is granted relates to operation of a motor vehicle, at least once every ((six))three months request ((from the department of licensing)) an abstract of the petitioner's driving record; ((and))

(2) At least once every month make contact with the petitioner ((or with any agency to which the petitioner has been directed for treatment as a part of the deferral))until treatment is completed;

(3) Review the petitioner's criminal history at a minimum of every 90 days until the end of the deferral period; and

(4) Report known violations of supervision or law and noncompliance with conditions of the deferred prosecution to the court within five business days or as soon as practicable.

Sec. 16. RCW 9.94A.525 and 2021 c 215 s 100 are each amended to read as follows:

The offender score is measured on the horizontal axis of the sentencing grid. The offender score rules are as follows:

The offender score is the sum of points accrued under this section rounded down to the nearest whole number.

(1) A prior conviction is a conviction which exists before the date of sentencing for the offense for which the offender score is being computed. Convictions entered or sentenced on the same date as the conviction for which the offender score is being computed shall be deemed "other current offenses" within the meaning of RCW 9.94A.589.

(2)(a) Class A and sex prior felony convictions shall always be included in the offender score.

(b) Class B prior felony convictions other than sex offenses shall not be included in the offender score, if since the last date of release from confinement (including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a felony conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and sentence, the offender had spent ((ten))10 consecutive years in the community without committing any crime that subsequently results in a conviction.

(c) Except as provided in (e) of this subsection, class C prior felony convictions other than sex offenses shall not be included in the offender score if, since the last date of release from confinement (including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a felony conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and sentence, the offender had spent five consecutive years in the community without committing any crime that subsequently results in a conviction.

(d) Except as provided in (e) of this subsection, serious traffic convictions shall not be included in the offender score if, since the last date of release from confinement (including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and sentence, the offender spent five years in the community without committing any crime that subsequently results in a conviction.

(e) If the present conviction is felony driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502(6)) or felony physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504(6)), all predicate crimes for the offense as defined by RCW 46.61.5055(14) shall be included in the offender score, and prior convictions for felony driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502(6)) or felony physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504(6)) shall always be included in the offender score. All other convictions of the defendant shall be scored according to this section.

(f) Prior convictions for a repetitive domestic violence offense, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, shall not be included in the offender score if, since the last date of release from confinement or entry of judgment and sentence, the offender had spent ((ten))10 consecutive years in the community without committing any crime that subsequently results in a conviction.

(g) This subsection applies to both adult and juvenile prior convictions.

(3) Out-of-state convictions for offenses shall be classified according to the comparable offense definitions and sentences provided by Washington law. Federal convictions for offenses shall be classified according to the comparable offense definitions and sentences provided by Washington law. If there is no clearly comparable offense under Washington law or the offense is one that is usually considered subject to exclusive federal jurisdiction, the offense shall be scored as a class C felony equivalent if it was a felony under the relevant federal statute.

(4) Score prior convictions for felony anticipatory offenses (attempts, criminal solicitations, and criminal conspiracies) the same as if they were convictions for completed offenses.

(5)(a) In the case of multiple prior convictions, for the purpose of computing the offender score, count all convictions separately, except:

(i) Prior offenses which were found, under RCW 9.94A.589(1)(a), to encompass the same criminal conduct, shall be counted as one offense, the offense that yields the highest offender score. The current sentencing court shall determine with respect to other prior adult offenses for which sentences were served concurrently or prior juvenile offenses for which sentences were served consecutively, whether those offenses shall be counted as one offense or as separate offenses using the "same criminal conduct" analysis found in RCW 9.94A.589(1)(a), and if the court finds that they shall be counted as one offense, then the offense that yields the highest offender score shall be used. The current sentencing court may presume that such other prior offenses were not the same criminal conduct from sentences imposed on separate dates, or in separate counties or jurisdictions, or in separate complaints, indictments, or informations;

(ii) In the case of multiple prior convictions for offenses committed before July 1, 1986, for the purpose of computing the offender score, count all adult convictions served concurrently as one offense, and count all juvenile convictions entered on the same date as one offense. Use the conviction for the offense that yields the highest offender score.

(b) As used in this subsection (5), "served concurrently" means that: (i) The latter sentence was imposed with specific reference to the former; (ii) the concurrent relationship of the sentences was judicially imposed; and (iii) the concurrent timing of the sentences was not the result of a probation or parole revocation on the former offense.

(6) If the present conviction is one of the anticipatory offenses of criminal attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy, count each prior conviction as if the present conviction were for a completed offense. When these convictions are used as criminal history, score them the same as a completed crime.

(7) If the present conviction is for a nonviolent offense and not covered by subsection (11), (12), or (13) of this section, count one point for each adult prior felony conviction and one point for each juvenile prior violent felony conviction and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior nonviolent felony conviction.

(8) If the present conviction is for a violent offense and not covered in subsection (9), (10), (11), (12), or (13) of this section, count two points for each prior adult and juvenile violent felony conviction, one point for each prior adult nonviolent felony conviction, and 1/2 point for each prior juvenile nonviolent felony conviction.

(9) If the present conviction is for a serious violent offense, count three points for prior adult and juvenile convictions for crimes in this category, two points for each prior adult and juvenile violent conviction (not already counted), one point for each prior adult nonviolent felony conviction, and 1/2 point for each prior juvenile nonviolent felony conviction.

(10) If the present conviction is for Burglary 1, count prior convictions as in subsection (8) of this section; however, count two points for each prior adult Burglary 2 or residential burglary conviction, and one point for each prior juvenile Burglary 2 or residential burglary conviction.

(11) If the present conviction is for a felony traffic offense count two points for each adult or juvenile prior conviction for Vehicular Homicide or Vehicular Assault; for each felony offense count one point for each adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior conviction; for each serious traffic offense, other than those used for an enhancement pursuant to RCW 46.61.520(2), count one point for each adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior conviction; count one point for each adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior conviction for operation of a vessel while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug; count one point for a deferred prosecution granted under chapter 10.05 RCW for a second or subsequent violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance.

(12) If the present conviction is for homicide by watercraft or assault by watercraft count two points for each adult or juvenile prior conviction for homicide by watercraft or assault by watercraft; for each felony offense count one point for each adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior conviction; count one point for each adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior conviction for driving under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, actual physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or operation of a vessel while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug.

(13) If the present conviction is for manufacture of methamphetamine count three points for each adult prior manufacture of methamphetamine conviction and two points for each juvenile manufacture of methamphetamine offense. If the present conviction is for a drug offense and the offender has a criminal history that includes a sex offense or serious violent offense, count three points for each adult prior felony drug offense conviction and two points for each juvenile drug offense. All other adult and juvenile felonies are scored as in subsection (8) of this section if the current drug offense is violent, or as in subsection (7) of this section if the current drug offense is nonviolent.

(14) If the present conviction is for Escape from Community Custody, RCW 72.09.310, count only prior escape convictions in the offender score. Count adult prior escape convictions as one point and juvenile prior escape convictions as 1/2 point.

(15) If the present conviction is for Escape 1, RCW 9A.76.110, or Escape 2, RCW 9A.76.120, count adult prior convictions as one point and juvenile prior convictions as 1/2 point.

(16) If the present conviction is for Burglary 2 or residential burglary, count priors as in subsection (7) of this section; however, count two points for each adult and juvenile prior Burglary 1 conviction, two points for each adult prior Burglary 2 or residential burglary conviction, and one point for each juvenile prior Burglary 2 or residential burglary conviction.

(17) If the present conviction is for a sex offense, count priors as in subsections (7) through (11) and (13) through (16) of this section; however, count three points for each adult and juvenile prior sex offense conviction.

(18) If the present conviction is for failure to register as a sex offender under RCW 9A.44.130 or 9A.44.132, count priors as in subsections (7) through (11) and (13) through (16) of this section; however, count three points for each adult and juvenile prior sex offense conviction, excluding prior convictions for failure to register as a sex offender under RCW 9A.44.130 or 9A.44.132, which shall count as one point.

(19) If the present conviction is for an offense committed while the offender was under community custody, add one point. For purposes of this subsection, community custody includes community placement or postrelease supervision, as defined in chapter 9.94B RCW.

(20) If the present conviction is for Theft of a Motor Vehicle, Possession of a Stolen Vehicle, Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1, or Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2, count priors as in subsections (7) through (18) of this section; however, count one point for prior convictions of Vehicle Prowling 2, and three points for each adult and juvenile prior Theft 1 (of a motor vehicle), Theft 2 (of a motor vehicle), Possession of Stolen Property 1 (of a motor vehicle), Possession of Stolen Property 2 (of a motor vehicle), Theft of a Motor Vehicle, Possession of a Stolen Vehicle, Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1, or Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2 conviction.

(21) If the present conviction is for a felony domestic violence offense where domestic violence as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 was pleaded and proven, count priors as in subsections (7) through (20) of this section; however, count points as follows:

(a) Count two points for each adult prior conviction where domestic violence as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 was pleaded and proven after August 1, 2011, for any of the following offenses: A felony violation of a no-contact or protection order (RCW 7.105.450 or former RCW 26.50.110), felony Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020(2)(b)), felony Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110(5)(b)), Burglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020), Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020), Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030), Unlawful imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040), Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200), Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210), Assault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011), Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021), Assault 3 (RCW 9A.36.031), Arson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020), or Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030);

(b) Count two points for each adult prior conviction where domestic violence as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 was pleaded and proven after July 23, 2017, for any of the following offenses: Assault of a child in the first degree, RCW 9A.36.120; Assault of a child in the second degree, RCW 9A.36.130; Assault of a child in the third degree, RCW 9A.36.140; Criminal Mistreatment in the first degree, RCW 9A.42.020; or Criminal Mistreatment in the second degree, RCW 9A.42.030;

(c) Count one point for each second and subsequent juvenile conviction where domestic violence as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 was pleaded and proven after August 1, 2011, for the offenses listed in (a) of this subsection; and

(d) Count one point for each adult prior conviction for a repetitive domestic violence offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, where domestic violence as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, was pleaded and proven after August 1, 2011.

(22) The fact that a prior conviction was not included in an offender's offender score or criminal history at a previous sentencing shall have no bearing on whether it is included in the criminal history or offender score for the current offense. Prior convictions that were not counted in the offender score or included in criminal history under repealed or previous versions of the sentencing reform act shall be included in criminal history and shall count in the offender score if the current version of the sentencing reform act requires including or counting those convictions. Prior convictions that were not included in criminal history or in the offender score shall be included upon any resentencing to ensure imposition of an accurate sentence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17. This act takes effect January 1, 2024.

--- END ---