BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 42.30 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A public agency that is required by state law to solicit public comment for a statutorily specified period of time, and is required by state law to provide notice that it is soliciting public comment, must specify the last day by which written public comment may be submitted.

(2) An agency that provides a notice that violates this section is subject to the same fines under the same procedures as other violations of this chapter are subject to under RCW 42.30.120.

--- END ---