BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person commits negligent driving with a vulnerable user victim in the first degree if he or she operates a vehicle, as defined in RCW 46.04.670, in a manner that is both negligent and endangers or is likely to endanger any person or property, and he or she proximately causes the death of a vulnerable user of a public way.

(2) Violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor, which shall be punished by:

(a) Up to 364 days of imprisonment;

(b) A fine of $5,000, which may not be reduced to an amount less than $1,000; and

(c) Suspension of driving privileges for 90 days.

(3) If a person is convicted of an offense under this section, then the court shall notify the department, and the department shall suspend the person's driving privileges.

(4) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Negligent" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 46.61.525(2).

(b) "Vulnerable user of a public way" means:

(i) A pedestrian;

(ii) A person riding an animal; or

(iii) A person operating or riding any of the following on a public way:

(A) A farm tractor or implement of husbandry, without an enclosed shell;

(B) A bicycle;

(C) An electric-assisted bicycle;

(D) An electric personal assistive mobility device;

(E) A moped;

(F) A motor-driven cycle;

(G) A motorized foot scooter; or

(H) A motorcycle.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.61.526 and 2020 c 146 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person commits negligent driving ((in the second degree)) with a vulnerable user victim in the second degree if, under circumstances not constituting negligent driving with a vulnerable user victim in the first degree under section 1 of this act or negligent driving in the first degree under RCW 46.61.5249, he or she operates a vehicle, as defined in RCW 46.04.670, in a manner that is both negligent and endangers or is likely to endanger any person or property, and he or she proximately causes ((the death,)) great bodily harm((,)) or substantial bodily harm of a vulnerable user of a public way.

(2) The law enforcement officer or prosecuting authority issuing the notice of infraction for an offense under this section shall state on the notice of infraction that the offense was a proximate cause of ((death,)) great bodily harm((,)) or substantial bodily harm, as defined in RCW 9A.04.110, of a vulnerable user of a public way.

(3) Persons under the age of ((sixteen))16 who commit an infraction under this section are subject to the provisions of RCW 13.40.250.

(4) A person found to have committed negligent driving in the second degree with a vulnerable user victim shall be required to:

(a) Pay a monetary penalty of ((five thousand dollars))$5,000, which may not be reduced to an amount less than ((one thousand dollars))$1,000; and

(b) Have his or her driving privileges suspended for ((ninety))90 days.

(5) In lieu of the penalties imposed under subsection (4) of this section, a person found to have committed negligent driving with a vulnerable user victim in the second degree ((with a vulnerable user victim)) who requests and personally appears for a hearing pursuant to RCW 46.63.070 (1) or (2) may elect to:

(a) Pay a penalty of ((two hundred fifty dollars))$250;

(b) Attend traffic school for a number of days to be determined by the court pursuant to chapter 46.83 RCW;

(c) Perform community service for a number of hours to be determined by the court, which may not exceed ((one hundred))100 hours, and which must include activities related to driver improvement and providing public education on traffic safety; and

(d) Submit certification to the court establishing that the requirements of this subsection have been met within one year of the hearing.

(6) If a person found to have committed a violation of this section elects the penalties imposed under subsection (5) of this section, the court may impose the penalties under subsection (5) of this section and the court may assess costs as the court deems appropriate for administrative processing.

(7) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, if a person found to have committed a violation of this section elects the penalties under subsection (5) of this section but does not complete all requirements of subsection (5) of this section within one year of the hearing:

(a)(i) The court shall impose a monetary penalty in the amount of ((five thousand dollars))$5,000, which may not be reduced to an amount less than ((one thousand dollars))$1,000; and

(ii) The person's driving privileges shall be suspended for ((ninety))90 days.

(b) For good cause shown, the court may extend the period of time in which the person must complete the requirements of subsection (5) of this section before any of the penalties provided in this subsection are imposed.

(8) An offense under this section is a traffic infraction. To the extent not inconsistent with this section, the provisions of chapter 46.63 RCW shall apply to infractions under this section. Procedures for the conduct of all hearings provided for in this section may be established by rule of the supreme court.

(9) If a person is penalized under subsection (4) of this section, then the court shall notify the department, and the department shall suspend the person's driving privileges. If a person fails to meet the requirements of subsection (5) of this section, the court shall notify the department that the person has failed to meet the requirements of subsection (5) of this section and the department shall suspend the person's driving privileges. Notice provided by the court under this subsection must be in a form specified by the department.

(10) Any act prohibited by this section that also constitutes a crime under any other law of this state may be the basis of prosecution under such other law notwithstanding that it may also be the basis for prosecution under this section.

(11) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Great bodily harm" and "substantial bodily harm" have the same meaning as provided in RCW 9A.04.110.

(b) "Negligent" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 46.61.525(2).

(c) "Vulnerable user of a public way" ((means:

(i) A pedestrian;

(ii) A person riding an animal; or

(iii) A person operating or riding any of the following on a public way:

(A) A farm tractor or implement of husbandry, without an enclosed shell;

(B) A bicycle;

(C) An electric-assisted bicycle;

(D) An electric personal assistive mobility device;

(E) A moped;

(F) A motor-driven cycle;

(G) A motorized foot scooter; or

(H) A motorcycle))has the same meaning as provided in section 1 of this act.

Sec. 3. RCW 46.20.342 and 2021 c 240 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for any person to drive a motor vehicle in this state while that person is in a suspended or revoked status or when his or her privilege to drive is suspended or revoked in this or any other state. Any person who has a valid Washington driver's license is not guilty of a violation of this section.

(a) A person found to be a habitual offender under chapter 46.65 RCW, who violates this section while an order of revocation issued under chapter 46.65 RCW prohibiting such operation is in effect, is guilty of driving while license suspended or revoked in the first degree, a gross misdemeanor. Upon the first such conviction, the person shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than ((ten))10 days. Upon the second conviction, the person shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than ((ninety))90 days. Upon the third or subsequent conviction, the person shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than ((one hundred eighty))180 days. If the person is also convicted of the offense defined in RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, when both convictions arise from the same event, the minimum sentence of confinement shall be not less than ((ninety))90 days. The minimum sentence of confinement required shall not be suspended or deferred. A conviction under this subsection does not prevent a person from petitioning for reinstatement as provided by RCW 46.65.080.

(b) A person who violates this section while an order of suspension or revocation prohibiting such operation is in effect and while the person is not eligible to reinstate his or her driver's license or driving privilege, other than for a suspension for the reasons described in (c) of this subsection, is guilty of driving while license suspended or revoked in the second degree, a gross misdemeanor. For the purposes of this subsection, a person is not considered to be eligible to reinstate his or her driver's license or driving privilege if the person is eligible to obtain an ignition interlock driver's license but did not obtain such a license. This subsection applies when a person's driver's license or driving privilege has been suspended or revoked by reason of:

(i) A conviction of a felony in the commission of which a motor vehicle was used;

(ii) A previous conviction under this section;

(iii) A notice received by the department from a court or diversion unit as provided by RCW 46.20.265, relating to a minor who has committed, or who has entered a diversion unit concerning an offense relating to alcohol, legend drugs, controlled substances, or imitation controlled substances;

(iv) A conviction of RCW 46.20.410, relating to the violation of restrictions of an occupational driver's license, a temporary restricted driver's license, or an ignition interlock driver's license;

(v) A conviction of RCW 46.20.345, relating to the operation of a motor vehicle with a suspended or revoked license;

(vi) A conviction of RCW 46.52.020, relating to duty in case of injury to or death of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;

(vii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.024, relating to attempting to elude pursuing police vehicles;

(viii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.212(5), relating to reckless endangerment of emergency zone workers;

(ix) A conviction of RCW 46.61.500, relating to reckless driving;

(x) A conviction of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, relating to a person under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;

(xi) A conviction of RCW 46.61.520, relating to vehicular homicide;

(xii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.522, relating to vehicular assault;

(xiii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.527(4), relating to reckless endangerment of roadway workers;

(xiv) A conviction of RCW 46.61.530, relating to racing of vehicles on highways;

(xv) A conviction of RCW 46.61.685, relating to leaving children in an unattended vehicle with motor running;

(xvi) A conviction of RCW 46.61.740, relating to theft of motor vehicle fuel;

(xvii) A conviction of RCW 46.64.048, relating to attempting, aiding, abetting, coercing, and committing crimes;

(xviii) A conviction of section 1 of this act, relating to negligent driving with a vulnerable user victim in the first degree;

(xix) An administrative action taken by the department under this chapter (( 46.20 RCW));

(((xix)))(xx) A conviction of a local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution of a political subdivision of this state, the federal government, or any other state, of an offense substantially similar to a violation included in this subsection; or

(((xx)))(xxi) A finding that a person has committed a traffic infraction under RCW 46.61.526 and suspension of driving privileges pursuant to RCW 46.61.526 (4)(b) or (7)(a)(ii).

(c) A person who violates this section when his or her driver's license or driving privilege is, at the time of the violation, suspended or revoked solely because:

(i) The person must furnish proof of satisfactory progress in a required alcoholism or drug treatment program;

(ii) The person must furnish proof of financial responsibility for the future as provided by chapter 46.29 RCW;

(iii) The person has failed to comply with the provisions of chapter 46.29 RCW relating to uninsured accidents;

(iv) The person has failed to respond to a notice of traffic infraction for a moving violation, failed to appear at a hearing for a moving violation, or failed to comply with the terms of a criminal complaint or criminal citation for a moving violation, as provided in RCW 46.20.289(1);

(v) The person has committed an offense in another state that, if committed in this state, would not be grounds for the suspension or revocation of the person's driver's license;

(vi) The person has been suspended or revoked by reason of one or more of the items listed in (b) of this subsection, but was eligible to reinstate his or her driver's license or driving privilege at the time of the violation;

(vii) The person has received traffic citations or notices of traffic infraction that have resulted in a suspension under RCW 46.20.267 relating to intermediate drivers' licenses; or

(viii) The person has been certified by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a child support order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320, or any combination of (c)(i) through (viii) of this subsection, is guilty of driving while license suspended or revoked in the third degree, a misdemeanor.

(d) For the purposes of this subsection, a person is not considered to be eligible to reinstate his or her driver's license or driving privilege if the person is eligible to obtain an ignition interlock driver's license but did not obtain such a license.

(2) Upon receiving a record of conviction of any person or upon receiving an order by any juvenile court or any duly authorized court officer of the conviction of any juvenile under this section, the department shall:

(a) For a conviction of driving while suspended or revoked in the first degree, as provided by subsection (1)(a) of this section, extend the period of administrative revocation imposed under chapter 46.65 RCW for an additional period of one year from and after the date the person would otherwise have been entitled to apply for a new license or have his or her driving privilege restored; or

(b) For a conviction of driving while suspended or revoked in the second degree, as provided by subsection (1)(b) of this section, not issue a new license or restore the driving privilege for an additional period of one year from and after the date the person would otherwise have been entitled to apply for a new license or have his or her driving privilege restored; or

(c) Not extend the period of suspension or revocation if the conviction was under subsection (1)(c) of this section. If the conviction was under subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section and the court recommends against the extension and the convicted person has obtained a valid driver's license, the period of suspension or revocation shall not be extended.

Sec. 4. RCW 46.61.110 and 2019 c 403 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The following rules shall govern the overtaking and passing of vehicles proceeding in the same direction:

(1)(a) The driver of a vehicle overtaking other traffic proceeding in the same direction shall pass to the left of it at a safe distance and shall not again drive to the right side of the roadway until safely clear of the overtaken traffic.

(b)(i) When the vehicle being overtaken is a motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, or moped, a driver of a motor vehicle found to be in violation of (a) of this subsection must be assessed an additional fine equal to the base penalty assessed under RCW 46.63.110(3). This fine may not be waived, reduced, or suspended, unless the court finds the offender to be indigent, and is not subject to the additional fees and assessments that the base penalty for this violation is subject to under RCW 2.68.040, 3.62.090, and 46.63.110.

(ii) The additional fine imposed under (b)(i) of this subsection must be deposited into the vulnerable roadway user education account created in RCW 46.61.145.

(2)(a) The driver of a vehicle approaching an individual who is traveling as a pedestrian or on a bicycle, riding an animal, or using a farm tractor or implement of husbandry without an enclosed shell, and who is traveling in the right lane of a roadway or on the right-hand shoulder or bicycle lane of the roadway, shall:

(i) On a roadway with two lanes or more for traffic moving in the direction of travel, before passing and until safely clear of the individual, move completely into a lane to the left of the right lane when it is safe to do so;

(ii) On a roadway with only one lane for traffic moving in the direction of travel:

(A) When there is sufficient room to the left of the individual in the lane for traffic moving in the direction of travel, before passing and until safely clear of the individual:

(I) Reduce speed to a safe speed for passing relative to the speed of the individual; and

(II) Pass at a safe distance, where practicable of at least three feet, to clearly avoid coming into contact with the individual or the individual's vehicle or animal; or

(B) When there is insufficient room to the left of the individual in the lane for traffic moving in the direction of travel to comply with (a)(ii)(A) of this subsection, before passing and until safely clear of the individual, move completely into the lane for traffic moving in the opposite direction when it is safe to do so and in compliance with RCW 46.61.120 and 46.61.125.

(b) A driver of a motor vehicle found to be in violation of this subsection (2) must be assessed an additional fine equal to the base penalty assessed under RCW 46.63.110(3). This fine may not be waived, reduced, or suspended, unless the court finds the offender to be indigent, and is not subject to the additional fees and assessments that the base penalty for this violation is subject to under RCW 2.68.040, 3.62.090, and 46.63.110.

(c) The additional fine imposed under (b) of this subsection must be deposited into the vulnerable roadway user education account created in RCW 46.61.145.

(d) For the purposes of this section, "vulnerable user of a public way" has the same meaning as provided in ((RCW 46.61.526(11)(c)))section 1 of this act.

(3) Except when overtaking and passing on the right is permitted, overtaken traffic shall give way to the right in favor of an overtaking vehicle on audible signal and shall not increase speed until completely passed by the overtaking vehicle.

Sec. 5. RCW 46.61.145 and 2019 c 403 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The driver of a motor vehicle shall not follow another vehicle more closely than is reasonable and prudent, having due regard for the speed of such vehicles and the traffic upon and the condition of the highway.

(2) The driver of any motor truck or motor vehicle drawing another vehicle when traveling upon a roadway outside of a business or residence district and which is following another motor truck or motor vehicle drawing another vehicle shall, whenever conditions permit, leave sufficient space so that an overtaking vehicle may enter and occupy such space without danger, except that this shall not prevent a motor truck or motor vehicle drawing another vehicle from overtaking and passing any like vehicle or other vehicle.

(3) Motor vehicles being driven upon any roadway outside of a business or residence district in a caravan or motorcade whether or not towing other vehicles shall be so operated as to allow sufficient space between each such vehicle or combination of vehicles so as to enable any other vehicle to enter and occupy such space without danger. This provision shall not apply to funeral processions.

(4)(a) When the vehicle being followed is a vulnerable user of a public way, a driver of a motor vehicle found to be in violation of this section must be assessed an additional fine equal to the base penalty assessed under RCW 46.63.110(3). This fine may not be waived, reduced, or suspended, unless the court finds the offender to be indigent, and is not subject to the additional fees and assessments that the base penalty for this violation is subject to under RCW 2.68.040, 3.62.090, and 46.63.110.

(b) For the purposes of this section, "vulnerable user of a public way" has the same meaning as provided in ((RCW 46.61.526(11)(c)))section 1 of this act.

(5) The additional fine imposed under subsection (4) of this section must be deposited into the vulnerable roadway user education account created in subsection (6) of this section.

(6) The vulnerable roadway user education account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from the additional fine in subsection (4) of this section must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only by the Washington traffic safety commission solely to:

(a) Support programs dedicated to increasing awareness by law enforcement officers, prosecutors, and judges of opportunities for the enforcement of traffic infractions and offenses committed against vulnerable roadway users; and

(b) With any funds remaining once the program support specified in (a) of this subsection has been provided, support programs dedicated to increasing awareness by the public of the risks and penalties associated with traffic infractions and offenses committed against vulnerable roadway users.

Sec. 6. RCW 46.61.180 and 2019 c 403 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When two vehicles approach or enter an intersection from different highways at approximately the same time, the driver of the vehicle on the left shall yield the right-of-way to the vehicle on the right.

(2) The right-of-way rule declared in subsection (1) of this section is modified at arterial highways and otherwise as stated in this chapter.

(3)(a) When the vehicle on the right approaching the intersection is a vulnerable user of a public way, a driver of a motor vehicle found to be in violation of this section must be assessed an additional fine equal to the base penalty assessed under RCW 46.63.110(3). This fine may not be waived, reduced, or suspended, unless the court finds the offender to be indigent, and is not subject to the additional fees and assessments that the base penalty for this violation is subject to under RCW 2.68.040, 3.62.090, and 46.63.110.

(b) For the purposes of this section, "vulnerable user of a public way" has the same meaning as provided in ((RCW 46.61.526(11)(c)))section 1 of this act.

(4) The additional fine imposed under subsection (3) of this section must be deposited into the vulnerable roadway user education account created in RCW 46.61.145.

Sec. 7. RCW 46.61.185 and 2019 c 403 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The driver of a vehicle intending to turn to the left within an intersection or into an alley, private road, or driveway shall yield the right-of-way to any vehicle approaching from the opposite direction which is within the intersection or so close thereto as to constitute an immediate hazard.

(2)(a) When the vehicle approaching from the opposite direction within the intersection or so close that it constitutes an immediate hazard is a vulnerable user of a public way, a driver of a motor vehicle found to be in violation of this section must be assessed an additional fine equal to the base penalty assessed under RCW 46.63.110(3). This fine may not be waived, reduced, or suspended, unless the court finds the offender to be indigent, and is not subject to the additional fees and assessments that the base penalty for this violation is subject to under RCW 2.68.040, 3.62.090, and 46.63.110.

(b) For the purposes of this section, "vulnerable user of a public way" has the same meaning as provided in ((RCW 46.61.526(11)(c)))section 1 of this act.

(3) The additional fine imposed under subsection (2) of this section must be deposited into the vulnerable roadway user education account created in RCW 46.61.145.

Sec. 8. RCW 46.61.190 and 2020 c 66 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Preferential right-of-way may be indicated by stop signs or yield signs as authorized in RCW 47.36.110.

(2)(a) Except when directed to proceed by a duly authorized flagger, or a police officer, or a firefighter vested by law with authority to direct, control, or regulate traffic, every driver of a vehicle approaching a stop sign shall stop except as provided in (b) of this subsection at a clearly marked stop line, but if none, before entering a marked crosswalk on the near side of the intersection or, if none, then at the point nearest the intersecting roadway where the driver has a view of approaching traffic on the intersecting roadway before entering the roadway, and after having stopped shall yield the right-of-way to any vehicle in the intersection or approaching on another roadway so closely as to constitute an immediate hazard during the time when such driver is moving across or within the intersection or junction of roadways.

(b)(i) With the exception of (b)(ii) and (iii) of this subsection, a person operating a bicycle approaching a stop sign shall either:

(A) Follow the requirements for approaching a stop sign as specified in (a) of this subsection; or

(B) Follow the requirements for approaching a yield sign as specified in subsection (3) of this section.

(ii) A person operating a bicycle approaching a stop sign located at a highway grade crossing of a railroad must follow the requirements of RCW 46.61.345.

(iii) A person operating a bicycle approaching a "stop" signal in use by a school bus, as required under RCW 46.37.190, must follow the requirements of RCW 46.61.370.

(3) The driver of a vehicle approaching a yield sign shall in obedience to such sign slow down to a speed reasonable for the existing conditions and if required for safety to stop, shall stop at a clearly marked stop line, but if none, before entering a marked crosswalk on the near side of the intersection or if none, then at the point nearest the intersecting roadway where the driver has a view of approaching traffic on the intersecting roadway before entering the roadway, and then after slowing or stopping, the driver shall yield the right-of-way to any vehicle in the intersection or approaching on another roadway so closely as to constitute an immediate hazard during the time such driver is moving across or within the intersection or junction of roadways: PROVIDED, That if such a driver is involved in a collision with a vehicle in the intersection or junction of roadways, after driving past a yield sign without stopping, such collision shall be deemed prima facie evidence of the driver's failure to yield right-of-way.

(4)(a) When right-of-way has not been yielded in accordance with this section to a vehicle that is a vulnerable user of a public way, a driver of a motor vehicle found to be in violation of this section must be assessed an additional fine equal to the base penalty assessed under RCW 46.63.110(3). This fine may not be waived, reduced, or suspended, unless the court finds the offender to be indigent, and is not subject to the additional fees and assessments that the base penalty for this violation is subject to under RCW 2.68.040, 3.62.090, and 46.63.110.

(b) For the purposes of this section, "vulnerable user of a public way" has the same meaning as provided in ((RCW 46.61.526(11)(c)))section 1 of this act.

(5) The additional fine imposed under subsection (4) of this section must be deposited into the vulnerable roadway user education account created in RCW 46.61.145.

Sec. 9. RCW 46.61.205 and 2019 c 403 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The driver of a vehicle about to enter or cross a highway from a private road or driveway shall yield the right-of-way to all vehicles lawfully approaching on said highway.

(2)(a) When right-of-way has not been yielded in accordance with this section to a vehicle that is a vulnerable user of a public way, a driver of a motor vehicle found to be in violation of this section must be assessed an additional fine equal to the base penalty assessed under RCW 46.63.110(3). This fine may not be waived, reduced, or suspended, unless the court finds the offender to be indigent, and is not subject to the additional fees and assessments that the base penalty for this violation is subject to under RCW 2.68.040, 3.62.090, and 46.63.110.

(b) For the purposes of this section, "vulnerable user of a public way" has the same meaning as provided in ((RCW 46.61.526(11)(c)))section 1 of this act.

(3) The additional fine imposed under subsection (2) of this section must be deposited into the vulnerable roadway user education account created in RCW 46.61.145.

Sec. 10. RCW 46.63.020 and 2018 c 18 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Failure to perform any act required or the performance of any act prohibited by this title or an equivalent administrative regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution relating to traffic including parking, standing, stopping, and pedestrian offenses, is designated as a traffic infraction and may not be classified as a criminal offense, except for an offense contained in the following provisions of this title or a violation of an equivalent administrative regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution:

(1) RCW 46.09.457(1)(b)(i) relating to a false statement regarding the inspection of and installation of equipment on wheeled all-terrain vehicles;

(2) RCW 46.09.470(2) relating to the operation of a nonhighway vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance;

(3) RCW 46.09.480 relating to operation of nonhighway vehicles;

(4) RCW 46.10.490(2) relating to the operation of a snowmobile while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or narcotics or habit-forming drugs or in a manner endangering the person of another;

(5) RCW 46.10.495 relating to the operation of snowmobiles;

(6) Chapter 46.12 RCW relating to certificates of title, registration certificates, and markings indicating that a vehicle has been destroyed or declared a total loss;

(7) RCW 46.16A.030 and 46.16A.050(3) relating to the nonpayment of taxes and fees by failure to register a vehicle and falsifying residency when registering a motor vehicle;

(8) RCW 46.16A.520 relating to permitting unauthorized persons to drive;

(9) RCW 46.16A.320 relating to vehicle trip permits;

(10) RCW 46.19.050(1) relating to knowingly providing false information in conjunction with an application for a special placard or license plate for disabled persons' parking;

(11) RCW 46.19.050(8) relating to illegally obtaining a parking placard, special license plate, special year tab, or identification card;

(12) RCW 46.19.050(9) relating to sale of a parking placard, special license plate, special year tab, or identification card;

(13) RCW 46.20.005 relating to driving without a valid driver's license;

(14) RCW 46.20.091 relating to false statements regarding a driver's license or instruction permit;

(15) RCW 46.20.0921 relating to the unlawful possession and use of a driver's license;

(16) RCW 46.20.342 relating to driving with a suspended or revoked license or status;

(17) RCW 46.20.345 relating to the operation of a motor vehicle with a suspended or revoked license;

(18) RCW 46.20.410 relating to the violation of restrictions of an occupational driver's license, temporary restricted driver's license, or ignition interlock driver's license;

(19) RCW 46.20.740 relating to operation of a motor vehicle without an ignition interlock device in violation of a license notation that the device is required;

(20) RCW 46.20.750 relating to circumventing an ignition interlock device;

(21) RCW 46.25.170 relating to commercial driver's licenses;

(22) Chapter 46.29 RCW relating to financial responsibility;

(23) RCW 46.30.040 relating to providing false evidence of financial responsibility;

(24) RCW 46.35.030 relating to recording device information;

(25) RCW 46.37.435 relating to wrongful installation of sunscreening material;

(26) RCW 46.37.650 relating to the manufacture, importation, sale, distribution, or installation of a counterfeit air bag, nonfunctional air bag, or previously deployed or damaged air bag;

(27) RCW 46.37.660 relating to the sale or installation of a device that causes a vehicle's diagnostic system to inaccurately indicate that the vehicle has a functional air bag when a counterfeit air bag, nonfunctional air bag, or no air bag is installed;

(28) RCW 46.37.671 through 46.37.675 relating to signal preemption devices;

(29) RCW 46.37.685 relating to switching or flipping license plates, utilizing technology to flip or change the appearance of a license plate, selling a license plate flipping device or technology used to change the appearance of a license plate, or falsifying a vehicle registration;

(30) RCW 46.44.180 relating to operation of mobile home pilot vehicles;

(31) RCW 46.48.175 relating to the transportation of dangerous articles;

(32) RCW 46.52.010 relating to duty on striking an unattended car or other property;

(33) RCW 46.52.020 relating to duty in case of injury to or death of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;

(34) RCW 46.52.090 relating to reports by repairers, storage persons, and appraisers;

(35) RCW 46.52.130 relating to confidentiality of the driving record to be furnished to an insurance company, an employer, and an alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agency;

(36) RCW 46.55.020 relating to engaging in the activities of a registered tow truck operator without a registration certificate;

(37) RCW 46.55.035 relating to prohibited practices by tow truck operators;

(38) RCW 46.55.300 relating to vehicle immobilization;

(39) RCW 46.61.015 relating to obedience to police officers, flaggers, or firefighters;

(40) RCW 46.61.020 relating to refusal to give information to or cooperate with an officer;

(41) RCW 46.61.022 relating to failure to stop and give identification to an officer;

(42) RCW 46.61.024 relating to attempting to elude pursuing police vehicles;

(43) RCW 46.61.212(((4)))(5) relating to reckless endangerment of emergency or work zone workers;

(44) RCW 46.61.500 relating to reckless driving;

(45) RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504 relating to persons under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;

(46) RCW 46.61.503 relating to a person under age twenty-one driving a motor vehicle after consuming alcohol;

(47) RCW 46.61.520 relating to vehicular homicide by motor vehicle;

(48) RCW 46.61.522 relating to vehicular assault;

(49) RCW 46.61.5249 relating to first degree negligent driving;

(50) RCW 46.61.527(4) relating to reckless endangerment of roadway workers;

(51) RCW 46.61.530 relating to racing of vehicles on highways;

(52) RCW 46.61.655(7) (a) and (b) relating to failure to secure a load;

(53) RCW 46.61.685 relating to leaving children in an unattended vehicle with the motor running;

(54) RCW 46.61.740 relating to theft of motor vehicle fuel;

(55) RCW 46.64.010 relating to unlawful cancellation of or attempt to cancel a traffic citation;

(56) RCW 46.64.048 relating to attempting, aiding, abetting, coercing, and committing crimes;

(57) Chapter 46.65 RCW relating to habitual traffic offenders;

(58) RCW 46.68.010 relating to false statements made to obtain a refund;

(59) Chapter 46.70 RCW relating to unfair motor vehicle business practices, except where that chapter provides for the assessment of monetary penalties of a civil nature;

(60) Chapter 46.72 RCW relating to the transportation of passengers in for hire vehicles;

(61) RCW 46.72A.060 relating to limousine carrier insurance;

(62) RCW 46.72A.070 relating to operation of a limousine without a vehicle certificate;

(63) RCW 46.72A.080 relating to false advertising by a limousine carrier;

(64) Chapter 46.80 RCW relating to motor vehicle wreckers;

(65) Chapter 46.82 RCW relating to driver's training schools;

(66) RCW 46.87.260 relating to alteration or forgery of a cab card, letter of authority, or other temporary authority issued under chapter 46.87 RCW;

(67) RCW 46.87.290 relating to operation of an unregistered or unlicensed vehicle under chapter 46.87 RCW;

(68) Section 1 of this act relating to negligent driving with a vulnerable user victim in the first degree.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. This act takes effect January 1, 2024.

--- END ---