BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.410 RCW to read as follows:

By December 1, 2025, the Washington professional educator standards board shall adopt rules providing for reviewing and vacating reprimands related to behavior that did not involve a student issued to persons with certificates or permits authorized under this chapter or chapter 28A.405 RCW. The rules must also describe the process for submitting a petition for vacating of a reprimand related to behavior that did not involve a student.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) By July 1, 2027, and in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature with the number of people with a certificate or permit authorized under chapters 28A.410 and 28A.405 RCW who have submitted a petition to have a reprimand vacated under the rules, and the number of people who had a reprimand vacated under the rules.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "rules" means rules providing for reviewing and vacating reprimands adopted as required by section 1 of this act.

(3) This section expires on August 1, 2027.

--- END ---