BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 74.34 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department shall maintain a vulnerable adult abuse registry. Upon request of any person, the department may disclose the identity of a person who has been entered on the registry with a final substantiated finding of abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, or neglect of a vulnerable adult. This information must also be shared with the department of health to advance the purposes of chapter 18.88B RCW.

(2) The department must develop a process in rule by which the department may remove individuals from the vulnerable adult abuse registry. The process must not allow a removal that would conflict with federal law.

(3) Except as described in subsection (4) of this section, a person who is on the vulnerable adult abuse registry may petition the department, in writing, for removal from the registry after three years have elapsed from the date on which the final substantiated finding is entered.

(4) A person may not petition the department to be removed from the registry if:

(a) The final substantiated finding that the person abused, abandoned, neglected, or financially exploited a vulnerable adult included information that:

(i) The person sexually abused a vulnerable adult;

(ii) The abuse or neglect caused a vulnerable adult to suffer great bodily harm or death;

(iii) The person financially exploited a vulnerable adult of property, resources, or services exceeding $5,000; or

(iv) The abuse involved a lethal weapon;

(b) The person has a conviction for an automatic disqualifying crime under RCW 43.43.842(1)(a) and the rules adopted under that subsection;

(c) The person has more than one final substantiated finding of abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, neglect, or any combination thereof, of a vulnerable adult; or

(d) The person is a nursing assistant whose name is on the registry for conduct committed while working as a certified nursing assistant in a nursing or skilled nursing facility, unless the removal from the registry maintained by the department under 42 C.F.R. Sec. 483.156 would be authorized under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395i-3(g)(1)(D) or Sec. 1396r(g)(1)(D).

(5) A person may petition the department for removal from the vulnerable adult abuse registry a maximum of three times and may only file one petition in any 12-month period.

(6) If the petition is granted, the individual is removed from the vulnerable adult abuse registry and the individual is no longer disqualified from employment under RCW 74.39A.056 or 18.20.125 by reason of the final substantiated finding. Nothing in this subsection affects a finding against the individual that is on the registry maintained by the department under 42 C.F.R. Sec. 483.156 unless removal from that registry is permitted by 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395i-3(g)(1)(D) or Sec. 1396r(g)(1)(D).

(7) If the department removes an individual from the vulnerable adult abuse registry, the department shall maintain a record of the individual and the underlying finding. These records are exempt from the disclosure described under subsection (1) of this section and chapter 42.56 RCW.

(8)(a) The state of Washington and its officers, employees, contractors, agents, and agencies, including the department, are immune from suit in law, equity, or any action under the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, based on the exercise of discretion to remove an individual from the vulnerable adult abuse registry, except as specified in (b) of this subsection. This section does not modify an applicant's right to seek review of an agency's licensing or certification decision under the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, or other applicable statute or agency rule.

(b) A person denied removal from the vulnerable adult abuse registry has the right to an adjudicative proceeding, and to judicial review of that adjudicative proceeding, to challenge the denial pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. In any such proceeding, it is the appellant's burden to prove that the appellant should be removed from the registry.

(9)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the following information is inadmissible and may not be used against the department or its employees in any civil or administrative action related to the hiring of a person who is or was on the vulnerable adult abuse registry:

(i) Documents prepared by department staff during the department's review and consideration of a petition for removal of a registry finding; and

(ii) Facts related to the underlying finding, including the underlying finding itself.

(b) Any documents that existed before a petition for removal was filed or that were created independently of the department's review and consideration of such petition do not become inadmissible merely because they were used during the department's review process.

(10) An individual's removal from the vulnerable adult abuse registry does not require an employer to use that individual for the care of, or allow that individual unsupervised access to, vulnerable adults.

(11) The department shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

(12) Nothing in this section limits any rights or remedies available under federal law, including the removal of a name from the nurse aide registry under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395i-3(g)(1)(D).

(13) This section does not create a protected class; private right of action; any right, privilege, or duty; or change any right, privilege, or duty existing under law.

Sec. 2. RCW 74.39A.056 and 2021 c 203 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) All long-term care workers shall be screened through state and federal background checks in a uniform and timely manner to verify that they do not have a history that would disqualify them from working with vulnerable persons. The department must process background checks for long-term care workers and make the information available to employers, prospective employers, and others as authorized by law.

(b)(i) For long-term care workers hired on or after January 7, 2012, the background checks required under this section shall include checking against the federal bureau of investigation fingerprint identification records system or its successor program. The department shall require these long-term care workers to submit fingerprints for the purpose of investigating conviction records through both the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation. The department shall not pass on the cost of these criminal background checks to the workers or their employers.

(ii) A long-term care worker who is not disqualified by the state background check can work and have unsupervised access pending the results of the federal bureau of investigation fingerprint background check as allowed by rules adopted by the department.

(c) The department shall share state and federal background check results with the department of health in accordance with RCW 18.88B.080.

(d) Background check screening required under this section and department rules is not required for an employee of a consumer directed employer if all of the following circumstances apply:

(i) The individual has an individual provider contract with the department;

(ii) The last background check on the contracted individual provider is still valid under department rules and did not disqualify the individual from providing personal care services;

(iii) Employment by the consumer directed employer is the only reason a new background check would be required; and

(iv) The department's background check results have been shared with the consumer directed employer.

(e) The department may require a fingerprint-based background check through both the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation at any time.

(2) A provider may not be employed in the care of and have unsupervised access to vulnerable adults if:

(a) The provider is on the vulnerable adult abuse registry or on any other registry based upon a finding of abuse, abandonment, neglect, or financial exploitation of a vulnerable adult;

(b) On or after October 1, 1998, the department of children, youth, and families, or its predecessor agency, has made a founded finding of abuse or neglect of a child against the provider. If the provider has received a certificate of parental improvement under chapter 74.13 RCW pertaining to the finding, the provider is not disqualified under this section;

(c) A disciplining authority, including the department of health, has made a finding of abuse, abandonment, neglect, or financial exploitation of a minor or a vulnerable adult against the provider; or

(d) A court has issued an order that includes a finding of fact or conclusion of law that the provider has committed abuse, abandonment, neglect, or financial exploitation of a minor or vulnerable adult. If the provider has received a certificate of parental improvement under chapter 74.13 RCW pertaining to the finding of fact or conclusion of law, the provider is not disqualified under this section.

(3) ((The department shall establish, by rule, a state registry which contains identifying information about long-term care workers identified under this chapter who have final substantiated findings of abuse, neglect, financial exploitation, or abandonment of a vulnerable adult as defined in RCW 74.34.020. The rule must include disclosure, disposition of findings, notification, findings of fact, appeal rights, and fair hearing requirements. The department shall disclose, upon request, final substantiated findings of abuse, neglect, financial exploitation, or abandonment to any person so requesting this information. This information must also be shared with the department of health to advance the purposes of chapter 18.88B RCW.

(4))) For the purposes of this section, "provider" means:

(a) An individual provider as defined in RCW 74.39A.240;

(b) An employee, licensee, or contractor of any of the following: A home care agency licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW; a nursing home under chapter 18.51 RCW; an assisted living facility under chapter 18.20 RCW; an enhanced services facility under chapter 70.97 RCW; a certified resident services and supports agency licensed or certified under chapter 71A.12 RCW; an adult family home under chapter 70.128 RCW; or any long-term care facility certified to provide medicaid or medicare services; and

(c) Any contractor of the department who may have unsupervised access to vulnerable adults.

(((5)))(4) The department shall adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 3. RCW 74.34.020 and 2021 c 215 s 162 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Abandonment" means action or inaction by a person or entity with a duty of care for a vulnerable adult that leaves the vulnerable person without the means or ability to obtain necessary food, clothing, shelter, or health care.

(2) "Abuse" means the intentional, willful, or reckless action or inaction that inflicts injury, unreasonable confinement, intimidation, or punishment on a vulnerable adult. In instances of abuse of a vulnerable adult who is unable to express or demonstrate physical harm, pain, or mental anguish, the abuse is presumed to cause physical harm, pain, or mental anguish. Abuse includes sexual abuse, mental abuse, physical abuse, and personal exploitation of a vulnerable adult, and improper use of restraint against a vulnerable adult which have the following meanings:

(a) "Sexual abuse" means any form of nonconsensual sexual conduct, including but not limited to unwanted or inappropriate touching, rape, molestation, indecent liberties, sexual coercion, sexually explicit photographing or recording, voyeurism, indecent exposure, and sexual harassment. Sexual abuse also includes any sexual conduct between a staff person, who is not also a resident or client, of a facility or a staff person of a program authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW, and a vulnerable adult living in that facility or receiving service from a program authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW, whether or not it is consensual.

(b) "Physical abuse" means the intentional, willful, or reckless action of inflicting bodily injury or physical mistreatment. Physical abuse includes, but is not limited to, striking with or without an object, slapping, pinching, choking, kicking, shoving, or prodding.

(c) "Mental abuse" means an intentional, willful, or reckless verbal or nonverbal action that threatens, humiliates, harasses, coerces, intimidates, isolates, unreasonably confines, or punishes a vulnerable adult. Mental abuse may include ridiculing, yelling, or swearing.

(d) "Personal exploitation" means an act of forcing, compelling, or exerting undue influence over a vulnerable adult causing the vulnerable adult to act in a way that is inconsistent with relevant past behavior, or causing the vulnerable adult to perform services for the benefit of another.

(e) "Improper use of restraint" means the inappropriate use of chemical, physical, or mechanical restraints for convenience or discipline or in a manner that: (i) Is inconsistent with federal or state licensing or certification requirements for facilities, hospitals, or programs authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW; (ii) is not medically authorized; or (iii) otherwise constitutes abuse under this section.

(3) "Chemical restraint" means the administration of any drug to manage a vulnerable adult's behavior in a way that reduces the safety risk to the vulnerable adult or others, has the temporary effect of restricting the vulnerable adult's freedom of movement, and is not standard treatment for the vulnerable adult's medical or psychiatric condition.

(4) "Consent" means express written consent granted after the vulnerable adult or his or her legal representative has been fully informed of the nature of the services to be offered and that the receipt of services is voluntary.

(5) "Department" means the department of social and health services.

(6) "Facility" means a residence licensed or required to be licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, assisted living facilities; chapter 18.51 RCW, nursing homes; chapter 70.128 RCW, adult family homes; chapter 72.36 RCW, soldiers' homes; chapter 71A.20 RCW, residential habilitation centers; or any other facility licensed or certified by the department.

(7) "Financial exploitation" means the illegal or improper use, control over, or withholding of the property, income, resources, or trust funds of the vulnerable adult by any person or entity for any person's or entity's profit or advantage other than for the vulnerable adult's profit or advantage. "Financial exploitation" includes, but is not limited to:

(a) The use of deception, intimidation, or undue influence by a person or entity in a position of trust and confidence with a vulnerable adult to obtain or use the property, income, resources, or trust funds of the vulnerable adult for the benefit of a person or entity other than the vulnerable adult;

(b) The breach of a fiduciary duty, including, but not limited to, the misuse of a power of attorney, trust, or a guardianship appointment, that results in the unauthorized appropriation, sale, or transfer of the property, income, resources, or trust funds of the vulnerable adult for the benefit of a person or entity other than the vulnerable adult; or

(c) Obtaining or using a vulnerable adult's property, income, resources, or trust funds without lawful authority, by a person or entity who knows or clearly should know that the vulnerable adult lacks the capacity to consent to the release or use of his or her property, income, resources, or trust funds.

(8) "Financial institution" has the same meaning as in RCW 30A.22.040 and 30A.22.041. For purposes of this chapter only, "financial institution" also means a "broker-dealer" or "investment adviser" as defined in RCW 21.20.005.

(9) "Hospital" means a facility licensed under chapter 70.41 or 71.12 RCW or a state hospital defined in chapter 72.23 RCW and any employee, agent, officer, director, or independent contractor thereof.

(10) "Individual provider" ((means a person under contract with the department to provide services in the home under chapter 74.09 or 74.39A RCW))has the same meaning as in RCW 74.39A.240.

(11) "Interested person" means a person who demonstrates to the court's satisfaction that the person is interested in the welfare of the vulnerable adult, that the person has a good faith belief that the court's intervention is necessary, and that the vulnerable adult is unable, due to incapacity, undue influence, or duress at the time the petition is filed, to protect his or her own interests.

(12)(a) "Isolate" or "isolation" means to restrict a vulnerable adult's ability to communicate, visit, interact, or otherwise associate with persons of his or her choosing. Isolation may be evidenced by acts including but not limited to:

(i) Acts that prevent a vulnerable adult from sending, making, or receiving his or her personal mail, electronic communications, or telephone calls; or

(ii) Acts that prevent or obstruct the vulnerable adult from meeting with others, such as telling a prospective visitor or caller that a vulnerable adult is not present, or does not wish contact, where the statement is contrary to the express wishes of the vulnerable adult.

(b) The term "isolate" or "isolation" may not be construed in a manner that prevents a guardian or limited guardian from performing his or her fiduciary obligations under chapter 11.130 RCW or prevents a hospital or facility from providing treatment consistent with the standard of care for delivery of health services.

(13) "Mandated reporter" is an employee of the department or the department of children, youth, and families; law enforcement officer; social worker; professional school personnel; individual provider; ((an employee of a facility;)) an operator of a facility or a certified residential services and supports agency under chapter 71A.12 RCW; an employee of a facility; an employee of a social service, welfare, mental health, adult day health, adult day care, home health, home care, ((or)) hospice, or certified residential services and supports agency; county coroner or medical examiner; Christian Science practitioner; or health care provider subject to chapter 18.130 RCW.

(14) "Mechanical restraint" means any device attached or adjacent to the vulnerable adult's body that he or she cannot easily remove that restricts freedom of movement or normal access to his or her body. "Mechanical restraint" does not include the use of devices, materials, or equipment that are (a) medically authorized, as required, and (b) used in a manner that is consistent with federal or state licensing or certification requirements for facilities, hospitals, or programs authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW.

(15) "Neglect" means (a) a pattern of conduct or inaction by a person or entity with a duty of care that fails to provide the goods and services that maintain physical or mental health of a vulnerable adult, or that fails to avoid or prevent physical or mental harm or pain to a vulnerable adult; or (b) an act or omission by a person or entity with a duty of care that demonstrates a serious disregard of consequences of such a magnitude as to constitute a clear and present danger to the vulnerable adult's health, welfare, or safety, including but not limited to conduct prohibited under RCW 9A.42.100.

(16) "Permissive reporter" means any person, including, but not limited to, an employee of a financial institution, attorney, or volunteer in a facility or program providing services for vulnerable adults.

(17) "Physical restraint" means the application of physical force without the use of any device, for the purpose of restraining the free movement of a vulnerable adult's body. "Physical restraint" does not include (a) briefly holding without undue force a vulnerable adult in order to calm or comfort him or her, or (b) holding a vulnerable adult's hand to safely escort him or her from one area to another.

(18) "Protective services" means any services provided by the department to a vulnerable adult with the consent of the vulnerable adult, or the legal representative of the vulnerable adult, who has been abandoned, abused, financially exploited, neglected, or in a state of self-neglect. These services may include, but are not limited to case management, social casework, home care, placement, arranging for medical evaluations, psychological evaluations, day care, or referral for legal assistance.

(19) "Self-neglect" means the failure of a vulnerable adult, not living in a facility, to provide for himself or herself the goods and services necessary for the vulnerable adult's physical or mental health, and the absence of which impairs or threatens the vulnerable adult's well-being. This definition may include a vulnerable adult who is receiving services through home health, hospice, or a home care agency, or an individual provider when the neglect is not a result of inaction by that agency or individual provider.

(20) "Social worker" means:

(a) A social worker as defined in RCW 18.320.010(2); or

(b) Anyone engaged in a professional capacity during the regular course of employment in encouraging or promoting the health, welfare, support, or education of vulnerable adults, or providing social services to vulnerable adults, whether in an individual capacity or as an employee or agent of any public or private organization or institution.

(21) "Vulnerable adult" includes a person:

(a) Sixty years of age or older who has the functional, mental, or physical inability to care for himself or herself; or

(b) Subject to a guardianship under RCW 11.130.265 or adult subject to conservatorship under RCW 11.130.360; or

(c) Who has a developmental disability as defined under RCW 71A.10.020; or

(d) Admitted to any facility; or

(e) Receiving services from home health, hospice, or home care agencies licensed or required to be licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW; or

(f) Receiving services from an individual provider; or

(g) Who self-directs his or her own care and receives services from a personal aide under chapter 74.39 RCW.

(22) "Vulnerable adult advocacy team" means a team of three or more persons who coordinate a multidisciplinary process, in compliance with chapter 266, Laws of 2017 and the protocol governed by RCW 74.34.320, for preventing, identifying, investigating, prosecuting, and providing services related to abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of vulnerable adults.

Sec. 4. RCW 74.34.063 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 818 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall initiate a response to a report, no later than twenty-four hours after knowledge of the report, of suspected abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, neglect, or self-neglect of a vulnerable adult.

(2) When the initial report or investigation by the department indicates that the alleged abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, or neglect may be criminal, the department shall make an immediate report to the appropriate law enforcement agency. The department and law enforcement will coordinate in investigating reports made under this chapter. The department may provide protective services and other remedies as specified in this chapter.

(3) The law enforcement agency or the department shall report the incident in writing to the proper county prosecutor or city attorney for appropriate action whenever the investigation reveals that a crime may have been committed.

(4) ((The))Upon request, the department and law enforcement ((may))shall share information contained in reports and findings of abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, and neglect of vulnerable adults with each other, consistent with RCW 74.04.060, chapter 42.56 RCW, and other applicable confidentiality laws.

(5) Unless prohibited by federal law, the department of social and health services may share with the department of children, youth, and families information contained in reports and findings of abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, and neglect of vulnerable adults.

(6) The department shall notify the proper licensing authority concerning any report received under this chapter that alleges that a person who is professionally licensed, certified, or registered under Title 18 RCW has abandoned, abused, financially exploited, or neglected a vulnerable adult.

Sec. 5. RCW 74.34.095 and 2013 c 23 s 218 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The following information is confidential and not subject to disclosure, except as provided in this section:

(a) A report of abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, or neglect made under this chapter;

(b) The identity of the person making the report; and

(c) All files, reports, records, communications, and working papers used or developed in the investigation or provision of protective services.

(2) Information considered confidential may be disclosed only for a purpose consistent with this chapter or as authorized by chapter 18.20, 18.51, or 74.39A RCW, ((or as authorized by)) the long-term care ombuds programs under federal law or state law, chapter 43.190 RCW, or the office of the developmental disabilities ombuds program under chapter 43.382 RCW.

(3) A court or presiding officer in an administrative proceeding may order disclosure of confidential information only if the court, or presiding officer in an administrative proceeding, determines that disclosure is essential to the administration of justice and will not endanger the life or safety of the vulnerable adult or individual who made the report. The court or presiding officer in an administrative hearing may place restrictions on such disclosure as the court or presiding officer deems proper.

(4)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, upon a request for information regarding a specifically named vulnerable adult, the department may disclose only the following information:

(i) Whether or not a report was received;

(ii) The status of the report; and

(iii) The outcome of an investigation.

(b) The department may not disclose any information regarding a specifically named vulnerable adult if any of the following circumstances apply:

(i) The information concerns a vulnerable adult residing in or receiving services from a department licensed or certified facility or provider where an unannounced investigation in response to the report has not been initiated;

(ii) The requester is the alleged perpetrator;

(iii) The department has a reasonable belief that disclosure may compromise any investigation by a law enforcement agency, disciplinary authority, the department, or the department of children, youth, and families; or

(iv) The department has a reasonable belief that the information may endanger any person.

Sec. 6. RCW 68.50.105 and 2019 c 470 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Reports and records of autopsies or postmortems shall be confidential, except that the following persons may examine and obtain copies of any such report or record: The personal representative of the decedent as defined in RCW 11.02.005, any family member, the attending physician or advanced registered nurse practitioner, the prosecuting attorney or law enforcement agencies having jurisdiction, public health officials, the department of labor and industries in cases in which it has an interest under RCW 68.50.103, ((or)) the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families or his or her designee in cases being reviewed under RCW 74.13.640, or the secretary of the department of social and health services or his or her designee under chapter 74.34 RCW.

(2)(a) Notwithstanding the restrictions contained in this section regarding the dissemination of records and reports of autopsies or postmortems, nor the exemptions referenced under RCW 42.56.240(1), nothing in this chapter prohibits a coroner, medical examiner, or his or her designee, from publicly discussing his or her findings as to any death subject to the jurisdiction of his or her office where actions of a law enforcement officer or corrections officer have been determined to be a proximate cause of the death, except as provided in (b) of this subsection.

(b) A coroner, medical examiner, or his or her designee may not publicly discuss his or her findings outside of formal court or inquest proceedings if there is a pending or active criminal investigation, or a criminal or civil action, concerning a death that has commenced prior to January 1, 2014.

(3) The coroner, the medical examiner, or the attending physician shall, upon request, meet with the family of the decedent to discuss the findings of the autopsy or postmortem. For the purposes of this section, the term "family" means the surviving spouse, state registered domestic partner, or any child, parent, grandparent, grandchild, brother, or sister of the decedent, or any person who was guardian of the decedent at the time of death.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. Sections 1 and 2 of this act take effect January 1, 2024.

--- END ---