BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 49.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) An employer shall reimburse an employee for all necessary expenditures and losses incurred by the employee in direct consequence of the discharge of the employee's duties. Reimbursement must be paid within 30 days of the employer's actual or constructive notice of the expenditure or loss.

(2) The failure of an employer to reimburse an employee under this section constitutes a loss of wages equal to the amount of the reimbursement owed to the employee.

(3) The department may adopt rules to implement and enforce this section. For the purpose of enforcing this section, the reimbursement requirement under this section constitutes a wage payment requirement under RCW 49.48.082.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2024.

--- END ---