BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.600 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Prior to course scheduling or course registration for the next school term, each public school that serves students in any of grades nine through 12 must provide all students and their parents or legal guardians with: Information about each available dual credit program and any financial assistance available to reduce dual credit course and exam costs for students and their families. The information must be provided via email and other communication methods, and, to the extent feasible, must be translated into the primary language of each parent or legal guardian.

(2) Public schools are encouraged to include in the notification required under subsection (1) of this section other information about advanced course taking that must be provided to parents and legal guardians under RCW 28A.320.195, 28A.600.287, and 28A.600.320.

(3) As used in this section, "public school" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.150.010.

--- END ---