BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) A capital budget is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the several dollar amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2025, out of the several funds specified in this act.

(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Fiscal year 2024" or "FY 2024" means the period beginning July 1, 2023, and ending June 30, 2024.

(b) "Fiscal year 2025" or "FY 2025" means the period beginning July 1, 2024, and ending June 30, 2025.

(c) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an unappropriated status.

(d) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only for the specified purpose.

(3) Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified purpose that is not expended subject to the specified conditions and limitations to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.

(4) The amounts shown under the headings "Prior Biennia," "Future Biennia," and "Total" in this act are for informational purposes only and do not constitute legislative approval of these amounts. "Prior biennia" typically refers to the immediate prior biennium for reappropriations, but may refer to multiple biennia in the case of specific projects. A "future biennia" amount is an estimate of what may be appropriated for the project or program in the 2025-2027 biennium and the following three biennia; an amount of zero does not necessarily constitute legislative intent to not provide funding for the project or program in the future.

(5) "Reappropriations" in this act are appropriations and, unless the context clearly provides otherwise, are subject to the relevant conditions and limitations applicable to appropriations. Reappropriations shall be limited to the unexpended balances remaining on June 30, 2023, from the 2021-2023 biennial appropriations for each project.

PART 1

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001. FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE

Archives Capital Minor Works (30000047)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,507,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$6,028,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,535,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1002. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

CERB Rural Broadband (40000250)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

The appropriations in this section are subject to the provisions of section 7013 of this act and the following conditions:

(1) The board may issue broadband grants to eligible subrecipients in accordance with requirements of the broadband equity, access, and deployment program in section 60102 of P.L. 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act).

(2) Applications for competitive funding must be made in the form and manner prescribed by the board.

(3) The board may provide financial assistance only for projects located in a rural community, as defined by the board, or located in a rural county.

(4)(a) $12,500,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for state match for federal authority allocated under this section.

(b) To the extent permitted by federal law, the board shall provide state match only for projects where the lead applicant is a public entity.

(5) When soliciting and selecting competitive applications for grant funds under this section, the board:

(a) Is encouraged to require a larger matching contribution from applicants that are for-profit entities rather than using public funds where it deems the applicant capable of providing matching funds. The board must incentivize matching fund contributions greater than 25 percent from applicants whenever feasible;

(b) To the extent permitted by federal law, may only award federal or state funding to a project that will result in the construction or improvement of open-access broadband infrastructure that remains open access for the useful life of the subsidized project. For the purposes of this section "open-access" means an arrangement in which the subgrantee offers nondiscriminatory access to and use of its network on a wholesale basis to other providers seeking to provide broadband service to end-user locations, at rates that include a discount from the provider's retail rates reflecting the costs that the subgrantee avoids by not providing retail service to the end user location; and

(c) Must adhere to the challenge process developed by the statewide broadband office under section 1015 of this act.
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$25,000,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$12,500,000

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$25,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$37,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$218,750,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$281,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1003. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Broadband (40000251)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

The appropriations are subject to the provisions of section 7014 of this act and the following conditions:

(1)(a) $12,500,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for state match for federal authority allocated under this section.

(b) To the extent permitted by federal law, the board shall provide state match only for projects where the lead applicant is a public entity.

(2) When soliciting and selecting competitive applications for grant funds under this section, the board:

(a) Is encouraged to require a larger matching contribution from applicants that are for-profit entities rather than using public funds where it deems the applicant capable of providing matching funds. The board must incentivize matching fund contributions greater than 25 percent from applicants whenever feasible;

(b) To the extent permitted by federal law, may only award federal or state funding to a project that will result in the construction or improvement of open-access broadband infrastructure that remains open access for the useful life of the subsidized project. For the purposes of this section "open-access" means an arrangement in which the subgrantee offers nondiscriminatory access to and use of its network on a wholesale basis to other providers seeking to provide broadband service to end-user locations, at rates that include a discount from the provider's retail rates reflecting the costs that the subgrantee avoids by not providing retail service to the end user location; and

(c) Must adhere to the challenge process developed by the statewide broadband office under section 1015 of this act.
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$25,000,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$12,500,000

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$25,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$37,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$218,750,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$281,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1004. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Building Communities Fund Grant Program (40000279)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.125.

(2) The department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by this appropriation. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(3) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

American Legion Veteran Housing and Resource Center. . . .$493,000

Asia Pacific Cultural Center Renovation. . . .$1,082,000

Behavioral Health Clinic. . . .$250,000

Benston Hall. . . .$247,000

Capital Expansion for Job Skills, Training, Support, and

More. . . .$100,000

Carl Maxey Center Remodel - Phase 3. . . .$350,000

Childcare and Development Center Phase II. . . .$200,000

CLR Certified Community Behavioral Health Center. . . .$2,446,000

Community Meal Program. . . .$672,000

Culinary Training Academy and Community Event Space

at HopeWorks. . . .$635,000

CYS Marina View Building Renovation. . . .$100,000

Eloise's Cooking Pot Food Bank Capital Remodel

Project . . . .$243,000

Energy Retrofit Project. . . .$135,000

Eritrean Community Center Expansion Project. . . .$312,000

Expanding Capacity for Workforce Development. . . .$99,000

Expansion of and Updates to GLOW Children ELC Space. . . .$185,000

Expansion of public food business incubator. . . .$100,000

Food Bank Renovation. . . .$425,000

Global Neighborhood Building Expansion: Enhancing Services

for Local Refugees. . . .$229,000

HVAC Replacement for ECEAP Classrooms. . . .$188,000

Landing Youth Service Center. . . .$297,000

Latino Arts and Culture Community Center. . . .$90,000

Makah Community Gymnasium. . . .$160,000

NEW Health Newport Capital Expansion. . . .$823,000

Nisqually Health and Wellness Center Project. . . .$6,000,000

North Seattle Family Support Center. . . .$1,090,000

ReCyclery Infrastructure, Bathroom and Shop Improvement

Project. . . .$144,000

Scott and Sis Names Family YMCA. . . .$3,000,000

Sea Mar CHC - Concrete. . . .$186,000

Sea Mar CHC - Elma. . . .$187,000

Sedro-Woolley Club Renovation. . . .$100,000

SEYFS Renovations. . . .$187,000

Snohomish Family Center Improvements. . . .$206,000

South Everett/Mukilteo Building Communities. . . .$100,000

Step By Step Early Learning Center. . . .$2,622,000

Teen Center Building Renovation. . . .$318,000

UHeights Community Kitchen, Safety, and Accessibility

Project . . . .$250,000

Unbridled Spirit: Outdoor Program Space. . . .$68,000

United Learning Center. . . .$100,000

William Grose Innovation Center. . . .$250,000

Yelm Boys & Girls Club Remodel. . . .$100,000

YWCA Clark County Community Office Repairs and

Renovation. . . .$101,000

(4) $1,700,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to provide technical assistance to organizations interested in applying for the building communities fund grants.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$26,570,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$106,280,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$132,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1005. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Building for the Arts (40000280)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.750.

(2) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of this section, the department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by this appropriation. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(3) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Arté Noir. . . .$750,000

Cornish College of the Arts. . . .$350,000

Experience Learning Community. . . .$200,000

Fire Mountain Arts Council. . . .$217,000

Imagine Children's Museum. . . .$75,000

Orcas Center. . . .$350,000

Pacific Public Media. . . .$800,000

Pickford Film Center. . . .$550,000

Port Angeles Waterfront Center dba Field Arts & Events

Hall. . . .$2,000,000

Richland Players Inc.. . . .$452,000

Seattle Children's Theatre. . . .$750,000

Seattle Repertory Theatre Renovations for

Accessibility. . . .$1,200,000

Seattle Symphony Orchestra. . . .$250,000

Seattle Theatre Group. . . .$491,000

Sequim City Band. . . .$401,000

SIFF Uptown Theater Renovation Project. . . .$500,000

Spokane Valley Summer Theatre. . . .$1,849,000

Tacoma Arts Live Tacoma Armory Performance Venue

Renovation. . . .$2,000,000

Theatre33. . . .$100,000

Vashon Allied Arts, Inc.. . . .$115,000
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$13,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$53,600,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$67,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1006. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 CERB Capital Construction (40000281)
Appropriation:

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State
. . . .
$25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$25,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$100,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$150,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1007. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Dig-Once Pilot Project and Enhanced Program Development (40000282)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for improvements to Reynolds Road and Harrison Avenue in Lewis county that demonstrate dig-once project practices that coordinate construction of multiple infrastructure projects to maximize project efficiencies and minimize cost.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1008. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Energy Retrofits and Solar Power for Public Buildings (40000283)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $6,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to local governments, public higher education institutions, school districts, tribal governments, and state agencies for improvements to facilities and related projects that result in energy and operational cost savings.

(a) At least 20 percent of each competitive grant round is designated for award to eligible projects in small cities or towns with a population of 5,000 or fewer residents.

(b) In each competitive round, a higher energy savings to investment ratio must result in a higher project ranking. Priority consideration must be given to applicants that have not received grant awards for this purpose in prior biennia.

(c) The department must determine a minimum match ratio to maximize the leverage of nonstate funds.

(2)(a) $10,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to be awarded in competitive rounds to local governments, public higher education institutions, school districts, tribal governments, and state agencies for projects that involve the purchase and installation of solar energy systems, including solar modules and inverters, with a preference for products manufactured in Washington.

(b) At least 20 percent of each competitive grant round is designated for award to eligible projects in small cities or towns with a population of 5,000 or fewer residents.

(c) In each competitive round, a higher energy savings to investment ratio must result in a higher project ranking. Priority consideration must be given to applicants that have not received grant awards for this purpose in prior biennia.

(d) The department must determine a minimum match ratio to maximize the leverage of nonstate funds.

(3) $4,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the energy efficiency and environmental performance improvements to minor works, stand-alone, and emergency projects at facilities owned by agencies that repair or replace existing building systems and reduce greenhouse gas emissions from state operations, including, but not limited to, HVAC, lighting, insulation, windows, and other mechanical systems. Eligibility for this funding is dependent on an analysis using the office of financial management's life-cycle cost tool that compares project design alternatives for initial and long-term cost-effectiveness. Assuming a reasonable return on investment, the department shall provide grants in the amount required to improve the project's energy efficiency comparted to the original project request.

(4) The department shall develop metrics that indicate the performance of energy efficiency efforts.

(5) If a grant is provided in subsection (1) or (3) of this section to purchase heating devices or systems, the agency must, whenever possible and most cost effective, select devices and systems that do not use fossil fuels.

(6) Grants provided in subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section to state agencies are exempt from the match requirements in this section.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$80,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$100,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1009. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

High Efficiency Electric Home Rebate Program (40000284)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $83,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation and $115,000,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to administer grants to eligible third-party administrators for heat pump and other high-efficiency electric equipment rebates, with a focus on low/moderate income households and small businesses. State incentives and rebates for installation of high efficiency electric equipment, including electrical panel upgrades, provide a benefit to the public consistent with the state's energy strategy and climate mandates by reducing greenhouse gas emissions from the built environment.

(2) The department shall implement a statewide high efficiency electric equipment program consistent with the following:

(a) Aid the transition of residential and commercial buildings away from fossil fuels by providing education and outreach resources for the installation of high efficiency electric heat pumps and other high efficiency electric equipment;

(b) Provide grants, coordination, and technical assistance to eligible third-party administrators to promote the adoption of high-efficiency electric heat pump equipment for space and water heating; and

(c) Develop strategies to ensure that the program serves low-income households, vulnerable populations, and overburdened communities, including dedicating a portion of the program funding for this purpose. For the purposes of this subsection (2)(c), "overburdened communities" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 70A.65.010.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "eligible third-party administrators" include, but are not limited to, nonprofits, utilities, housing providers, community action agencies and community-based organizations.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$115,000,000

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$83,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$198,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$198,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1010. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Early Learning Facilities – School Districts (40000285)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Bethel School District. . . .$1,080,000

Highline School District. . . .$809,000

Issaquah School District. . . .$1,057,000

Orondo School District. . . .$1,080,000

South Bend School District. . . .$300,000

Toppenish School District. . . .$1,080,000
Appropriation:

Ruth Lecocq Kagi Early Learning Facilities

Development Account—State
. . . .
$5,406,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$21,624,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$27,030,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1011. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Library Capital Improvement Program (40000286)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for a local library capital improvement grant program for the following list of projects:

Camas Public Library. . . .$730,000

City of Longview. . . .$750,000

City of Port Townsend. . . .$173,000

City of Shelton. . . .$70,000

City of South Bend. . . .$249,000

City of Walla Walla. . . .$2,000,000

Pend Oreille County Library District. . . .$200,000

Pierce County Library - Bonney Lake. . . .$164,000

Pierce County Library - Sumner. . . .$2,000,000

San Juan Island Library District. . . .$2,000,000

Stevens County Rural Library District. . . .$615,000

Tacoma Public Library. . . .$2,000,000

(2) The department must establish a competitive process to solicit proposals for and prioritize projects whose primary objective is to assist libraries operated by governmental units, as defined in RCW 27.12.010, in acquiring, constructing, repairing, or rehabilitating facilities.

(3) The department must establish a committee to develop the grant program criteria established under subsection (2) of this section and review proposals. The committee must be composed of five members as provided in this subsection. The committee must include: (a) A representative from the department of commerce; (b) a representative from the department of archaeology and historic preservation; (c) the state librarian; (d) a representative from a library district; and (e) a representative from a municipal library.

(4) The department must conduct a statewide solicitation of project applications. The department must evaluate and rank applications in consultation with the committee established in subsection (3) of this section, using objective criteria. The ranking of projects must prioritize library district facilities listed on a local, state, or federal register of historic places and those located in distressed or rural counties. The evaluation and ranking process must also include an examination of existing assets that applicants propose to apply to projects. Grant assistance under this section may not exceed 50 percent of the total cost of the project. The nonstate portion of the total project cost may include cash, the value of real property when acquired solely for the purpose of the project, and in-kind contributions.

(5) The department must submit a prioritized list of recommended projects to the governor and the legislature by October 1, 2024, for inclusion in the department of commerce's 2025-2027 biennial capital budget request. The list must include a description of each project, the amount of recommended state funding, and documentation of nonstate funds to be used for the project. Individual grants may not exceed $2,000,000. The total amount of recommended state funding for the projects on a biennial project list may not exceed $10,000,000.

(6) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee must repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued on the date most close in time to the date of authorization of the grant.

(7) The department must assist grant recipients under this section to apply for applicable competitive federal grant funding and, upon receipt of any such funding, an equal amount of the state building construction account—state appropriation must be placed in unallotted status.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,951,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$43,804,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$54,755,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1012. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Pacific Tower Capital Improvements (40000287)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,464,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$6,061,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,525,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1013. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Pacific Tower College Tenant Improvements (40000288)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,677,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,677,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1014. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Public Works Assistance Account (PWAA) (40000289)
Appropriation:

Public Works Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$400,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,600,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1015. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Broadband Infrastructure Federal Match Projects (40000290)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $25,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely as match for federal authority allocated under this section and section 7017 of this act for the statewide broadband office to administer the broadband equity, access, and deployment state grants program in section 60102 of P.L. 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act). Expenditure of the amount in this subsection is contingent on the receipt of this grant funding.

(b) To the extent permitted by federal law, the office shall provide state match only for projects where the lead applicant is a public entity.

(2) When soliciting and selecting competitive applications for grant funds under this section, the statewide broadband office:

(a) To the extent permitted by federal law, may only award federal or state funding to a project that will result in the construction or improvement of open-access broadband infrastructure that remains open access for the useful life of the subsidized project. For the purposes of this section "open-access" means an arrangement in which the subgrantee offers nondiscriminatory access to and use of its network on a wholesale basis to other providers seeking to provide broadband service to end-user locations, at rates that include a discount from the provider's retail rates reflecting the costs that the subgrantee avoids by not providing retail service to the end user location; and

(b) Is encouraged to require a larger matching contribution from applicants that are for-profit entities rather than using public funds where it deems the applicant capable of providing matching funds. The office must incentivize matching fund contributions greater than 25 percent from applicants whenever feasible.

(3) The statewide broadband office must include, in the five-year action plan developed using initial planning funds from the broadband equity, access, and deployment program funded under P.L. 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act):

(a) Consideration of broadband infrastructure projects that use wireless technology in order to expand access at the lowest cost to the most unserved or underserved residents;

(b) A challenge process that includes provisions that prohibit a broadband service provider from receiving any state matching funds or federal broadband equity, access, and deployment program funding that is distributed by the office, the community economic revitalization board, or the public works board for a period of three years following the submission of the challenge in cases where:

(i) The service provider challenges a proposed project in accordance with the challenge process established by the office and the challenge is found to be unsubstantiated by the office, the community economic revitalization board, or the public works board; or

(ii) The broadband office, the community economic revitalization board, or the public works board denies funding to another project based on a substantiated challenge and the challenging service provider does not demonstrate efforts to begin construction of a broadband service project capable of delivering service at speeds required by the office at the challenged service addresses within 12 months of the challenge or within 18 months of the challenge if extended by the office; and

(c) Steps the office will take to promote: The use of existing infrastructure; dig-once policies; streamlined permitting processes; and cost-effective access to poles, conduits, easements, and rights-of-way. To the extent permitted under federal law, the office must consider creating a pool of grant funds dedicated to pole costs.

(4) $300,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation provided in this section is for a staff position dedicated to advising the statewide broadband office on the availability and feasibility of deploying new and emerging technologies in broadband internet service.
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$50,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$25,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$75,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$437,500,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$512,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1016. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Weatherization Plus Health (40000291)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $5,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants for the Washington State University energy extension community energy efficiency program (CEEP) to support homeowners, tenants, and small business owners in making sound energy efficiency investments by providing consumer education and marketing, workforce support through training and lead generation, and direct consumer incentives for upgrades to existing homes and small commercial buildings. This is the maximum amount the department may expend for this purpose.

(2) The department must, to the extent practicable, implement the recommendations in the weatherization plus health 2022 report.

(3) If funding from these appropriations is used to purchase heating devices or systems, the agency shall, whenever possible and most cost effective, select devices and systems that do not use fossil fuels.

(4) The department must:

(a) Recruit community energy efficiency program sponsors that are community-based organizations located in geographic areas of the state that have not received funding for low-income weatherization programs, targeting hard to reach market segments;

(b) Leverage funding from community energy efficiency program sponsors in an amount greater than or equal to the amount provided by the state through the weatherization program;

(c) Ensure that community energy efficiency program utility sponsors work with nonprofit community-based organizations to deliver community energy efficiency program services; and

(d) Identify community energy efficiency program sponsors that support the conversion of space and water heating from fossil fuels to electricity, as part of a set of energy efficiency investments.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$35,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$40,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$160,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1017. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Youth Recreational Facilities Grant Program (40000292)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.135.

(2) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of this section, the department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by this appropriation. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(3) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Camp Kilworth Lodges Renovation and Activation. . . .$500,000

Coupeville Boys & Girls Club Construction Project. . . .$391,000

Dylan Jude Harrell Community Center Gymnasium. . . .$384,000

EYFO Youth Enrichment Center. . . .$1,200,000

GHHS Safe Learning Spaces. . . .$254,000

Multicultural Youth Recreation Facility. . . .$226,000

OIC Excel Youth Center. . . .$1,054,000

The Lummi Nation BGC Facility Improvement Project. . . .$340,000
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,349,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$17,396,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$21,745,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1018. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Capital Pre-Development Funding (40000293)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1019. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Clean Energy Fund Program (40000294)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for competitive grants to eligible entities for predevelopment, design, and construction of projects that provide a public benefit through research, development, demonstration, or deployment of clean energy technologies that save energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions, or increase energy independence for the state. Priority must be given to projects that benefit vulnerable populations and overburdened communities, including tribes.

(2) Entities eligible for grant funding under this section are local governments, federally recognized tribal governments and tribes' contracted service providers, public and private utilities that serve retail customers in the state, nonprofit organizations, and state agencies.

(3) To be eligible, a project must be consistent with the state energy strategy adopted under chapter 43.21F RCW and policies under chapter 19.405 RCW. To the extent practicable, the department must prioritize projects that build upon Washington's strengths in aerospace, maritime, information and communications technology, grid modernization, advanced materials, and decarbonizing the built environment.

(4) The department must invite stakeholders to participate in the design and implementation of grant programs funded under this section. The department must consider equity and environmental justice when developing the program structure and opportunities for applicant participation.

(5) When soliciting and evaluating proposals, awarding contracts, and monitoring projects under this section, the department must:

(a) Ensure that competitive processes, rather than sole source contracting processes, are used to select all projects, except as otherwise noted in this section;

(b) Ensure that a public benefit results from the use of public funds through due diligence and monitoring of contracted projects, including ensuring compliance with all applicable laws related to the project selection process, project monitoring, and contracting; and

(c) Prioritize projects for funding that leverage the greatest amount of matching funds, such as local levy funding.

(6)(a) The department must require project applicants to:

(i) Disclose all sources of public funding invested in a project; and

(ii) Identify by name any former or current state of Washington employees employed by the applicant or its governing body in the 24 months preceding the application submittal. The identification must include the person's separation date and job title or position held. If the department determines that a conflict of interest or other violation of chapter 42.52 RCW exists, the application must be disqualified from further consideration.

(b) If, after a grant has been awarded, the department finds that a grantee has violated chapter 42.52 RCW, either in procuring or performing under the grant, the department in its sole discretion may terminate the grant funding by written notice. If the grant is terminated, the department must reserve its right to pursue all available remedies under law to address the violation.

(7) The department must specify the requirements in subsections (5) and (6) of this section in funding contracts entered into by the department under this section.

(8) $10,000,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to tribes for clean energy development projects. Eligible uses of grant funding include planning, predesign, design, construction, project predevelopment, and deployment of clean energy projects that contribute to achieving the state's greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals and related policies. The department must collaborate with tribes in the design and development of this grant program.

(9) $10,000,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for state match for federal funding that aligns with subsection (1) of this section and accelerates meeting state clean energy and climate goals. Funding may be used to match federal grants to the state or nonstate entities for clean energy research, development, and demonstration projects.

(10) $20,000,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation in the section is provided solely for grants for strategic research, development, and demonstration of new and emerging clean energy generation and storage technologies and climate change mitigation technologies, including greenhouse gas removal. Grants awarded under this subsection must reduce reliance on fossil fuels, reduce risk of irregularities in power supply, offer opportunities for economic and job growth, and strengthen technology supply chains. Grant funds are intended to catalyze diverse new technologies that change production, use, storage, and transportation of energy. The department may provide funding to projects at various stages of readiness, including early-stage research, pilot and demonstration projects, and dual use projects that produce clean energy and additional benefits.

(11) $15,000,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation in the section and $5,000,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation in this section are provided solely for grants for electrical grid integration and innovation projects. To be eligible, a project must develop and demonstrate distributed energy resources, as defined in RCW 19.405.020, and nonwire alternatives that advance community resilience, support implementation of demand response and sustainable microgrids, improve integration of renewable energy and energy storage, and accelerate beneficial load integration and demand management for building electrification, equipment electrification, and electric vehicle charging.

(12) The department must strive to allocate all of the amounts appropriated in this section within the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium in the manner prescribed in each subsection. However, no sooner than January 1, 2024, if upon review of applications the department determines there are not adequate suitable projects in a category, the department may reallocate funding among the purposes of the subsections of this section. Beginning January 1, 2024, the department must provide quarterly notice of any funding reallocations to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$45,000,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$15,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$60,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$240,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$300,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1020. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Health Care Infrastructure (91002197)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Chelan Valley EMS/Access to Health Care

Infrastructure (Chelan). . . .$11,000,000

Confluence Health: Radiation Treatment (Moses

Lake). . . .$3,800,000

Jefferson Reproductive and Gynecological Health

(Port Townsend). . . .$4,000,000

Samaritan Hospital (Moses Lake). . . .$8,418,000

Tubman Center for Health & Freedom (Seattle). . . .$11,700,000

(2) No sooner than January 1, 2024, to accommodate changes in projects' scopes or costs, the department may transfer up to 20 percent of any unused funding appropriated in this section between the projects identified in subsection (1) of this section, subject to the approval of the affected public facility.

(3) The department may not expend funding for a project in this section unless and until the nonstate share of that project's costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(4) Prior to receiving funding, grant recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to grants for preconstruction activities or grants in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the department finds the grantee to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$38,918,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$38,918,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1021. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Youth Shelters and Housing (91001682)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Community Youth Services (Olympia). . . .$200,000

Housing and Services for Youth Wellness (Seattle). . . .$5,000,000

OlyCap Pfeiffer House (Port Townsend). . . .$70,000

ROOTS Young Adult Shelter Phase 2 Renovations

(Seattle). . . .$1,500,000

Safe Harbor Support Center (Kennewick). . . .$300,000

Serenity House (Port Angeles). . . .$50,000

Shelton Young Adult Transitional Housing (Shelton). . . .$1,200,000

Skagit Valley Family YMCA (Mt. Vernon). . . .$2,200,000

VOA Crosswalk 2.0 (Spokane). . . .$2,500,000

YouthCare. . . .$1,500,000

(2) No sooner than January 1, 2024, to accommodate changes in projects' scopes or costs, the department may transfer up to 20 percent of any unused funding appropriated in this section between the projects identified in subsection (1) of this section, subject to the approval of the affected public facility.

(3) The department may not expend funding for a project in this section unless and until the nonstate share of that project's costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(4) Prior to receiving funding, grant recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to grants for preconstruction activities or grants in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the department finds the grantee to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$14,520,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,520,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1022. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Housing Trust Fund (40000295)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $192,877,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation and $2,623,000 of the capital community assistance account—state appropriation are provided solely for the new construction, acquisition, or rehabilitation of affordable housing projects that serve and benefit low-income and special needs populations including, but not limited to, people with chronic mental illness or behavioral health conditions, farmworkers, people who are homeless, and people in need of permanent supportive housing. The department shall strive to invest at least 20 percent of the appropriation provided under this subsection with by and for organizations, as defined by the office of equity.

(2) $25,000,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for affordable housing projects that serve and benefit low-income people with developmental or intellectual disabilities. The department must use a separate application form and evaluation criteria for applications under this subsection. The department must coordinate with the department of social and health services regarding any needed supportive services and make efforts to enact the recommendations of the housing needs study for individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities, as provided in section 1068(6), chapter 332, Laws of 2021.

(3) $100,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the apple health and homes rapid permanent supportive housing program created in chapter 216, Laws of 2022. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:

(a) $5,000,000 is provided solely for the St. Agnes Haven project in Spokane; and

(b) $5,100,000 is provided solely for the Kenmore Supportive Housing project in Kenmore.

(4) $39,000,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for awards to organizations eligible under RCW 43.185A.040 for the development of homeownership projects affordable to first-time low-income households throughout the state. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $14,000,000 is provided solely for Tacoma-Pierce county habitat for humanity to acquire and rehabilitate single family homes from the Pierce county housing authority. Projects serving homebuyers whose income is up to 80 percent of the area median income, adjusted for household size, for the county where the property is located are eligible to apply, except that projects located in rural areas of the state, as defined by the department, serving homebuyers whose income is up to 100 percent of the area median income, adjusted for household size, for the county where the property is located are eligible to apply. Eligible activities include, but are not limited to, down payment assistance, closing costs, acquisition, rehabilitation costs, and new construction. Eligible organizations may include those that plan to provide housing to socially disadvantaged communities as defined in 13 C.F.R. Sec. 124.103. The department shall strive to invest at least 50 percent of these funds with by and for organizations, as defined by the office of equity, and make efforts to enact the recommendations of the homeownership disparities work group created in section 128(100), chapter 297, Laws of 2022. In addition to the definition in RCW 43.185A.010, for the purposes of awarding funds to homeownership projects during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, "first-time home buyer" also includes:

(a) A single parent who has only owned a home with a former spouse while married;

(b) An individual who is a displaced homemaker as defined in 24 C.F.R. Sec. 93.2 as it existed on the effective date of this section, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section, and who has only owned a home with a spouse;

(c) An individual who has only owned a principal residence not permanently affixed to a permanent foundation in accordance with applicable regulations; or

(d) An individual who has only owned a property that is discerned by a licensed building inspector as being uninhabitable.

(5) $25,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for affordable housing preservation projects, which may include, but are not limited to:

(a) Projects preserving and extending the affordability commitment period for projects in the housing trust fund portfolio. The funds may be provided for major building improvements, preservation, and system replacements, necessary for the existing housing trust fund portfolio to maintain long-term viability. The department must require a capital needs assessment be provided prior to contract execution. Funds may not be used to add or expand the capacity of the property. When allocating funds, the department must prioritize buildings that are older than 15 years and that serve very low-income and extremely low-income populations.

(b) Projects preserving affordable multifamily housing at risk of losing its affordability due to expiration of use restrictions that otherwise require affordability including, but not limited to, United States department of agriculture funded multifamily housing. The department must prioritize projects that satisfy the goal of long-term preservation of Washington's affordable multifamily housing stock, particularly in rural areas of the state. Funds may be used for acquisition or for acquisition and rehabilitation of properties to preserve the affordable housing units beyond their existing use restrictions and keep them in Washington's housing portfolio for a minimum of 40 years. If a capital needs assessment is required, the department must work with the applicant to ensure that this does not create an unnecessary impediment to rapidly accessing these funds.

(c) The funding provided under this subsection (5) is not subject to the 90-day application periods in RCW 43.185.070 or 43.185A.050.

(d) The amount awarded under this subsection (5) may not be calculated in award limitations for other housing trust fund awards.

(6) $2,000,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for a grant to the northwest cooperative development center to provide subgrants for the acquisition and preservation of mobile or manufactured home communities. Funding provided under this subsection may be used to acquire mobile or manufactured home communities for the purpose of avoiding household displacement due to sale or other transactions and ensuring preservation of housing affordability for low-income households for a minimum of 40 years.

(7) $2,000,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for a grant to the northwest cooperative development center to provide subgrants to organizations that are "mobile home park cooperatives" or "manufactured housing cooperatives" under RCW 59.20.030 for completing capital improvement processes. Subgrants provided under this subsection may be used solely for critical improvements, repairs, and infrastructure upgrades to promote the preservation of mobile or manufactured home communities as affordable housing. The grantee must award subgrants based on needs relating to health, safety, and cost.

(8) $11,500,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Gravelly Lake Commons at LASA (Lakewood). . . .$500,000

Leavenworth Affordable Workforce Rental Housing

(Leavenworth). . . .$1,000,000

Mary's Place Shelter Replacement (Burien). . . .$6,000,000

Mount Zion Housing (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

Skyway Affordable Housing (Skyway). . . .$3,000,000

(9) In evaluating projects in this section, the department must give preference for applications based on some or all of the criteria in RCW 43.185.070(5).

(10) The appropriations in this section are subject to the following reporting requirements:

(a) The department must report on its website the following for every previous funding cycle: The number of homeownership and multifamily rental projects funded by housing trust fund moneys; the percentage of housing trust fund investments made to homeownership and multifamily rental projects; and the total number of households being served at up to 80 percent of the area median income, up to 50 percent of the area median income, and up to 30 percent of the area median income, for both homeownership and multifamily rental projects.

(b) By November 1, 2023, and November 1, 2024, the department must provide the legislature and the governor with a report of its final cost data for each project under this section. Such cost data must, at a minimum, include total development cost per unit for each project completed within the past year, descriptive statistics such as average and median per unit costs, regional cost variation, and other costs that the department deems necessary to improve cost controls and enhance understanding of development costs. The department must coordinate with the housing finance commission to identify relevant development costs data and ensure that the measures are consistent across relevant agencies.

(11) The department shall strive to allocate at least 30 percent of the funds provided in this section to projects located in rural areas of the state, as defined by the department.

(12) The department must strive to allocate all of the amounts appropriated in this section within the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium in the manner prescribed in each subsection. However, if upon review of applications the department determines there are not adequate suitable projects in a category, the department may allocate funds to other affordable housing projects serving other low-income and special needs populations, provided those projects are located in an area with an identified need for the type of housing proposed.
Appropriation:

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$2,623,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$136,500,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$260,877,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$400,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,608,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,008,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1023. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Connecting Housing to Infrastructure (CHIP) (40000296)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants or deferred loans to local governments and public utility districts or their contracted service providers for system development charges and utility improvements for new affordable housing projects that serve and benefit low-income households. Where applicable, the extension must be consistent with the approved comprehensive plans under the growth management act and must be within the established boundaries of the urban growth area.

(2) $48,202,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants or deferred loans to local governments or public utilities located within a jurisdiction that impose a sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.530(1) (a)(ii) or (b)(i)(B), 82.14.540, or 84.52.105.

(3) $26,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to local governments or public utilities located within:

(a) A city or county with a population of 150,000 or less; and

(b) A jurisdiction that imposed a sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.530(1) (a)(ii) or (b)(i)(B).

(4) $798,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Habitat for Humanity Infrastructure Project in Kennewick and Walla Walla.

(5) To be eligible for funding under this section, an applicant must demonstrate, at minimum:

(a) That affordable housing development will begin construction within 24 months of the grant or loan award; and

(b) A strong probability of serving the original target group or income level for a period of at least 25 years.

(6) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply.

(a) "Affordable housing" has the same meaning as in RCW 43.185A.010.

(b) "Low-income household" has the same meaning as in RCW 43.185A.010.

(c) "System development charges" means charges for new drinking water, wastewater, or stormwater connections when a local government or public utility has waived standard fees normally applied to developers for connection charges on affordable housing projects.

(d) "Utility improvements" means drinking water, wastewater, or stormwater utility improvements.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$75,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$80,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$155,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1024. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Transit Oriented Housing Development Partnership Match (40000298)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5466 (transit-oriented development). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the appropriations in this section shall lapse.
Appropriation:

General Fund—Private/Local
. . . .
$25,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$25,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$50,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$200,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$250,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1025. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Behavioral Health Community Capacity Grants (40000299)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to issue grants to community hospitals or other community providers to expand and establish new capacity for behavioral health services in communities. The department must consult an advisory group consisting of representatives from the department of social and health services, the health care authority, one representative from a managed care organization, one representative from an accountable care organization, and one representative from the association of county human services. Amounts provided in this section may be used for construction and equipment costs associated with establishment or preservation of the facilities. The department may approve funding for the acquisition of a facility if the project will result in increased behavioral health capacity. Amounts provided in this section may not be used for operating costs associated with the treatment of patients using these services.

(2) In awarding funding for projects in subsection (5) of this section, the department must establish criteria for the issuance of the grants, which must include:

(a) Evidence that the application was developed in collaboration with one or more regional behavioral health entities that administer the purchasing of services;

(b) Evidence that the applicant has assessed and would meet gaps in geographical availability of behavioral health services in their region;

(c) Evidence that the applicant is able to meet applicable licensing and certification requirements in the facility that will be used to provide services;

(d) A commitment by applicants to serve persons who are publicly funded and persons detained for involuntary commitment under chapter 71.05 RCW;

(e) A commitment by the applicant to maintain and operate the beds or facility for a time period commensurate to the state investment, but for at least a 10-year period;

(f) The date upon which structural modifications or construction would begin and the anticipated date of completion of the project;

(g) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with opening the beds;

(h) A financial plan demonstrating the applicant's ability to maintain and operate the facility; and

(i) The applicant's commitment to work with local courts and prosecutors to ensure that prosecutors and courts in the area served by the hospital or facility will be available to conduct involuntary commitment hearings and proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW.

(3) In awarding funding for projects in subsection (5) of this section, the department, in consultation with the advisory group established in subsection (1) of this section, must strive for geographic distribution and to allocate funding based on population and service needs of an area. The department must consider current services available, anticipated services available based on projects underway, and the service delivery needs of an area.

(4) The department must prioritize projects that increase capacity in unserved and underserved areas of the state.

(5)(a) $34,765,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for competitive community behavioral health grants to address regional needs. The department must give priority to facilities that:

(i) Serve individuals who will be transitioned from or diverted from the state hospitals; and

(ii) Have confirmed that the health care authority, department of social and health services, or a managed care organization plans to contract with the facility for operating costs.

(b) $31,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to intensive behavioral health treatment facilities for long-term placement of behavioral health patients with complex needs and that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases.

(c) $28,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to community providers to increase behavioral health services and capacity for children and minor youth including, but not limited to, services for substance use disorder treatment, sexual assault and traumatic stress, anxiety, or depression, children with behavioral health and intellectual or developmental disability needs, and interventions for children exhibiting aggressive or depressive behaviors in facilities that are not subject to federal funding restrictions. Consideration must be given to programs that incorporate outreach and treatment for youth dealing with behavioral health or social isolation issues.

(6) The amounts provided in this subsection are subject to the criteria in subsection (1) of this section, except the projects are not required to establish new capacity:

(a) $22,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to community providers to prevent the closure of existing behavioral health facilities. For purposes of this subsection (6)(a), the department must implement necessary procedures to enable rapid commitment of funds on a first-come, first-served basis to qualifying project proposals that satisfy the goal of long-term preservation of behavioral health facilities.

(b) $95,235,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Center for Alcohol & Drug Treatment New Facility

(Wenatchee). . . .$19,600,000

CRMHS Satellite Building Project (Vancouver). . . .$2,500,000

Evergreen Treatment Services (Seattle). . . .$6,000,000

Jamestown S'Klallam Behavior Health Center

(Sequim). . . .$13,000,000

Lummi Nation Substance Abuse Treatment

(Bellingham). . . .$5,000,000

Lynnwood Community Recovery Center (Lynnwood). . . .$1,275,000

Nisqually Tribe Healing Village (Olympia). . . .$6,000,000

Recovery Innovations Crisis Stabilization (Federal

Way). . . .$1,900,000

SeaMar Youth Crisis Center (Seattle). . . .$480,000

SIHB Thunderbird Treatment Center (Vashon). . . .$1,030,000

Skagit County Crisis Stabilization Center (SCCSC)

(Sedro-Woolley). . . .$12,700,000

Substance Use Disorder & Mental Health Inpatient

Treatment (Yakima). . . .$11,750,000

Three Rivers Behavioral Health Center (Kennewick). . . .$5,000,000

Whatcom 23-Hour Crisis Relief Center (Bellingham). . . .$9,000,000

(7) The department shall notify all applicants that they may be required to have a construction review performed by the department of health.

(8) To accommodate the emergent need for behavioral health services, the department and the department of health, in collaboration with the health care authority and the department of social and health services, must establish a concurrent and expedited process to assist grant applicants in meeting any applicable regulatory requirements necessary to operate inpatient psychiatric beds, freestanding evaluation and treatment facilities, enhanced services facilities, triage facilities, crisis stabilization facilities, or secure detoxification/secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities.

(9) The department must strive to allocate all of the amounts provided in this section in the manner prescribed in each subsection. However, if upon review of applications, the department determines, in consultation with the advisory group established in subsection (1) of this section, that there are not adequate suitable projects in a category, the department may allocate funding to other project categories listed in this section, prioritizing projects that support serving individuals who will be transitioned from or diverted from the state hospitals. Underserved areas of the state may also be considered.

(10) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that the grantee or successor hold the capital improvements for at least a 10-year period. The provisions must require the facility to be used for behavioral health services, but may allow the facility to change ownership or facility type during the commitment period. The department shall monitor the activities of recipients of grants under this program to determine compliance with the terms and conditions set forth in its contract.

(11) The department must provide a progress report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1, 2024. The report must include:

(a) The total number of applications and amount of funding requested;

(b) A list and description of the projects approved for funding including state funding, total project cost, services anticipated to be provided, bed capacity, and anticipated completion date;

(c) A statewide map of new capacity since 2018, including projected bed capacity and opening dates;

(d) A status report of projects that received funding in prior funding rounds, including details about the project completion and the date the facility began providing services; and

(e) Recommendations for statutory language that would codify the grant program on an ongoing basis including:

(i) Evaluation and prioritization criteria;

(ii) Monitoring and compliance requirements;

(iii) Preconstruction and technical assistance services; and

(iv) Data needed to determine the service needs by area of the state.

(12) The department must coordinate with the health care authority to submit capital budget requests to fund behavioral health community capacity grants for the 2025-2027 biennial budget by the due date established by the office of financial management. Associated state budget operating costs must also be identified and requested.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$211,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$211,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1026. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Early Learning Facilities Fund Grant Program (40000300)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $5,000,000 of the Ruth Lecocq Kagi early learning facilities development account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for minor renovation grants.

(2) $54,500,000 of the Ruth Lecocq Kagi early learning facilities development account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the early learning facility grant and loan program, subject to the provisions of RCW 43.31.573 through 43.31.583 and 43.84.092, to provide state assistance for designing, constructing, purchasing, expanding, or modernizing public or private early learning education facilities for eligible organizations. Up to four percent of the funding in this subsection may be used by the department of children, youth, and families to provide technical assistance to early learning providers interested in applying for the early learning facility grant or loan program.

(3) The department of children, youth, and families must develop methodology to identify, at the school district boundary level, the geographic locations of where early childhood education and assistance program slots are needed to meet the entitlement specified in RCW 43.216.556. This methodology must be linked to the caseload forecast produced by the caseload forecast council and must include estimates of the number of slots needed at each school district. This methodology must inform any early learning facilities needs assessment conducted by the department and the department of children, youth, and families. This methodology must be included as part of the budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030.

(4) When prioritizing areas with the highest unmet need for early childhood education and assistance program slots, the committee of early learning experts convened by the department pursuant to RCW 43.31.581 must first consider those areas at risk of not meeting the entitlement specified in RCW 43.216.556.

(5) The department must track the number of slots being renovated separately from the number of slots being constructed and, within these categories, must track the number of slots separately by program for the working connections child care program and the early childhood education and assistance program.

(6) When prioritizing applications for projects pursuant to RCW 43.31.581, the department must award priority points to applications from a rural county or from extreme child care deserts as defined by the department of children, youth, and families.

(7) For early learning facilities collocated with affordable or supportive housing developments, the department may remit state funding on a reimbursement basis for 100 percent of eligible project costs, regardless of the project's match amount, once the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed in an amount sufficient to complete the entire project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public as an early learning facility. These projects are not subject to section 8015 of this act or RCW 43.88.150.

(8) It is the intent of the legislature to reappropriate funding in the 2023-2025 omnibus capital appropriations act for early learning facilities appropriated in this section.

(9) $10,500,000 of the Ruth Lecocq Kagi early learning facilities development account—state appropriation is provided solely for the following list of early learning facility projects:

Cora Whitley Family Center (Tacoma). . . .$2,500,000

Eastside Early Childhood Center (Bellevue). . . .$1,000,000

New Tomorrow's Hope Child Development Center

(Everett). . . .$1,000,000

Northgate Jose Marti Early Learning Center

(Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

Rainier Valley Early Learning Center (Seattle). . . .$2,000,000

YMCA Early Learning Center (Port Angeles). . . .$2,000,000

Young Child & Family Center, North Thurston PS

(Olympia). . . .$1,000,000
Appropriation:

Ruth Lecocq Kagi Early Learning Facilities

Development Account—State
. . . .
$70,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$280,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$350,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1027. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2024 Local and Community Projects (40000301)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department shall not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards under chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only and may not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department shall include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The department must comply with the requirements set forth in executive order 21-02 and must consult with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes on the potential effects of these projects on cultural resources and historic properties. Consultation with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes must be initiated before project funds are made available.

(8) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

ACT Historic Landmark Roof Restoration (Seattle). . . .$538,000

ADA For Northwest Center Janitorial (Spokane

Valley). . . .$20,000

Admiral Theatre Facility Improvements (Bremerton). . . .$165,000

African Diaspora Cultural Anchor Village (SeaTac). . . .$500,000

Agricultural Innovation Center (Pasco). . . .$200,000

Airway Heights Public Safety (Airway Heights). . . .$1,340,000

Algona Wetland Preserve Interpretive Trail

(Algona). . . .$600,000

American Indian Community Center (Spokane). . . .$500,000

American Legion Post 79 Roof Replacement

(Snoqualmie). . . .$49,000

Anderson Island Multipurpose Building (Anderson

Island). . . .$257,000

Angleside Reservoir Capacity Upgrades (Shelton). . . .$1,850,000

Arlington Commercial Kitchen (Arlington). . . .$581,000

ARTE NOIR Capital Construction Completion

(Seattle). . . .$381,000

Asbestos Abatement Old City Hall (Benton City). . . .$309,000

Asia Pacific Cultural Center (Tacoma). . . .$1,000,000

Auburn Avenue Theater Rebuild (Auburn). . . .$1,545,000

B5 Community Learning Center (Kennewick). . . .$773,000

Bridge Meadows Pre-Development (Tacoma). . . .$515,000

Bringing It Home II 24-Hour Domestic Violence

Shelter (Yakima). . . .$125,000

Browse Infrastructure (Seattle). . . .$144,000

Camas Library Safety & Accessibility Exterior

(Camas). . . .$258,000

Camp Thunderbird Wastewater Treatment Facility

(Olympia). . . .$618,000

Capitol Land Trust Public Access Preconstruction

(Olympia). . . .$77,000

Cedarwood Community Recreation Ctr Redevelopment

(Lake Stevens). . . .$1,123,000

Center Senior Living Housing Development (Grand

Coulee). . . .$361,000

Central Colville Apartments (Colville). . . .$52,000

Central Whidbey Fire & Rescue Station 53

(Coupeville). . . .$2,750,000

Centralia Quad Infield Turf Project (Centralia). . . .$2,480,000

Chelan Butte Acquisition Feasibility Study

(Chelan). . . .$125,000

Children's Therapy Center (University Place). . . .$500,000

Chinese Reconciliation Project Design (Tacoma). . . .$400,000

City Hall Structural Assessment (Toledo). . . .$53,000

City of Selah Wastewater Treatment Plant

Improvements (Selah). . . .$1,442,000

Clallam Joint Public Safety Facility (Port

Angeles). . . .$5,750,000

Colfax Community Center (Colfax). . . .$72,000

Colfax Pool (Colfax). . . .$1,030,000

Columbia Grove Community Playground (East

Wenatchee). . . .$72,000

Communications Devices for Officials (Olympia). . . .$15,000

Community Center at Lake Chelan (Chelan). . . .$1,723,000

Community Center Roof Replacement (Aberdeen). . . .$165,000

Community Homes Renovations 41st LD (Bellevue). . . .$106,000

Community Homes Renovations 48th LD (Bellevue). . . .$243,000

Community Homes Renovations 45th LD (Woodinville). . . .$77,000

Community Homes Upgrades 1st LD (Bothell). . . .$104,000

Conconully Service Complex/Fire Hall (Conconully). . . .$2,050,000

Coupeville Food Bank & Workforce Housing

Apartments (Coupeville). . . .$230,000

Cross Kirkland Corridor 132nd Avenue NE

Improvements (Kirkland). . . .$515,000

deWilde Rugby Fields (Ferndale). . . .$150,000

Diking District 7 Fish Passage and Levee

(Stanwood). . . .$1,900,000

Dishman Hills Conservancy Education Ctr Site

Planning (Spokane). . . .$46,000

Downtown Pasco North Plaza (Pasco). . . .$155,000

Eagle Track Raceway Stadium Light Project

(Republic). . . .$117,000

East Hill North Community Park Phase 1 (Kent). . . .$1,000,000

Edmonds Center for the Arts Design (Edmonds). . . .$200,000

Ejidos Community Farm (Everson). . . .$400,000

El Centro de la Raza Federal Way Campus (Federal

Way). . . .$1,545,000

Ellensburg Rodeo Grandstands (Ellensburg). . . .$1,030,000

Emergency Operation Generator (Coupeville). . . .$386,000

Emergency Shelter Capital Improvements (Shelton). . . .$103,000

Enumclaw Community Center (Enumclaw). . . .$500,000

EWAM Handicap Parking Improvement Project

(Pomeroy). . . .$98,000

Fall City Business District Septic Project (Fall

City). . . .$1,550,000

Family Resource Center at Cedar Crossing (Seattle). . . .$360,000

Felts Field Gateway Improvement (Spokane). . . .$515,000

Ferndale Civic and Community Organization Campus

(Ferndale). . . .$3,050,000

Fife Aquatic & Community Center Improvements

(Fife). . . .$1,500,000

Fire Panel Replacement & Integration (Seattle). . . .$294,000

FISH Food Bank Expansion (Ellensburg). . . .$573,000

Foothills Trail Crossing at Main Street (Buckley). . . .$128,000

Free Clinic & Central Construction Project (Walla

Walla). . . .$515,000

Ft Steilacoom Park Nisqually Indian Tribe

Improvements (Lakewood). . . .$309,000

Gibson Hall Improvement Project (Issaquah). . . .$206,000

Glen Tana (Spokane). . . .$3,000,000

Golden Tiger Multi-Use Trail Phase 2 (Republic). . . .$168,000

Goldendale Municipal Airport - Land Acquisition

(Goldendale). . . .$361,000

Greater Wenatchee Irrigation Dist Infrastructure

(East Wenatchee). . . .$2,000,000

Greenwood Early Learning Playground (Seattle). . . .$68,000

Heritage Heights Remodel and Conversion to Medical

Care (Chelan). . . .$824,000

High Prairie Fire District 14 Emergency

Preparedness (Lyle). . . .$248,000

Highland Park Improvement Club Rebuild (Seattle). . . .$500,000

Historic Lamar Cabin Preservation (Prescott). . . .$267,000

HUB Sports Fields (Liberty Lake). . . .$1,030,000

ICOM 911 Microwave Radio Broadband System (Oak

Harbor). . . .$500,000

Interurban Trail War Memorials (Pacific). . . .$400,000

Issaquah Senior Ctr Veterans Memorial Consolidated

Prk (Issaquah). . . .$721,000

Japanese American Exclusion Memorial Vis Ctr

(Bainbridge Island). . . .$350,000

Kalama Creek Hatchery Renovation (Olympia). . . .$3,350,000

KCFD #50 Generator (Baring). . . .$20,000

Kelso School District-Construction & Renovation

Projects (Kelso). . . .$165,000

Kelso Train Station Roof Replacement (Kelso). . . .$412,000

Kennewick Kiwanis Playground (Kennewick). . . .$258,000

King Street Station Creative Youth Empowerment Hub

(Seattle). . . .$500,000

Kirkland Performance Center Safety Improvements

(Kirkland). . . .$1,287,000

Klineline Bridge and ADA Improvements (Vancouver). . . .$1,365,000

Kulshan View (Mount Vernon). . . .$309,000

Lacamas Lake Water Improvements (Camas). . . .$515,000

Lake Chelan Food Bank Building Remodel & Addition

(Chelan). . . .$2,000,000

Lake Hills Clubhouse Renovation (Bellevue). . . .$583,000

Lake Wilderness Arboretum Improvements (Maple

Valley). . . .$450,000

Larson Playfield Irrigation Conversion (Moses

Lake). . . .$258,000

Latah Water System Rehabilitation Project (Latah). . . .$180,000

Latino Community Service Center (Lynnwood). . . .$515,000

Lynden Senior and Community Center (Lynden). . . .$309,000

Lynnwood Neighborhood Center (Lynnwood). . . .$2,050,000

Manson Fire Station - Training Room and Living

Quarters (Manson). . . .$206,000

Marshall Park Inclusive Community Playground

(Vancouver). . . .$685,000

Mason County Jail Expansion (Shelton). . . .$1,030,000

Mason PUD 1 Vuecrest Water System Storage Project

(Union). . . .$618,000

Masonic Building Roof Renovation (Centralia). . . .$170,000

Menastash Grange Revitalization and Expansion

(Ellensburg). . . .$85,000

Mental Health Quiet Room (Moses Lake). . . .$31,000

Mill Creek City Hall North Renovation (Mill Creek). . . .$515,000

Mill Creek Multiuse Recreational Property (Mill

Creek). . . .$1,030,000

Modernization of Pacific County Jail Facility

(South Bend). . . .$464,000

Muslim American Youth Foundation Center (Burien). . . .$500,000

New Beginnings Homes (Puyallup). . . .$440,000

No. County Rec. Association Youth Sports (Castle

Rock). . . .$164,000

North Fork Skykomish River 911 Extension Project

(Index). . . .$420,000

North Seattle Boys & Girls Clubs Flooring

Replacement (Seattle). . . .$134,000

Oak Harbor Boys & Girls Club Sports Court (Oak

Harbor). . . .$250,000

Oak Harbor Economic Development (Oak Harbor). . . .$200,000

ODT Land Purchase (Port Townsend). . . .$750,000

Olympic Discovery Trail Anderson Lake Extension

(Chimacum). . . .$1,397,000

Othello's Regional Water Plan (Othello). . . .$412,000

Pasado's Safe Haven Water and Safety Upgrades

(Monroe). . . .$485,000

Peninsula Senior Activity (Ocean Park). . . .$272,000

PenMet Parks Community Recreation Center (Gig

Harbor). . . .$1,030,000

Perfect Passage (Tonasket). . . .$730,000

Port Gamble Shoreline Restoration (Port Gamble). . . .$2,400,000

Port of Allyn Public Pier Replacement (Allyn). . . .$515,000

Port of Anacortes T-Dock Reconfiguration

(Anacortes). . . .$1,000,000

Port of Mattawa Event Center Phase 3 Upgrade

Project (Mattawa). . . .$361,000

Port of Skamania Cascades Business Park (North

Bonneville). . . .$1,000,000

Port of Willapa Harbor (South Bend). . . .$800,000

Port Orchard Breakwater Replacement (Port Orchard). . . .$1,000,000

Port Remediation (Olympia). . . .$2,200,000

Puyallup Elks Roof Replacement (Puyallup). . . .$370,000

Refugee Welcoming & Healing Center (SeaTac). . . .$250,000

Regional Athletic Complex Transformer Upgrade

(Olympia). . . .$103,000

Remembrance Gallery (Puyallup). . . .$257,000

Renovation and Addition to RP Theater Building

(Richland). . . .$350,000

Republic Community Library (Republic). . . .$183,000

Reservoir Capacity & Seismic (Battle Ground). . . .$1,288,000

Ritzville Legion Hall Renovation (Ritzville). . . .$165,000

Ritzville Rodeo Bleachers Replacement (Ritzville). . . .$187,000

Roslyn Old City Hall Community Center (Roslyn). . . .$77,000

Sam Chastain Trail (Renton). . . .$500,000

School Based Health Care Facility (Tacoma). . . .$515,000

Scott Hill Park & Sports Complex of Woodland

(Woodland). . . .$350,000

Search & Rescue Headquarters Feasibility Study

(Snoqualmie). . . .$103,000

Seattle Public Theater Accessibility Upgrades

(Seattle). . . .$77,000

Short's Farm Purchase (Chimacum). . . .$1,000,000

Slavonian Hall (Tacoma). . . .$472,000

Snohomish Boys & Girls Club Teen Center

(Snohomish). . . .$412,000

Snoqualmie Valley Youth Center Barn with Storage

(North Bend). . . .$231,000

South Thurston Fire & EMS New Fire Station

(Tenino). . . .$3,050,000

South UGA Water and Sewer Extensions (Kennewick). . . .$1,122,000

South Whidbey Aquatic Wellness Center (Langley). . . .$360,000

SPARC Capital Campaign (Mount Vernon). . . .$750,000

Spokane Civic Theatre Facility (Spokane). . . .$1,500,000

Stanwood Art Center Design (Stanwood). . . .$200,000

Stonerose Fossil Center (Republic). . . .$721,000

Sue Bird and Lenny Wilkens Statues (Seattle). . . .$412,000

Tam O'Shanter Multi-Purpose Court Fencing and

Lighting (Kelso). . . .$46,000

Tenino Stone Carvers Guild Workshop and Classroom

(Tenino). . . .$160,000

Terminal 4 Expansion & Redevelopment Project

(Aberdeen). . . .$3,500,000

Thun Field - Emergency Response and Meeting Space

(Puyallup). . . .$1,000,000

Town of Elmer City Fire Station Improvements

(Elmer City). . . .$537,000

Town of Index Water Line Repair and Replacement

(Index). . . .$628,000

Tukwila Community Center HVAC Replacement

(Tukwila). . . .$250,000

Tukwila Immigrant & Refugee Wadajir Land

Acquisition (Tukwila). . . .$2,250,000

Tulalip Creek Hatchery (Marysville). . . .$1,000,000

United Way Elevator and Disability Access (Tacoma). . . .$129,000

VFW Post 2224 Critical Renovations (Puyallup). . . .$206,000

Village Theatre's Francis J Gaudette HVAC

Replacement (Issaquah). . . .$489,000

Wallace Heights Septic Elimination Program

(Vancouver). . . .$500,000

Wastewater Treatment System Upgrades (Long Beach). . . .$340,000

Weld Seattle Reentry Resource Center (Seattle). . . .$5,000,000

Wenatchee Valley Museum Expansion and Redesign

(Wenatchee). . . .$1,000,000

Wenatchee Valley YMCA (Wenatchee). . . .$1,030,000

West Biddle Lake Dam Restoration (Vancouver). . . .$412,000

What-Comm Dispatch Center (Bellingham). . . .$1,000,000

White Center Community Hub (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

Wilkeson Infrastructure (Wilkeson). . . .$824,000

Windermere Park Playground (Longview). . . .$155,000

WRF Upgrades Solid Side (Yelm). . . .$442,000

Yakama Nation "Creator Law Sculpture" (Roslyn). . . .$99,000

Yakima Co Fire Emergency Responder Radio System

(Yakima). . . .$139,000

Yakima County Fire District 12 Wildfire Response

(Yakima). . . .$38,000
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$133,849,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$600,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$733,849,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1028. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Dental Capacity Grants (92001393)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding provided in this section must be used for the construction and equipment directly associated with dental facilities. The funding provided in this section is for projects that are maintained for at least a 10-year period and provide capacity to address unmet patient need and increase efficiency in dental access.

(2) The amount provided in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

CVCH East Wenatchee Dental Clinic (East Wenatchee). . . .$1,850,000

HealthPoint (Seattle). . . .$490,000

Lake Roosevelt Community Health Center (Inchelium). . . .$160,000

Lake Roosevelt Community Health Center (Keller). . . .$80,000

Neighborcare Health (Seattle). . . .$1,800,000

Peninsula Community Health Services (Bremerton). . . .$495,000

Seattle Indian Health Board (Seattle). . . .$305,000
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,180,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$6,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,180,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1029. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Dental Community Partnerships (92001399)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

PNWU Dental School (Yakima). . . .$5,943,000

Yakima Valley Farm Workers Clinic (Kennewick). . . .$4,000,000
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,943,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,943,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1030. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Tribal Climate Adaptation Pass-through Grants (40000421)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to provide tribal assistance to mitigate and adapt to the effects of climate change, including, but not limited to, supporting relocation for Indian tribes located in areas of heightened risk due to anticipated sea level rise, flooding, or other disturbances caused by climate change. In developing the grant program, the department must collaborate with tribes to determine program parameters for award amounts, distribution, and benchmarks for success. In order to meet the requirements of RCW 70A.65.230(1)(b), tribal applicants are encouraged to include a tribal resolution supporting their request with their application.

(2) $12,050,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Quinault Indian nation for the following list of projects:

Architectural Drawings For The Quinault Museum. . . .$150,000

Marine Climate Change Assessment. . . .$300,000

Queets Generations Building. . . .$8,000,000

Queets Village Relocation Planning. . . .$1,000,000

Taholah Water Tank. . . .$2,600,000
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$50,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$151,800,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$201,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1031. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

DOE Hydrogen Hub -State Match (40000561)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for state match for the Pacific Northwest hydrogen association application, supported by the department, for a United States department of energy hydrogen hub grant.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$80,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$100,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1032. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Inflation Reduction Act HOMES Program (40000564)
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$83,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$83,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1033. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Housing Finance Commission Land Acquisition Program (40000568)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the housing finance commission land acquisition program to assist eligible organizations purchase land for affordable rental or homeownership housing developments serving low-income households.

(2) In addition to affordable housing, facilities intended to provide supportive services to affordable housing residents and low-income households in the nearby community may be developed on the land.

(3) Priority must given to projects serving households whose adjusted income is at or below 50 percent of the median family income for the county where the project is located.

(4) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(a) "Eligible organizations" has the same meaning as in RCW 43.185A.040.

(b) "Low-income household" has the same meaning as in RCW 43.185A.010.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$40,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1034. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Defense Community Compatibility Projects (40000572)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$27,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,800,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$36,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1035. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Rising Strong Project Grant Pass Through (40000576)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the rising strong project to construct supportive transitional housing to support at least 24 households in western Washington to receive comprehensive family services as well as treatment for substance use disorders while preserving the family unit.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$13,356,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,356,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1036. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Reducing Emissions in Hard-to-Decarbonize Sectors Program (40000577)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to administer a grant program for greenhouse gas emissions reduction strategies for hard to decarbonize sectors, including industry, aviation, and maritime.

(2) Grant awards may be used only to achieve near-term greenhouse gas emissions reductions in eligible sectors beyond what would have been achieved under business as usual. The grant program must prioritize projects that improve compliance with state greenhouse gas reduction policies including, but not limited to, the cap and invest program, the clean fuel standard, and the hydrofluorocarbon phasedown. Projects may include efficiency and process improvements. Awards may not exceed 15 percent of available funding per applicant. The department may require that applicants provide nonstate matching funds.

(3) Up to $250,000 of the appropriation in this section may be used to assist the department for providing facilitation and consultation to eligible facilities to help them identify, plan, and implement near-term strategies to achieve reductions in the facility's greenhouse gas emissions. The department may also consult with eligible facilities to develop a long-term strategy for industrial decarbonization and emissions reduction.

(4) Up to $324,000 of the appropriation provided in this section may be used to develop a process, in consultation with Washington department of transportation, to select projects to advance the research, development, or manufacturing of sustainable aviation.

(5) Up to 5 percent of the appropriation in this section may be used by the department to administer the reducing emissions in hard-to-decarbonize sectors program, including, but not limited to, providing technical assistance, managing contracts, reporting, and providing assistance in the planning and implementation process.

(6) A minimum of 40 percent of the appropriation must be spent for projects that benefit vulnerable populations in overburdened communities as defined in RCW 70A.65.010.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$40,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$168,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$208,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1037. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Local Emission Reduction Projects (91002184)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely for the following list of projects:

C6 Forest to Farm Biochar Pilot Plant

(Leavenworth). . . .$1,425,000

Great Northern School District Improvement

Planning (Spokane). . . .$1,613,000

Hydrogen Storage & Fuel Cell for Peak Shaving

(Okanogan). . . .$1,648,000

Meydenbauer Center Energy Efficiency (Bellevue). . . .$6,000,000

Outdoor Fields LED Retrofit and Solar Installation

(Tukwila). . . .$500,000

Process Water Reuse Facility (Pasco). . . .$5,050,000

Small Faces Preschool HVAC Upgrades (Seattle). . . .$435,000

Waterfront Low Carbon District Energy System

(Bellingham). . . .$100,000
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$15,346,000

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
$1,425,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$16,771,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$16,771,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1038. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Rural Rehabilitation Grant Program (91002195)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$24,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1039. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Broadband Study (91002196)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the state broadband office to study and report on the feasibility of increasing broadband access in unserved and underserved areas of the state through low-orbit satellite networks. The study must evaluate factors such as unique topography, lack of population density, remote location, and other considerations related to cost-effective broadband service delivery. The study must include, at a minimum:

(a) A comparison of the estimated costs of satellite network build-out with the design and construction costs of other broadband service infrastructure types such as fiber optic and wireless technologies in unique geographic areas; and

(b) Identification of areas not prioritized for federal support in the five-year action plan submitted by the office in accordance with the broadband equity, access, and deployment program funded under P.L. 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act) and recommendations for how to improve broadband service in those areas.

(2) The office must report findings and recommendations resulting from the study to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$75,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$75,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1040. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Facility Improvement Fund (92001367)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided under subsection (5) of this section, the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Bellingham: Joe Martin Stadium. . . .$700,000

Everett School District: Everett Memorial Stadium. . . .$7,400,000

Lower Columbia College: David Story Field. . . .$1,300,000

Pasco: Gesa Stadium. . . .$3,000,000

Port Angeles: Civic Field. . . .$600,000

Ridgefield: Ridgefield Outdoor Recreational Complex. . . .$450,000

Spokane County: Avista Stadium. . . .$5,800,000

Tacoma: Cheney Stadium. . . .$3,000,000

Walla Walla: Borleske Stadium. . . .$525,000

Wenatchee Valley College: Paul Thomas Sr. Field. . . .$700,000

Yakima County: Yakima County Stadium. . . .$525,000

(2) No sooner than January 1, 2024, to accommodate changes in projects' scopes or costs, the department may transfer up to 20 percent of any unused funding appropriated in this section between the projects identified in subsection (1) of this section, subject to the approval of the affected public facility.

(3) The department may not expend funding for a project in this section unless and until the nonstate share of that project's costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(4) Prior to receiving funding, grant recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to grants for preconstruction activities or grants in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the department finds the grantee to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) The department may use no more than $360,000 of the amount appropriated under this section for administrative costs. The remaining amount must be awarded as grants to the public facilities under subsection (1) of this section, subject to the other requirements of this section.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$24,360,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$24,360,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1041. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Emergency Repairs (40000005)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Emergency repair funding is provided solely to address unexpected building or grounds failures that will impact public health and safety and the day-to-day operations of the facility. To be eligible for funds from the emergency repair pool, a request letter for emergency funding signed by the affected agency director must be submitted to the office of financial management and the appropriate legislative fiscal committees. The request must include a statement describing the health and safety hazard and impacts to facility operations, the possible cause, the proposed scope of emergency repair work and related cost estimate, and identification of other funding that may be applied to the project.

(2) For emergencies occurring during a legislative session, an agency must notify the legislative fiscal committees before requesting emergency funds from the office of financial management.

(3) The office of financial management must notify the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee and the legislative fiscal committees as emergency projects are approved for funding and include what funded level was approved.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$16,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1042. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Lake Long-Term Management Planning (30000740)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Pursuant to RCW 43.88.130, the department may enter into a multibiennium contract for the project. Nothing in this section authorizes the agency to make an expenditure without an appropriation.
Appropriation:

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
$3,902,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State
. . . .
$3,098,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$7,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,849,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$239,022,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$252,871,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1043. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Elevator Modernization (30000786)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1075, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,316,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State
. . . .
$1,229,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$2,545,000

Appropriation:

Capitol Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,047,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State
. . . .
$3,646,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$7,693,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,846,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,084,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1044. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Campus Physical Security & Safety Improvements (30000812)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6023, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

Capitol Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$292,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$156,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State
. . . .
$544,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$992,000

Appropriation:

Capitol Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,946,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,393,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$12,339,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,184,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$354,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$18,869,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1045. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Campus Security & Safety Enhancements (40000226)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1110, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,135,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,219,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$922,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,276,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1046. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Facility Professional Services Staffing (40000244)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for architectural and engineering services to manage public works contracting for all state facilities pursuant to RCW 43.19.450.

(2) At the end of each biennium, the department must report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature on performance, including the following:

(a) The number of projects managed by each project manager by fiscal year;

(b) The number of project predesigns completed on time, reported by project and fiscal year;

(c) The number of project designs completed, reported by project and fiscal year;

(d) The number of project constructions completed on time, reported by project and fiscal year and in total;

(e) Projects that were not completed on schedule, how many days they were delayed, and the reasons for the delays;

(f) The number and cost of the change orders and the reason for each change order; and

(g) A list of the interagency agreements executed with state agencies during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium to provide staff support to state agencies that is over and above the allocation provided in this section. The list must include the agency, the amount of dollars by fiscal year, and the rationale for the additional service.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$26,922,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$107,688,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$134,610,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1047. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Campus - Critical Fire System Upgrades (40000245)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,665,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$15,128,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$17,793,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1048. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

B&G Maintenance Facility - Rebuild (40000247)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,582,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,582,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1049. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

NRB - Replace Piping for Wet Fire Suppression (40000249)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$9,876,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,126,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1050. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

2023-25 Statewide Minor Works - Preservation (40000250)
Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State
. . . .
$2,141,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,564,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,705,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1051. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

2023-25 Statewide Minor Works - Programmatic (40000305)
Appropriation:

Capitol Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$474,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State
. . . .
$162,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$636,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$2,544,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,180,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1052. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Modular Building - Critical Repairs & Upgrades (40000314)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1053. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Old Cap - Roof Replacement (40000338)
Appropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State
. . . .
$1,474,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$5,579,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,053,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1054. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Campus Emergency Generator Replacement (40000393)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$854,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,161,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,015,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1055. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Legislative Building Cleaning (40000400)
Appropriation:

Capitol Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,970,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$5,708,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,678,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1056. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

HB 1390 - District Energy Systems (91000449)
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1057. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Legislative Campus Modernization (92000020)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1059, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.

(2) The department must consult with the senate facilities and operations committee or its designees and the house of representatives' executive rules committee or its designees at least every other month.

(3) All appropriations must be coded and tracked as separate discrete subprojects in the agency financial reporting system.

(4) If the department receives information that projected costs for any of the subprojects in subsections (5), (6), or (7) of this section will exceed the amount provided in the respective subsections, including projected costs in future biennia, the department must timely notify and provide that information in writing to the project executive team. Prior to proceeding with design or construction, the department must:

(a) Provide at least three options to reduce the subproject costs to stay within the amount provided for that subproject and the project schedule;

(b) Consult with the project executive team on the options offered, prior to proceeding with a reduced cost option; and

(c) Receive majority consensus from the project executive team to either adopt and move forward with reduced cost options that bring the subproject costs within amounts appropriated or adopt a tentative modified budget for the subproject. If a tentative modified budget is adopted, the department must seek additional funding in the next agency budget submittal.

(5) $83,837,000 of the amount provided in this section is provided solely for the Irv Newhouse building replacement design and construction subproject on opportunity site six west. The department must:

(a) Start Newhouse building construction by July 1, 2023;

(b) Complete Newhouse building construction by October 31, 2024; and

(c) Consult with the leadership of the senate, or their designees, at least every month, beginning July 1, 2023.

(6) $145,982,000 of the amount provided in this section is provided solely for the rehabilitation, design, and construction of the Pritchard building and the renovation of the John L. O'Brien building subproject.

(7) $16,450,000 of the amount provided in this section is provided solely for the legislative campus modernization global subproject that includes, but is not limited to, the visitor lot (opportunity site six east), Columbia street site work, the legislative modular building, and Water street site work.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$72,346,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State
. . . .
$2,665,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$75,011,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$156,929,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$14,925,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$246,865,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1058. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Temple of Justice HVAC, Lighting & Water Systems (92000040)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$25,410,000

Appropriation:

Capitol Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,007,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,590,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$34,007,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1059. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

King County Area Readiness Center (30000592)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1093, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$569,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,486,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$106,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$119,055,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1060. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Tri-Cities Readiness Center (30000808)
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,421,000

Military Department Capital Account—State
. . . .
$204,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$265,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$1,890,000

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$944,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,944,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$16,010,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,844,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1061. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Snohomish Readiness Center (30000930)
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$3,872,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,406,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$5,278,000

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,196,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,707,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,903,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$637,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,818,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1062. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Field Maintenance Shop Addition-Sedro Woolley FMS (40000104)
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,373,000

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$874,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1063. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Camp Murray Bldg 47 and 48 Barracks Replacement (40000190)
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,976,000

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$853,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$171,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1064. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Camp Murray Bldg 65 Barracks Replacement (40000191)
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,051,000

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$764,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$185,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1065. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Camp Murray Bldg 34 Renovation (40000192)
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$4,915,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,425,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$8,340,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,340,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1066. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Moses Lake Readiness Center Renovation (40000194)
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$3,080,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,462,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$5,542,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,542,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1067. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

JBLM Non-Organizational (POV) Parking Expansion (40000196)
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,210,000

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$35,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,895,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1068. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Program 2023-25 Biennium (40000274)
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$7,764,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,721,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$12,485,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$49,940,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$62,425,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1069. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

WA Army National Guard Vehicle Storage Buildings (40000290)
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$11,450,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$750,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$12,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,960,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,160,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1070. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Yakima Training Center 951 Renovation (40000297)
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$3,060,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,060,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1071. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Central Building Automation System for National Guard Buildings (40000298)
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,227,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,227,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1072. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Spokane Readiness Center IT Infrastructure Upgrade (40000300)
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,241,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$609,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1073. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Preservation 2023-25 Biennium (40000301)
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$3,156,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,035,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$5,191,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,764,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,955,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1074. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Wenatchee Army National Guard Aviation Support Facility (40000305)
Appropriation:

Military Department Capital Account—State
. . . .
$3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$76,700,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$80,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1075. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Kent Readiness Center Water Damage Repairs (40000311)
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,707,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$569,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,276,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,276,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1076. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Yakima Training Center Army NG Combat Fitness Training Facility (40000314)
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$6,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1077. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

2023-25 Historic County Courthouse Rehabilitation Grant Program (40000015)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Klickitat County Courthouse. . . .$585,000

Lewis County Courthouse. . . .$120,000

Okanogan County Courthouse. . . .$670,000

Stevens County Courthouse. . . .$97,000

Yakima County Courthouse. . . .$815,000
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,287,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$9,148,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,435,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1078. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

2023-25 Historic Cemetery Grant Program (40000016)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$515,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$2,060,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,575,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1079. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

2023-25 Historic Theater Capital Grant Program (40000017)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation provided in this section is intended to fund activities that preserve the historic character of theaters and not maintenance and upkeep.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$515,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$2,060,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,575,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1080. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

2023-25 Heritage Barn Grant Program (40000018)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

(End of part)

PART 2

HUMAN SERVICES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2001. FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION

Omnibus Minor Works (40000017)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$356,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,424,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,780,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2002. FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION

Facility Space Needs Assessment (40000019)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The commission must explore alternatives that include an option for one or more regional training facilities, including evaluating options for regional locations in southwest Washington and Mason county.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2003. FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION

Regional Training Facilities (92000006)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following project:

Southwest Regional Training Academy. . . .$1,000,000
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2004. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

Minor Works Preservation Projects (30000035)
Appropriation:

Accident Account—State
. . . .
$999,000

Medical Aid Account—State
. . . .
$997,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,996,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,650,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$7,984,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,630,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2005. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

Interior Lighting and Controls Upgrade (40000014)
Appropriation:

Accident Account—State
. . . .
$963,000

Medical Aid Account—State
. . . .
$962,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,925,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,924,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,849,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2006. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

Solar Panel Installation - Lab & Training Facility (40000015)
Appropriation:

Accident Account—State
. . . .
$1,867,000

Medical Aid Account—State
. . . .
$1,867,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,734,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,734,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2007. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Lakeland Village: Code Required Campus Infrastructure Upgrades (30002238)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,505,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$10,200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,705,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2008. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Multiple Buildings: Fire Doors Replacement (40000392)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,602,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,413,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$498,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,513,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2009. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Child Study and Treatment Center-Ketron: LSA Expansion (40000411)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,535,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,382,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$83,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2010. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Programmatic 2023-25 (40000953)
Appropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$2,377,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,353,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,730,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$18,920,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$23,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2011. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Preservation 2023-25 (40000954)
Appropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$3,482,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,512,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$7,994,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$91,976,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$99,970,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2012. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Statewide: Communications Systems Condition Assessment (40000959)
Appropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$6,292,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$81,998,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$88,290,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2013. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Statewide: Clean Buildings Act (40000960)
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$3,727,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,875,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,602,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2014. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital: New Forensic Hospital (91000067)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2040,chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

(2) Pursuant to RCW 43.88.130, the department may enter into a multibiennium contract for this project. Nothing in this section authorizes the agency to make an expenditure without an appropriation.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$43,870,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$613,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,130,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$282,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$947,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2015. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

BH: State Owned, Mixed Use Community Civil 48-Bed Capacity (91000077)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2054, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$50,480,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$24,229,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$7,645,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$82,354,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2016. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Child Study & Treatment Center - Youth Housing (91000084)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2017. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Maple Lane - Rapid BH Bed Capacity (92000046)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$21,070,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$21,070,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2018. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Public Health Lab South Laboratory Addition (30000379)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,131,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$57,148,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$998,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$62,277,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2019. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

New LED Lighting and Controls in Existing Laboratory Spaces (40000054)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$365,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,214,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,579,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2020. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

New Deionized Water (DI) Piping at Public Health Laboratories (40000063)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,172,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,172,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2021. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Public Health Lab Space Needs Predesign (40000064)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to complete a predesign that must include an evaluation of space needs. The predesign may include an option to renovate building 20 but at least two other options must also be evaluated, in addition to a no action alternative.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$360,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$46,899,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$47,259,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2022. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water System Rehabilitations and Consolidations (40000065)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$12,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$17,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2023. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

2023-25 DWSRF State Match (40000066)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of a clean water infrastructure facility or other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is reasonably obtainable, the department shall require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its drinking water state revolving fund program loan.

(2) The department must encourage local government use of federally funded drinking water infrastructure programs operated by the United States department of agriculture rural development agency.
Appropriation:

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$14,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$17,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2024. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

2023-25 DWSRF Construction Loan Program (40000067)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of a clean water infrastructure facility or other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is reasonably obtainable, the department must require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its drinking water state revolving fund program loan.

(2) The department must encourage local government use of federally funded drinking water infrastructure programs operated by the United States department of agriculture rural development agency.
Appropriation:

Drinking Water Assistance Account—Federal
. . . .
$131,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$524,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$655,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2025. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Minor Works Facilities Preservation (30000094)
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$170,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$450,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$620,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,860,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,918,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$7,440,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,838,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2026. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Northwest Washington State Veterans Cemetery Feasibility Study (40000035)
Appropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2027. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

WSVC - Raise, Realign, and Clean Markers (40000070)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2028. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

SVH - Skilled Nursing Facility Replacement Feasibility Study (40000071)
Appropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2029. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

WSH Master Plan (40000075)
Appropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2030. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

WSVC - Burial and Columbarium Expansion Grant (40000092)
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$3,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$300,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2031. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

WVH - Fire Alarm Replacement - 240 Building (40000099)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,280,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,280,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2032. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

DVA ARPA Federal Funds & State Match (91000013)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are subject to the provisions of section 7061 of this act.
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$24,495,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,849,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$35,344,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,810,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$55,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$42,209,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2033. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

HB 1390 -District Energy Systems (91000017)
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2034. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

WSH - Roosevelt Building Restroom Renovation (92000002)
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$3,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2035. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Echo Glen Secure Facility Improvements (40000546)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2036. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Echo Glen Minimum Security Transition Housing (40000550)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,218,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,218,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2037. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Green Hill Spruce Living Unit Renovation Minimum Security (40000552)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,270,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$7,463,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,733,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2038. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Statewide Minor Works (40000557)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,328,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$9,312,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,640,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2039. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WCC: Paint & Repair 300,000 Gallon Water Storage Tank (30000697)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$600,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,406,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,006,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,506,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2040. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

SW IMU Recreation Yard Improvement (30001123)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,244,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$756,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$2,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2041. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

ECWR: Foundation and Siding (40000067)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$850,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,111,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,961,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2042. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC: SOU and TRU - Domestic Water and HVAC Piping System (40000246)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2026, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,962,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$26,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$167,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$21,143,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,272,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2043. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Inpatient Psychiatric Unit (40000413)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$350,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$17,100,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2044. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

CRCC Sage Unit Move to AHCC (40000414)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,026,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,452,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$24,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,502,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2045. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

AHCC: Modular Building for Health Service Staff (40000415)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$791,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$408,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,199,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2046. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

CRCC: Modular Building for Health Service Staff (40000416)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$777,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$428,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,205,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2047. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Minor Works Preservation Projects (40000427)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,332,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$29,328,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$36,660,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2048. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

HB 1390 - District Energy Systems (91000434)
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$1,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2049. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WSP: Unit Six Roof Replacement (92000037)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$375,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$12,569,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,050,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,994,000

(End of part)

PART 3

NATURAL RESOURCES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3001. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2023-25 Reducing Diesel Greenhouse Gases (GHG) and Toxic Emissions (40000474)
Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$15,632,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$62,528,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$78,160,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3002. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2023-25 Coastal Wetlands Federal Funds (40000475)
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$14,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$56,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$70,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3003. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2023-25 Chehalis Basin Strategy (40000476)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $69,100,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for board-approved:

(a) Projects to protect and restore aquatic species habitat, including: Construction and property acquisition; preconstruction and acquisition planning and project development, feasibility, design, environmental review, and permitting; postconstruction and acquisition monitoring and adaptive management; and engagement of state agencies, tribes, conservation partners, landowners, and other parties;

(b) Projects to reduce flood damage, including: Construction and property acquisition; preconstruction and acquisition project planning and development, feasibility, design, environmental review, and permitting; completion of environmental review and endangered species act consultation on the proposed flood protection facility; refinement and evaluation of the local action non-dam alternative; and engagement of state agencies, tribes, project sponsors, landowners, and other parties; and

(c) Integrated projects that advance both the habitat restoration and the flood damage reduction goals of the Chehalis Basin strategy using a multibenefit approach, including: Community outreach and education; construction and property acquisition; preconstruction and acquisition planning and project development, feasibility, design, environmental review, and permitting; post construction and acquisition monitoring and adaptive management; and engagement of federal, state, and local agencies, tribes, conservation partners, landowners, and other parties.

(2) $3,900,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the operations of the office of Chehalis Basin and Chehalis Basin board to oversee the development, implementation, and amendment of the Chehalis Basin strategy, and this is the maximum amount the board may expend for this purpose. Oversight operations include, but are not limited to: Providing financial accountability, project management, and board meeting administration and facilitation.

(3) Specific projects must be approved by at least six of the seven voting members of the Chehalis Basin board. The Chehalis Basin board has the discretion to allocate funding between subsection (1)(a), (b), and (c) of this section as needed to meet the objectives of this appropriation and approved by at least six of the seven voting members of the board. However, $3,900,000 is the maximum amount the department may expend for the purposes of subsection (2) of this section.

(4) Up to 1.5 percent of the appropriation in this section may be used by the recreation and conservation office to administer contracts associated with the subprojects funded through this section. Contract administration includes, but is not limited to: Drafting and amending contracts, reviewing and approving invoices, tracking expenditures, and performing field inspections to assess project status when conducting similar assessments related to other agency contracts in the same geographic area.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$73,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$292,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$365,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3004. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2023-25 Freshwater Aquatic Invasive Plants Grant Program (40000477)
Appropriation:

Freshwater Aquatic Weeds Account—State
. . . .
$1,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$6,800,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3005. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2023-25 Freshwater Algae Grant Program (40000478)
Appropriation:

Aquatic Algae Control Account—State
. . . .
$710,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$2,840,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3006. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2023-25 Reducing Toxic Wood Stove Emissions (40000479)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Whenever possible and most cost effective, the agency and local air agency partners must select home heating devices that are certified by the United States environmental protection agency or that do not use natural gas to replace noncompliant devices.
Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$4,144,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$16,576,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,720,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3007. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2023-25 Affordable Housing Cleanup Grant Program (40000480)
Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$12,259,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$49,036,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$61,295,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3008. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2023-25 Product Replacement Program (40000486)
Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$6,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$26,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3009. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2023-25 Clean Up Toxic Sites – Puget Sound (40000487)
Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$7,455,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$29,820,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$37,275,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3010. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2023-25 Remedial Action Grant Program (40000495)
Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$115,111,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$460,444,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$575,555,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3011. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2023-25 Protect Investments in Cleanup Remedies (40000526)
Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$4,450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$17,800,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$22,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3012. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2023-25 ASARCO Everett Smelter Plume Cleanup (40000529)
Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$7,679,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$30,716,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$38,395,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3013. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2023-25 PFAS Contaminated Drinking Water (40000530)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3014. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2023-25 Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (40000533)
Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$3,800,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3015. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2023-25 Swift Creek Natural Asbestos Flood Control and Cleanup (40000538)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$16,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3016. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2023-25 Stormwater Financial Assistance Program (40000539)
Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State
. . . .
$68,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$272,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$340,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3017. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2023-25 Floodplains by Design (40000540)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$70,392,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$281,568,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$351,960,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3018. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2023-25 Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (40000559)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,246,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$12,984,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$16,230,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3019. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2023-25 Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (40000563)
Appropriation:

Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund—Federal
. . . .
$200,000,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund—State
. . . .
$435,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$635,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$2,540,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,175,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3020. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2023-25 State Match - Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (40000564)
Appropriation:

Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund—State
. . . .
$35,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$140,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$175,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3021. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2023-25 Streamflow Restoration Program (40000565)
Appropriation:

Watershed Restoration and Enhancement Bond

Account—State
. . . .
$40,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$160,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3022. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2023-25 Sewer Overflow & Stormwater Reuse Municipal Grants Prog (40000567)
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$16,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$66,800,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$83,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3023. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2023-25 Waste Tire Pile Cleanup and Prevention (40000568)
Appropriation:

Waste Tire Removal Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3024. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2023-25 Stormwater Public Private Partnerships (40000569)
Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$12,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3025. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Elevator Restorations at Ecology Facilities (40000570)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to update and restore two traction elevators at agency headquarters, two hydraulic elevators at the eastern Washington regional office in Spokane, and one hydraulic elevator at Padilla Bay.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,202,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,202,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3026. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2023-25 Centennial Clean Water Program (40000571)
Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$40,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$160,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3027. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2023-25 Yakima River Basin Water Supply (40000572)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$49,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$196,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$245,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3028. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2023-25 Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (40000583)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $20,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for planning, designing, engineering, development, coordination, and construction of the Odessa Groundwater Replacement Project, sufficient to irrigate the acres located within the Odessa subarea special study and facilities modifications necessary to accommodate capacity demands resulting from the individual public delivery systems within the Odessa Groundwater Replacement Program.

(a) To be eligible for a grant under this subsection (1), a project must have at least 30 percent of its design work completed by July 1, 2023.

(b) The east Columbia basin irrigation district may only be allowed to make any administrative charges sufficient to administer the state grants, not to exceed one percent of amounts provided to them within this appropriation, with the requirement to report administrative expenditures to the office of Columbia river annually.

(2) $850,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to enter into an agreement with the United States bureau of reclamation to reimburse the bureau for costs related to the design and review activities necessary to complete the transfer of the groundwater replacement delivery system title to the United States by the East Columbia Basin irrigation district and to secure project reserved power for public delivery systems.
Appropriation:

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Revenue

Recovery Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$43,200,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$44,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$175,400,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$220,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3029. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Product Testing Laboratory (40000604)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$16,111,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$16,461,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3030. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2023-25 Zosel Dam Preservation (40000605)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,549,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,549,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3031. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Improving Air Quality in Overburdened Communities Initiative (40000606)
Appropriation:

Air Quality and Health Disparities Improvement

Account—State
. . . .
$21,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$85,600,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$107,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3032. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Landfill Methane Capture (40000611)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to administer a grant program for landfills to comply with methane emission requirements established in chapter 70A.540 RCW.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3033. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Padilla Bay Samish Conservation Area (40000612)
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,333,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,333,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3034. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

PSCAA Ultra-fine Particle Monitoring (91000378)
Appropriation:

Air Quality and Health Disparities Improvement

Account—State
. . . .
$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3035. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Port of Everett Seaport Modernization (Everett) (91000380)
Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3036. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

PFAS Statewide Funding Strategy (91000382)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department, in consultation with the department of health, to develop a multiyear statewide funding strategy for reducing perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS) in the environment. The strategy must build upon the recommendations contained in the department's 2022 per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances chemical action plan and focus on funding for future capital projects related to safe drinking water, managing environmental contamination, and evaluating perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances waste management options. The department must submit the strategy in a report to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.
Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3037. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

North Shore Levee (92000200)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: It is the intent of the legislature to provide additional project funding in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$18,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$17,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3038. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

2023-25 Underground Storage Tank Capital Financial Assistance Pgm (40000002)
Appropriation:

Pollution Liability Insurance Agency Underground

Storage Tank Revolving Account—State
. . . .
$12,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$48,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$60,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3039. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

2023-25 Heating Oil Capital Financing Assistance Program (40000003)
Appropriation:

Pollution Liability Insurance Agency Underground

Storage Tank Revolving Account—State
. . . .
$8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$32,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3040. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Chelan State Park Moorage Dock Pile Replacement (30000416)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$72,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$574,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,772,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,418,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3041. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Millersylvania Replace Original 1940's Water System (30000521)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$571,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$3,299,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,870,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3042. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Local Grant Authority (30000857)
Appropriation:

Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account—

Private/Local
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,516,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$16,516,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3043. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Federal Grant Authority (30000858)
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,650,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$3,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3044. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Parkland Acquisition (30000976)
Appropriation:

Parkland Acquisition Account—State
. . . .
$2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,753,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$10,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,253,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3045. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Saltwater - Green Vision Project (40000053)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the state parks and recreation commission must pursue, to the extent practicable, relevant opportunities to fund the future costs of this project through other state and federal capital grant programs.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$5,100,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3046. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide - Fish Barrier Removal (40000123)
Appropriation:

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
$1,375,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$5,500,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3047. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Nisqually New Full Service Park (40000153)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,244,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$21,825,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,739,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$15,099,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$51,907,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3048. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Cape Disappointment: Campground Access Road Culverts (40000178)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,108,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,108,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3049. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Ebey Replace Campground Restroom (40000186)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$270,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,072,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,342,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3050. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Larrabee Water System Replacement (40000195)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,880,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,880,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3051. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Wallace Falls Water System Replacement (40000206)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,208,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,208,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3052. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Sun Lakes Replace Primary Lift Station (40000213)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,356,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,356,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3053. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

2023-25 Recreational Marine Sewage Disposal Program (CVA) (40000366)
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,600,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$10,400,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3054. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Sylvia Culvert Replacement (40000385)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,879,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,879,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3055. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

NW Region Wide Culvert Replacements (40000389)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$490,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$490,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3056. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden PDA Fire Alarm System Modifications and Upgrades (40000437)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,777,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$3,328,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,105,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3057. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Palouse to Cascades Trail - Trail Structure Repairs (40000438)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,401,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$3,533,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,934,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3058. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works Preservation 2023-25 (40000444)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,241,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$16,964,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$21,205,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3059. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Program 2023-25 (40000448)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,191,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$7,964,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,155,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3060. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden PDA Geothermal Heating (40000457)
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$7,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3061. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

2023-25 Capital Preservation Pool (91000443)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for minor works projects, as described in section 8017 of this act.

(2) The state parks and recreation commission may not use the appropriation in this section for planning, predesign, or design costs that will result in a request for construction funding in a subsequent biennium.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$14,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$58,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$72,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3062. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2023-25 Washington Wildlife Recreation Program (40000053)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely for projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. RCO-1-HB-2023, developed March 14, 2023.
Appropriation:

Farm and Forest Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State
. . . .
$45,000,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
$45,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$100,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$400,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3063. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2023-25 Salmon Recovery Funding Board Grant Programs (40000054)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,400,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain the lead entity program as described in chapter 77.85 RCW.

(2) $640,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for regional fisheries enhancement groups created in RCW 77.95.060.
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$75,000,000

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
$8,040,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$20,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$103,040,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$412,160,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$515,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3064. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2023-25 Boating Facilities Program (40000055)
Appropriation:

Recreation Resources Account—State
. . . .
$13,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$55,200,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$69,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3065. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2023-25 Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities (40000056)
Appropriation:

NOVA Program Account—State
. . . .
$12,063,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$48,252,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$60,315,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3066. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2023-25 Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (40000057)
Appropriation:

Firearms Range Account—State
. . . .
$840,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$3,360,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3067. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2023-25 Youth Athletics Facilities (40000058)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. RCO-3-HB-2023, developed March 14, 2023.
Appropriation:

Youth Athletic Facility Account—State
. . . .
$10,801,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$43,204,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$54,005,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3068. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2023-25 Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (40000059)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely for projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. RCO-4-HB-2023, developed March 14, 2023.
Appropriation:

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State
. . . .
$3,500,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$307,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$3,807,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$15,228,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$19,035,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3069. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2023-25 Community Forest Grant Program (40000060)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. RCO-5-HB-2023, developed March 14, 2023.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,807,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$31,228,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$39,035,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3070. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2023-25 Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (40000061)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. RCO-2.1-HB-2023, developed March 29, 2023.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$59,165,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$236,660,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$295,825,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3071. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2023-25 Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (40000062)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided under subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the appropriation in this section is provided solely for projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. RCO-7-HB-2023, developed March 14, 2023.

(2) The recreation and conservation funding board may retain a portion of the funding appropriated in this section for the administration of the grants. The portion of the funding retained for administration may not exceed $763,000.

(3) The department of fish and wildlife may retain a portion of the funding appropriated in this section for costs related to technical assistance and program administration. The portion of the funding retained for costs related to technical assistance and program administration may not exceed $763,000.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$20,042,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$80,168,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$100,210,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3072. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2023-25 Washington Coastal Restoration and Resiliency Initiative (40000063)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided under subsection (2) of this section, the appropriation in this section is provided solely for projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. RCO-8-HB-2023, developed March 14, 2023.

(2) The recreation and conservation funding board may retain a portion of the funds appropriated in this section for the administration of the grants. The portion of the funding retained for administration may not exceed 4.12 percent of the appropriation.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,134,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,536,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,670,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3073. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2023-25 Brian Abbott Fish Barrier Removal Board (40000064)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided under subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the appropriation in this section is provided solely for projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. RCO-6-HB-2023, developed March 14, 2023.

(2) The recreation and conservation funding board may retain a portion of the funding appropriated in this section for the administration of the grants. The portion of the funding retained for administration may not exceed $1,356,000.

(3) The department of fish and wildlife may retain up to $1,862,000 of the funding appropriated in this section for the Brian Abbott fish barrier removal board for technical assistance in developing projects for consideration.
Appropriation:

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
$20,849,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$27,558,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$48,407,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$193,628,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$242,035,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3074. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2023-25 Recreational Trails Program (40000065)
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3075. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2023-25 Boating Infrastructure Grants (40000066)
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3076. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2023-25 Land and Water Conservation Fund (40000067)
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$80,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$100,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3077. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2023-25 Family Forest Fish Passage Program (40000068)
Appropriation:

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
$7,780,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$31,120,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$38,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3078. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Planning for Recreation Access Grants (40000503)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3079. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Upper Quinault River Restoration Project (91000958)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,123,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,877,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3080. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Springwood Ranch in Kittitas County (91001663)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided under subsection (4) of this section, the appropriations in this section are provided solely for a grant from the agency to The Trust for Public Land to cover the costs of the Trust's acquisition, disposition, and temporary management of real property in upper Kittitas County known as Springwood Ranch in exchange for an agreement to reconvey the real property for public purposes as described in this section.

(2) The recreation and conservation office shall enter into a grant agreement with The Trust for Public Land that allows for the disbursement of the funding described in subsection (1) of this section to The Trust for Public Land for the following purposes:

(a) To convey a portion of the Springwood Ranch property to Kittitas County for its ownership and management, including maintenance of existing agricultural uses and future uses allowed under current zoning or that provide a public use or benefit;

(b) To convey a portion of the Springwood Ranch property to the department of fish and wildlife for its ownership and management to provide public use and benefit;

(c) To convey a portion of the Springwood Ranch property to the Yakama Nation for its ownership and management to provide public benefit;

(d) To convey a portion of the Springwood Ranch property to the Kittitas Reclamation District, which shall hold the property until a transfer, without compensation and subject to section 8039 of this act, to the United States bureau of reclamation for the purposes of construction of a water supply reservoir for managing instream flow in accordance with the Yakima Basin integrated plan, or until such purpose is declared by the bureau of reclamation no longer feasible; and

(e) To assist in achieving the goals of the Yakima Basin integrated plan.

(3) If the bureau of reclamation determines that the construction of a water supply reservoir is not feasible as described in subsection (2)(d) of this section, the Kittitas Reclamation District must work with Kittitas County, the Yakama Nation, the department of fish and wildlife, and other interested stakeholders to identify the appropriate public owner and manager and convey, without compensation and in accordance with RCW 87.03.136, as amended in section 8039 of this act, the Kittitas Reclamation District's portion of Springwood Ranch to that entity.

(4) The recreation and conservation office may use up to one percent of the appropriations in this section, if necessary, to recover its administrative costs.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$11,600,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$2,400,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$14,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$24,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3081. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Salmon Recovery Funding Board: Riparian Grant Program (91001679)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The salmon recovery funding board shall develop and administer a grant category under this section that is specific to riparian areas. The legislature intends that the riparian area grant category complement the existing salmon recovery grant program that is designed to address the highest priority needs of salmon habitat and protection.

(2) In developing the riparian area grant category, the salmon recovery funding board:

(a) Shall use existing structures, processes, procedures, policies, and criteria developed pursuant to chapter 77.85 RCW; and

(b) May adopt additional criteria specific to riparian areas to achieve restoration of fully functioning riparian ecosystems.
Appropriation:

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
$25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$100,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$125,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3082. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Fish Barrier Removal Projects in Skagit County (91001662)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3046, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Appropriation:

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3083. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2023-25 VSP Project Funding (40000021)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$12,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3084. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2023-25 Natural Resource Investment for the Economy & Environment (40000022)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$16,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3085. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2023-25 Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program (CREP) (40000023)
Appropriation:

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
$9,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$13,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$52,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$65,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3086. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2023-25 Farmland Protection and Land Access (40000024)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3087. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2023-25 Irrigation Efficiencies (40000025)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for technical assistance and grants to conservation districts for the purpose of implementing water conservation measures and irrigation efficiencies. The state conservation commission shall give preference to projects located in the 16 fish critical basins, other water-short or drought impacted basins, and basins with significant water resource and instream flow issues. Projects that are not within the basins described in this subsection are also eligible to receive funding.

(2) Conservation districts statewide are eligible for grants under subsection (1) of this section. A conservation district receiving funds shall manage each grant to ensure that a portion of the water saved by the water conservation measure or irrigation efficiency is available for other instream and out-of-stream uses and users. The proportion of saved water made available for other uses and users must be equal to the percentage of the public investment in the conservation measure or irrigation efficiency.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3088. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2023-25 Regional Conservation Partnership Program (RCPP) (40000026)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The 2025-2027 fiscal biennium budget request for the regional conservation partnership program state match must include the following information:

(a) Total project cost broken out by federal, state, and other fund sources;

(b) Anticipated budget by fund source by state fiscal year;

(c) Whether or not the commission received the project cost information from the project sponsor prior to the sponsor applying for funding from the federal government; and

(d) The date of when the federal award was received or is anticipated to be received.

(2) It is the intent of the legislature to prioritize projects that report the need for state match to the commission prior to submitting an application to the federal government. The commission must communicate this requirement and legislative intent to conservation districts and other interested applicants.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$12,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3089. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2023-25 Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program (CREP) PIP (40000027)
Appropriation:

Conservation Assistance Rev Account—State
. . . .
$100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$400,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3090. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2023-25 Washington Shrubsteppe Restoration & Resiliency Initiative (40000028)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$6,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3091. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2023-25 Improve Shellfish Growing Areas (40000029)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$14,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$17,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3092. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Riparian Restoration with Landowners (91000020)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for the state conservation commission to provide grants for riparian restoration projects with landowners.

(2)(a) Within funds appropriated in this section, the commission shall develop and implement the voluntary riparian grant program to fund protection and restoration of critical riparian management zones. The commission is responsible for developing the voluntary grant program criteria to achieve optimal restoration of functioning riparian ecosystems in priority critical riparian management zones.

(b) In adopting the program criteria under this section, the commission must:

(i) Invite federally recognized tribes to be full participants;

(ii) Coordinate with private landowners and other interested stakeholders;

(iii) Seek technical support from the department of ecology, the department of fish and wildlife, conservation districts, and the department of agriculture; and

(iv) Consider the best available, locally applicable science that is specific to each region of the state where the program criteria will be applied.

(3)(a) The commission shall prioritize critical riparian management zones at the watershed or subbasin scale where grant funding under the program created in this section would be primarily targeted. The prioritization must be informed by, consistent with, and aligned with one or more of the following: Watershed plans developed pursuant to chapter 90.82 RCW; the action agenda developed under RCW 90.71.260; regional recovery plans created under RCW 77.85.090; the habitat project lists developed pursuant to RCW 77.85.050; the prioritization process developed under RCW 77.95.160; and priority projects identified for salmon recovery through agency grant programs.

(b) The prioritization of critical riparian management projects must be developed in coordination with:

(i) Local federally recognized tribes;

(ii) Local private landowners who are voluntarily participating in the program;

(iii) Local conservation districts; and

(iv) Technical support from the local county, the department of fish and wildlife, the department of ecology, and water resource inventory area planning units organized pursuant to chapter 90.82 RCW.

(4)(a) Conditions for awarding funding for projects under this program include, but are not limited to:

(i) Consistency with the program criteria established under subsection (2) of this section;

(ii) Tiered incentive rates tied to improving functionality for riparian areas; and

(iii) Other requirements as determined by the commission.

(b) The commission must give preference and compensation for permanent protection of riparian areas or removal of riparian land from agricultural production or other development by purchase at fair market value.

(5) The commission must distribute riparian grant program funding equitably throughout the state, consistent with received grant applications and benefit to salmon habitat. Funding is intended primarily for projects located in salmon recovery regions, as defined in RCW 77.85.010, but funding may also be distributed to a project not located in a salmon recovery region upon a determination by the commission that the project will provide a unique benefit to salmon habitat.

(6) Allowable expenses to a grantee receiving funds under this section include, but are not limited to, labor, equipment, fencing, mulch, seed, seedling trees, manual weed control, and yearly maintenance costs for up to 10 years.

(7) Any native woody trees and shrubs planted with funding provided under this section must be maintained for a minimum of five years or as otherwise set by the commission for each grantee. Vegetation must be chosen to prevent invasive weed populations and ensure survival and successful establishment of plantings.

(8) The commission shall determine appropriate recordkeeping and data collections procedures required for program implementation and shall establish a data management system that allows for coordination between the commission and other state agencies. Any data collected or shared under this section may be used only to assess the successes of the riparian grant program in improving the functions of critical riparian habitat.

(9) The commission shall develop and implement a framework that includes monitoring, adaptive management, and metrics in order to ensure consistency with the requirements of the riparian grant program. The monitoring and adaptive management framework may include, but is not limited to, consideration of:

(a) Acres identified as eligible for restoration within a watershed;

(b) Acres planned to be restored;

(c) Acres actually planted and maintained;

(d) Success in targeting and achieving aggregated project implementation resulting in increase in linear miles restored;

(e) Plan review criteria; and

(f) Other similar factors as identified by the commission.

(10) The commission may use up to two percent of any amounts appropriated in this section for targeted outreach activities that focus on critically identified geographic locations for listed salmon species.

(11) The commission may use up to four percent of amounts appropriated in this for administrative expenses.

(12) For the purposes of this section, "critical riparian management zone" means the area adjacent to freshwaters, wetlands, and marine waters that has been locally or regionally identified as an area where salmon recovery efforts would significantly benefit from enhanced protection or restoration.
Reappropriation:

Salmon Recovery Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Appropriation:

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
$25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$100,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$135,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3093. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

2023-25 Migratory Waterfowl Habitat (20082045)
Reappropriation:

Limited Fish and Wildlife Account—State
. . . .
$1,182,000

Appropriation:

Limited Fish and Wildlife Account—State
. . . .
$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,655,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$2,400,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,837,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3094. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

2023-25 Mitigation Projects and Dedicated Funding (20082048)
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$13,728,000

General Fund—Private/Local
. . . .
$2,080,000

Limited Fish and Wildlife Account—State
. . . .
$1,388,000

Special Wildlife Account—Federal
. . . .
$2,303,000

Special Wildlife Account—Private/Local
. . . .
$3,328,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$22,827,000

Appropriation:

Fish, Wildlife, and Conservation Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$10,000,000

General Fund—Private/Local
. . . .
$1,000,000

Special Wildlife Account—Federal
. . . .
$1,000,000

Special Wildlife Account—Private/Local
. . . .
$1,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$13,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$89,394,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$54,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$179,721,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3095. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minter Hatchery Intakes (30000277)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,576,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,441,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,335,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,352,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3096. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Wallace River Hatchery - Replace Intakes and Ponds (30000660)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,810,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$17,228,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,495,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$12,936,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$45,469,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3097. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Soos Creek Hatchery Renovation (30000661)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,180,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,054,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$16,861,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$22,095,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3098. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Spokane Hatchery Renovation (30000663)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,277,000

Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$8,647,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,153,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$16,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$523,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$36,446,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$56,046,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3099. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Naselle Hatchery Renovation (30000671)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$16,235,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$11,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,897,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$25,588,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$60,220,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3100. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Beaver Creek Hatchery - Renovation (30000680)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$129,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,696,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$28,872,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$31,703,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3101. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Toutle River Fish Collection Facility - Match (40000021)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3058, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,042,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,936,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$667,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,645,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3102. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Fish and Wildlife Health and BioSecurity Facility (40000090)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$884,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$6,921,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,805,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3103. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

SRKW - Sol Duc Hatchery Modifications (40000147)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$127,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,186,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$73,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,508,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,894,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3104. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Duckabush Estuary Habitat Restoration (40000163)
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$30,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$14,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$44,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$27,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$71,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3105. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works Preservation 23-25 (40000164)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,575,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$38,300,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$47,875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3106. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

SRKW - Palmer Ponds Expansion (40000175)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$3,842,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,792,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3107. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works Programmatic 23-25 (40000178)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$14,400,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$18,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3108. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

SRKW Masterplan Phase II (40000190)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3109. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Snohomish County Wildlife Rehabilitation Facility (PAWS) (40000267)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3110. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Cooperative Elk and Deer Damage Fencing (91000162)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,200,000 of the appropriation provided in this section is provided solely for a cooperative elk fencing program administered by the department.

(2) $200,000 of the appropriation provided in this section is provided solely for the department to purchase deer fencing materials to provide to private landowners.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$5,600,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3111. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2023-25 Forestry Riparian Easement Program (40000139)
Appropriation:

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3112. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2023-25 Rivers and Habitat Open Space Program (RHOSP) (40000140)
Appropriation:

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
$1,660,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,354,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$5,014,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,056,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,070,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3113. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2023-25 Safe and Sustainable Recreation (40000141)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,915,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$11,660,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,575,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3114. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2023-25 School Seismic Safety - Geologic Site Class Assessments (40000142)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$663,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$2,652,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,315,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3115. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Whiteman Cove Restoration (40000143)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,937,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,937,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3116. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Lakebay Marina UST Cleanup (40000144)
Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$1,009,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,009,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3117. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2023-25 State Trust Land Replacement (40000145)
Appropriation:

Community and Technical College Forest Reserve

Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Natural Resources Real Property Replacement

Account—State
. . . .
$30,000,000

Resource Management Cost Account—State
. . . .
$30,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$61,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$244,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$305,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3118. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2023-25 Federal Land Acquisition Grants (40000148)
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3119. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2023-25 Forest Legacy (40000149)
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$14,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$56,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$70,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3120. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2023-25 Structurally Deficient Bridges (40000150)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,062,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$12,248,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,310,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3121. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2023-25 Natural Areas Facilities Preservation and Access (40000151)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,092,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,368,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,460,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3122. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Revitalizing Trust Land Transfers (40000152)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. DNR-1-HB-2023, developed March 14, 2023.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$20,875,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$83,500,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$104,375,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3123. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Webster Nursery Seed Plant Replacement (40000153)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,745,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,745,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3124. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2023-25 Minor Works Preservation (40000154)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,216,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$12,864,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$16,080,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3125. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Correction of Fish Barrier Culverts (40000155)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$235,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$940,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,175,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3126. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Omak Consolidation, Expansion and Relocation (40000156)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,789,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,740,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$23,529,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3127. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Webster Nursery Production Expansion (40000157)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$663,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$663,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3128. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2023-25 Emergent Environmental Mitigation Projects (40000158)
Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$720,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$2,880,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3129. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Ahtanum Fire Camp Relocation or Renovation (40000161)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$426,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$426,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3130. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2023-25 Minor Works Programmatic (40000162)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,232,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$12,928,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$16,160,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3131. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Eatonville Work Center and Fire Station (40000163)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$880,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$880,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3132. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

State-Owned Lands Carbon Sequestration (40000405)
Appropriation:

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3133. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2023-25 State Forest Land Replacement - Encumbered Lands (40000146)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$24,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3134. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Removal of Aquatic Derelict Structures (40000147)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the removal and disposal of aquatic derelict structures, including the derelict structures known as Dickman Mill, Former High Tides Seafood Pier, Ray's Boathouse Pier, and Triton-America Pier.
Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$9,650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$38,400,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$48,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3135. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Trust Land Transfer Program (40000034)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the completion of the Dabob Bay trust land transfer.

(2) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3281, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,692,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,246,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,708,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,646,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3136. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

2023-25 WA State Fairs Health and Safety Grants (92000006)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$24,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,000,000

(End of part)

PART 4

TRANSPORTATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4001. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

Vancouver Crime Lab - New Roof (30000240)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,594,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,594,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4002. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

Crime Laboratory I-5 North Corridor Consolidated Facility (30000290)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$246,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$87,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$82,900,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$90,433,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4003. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

FTA Minor Works and Repairs (40000031)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$181,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$237,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$44,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$948,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,410,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4004. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

Fire Training Academy Roof Replacement (40000077)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$572,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$572,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4005. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

Seattle Crime Laboratory Generator Replacement (40000081)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4006. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION

2023-25 CARB Loans (40000003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section must be deposited in the public use general aviation airport loan revolving account.
Appropriation:

Public Works Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,000,000

(End of part)

PART 5

EDUCATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5001. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

West Sound Technical Skills Center Modernization (40000015)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5003, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,990,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$40,606,000

School Construction and Skill Centers Building

Account—State
. . . .
$755,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$41,361,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$410,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$44,343,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$97,104,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5002. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2023-25 School Construction Assistance Program (40000063)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $583,141,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for school construction assistance grants for qualifying public school construction projects.

(2) $3,684,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for study and survey grants and for completing inventory and building condition assessments for public school districts every six years.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$588,172,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$5,136,683,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,724,855,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5003. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2023-25 Small District and State Tribal Compact Schools Mod (40000065)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $78,390,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation and $3,000,000 of the common school construction account—federal appropriation in this section are provided solely for modernization grants for small school districts authorized under RCW 28A.525.159.

(2) $2,263,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for planning grants for small school districts authorized under RCW 28A.525.159. Planning grants may not exceed $50,000 per district. Planning grants may only be awarded to school districts with an estimated total project cost of $5,000,000 or less.

(3) $12,145,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for planning grants and modernization grants to state-tribal compact schools. The superintendent of public instruction may prioritize planning grants for state-tribal compact schools with the most serious building deficiencies and the most limited financial capacity.

(4) $5,000,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for energy assessment grants for small school districts eligible under RCW 28A.525.159. Grants funding awarded may be used to perform facility energy assessments of instructional buildings.

(5) Except as specified in subsection (4) of this section, the appropriations in this section are provided solely for projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. OSPI-1-HB-2023, developed March 24, 2023.

(6) The superintendent of public instruction shall submit a list of small school district modernization projects, as prioritized by the advisory committee under RCW 28A.525.159, to the legislature and the governor by September 15, 2024. The list must include: (a) A description of the project; (b) the proposed state funding level, not to exceed $5,000,000; (c) estimated total project costs; and (d) local funding resources.
Appropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$85,653,000

Common School Construction Fund—Federal
. . . .
$3,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$12,145,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$100,798,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$403,192,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$503,990,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5004. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2023-25 School Seismic Safety Grant Program (40000066)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for seismic planning and remediation project grants to school districts and state-tribal education compact schools authorized under RCW 28A.525.320.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$40,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$160,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5005. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2023-25 School District Health and Safety (40000067)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $5,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for emergency repair grants to address unexpected and imminent health and safety hazards at K-12 public schools, including skill centers, that will impact the day-to-day operations of the school facility, and this is the maximum amount that may be spent for this purpose. For emergency repair grants only, an emergency declaration must be signed by the school district board of directors and submitted to the superintendent of public instruction for consideration. The emergency declaration must include a description of the imminent health and safety hazard, the possible cause, the proposed scope of emergency repair work and related cost estimate, and identification of local funding to be applied to the project. Grants of emergency repair moneys must be conditioned upon the written commitment and plan of the school district board of directors to repay the grant with any insurance payments or other judgments that may be awarded, if applicable.

(2) $10,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation and $2,000,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation in this section are provided solely for urgent repair grants to address nonreccurring urgent small repair projects at K-12 public schools, excluding skill centers, that could impact the health and safety of students and staff if not completed, and this is the maximum amount that may be spent for this purpose. The office of the superintendent of public instruction, after consulting with maintenance and operations administrators of school districts, shall develop criteria and assurances for providing funding for specific projects through a competitive grant program. The criteria and assurances must include, but are not limited to, the following: (a) Limiting school districts to one grant, not to exceed $500,000, per three-year period; (b) prioritizing applications based on limited school district financial resources for the project; and (c) requiring any district receiving funding provided in this section to demonstrate a consistent commitment to addressing school facility needs. The grant applications must include a comprehensive description of the health and safety issues to be addressed, a detailed description of the remedy, including a detailed cost estimate of the repair or replacement work to be performed, and identification of local funding, if any, which will be applied to the project. Grants may be used for, but are not limited to: Repair or replacement of failing building systems, abatement of potentially hazardous materials, and safety-related structural improvements.

(3) $5,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for equal access grants for facility repairs and alterations at K-12 public schools, including skills centers, to improve compliance with the Americans with disabilities act and individuals with disabilities education act, and this is the maximum amount that may be spent for this purpose. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop criteria and assurances for providing funding for specific projects through a competitive grant program. The criteria and assurances must include, but are not limited to, the following: (a) Limiting districts to one grant, not to exceed $100,000, per three-year period; (b) prioritizing applications based on limited school district financial resources for the project; and (c) requiring recipient districts to demonstrate a consistent commitment to addressing school facility needs. The grant applications must include a description of the Americans with disabilities act or individuals with disabilities education act compliance deficiency, a comprehensive description of the facility accessibility issues to be addressed, a detailed description of the remedy including a detailed cost estimate of the repair or replacement work to be performed, and identification of local funding, if any, which will be applied to the project. Priority for grant funding must be given to school districts that demonstrate a lack of capital resources to address the compliance deficiencies outlined in the grant application.

(4) The superintendent of public instruction must notify the office of financial management, the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the house capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee as projects described in subsection (1) of this section are approved for funding.
Appropriation:

Common School Construction Fund—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$20,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$22,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$88,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$110,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5006. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2023-25 Healthy Kids-Healthy Schools (40000068)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $9,962,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation and $38,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section are provided solely for healthy kids and healthy schools grants for projects that are consistent with the healthiest next generation priorities.

(b) The amounts provided in this subsection (1) are provided solely for grant funding to school districts for the purchase of equipment or to make repairs to existing equipment that is related to improving: (i) Children's physical health, and may include, but is not limited to, fitness playground equipment, covered play areas, and physical education equipment or related structures or renovation; and (ii) children's nutrition, and may include, but is not limited to, garden related structures and greenhouses to provide students access to fresh produce, and kitchen equipment or upgrades.

(c) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop criteria for grant funding under this subsection (1) that include, but are not limited to, the following requirements: (i) Districts may apply for grants, but no single district may receive more than $200,000 of the appropriation for grants awarded under this section; (ii) any district receiving funding provided in this section must demonstrate a consistent commitment to addressing school facilities' needs; and (iii) applicants with a high percentage of students who are eligible and enrolled in the free and reduced-price meals program may be prioritized.

(2) $1,500,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to school districts, charter schools, and state-tribal education compact schools for the replacement of lead-contaminated pipes, drinking water fixtures, and the purchase of water filters, including the labor costs of remediation design, installation, and construction.

(3)(a) $1,500,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to school districts, charter schools, and state-tribal education compact schools for the removal, disposal, and replacement of T-12 lighting fixtures and ballasts manufactured in or before 1979 with energy-efficient LED lighting. State grant funding provided under this subsection (3) must be prioritized for buildings that are not under contract to be replaced or modernized. State grant funding provided under this subsection (3) may only be expended after all applicable funding from utility company rebate programs available to schools in the state has been exhausted.

(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must provide information to state grant applicants under this subsection (3) related to identifying the year of T-12 lighting fixture and ballast manufacture, which may include pertinent information developed by the United States environmental protection agency. In order to receive a state grant under this section, grant applicants must provide supporting documentation, as determined by the office of the superintendent of public instruction, that includes: (i) The number of T-12 lighting fixtures and ballasts manufactured before and during 1979 and after 1979 in their facilities; and (ii) the age and primary use of each facility where the T-12 lighting fixtures and ballasts under (a) of this subsection (3) are located.
Appropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,962,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,038,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$13,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$52,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$65,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5007. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2023-25 Career Preparation and Launch Capital Grants (40000069)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the superintendent of public instruction to provide competitive grants to school districts to purchase and install career and technical education equipment that expands career connected learning and work-integrated learning opportunities.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, after consulting with school districts, Career Connect Washington, and the workforce training and education coordinating board, shall develop criteria and assurances for providing funding and outcomes for specific projects through a competitive grant program to stay within the appropriation level provided in this section consistent with the following priorities. The criteria must include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Districts or schools must demonstrate that the request provides necessary equipment to deliver career and technical education; and

(b) Applicants with a high percentage of students who are eligible and enrolled in the free and reduced-price meals program must be prioritized.

(3) No single district may receive more than $150,000 of the appropriation.
Appropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5008. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2023-25 Skills Centers Minor Works (40000070)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,135,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,540,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,675,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5009. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

K-12 Capital Programs Administration (40000090)
Appropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,839,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$19,356,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$24,195,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5010. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Chief Leschi School HVAC (40000099)
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,573,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$11,573,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$19,062,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,635,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5011. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Green Schools: Stormwater Infrastructure Projects (91000466)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for a contract with a statewide community-based organization with experience planning and developing green stormwater infrastructure and related educational programs on public school properties. The organization awarded funding under this section must use this funding solely for green stormwater infrastructure projects on public school properties.

(2) The organization selected under subsection (1) of this section must use geographic analysis to identify green stormwater infrastructure project locations based on the opportunity to reduce stormwater runoff.

(3) To qualify for a project under this section, schools must be eligible for financial assistance under Title I of the elementary and secondary education act, as amended by the every student succeeds act (P.L. 114-95). The organization selected under subsection (1) of this section must prioritize schools with high percentages of students eligible for the free and reduced-price meals program that also serve diverse student populations.

(4) Stormwater infrastructure projects under this section should aim to: (a) Provide equity of opportunity in high-need communities; and (b) engage students in conjunction with K-12 STEM education programs aligned with the Washington state science and learning standards.
Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$800,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5012. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

HB 1044 - Capital Assistance to Small School Districts (91000491)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for preconstruction grants and administrative implementation pursuant to Substitute House Bill No. 1044.

(2) If Substitute House Bill No. 1044 (capital assistance/schools) is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,979,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,356,583,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,360,562,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5013. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Maritime 253 Skills Center (91000493)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5014. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

2023-25 Campus Preservation (Minor Works) (40000021)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,400,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5015. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS

Academic and Physical Education Building (30000036)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$47,706,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$12,453,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$7,370,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$67,529,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5016. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS

2023-25 Minor Works (40000007)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$830,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$3,320,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5017. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION

2023-25 Creative Districts Capital Projects Program (30000003)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$416,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,664,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,080,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5018. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Great Hall Core Exhibit Renewal (40000145)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$575,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$751,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,226,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5019. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Heritage Capital Grant Projects 2023-25 (40000150)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5020. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Preservation - Minor Works 2023-25 (40000180)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$973,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$3,892,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,865,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5021. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Program-Museum Audio Visual Upgrades (40000181)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$437,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$437,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5022. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Minor Works: Preservation 2023-25 (40000054)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,681,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$10,724,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,405,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5023. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Major Infrastructure (30000808)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
$1,637,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$3,637,000

Appropriation:

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
$14,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$38,863,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$18,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$74,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5024. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Magnuson Health Sciences Phase II- Renovation/Replacement (40000049)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,284,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$58,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,716,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$64,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5025. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Tacoma - Land Acquisition (40000101)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5026. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Seattle - Asset Preservation (Minor Works) 23-25 (40000103)
Appropriation:

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
$33,691,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$134,764,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$168,455,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5027. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Bothell - Asset Preservation (Minor Works) 23-25 (40000129)
Appropriation:

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
$5,919,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$23,676,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$29,595,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5028. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Tacoma - Asset Preservation (Minor Works) 23-25 (40000131)
Appropriation:

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
$4,915,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$19,660,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$24,575,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5029. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Infrastructure Renewal (40000132)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$13,000,000

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
$9,175,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$22,175,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$88,700,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$110,875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5030. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (91000029)
Appropriation:

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
$25,825,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,825,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5031. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Tacoma Campus Soil Remediation (92000002)
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$2,578,000

Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$7,680,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,258,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5032. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Minor Capital Preservation 2023-25 (MCR) (40000340)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,500,000

Washington State University Building Account—

State
. . . .
$40,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$46,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$200,460,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$246,960,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5033. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Minor Capital Program 2023-25 (MCI & Omnibus Equip.) (40000341)
Appropriation:

Washington State University Building Account—

State
. . . .
$6,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$26,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5034. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

New Engineering Student Success Building & Infrastructure (40000342)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$40,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5035. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Clean Building Standard Energy Efficiency Improvements (40000346)
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$15,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5036. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Eastlick-Abelson Renovation (40000362)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$22,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$22,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5037. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (91000037)
Appropriation:

Washington State University Building Account—

State
. . . .
$10,115,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$20,230,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,460,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$70,805,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5038. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Science Renovation (30000507)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$26,452,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$58,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$26,835,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$111,287,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5039. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works: Preservation 2023-25 (40000116)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,375,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$30,368,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,743,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5040. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works: Program 2023-25 (40000120)
Appropriation:

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$24,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5041. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Preventative Maintenance/Backlog Reduction (40000134)
Appropriation:

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$2,217,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,868,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,085,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5042. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

HB 1390 – District Energy Systems (91000027)
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5043. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Multicultural Center (40000123)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5044. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works Preservation 2023-2025 (40000128)
Appropriation:

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$7,594,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,035,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$8,629,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$53,892,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$62,521,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5045. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works Program 2023-2025 (40000145)
Appropriation:

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5046. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Behavioral & Mental Health Building (91000022)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Pursuant to RCW 43.88.130, Central Washington University may enter into a multibiennium contract for the design and construction of a behavioral and mental health building. Nothing in this section authorizes the agency to make an expenditure without an appropriation.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$45,580,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$82,990,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$128,570,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5047. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (91000023)
Appropriation:

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$2,422,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,422,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5048. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

HB 1390 – District Energy Systems (91000024)
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5049. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Seminar I Renovation (30000125)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,679,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$25,227,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,533,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$28,439,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5050. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Preventative Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (30000612)
Appropriation:

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$880,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,493,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$3,520,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,893,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5051. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Minor Works Preservation 2023-25 (40000085)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,300,000

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$5,790,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$8,090,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$35,880,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$43,970,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5052. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Minor Works Program 2023-25 (40000094)
Appropriation:

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$2,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5053. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

HB 1390 – District Energy Systems (91000037)
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$25,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5054. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Student Development and Success Center (30000919)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$53,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$53,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5055. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Heating Conversion Project (40000005)
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$139,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$149,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5056. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Preservation 2023-25 (40000006)
Appropriation:

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$4,888,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$34,008,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$38,896,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5057. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Program 2023-25 (40000007)
Appropriation:

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$12,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5058. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Preventative Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (40000012)
Appropriation:

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$3,614,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$14,456,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$18,070,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5059. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Lake Washington: Center for Design (40000102)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$893,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$38,949,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,267,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$42,109,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5060. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Tacoma: Center for Innovative Learning and Engagement (40000104)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,379,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$39,606,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$613,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$42,598,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5061. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bates: Fire Service Training Center (40000130)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,558,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$38,135,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$244,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,937,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5062. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Everett: Baker Hall Replacement (40000190)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$135,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$37,904,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$140,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$38,179,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5063. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Wenatchee: Center for Technical Education and Innovation (40000198)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,949,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$46,471,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,317,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$49,737,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5064. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Facility Repairs (23-25) (40000595)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$49,496,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$197,984,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$247,480,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5065. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Preservation (23-25) (40000630)
Appropriation:

Community and Technical College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$5,924,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$22,800,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$28,724,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$114,896,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$143,620,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5066. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Roof Repairs (23-25) (40000670)
Appropriation:

Community and Technical College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$10,613,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,374,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$14,987,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$59,948,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$74,935,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5067. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Site Repairs (23-25) (40000698)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,754,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$31,016,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$38,770,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5068. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Infrastructure Replacement (23-25) (40000721)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$40,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$161,200,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$201,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5069. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Program Improvements (23-25) (40000754)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$68,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$272,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$340,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5070. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Bldg System Repairs (40000871)
Appropriation:

Community and Technical College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$22,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$91,200,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$114,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5071. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

2023-25 Career Preparation and Launch Grants (92000037)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) This appropriation is provided solely for the state board for community and technical colleges to provide competitive grants to community and technical colleges to purchase and install equipment that expands career-connected learning opportunities.

(2) The state board for community and technical colleges shall develop common criteria for providing competitive grant funding and outcomes for specific projects.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,000,000

(End of part)

PART 6

REAPPROPRIATIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6001. FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE

Archives Minor Works (30000044)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$56,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$269,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$325,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6002. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Economic Revitalization Board (30000097)
Reappropriation:

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State
. . . .
$7,774,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$10,246,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$18,020,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6003. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Assistance Account Program 2013 Loan List (30000184)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1016, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.
Reappropriation:

Public Works Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$503,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$31,655,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,158,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6004. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy and Energy Freedom Program (30000726)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6003, chapter 4, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,086,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$2,523,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$4,609,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$35,791,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6005. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017 Local and Community Projects (30000846)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6004, chapter 4, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,229,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$9,517,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,746,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6006. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2017-19 Housing Trust Fund Program (30000872)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1004, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,645,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$6,007,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State
. . . .
$1,476,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$11,128,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$102,161,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$113,289,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6007. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Economic Opportunity Grants (30000873)
Reappropriation:

Rural Washington Loan Account—State
. . . .
$325,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,425,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6008. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Assistance Account Construction Loans (30000878)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1019, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$22,673,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$54,547,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$77,220,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6009. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Weatherization Plus Health Matchmaker Program (30000879)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1014, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$222,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$3,492,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$3,714,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$19,786,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$23,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6010. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy Funds 3 (30000881)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1007, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

Energy Efficiency Account—State
. . . .
$4,994,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$20,387,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$25,381,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$18,319,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$43,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6011. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Energy Efficiency and Solar Grants (30000882)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6007, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

Energy Efficiency Account—State
. . . .
$1,293,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$782,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$2,075,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,925,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6012. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2018 Local and Community Projects (40000005)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1052, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$21,708,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$106,629,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$128,337,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6013. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Early Learning Facility Grants (40000006)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1005, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.
Reappropriation:

Early Learning Facilities Development Account—

State
. . . .
$314,000

Early Learning Facilities Revolving Account—

State
. . . .
$1,556,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$1,870,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$13,595,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,465,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6014. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Dental Clinic Capacity Grants (40000007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1002, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$978,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$14,556,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,534,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6015. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

PWAA Preconstruction and Emergency Loan Programs (40000009)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1027, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$1,702,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$17,298,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$19,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6016. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Behavioral Health Community Capacity (40000018)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6004, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$19,163,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$63,936,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$83,099,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6017. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Housing Trust Fund Program (40000036)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6005, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,775,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$35,592,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$38,367,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$134,383,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$172,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6018. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Board (40000038)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1020, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.
Reappropriation:

Public Works Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$17,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$76,578,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$93,578,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6019. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Building for the Arts Grant Program (40000039)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6011, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,497,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,827,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,324,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6020. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Community Economic Revitalization Board (40000040)
Reappropriation:

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State
. . . .
$18,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$18,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6021. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Youth Recreational Facilities Grant Program (40000041)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1034, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,190,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,690,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,880,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6022. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy Transition 4 (40000042)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1005, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$15,234,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$901,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$16,135,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$16,465,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6023. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Building Communities Fund Program (40000043)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1036, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$15,255,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$21,530,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$36,785,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6024. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Early Learning Facilities (40000044)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1006, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.
Reappropriation:

Early Learning Facilities Development Account—

State
. . . .
$1,140,000

Early Learning Facilities Revolving Account—

State
. . . .
$13,292,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,767,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$18,199,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$16,821,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,020,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6025. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Weatherization (40000048)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1038, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$19,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6026. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Energy Efficiency and Solar Grants Program (40000049)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1023, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,979,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,521,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6027. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Behavioral Health Capacity Grants (40000114)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1010, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$35,919,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$90,232,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$126,151,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6028. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2020 Local and Community Projects (40000116)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6007, chapter 332, Laws of 2021, except that funding may not be directed to the Arivva Community Center.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$50,532,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$115,775,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$166,307,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6029. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Washington Broadband Program (40000117)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1012, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.
Reappropriation:

Statewide Broadband Account—State
. . . .
$16,079,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,471,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$21,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6030. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Behavioral Rehabilitation Services Capacity Grants (40000124)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1044, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,967,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$33,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6031. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021 Local and Community Projects (40000130)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6008, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$11,416,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$21,256,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,672,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6032. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Seattle Vocational Institute (40000136)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1009, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$175,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$81,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$256,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,044,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6033. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Youth Recreational Facilities Grant Program (40000139)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1056, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,019,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$670,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,689,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6034. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Early Learning Facilities-School Districts Grant (40000140)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1057, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

Early Learning Facilities Development Account—

State
. . . .
$2,281,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,438,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,719,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6035. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Public Works Assistance Account-Construction (40000141)
Reappropriation:

Public Works Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$217,510,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$31,490,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$249,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6036. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Building Communities Fund Grant Program (40000142)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1059, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$27,103,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,043,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,146,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6037. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Building for the Arts Grant Program (40000143)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1060, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,955,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,045,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$16,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6038. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 CERB Capital Construction (40000144)
Reappropriation:

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$40,000,000

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$412,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$50,412,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$14,588,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$65,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6039. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Library Capital Improvement Program (LCIP) Grants (40000147)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1017, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$15,631,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$973,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$16,604,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6040. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Clean Energy V-Investing in Washington's Clean Energy (40000148)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 7005 of this act.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$52,821,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$2,410,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$55,231,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,067,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$56,298,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6041. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Energy Retrofits for Public Buildings Grant Program (40000149)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7009 of this act.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,211,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,746,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,957,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6042. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Weatherization Plus Health (40000150)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 7015 of this act.
Reappropriation:

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$8,182,000

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$47,049,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,940,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$60,171,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,944,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$67,115,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6043. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 PWB Broadband Infrastructure (40000152)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1067, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—Federal
. . . .
$45,040,000

Statewide Broadband Account—State
. . . .
$14,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$59,040,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$960,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$60,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6044. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Housing Trust Fund Investment in Affordable Housing (40000153)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1020, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$105,032,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$66,268,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$28,793,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$56,051,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$256,144,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$31,856,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$288,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6045. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Behavioral Health Community Capacity Grants (40000219)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 7008 of this act.
Reappropriation:

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$26,323,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$89,011,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$115,334,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,153,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$121,487,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6046. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019-21 Housing Trust Fund Investment from Operating (40000220)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1070, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

Washington Housing Trust Account—State
. . . .
$17,156,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$30,285,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$47,441,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6047. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Rapid Capital Housing Acquisition (40000222)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 7003 of this act.
Reappropriation:

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$31,597,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$25,971,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$57,568,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$62,567,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$120,135,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6048. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Rural Rehabilitation Loan Program (40000223)
Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$2,833,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$9,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,842,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6049. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2022 Local & Community Projects (40000230)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7010 of this act.

(2) The department must reimburse the city of Chelan for its expenditures for the Chelan municipal airport extension project. The amount of the reimbursement to the city of Chelan under this section may not exceed the amount appropriated for the Chelan municipal airport extension project in section 1022, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.

(3) It is the intent of the legislature to appropriate funding for the remaining costs of the Chelan municipal airport extension project in fiscal year 2024.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$118,443,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$51,879,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$170,322,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6050. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Economic Opportunity Grants Authority (40000246)
Reappropriation:

Rural Washington Loan Account—State
. . . .
$903,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$903,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6051. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2022 Rapid Capital Housing Acquisition (40000260)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1024, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

Apple Health and Homes Account—State
. . . .
$59,952,000

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$213,558,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$273,510,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$26,490,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$300,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6052. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023 Local and Community Projects (40000266)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7006 of this act.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$48,301,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,017,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$53,318,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6053. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Ports Infrastructure (40000278)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1027, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$14,328,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,718,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$16,046,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6054. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

CERB Administered Broadband Infrastructure (91000943)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1011, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—Federal
. . . .
$22,716,000

Public Works Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$3,450,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$2,100,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$28,266,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$10,184,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$38,450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6055. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019 Local and Community Projects (91001157)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1017, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,781,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$35,749,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,530,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6056. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Library Capital Improvement Program (91001239)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1053, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,702,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,136,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,838,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6057. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Rapid Response Community Preservation Pilot Program (91001278)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1018, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.
Reappropriation:

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6058. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Dental Capacity Grants (91001306)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6012, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$485,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,093,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,578,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6059. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Continuing Affordability in Current Housing (91001659)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1072, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6060. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Dental Capacity Grants (91001660)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1043, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,676,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,549,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,225,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6061. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Substance Use Disorder Recovery Housing (91001675)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1031, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$48,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$102,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6062. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Early Learning Facilities (91001677)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1037, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$25,878,000

Early Learning Facilities Development Account—

State
. . . .
$18,841,000

Early Learning Facilities Revolving Account—

State
. . . .
$2,192,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$891,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$47,802,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$14,698,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$62,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6063. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Early Learning Renovation Grants (91001681)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7012 of this act.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6064. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Grants for Affordable Housing Development Connections (91001685)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1032, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$27,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$17,910,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$44,910,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$390,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$45,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6065. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Work, Education, Health Monitoring Projects (91001686)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7011 of this act.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$805,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$21,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$826,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6066. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Infrastructure Projects (91001687)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1033, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$25,714,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$94,106,000

Public Works Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$485,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,087,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$130,392,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,908,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$137,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6067. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Capital Grant Program Equity (91001688)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1093, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.

(2) The department may use up to 5 percent of the reappropriation in this section to administer the program, including, but not limited to, providing technical assistance, managing contracts, and reporting.

(3) The department must provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor by October 1, 2024, on progress and recommendations for improving outreach to underrepresented and remote communities and eliminating barriers to participating in state capital funding programs.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6068. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Food Banks (91001690)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1034, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,686,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,586,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6069. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Homeless Youth Facilities (91001991)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1048, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$9,723,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,172,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,895,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6070. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2022 Permanent Supportive Housing Remediation (91002160)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1035, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6071. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Dig-Once Pilot Program (91002171)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1050, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$17,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$23,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6072. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Projects for Jobs & Economic Development (92000151)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6013, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account—State
. . . .
$116,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$735,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$851,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$35,786,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$36,637,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6073. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Projects that Strengthen Communities & Quality of Life (92000230)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6006, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$982,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$31,102,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,084,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6074. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Local & Community Projects 2016 (92000369)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1030, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,917,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$123,002,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$128,919,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6075. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Enhanced Shelter Capacity Grants (92000939)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7007 of this act.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,889,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$723,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,612,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6076. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Broadband Office (92000953)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 7016 of this act.
Reappropriation:

Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—Federal
. . . .
$124,726,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$150,522,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$19,287,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$294,535,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,468,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$296,003,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6077. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Community Relief (92000957)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1044, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,848,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$1,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$9,849,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,901,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6078. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Reimann Roads, Telecomm and Utility Relocation (Pasco) (92001004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1088, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,515,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$985,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6079. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Child Care Minor Renovation Grants (92001109)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1045, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$28,011,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$511,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$28,522,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6080. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Increasing Housing Inventory (92001122)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1090, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,183,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$317,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6081. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2022 Dental Capacity Grants (92001175)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1049, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,705,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$96,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,801,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6082. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2022 Broadband Office (92001178)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7017 of this act.
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$49,991,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$9,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6083. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Energy Efficiency Revolving Loan Fund Capitalization Program (92001179)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1051, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

Energy Efficiency Rev Loan Capital—State
. . . .
$1,869,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,869,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6084. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2022 Crisis Stabilization Facilities (92001286)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1025, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$71,995,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$72,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6085. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Cowlitz River Dredging (20082856)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1053, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$700,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6086. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Construction Cost Assessment (40000002)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1099, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State
. . . .
$54,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$246,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6087. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Fircrest School Land Use Assessment (92000035)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1100, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$165,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$335,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6088. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

21-31 Statewide Minor Works - Preservation (40000180)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$323,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$564,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$887,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6089. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Executive Guard Post One (40000448)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$740,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$740,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6090. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

FTA Emergency Power Generator Replacement (30000171)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$821,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$54,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6091. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

FTA - Student Dormitory HVAC (40000034)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$127,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$198,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$325,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6092. FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION

Omnibus Minor Works (40000014)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$726,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$9,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$735,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6093. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

Modernize Lab and Training Facility (30000043)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 2005, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

Accident Account—State
. . . .
$9,860,000

Medical Aid Account—State
. . . .
$1,730,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$11,590,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$41,613,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$53,203,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6094. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

Air Handler Retrofit and Cooling Tower Replacement (30000059)
Reappropriation:

Accident Account—State
. . . .
$2,050,000

Medical Aid Account—State
. . . .
$2,050,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$4,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$638,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,738,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6095. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Joint Force Readiness Center: Replacement (30000591)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$144,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$156,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6096. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Thurston County Readiness Center (30000594)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1027, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$3,301,000

Military Department Capital Account—State
. . . .
$553,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$3,854,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$44,098,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$47,952,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6097. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Anacortes Readiness Center Major Renovation (40000004)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1100, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,472,000

Military Department Capital Account—State
. . . .
$62,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,707,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$5,241,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,010,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,251,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6098. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Stryker Canopies Kent Site (40000073)
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,547,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$453,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6099. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Stryker Canopies Bremerton Site (40000077)
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,107,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$393,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6100. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Montesano Field Maintenance Shop (FMS) Addition (40000095)
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,964,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$36,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6101. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Program 21-23 Biennium (40000185)
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$5,309,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,002,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$7,311,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,351,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,662,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6102. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor Works Preservation 2021-23 Biennium (40000188)
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$6,289,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,028,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$8,317,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,215,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,532,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6103. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Camp Murray Bldg. 20 Roof Top Unit Upgrade (40000189)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$307,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$313,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6104. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital New Kitchen and Commissary Building (20081319)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2003, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,263,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$28,927,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,190,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6105. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Fircrest School-Back-Up Power & Electrical Feeders (30000415)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2005, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,035,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,165,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6106. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital: New Boiler Plant (30000468)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,095,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$11,234,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,329,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6107. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Preservation Projects: Statewide (30002235)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,419,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$25,266,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$26,685,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6108. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Rainier School-Multiple Buildings: Roofing Replacement & Repairs (30002752)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2005, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$456,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,174,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,630,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6109. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Fircrest School-Nursing Facilities: Replacement (30002755)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7021 of this act.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$11,922,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$261,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,183,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6110. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital-Westlake: New HVAC DDC Controls (30002759)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,589,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,261,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6111. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Forensic Services: Two Wards Addition (30002765)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,673,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$21,827,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6112. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

DOC/DSHS McNeil Island-Infrastructure: Repairs & Upgrades (30003211)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$979,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$976,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,955,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6113. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

DOC/DSHS McNeil Island-Infrastructure: Water System Replacement (30003213)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$96,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,412,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,508,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6114. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Child Study and Treatment Center: CLIP Capacity (30003324)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$157,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$12,787,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,944,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6115. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

State Psychiatric Hospitals: Compliance with Federal Requirements (30003569)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2015, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$94,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,906,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6116. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital: Master Plan Update (30003571)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2016, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.
Reappropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$69,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$456,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$525,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6117. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Yakima Valley School-Multiple Buildings: Safety Improvements (30003573)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$56,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,819,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6118. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Special Commitment Center-Community Facilities: New Capacity (30003577)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 2023, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$176,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$6,176,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$324,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6119. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Multiple Buildings: Fire Suppression (30003579)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$55,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$945,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6120. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Multiple Buildings: Elevator Modernization (30003582)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$318,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$465,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$783,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6121. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Fircrest School: Campus Master Plan & Rezone (30003601)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 2007, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$1,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$163,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$164,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$329,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$493,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6122. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Forensic Services: Roofing Replacement (30003603)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$54,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,901,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,955,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6123. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital: Emergency Electrical System Upgrades (30003616)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,182,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$873,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,055,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6124. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Behavioral Health: Compliance with Systems Improvement Agreement (30003849)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2033, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$124,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,776,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6125. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Preservation Projects: Statewide 2019-21 (40000381)
Reappropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$913,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,447,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$7,360,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$7,690,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6126. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Program Projects: Statewide 2019-21 (40000382)
Reappropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$566,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$171,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$737,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,018,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,755,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6127. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital-Eastlake & Westlake: Fire & Smoke Controls (40000404)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,728,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$322,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6128. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital-Westlake: Fire Stops (40000405)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,874,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$256,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,130,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6129. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital-EL & WL: HVAC Compliance & Monitoring (40000492)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$570,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,345,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,915,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6130. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Maple Lane-Columbia Cottage: Behavioral Health Expansion (40000567)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,871,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,129,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6131. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Program Projects: Statewide 2021-23 (40000569)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2046, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,070,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$685,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,755,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6132. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor Works Preservation Projects: Statewide 2021-23 (40000571)
Reappropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$1,612,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,600,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$9,212,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,378,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,590,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6133. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Transitional Care Center-Main Building: Patient Rooms Cooling (40000574)
Reappropriation:

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,315,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$20,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,335,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6134. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Statewide-Behavioral Health: Patient Safety Improvements 2021-23 (40000578)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,151,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$849,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6135. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Building 29: Roofing Replacement (40000589)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,867,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$168,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,035,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6136. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Building 27: Roofing Replacement (40000888)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$512,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$688,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6137. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Fircrest School-ICF Cottages: HVAC & Water Heater Improvements (40000946)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,605,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$175,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,780,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6138. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Building 29: CMS Certification (40000948)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$30,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$190,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$220,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6139. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

ESH and WSH-All Wards: Patient Safety Improvements (91000019)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,633,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$14,036,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$18,669,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6140. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

DSHS & DCYF Fire Alarms (91000066)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2036, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,026,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$10,793,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$16,819,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6141. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern State Hospital Elevators (91000068)
Reappropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$720,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,980,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6142. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital & CSTC Power Upgrades (91000070)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$783,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,517,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6143. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

BH: State Operated Community Civil 16-Bed Capacity (91000075)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,255,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$17,935,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,190,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6144. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Rainier School-PATs E,C Cottage Cooling Upgrades (91000078)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$143,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$7,857,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6145. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital Treatment & Recovery Center (91000080)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$23,931,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$669,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$24,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6146. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Residential Habilitation Center Land Management (92000044)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2060, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6147. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water Preconstruction Loans (30000334)
Reappropriation:

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$4,279,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,721,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6148. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

New Central Boiler Plant (30000381)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2064, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,658,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,607,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,265,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6149. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water Construction Loans (30000409)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2034, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.
Reappropriation:

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$36,094,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$81,906,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$118,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6150. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water System Repairs and Consolidation (40000006)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2035, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$760,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,240,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6151. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

2019-21 Drinking Water Assistance Program (40000025)
Reappropriation:

Drinking Water Assistance Account—Federal
. . . .
$2,197,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$32,803,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6152. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

2019-21 Drinking Water System Repairs and Consolidation (40000027)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2068, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$592,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$908,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6153. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Small & Disadvantaged Communities DW (40000031)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2020, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$20,042,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$764,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,806,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6154. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Replace Air Handling Unit (AHU) in A/Q-wings (40000034)
Reappropriation:

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,894,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,894,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6155. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

2021-23 Drinking Water Assistance Program (40000049)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2023, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

Drinking Water Assistance Account—Federal
. . . .
$112,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$112,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6156. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

2021-23 Drinking Water Construction Loans - State Match (40000051)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2024, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$11,769,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,631,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6157. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Lakewood Water District PFAS Treatment Facility (40000052)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$936,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,633,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,569,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6158. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Generator for New Central Boiler Plant (40000053)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,837,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,837,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6159. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Improve Critical Water Infrastructure (40000058)
Reappropriation:

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6160. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Increase DWSRF Preconstruction Loans (40000059)
Reappropriation:

Drinking Water Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6161. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

WVH HVAC Retrofit (40000006)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$395,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$355,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6162. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

WSH - Life Safety Grant (40000013)
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$315,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$164,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$479,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$21,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6163. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Transitional Housing Capital Improvements (40000066)
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,286,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$114,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6164. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Extended Care Facilities Construction Grants (92000001)
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$12,538,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$595,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,133,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6165. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Echo Glen-Housing Unit: Acute Mental Health Unit (30002736)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2078, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,043,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,557,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6166. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Green Hill School-Recreation Building: Replacement (30003237)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2013, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$14,726,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$17,036,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$31,762,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6167. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Minor Works Preservation Projects: Statewide 2019-21 (40000400)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$140,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,300,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,440,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6168. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Minor Works Preservation Projects - SW 2021-23 (40000532)
Reappropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
$739,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$22,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$761,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6169. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Green Hill School - Baker North Remodel (40000534)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,935,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$689,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,624,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6170. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC: WSR Perimeter Wall Renovation (30000117)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$905,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$295,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$5,596,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,796,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6171. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington Corrections Center: Transformers and Switches (30000143)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,002,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$12,583,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,585,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6172. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC: TRU Roof Programs and Recreation Building (30000738)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,840,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$156,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,996,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6173. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC: WSR Clinic Roof Replacement (40000180)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,123,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$210,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,333,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6174. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Minor Works - Preservation Projects (40000254)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,595,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,728,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,323,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6175. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

LCC: Boiler Replacement (40000255)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,210,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$90,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6176. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WCC: Interim Mental Health Building (40000260)
Reappropriation:

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$672,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,237,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$1,909,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$38,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,947,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6177. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

MCC: TRU Support Building HVAC Replacement (40000379)
Reappropriation:

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$4,606,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$40,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,646,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6178. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WCC: Support Buildings Roof Replacement (40000380)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,746,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$254,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6179. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

Independent Living Skills Center (30000107)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,228,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,770,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,998,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6180. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

Minor Works: Campus Preservation 2019-21 (40000004)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$75,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$580,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$655,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6181. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

21-23 Campus Preservation (40000015)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$459,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$16,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$475,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6182. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS

Minor Works: Preservation 2021-23 (30000047)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$75,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$170,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$245,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6183. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Rehabilitation of Beverly Bridge (30000022)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1111, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Private/Local
. . . .
$429,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$156,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$585,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,990,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,575,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6184. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

2019-21 Historic County Courthouse Grants Program (30000023)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1112, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$160,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$959,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,119,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6185. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

2019-21 Historic Cemetery Grant Program (40000001)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$121,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$394,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$515,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6186. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

Ebey's National Historic Reserve (40000003)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1115, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$624,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$696,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,320,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6187. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

2021-23 Heritage Barn Grants (40000005)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$765,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$235,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6188. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

2021-23 Historic County Courthouse Rehabilitation Program (40000006)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1144, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,603,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$259,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,862,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6189. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

2021-23 Historic Cemetery Grant Program (40000007)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$275,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$25,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6190. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION

2021-23 Historic Theater Capital Grant Program (40000012)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1146, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$288,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$12,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6191. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Bothell (30000378)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5037, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$24,018,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$55,420,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$79,438,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6192. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UWMC NW - Campus Behavioral Health Renovation (91000027)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5055, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,297,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$703,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6193. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

College of Engineering Interdisciplinary/Education Research Ctr (30000492)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$36,677,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$13,323,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6194. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Behavioral Health Teaching Facility (40000038)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 5014, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$88,777,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$98,777,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$145,223,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$244,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6195. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Seattle - Asset Preservation (Minor Works) 21-23 (40000050)
Reappropriation:

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
$16,552,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$19,133,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,685,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6196. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Bothell - Asset Preservation (Minor Works) 2021-23 (40000070)
Reappropriation:

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
$1,429,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,209,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,638,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6197. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Ctr for Advanced Materials and Clean Energy Research Test Beds (91000016)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$12,588,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$16,412,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$29,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6198. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

WSU Vancouver - Life Sciences Building (30000840)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$32,017,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$25,083,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$57,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6199. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Spokane-Biomedical and Health Sc Building Ph II (40000012)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,095,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,405,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6200. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Minor Capital Preservation (MCR): 2021-23 (40000145)
Reappropriation:

Washington State University Building Account—

State
. . . .
$13,607,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$14,186,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$27,793,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6201. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Campus Fire Protection and Domestic Water Reservoir (40000272)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,721,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,279,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6202. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Clark Hall Research Lab Renovation (40000274)
Reappropriation:

Washington State University Building Account—

State
. . . .
$1,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,850,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6203. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Pullman Student Success Center Phase 1 (40000339)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,903,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$97,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6204. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Infrastructure Renewal II (40000016)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,436,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$9,564,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6205. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Infrastructure Renewal III (40000070)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,876,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$124,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6206. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Lucy Covington Center (40000071)
Reappropriation:

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$272,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$28,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6207. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works: Preservation 2021-23 (40000107)
Reappropriation:

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$1,806,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,194,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6208. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works: Program 2021-23 (40000110)
Reappropriation:

Eastern Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6209. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Nutrition Science (30000456)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,344,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$57,236,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$59,580,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6210. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Health Education (40000009)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$24,224,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$37,981,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$62,205,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6211. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Chiller Addition (40000075)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$952,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,237,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,189,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6212. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works Preservation 2021 - 2023 (40000083)
Reappropriation:

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$2,504,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$300,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$2,804,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,657,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,461,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6213. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works Program 2021 - 2023 (40000084)
Reappropriation:

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$511,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$489,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6214. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Electrical Grid Security (40000121)
Reappropriation:

Central Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$576,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$576,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$1,152,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$356,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,508,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6215. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Minor Works Preservation 2021-23 (40000034)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,772,000

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$850,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$2,622,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,903,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,525,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6216. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Lab II HVAC Upgrades (40000047)
Reappropriation:

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$3,454,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$546,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6217. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Recreation and Athletic Center Critical Repairs (40000082)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$971,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$29,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6218. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Emergency Dispatch & Communication System Replacement (40000084)
Reappropriation:

The Evergreen State College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$992,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6219. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Access Control Security Upgrades (30000604)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,290,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$556,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$1,846,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,669,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,515,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6220. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Electrical Engineering/Computer Science Building (30000872)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 5028, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$1,863,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$46,324,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$49,687,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,676,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$56,363,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6221. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

2021-23 Classroom & Lab Upgrades (30000911)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,033,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,817,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6222. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Coast Salish Longhouse (30000912)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 5105, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,749,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$4,249,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$251,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6223. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Preservation 2021-23 (30000915)
Reappropriation:

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$2,610,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,190,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6224. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Program 2021-2023 (30000918)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$544,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$318,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$862,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$695,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,557,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6225. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION

Creative Districts Capital Construction Projects (30000002)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$381,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$31,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$412,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6226. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Heritage Capital Grants Projects (30000297)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5054, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,003,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$7,376,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,379,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6227. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Heritage Capital Grant Projects: 2019-21 (40000014)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5020, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,303,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,828,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,131,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6228. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Heritage Capital Grant Projects 2021-2023 (40000099)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,457,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,359,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,816,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6229. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Preservation - Minor Works 2021-23 (40000136)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,637,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,060,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,697,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6230. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Black History Commemoration (91000008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5022, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$17,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$83,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6231. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Campbell and Carriage House Repairs and Restoration (40000017)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$764,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,192,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,956,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6232. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Minor Works: Preservation 2021-23 (40000041)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$109,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$669,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$778,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6233. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Complete HVAC Controls Replacement (40000052)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$11,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$279,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$290,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6234. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Garage & Emergency Exit Concrete Remediation (40000053)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$838,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$63,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$901,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6235. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Low-Level Nuclear Waste Disposal Trench Closure (19972012)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3002, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.
Reappropriation:

Site Closure Account—State
. . . .
$1,774,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,128,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,902,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6236. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Twin Lake Aquifer Recharge Project (20042951)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$128,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$622,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6237. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Quad Cities Water Right Mitigation (20052852)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$116,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,484,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6238. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Transfer of Water Rights for Cabin Owners (20081951)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$57,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$393,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6239. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000028)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$57,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,939,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,996,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6240. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000213)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3030, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$67,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$7,933,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6241. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grant Program (30000216)
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$15,255,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$47,404,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$62,659,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6242. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

ASARCO - Tacoma Smelter Plume and Mines (30000280)
Reappropriation:

Cleanup Settlement Account—State
. . . .
$2,090,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$17,837,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$19,927,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6243. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Padilla Bay Federal Capital Projects (30000282)
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$60,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$740,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6244. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000331)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$895,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$9,105,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6245. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Dungeness Water Supply & Mitigation (30000333)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3082, chapter 19, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$375,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,675,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6246. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

ASARCO Cleanup (30000334)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3001, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

Cleanup Settlement Account—State
. . . .
$443,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$35,817,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$36,260,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6247. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grants (30000374)
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$7,933,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$54,299,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$62,232,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6248. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000432)
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$4,684,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,124,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,808,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6249. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grants (30000458)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3011, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,421,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$34,584,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$44,005,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6250. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Floodplains by Design (30000537)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,183,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$33,344,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,527,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6251. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

ASARCO Cleanup (30000538)
Reappropriation:

Cleanup Settlement Account—State
. . . .
$1,022,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$10,939,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,961,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6252. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Cleanup Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000542)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3013, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$2,054,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$11,418,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,472,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6253. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (30000588)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3068, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.
Reappropriation:

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Revenue

Recovery Account—State
. . . .
$462,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$18,538,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$19,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6254. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (30000589)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,125,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,930,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,055,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6255. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Yakima River Basin Water Supply (30000590)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7038 of this act.
Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$294,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$26,456,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$26,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6256. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000591)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$875,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,125,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6257. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

ASARCO Cleanup (30000670)
Reappropriation:

Cleanup Settlement Account—State
. . . .
$10,884,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$17,876,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$28,760,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6258. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (30000673)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,815,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,869,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,684,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6259. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2015-17 Restored Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000704)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,068,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$368,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,436,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6260. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Centennial Clean Water program (30000705)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3009, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,693,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$27,907,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$33,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6261. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Floodplains by Design 2017-19 (30000706)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3001, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,919,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$26,522,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,441,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6262. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Remedial Action Grants (30000707)
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$1,123,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,420,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,543,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6263. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Swift Creek Natural Asbestos Flood Control and Cleanup (30000708)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3040, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$123,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,318,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,441,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6264. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (30000712)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3006, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.
Reappropriation:

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development

Account—State
. . . .
$5,836,000

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Revenue

Recovery Account—State
. . . .
$893,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,529,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$8,258,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$25,542,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$33,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6265. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000714)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3017, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,374,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,626,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6266. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water Irrigation Efficiencies Program (30000740)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3007, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$204,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,296,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6267. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000742)
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$1,727,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$13,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,740,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6268. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2015-17 Restored Clean Up Toxic Sites – Puget Sound (30000763)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,557,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,139,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,696,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6269. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Stormwater Financial Assistance Program (30000796)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3049, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State
. . . .
$4,138,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$19,192,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$23,330,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$13,070,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$36,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6270. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2015-17 Restored Stormwater Financial Assistance (30000797)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$11,172,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$18,928,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6271. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

VW Settlement Funded Projects (40000018)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3008, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Private/Local
. . . .
$92,185,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$20,515,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$112,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6272. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Reduce Air Pollution from Transit/Sch. Buses/State-Owned Vehicles (40000109)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3019, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.
Reappropriation:

Air Pollution Control Account—State
. . . .
$10,587,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$17,813,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$28,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6273. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (40000110)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3070, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund—State
. . . .
$138,531,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$65,469,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$204,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6274. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (40000111)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,673,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,561,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,234,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6275. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 ASARCO Cleanup (40000114)
Reappropriation:

Cleanup Settlement Account—State
. . . .
$6,352,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$448,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6276. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Reducing Toxic Diesel Emissions (40000115)
Reappropriation:

Air Pollution Control Account—State
. . . .
$217,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$783,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6277. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Centennial Clean Water Program (40000116)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3074, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$13,226,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$16,774,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6278. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (40000117)
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$12,052,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$58,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,110,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6279. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Padilla Bay Federal Capital Projects (40000127)
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6280. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Floodplains by Design (40000129)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$27,982,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$22,418,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6281. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Clean Up Toxics Sites – Puget Sound (40000130)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3080, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$11,636,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,131,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,767,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6282. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Stormwater Financial Assistance Program (40000144)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3020, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State
. . . .
$26,731,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$22,275,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$49,006,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6283. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2015 Drought Authority (40000146)
Reappropriation:

State Drought Preparedness and Response Account—

State
. . . .
$669,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$669,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6284. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Healthy Housing Remediation Program (40000149)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3085, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$3,449,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,381,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,830,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6285. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (40000152)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3087, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Revenue

Recovery Account—State
. . . .
$2,323,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$16,144,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$10,360,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$28,827,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$11,173,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6286. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Streamflow Restoration Program (40000177)
Reappropriation:

Watershed Restoration and Enhancement Bond

Account—State
. . . .
$26,806,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$13,194,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6287. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Yakima River Basin Water Supply (40000179)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7044 of this act.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$14,008,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$22,906,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$36,914,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6288. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Zosel Dam Preservation (40000193)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$80,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$137,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$217,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6289. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Protect Investments in Cleanup Remedies (40000194)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6032, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$4,732,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,472,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,204,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6290. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Chehalis Basin Strategy (40000209)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3023, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$27,989,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$45,918,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$73,907,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6291. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Chemical Action Plan Implementation (40000210)
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$261,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,443,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,704,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6292. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Remedial Action Grants (40000211)
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$31,903,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$16,979,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$48,882,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6293. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2020 Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (40000286)
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$632,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$368,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6294. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2020 Remedial Action Grants (40000288)
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$20,766,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$11,890,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,656,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6295. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 ASARCO Everett Smelter Plume Cleanup (40000303)
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$10,797,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$17,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,814,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6296. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Remedial Action Grant Program (40000304)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3082, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$68,985,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,209,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$71,194,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6297. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Stormwater Financial Assistance Program (40000336)
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State
. . . .
$67,181,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$7,819,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$75,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6298. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (40000337)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3003, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund—Federal
. . . .
$14,603,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund—State
. . . .
$225,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$239,603,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$18,397,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$258,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6299. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Waste Tire Pile Cleanup and Prevention (40000338)
Reappropriation:

Waste Tire Removal Account—State
. . . .
$419,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$581,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6300. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (40000340)
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$20,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$470,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,820,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6301. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Clean Up Toxic Sites – Puget Sound (40000346)
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$4,663,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,145,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,808,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6302. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Centennial Clean Water Program (40000359)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3089, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$35,222,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,778,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6303. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Protect Investments in Cleanup Remedies (40000360)
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$10,137,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$956,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,093,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6304. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Reducing Toxic Wood Stove Emissions (40000371)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3091, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$1,298,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,702,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6305. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Freshwater Aquatic Invasive Plants Grant Program (40000375)
Reappropriation:

Freshwater Aquatic Weeds Account—State
. . . .
$1,055,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$645,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6306. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Freshwater Algae Grant Program (40000376)
Reappropriation:

Aquatic Algae Control Account—State
. . . .
$486,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$244,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$730,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6307. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Healthy Housing Remediation Program (40000378)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7047 of this act.
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$10,273,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$299,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,572,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6308. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 ASARCO Tacoma Smelter Plume Cleanup (40000386)
Reappropriation:

Cleanup Settlement Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6309. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Chehalis Basin Strategy (40000387)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3096, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$57,660,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$12,340,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$70,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6310. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Coastal Wetlands Federal Funds (40000388)
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$10,836,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,164,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6311. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Floodplains by Design (40000389)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$41,349,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$9,559,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,908,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6312. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Reducing Diesel GHG & Toxic Emissions (40000390)
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$14,913,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$87,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6313. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (40000391)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,281,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,281,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6314. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Puget Sound Nutrient Reduction Grant Program (40000396)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3101, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,981,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$19,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6315. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Streamflow Restoration Program (40000397)
Reappropriation:

Watershed Restoration and Enhancement Bond

Account—State
. . . .
$39,943,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$57,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6316. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (40000399)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3103, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

Columbia River Basin Water Supply Revenue

Recovery Account—State
. . . .
$1,464,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$39,574,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$41,038,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,962,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$45,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6317. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Yakima River Basin Water Supply (40000422)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$18,909,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$23,091,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$42,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6318. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Product Replacement Program (40000436)
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$5,133,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,367,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6319. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Pacific Wood Treating Site Cleanup – Cleanup Settlement Account (40000464)
Reappropriation:

Cleanup Settlement Account—State
. . . .
$2,326,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,326,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6320. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2022 Clean Up Toxic Sites – Puget Sound (40000465)
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6321. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2022 Community-Based Public-Private Stormwater Partnership (40000470)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3008, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State
. . . .
$987,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$13,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6322. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2022 Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (40000473)
Reappropriation:

Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund—State
. . . .
$200,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6323. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Skagit Water (91000347)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3012, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,521,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$979,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6324. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

PFAS Pilot Project (91000359)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3108, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$494,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$656,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6325. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Water Banking (91000373)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 7049 of this act.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

State Drought Preparedness and Response Account—

State
. . . .
$9,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$14,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6326. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Storm Water Improvements (92000076)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3028, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$17,004,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$79,962,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$96,966,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6327. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Drought Response (92000142)
Reappropriation:

State Drought Preparedness and Response Account—

State
. . . .
$1,205,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,518,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,723,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6328. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Pier 63 Creosote Removal (92000193)
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6329. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2022 Stormwater Projects (92000195)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3011, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State
. . . .
$4,855,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,855,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6330. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Underground Storage Tank Capital Program Demonstration and Design (30000001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3085, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.
Reappropriation:

Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust

Account—State
. . . .
$210,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,590,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6331. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Underground Storage Tank Capital Financial Assistance Program (30000002)
Reappropriation:

Pollution Liability Insurance Agency Underground

Storage Tank Revolving Account—State
. . . .
$3,636,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,364,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6332. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Underground Storage Tank Capital Financing Assistance Pgm 2019-21 (30000702)
Reappropriation:

Pollution Liability Insurance Agency Underground

Storage Tank Revolving Account—State
. . . .
$10,701,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,799,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6333. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

2021-23 Underground Storage Tank Capital Financial Assistance Pgm (30000705)
Reappropriation:

Pollution Liability Insurance Agency Underground

Storage Tank Revolving Account—State
. . . .
$11,733,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$267,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6334. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

2021-23 Heating Oil Capital Financing Assistance Program (30000706)
Reappropriation:

Pollution Liability Insurance Agency Underground

Storage Tank Revolving Account—State
. . . .
$7,815,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$185,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6335. FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

Underground Storage Tank Capital Financial Assistance Pgm 2017-19 (92000001)
Reappropriation:

Pollution Liability Insurance Agency Underground

Storage Tank Revolving Account—State
. . . .
$9,022,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,678,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6336. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Flagler - Welcome Center Replacement (30000097)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,387,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$59,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,446,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6337. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Sun Lakes State Park: Dry Falls Campground Renovation (30000305)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$288,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$114,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,712,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,114,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6338. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Schafer Relocate Campground (30000532)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,292,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,474,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,766,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6339. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Kopachuck Day Use Development (30000820)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,902,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,106,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,035,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,043,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6340. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Sammamish Dock Grant Match (30000872)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$866,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$200,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,066,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6341. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Field Spring Replace Failed Sewage Syst & Non-ADA Comfort Station (30000951)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$538,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,210,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,748,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6342. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Mount Spokane - Maintenance Facility Relocation from Harms Way (30000959)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$691,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,441,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6343. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Palouse Falls Day Use Area Renovation (30000983)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$214,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$220,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6344. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Sammamish Sunset Beach Picnic Area (30000984)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,968,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$792,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,760,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6345. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide New Park (30001019)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$94,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$219,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$313,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6346. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide Electric Vehicle Charging Stations (40000016)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$145,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$55,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6347. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Preservation Minor Works 2019-21 (40000151)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$611,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,836,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,447,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6348. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Palouse to Cascade Trail - Crab Creek Trestle Replacement (40000162)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,004,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$277,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,281,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6349. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Flagler Historic Theater Restoration (40000188)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$67,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$129,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$196,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6350. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Saint Edward Maintenance Facility (40000218)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,426,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$98,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,524,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6351. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Preservation 2021-23 (40000364)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,227,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$773,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6352. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Minor Works - Program 2021-23 (40000365)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,843,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$93,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,936,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6353. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Flagler Campground Road Relocation (91000434)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$620,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$40,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$660,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6354. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Anderson Lake - New Day Use Facilities and Trail Development (91000441)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3023, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$229,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$106,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$335,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6355. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

State Parks Capital Preservation Pool (92000014)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3162, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,501,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$22,464,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$29,965,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6356. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

2021-23 State Parks Capital Preservation Pool (92000017)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3025, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$31,583,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,667,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6357. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000220)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3029, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

Farm and Forest Account—State
. . . .
$1,385,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State
. . . .
$2,045,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
$2,879,000

Riparian Protection Account—State
. . . .
$117,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$6,426,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$48,897,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$55,323,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6358. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000221)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3164, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$4,100,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,312,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$5,412,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$60,933,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$66,345,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6359. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000227)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$418,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$7,582,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6360. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Recreational Trails Program (30000229)
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$552,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,035,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,587,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6361. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000408)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3070, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$20,925,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,437,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$23,362,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$42,851,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$66,213,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6362. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2017-19 Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000409)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3034, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

Farm and Forest Account—State
. . . .
$3,939,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State
. . . .
$11,662,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
$9,541,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$25,142,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$54,858,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$80,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6363. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Boating Facilities Program (30000410)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3072, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.
Reappropriation:

Recreation Resources Account—State
. . . .
$5,473,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$11,702,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$17,175,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6364. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities (30000411)
Reappropriation:

NOVA Program Account—State
. . . .
$2,397,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$10,798,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,195,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6365. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Youth Athletic Facilities (30000412)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,218,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,859,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,077,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6366. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000413)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3037, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State
. . . .
$517,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,205,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$2,722,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$9,563,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,285,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6367. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (30000414)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,169,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$32,831,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6368. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000415)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,695,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,305,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6369. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (30000416)
Reappropriation:

Firearms Range Account—State
. . . .
$390,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$423,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$813,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6370. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Washington Coastal Restoration Initiative (30000420)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3082, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,105,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,395,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6371. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Family Forest Fish Passage Program (40000001)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$97,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,903,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6372. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2019-21 - Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (40000002)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3200, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

Farm and Forest Account—State
. . . .
$5,286,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State
. . . .
$17,489,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
$14,430,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$37,205,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$47,795,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$85,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6373. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2019-21 - Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (40000004)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3201, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$17,126,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,174,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$19,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$55,700,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$75,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6374. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2019-21 - Boating Facilities Program (40000005)
Reappropriation:

Recreation Resources Account—State
. . . .
$10,764,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$7,108,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$17,872,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6375. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2019-21 - Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities (40000006)
Reappropriation:

NOVA Program Account—State
. . . .
$1,776,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$9,635,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,411,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6376. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2019-21 - Youth Athletic Facilities (40000007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3041, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,764,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,236,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6377. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2019-21 - Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (40000008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3202, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,813,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,787,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6378. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2019-21 - Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (40000009)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$15,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$34,157,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$49,507,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6379. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2019-21 - Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (40000010)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,475,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$7,525,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6380. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2019-21 - Washington Coastal Restoration Initiative (40000011)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3208, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,025,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$10,061,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,086,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6381. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2019-21 - Brian Abbott Fish Barrier Removal Board (40000012)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3209, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,318,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$18,173,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$26,491,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6382. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2019-21 - Firearms and Archery Range (40000013)
Reappropriation:

Firearms Range Account—State
. . . .
$320,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$415,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$735,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6383. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2019-21 - Recreational Trails Program (40000014)
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,917,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,083,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6384. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2019-21 - Boating Infrastructure Grants (40000015)
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$649,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,551,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6385. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2019-21 - Land and Water Conservation Fund (40000016)
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$3,266,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,734,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6386. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2019-21 Family Forest Fish Passage Program (40000017)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$431,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,569,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6387. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2021-23 - Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (40000019)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3213, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

Farm and Forest Account—State
. . . .
$9,110,000

Habitat Conservation Account—State
. . . .
$38,030,000

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
$40,103,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$87,243,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$12,757,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$100,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6388. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2021-23 - Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (40000021)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3042, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$56,169,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$22,331,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$78,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$16,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$95,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6389. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2021-23 - Boating Facilities Program (40000023)
Reappropriation:

Recreation Resources Account—State
. . . .
$12,283,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,667,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6390. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2021-23 - Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities (40000025)
Reappropriation:

NOVA Program Account—State
. . . .
$8,786,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,214,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6391. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2021-23 - Youth Athletic Facilities (40000027)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3217, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,417,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,810,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,227,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6392. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2021-23 - Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (40000029)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3048, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account—State
. . . .
$418,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,430,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$8,848,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$670,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,518,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6393. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2021-23 - Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (40000031)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$45,361,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$7,446,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$52,807,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6394. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2021-23 - Washington Coastal Restoration Initiative (40000033)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3220, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,019,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,294,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,313,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6395. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2021-23- Brian Abbott Fish Barrier Removal Board (40000035)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3043, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$20,114,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,681,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$26,795,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6396. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2021-23 - Firearms and Archery Range (40000037)
Reappropriation:

Firearms Range Account—State
. . . .
$549,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$81,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$630,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6397. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2021-23 - Recreational Trails Program (40000039)
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$3,915,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,085,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6398. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2021-23 - Boating Infrastructure Grants (40000041)
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,179,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$21,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6399. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2021-23 - Land and Water Conservation Fund (40000043)
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$18,874,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,126,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6400. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2021-23 - Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (40000045)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3226, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$13,282,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,426,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$15,708,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6401. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2021-23 - Community Forest Grant Program (40000047)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3227, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,956,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,343,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$16,299,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6402. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2021-23 - Outdoor Recreation Equity (40000049)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3203, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,908,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$92,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6403. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2021-23 - Family Forest Fish Passage Program (40000050)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,033,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,924,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,957,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6404. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2021-23 Salmon Recovery Investment from Operating (40000069)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7050 of this act.
Reappropriation:

Salmon Recovery Account—State
. . . .
$50,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6405. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2021-23 Grants For Watershed Projects from Operating (40000070)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7051 of this act.
Reappropriation:

Salmon Recovery Account—State
. . . .
$25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6406. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2021-23 Duckabush Estuary Restoration Project from Operating (40000071)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7052 of this act.
Reappropriation:

Salmon Recovery Account—State
. . . .
$25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6407. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Coastal Restoration Grants (91000448)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3177, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$622,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$10,563,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,185,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6408. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Recreation & Conservation Office Recreation Grants (92000131)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3049, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.
Reappropriation:

Outdoor Recreation Account—State
. . . .
$433,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,143,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$6,576,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$28,205,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$34,781,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6409. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Statewide Multi-modal Trails Database (92000448)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3234, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$93,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$107,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6410. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Match for Federal RCPP Program (30000017)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3033, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,426,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,449,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6411. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2019-21 Match for Federal RCPP (40000006)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3051, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$212,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,037,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,249,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6412. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2019-21 Water Irrigation Efficiencies Program (40000009)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3224, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,383,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$617,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6413. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2021-23 Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program (CREP) (40000013)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3241, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,083,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$917,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6414. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2021-23 Water Irrigation Efficiencies Program (40000014)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6415. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2021-23 Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program (CREP) PIP loan (40000015)
Reappropriation:

Conservation Assistance Rev Account—State
. . . .
$160,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$160,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6416. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2021-23 Natural Resource Investment for the Economy & Environment (40000016)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3244, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,606,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$394,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6417. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2021-23 Regional Conservation Partnership Program (RCPP) Match (40000017)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,884,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$116,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6418. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2021-23 Improve Shellfish Growing Areas (40000018)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3246, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,952,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$548,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6419. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2021-23 Farmland Protection and Land Access (40000020)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3050, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6420. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2021-23 Conservation Reserve Enhancement from Operating (40000038)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7054 of this act.
Reappropriation:

Salmon Recovery Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6421. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2019-21 CREP Riparian Cost Share - State Match (91000017)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$588,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,212,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6422. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Natural Resource Investment for the Economy & Environment 2017-19 (92000011)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3090, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6423. FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Voluntary Stewardship Program (92000016)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,991,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$9,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6424. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Eells Springs Hatchery Renovation (30000214)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$396,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,097,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,493,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6425. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Samish Hatchery Intakes (30000276)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$228,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,504,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,732,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6426. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Puget Sound and Adjacent Waters Nearshore Restoration - Match (30000753)
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$500,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$281,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$781,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$219,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6427. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Snow Creek Reconstruct Facility (30000826)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3271, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$917,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$219,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$7,060,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,196,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6428. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Forks Creek Hatchery - Renovate Intake and Diversion (30000827)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,312,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,060,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,256,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,628,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6429. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Hurd Creek - Relocate Facilities out of Floodplain (30000830)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$11,307,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,291,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,598,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6430. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Dungeness Hatchery - Replace Main Intake (30000844)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$322,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,080,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,402,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6431. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

PSNERP Match (30000846)
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$40,563,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,376,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$42,939,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,148,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$381,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$425,087,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6432. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Wiley Slough Dike Raising (40000004)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,401,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,052,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,453,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6433. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works Preservation 2019-21 (40000007)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$7,480,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,030,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6434. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works Programmatic 2019-21 (40000008)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$665,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,762,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,427,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6435. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Elochoman Hatchery Demolition and Restoration (40000024)
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$3,816,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,066,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6436. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Region 1 Office - Construct Secure Storage (40000087)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$56,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$94,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$9,677,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,827,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6437. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works Preservation 21-23 (40000089)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,815,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,175,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,990,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6438. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor Works Program 21-23 (40000092)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,127,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$801,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,928,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6439. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

SRKW - New Cowlitz River Hatchery (40000145)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$124,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$176,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6440. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

SRKW - Kendall Creek Hatchery Modifications (40000146)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,957,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$360,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,317,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6441. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

SRKW - Voights Creek Hatchery Modifications (40000148)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,427,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$124,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,551,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6442. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Klickitat WLA - Simcoe Fencing (40000161)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$422,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$28,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6443. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Deschutes Watershed Center (20062008)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,888,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$13,807,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$34,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$51,695,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6444. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Taneum Creek Property Acquisition Post Closing Activities (40000162)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$145,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$55,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6445. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Upper Columbia River Salmon Reintroduction from Operating (40000266)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7055 of this act.
Reappropriation:

Salmon Recovery Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6446. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Kalama Creek Hatchery (91000160)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3062, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6447. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Western Pond Turtle Nest Hill Restoration (91000161)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3061, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$192,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6448. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Naches Rearing Ponds (92000049)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$512,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$88,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6449. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Shrubsteppe and Rangeland Cooperative Wildlife Fencing (92000050)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3294, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,337,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$163,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6450. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Cooperative Elk Damage Fencing (30000662)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3243, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,097,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,503,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6451. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Wooten Wildlife Area Improve Flood Plain (30000481)
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$5,700,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$364,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$6,064,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,636,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$3,370,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,070,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6452. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Kalama Falls Hatchery Replace Raceways and PA System (30000848)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$370,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$446,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$10,763,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$11,579,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6453. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Recreational Fishing Access on the Grande Ronde River (92000051)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3064, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$488,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$12,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6454. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Upper Indian Creek Fish Screen Removal (92001248)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$24,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$41,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$65,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6455. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Port Angeles Storm Water Repair (40000015)
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State
. . . .
$1,134,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$86,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,220,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6456. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Airway Heights Facility Replacement (40000025)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,462,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$738,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6457. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Omak Consolidation, Expansion and Relocation (40000033)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$93,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$15,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$108,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6458. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Teanaway (40000038)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$592,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,264,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,856,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6459. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Land Acquisition Grants (40000039)
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$12,537,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,463,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$18,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6460. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forest Hazard Reduction (40000049)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3292, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,190,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$12,010,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6461. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Grouse Ridge Fish Barriers & RMAP Compliance (40000056)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$227,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,748,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,975,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6462. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Emergent Environmental Mitigation Projects (40000058)
Reappropriation:

Forest Development Account—State
. . . .
$67,000

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$421,000

Resource Management Cost Account—State
. . . .
$68,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$556,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$554,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,110,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6463. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2021-23 Minor Works Preservation (40000070)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3072, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,804,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,318,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,122,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6464. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Webster Nursery Seed Plant Replacement (40000073)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$113,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$107,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$220,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6465. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2021-23 Community Forests (40000074)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3323, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6466. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2021-23 Forestry Riparian Easement Program (40000077)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,146,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$854,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6467. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2021-23 Puget Sound Corps (40000079)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3326, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,607,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,393,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6468. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2021-23 Rivers and Habitat Open Space Program (40000081)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3327, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,409,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$10,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,419,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6469. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Rural Broadband Investment (40000082)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3073, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,854,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$146,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6470. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2021-23 Structurally Deficient Bridges (40000086)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3066, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$693,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$357,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6471. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2021-23 Sustainable Recreation (40000088)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3299, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,072,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,176,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,248,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6472. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2021-23 Forest Legacy (40000090)
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$17,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$17,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6473. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2021-23 Land Acquisition Grants (40000091)
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6474. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2021-23 Road Maintenance and Abandonment Planning (40000092)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3303, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,067,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$811,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,878,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6475. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2021-23 Natural Areas Facilities Preservation and Access (40000093)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3304, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,136,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$869,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,005,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6476. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forestry Riparian Easement Program from Operating (40000376)
Reappropriation:

Salmon Recovery Account—State
. . . .
$4,999,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6477. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Port of Willapa Harbor Energy Innovation District Grant (91000099)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$100,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6478. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

DNR and Camp Colman Collaboration (92000037)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3074, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$770,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$970,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6479. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Camp Colman Cabin Preservation and Upgrades (92000039)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3075, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6480. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

2021-23 WA State Fairs Health and Safety Grants (92000005)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,695,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,310,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,005,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6481. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Grays Harbor College: Student Services and Instructional Building (30000127)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$31,008,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$17,169,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$48,177,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6482. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clark College: North County Satellite (30000135)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$56,514,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,404,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$58,918,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6483. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Olympic Innovation and Technology Learning Center (40000103)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,329,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$223,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$27,678,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,230,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6484. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Lower Columbia: Center for Vocational and Transitional Studies (40000106)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,556,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$650,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,206,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6485. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Shoreline: STE(A)M Education Center (40000214)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,735,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,304,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,039,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6486. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Everett Community College: Learning Resource Center (30000136)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$12,939,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$39,160,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$52,099,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6487. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Whatcom Community College: Learning Commons (30000138)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,396,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$31,378,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$36,774,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6488. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane: Main Building South Wing Renovation (30000982)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5025, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$126,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$28,380,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$28,506,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6489. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Highline: Health and Life Sciences (30000983)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$565,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$26,588,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$27,153,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6490. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Wenatchee Valley: Wells Hall Replacement (30000985)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,974,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$29,397,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,371,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6491. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Olympic: Shop Building Renovation (30000986)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,716,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$889,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,605,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6492. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Pierce Fort Steilacoom: Cascade Building Renovation - Phase 3 (30000987)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,923,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$27,177,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6493. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

South Seattle: Automotive Technology Renovation and Expansion (30000988)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,444,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$24,433,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,877,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6494. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bates: Medical Mile Health Science Center (30000989)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$44,059,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$44,066,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6495. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Shoreline: Allied Health, Science & Manufacturing Replacement (30000990)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$22,590,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$24,850,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$47,440,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6496. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

North Seattle Library Building Renovation (30001451)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$12,626,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$21,341,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$33,967,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6497. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Walla Walla Science and Technology Building Replacement (30001452)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$638,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$10,001,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,639,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6498. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane Falls: Fine and Applied Arts Replacement (30001458)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5140, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$22,806,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$19,363,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$42,169,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6499. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane: Apprenticeship Center (40000107)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,064,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$304,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,368,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6500. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Centralia: Teacher Education and Family Development Center (40000109)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,447,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$821,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,268,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6501. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Skagit: Library/Culinary Arts Building (40000110)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,052,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$205,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,257,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6502. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Edmonds: Triton Learning Commons (40000114)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,647,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,009,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,656,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6503. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bellevue: Center for Transdisciplinary Learning and Innovation (40000168)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$41,749,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,032,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$42,781,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6504. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Renton: Health Sciences Center (40000204)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,721,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$276,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,997,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6505. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Cascadia: CC5 Gateway building (40000222)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,803,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$293,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,096,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6506. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Pierce Puyallup: STEM building (40000293)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$37,731,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,238,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$41,969,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6507. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Infrastructure (40000431)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5037, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,885,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,632,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,517,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6508. FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Pierce College Olympic South Asbestos Abatement and Restoration (40000516)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,176,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,983,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,159,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6509. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2013-15 School Construction Assistance Program - Maintenance (30000145)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5001, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,473,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$385,853,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$387,326,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6510. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2015-17 School Construction Assistance Program (30000169)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5013, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.
Reappropriation:

Common School Construction Fund—State
. . . .
$94,555,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$551,301,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$645,856,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6511. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Tri-Tech Skill Center - Core Growth (30000197)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5004, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$46,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$10,761,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,807,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6512. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2017-19 School Construction Assistance Program (40000003)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 5003, chapter 298, Laws of 2018.
Reappropriation:

Common School Construction Fund—State
. . . .
$48,232,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,581,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$49,813,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$898,937,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$948,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6513. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2019-21 School Construction Assistance Program - Maintenance Lvl (40000013)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6040, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

Common School Construction Fund—State
. . . .
$95,148,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,377,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$97,525,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$924,317,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,021,842,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6514. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

School District Health and Safety 2019-21 (40000019)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5016, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$110,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,836,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,946,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6515. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Skills Centers Minor Works (40000023)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$368,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,632,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6516. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2021-23 School Construction Assistance Program (40000034)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 7058 of this act.
Reappropriation:

Common School Construction Fund—State
. . . .
$28,690,000

Common School Construction Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,927,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$266,883,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$298,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$133,127,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$431,627,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6517. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2021-23 Small District and Tribal Compact Schools Modernization (40000039)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5005, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$25,727,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$16,386,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$42,113,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6518. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2021-23 Skills Centers Minor Works (40000040)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5006, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$38,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,388,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6519. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Pierce County Skills Center - Evergreen Building Modernization (40000048)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,597,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$233,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,830,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6520. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Seattle Public Schools Skills Center - Rainier Beach High School (40000050)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6521. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Puget Sound Skills Center Preservation (40000051)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,024,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,024,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6522. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2021-23 School District Health and Safety (40000052)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 5007, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

Common School Construction Fund—State
. . . .
$1,553,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,393,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$4,946,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,947,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,893,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6523. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2021-23 Career Preparation and Launch Grants (40000056)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5025, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

Common School Construction Fund—State
. . . .
$694,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,306,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6524. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2021-23 Healthy Kids-Healthy Schools: Physical Health & Nutrition (91000464)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5016, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,421,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,579,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6525. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2021-23 Healthy Kids-Healthy Schools: Remediation of Lead (91000465)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5027, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.
Reappropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$270,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,112,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$3,382,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$216,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,598,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6526. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Healthy Kids/Healthy Schools - T-12 Lighting (91000483)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5009, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6527. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Pierce College at New Bethel High School (92000036)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5012, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6528. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

K-3 Class-size Reduction Grants (92000039)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5023, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,842,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$230,658,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$234,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6529. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Distressed Schools (92000041)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5004, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$674,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$44,812,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$45,486,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6530. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2019-21 Small District Modernization Grants (92000139)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5003, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,128,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$22,255,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$23,383,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6531. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2019-21 STEM Grants (92000140)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5029, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$32,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$7,668,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6532. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2019-21 Distressed Schools (92000142)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5005, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,429,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$22,508,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,937,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6533. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2019-21 School Seismic Safety Retrofit Program (92000148)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5006, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,511,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,729,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,240,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6534. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2021-23 Distressed Schools (92000917)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5010, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$20,276,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$10,144,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,420,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6535. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2021-23 School Seismic Safety Grant Program (5933) (92000923)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5008, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$100,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$100,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6536. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2022 Small District and Tribal Compact Schools Modernization (92000925)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5011, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,496,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$116,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,612,000

(End of part)

PART 7

SUPPLEMENTAL

Sec. 7001. 2021 c 332 s 1039 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Rural Rehabilitation Loan Program (40000052)
Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
(($4,986,000))

$1,144,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$14,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($5,000,000))

$1,158,000

Sec. 7002. 2021 c 332 s 1041 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2020 Local and Community Projects (40000116)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section ((1011, chapter 356, Laws of 2020))6007, chapter 332, Laws of 2021, except funding may not be directed to the Arivva Community Center.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($94,196,000))

$93,296,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$73,011,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($167,207,000))

$166,307,000

Sec. 7003. 2022 c 296 s 1021 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Rapid Capital Housing Acquisition (40000222)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided in subsections (7) through (8) of this section, the appropriations in this section are provided solely for the department to issue competitive financial assistance to eligible organizations under RCW 43.185A.040 to acquire or rent real property for a rapid conversion into enhanced emergency shelters, permanent supportive housing, transitional housing, permanent housing, youth housing, drop-in center, or shelter for extremely low-income people, as well as individuals, families, unaccompanied youth, and young people experiencing sheltered and unsheltered homelessness. Amounts provided in this section may be also used for renovation and building update costs associated with establishment of the acquired or rented facilities. For youth housing, drop-in centers, and shelter projects, renovation of existing properties is an allowable activity. The department may only approve funding for projects resulting in increased shelter or housing capacity. Amounts provided in this section may not be used for operating or maintenance costs associated with providing housing, supportive services, or debt service.

(2) Funds may also be used for permanent financing for real estate acquired using other short term acquisition sources. To expand availability of permanent housing, financing of acquisition of unoccupied multifamily housing is a priority. Funds must also be provided specifically for the city of Seattle to move people experiencing unsheltered homelessness into safe spaces, including, but not limited to, tiny homes, hotels, enhanced emergency shelters, or other rapid housing alternatives.

(3) While emphasizing the rapid deployment of the amounts appropriated under this section to alleviate the immediate crisis of homelessness throughout the state, the department shall establish criteria for the issuance of the grants, during which time the property must be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued on the date most close in time to the date of authorization of the grant. The criteria must include:

(a) The date upon which structural modifications or construction would begin and the anticipated date of completion of the project;

(b) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with the acquisition and any updates or improvements necessary to make the property habitable for its intended use;

(c) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with opening the beds or units; and

(d) A financial plan demonstrating the ability to maintain and operate the property and support its intended tenants throughout the end of the grant contract.

(4) The department must provide a progress report on its website by December 1, 2022. The report must include:

(a) The total number of applications and amount of funding requested; and

(b) A list and description of the projects approved for funding including state funding, total project cost, services anticipated to be provided, housing units, and anticipated completion date.

(5) The funding provided under this section is not subject to the 90-day application periods in RCW 43.185.070 or 43.185A.050. The department of commerce shall dispense funds to the city of Seattle and other qualifying applicants within 45 days of receipt of documentation from the applicant for qualifying uses and execution of any necessary contracts with the department in order to effect the purpose of rapid deployment of funds under this section.

(6) If the department receives simultaneous applications for funding under this program, proposals that reach the greatest public benefit, as defined by the department, must be prioritized. For purposes of this subsection (6), "greatest public benefit" must include, but is not limited to:

(a) The greatest number of accommodations or increased shelter capacity that will benefit extremely low-income people, as well as individuals, families, and youth experiencing homelessness.

(b) Whether the project has federally funded rental assistance tied to it;

(c) The scarcity of the affordable housing or shelter capacity applied for compared to the number of available affordable housing units or shelter capacity in the same geographic location; and

(d) The program's established funding priorities under RCW 43.185.070(5).

(7) $17,500,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

$5,000,000 for the Tacoma Housing Authority affordable housing acquisition;

$4,000,000 for the Keiro nursing home acquisition in Seattle;

(($1,500,000))$2,400,000 for the Parkland((/Spanaway homeless))Next Chapter shelter;

$2,000,000 for the Illahee Affordable Housing project in Bellevue; and

$5,000,000 for the City of Seattle for the acquisition of the Clay Apartments in partnership with a low-income housing provider.

(8)(a) (($6,565,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery account—federal appropriation and $1,338,000))$7,903,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation ((are))is provided solely for the following list of youth housing projects identified by the office of homeless youth protection and prevention programs:

FYRE's Village: Housing Stability for Young Adults

(Omak). . . .$3,350,000

NWYS Young Adult Shelter Services (Bellingham). . . .$438,000

OlyCap Pfeiffer House (Port Townsend). . . .$127,000

Ryan's House for Youth Campus (Coupeville). . . .$1,015,000

Shelton Young Adult Transitional Housing (Shelton). . . .$773,000

Volunteers of America Crosswalk 2.0 (Spokane). . . .$2,200,000

(b) If funding provided in (a) of this subsection needs to be reallocated, the department shall consult with the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs to identify other eligible youth housing projects.

(9) The department must ensure compliance with conditions of the federal coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund. All expenditures from the coronavirus state fiscal recovery account—federal appropriation in this section must be obligated by December 31, 2024.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($90,138,000))

$82,538,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
(($29,097,000))

$37,597,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($119,235,000))

$120,135,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($119,235,000))

$120,135,000

Sec. 7004. 2021 c 332 s 1073 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Rural Rehabilitation Loan Program (40000223)
Appropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
(($5,000,000))

$2,842,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($5,000,000))

$2,842,000

Sec. 7005. 2022 c 296 s 1018 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Clean Energy V - Investing in Washington's Clean Energy (40000148)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for projects that provide a benefit to the public through development, demonstration, and deployment of clean energy technologies that save energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions, or increase energy independence for the state. Priority must be given to projects that benefit vulnerable populations and overburdened communities, including tribes and communities with high environmental or energy burdens.

(2) The 2021 state energy strategy must guide the department in the design of programs under this section, using an equity and environmental justice lens for program structure and participation. To the extent practicable, the department must prioritize projects that build upon Washington's existing strengths in communities, aerospace, maritime, information and communications technology (particularly data center infrastructure, artificial intelligence and machine learning), grid modernization, advanced materials, and decarbonizing the built environment.

(3) Subject to the availability of funds, the department must reconvene an advisory committee to support involvement of a broad range of stakeholders in the design and implementation of programs implemented under this section to encourage collaboration, leverage partners, and engage communities and organizations in improving the equitable distribution of benefits from the program.

(4) In soliciting and evaluating proposals, awarding contracts, and monitoring projects under this section, the department must:

(a) Ensure that competitive processes, rather than sole source contracting processes, are used to select all projects, except as otherwise noted in this section; and

(b) Conduct due diligence activities associated with the use of public funds including, but not limited to, oversight of the project selection process, project monitoring, and ensuring that all applications and contracts fully comply with all applicable laws including disclosure and conflict of interest statutes.

(5) During project solicitation periods for grants funded with this appropriation, the department must maintain a list of applicants by grant program that scored competitively but did not receive a grant award due to lack of available funding. These applicants must be considered for funding during future grant award cycles. If the department submits a 2022 supplemental budget request for this program, the request must include a list of prioritized projects by grant type.

(6)(a) Pursuant to chapter 42.52 RCW, the ethics in public service act, the department must require a project applicant to identify in application materials any state of Washington employees or former state employees employed by the firm or on the firm's governing board during the past 24 months. Application materials must identify the individual by name, the agency previously or currently employing the individual, job title or position held, and separation date. If it is determined by the department that a conflict of interest exists, the applicant may be disqualified from further consideration for award of funding.

(b) If the department finds, after due notice and examination, that there is a violation of chapter 42.52 RCW, or any similar statute involving a grantee who received funding under this section, either in procuring or performing under the grant, the department in its sole discretion may terminate the funding grant by written notice. If the grant is terminated, the department must reserve its right to pursue all available remedies under law to address the violation.

(7) The requirements in subsections (4) and (6) of this section must be specified in funding agreements issued by the department.

(8) $17,594,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for grid modernization grants.

(a)(i) $11,000,000 is provided solely for projects that: Advance community resilience, clean and renewable energy technologies and transmission and distribution control systems; support integration of renewable energy sources, deployment of distributed energy resources and sustainable microgrids; and support state decarbonization goals pursuant to the clean energy transformation act, including requirements placed upon retail electric utilities.

(ii) Projects must be implemented by community organizations, local governments, federally recognized tribal governments, or by public and private electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state (retail electric utilities). Projects submitted by applicants other than retail electric utilities must demonstrate partnership with their load serving entity to apply. Priority must be given to:

(A) Projects that benefit vulnerable populations, including tribes and communities with high environmental or energy burden; and

(B) Projects that demonstrate partnerships between eligible applicants in applying for funding, including utilities, public and private sector research organizations, businesses, tribes, and nonprofit organizations.

(iii) The department shall develop a grant application process to competitively select projects for grant awards, to include scoring conducted by a group of qualified experts with application of criteria specified by the department. In development of the application criteria, the department shall, to the extent possible, develop program guidelines that encourage smaller utilities or consortia of small utilities to apply for funding. Where suitable, this may include funding for projects consisting solely of planning, predesign and/or predevelopment activities.

(iv) Applications for grants must disclose all sources of public funds invested in a project.

(b) $3,550,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the Public Utility District No. 1 of Lewis county for land acquisition and construction of the Winlock Industrial Park and South County Substation and Transmission facility, located on North Military Road in Winlock.

(c) $3,044,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the Klickitat County Public Hospital District #1 for the Electrical Upgrade and Smart Grid project at the Klickitat Valley Health Hospital in Goldendale.

(9) $10,830,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants for strategic research and development for new and emerging clean energy technologies. These grants must be used to match federal or other nonstate funds to research, develop, and demonstrate clean energy technologies, focusing on areas that help develop technologies to meet the state's climate goals, offer opportunities for economic and job growth, and strengthen technology supply chains. The program may include, but is not limited to: Solar technologies, advanced bioenergy and biofuels, development of new earth abundant materials or lightweight materials, advanced energy storage, recycling energy system components, and new renewable energy and energy efficiency technologies.

(a) $5,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for competitive grants.

(b) $4,800,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory for a renewable energy platform to support ocean energy research and development testbeds for the Marine and Coastal Research Laboratory in Sequim.

(c) $1,030,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the Chelan County Public Utility District for the hydroelectric turbine hub project at Rocky Reach dam near Wenatchee.

(10)(a) $2,500,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely as grants to nonprofit lenders to create a revolving loan fund to support the widespread use of proven energy efficiency and renewable energy technologies by households, or for the benefit of households, with high energy burden or environmental health risk now inhibited by lack of access to capital.

(b) The department shall provide grant funds to one or more competitively selected nonprofit lenders that must provide matching private capital and administer the loan fund. The department shall select the loan fund administrator or administrators through a competitive process, with scoring conducted by a group of qualified experts, applying criteria specified by the department.

(c) The department must establish guidelines that specify applicant eligibility, the screening process, and evaluation and selection criteria. The guidelines must be used by the nonprofit lenders.

(11) $5,550,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to demonstrate innovative approaches to electrification of transportation systems.

(a)(i) $3,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for competitive grants, prioritizing projects that:

(A) Demonstrate meaningful and enduring benefits to communities and populations disproportionately burdened by air pollution, climate change, or lack of transportation investments;

(B) Beneficially integrate load using behavioral, software, hardware, or other demand-side management technologies, such as demand response, time-of-use rates, or behavioral programming;

(C) Accelerate the transportation electrification market in Washington using market transformation principles; or

(D) Develop electric vehicle charging and hydrogen fueling infrastructure along highways, freeways, and other heavily trafficked corridors across the state to support long-distance travel.

(ii) Projects must be implemented by local governments, federally recognized tribal governments, by public and private electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state, or state agencies. Eligible parties may partner with other public and private sector research organizations and businesses in applying for funding. The department shall consult and coordinate with the Washington state department of transportation on project selection and implementation. The department shall also coordinate with other state agencies that have other electrification programs, in order to determine to optimally accomplish each agency's respective policy and program goals.

(iii) Projects must be related to on-road end-uses and nonmaritime off-road uses.

(iv) Eligible technologies for these projects include, but are not limited to:

(A) Battery electric vehicle supply equipment;

(B) On-site generation or storage, where the technology directly supplies electricity to the electric vehicle supply equipment;

(C) Electric grid distribution system infrastructure upgrades, where the upgrade is needed as a result of the installed electric vehicle supply equipment;

(D) Hydrogen refueling station infrastructure that:

(I) Dispenses renewable hydrogen or hydrogen produced in Washington with electrolysis; and

(II) Aligns with the 2021 state energy strategy's recommended uses of hydrogen in the transportation sector.

(v) $2,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for federally recognized tribal governments and for local governments in rural communities, for projects aligning with the above objectives and addressing electric vehicle supply infrastructure gaps in rural communities.

(b) $2,550,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the Lewis Public Transportation Benefit Area to construct a hydrogen fueling station that dispenses renewable hydrogen or hydrogen produced in Washington with electrolysis for electric vehicles at Exit 74 on Interstate 5, near Chehalis.

(12)(a) $10,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the purpose of building electrification projects that advance the goals of the 2021 state energy strategy to demonstrate grid-enabled, high-efficiency, all electric buildings.

(b) The program may include, but is not limited to: Shifting from fossil fuels to high-efficiency electric heat pumps and other electric equipment, control systems that enable grid integration or demand control, and on-site renewable generation and efficiency measures that significantly reduce building energy loads.

(c) Preference must be given to projects based on total greenhouse gas emissions reductions, accelerating the path to zero-energy, or that demonstrate early adoption of grid integration technology.

(d) Program funding may be administered to entities also receiving incentives provided according to RCW 19.27A.220 for buildings covered by the state energy performance standard, RCW 19.27A.210.

(e) $5,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the purpose of supporting the transition of residential and commercial buildings away from fossil fuels through the installation of high-efficiency electric heat pumps and other electric equipment.

(13) $4,924,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for maritime electrification grants.

(a) $4,450,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the Northwest Seaport Alliance to upgrade the reefer plug capacity at the Port of Seattle's Terminal 5, located in west Seattle.

(b) $474,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the Skagit County Public Works Department for electric ferry charging infrastructure in Anacortes.

(14) $4,900,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop targeted rural clean energy innovation projects as provided in this subsection (14).

(a) $150,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop targeted rural clean energy strategies informed by rural community and business engagement, outreach, and research. The department must convene a rural energy work group to identify investments, programs, and policy changes that align with the 2021 state energy strategy and increase access to clean energy opportunities in rural communities and agricultural and forestry management practices. The group must identify existing federal funding opportunities and strategies to leverage these funds with state capital investment. By June 30, 2022, the department shall report recommendations and findings from the rural energy work group to the office of financial management, the governor, and the appropriate legislative committees and present a strategic plan for state rural clean energy investment.

(b) $4,750,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for rural clean energy innovation grants.

(i) The department must award at least 40 percent of the funding to projects that enhance the viability of dairy digester bioenergy projects through advanced resource recovery systems that produce renewable natural gas and value-added biofertilizers, reduce greenhouse gas emissions, and improve soil health and air and water quality.

(ii) Grants may also be awarded to other clean energy innovation projects in rural communities, including, but not limited to, projects that enhance energy efficiency, demand response, energy storage, renewable energy, beneficial electrification, resilience, organic waste management, and biological carbon sequestration.

(iii) Grants may fund project predevelopment, research, and development, pilot projects, strategic implementation, field trials, and data dashboards and tools to inform rural project development.

(c) The department is encouraged to make 20 percent of the funds under (b) of this subsection (14) to tribal governments, designated subdivisions, and agencies.

(d) If a grant is awarded to purchase heating devices or systems, the agency must, whenever possible and most cost effective, select devices and systems that do not use fossil fuels.

(((15) $10,072,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the first phase of an aluminum smelter restart project which, when fully deployed, will reduce emissions of greenhouse gases by a minimum of 750,000 tons per year, increase energy efficiency, and protect or create aluminum manufacturing jobs located in Whatcom county. It is the intent of the legislature that if the appropriation in this subsection is not spent by June 30, 2025, the funding provided in this subsection shall not be reappropriated.

(16) $10,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Grant county public utility district for expenses related to public infrastructure development benefiting a large-scale solar manufacturing facility in central Washington. If the department has not received a signed agreement between the Grant county public utility district and the large-scale solar manufacturer indicating the manufacturer's intent to develop the site in central Washington by December 31, 2025, the funding provided in this subsection shall not be reappropriated.))
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($73,870,000))

$53,798,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$2,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($76,370,000))

$56,298,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$100,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($176,370,000))

$156,298,000

Sec. 7006. 2022 c 296 s 1026 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023 Local and Community Projects (40000266)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department may not expend the appropriation provided in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high-performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only and may not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The department must comply with the requirements set forth in executive order 21-02 and must consult with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes on the potential effects of these projects on cultural resources and historic properties. Consultation with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes must be initiated before project funds are made available.

(8) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

57th Avenue Sewer Project (University Place). . . .$100,000

988 Expansion (Everett). . . .$300,000

Accessibility and Upgrades for WHO (Vancouver). . . .$283,000

Allyn Community Center (Allyn). . . .$300,000

Anacortes Family Center (Anacortes). . . .$50,000

Ballard Boys & Girls Club Teen Ctr Remodel

& Expansion (Seattle). . . .$241,000

Black Diamond Community Skatepark (Black Diamond). . . .$85,000

Boys & Girls Club Fire Safety Upgrade (Federal Way). . . .$361,000

Bremerton Library Building - HVAC (Bremerton). . . .$412,000

Burton Water Company Cooperative Conversion (Vashon). . . .$26,000

Camp Korey Internet & Telemedicine (Mount Vernon). . . .$330,000

Children's Therapy Center (Tacoma). . . .$250,000

CHOB Electrical Upgrade to Emergency Shelter (Longview). . . .$258,000

City Hall Preservation Phase II (Enumclaw). . . .$289,000

City of Tenino Playground (Tenino). . . .$515,000

City of Yelm Dog Park (Yelm). . . .$52,000

Civil Air Patrol Hangar (Ephrata). . . .$1,200,000

Columbia Basin Dive Rescue's New Boat (Richland). . . .$270,000

Communication Devices for Football Officials (Olympia). . . .$36,000

((Community Boating Center for All - Magnuson Park))Sail

Sand Point (Seattle). . . .$100,000

Confluence Health Treatment Center (Moses Lake). . . .$1,236,000

Craft Beverage (Tumwater). . . .$200,000

Darrington Wood Innovation Center (Darrington). . . .$1,700,000

Edmonds Boys & Girls Club Feasibility Study (Edmonds). . . .$206,000

Electrical & Safety Upgrades at N Seattle Boys &

Girls (Seattle). . . .$304,000

Eli's Park Project (Seattle). . . .$200,000

Elks 1450 Roof Replacement (Puyallup). . . .$381,000

Felts Field Gateway Project (Spokane). . . .$200,000

Ferndale Civic and Community Campus (Ferndale). . . .$1,500,000

Field Arts and Events Hall. . . .$250,000

Fircrest Campus Master Plan (Shoreline). . . .$300,000

First Street Downtown Revitalization (Cle Elum). . . .$465,000

Flooring Replacement Kirkland Boys & Girls Club

(Kirkland). . . .$53,000

Foss Waterway Seaport Public Restrooms (Tacoma). . . .$258,000

Frontier Park Goat Barns (Graham). . . .$70,000

GenPride LGBTQ+ Senior Community Center (Seattle). . . .$530,000

GH Senior Center Office/Education Container (Gig Harbor). . . .$61,000

Goldsborough Switching Station (Shelton). . . .$103,000

Granger Historical Society New Museum Project (Granger). . . .$100,000

Harlequin Productions Theater Renovation (Olympia). . . .$250,000

Harper Estuary Restoration and Bridge Construction

(Port Orchard). . . .$100,000

Historic Neptune Theatre HVAC Upgrade (Seattle). . . .$100,000

Historic Newcastle Cemetery (Newcastle). . . .$75,000

Historic Paramount Theatre HVAC Upgrade (Seattle). . . .$198,000

Howard Bowen Memorial Events Complex (Sumas). . . .$319,000

HVAC Upgrade with New System and Heat Pumps (Shelton). . . .$250,000

Illahee Preserve 'Homestead, Ph 1' Acquisition

(Bremerton). . . .$196,000

Imagine Children's Museum (Everett). . . .$250,000

Interfaith Family Shelter (Everett). . . .$800,000

Island County Jail Intake Body Sensor (Coupeville). . . .$200,000

Jim Kaemingk Sr. Trail Missing Link (Lynden). . . .$300,000

Kitsap Humane Society (Silverdale). . . .$258,000

Kiwanis Park Playground Accessibility Upgrades

(Bremerton). . . .$165,000

Klickitat County Animal Shelter (Goldendale). . . .$670,000

La Conner Regional Library (La Conner). . . .$640,000

Lake Boren Park Fishing Dock and Viewing Platform

(Newcastle). . . .$62,000

Lake Wilderness Lodge Emergency Generator (Maple Valley). . . .$412,000

Lewis County Regional Tennis and Wrestling Facility

(Chehalis). . . .$875,000

Library Commons Project (Mount Vernon). . . .$4,000,000

Logistics Facility (Vancouver). . . .$160,000

Longview Senior Center Roof and Energy Upgrades

(Longview). . . .$273,000

Luther Burbank Pk Waterfront Activity Center

(Mercer Island). . . .$85,000

Marina View Building Renovation (Olympia). . . .$103,000

Marymount/Spana-Park Senior Center Roof (Spanaway). . . .$103,000

Mason Co Housing Authority Roof & Electrical (Shelton). . . .$201,000

McKinney Center Minor Works (Seattle). . . .$560,000

Mill Creek Library Project (Mill Creek). . . .$200,000

Mill Creek Parks Master Plan (Mill Creek). . . .$206,000

Mount Spokane Lodge Renovations (Mead). . . .$397,000

Mukai's Fruit Barreling Plant (Vashon, WA). . . .$50,000

Naches Rearing Pond (Naches). . . .$50,000

New Beginnings Homes (Puyallup). . . .$201,000

Newman Lake Milfoil Wash Station (Newman Lake). . . .$100,000

Non Destructive Weld Testing (Sunnyside). . . .$30,000

Nooksack River Integrated Floodplain Mitigation

(Whatcom County). . . .$2,000,000

North Creek Trail (Bothell). . . .$500,000

North Trailhead Restroom & Covered Structure

(Castle Rock). . . .$155,000

Northwest Kidney Centers - Port Angeles Clinic (Port

Angeles). . . .$235,000

ODMF Multicultural Village (Kent). . . .$450,000

Old Fort Lake Subarea (DuPont). . . .$400,000

Pacific Co. Fair Three M Project (Raymond). . . .$412,000

Pattison Property Redevelopment (Federal Way). . . .$1,250,000

Pedestrian Boardwalk May Creek Trail (Renton). . . .$258,000

Peshastin Cross Over Siphon Pipe (Peshastin). . . .$309,000

Pilchuck Glass School Ventilation (Stanwood). . . .$103,000

Pipe Lake Water Quality Improvement Project (Covington). . . .$319,000

Planning Land Acquisition for Veteran Rites (Tacoma). . . .$46,000

Port Gamble Forest Restoration (Port Gamble). . . .$300,000

Port Marine Transportation Infrastructure (Friday Harbor). . . .$258,000

Port of Mattawa Event Center (Mattawa). . . .$125,000

Public Electric Vehicle Infrastructure (Lacey). . . .$103,000

Pump Station Modernization: Design and Permitting (Mount

Vernon). . . .$100,000

Rejuvenation Community Day Center & Shower/Laundry

(Bremerton). . . .$250,000

Ridgefield Splashpad (Ridgefield). . . .$258,000

Rimrock Grange Renovation (Washtucna). . . .$105,000

Rister Stadium Elevator Lift (Kelso). . . .$33,000

Roslyn Downtown Association Gazebo (Roslyn). . . .$171,000

Rotary Morrow Community Park (Poulsbo). . . .$50,000

Salmon Reintroduction in the Upper Columbia (Spokane). . . .$375,000

Seattle Aquarium Ocean Pavilion (Seattle). . . .$500,000

Secure Parking for Shelton Police (Shelton). . . .$206,000

Seismic Upgrade and Roof Replacement (Vancouver). . . .$309,000

Senior Resources Svc HUB Feasibility Study (Freeland). . . .$273,000

Serving the Community Through Capital Improvements

(Walla Walla). . . .$336,000

Skokomish Water Line Extension (Skokomish). . . .$50,000

Smokey Point Park (Arlington). . . .$278,000

Snohomish Teen Center Addition (Snohomish). . . .$515,000

South Area Commercial Sewer Infrastructure Ext. (Airway

Heights). . . .$300,000

South Sound Innovation and Education Center

(Federal Way). . . .$300,000

South Whidbey Aquatic Wellness Center (Langley). . . .$400,000

Starbuck Rodeo Arena Remodel (Dayton). . . .$98,000

Steilacoom Electrical Charging Station Project

(Steilacoom). . . .$50,000

Sultan-Monroe Commercial Kitchen (Monroe). . . .$134,000

The Tacoma Recovery Cafe Site Acquisition (Tacoma). . . .$500,000

Titlow Park Bridge Replacement (Tacoma). . . .$350,000

Toppenish Hospital (Toppenish). . . .$2,000,000

Town Center to Burke-Gilman Trail Connector (Lake

Forest Park). . . .$103,000

Town of Naches Mobile Stage (Naches). . . .$250,000

Transitions (Spokane). . . .$103,000

Tubman Health Clinic (Seattle). . . .$4,500,000

Tukwila ((Teen Center and Senior Intergenerational))Community

Center (Tukwila). . . .$258,000

Urban League of Metropolitan Seattle Building (Seattle). . . .$500,000

Vandercook Park Restroom (Longview). . . .$309,000

Veteran Housing at Stratford Apartments (Longview). . . .$206,000

VOA Veteran Transitional Housing Energy Efficiency

(Spokane). . . .$195,000

Wa Na Wari Capital Improvements (Seattle). . . .$258,000

WA Soldiers Home Cemetery Road Pavement Project

(Orting). . . .$180,000

Weld Collaborative Reintegration Resource (Seattle). . . .$775,000

Wenatchee City Pool Repairs (Wenatchee). . . .$550,000

Wenatchee Valley YMCA (Wenatchee). . . .$515,000

West Plains Childcare Center (Airway Heights). . . .$191,000

Westport Marina Gear Yard (Westport). . . .$412,000

WGC - Accessibility and Education Support (Waitsburg). . . .$42,000

Whelan Community Building (Pullman). . . .$153,000

White Center Food Bank Grow2Give Relocation (Seattle). . . .$200,000

Wilkeson Water Treatment System (Wilkeson). . . .$300,000

Willows Road Pedestrian Safety Connection (Kirkland). . . .$206,000

Woodland Community Library Building Project (Woodland). . . .$515,000

Yakima Canyon Interpretive Center (Ellensburg). . . .$150,000

Yakima Greenway Master Plan (Yakima). . . .$67,000

Yakima YMCA Park Development (Yakima). . . .$232,000

Youth Achievement Center (Seattle). . . .$500,000

YVT Bucket Truck (Yakima). . . .$70,000

Total. . . .$53,318,000
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$53,318,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$53,318,000

Sec. 7007. 2022 c 296 s 1036 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Enhanced Shelter Capacity Grants (92000939)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1022, chapter 356, Laws of 2020, except that no funding may be directed to the Auburn Resource Center or the St. Vincent de Paul Cold Weather Shelter.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($4,818,000))

$4,612,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($4,818,000))

$4,612,000

Sec. 7008. 2022 c 296 s 1039 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Behavioral Health Community Capacity Grants (40000219)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for the department to issue grants to community hospitals or other community providers to expand and establish new capacity for behavioral health services in communities. The department must consult an advisory group consisting of representatives from the department of social and health services, the health care authority, one representative from a managed care organization, one representative from an accountable care organization, and one representative from the association of county human services. Amounts provided in this section may be used for construction and equipment costs associated with establishment of the facilities. The department may approve funding for the acquisition of a facility if the project will result in increased behavioral health capacity. Amounts provided in this section may not be used for operating costs associated with the treatment of patients using these services.

(2) The department must establish criteria for the issuance of the grants, which must include:

(a) Evidence that the application was developed in collaboration with one or more regional behavioral health entities that administer the purchasing of services;

(b) Evidence that the applicant has assessed and would meet gaps in geographical behavioral health services needs in their region;

(c) Evidence that the applicant is able to meet applicable licensing and certification requirements in the facility that will be used to provide services;

(d) A commitment by applicants to serve persons who are publicly funded and persons detained under the involuntary treatment act under chapter 71.05 RCW;

(e) A commitment by the applicant to maintain and operate the beds or facility for a time period commensurate to the state investment, but for at least a 15-year period;

(f) The date upon which structural modifications or construction would begin and the anticipated date of completion of the project;

(g) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with opening the beds;

(h) A financial plan demonstrating the ability to maintain and operate the facility; and

(i) The applicant's commitment to work with local courts and prosecutors to ensure that prosecutors and courts in the area served by the hospital or facility will be available to conduct involuntary commitment hearings and proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW.

(3) In awarding funding for projects in subsection (5) of this section, the department, in consultation with the advisory group established in subsection (1) of this section, must strive for geographic distribution and allocate funding based on population and service needs of an area. The department must consider current services available, anticipated services available based on projects underway, and the service delivery needs of an area.

(4) The department must prioritize projects that increase capacity in unserved and underserved areas of the state.

(5) $71,400,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for a competitive process for each category listed and is subject to the criteria in subsections (1), (2), (3), and (4) of this section:

(a) $11,600,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for at least six enhanced service facilities for long-term placement of patients discharged or diverted from the state psychiatric hospitals and that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(b) $10,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for enhanced adult residential care facilities for long-term placements of dementia discharged or diverted from the state psychiatric hospitals and are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(c) $2,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for at least one facility with secure withdrawal management and stabilization treatment beds that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(d) $2,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for at least one crisis triage and stabilization facility that is not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(e) $12,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for two 16-bed crisis triage and stabilization facilities in the King county region consistent with the settlement agreement in A.B, by and through Trueblood, et al., v. DSHS, et al., No. 15–35462, and that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental disease;

(f) $2,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for at least two mental health peer respite centers that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases. No more than one mental health peer respite center should be funded in each of the nine regions;

(g) $18,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to provide grants to community hospitals, freestanding evaluation and treatment providers, or freestanding psychiatric hospitals to develop capacity for beds to serve individuals on 90-day or 180-day civil commitments as an alternative to treatment in the state hospitals. In awarding this funding, the department must coordinate with the department of social and health services, the health care authority, and the department of health and must only select facilities that meet the following conditions:

(i) The funding must be used to increase capacity related to serving individuals who will be transitioned from or diverted from the state hospitals;

(ii) The facility is not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(iii) The provider has submitted a proposal for operating the facility to the health care authority;

(iv) The provider has demonstrated to the department of health and the health care authority that it is able to meet the applicable licensing and certification requirements for the facility that will be used to provide services; and

(v) The health care authority has confirmed that it intends to contract with the facility for operating costs within funds provided in the operating budget for these purposes;

(h) $2,400,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for competitive community behavioral health grants to address regional needs;

(i) $9,400,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for at least three intensive behavioral health treatment facilities for long-term placement of behavioral health patients with complex needs and that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases; and

(j) $2,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to community providers to increase behavioral health services and capacity for children and minor youth including, but not limited to, services for substance use disorder treatment, sexual assault and traumatic stress, anxiety, or depression, and interventions for children exhibiting aggressive or depressive behaviors in facilities that are not subject to federal funding restrictions. Consideration must be given to programs that incorporate outreach and treatment for youth dealing with mental health or social isolation issues.

(6)(a) $15,648,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation and $8,748,000 of the capital community assistance account—state appropriation in this section are provided solely for the following list of projects and is subject to the criteria in subsection (1) of this section:

Astria Toppenish Hospital (Toppenish). . . .$1,648,000

Compass Health Broadway (Everett). . . .$14,000,000

Evergreen Recovery Residential Treatment (Everett). . . .$1,000,000

EvergreenHealth Monroe (Monroe). . . .$4,275,000

NE Spokane Community Behavioral Health Center

(Spokane). . . .$700,000

Red Road Clean and Sober Housing (Renton). . . .$773,000

Seattle Clinic at Evergreen Treatment (Seattle). . . .$2,000,000

(b) $8,116,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation and $17,575,000 of the capital community assistance account—state appropriation in this section are provided solely for the following list of projects and is subject to the criteria in subsection (1) of this section, except that the following projects are not required to establish new capacity:

Cascade Hall (Seattle). . . .$6,000,000

Comprehensive Health Care - ((Goldendale Facility

(Goldendale)))Camp Hope (Yakima). . . .$1,030,000

Jamestown S'Klallam (Sequim). . . .$3,250,000

Lummi Nation Healing Wellness Center (Bellingham). . . .$1,250,000

Maplewood Enhanced Services Facility (Bellingham). . . .$1,500,000

SIHB Thunderbird Treatment Center (Seattle). . . .$3,000,000

Family Solutions (Vancouver). . . .$2,050,000

Renovation Youth Evaluation & Treatment Facility

(Bremerton). . . .$316,000

Sound Enhanced Services Facility (Auburn). . . .$3,000,000

Three Rivers Behavioral Health Recovery Center

(Kennewick). . . .$4,295,000

(7) The department must notify all applicants that they may be required to have a construction review performed by the department of health.

(8) To accommodate the emergent need for behavioral health services, the department and the department of health, in collaboration with the health care authority and the department of social and health services, must establish a concurrent and expedited process to assist grant applicants in meeting any applicable regulatory requirements necessary to operate inpatient psychiatric beds, freestanding evaluation and treatment facilities, enhanced services facilities, triage facilities, crisis stabilization facilities, or secure detoxification/secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities.

(9) The department must strive to allocate all of the amounts appropriated within subsection (5) of this section in the manner prescribed. However, if upon review of applications, the department determines, in consultation with the advisory group established in subsection (1) of this section, that there are not adequate suitable projects in a category of projects under subsection (5) of this section, the department may allocate funds to other behavioral health capacity project categories within subsection (5) of this section, prioritizing projects under subsections (5)(a), (g), and (i) of this section. Underserved areas of the state may also be considered.

(10) The department must provide a progress report by November 1, 2022. The report must include:

(a) The total number of applications and amount of funding requested;

(b) A list and description of the projects approved for funding including state funding, total project cost, services anticipated to be provided, bed capacity, and anticipated completion date; and

(c) A status report of projects that received funding in prior funding rounds, including details about the project completion and the date the facility began providing services.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$95,164,000

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$26,323,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$121,487,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$120,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$241,487,000

Sec. 7009. 2021 c 332 s 1065 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Energy Retrofits for Public Buildings Grant Program (40000149)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $4,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to local governments, public higher education institutions, school districts, federally recognized tribal governments, and state agencies for operational cost savings improvements to facilities and related projects that result in energy and operational cost savings.

(a)(i) $3,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants awarded in competitive rounds.

(ii) At least 20 percent of each competitive grant round is designated for award to eligible projects in small cities or towns with a population of 5,000 or fewer residents.

(iii) In each competitive round, a higher energy savings to investment ratio must result in a higher project ranking. Priority consideration must be given to applicants that have not received grant awards for this purpose in prior biennia.

(iv) The department must determine a minimum match ratio to maximize the leverage of nonstate funds.

(b) $450,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to Western Washington University for the heating system conversion feasibility study.

(c) $550,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to Whidbey Island Public Hospital District for energy upgrades at WhidbeyHealth Medical Center in Coupeville.

(2)(a) $1,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to be awarded in competitive rounds to local governments, public higher education institutions, school districts, federally recognized tribal governments, and state agencies for projects that involve the purchase and installation of solar energy systems, including solar modules and inverters, with a preference for products manufactured in Washington.

(b) At least 20 percent of each competitive grant round is designated for award to eligible projects in small cities or towns with a population of 5,000 or fewer residents.

(c) In each competitive round, a higher energy savings to investment ratio must result in a higher project ranking. Priority consideration must be given to applicants that have not received grant awards for this purpose in prior biennia.

(d) The department must determine a minimum match ratio to maximize the leverage of nonstate funds.

(3) $4,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the energy efficiency and environmental performance improvements to minor works, stand-alone, and emergency projects at facilities owned by agencies named by the state efficiency and environmental performance office executive order 20-01 that repair or replace existing building systems and reduce greenhouse gas emissions from state operations, including, but not limited to, HVAC, lighting, insulation, windows, and other mechanical systems. Eligibility for this funding is dependent on an analysis using the office of financial management's life-cycle cost tool that compares project design alternatives for initial and long-term cost-effectiveness. Assuming a reasonable return on investment, the department shall provide grants in the amount required to improve the project's energy efficiency compared to the original project request. Prior to awarding funds, the department shall submit to the office of financial management a list of all proposed awards for review and approval.

(4) The department shall develop metrics that indicate the performance of energy efficiency efforts.

(5) $457,000 of the appropriation provided in this section is provided solely for photovoltaic panels for the capitol campus child care center.

(6) If a grant is provided in subsection (1) or (3) of this section to purchase heating devices or systems, the agency must, whenever possible and most cost effective, select devices and systems that do not use fossil fuels.

(7) Grants to state agencies provided under subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section are exempt from the match requirements of this section.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,957,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,957,000

Sec. 7010. 2022 c 296 s 1022 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2022 Local & Community Projects (40000230)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only or to the Chelan municipal airport extension project in subsection (8)(a) of this section.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high-performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and may not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The department must comply with the requirements set forth in executive order 21-02 and must consult with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes on the potential effects of these projects on cultural resources and historic properties. Consultation with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes must be initiated before project funds are made available.

(8)(a) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

300 Rainier Ave Building. . . .$206,000

Adams County Property/Evidence Processing Facility

(Othello). . . .$900,000

Amara 29 Acre Opportunity in Pierce County (Tacoma). . . .$246,000

American Lake Park ADA Improvement Project (Lakewood). . . .$258,000

American Legion Building Renovation (Goldendale). . . .$262,000

American Legion Veterans Housing & Resource Ctr (Raymond). . . .$88,000

Arlington Innovation Center (Arlington). . . .$372,000

Ashley House (Spokane). . . .$552,000

Auburn Resource Center (Auburn). . . .$1,500,000

Aurora Commons Acquisition (Seattle). . . .$2,500,000

Ballinger Park - Hall Creek Restoration

(Mountlake Terrace). . . .$824,000

Battle Ground HealthCare Free Clinic Relocation

(Battle Ground). . . .$1,000,000

Bellevue High School Automotive Dynamometer Install

(Bellevue). . . .$277,000

Bigelow House Museum Preservation (Olympia). . . .$52,000

BIPOC Artist Installation at Kraken Training Center

(Seattle). . . .$155,000

Brewery Park Visitor Center (Tumwater). . . .$1,200,000

Bridges To Home (Shoreline). . . .$2,000,000

Camp Kilworth - YMCA Day Camp/Environmental Educ

(Federal Way). . . .$1,030,000

Campus Towers Roofing Project (Longview). . . .$301,000

Capitol Theatre Curtains/Soft Goods Replacement (Yakima). . . .$250,000

Central Klickitat County Parks Improvements (Goldendale). . . .$25,000

Chehalis Centralia Steam Locomotive Repair/Restore

(Chehalis). . . .$123,000

Chelan Municipal Airport Extension (Chelan). . . .$5,700,000

Children's Village Neurodevelopmental Center Expansion

(Yakima). . . .$750,000

City of Wenatchee Community Center (Wenatchee). . . .$2,500,000

Civic Park Mika's Playground (Edmonds). . . .$258,000

Clallam Joint Emergency Services (Port Angeles). . . .

$1,700,000

Class A Biosolids Dryer (Yelm). . . .$850,000

Clemans View Park (Naches). . . .$442,000

Coastal Community Action Program Service Ctr (Aberdeen). . . .$500,000

Communications Tower (Ocean Shores). . . .$77,000

Community Action Resource and Training Center (Omak). . . .$400,000

Community Multi-Use Center (Carnation). . . .$1,030,000

Cornforth Campbell Demolition & Infrastructure

(Puyallup). . . .$330,000

Coulee City Medical Clinic (Coulee City). . . .$846,000

Coulon North Water Walk Repair and Enhancement

(Renton). . . .$1,339,000

Coupeville Boys & Girls Club (Coupeville). . . .

$1,236,000

Cow Skull Creek and Rushingwater Creek Acclimation Ponds

(Orting). . . .$690,000

Craft Beverage Lab & Instrumentation (Tumwater). . . .$773,000

Cross Park Trail and Picnic Shelter (Tacoma). . . .$206,000

CSML Food Bank Facility (Moses Lake). . . .$1,900,000

Cultural Anchor Village (Tukwila). . . .$1,500,000

Curran House Museum (University Place). . . .$85,000

Dawson Place Facilities (Everett). . . .$258,000

Day/Night House Exhibit Rebuild - Design Phase

(Seattle). . . .$300,000

Daybreak Star Indian Cultural Center (Seattle). . . .$2,600,000

Delridge Wetland Park (Seattle). . . .$244,000

Des Moines North Marina Bulkhead Replacement Ph II

(Des Moines). . . .$2,000,000

Doris Morrison Learning Center (Greenacres). . . .$1,030,000

Downtown Puyallup Redevelopment Infrastructure

(Puyallup). . . .$257,000

Downtown Revitalization (Blaine). . . .$500,000

Duffy's Pond Pathway Completion (Kennewick). . . .$38,000

Early Learning Facility Project for Licensed Childcare

(Hoquiam). . . .$721,000

East County Family Resource Center Renovation

(Washougal). . . .$721,000

Edmonds Marsh ((Restoration))Water Quality Improvement

(Edmonds). . . .(($258,000))

$458,000

Edmonds Waterfront Center (Edmonds). . . .$250,000

Ejido Farm Project (Everson). . . .$200,000

Ellensburg Masonic Temple (Ellensburg). . . .$258,000

Ellensburg Rodeo Grandstands (Ellensburg). . . .$1,500,000

Ephrata Rec Center Upgrade (Ephrata). . . .$621,000

Esther's Home (Pasco). . . .$1,000,000

Ethiopian Community Affordable Housing (Seattle). . . .$3,000,000

Extruded Curb Improvements (Kirkland). . . .$515,000

Family Engagement Center (Seattle). . . .$1,030,000

Felts Field Gateway Project (Spokane). . . .$400,000

Ferry County Airport Runway Lighting System (Republic). . . .$450,000

Flag Plaza Redevelopment (Kennewick). . . .$46,000

FOE Meeting and Dance Hall (Puyallup). . . .$77,000

Fourth Plain Community Commons (Vancouver). . . .$1,236,000

Franklin Pierce Farm Agricultural Resource Center

(Tacoma). . . .$3,900,000

Frontier Park - Goat Barn Roof (Graham). . . .$89,000

Frontier Park-Horse Arena Cover (Graham). . . .$1,811,000

Garfield Pool Upgrade (Garfield). . . .$500,000

Gas Station Park Improvements (Tacoma). . . .$515,000

Gold Mountain Communications Zone - Upgraded Telecomm

(Bremerton). . . .$835,000

Granger Historical Society Museum (Granger). . . .$300,000

Green Lake Community Boathouse (Seattle). . . .$100,000

Grounds Improvement Proposal (Ritzville). . . .$150,000

Health Care Kiosk Deployment (Federal Way). . . .$75,000

Historic Downtown Chelan Infrastructure Predesign

(Chelan). . . .$150,000

Immigrant and Refugee Community Hub (Tukwila). . . .$960,000

Island County Criminal Justice Renovation (Coupeville). . . .$600,000

IT3 Discovery Center (Ridgefield). . . .$1,350,000

Japanese Gulch Daylighting (Mukilteo). . . .$206,000

Jim Kaemingk Sr. Trail (Lynden). . . .$200,000

Joya Child & Family Development Center (Spokane). . . .$1,200,000

JV Memorial Pool Roof (Oak Harbor). . . .$250,000

Kitsap Lake Park Renovation & Accessibility (Bremerton). . . .$258,000

Kittitas Valley Healthcare Laboratory Services Reno

(Ellensburg). . . .$397,000

La Center City Hall Improvements (La Center). . . .$1,236,000

Lake Lawrence Fire Station (Yelm). . . .$515,000

Lake Sacajawea Renovation Project (Longview). . . .$900,000

Lake Stevens Civic Center Phase 3 (Lake Stevens). . . .$2,100,000

Lakefront Property Acquisition (Lake Forest Park). . . .$432,000

LASA Client Services Center (Lakewood). . . .$515,000

Leavenworth Ski Hill ADA Restroom (Leavenworth). . . .$52,000

Lewis County Public Safety Radio Infrastructure

(Chehalis). . . .$129,000

Lewis County Youth Services Renovation and Addition

(Chehalis). . . .$824,000

LGBTQ-Affirming Senior Center (Seattle). . . .$1,030,000

Links to Opportunity (Tacoma). . . .$2,000,000

Little League Field Improvement (Federal Way). . . .$200,000

Longview Hospice Care Center Renovation (Longview). . . .$765,000

Lopez Island Swim Center (Lopez Island). . . .$245,000

Lynnwood Neighborhood Center (Lynnwood). . . .$500,000

Maddie's Place (Spokane). . . .$644,000

Madrona Day Treatment School (Bremerton). . . .$321,000

Magnuson Park Hangar 2 (Seattle). . . .$1,130,000

Main Street Phase 2 (Mountlake Terrace). . . .$1,200,000

Mariner Community Campus (Everett). . . .$1,670,000

Martin Luther King Center Improvements (Pasco). . . .$1,000,000

Mary's Place Shelter Renovation (Burien). . . .$352,000

Marysville Trail Connector (Marysville). . . .$515,000

Mason County Veterans Memorial Hall Refurbishment

(Shelton). . . .$62,000

McKinney Center Renovations (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

Meadowglen Community Park (Spokane). . . .$77,000

Medical Examiner's Facility Upgrades (Spokane). . . .$600,000

Miller Park (Yakima). . . .$642,000

MLK Community Center Roof Replacement (Spokane). . . .$1,380,000

Moses Lake Business Incubator (Moses Lake). . . .$1,313,000

Mountain Rescue Center (North Bend). . . .$222,000

Nelson Dam Removal Project (Naches). . . .$1,325,000

New Ground Kirkland (Kirkland). . . .$258,000

Next Chapter Morgan Shelter (Tacoma). . . .$16,000

NJROTC/NNDCC Program Peninsula School District

(Gig Harbor). . . .$170,000

North Bend Depot Rehab (North Bend). . . .$151,000

North Clear Zone Land Acquisition (Lakewood). . . .$1,400,000

North Creek Trail (Bothell). . . .$618,000

North Seattle Boys & Girls Club Safety Upgrades

(Seattle). . . .$361,000

Northwest Kidney Centers Clinic (Port Angeles). . . .$900,000

Ocean Beach Medical Group - Ilwaco Clinic (Ilwaco). . . .$309,000

Panther Lake Community Park (Kent). . . .$2,000,000

Patterson Park Preservation & Upgrade (Republic). . . .$300,000

Pedestrian Overcrossing Replacement (Kalama). . . .$2,250,000

Perfect Passage (Tonasket). . . .$1,698,000

Perry Technical Institute Auditorium Renovation

(Yakima). . . .$1,550,000

Peter Kirk Community Center Roof and Retrofitted Emerg

(Kirkland). . . .$773,000

Phase 1 Master Plan - COVID Mitigation (Lake Stevens). . . .$103,000

Phase 1 of Trails Plan Improvements (Issaquah). . . .$251,000

Planning & Upgrades Edmonds Boys & Girls Club (Edmonds). . . .$200,000

Point Hudson Breakwater (Port Townsend). . . .$1,000,000

Police Station Renovations - City of Duvall (Duvall). . . .$107,000

Port of Olympia Marine Center (Olympia). . . .$250,000

Port of Vancouver Waterfront T1 Building Demo/Deconst

(Vancouver). . . .$1,000,000

Port Susan Trail (Stanwood). . . .$742,000

Port Townsend Affordable Housing Development

(Port Townsend). . . .$1,400,000

Proclaim Liberty Affordable Housing (Spokane). . . .$2,000,000

Project Chairlift: Lifting Up Washington State (Mead). . . .$750,000

Pts of Ilwaco/Chinook Nav Infrastructure

(Ilwaco & Chinook). . . .$634,000

Public Pavilion for Shoreline Park (Shoreline). . . .$361,000

Puyallup Recreation Center (Puyallup). . . .$1,030,000

Puyallup Valley Cultural Heritage Center (Puyallup). . . .$335,000

Rainier View Covered Court (Sumner). . . .$245,000

Ramstead Regional Park (Everson). . . .$1,500,000

Redmond Senior and Community Center (Redmond). . . .$1,250,000

Redondo Fishing Pier (Des Moines). . . .$900,000

Replacement Hospice House (Richland). . . .$900,000

Resource Center Planning (Pasco). . . .$250,000

Ridgefield I-5 Pedestrian Screen (Ridgefield). . . .$335,000

Ridgefield YMCA (Ridgefield). . . .$258,000

Ridgetop DNR Trust Land Purchase (Silverdale). . . .$2,050,000

Ritzville Downtown Improvements (Ritzville). . . .$105,000

Sargent Oyster House Restoration (Allyn). . . .$344,000

School Based Health Care Clinic (Tacoma). . . .$750,000

SE 168th St. Bike Lanes/Safe Crossings (Renton). . . .$500,000

Seattle Aquarium Expansion (Seattle). . . .$2,000,000

Seattle Kraken Multisport Courts (Seattle). . . .$103,000

Selah-Moxee Irrigation District (Moxee). . . .$300,000

Seminary Hill Natural and Heritage Trail Project

(Centralia). . . .$52,000

Sheffield Trail (Fife). . . .$1,030,000

Shipley Senior Center (Sequim). . . .$463,000

Shoreline Parks Restrooms (Shoreline). . . .$412,000

SIHB Thunderbird Treatment Center (Seattle). . . .$309,000

Silver Crest Park (Mill Creek). . . .$90,000

Skabob House Cultural Center Art Studio (Skokomish). . . .$500,000

Skagit County Morgue (Mount Vernon). . . .$139,000

Sky Valley Teen Center (Sultan). . . .$773,000

Sno-Isle Regional Inter-County Libraries

(Lake Stevens). . . .$1,100,000

Snohomish County Food and Farming Center (Everett). . . .$2,550,000

Snoqualmie Valley Youth Activity Center (North Bend). . . .$361,000

Soap Lake City Hall Reactivation (Soap Lake). . . .$157,000

SoCo Park (Covington). . . .$1,300,000

South Bend School Multi-Use Field Upgrades (South Bend). . . .$361,000

South Kitsap Community Events Center (Port Orchard). . . .$1,236,000

South Kitsap HS Phys Ed Support (Port Orchard). . . .$15,000

Southwest Washington Grain Project (Chehalis). . . .$1,750,000

Spokane Public Radio (Spokane). . . .$1,000,000

Spokane Valley Boys & Girls Club (Spokane Valley). . . .$1,030,000

Spokane Valley Fairgrounds Exhibition Center

(Spokane Valley). . . .$750,000

Sprinker Recreation Center Outdoor Improvements

(Tacoma). . . .$400,000

Squire's Landing Park Waterfront & Open Space Access Pr

(Kenmore). . . .$927,000

Steilacoom Tribal Cultural Center (Steilacoom). . . .$814,000

Stonehenge Memorial Public Restroom Project (Maryhill). . . .$129,000

Sultan Basin Park Design (Sultan). . . .$26,000

Sumas Sidewalks and Trails (Sumas). . . .$75,000

Teaching & Commercial Kitchen (Kent). . . .$515,000

The Campaign for Wesley Des Moines (Des Moines). . . .$500,000

The Eli's Park Project (Seattle). . . .$900,000

The Ethiopian Village (Seattle). . . .$515,000

The Hilltop (Tacoma). . . .$1,545,000

The Landing (Redmond). . . .$258,000

The Millworks (Bellingham). . . .$1,000,000

The Podium (Spokane). . . .$774,000

The Way Station (Bellingham). . . .$4,050,000

Therapeutic Play Spaces (Spokane). . . .$108,000

Tiny House Villages and Cottages (Seattle). . . .$2,000,000

Together Center (Redmond). . . .$1,030,000

Toppenish Junior Livestock Facility Planning (Toppenish). . . .$21,000

Trails End Community Meeting Space (Tumwater). . . .$155,000

Treatment Plant Remodel (Duvall). . . .$742,000

Turf Field Lighting (Yakima). . . .$500,000

Turning Pointe Youth Advocacy Addition (Shelton). . . .$82,000

Twisp Civic Center (Twisp). . . .$1,500,000

United Way of King County Building Restoration

(Seattle). . . .$566,000

University Heights Center Renovation (Seattle). . . .$595,000

Upper Kittitas County Medic One - Station 99 (Cle Elum). . . .$784,000

Vaughn Library Hall Restoration (Vaughn). . . .$103,000

Wards Lake Park Improvement Project (Lakewood). . . .$258,000

Water Efficiency Improvements (Royal City). . . .$193,000

Wenas Creek Screening, Passage Engineering Design

(Selah). . . .$150,000

West Biddle Lake Dam Restoration (Vancouver). . . .$1,881,000

Whatcom County Integrated Public Safety Radio System

(Bellingham). . . .$400,000

Woodland Scott Hill Park & Sports Complex (Woodland). . . .$600,000

Yakima County Fire Communications Radio Repeaters

(Yakima). . . .$103,000

Yakima Valley Fair (Grandview). . . .$235,000

Yelm Senior Center Repairs (Yelm). . . .$36,000

Youth Resource Center (Federal Way). . . .$82,000

(b) The funding for the Magnuson Park Historic Hanger 2 (Seattle) project is contingent on the contribution of at least $6,000,000 for the Magnuson Park Center For Excellence. If the Magnuson Park Center For Excellence has not certified to the department of commerce that the project has secured at least $6,000,000 in total funding for the capital phase of the project by July 31, 2022, the funds in this subsection (8)(b) shall lapse. The lapse date of July 31, 2022, must be extended to the same extent that the city of Seattle grants an extension, if any, beyond that date for the same project, provided that no further extension may be granted past July 31, 2023. The Magnuson Park Center For Excellence must ensure that the long-term lease with Seattle Parks and Recreation stipulates meaningful public benefits that prioritize low-income, black, indigenous, and people of color youth and families of the Magnuson park and neighborhood and Northeast Seattle. The lease must include provisions to proactively recruit and provide no-cost access to the residents as well as the creation of a scholarship fund dedicated to the residents for the center's events and programming. Additional public benefits to improve accessibility for Magnuson Park residents must be considered in the lease negotiations.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($169,916,000))

$170,322,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($169,916,000))

$170,322,000

Sec. 7011. 2022 c 296 s 1046 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Work, Education, Health Monitoring Projects (91001686)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high-performance building standards as required by chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and may not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The department must comply with the requirements set forth in executive order 21-02 and must consult with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes on the potential effects of these projects on cultural resources and historic properties. Consultation with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes must be initiated before project funds are made available.

(8) (($926,000 of the state building construction account—state))The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

((Camp Waskowitz Restrooms (North Bend)))Sylvester Middle School

Restrooms (Burien). . . .$250,000

Mary's Place Burien Shelter ((COVID Updates))

(Seattle). . . .$550,000

Nordic Heritage Museum HVAC Renovation (Seattle). . . .$26,000

((Sherwood COVID Mitigation (Lake Stevens). . . .$100,000))
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($926,000))

$826,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($926,000))

$826,000

Sec. 7012. 2021 c 332 s 1094 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Early Learning ((COVID-19)) Renovation Grants (91001681)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $8,500,000 of the ((coronavirus capital projects account—federal))state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Washington early learning loan fund to provide grants to early learning facilities for ((emergency)) renovation ((and)), remodeling ((changes in response to the public health emergency with respect to the coronavirus disease)), and expansion.

(2) The grants may not be used for operating expenditures, but must be used for capital needs to:

(a) Support increased social distancing requirements;

(b) Support increased health and safety measures;

(c) Provide increased outdoor space; or

(d) Increase or preserve early learning slots within a facility or community.

(3) Grant recipients must meet the requirements in RCW 43.31.575.

(4) Up to four percent of the funding in this appropriation may be used by the contractor to provide technical assistance to early learning providers interested in applying for the early learning facility grant or loan program.
Appropriation:

((Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—

Federal
. . . .
$8,500,000))

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$8,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,500,000

Sec. 7013. 2022 c 296 s 1012 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

CERB Rural Broadband (40000250)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $25,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation in this section is provided solely as expenditure authority for grant funding received by the department for the broadband equity, access, and deployment state grants program in section 60102 of P.L. 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act), not to exceed the actual amount of grant funding awarded. Expenditure of the amount in this subsection is contingent on the receipt of this grant funding. ((If the department does not receive the grant funding by June 30, 2023, the expenditure authority in this section shall lapse.))
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,000,000

Sec. 7014. 2022 c 296 s 1013 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Works Broadband (40000251)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $25,000,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation in this section is provided solely as expenditure authority for grant funding received by the department for the broadband equity, access, and deployment state grants program in section 60102 of P.L. 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act), not to exceed the actual amount of grant funding awarded. Expenditure of the amount in this subsection is contingent on the receipt of this grant funding. ((If the department does not receive the grant funding by June 30, 2023, the expenditure authority in this section shall lapse.))
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,000,000

Sec. 7015. 2022 c 296 s 1019 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Weatherization Plus Health (40000150)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $5,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants for the Washington State University energy extension community energy efficiency program (CEEP) to support homeowners, tenants, and small business owners in making sound energy efficiency investments by providing consumer education and marketing, workforce support through training and lead generation, and direct consumer incentives for upgrades to existing homes and small commercial buildings. This is the maximum amount the department may expend for this purpose.

(2) The department, in collaboration with the Washington State University, shall make recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature on strategies to expand and align the weatherization program and the rural rehabilitation loan program. The department shall report the recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor by November 1, 2022. The recommendations must include strategies to:

(a) Recruit community energy efficiency program sponsors that are community-based organizations located in geographic areas of the state that have not received funding for low-income weatherization programs, targeting hard to reach market segments;

(b) Leverage funding from community energy efficiency program sponsors in an amount greater than or equal to the amount provided by the state through the weatherization program;

(c) Ensure that community energy efficiency program utility sponsors work with non-profit community-based organizations to deliver community energy efficiency program services; and

(d) Identify community energy efficiency program sponsors that support the conversion of space and water heating from fossil fuels to electricity, as part of a set of energy efficiency investments.

(3) If funding from this appropriation is used to purchase heating devices or systems, the agency shall, whenever possible and most cost effective, select devices and systems that do not use fossil fuels.

(4) (($69,766,000))$47,115,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation in this section is provided solely as expenditure authority for grant funding received by the department for the weatherization assistance program in section 40551 of P.L. 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act), not to exceed the actual amount of grant funding awarded. Expenditure of the amount in this subsection is contingent on the receipt of this grant funding. ((If the department does not receive the grant funding by June 30, 2023, the expenditure authority in this section shall lapse.))
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
(($69,766,000))

$47,115,000

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($89,766,000))

$67,115,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$50,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($139,766,000))

$117,115,000

Sec. 7016. 2022 c 296 s 1041 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Broadband Office (92000953)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The appropriations in this section are provided solely to the statewide broadband office for qualifying broadband infrastructure projects.

(b) Unless otherwise stated, eligible applicants for grants awarded under subsections (2) and (3) of this section are:

(i) Local governments, including ports and public utility districts;

(ii) Federally recognized tribes;

(iii) Nonprofit organizations;

(iv) Nonprofit cooperative organizations; and

(v) Multiparty entities comprised of a combination of public entity members or private entity members. A multiparty entity cannot be solely comprised of private entities.

(c) The department must prioritize eligible applications where the lead applicant is a public entity.

(d) Projects receiving grants under this section must:

(i) Demonstrate that the project site is under the applicant's control for a minimum of 25 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease; and

(ii) Commit to using the infrastructure funded by the grant for the purposes of providing broadband connectivity for a minimum of 25 years. (e) Unless otherwise stated, priority must be given to projects:

(i) Located in unserved areas of the state, which for the purposes of this section means areas of Washington in which households and businesses lack access to broadband service of speeds at a minimum of 100 megabits per second download and at a minimum 20 megabits per second upload;

(ii) Located in geographic areas of greatest priority for the deployment of broadband infrastructure to achieve the state's broadband goals, as provided in RCW 43.330.536, identified with department and board mapping tools; or

(iii) That construct last mile infrastructure, as defined in RCW 43.330.530. (f) Unless otherwise stated, appropriations may not be used for projects where a broadband provider currently provides, or has begun construction to provide, broadband service, as defined in RCW 43.330.530, to end users in the proposed project area.

(g) The appropriations must be used for projects that use a technology-neutral approach in order to expand access at the lowest cost to the most unserved or underserved residents.

(h)(i) The statewide broadband office must act as fiscal agent for the grants authorized in subsections (2) and (3) of this section.

(ii) No more than 1.5 percent of the funds appropriated for the program may be expended by the statewide broadband office for administration purposes.

(i) The statewide broadband office must impose grant or contract conditions to help ensure that any project funded under this section will result in an enduring public benefit, where feasible, for at least 25 years.

(2)(a) (($50,000,000))$20,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely to the statewide broadband office to award as grants to eligible applicants as match funds to leverage federal broadband infrastructure program funding.

(b)(i) For the purposes of this subsection (2), "state broadband infrastructure funders" are the state broadband office, the public works board, and the community economic revitalization board.

(ii) The statewide broadband office must develop a project evaluation process to assist in coordination among state broadband infrastructure funders to maximize opportunities to leverage federal funding and ensure efficient state investment. The project evaluation process must help determine whether a project is a strong candidate for a known federal funding opportunity and if a project can be packaged as part of a regional or other coordinated federal grant proposal. The state broadband infrastructure funders are encouraged to enter into a memorandum of understanding outlining how coordination will take place so that the process can help with a coordinated funding strategy across these entities.

(3)(a) $150,996,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation, $124,749,000 of the coronavirus capital projects account—federal appropriation, and $258,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation are provided solely for grants to eligible applicants for qualifying broadband infrastructure projects.

(b)(i) Projects that receive grant funding under this subsection (3) must be eligible for funds under section 9901 of the American rescue plan act.

(ii) To ensure compliance with conditions of the federal coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund and coronavirus capital projects account, all expenditures of amounts appropriated in this subsection (3) must be obligated by December 31, 2024.

(c)(i) $5,000,000 of the appropriation in this subsection is provided for broadband equity and affordability grants.

(ii) Grants must be provided to eligible applicants located in areas:

(A) With existing broadband service with speeds at a minimum of 100 megabits per second download and at a minimum 20 megabits per second upload; and

(B) Where the state broadband office, in consultation with the department of equity, determine that access to existing broadband service is not affordable or equitable.

(iii) Eligible applicants for grants awarded under this subsection (3)(c) are:

(A) Local governments, including ports and public utility districts;

(B) Federally recognized tribes;

(C) Public school districts;

(D) Nonprofit organizations; and

(E) Multiparty entities comprised of public entity members to fund broadband deployment.

(d) $258,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this subsection is provided solely for the Precision Agriculture and Broadband pilot project.

(e) $225,000 of the coronavirus capital projects account—federal appropriation in this subsection is provided solely for the Point Roberts rural broadband project.

(4) By January 30, 2022, and January 30, 2023, the statewide broadband office must develop and submit a report regarding the grants established in subsections (2) and (3) of this section to the office of financial management and appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature. The report must include:

(a) The total number of applications and amount of funding requested;

(b) A list and description of projects approved for grant funding in the preceding fiscal year;

(c) The total amount of grant funding that was disbursed during the preceding fiscal year;

(d) The total amount of funds obligated and timing of when the funds were obligated in the preceding fiscal year; and

(e) For projects funded in the prior biennium, the outcomes achieved by the approved projects.

(5) For eligible applicants providing service outside of their jurisdictional boundary, no more than three percent of the award amount may be expended for administration purposes.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($50,258,000))

$20,258,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery

((Account))Fund—Federal
. . . .
$150,996,000

Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—Federal
. . . .
$124,749,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($326,003,000))

$296,003,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($326,003,000))

$296,003,000

Sec. 7017. 2022 c 296 s 1042 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2022 Broadband Office (92001178)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely as expenditure authority for grant funding received by the department for the broadband equity, access, and deployment state grants program in section 60102 of P.L. 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act), not to exceed the actual amount of grant funding awarded. Expenditure of the amount in this subsection is contingent on the receipt of this grant funding. ((If the department does not receive the grant funding by June 30, 2023, the expenditure authority in this subsection shall lapse.))
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$50,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,000,000

Sec. 7018. 2021 c 332 s 1098 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Emergency Repairs (30000041)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Emergency repair funding is provided solely to address unexpected building or grounds failures that will impact public health and safety and the day-to-day operations of the facility. To be eligible for funds from the emergency repair pool, a request letter for emergency funding signed by the affected agency director must be submitted to the office of financial management and the appropriate legislative fiscal committees. The request must include a statement describing the health and safety hazard and impacts to facility operations, the possible cause, the proposed scope of emergency repair work and related cost estimate, and identification of other funding that may be applied to the project.

(2) For emergencies occurring during a legislative session, an agency must notify the legislative fiscal committees before requesting emergency funds from the office of financial management.

(3) The office of financial management must notify the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee and the legislative fiscal committees as emergency projects are approved for funding and include what funded level was approved.

(4) The office of financial management must report quarterly, beginning October 1, 2021, on the funding approved by agency and by emergency to the fiscal committees of the legislature.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($4,000,000))

$2,660,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$16,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($20,000,000))

$18,660,000

Sec. 7019. 2022 c 296 s 1056 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Inflation and Contingency Fund (92001124)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for inflationary cost increases of materials for state agency projects funded in an omnibus capital appropriations act that are currently active in the construction phase. Projects in the design phase are not eligible and must submit a budget decision package for the 2023 legislative session. The office of financial management shall allocate funds based on project necessity.

(2) To be eligible for funds from this inflation and contingency fund, a request letter signed by the affected agency director must be submitted to the office of financial management and the appropriate legislative fiscal committees. The request must include:

(a) A statement describing the unexpected costs;

(b) The ways the agency has already mitigated project costs; and

(c) The identification of other funding that may be applied to the project.

(3) For requests during a legislative session, an agency must notify the legislative fiscal committees before requesting these funds from the office of financial management.

(4) The office of financial management must notify the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee and the fiscal committees of the legislature as inflation and contingency funds are approved, including the approved funding level by fund type, and a copy of all the materials submitted in subsection (2) of this section.

(5) The office of financial management must report quarterly, beginning October 1, 2022, on the funding approved by agency, by project number, and type of funds authorized, to the fiscal committees of the legislature.
Appropriation:

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
(($8,000,000))

$2,842,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($8,000,000))

$2,842,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7020. A new section is added to 2022 c 296 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Executive Guard Post One (40000448)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$740,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$740,000

Sec. 7021. 2022 c 296 s 2004 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Fircrest School-Nursing Facilities: Replacement (30002755)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) It is the intent of the legislature to further the recommendations of the December 2019 report from the William D. Ruckleshaus center to redesign the intermediate care facility of the Fircrest Residential Habilitation Center to function as short-term crisis stabilization and intervention. It is also the intent of the legislature to concentrate the footprint of the Fircrest Residential Habilitation Center on the northern portion of the property. ((As a result, $7,750,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for design of a 120-bed nursing facility.

(2) $2,243,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to relocate the adult training program to a different location on the Fircrest Rehabilitation Center campus. The department must consider the proposal to redesign the facility as a short-term crisis stabilization and intervention when devising options for relocation of the adult training program and submit a report of these options to the legislature no later than December 1, 2022.

(3)))(2) The department must seek input from individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities, including the residents at Fircrest and their families or guardians, in design of a nursing facility.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$58,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,993,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$184,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,235,000

Sec. 7022. 2021 c 332 s 2032 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital: Wards Renovations for Forensic Services (40000026)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,770,000))

$1,602,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,790,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($10,560,000))

$10,392,000

Sec. 7023. 2021 c 332 s 2039 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Special Commitment Center: Strategic Master Plan (40000394)
Appropriation:

Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions Account—State
. . . .
(($250,000))

$239,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($250,000))

$239,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7024. A new section is added to 2022 c 296 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

ESH FSU Chiller Replacement (40001136)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$600,000

Sec. 7025. 2021 c 332 s 2059 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Community Nursing Care Homes (92000042)

(1) It is the intent of the legislature to further the recommendations of the December 2019 report from the William D. Ruckleshaus center to redesign intermediate care facilities of the residential habilitation centers to function as short-term crisis stabilization and intervention by constructing smaller, nursing care homes in community settings to care for individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities.

(2) (($300,000 of the))The appropriation in this section is provided solely to complete a predesign of community nursing care homes to provide nursing facility level of care to individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities. The predesign must include options for four or five individual facilities with a minimum of four beds in each and for an individual facility with a minimum of 30 beds.

(3) The department shall provide recommendations for where these community nursing care homes should be located geographically in the state and an analysis of the costs associated with operating these homes. The department shall submit a report of this information to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 1, 2021.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($300,000))

$206,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($300,000))

$206,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7026. A new section is added to 2022 c 296 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Maple Lane - Rapid BH Bed Capacity (92000046)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$800,000

Sec. 7027. 2021 c 332 s 2067 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Othello Water Supply and Storage (40000008)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($965,000))

$781,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$585,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($1,550,000))

$1,366,000

Sec. 7028. 2022 c 296 s 2037 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WCC: Interim Mental Health Building (40000260)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,275,000

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$672,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$1,947,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($1,275,000))

$1,947,000

Sec. 7029. 2021 c 332 s 3002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Low-Level Nuclear Waste Disposal Trench Closure (19972012)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3002, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.
Reappropriation:

Site Closure Account—State
. . . .
(($8,472,000))

$1,972,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,930,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($13,402,000))

$6,902,000

Sec. 7030. 2021 c 332 s 3010 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grant Program (30000216)
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($17,040,000))

$16,835,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$45,824,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($62,864,000))

$62,659,000

Sec. 7031. 2021 c 332 s 3019 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grants (30000374)
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($9,357,000))

$9,052,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$53,180,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($62,537,000))

$62,232,000

Sec. 7032. 2021 c 332 s 3021 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000432)
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($7,444,000))

$5,352,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,456,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($9,900,000))

$7,808,000

Sec. 7033. 2021 c 332 s 3022 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Remedial Action Grants (30000458)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3011, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($8,711,000))

$1,171,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($14,081,000))

$12,879,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($22,792,000))

$14,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$29,955,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($52,747,000))

$44,005,000

Sec. 7034. 2021 c 332 s 3024 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Stormwater Financial Assistance Program (30000535)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3012, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State
. . . .
(($22,444,000))

$3,944,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,757,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($31,201,000))

$12,701,000

Sec. 7035. 2021 c 332 s 3026 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Floodplains by Design (30000537)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($10,094,000))

$10,061,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$25,466,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($35,560,000))

$35,527,000

Sec. 7036. 2021 c 332 s 3027 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

ASARCO Cleanup (30000538)
Reappropriation:

Cleanup Settlement Account—State
. . . .
(($1,982,000))

$1,797,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$10,164,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($12,146,000))

$11,961,000

Sec. 7037. 2021 c 332 s 3028 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Cleanup Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000542)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3013, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($6,379,000))

$5,470,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$8,002,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($14,381,000))

$13,472,000

Sec. 7038. 2021 c 332 s 3031 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Yakima River Basin Water Supply (30000590)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(((1))) The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3070, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.((, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2)(a) $3,250,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the acquisition of real property in lower Kittitas county known as the Eaton Ranch property by the state through the department of enterprise services on behalf of the department. This appropriation is provided to fund the closing, project, and transaction costs related to the acquisition of the property. The departments must expedite the review and execution of the transaction by June 30, 2022. It is the intent of the legislature that the state hold the property until a transfer to the United States bureau of reclamation for the purposes of construction of a water supply reservoir in accordance with the Yakima Basin integrated plan, or until such purpose is declared by the bureau no longer feasible.

(b) The legislature recognizes and declares that the acquisition of a portion of the Eaton Ranch for the construction of a water supply reservoir in accordance with the goals and objectives of the Yakima Basin integrated plan is a unique circumstance and the Eaton Ranch property offers special and essential features that are expected to yield broad public benefit to the state. It is the intent of the legislature that the department provide the necessary funding through subsequent funding requests to maintain and principally operate the land for grazing of livestock with the local conservation district, or an equivalent organization, until a transfer of the property to the United States bureau of reclamation)).
Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
(($3,564,000))

$314,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$26,436,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($30,000,000))

$26,750,000

Sec. 7039. 2021 c 332 s 3037 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Centennial Clean Water Program (30000705)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3009, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($17,403,000))

$16,003,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$17,597,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($35,000,000))

$33,600,000

Sec. 7040. 2021 c 332 s 3038 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Floodplains by Design 2017-19 (30000706)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($24,036,000))

$24,013,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$11,428,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($35,464,000))

$35,441,000

Sec. 7041. 2021 c 332 s 3039 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2017-19 Remedial Action Grants (30000707)
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($3,261,000))

$2,927,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,616,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($5,877,000))

$5,543,000

Sec. 7042. 2021 c 332 s 3048 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2015-17 Restored Clean Up Toxic Sites - Puget Sound (30000763)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($2,155,000))

$1,611,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,085,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($5,240,000))

$4,696,000

Sec. 7043. 2021 c 332 s 3069 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Healthy Housing Remediation Program (40000149)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3085, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($5,000,000))

$4,830,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($5,000,000))

$4,830,000

Sec. 7044. 2021 c 332 s 3072 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Yakima River Basin Water Supply (40000179)

((The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,250,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the acquisition of real property in lower Kittitas county known as the Eaton Ranch property by the state through the department of enterprise services on behalf of the department. This appropriation is provided to fund the closing, project, and transaction costs related to the acquisition of the property. The departments must expedite the review and execution of the transaction by June 30, 2022. It is the intent of the legislature that the state hold the property until a transfer to the United States bureau of reclamation for the purposes of construction of a water supply reservoir in accordance with the Yakima Basin integrated plan, or until such purpose is declared by the bureau no longer feasible.

(2) The legislature recognizes and declares that the acquisition of a portion of the Eaton Ranch for the construction of a water supply reservoir in accordance with the goals and objectives of the Yakima Basin integrated plan is a unique circumstance and the Eaton Ranch property offers special and essential features that are expected to yield broad public benefit to the state. It is the intent of the legislature that the department provide the necessary funding through subsequent funding requests to maintain and principally operate the land for grazing of livestock with the local conservation district, or an equivalent organization, until a transfer of the property to the United States bureau of reclamation.))
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($26,212,000))

$23,126,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$13,788,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($40,000,000))

$36,914,000

Sec. 7045. 2021 c 332 s 3078 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2019-21 Remedial Action Grants (40000211)
Reappropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($46,763,000))

$45,681,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$3,201,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($49,964,000))

$48,882,000

Sec. 7046. 2022 c 296 s 3003 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (40000337)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $33,000,000 of the water pollution control revolving—federal appropriation in this section is provided solely as expenditure authority for grant funding received by the department for the clean water state revolving fund program in section 50210 of P.L. 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act), not to exceed the actual amount of grant funding awarded. Expenditure of the amount in this section is contingent on the receipt of this grant funding. ((If the department does not receive the grant funding by June 30, 2023, the expenditure authority in this section shall lapse.))
Appropriation:

Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund—State
. . . .
$225,000,000

Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund—Federal
. . . .
(($108,000,000))

$33,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($333,000,000))

$258,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,200,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($1,533,000,000))

$1,458,000,000

Sec. 7047. 2021 c 332 s 3094 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Healthy Housing Remediation Program (40000378)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) (($10,161,000))$9,822,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to establish and administer a program to:

(i) Provide grants or other public funding to persons intending to remediate contaminated real property for development of affordable housing, as defined in RCW 43.185A.010. The grants or public funding may only be used for:

(A) Integrated planning to fund studies and other activities necessary to facilitate the acquisition, remediation, and adaptive reuse of known or suspected contaminated real property for affordable housing development, including:

(I) The activities specified under RCW 70A.305.190(5)(d); and

(II) Entry into development agreements pursuant to RCW 36.70B.170, 36.70B.180, and 36.70B.190 to accelerate the development of the contaminated real property into affordable housing; and

(B) Remediation of contaminated real property for affordable housing development; or

(ii) Remediate contaminated real property where a person intends to develop affordable housing, as defined in RCW 43.185A.010.

(b) When evaluating projects under this section, the department must consult with the department of commerce and consider at a minimum:

(i) The ability of the project to expedite the cleanup and reuse of the contaminated real property for affordable housing development;

(ii) The extent to which the project leverages other public or private funding for the cleanup and reuse of the contaminated real property for affordable housing development;

(iii) The suitability of the real property for affordable housing based on the threat posed by the contamination to human health;

(iv) Whether the work to be funded is ready to proceed and be completed; and

(v) The distribution of funding throughout the state and among public and private entities.

(c) Any remediation of contaminated real property funded under this section must be performed:

(i) Under an agreed order or consent decree issued under chapter 70A.305 RCW or by the department; and

(ii) In accordance with the rules established under chapter 70A.305 RCW.

(d) Real property remediated under this section must be restricted to affordable housing use for a period of no less than 30 years.

(i) To ensure that real property remediated under this section is used for affordable housing, the department may file a lien against the real property pursuant to RCW 70A.305.060, require the person to record an interest in the real property in accordance with RCW 64.04.130, or use other means deemed by the department to be no less protective of the affordable housing use and interests of the department.

(ii) Any person who refuses, without sufficient cause, to comply with this subsection is subject to enforcement pursuant to any agreement or chapter 70A.305 RCW for the repayment, with interest, of funds provided or expended by the department under this section.

(2) $750,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely to mitigate soil contamination of toxic substances to enable the development of affordable housing, at the former University of Washington Mount Baker site, located at 2901 27th Ave South in Seattle and consisting of approximately four acres of land.
Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($10,911,000))

$10,572,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($50,911,000))

$50,572,000

Sec. 7048. 2021 c 332 s 3097 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Coastal Wetlands Federal Funds (40000388)
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
(($8,000,000))

$14,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$32,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($40,000,000))

$46,000,000

Sec. 7049. 2022 c 296 s 3010 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Water Banking (91000373)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for the department to administer a pilot grant program for water banking strategies to meet local water needs.

(b) $2,000,000 is provided solely for qualified applicants located within the Methow River Basin.

(2)(a) Grant awards may only be used for:

(i) Development of water banks in rural counties as defined in RCW 82.14.370(5);

(ii) Acquisition of water rights appropriate for use in a water bank including all costs necessary to evaluate the water right for eligibility for its intended use; and

(iii) Activities necessary to facilitate the creation of a water bank.

(b) ((For))Except for applicants located in Lewis county, for applicants located outside of the Methow River Basin, grant awards may only be used for the development of water banks in rural counties that have the headwaters of a major watershed within their borders and only for water banking strategies within the county of origin. For purposes of this section, "major watershed" has the same meaning as shoreline of statewide significance in RCW 90.58.030(2)(f)(v) (A) and (B).

(3) Grant awards may not exceed $2,000,000 per applicant.

(4) For the purposes of a grant pursuant to this section, a water bank must meet water needs, which include, but are not limited to, agricultural use and instream flow for fish and wildlife. The water bank must preserve water rights for use in the county of origin, unless the applicant is located in Lewis county, and for permanent instream flows for fish and wildlife through the primary and secondary reaches of the water right.

(5) To be eligible to receive a grant under this section, an applicant must:

(a) Be a public entity or a participant in a public-private partnership with a public entity;

(b) Exhibit sufficient expertise and capacity to develop and maintain a water bank consistent with the purposes of this appropriation;

(c) Secure a valid interest to purchase a water right;

(d) Show that the water rights appear to be adequate for the intended use; and

(e) Agree to have one-third of any water right purchased with the funds appropriated under this section to have its purpose of use changed permanently to instream flow benefiting fish and wildlife.

(6) ((If the amounts provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section are not obligated by June 30, 2023, the water banking pilot program established in this section is null and void, and funding is not reappropriated.))In determining whether a grant request is eligible for funding under this section, the department may not disqualify proposals that purchase water rights from an existing water bank.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

State Drought Preparedness and Response

Account—State
. . . .
$9,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$14,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7050. A new section is added to 2022 c 296 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2021-23 Salmon Recovery Investment from Operating (40000069)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for the salmon recovery board to provide grants for projects valued at greater than $5,000,000 each that will benefit salmon recovery.
Appropriation:

Salmon Recovery Account—State
. . . .
$50,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7051. A new section is added to 2022 c 296 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2021-23 Grants for Watershed Projects from Operating (40000070)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for the salmon recovery board to provide grants for watershed projects typically valued at less than $5,000,000 each that will benefit salmon recovery.
Appropriation:

Salmon Recovery Account—State
. . . .
$25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7052. A new section is added to 2022 c 296 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE

2021-23 Duckabush Estuary Restoration Project from Operating (40000071)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for the office to provide a grant for the Duckabush estuary restoration project.
Appropriation:

Salmon Recovery Account—State
. . . .
$25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7053. A new section is added to 2022 c 296 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Riparian Restoration with Landowners (91000020)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for the commission to provide grants for riparian restoration projects with landowners.
Appropriation:

Salmon Recovery Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7054. A new section is added to 2022 c 296 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2021-23 Conservation Reserve Enhancement from Operating (40000038)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for the purposes of the conservation reserve enhancement program, including additional project management and cost-share funding.
Appropriation:

Salmon Recovery Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7055. A new section is added to 2022 c 296 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Upper Columbia River Salmon Reintroduction from Operating (40000266)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide grants and coordinate with the tribes of the upper Columbia River to reintroduce Chinook salmon.
Appropriation:

Salmon Recovery Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

Sec. 7056. 2021 c 332 s 3295 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Port Angeles Storm Water Repair (40000015)
Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State
. . . .
(($1,020,000))

$1,220,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($1,020,000))

$1,220,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7057. A new section is added to 2022 c 296 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forestry Riparian Easement Program from Operating (40000376)
Appropriation:

Salmon Recovery Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

Sec. 7058. 2022 c 296 s 5004 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2021-23 School Construction Assistance Program (40000034)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($537,824,000))$428,204,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for school construction assistance grants for qualifying public school construction projects.

(2) (($2,836,000))$3,403,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for study and survey grants and for completing inventory and building condition assessments for public school districts every six years.

(3) $20,000 of the appropriations in this section is provided solely for the Sunnyside School District for the transfer of the Yakima Valley Technical Skills Center Sunnyside Satellite Campus and its related property and equipment.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($505,306,000))

$396,253,000

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$29,374,000

Common School Construction Account—Federal
. . . .
$6,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($540,680,000))

$431,627,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$3,899,490,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($4,440,170,000))

$4,331,117,000

Sec. 7059. 2022 c 296 s 5028 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Electrical Engineering/Computer Science Building (30000872)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5089, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.

(2) The University may pursue the living building challenge petal certification for this project instead of the LEED silver certification required by RCW 39.35D.030.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Appropriation:

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$1,863,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$51,000,000

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($52,500,000))

$54,363,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,500,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($54,500,000))

$56,363,000

Sec. 7060. 2022 c 296 s 7002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS.
(1) The following agencies may enter into financial contracts, paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or nonappropriated, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section, agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements, lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance committee.

(2) Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible for state funded maintenance and operations.

(3) Secretary of state: Enter into a financing contract for up to $119,000,000 plus financing expenses ((and)), required reserves, and capitalized interest pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a new library-archives building.

(4) Washington state patrol: Enter into a financing contract for up to $7,706,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a burn building for live fire training.

(5) Department of social and health services: Enter into a financing contract for up to (($115,700,000))$175,888,000 plus costs and financing expenses ((and)), required reserves, and capitalized interest pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a nursing facility on the fircrest residential habilitation center campus. The department may contract to lease develop or lease purchase the facility. Before entering into a contract, the department must consult with the office of financial management and the office of the state treasurer. Should the department of social and health services choose to use a financing contract that does not provide for the issuance of certificates of participation, the financing contract shall be subject to approval by the state finance committee as required by RCW 39.94.010. In approving a financing contract not providing for the use of certificates of participation, the state finance committee should be reasonably certain that the contract is excluded from the computation of indebtedness, particularly that the contract is not backed by the full faith and credit of the state and the legislature is expressly not obligated to appropriate funds to make payments. For purposes of this subsection, "financing contract" includes but is not limited to a certificate of participation and tax exempt financing similar to that authorized in RCW 47.79.140.

(6) Community and technical colleges:

(a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Grays Harbor College for up to $3,200,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a student services and instructional building.

(b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Shoreline Community College for up to $3,128,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an allied health, science, and manufacturing replacement building.

(c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of South Puget Sound Community College for up to $5,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate a health education building.

(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Bates Technical College for up to $1,350,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase land and facilities.

(7) The department of ecology: Enter into a financing contract for up to $3,797,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the Lacey headquarters parking garage preservation project.

Sec. 7061. 2022 c 296 s 2030 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

DVA ARPA Federal Funds & State Match (91000013)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department is granted federal expenditure authority in anticipation of the receipt of federal competitive grant funding for which it is eligible to apply under section 8004 of the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2.

(2) Funding appropriated in this section must be used for projects in the following priority order:

(a) The WVH HVAC Retrofit project (40000006); and

(b) Minor works projects that meet the requirements set forth in section 8004 of the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2.

(3) The state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for state match funds to leverage the federal funding described in subsection (1) of this section. Any amount that exceeds the level of state match funds required to maximize the federal funding opportunity must be placed in unallotted status.
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$24,515,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,884,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$35,399,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$35,399,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7062. 2021 c 332 s 3111 (uncodified) is repealed.

(End of part)

PART 8

MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8001. RCW 43.88.031 requires the disclosure of the estimated debt service costs associated with new capital bond appropriations. The estimated debt service costs for the appropriations contained in this act are $59,511,000 for the 2023-2025 biennium, $370,419,000 for the 2025-2027 biennium, and $518,208,000 for the 2027-2029 biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8002. ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS.(1) The following agencies may enter into financial contracts, paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or nonappropriated, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section, agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements, lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance committee.

(2) Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible for state funded maintenance and operations.

(3) Secretary of state: Enter into a financing contract for up to $119,000,000 plus financing expenses, required reserves, and capitalized interest pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a new library-archives building.

(4) Department of social and health services: Enter into a financing contract for up to $175,888,000 plus costs and financing expenses, required reserves, and capitalized interest pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a nursing facility on the Fircrest residential habilitation center campus. The department may contract to lease develop or lease purchase the facility. Before entering into a contract, the department must consult with the office of financial management and the office of the state treasurer. Should the department of social and health services choose to use a financing contract that does not provide for the issuance of certificates of participation, the financing contract shall be subject to approval by the state finance committee as required by RCW 39.94.010. In approving a financing contract not providing for the use of certificates of participation, the state finance committee should be reasonably certain that the contract is excluded from the computation of indebtedness, particularly that the contract is not backed by the full faith and credit of the state and the legislature is expressly not obligated to appropriate funds to make payments. For purposes of this subsection, "financing contract" includes but is not limited to a certificate of participation and tax exempt financing similar to that authorized in RCW 47.79.140.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8003. (1) To ensure that major construction projects are carried out in accordance with legislative and executive intent, agencies must complete a predesign for state construction projects with a total anticipated cost in excess of $10,000,000. For purposes of this section, "total anticipated cost" means the sum of the anticipated cost of the predesign, design, and construction phases of the project.

(2) Appropriations for design may not be expended or encumbered until the office of financial management has reviewed and approved the agency's predesign.

(3) The predesign must explore at least three project alternatives. These alternatives must be both distinctly different and viable solutions to the issue being addressed. The chosen alternative should be the most reasonable and cost-effective solution. The predesign document must include, but not be limited to, program, site, and cost analysis, and an analysis of the life-cycle costs of the alternatives explored, in accordance with the predesign manual adopted by the office of financial management.

(4) For projects exceeding the $10,000,000 predesign threshold established in this section, the office of financial management may make an exception to some or all of the predesign requirements in this section. The office of financial management shall report any exception to the fiscal committees of the legislature:

(a) A description of the major capital project for which the predesign waiver is made;

(b) An explanation of the reason for the waiver; and

(c) A rough order of magnitude cost estimate for the project's design and construction.

(5) In deliberations related to submitting an exception under this section, the office of financial management shall consider the following factors:

(a) Whether there is any determination to be made regarding the site of the project;

(b) Whether there is any determination to be made regarding whether the project will involve renovation, new construction, or both;

(c) Whether, within six years of submitting the request for funding, the agency has completed, or initiated the construction of, a substantially similar project;

(d) Whether there is any anticipated change to the project's program or the services to be delivered at the facility;

(e) Whether the requesting agency indicates that the project may not require some or all of the predesign requirements in this section due to a lack of complexity; and

(f) Whether any other factors related to project complexity or risk, as determined by the office of financial management, could reduce the need for, or scope of, a predesign.

(6) If under this section, some or all predesign requirements are waived, the office of financial management may instead propose a professional project cost estimate instead of a request for predesign funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8004. (1) The legislature finds that use of life-cycle cost analysis will aid public entities, architects, engineers, and contractors in making design and construction decisions that positively impact both the initial construction cost and the ongoing operating and maintenance cost of a project. To ensure that the total cost of a project is accounted for and the most reasonable and cost-efficient design is used, agencies shall develop life-cycle costs for any construction project over $10,000,000. The life-cycle costs must represent the present value sum of capital costs, installation costs, operating costs, and maintenance costs over the life expectancy of the project. The legislature further finds the most effective approach to the life-cycle cost analysis is to integrate it into the early part of the design process.

(2) Agencies must develop a minimum of three project alternatives for use in the life-cycle cost analysis. These alternatives must be both distinctly different and viable solutions to the issue being addressed. Agencies must choose the most reasonable and cost-effective solution, as supported by the life-cycle cost analysis. A brief description of each project alternative and why it was chosen must be included in the life-cycle cost analysis section of the predesign.

(3) The office of financial management shall: (a) Make available a life-cycle cost model to be used for analysis; (b) in consultation with the department of enterprise services, provide assistance in using the life-cycle cost model; and (c) update the life-cycle cost model annually including assumptions for inflation rates, discount rates, and energy rates.

(4) Agencies shall consider architectural and engineering firms' and general contractors' experience using life-cycle costs, operating costs, and energy efficiency measures when selecting an architectural and engineering firm, or when selecting contractors using alternative contracting methods.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8005. Agencies administering construction projects with a total anticipated cost in excess of $10,000,000 must submit progress reports to the office of financial management and to the fiscal committees of the house of representatives and senate. "Total anticipated cost" means the sum of the anticipated cost of the predesign, design, and construction phases of the project. Reports must be submitted on July 1st and December 31st of each year in a format determined by the office of financial management. After the project is completed, agencies must also submit a closeout report that identifies the total project cost and any unspent appropriations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8006. (1) Allotments for appropriations in this act shall be provided in accordance with the capital project review requirements adopted by the office of financial management and in compliance with RCW 43.88.110. Projects that will be employing alternative public works construction procedures under chapter 39.10 RCW are subject to the allotment procedures defined in this section and RCW 43.88.110.

(2) Each project is defined as proposed in the legislative budget notes or in the governor's budget document.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8007. (1) The office of financial management may authorize a transfer of appropriation authority provided for a capital project that is in excess of the amount required for the completion of such project to another capital project for which the appropriation is insufficient. No such transfer may be used to expand the capacity of any facility beyond that intended in making the appropriation. Such transfers may be effected only between capital appropriations to a specific department, commission, agency, or institution of higher education and only between capital projects that are funded from the same fund or account. No transfers may occur between projects to local government agencies except where the grants are provided within a single omnibus appropriation and where such transfers are specifically authorized by the implementing statutes that govern the grants.

(2) The office of financial management may find that an amount is in excess of the amount required for the completion of a project only if: (a) The project as defined in the notes to the budget document is substantially complete and there are funds remaining; or (b) bids have been let on a project and it appears to a substantial certainty that the project as defined in the notes to the budget document can be completed within the biennium for less than the amount appropriated in this act.

(3) For the purposes of this section, the intent is that each project be defined as proposed to the legislature in the governor's budget document, unless it clearly appears from the legislative history that the legislature intended to define the scope of a project in a different way.

(4) A report of any transfer effected under this section, except emergency projects or any transfer under $250,000, shall be filed with the fiscal committees of the legislature by the office of financial management at least 30 days before the date the transfer is effected. The office of financial management shall report all emergency or smaller transfers within 30 days from the date of transfer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8008. (1) It is expected that projects be ready to proceed in a timely manner depending on the type or phase of the project or program that is the subject of the appropriation in this act. Except for major projects that customarily may take more than two biennia to complete from predesign to the end of construction, or large infrastructure grant or loan programs supporting projects that often take more than two biennia to complete, the legislature generally does not intend to reappropriate funds more than once, particularly for smaller grant programs, local/community projects, and minor works.

(2) Agencies shall expedite the expenditure of reappropriations and appropriations in this act in order to: (a) Rehabilitate infrastructure resources; (b) accelerate environmental rehabilitation and restoration projects for the improvement of the state's natural environment; (c) reduce additional costs associated with acquisition and construction inflationary pressures; and (d) provide additional employment opportunities associated with capital expenditures.

(3) To the extent feasible, agencies are directed to accelerate expenditure rates at their current level of permanent employees and shall use contracted design and construction services wherever necessary to meet the goals of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8009. Any building project that receives over $10,000,000 in funding from the capital budget must be built to sustainable standards. "Sustainable building" means a building that integrates and optimizes all major high-performance building attributes, including energy efficiency, durability, life-cycle performance, and occupant productivity, and minimizes greenhouse gas emissions. The following design and construction attributes must be integrated into the building project:

(1) Employ integrated design principles: Use a collaborative, integrated planning and design process that initiates and maintains an integrated project team in all stages of a project's planning and delivery. Establish performance goals for siting, energy, water, materials, and indoor environmental quality along with other comprehensive design goals and ensures incorporation of these goals throughout the design and life-cycle of the building. Consider all stages of the building's life-cycle, including deconstruction.

(2) Commissioning: Employ commissioning practices tailored to the size and complexity of the building and its system components in order to verify performance of building components and systems and help ensure that design requirements are met. This should include an experienced commissioning provider, inclusion of commissioning requirements in construction documents, a commissioning plan, verification of the installation and performance of systems to be commissioned, and a commissioning report.

(3) Optimize energy performance: Establish a whole building performance target that takes into account the intended use, occupancy, operations, plug loads, other energy demands, and design to earn the ENERGY STAR targets for new construction and major renovation where applicable. For new construction target low energy use index. For major renovations, target reducing energy use by 50 percent below prerenovations baseline.

(4) On-site renewable energy: Implement renewable energy generation projects on agency property for agency use, when life-cycle cost effective.

(5) High-efficiency electric equipment: Use only high-efficiency electric equipment for water and space heating needs not met through on-site renewable energy, when life-cycle cost effective.

(6) Measurement and verification: For buildings over 50,000 square feet, install building level electricity meters in new major construction and renovation projects to track and continuously optimize performance. Include equivalent meters for natural gas and steam, where natural gas and steam are used. Where appropriate, install dashboards inside buildings to display and incentivize occupants on energy use.

(7) Benchmarking: Compare performance data from the first year of operation with the energy design target. Verify that the building performance meets or exceeds the design target. For other building and space types, use an equivalent benchmarking tool.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8010. State agencies, including institutions of higher education, shall allot and report full-time equivalent staff for capital projects in a manner comparable to staff reporting for operating expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8011. Executive Order No. 21-02, archaeological and cultural resources, was issued effective April 7, 2021. Agencies shall comply with the requirements set forth in this executive order and must consult with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes on the potential effects of projects on cultural resources and historic properties proposed in state-funded construction or acquisition projects, including grant or pass-through funding that culminates in construction or land acquisitions. Consultation with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes must be initiated early in the project planning process, prior to construction or taking title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8012. FOR THE ARTS COMMISSION—ART WORK ALLOWANCE.(1) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction of school plant facilities is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210.

(2) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction or any major renovation or remodel work exceeding $200,000 by colleges or universities is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28B.10.027.

(3) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction of any public building by a state agency identified in RCW 43.17.200 is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 43.17.200.

(4) At least 75 percent of the moneys spent by the Washington state arts commission during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200 must be expended solely for direct acquisition of works of art; 20 percent may be expended for program administration; and 5 percent may be expended to conserve or maintain existing pieces in the state art collection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8013. To carry out the provisions of this act, the governor may assign responsibility for predesign, design, construction, and other related activities to any appropriate agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8014. If any federal moneys appropriated by this act for capital projects are not received by the state, the department or agency to which the moneys were appropriated may replace the federal moneys with funds available from private or local sources. No replacement may occur under this section without the prior approval of the director of financial management in consultation with the senate ways and means committee and the house of representatives capital budget committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8015. (1) Unless otherwise stated, for all appropriations under this act that require a match of nonstate money or in-kind contributions, the following requirement, consistent with RCW 43.88.150, shall apply: Expenditures of state money shall be timed so that the state share of project expenditures never exceeds the intended state share of total project costs.

(2) Provision of the full amount of required matching funds is not required to permit the expenditure of capital budget appropriations for phased projects if a proportional amount of the required matching funds is provided for each distinct, identifiable phase of the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8016. NONTAXABLE AND TAXABLE BOND PROCEEDS.Portions of the appropriation authority granted by this act from the state building construction account, or any other account receiving bond proceeds, may be transferred to the state taxable building construction account as deemed necessary by the state treasurer, on behalf of the state finance committee, to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds. Portions of the general obligation bond proceeds authorized by Substitute House Bill No. 1148 (state general obligation bonds and related accounts) for deposit into the state taxable building construction account that are in excess of amounts required to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and regulations shall be deposited into the state building construction account. The state treasurer shall submit written notification to the director of financial management if it is determined that a shift of appropriation authority between the state building construction account, or any other account receiving bond proceeds, and the state taxable building construction account is necessary, or that a shift of appropriation authority from the state taxable building construction account to the state building construction account may be made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8017. (1) Minor works project lists are single line appropriations that include multiple projects of a similar nature and that are valued between $25,000 and $1,000,000 each, with the exception of higher education minor works projects that may be valued up to $2,000,000. Funds appropriated in this act for minor works may not be initially allotted until agencies submit project lists to the office of financial management for review and approval.

(2) Revisions to the project lists, including the addition of projects and the transfer of funds between projects, are allowed but must be submitted to the office of financial management, the house of representatives capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee for review and comment, and must include an explanation of variances from prior approved lists. Any project list revisions must be approved by the office of financial management before funds may be expended from the minor works appropriation.

(3)(a) All minor works projects should be completed within two years of the appropriation with the funding provided.

(b) Agencies are prohibited from including projects on their minor works lists that are a phase of a larger project, and that if combined over a continuous period of time, would exceed $1,000,000, or $2,000,000 for higher education minor works projects.

(c) Minor works appropriations may not be used for the following: Studies, except for technical or engineering reviews or designs that lead directly to and support a project on the same minor works list; planning; design outside the scope of work on a minor works list; movable, temporary, and traditionally funded operating equipment not in compliance with the equipment criteria established by the office of financial management; software not dedicated to control of a specialized system; moving expenses; land or facility acquisition; rolling stock; computers; or to supplement funding for projects with funding shortfalls unless expressly authorized. The office of financial management may make an exception to the limitations described in this subsection (3)(c) for exigent circumstances after notifying the legislative fiscal committees and waiting 10 days for comments by the legislature regarding the proposed exception.

(d) Minor works preservation projects may include program improvements of no more than 25 percent of the individual minor works preservation project cost.

(e) Improvements for accessibility in compliance with the Americans with disabilities act may be included in any of the minor works categories.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8018. To the extent that any appropriation authorizes expenditures of state funds from the state building construction account, or from any other capital project account in the state treasury, for a capital project or program that is specified to be funded with proceeds from the sale of bonds, the legislature declares that any such expenditures for that project or program made prior to the issue date of the applicable bonds are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of those bonds in a maximum amount equal to the amount of such appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8019. FOR THE STATE TREASURER—TRANSFERS

(1) Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to the

water pollution control revolving account—state, up to

$17,500,000 for fiscal year 2024 and up to $17,500,000

for fiscal year 2025
. . . .
$35,000,000

(2) Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer

to the drinking water assistance account—state, up to

$1,750,000 for fiscal year 2024 and up to $1,750,000

for fiscal year 2025
. . . .
$3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8020. In order to accelerate the reduction of embodied carbon and improve the environmental performance of construction materials, agencies shall, whenever possible, review and consider embodied carbon reported in environmental product declarations when evaluating proposed structural materials for construction projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8021. The department of natural resources, in coordination with the department of social and health services, shall enter into long-term, revenue-generating opportunities for under used portions of the Fircrest residential habilitation center bounded by 15th Ave NE and NE 150th Street to benefit the charitable, educational, penal, and reformatory institutions account. Long-term, revenue generating opportunities may include, but are not limited to, land leases, land sales, and land swaps. The department of social and health services and the department of natural resources must amend their lease under chapter 7, Laws of 1986 if necessary to conform with this section.

Sec. 8022. RCW 28A.320.330 and 2021 c 332 s 7045 are each amended to read as follows:

School districts shall establish the following funds in addition to those provided elsewhere by law:

(1)(a) A general fund for the school district to account for all financial operations of the school district except those required to be accounted for in another fund.

(b) By the 2018-19 school year, a local revenue subfund of its general fund to account for the financial operations of a school district that are paid from local revenues. The local revenues that must be deposited in the local revenue subfund are enrichment levies and transportation vehicle levies collected under RCW 84.52.053, local effort assistance funding received under chapter 28A.500 RCW, and other school district local revenues including, but not limited to, grants, donations, and state and federal payments in lieu of taxes, but do not include other federal revenues, or local revenues that operate as an offset to the district's basic education allocation under RCW 28A.150.250. School districts must track expenditures from this subfund separately to account for the expenditure of each of these streams of revenue by source, and must provide the supplemental expenditure schedule under (c) of this subsection, and any other supplemental expenditure schedules required by the superintendent of public instruction or state auditor, for purposes of RCW 43.09.2856.

(c) Beginning in the 2019-20 school year, the superintendent of public instruction must require school districts to provide a supplemental expenditure schedule by revenue source that identifies the amount expended by object for each of the following supplementary enrichment activities beyond the state funded amount:

(i) Minimum instructional offerings under RCW 28A.150.220 or 28A.150.260 not otherwise included on other lines;

(ii) Staffing ratios or program components under RCW 28A.150.260, including providing additional staff for class size reduction beyond class sizes allocated in the prototypical school model and additional staff beyond the staffing ratios allocated in the prototypical school formula;

(iii) Program components under RCW 28A.150.200, 28A.150.220, or 28A.150.260, not otherwise included on other lines;

(iv) Program components to support students in the program of special education;

(v) Program components of professional learning, as defined by RCW 28A.415.430, beyond that allocated under RCW 28A.150.415;

(vi) Extracurricular activities;

(vii) Extended school days or an extended school year;

(viii) Additional course offerings beyond the minimum instructional program established in the state's statutory program of basic education;

(ix) Activities associated with early learning programs;

(x) Activities associated with providing the student transportation program;

(xi) Any additional salary costs attributable to the provision or administration of the enrichment activities allowed under RCW 28A.150.276;

(xii) Additional activities or enhancements that the office of the superintendent of public instruction determines to be a documented and demonstrated enrichment of the state's statutory program of basic education under RCW 28A.150.276; and

(xiii) All other costs not otherwise identified in other line items.

(d) For any salary and related benefit costs identified in (c)(xi), (xii), and (xiii) of this subsection, the school district shall maintain a record describing how these expenditures are documented and demonstrated enrichment of the state's statutory program of basic education. School districts shall maintain these records until the state auditor has completed the audit under RCW 43.09.2856.

(2) A capital projects fund shall be established for major capital purposes. All statutory references to a "building fund" shall mean the capital projects fund so established. Money to be deposited into the capital projects fund shall include, but not be limited to, bond proceeds, proceeds from excess levies authorized by RCW 84.52.053, state apportionment proceeds as authorized by RCW 28A.150.270, earnings from capital projects fund investments as authorized by RCW 28A.320.310 and 28A.320.320, and state forest revenues transferred pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.

Money derived from the sale of bonds, including interest earnings thereof, may only be used for those purposes described in RCW 28A.530.010, except that accrued interest paid for bonds shall be deposited in the debt service fund.

Money to be deposited into the capital projects fund shall include but not be limited to rental and lease proceeds as authorized by RCW 28A.335.060, and proceeds from the sale of real property as authorized by RCW 28A.335.130.

Money legally deposited into the capital projects fund from other sources may be used for the purposes described in RCW 28A.530.010, and for the purposes of:

(a) Major renovation and replacement of facilities and systems where periodical repairs are no longer economical or extend the useful life of the facility or system beyond its original planned useful life. Such renovation and replacement shall include, but shall not be limited to, major repairs, exterior painting of facilities, replacement and refurbishment of roofing, exterior walls, windows, heating and ventilating systems, floor covering in classrooms and public or common areas, and electrical and plumbing systems.

(b) Renovation and rehabilitation of playfields, athletic fields, and other district real property.

(c) The conduct of preliminary energy audits and energy audits of school district buildings. For the purpose of this section:

(i) "Preliminary energy audits" means a determination of the energy consumption characteristics of a building, including the size, type, rate of energy consumption, and major energy using systems of the building.

(ii) "Energy audit" means a survey of a building or complex which identifies the type, size, energy use level, and major energy using systems; which determines appropriate energy conservation maintenance or operating procedures and assesses any need for the acquisition and installation of energy conservation measures, including solar energy and renewable resource measures.

(iii) "Energy capital improvement" means the installation, or modification of the installation, of energy conservation measures in a building which measures are primarily intended to reduce energy consumption or allow the use of an alternative energy source.

(d) Those energy capital improvements which are identified as being cost-effective in the audits authorized by this section.

(e) Purchase or installation of additional major items of equipment and furniture: PROVIDED, That vehicles shall not be purchased with capital projects fund money.

(f)(i) Costs associated with implementing technology systems, facilities, and projects, including acquiring hardware, licensing software, and online applications and training related to the installation of the foregoing. However, the software or applications must be an integral part of the district's technology systems, facilities, or projects.

(ii) Costs associated with the application and modernization of technology systems for operations and instruction including, but not limited to, the ongoing fees for online applications, subscriptions, or software licenses, including upgrades and incidental services, and ongoing training related to the installation and integration of these products and services. However, to the extent the funds are used for the purpose under this subsection (2)(f)(ii), the school district shall transfer to the district's general fund the portion of the capital projects fund used for this purpose. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop accounting guidelines for these transfers in accordance with internal revenue service regulations.

(g) Major equipment repair, painting of facilities, and other major preventative maintenance purposes. However, to the extent the funds are used for the purpose under this subsection (2)(g), the school district shall transfer to the district's general fund the portion of the capital projects fund used for this purpose. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop accounting guidelines for these transfers in accordance with internal revenue service regulations. Based on the district's most recent two-year history of general fund maintenance expenditures, funds used for this purpose may not replace routine annual preventive maintenance expenditures made from the district's general fund.

(h) During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, renovation and replacement of facilities and systems, purchase or installation of items of equipment and furniture, including maintenance vehicles and machinery, and other preventative maintenance or infrastructure improvement purposes.

(i) During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, for moneys in the capital projects fund not attributable to capital levies, moving of equipment and furniture between buildings and warehouses for storage, moving of the content of teachers' classrooms between buildings, and furniture purchases, when these costs are due to the following activities: Construction, remodeling, replacement, temporary placement, consolidation, or directed transfer.

(3) A debt service fund to provide for tax proceeds, other revenues, and disbursements as authorized in chapter 39.44 RCW. State forestland revenues that are deposited in a school district's debt service fund pursuant to RCW 79.64.110 and to the extent not necessary for payment of debt service on school district bonds may be transferred by the school district into the district's capital projects fund.

(4) An associated student body fund as authorized by RCW 28A.325.030.

(5) Advance refunding bond funds and refunded bond funds to provide for the proceeds and disbursements as authorized in chapter 39.53 RCW.

Sec. 8023. RCW 28B.20.725 and 2021 c 332 s 7027 are each amended to read as follows:

The board is hereby empowered:

(1) To reserve the right to issue bonds later on a parity with any bonds being issued;

(2) To authorize the investing of moneys in the bond retirement fund and any reserve account therein;

(3) To authorize the transfer of money from the University of Washington building account to the bond retirement fund when necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of such fund;

(4) To create a reserve account or accounts in the bond retirement fund to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on any bonds;

(5) To authorize the transfer to the University of Washington building account of any money on deposit in the bond retirement fund in excess of debt service for a period of three years from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of such fund. ((However, during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the University of Washington building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund.)) However, during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the University of Washington building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund. However, during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the University of Washington building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund.

Sec. 8024. RCW 28B.15.210 and 2021 c 332 s 7025 are each amended to read as follows:

Within ((thirty-five))35 days from the date of collection thereof, all building fees at the University of Washington, including building fees to be charged students registering in the schools of medicine and dentistry, shall be paid into the state treasury and credited as follows:

One-half or such larger portion as may be necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of the bond retirement fund to the "University of Washington bond retirement fund" and the remainder thereof to the "University of Washington building account." The sum so credited to the University of Washington building account shall be used exclusively for the purpose of erecting, altering, maintaining, equipping, or furnishing buildings, and for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW, except for any sums transferred as authorized in RCW 28B.20.725(3). The sum so credited to the University of Washington bond retirement fund shall be used for the payment of principal of and interest on bonds outstanding as provided by chapter 28B.20 RCW except for any sums transferred as authorized in RCW 28B.20.725(5). ((During the 2019-2021 biennium, sums credited to the University of Washington building account may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments.)) During the 2021-2023 biennium, sums credited to the University of Washington building account may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments. During the 2023-2025 biennium, sums credited to the University of Washington building account may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments.

Sec. 8025. RCW 28B.15.310 and 2021 c 332 s 7026 are each amended to read as follows:

Within ((thirty-five))35 days from the date of collection thereof, all building fees shall be paid and credited as follows: To the Washington State University bond retirement fund, one-half or such larger portion as may be necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of such bond retirement fund; and the remainder thereof to the Washington State University building account.

The sum so credited to the Washington State University building account shall be expended by the board of regents for buildings, equipment, or maintenance on the campus of Washington State University as may be deemed most advisable and for the best interests of the university, and for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW, except for any sums transferred as authorized by law. ((During the 2019-2021 biennium, sums credited to the Washington State University building account may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments.)) During the 2021-2023 biennium, sums credited to the Washington State University building account may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments. During the 2023-2025 biennium, sums credited to the Washington State University building account may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments. Expenditures so made shall be accounted for in accordance with existing law and shall not be expended until appropriated by the legislature.

The sum so credited to the Washington State University bond retirement fund shall be used to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on building bonds issued by the university, except for any sums which may be transferred out of such fund as authorized by law.

Sec. 8026. RCW 28B.30.750 and 2021 c 332 s 7028 are each amended to read as follows:

The board is hereby empowered:

(1) To reserve the right to issue bonds later on a parity with any bonds being issued;

(2) To authorize the investing of moneys in the bond retirement fund and any reserve account therein;

(3) To authorize the transfer of money from the Washington State University building account to the bond retirement fund when necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of such fund;

(4) To create a reserve account or accounts in the bond retirement fund to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on any bonds;

(5) To authorize the transfer to the Washington State University building account of any money on deposit in the bond retirement fund in excess of debt service for a period of three years from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of such fund. ((However, during the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the Washington State University building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund.)) However, during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the Washington State University building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund. However, during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer to the Washington State University building account moneys that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement fund.

Sec. 8027. RCW 28B.35.370 and 2021 c 332 s 7029 are each amended to read as follows:

Within ((thirty-five))35 days from the date of collection thereof all building fees of each regional university and The Evergreen State College shall be paid into the state treasury and these together with such normal school fund revenues as provided in RCW 28B.35.751 as are received by the state treasury shall be credited as follows:

(1) On or before June 30th of each year the board of trustees of each regional university and The Evergreen State College, if issuing bonds payable out of its building fees and above described normal school fund revenues, shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts required in the ensuing ((twelve))12 months to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds. The amounts so certified by each regional university and The Evergreen State College shall be a prior lien and charge against all building fees and above described normal school fund revenues of such institution. The state treasurer shall thereupon deposit the amounts so certified in the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the Western Washington University capital projects account, or The Evergreen State College capital projects account respectively, which accounts are hereby created in the state treasury. The amounts deposited in the respective capital projects accounts shall be used to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the building bonds issued by such regional universities and The Evergreen State College as authorized by law. If in any ((twelve))12-month period it shall appear that the amount certified by any such board of trustees is insufficient to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the outstanding building and above described normal school fund revenue bonds of its institution, the state treasurer shall notify the board of trustees and such board shall adjust its certificate so that all requirements of moneys to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on all such bonds then outstanding shall be fully met at all times.

(2) All normal school fund revenue pursuant to RCW 28B.35.751 shall be deposited in the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the Western Washington University capital projects account, or The Evergreen State College capital projects account respectively, which accounts are hereby created in the state treasury. The sums deposited in the respective capital projects accounts shall be appropriated and expended to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on bonds payable out of the building fees and normal school revenue and for the construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping, maintenance, demolition and major alteration of buildings and other capital assets, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements, improvements or appurtenances in relation thereto except for any sums transferred therefrom as authorized by law. ((During the 2019-2021 biennium, sums in the respective capital accounts may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments.)) During the 2021-2023 biennium, sums in the respective capital accounts may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments. During the 2023-2025 biennium, sums in the respective capital accounts may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments.

(3) Funds available in the respective capital projects accounts may also be used for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW.

Sec. 8028. RCW 28B.50.360 and 2021 c 332 s 7030 are each amended to read as follows:

Within ((thirty-five))35 days from the date of start of each quarter all collected building fees of each such community and technical college shall be paid into the state treasury, and shall be credited as follows:

(1) On or before June 30th of each year the college board, if issuing bonds payable out of building fees, shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts required in the ensuing ((twelve))12-month period to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds. The state treasurer shall thereupon deposit the amounts so certified in the community and technical college capital projects account. Such amounts of the funds deposited in the community and technical college capital projects account as are necessary to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the building bonds issued by the college board as authorized by this chapter shall be devoted to that purpose. If in any ((twelve))12-month period it shall appear that the amount certified by the college board is insufficient to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the outstanding building bonds, the state treasurer shall notify the college board and such board shall adjust its certificate so that all requirements of moneys to pay and secure the payment of the principal and interest on all such bonds then outstanding shall be fully met at all times.

(2) The community and technical college capital projects account is hereby created in the state treasury. The sums deposited in the capital projects account shall be appropriated and expended to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on bonds payable out of the building fees and for the construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping, maintenance, demolition and major alteration of buildings and other capital assets owned by the state board for community and technical colleges in the name of the state of Washington, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements, improvements or appurtenances in relation thereto, engineering and architectural services provided by the department of enterprise services, and for the payment of principal of and interest on any bonds issued for such purposes. ((During the 2019-2021 biennium, sums in the capital projects account may also be used for routine facility maintenance and utility costs.)) During the 2021-2023 biennium, sums in the capital projects account may also be used for routine facility maintenance and utility costs. During the 2023-2025 biennium, sums in the capital projects account may also be used for routine facility maintenance and utility costs.

(3) Funds available in the community and technical college capital projects account may also be used for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW.

Sec. 8029. RCW 39.35D.030 and 2021 c 332 s 7049 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All major facility projects of public agencies receiving any funding in a state capital budget, or projects financed through a financing contract as defined in RCW 39.94.020, must be designed, constructed, and certified to at least the LEED silver standard. This subsection applies to major facility projects that have not entered the design phase prior to July 24, 2005, and to the extent appropriate LEED silver standards exist for that type of building or facility.

(2) All major facility projects of any entity other than a public agency or public school district receiving any funding in a state capital budget must be designed, constructed, and certified to at least the LEED silver standard. This subsection applies to major facility projects that have not entered the grant application process prior to July 24, 2005, and to the extent appropriate LEED silver standards exist for that type of building or facility.

(3)(a) Public agencies, under this section, shall monitor and document ongoing operating savings resulting from major facility projects designed, constructed, and certified as required under this section.

(b) Public agencies, under this section, shall report annually to the department on major facility projects and operating savings.

(4) The department shall consolidate the reports required in subsection (3) of this section into one report and report to the governor and legislature by September 1st of each even-numbered year beginning in 2006 and ending in 2016. In its report, the department shall also report on the implementation of this chapter, including reasons why the LEED standard was not used as required by RCW 39.35D.020(5)(b). The department shall make recommendations regarding the ongoing implementation of this chapter, including a discussion of incentives and disincentives related to implementing this chapter.

(5) For the purposes of determining compliance with the requirement for a project to be designed, constructed, and certified to at least the LEED silver standard, the department must credit one additional point for a project that uses wood products with a credible third-party sustainable forest certification or from forests regulated under chapter 76.09 RCW, the Washington forest practices act. For projects that qualify for this additional point, and for which an additional point would have resulted in formal certification under the LEED silver standard, the project must be deemed to meet the standard under this section.

(6) During the 2021-2023 and 2023-2025 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, an alternative high-performance building certification, as determined by the legislature, may be used instead of the LEED silver building design, construction, and certification standard required by this section.

Sec. 8030. RCW 43.07.410 and 2019 c 448 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington state library-archives building account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All moneys received under RCW 36.18.010(12), 36.22.175(3), and 43.07.370(3) must be deposited in the account. ((Expenditures))Except for during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, expenditures from the account may be made only for the purposes of payment of the financing contract entered into by the secretary of state for the Washington state library-archives building. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the secretary of state may spend up to $15,000,000 from the account for costs associated with the design and construction of the state library-archives building and for costs necessary to prepare the building for occupancy. Only the secretary of state or the secretary of state's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. An appropriation is not required for expenditures, but the account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.

Sec. 8031. RCW 43.31.577 and 2021 c 130 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Activities eligible for funding through the early learning facilities grant and loan program for eligible organizations include:

(a) Facility predesign grants or loans of no more than $20,000 to allow eligible organizations to secure professional services or consult with organizations certified by the community development financial institutions fund to plan for and assess the feasibility of early learning facilities projects or receive other technical assistance to design and develop projects for construction funding;

(b) Grants or loans of no more than $200,000 for minor renovations or repairs of existing early learning facilities or for predevelopment activities to advance a proposal from planning to major construction or renovation;

(c) Major construction and renovation grants or loans and grants or loans for facility purchases of no more than $1,000,000 to create or expand early learning facilities, except that during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium these grants or loans may not exceed $2,500,000; and

(d) Administration costs associated with conducting application processes, managing contracts, and providing technical assistance.

(2) Activities eligible for funding through the early learning facilities grant and loan program for school districts include major construction, purchase, and renovation grants or loans of no more than $1,000,000 to create or expand early learning facilities that received priority and ranking as described in RCW 43.31.581.

(3) Amounts in this section must be increased annually by the United States implicit price deflator for state and local government construction provided by the office of financial management.

Sec. 8032. RCW 43.82.010 and 2018 c 217 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director of enterprise services, on behalf of the agency involved and after consultation with the office of financial management, shall purchase, lease, lease purchase, rent, or otherwise acquire all real estate, improved or unimproved, as may be required by elected state officials, institutions, departments, commissions, boards, and other state agencies, or federal agencies where joint state and federal activities are undertaken and may grant easements and transfer, exchange, sell, lease, or sublease all or part of any surplus real estate for those state agencies which do not otherwise have the specific authority to dispose of real estate. Any such transfer, exchange, or sale must comply with RCW 43.17.400, and may be made in accordance with RCW 39.33.015. This section does not transfer financial liability for the acquired property to the department of enterprise services.

(2) Except for real estate occupied by federal agencies, the director shall determine the location, size, and design of any real estate or improvements thereon acquired or held pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. Facilities acquired or held pursuant to this chapter, and any improvements thereon, shall conform to standards adopted by the director and approved by the office of financial management governing facility efficiency unless a specific exemption from such standards is provided by the director of enterprise services. The director of enterprise services shall report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature annually on any exemptions granted pursuant to this subsection.

(3) Except for leases permitted under subsection (4) of this section, the director of enterprise services may fix the terms and conditions of each lease entered into under this chapter, except that no lease shall extend greater than twenty years in duration. The director of enterprise services may enter into a long-term lease greater than ten years in duration upon a determination by the director of the office of financial management that the long-term lease provides a more favorable rate than would otherwise be available, it appears to a substantial certainty that the facility is necessary for use by the state for the full length of the lease term, and the facility meets the standards adopted pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. The director of enterprise services may enter into a long-term lease greater than ten years in duration if an analysis shows that the life-cycle cost of leasing the facility is less than the life-cycle cost of purchasing or constructing a facility in lieu of leasing the facility.

(4)(a) The director of enterprise services may fix the terms of leases for property under the department of enterprise services' control at the former Northern State Hospital site for up to sixty years.

(b) During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the state board for community and technical colleges on behalf of north Seattle community college may enter into a long-term lease, not to exceed 99 years, of a portion of the north Seattle community college for purposes of affordable housing under RCW 39.33.015.

(5) Except as permitted under chapter 39.94 RCW, no lease for or on behalf of any state agency may be used or referred to as collateral or security for the payment of securities offered for sale through a public offering. Except as permitted under chapter 39.94 RCW, no lease for or on behalf of any state agency may be used or referred to as collateral or security for the payment of securities offered for sale through a private placement without the prior written approval of the state treasurer. However, this limitation shall not prevent a lessor from assigning or encumbering its interest in a lease as security for the repayment of a promissory note provided that the transaction would otherwise be an exempt transaction under RCW 21.20.320. The state treasurer shall adopt rules that establish the criteria under which any such approval may be granted. In establishing such criteria the state treasurer shall give primary consideration to the protection of the state's credit rating and the integrity of the state's debt management program. If it appears to the state treasurer that any lease has been used or referred to in violation of this subsection or rules adopted under this subsection, then he or she may recommend that the governor cause such lease to be terminated. The department of enterprise services shall promptly notify the state treasurer whenever it may appear to the department that any lease has been used or referred to in violation of this subsection or rules adopted under this subsection.

(6) It is the policy of the state to encourage the colocation and consolidation of state services into single or adjacent facilities, whenever appropriate, to improve public service delivery, minimize duplication of facilities, increase efficiency of operations, and promote sound growth management planning.

(7) The director of enterprise services shall provide coordinated long-range planning services to identify and evaluate opportunities for colocating and consolidating state facilities. Upon the renewal of any lease, the inception of a new lease, or the purchase of a facility, the director of enterprise services shall determine whether an opportunity exists for colocating the agency or agencies in a single facility with other agencies located in the same geographic area. If a colocation opportunity exists, the director of enterprise services shall consult with the affected state agencies and the office of financial management to evaluate the impact colocation would have on the cost and delivery of agency programs, including whether program delivery would be enhanced due to the centralization of services. The director of enterprise services, in consultation with the office of financial management, shall develop procedures for implementing colocation and consolidation of state facilities.

(8) The director of enterprise services is authorized to purchase, lease, rent, or otherwise acquire improved or unimproved real estate as owner or lessee and to lease or sublet all or a part of such real estate to state or federal agencies. The director of enterprise services shall charge each using agency its proportionate rental which shall include an amount sufficient to pay all costs, including, but not limited to, those for utilities, janitorial and accounting services, and sufficient to provide for contingencies; which shall not exceed five percent of the average annual rental, to meet unforeseen expenses incident to management of the real estate.

(9) If the director of enterprise services determines that it is necessary or advisable to undertake any work, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement on any real estate acquired pursuant to subsection (1) or (8) of this section, the director shall cause plans and specifications thereof and an estimate of the cost of such work to be made and filed in his or her office and the state agency benefiting thereby is hereby authorized to pay for such work out of any available funds: PROVIDED, That the cost of executing such work shall not exceed the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars. Work, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars, other than that done by the owner of the property if other than the state, shall be performed in accordance with the public works law of this state.

(10) In order to obtain maximum utilization of space, the director of enterprise services shall make space utilization studies, and shall establish standards for use of space by state agencies. Such studies shall include the identification of opportunities for colocation and consolidation of state agency office and support facilities.

(11) The director of enterprise services may construct new buildings on, or improve existing facilities, and furnish and equip, all real estate under his or her management. Prior to the construction of new buildings or major improvements to existing facilities or acquisition of facilities using a lease purchase contract, the director of enterprise services shall conduct an evaluation of the facility design and budget using life-cycle cost analysis, value-engineering, and other techniques to maximize the long-term effectiveness and efficiency of the facility or improvement.

(12) All conveyances and contracts to purchase, lease, rent, transfer, exchange, or sell real estate and to grant and accept easements shall be approved as to form by the attorney general, signed by the director of enterprise services or the director's designee, and recorded with the county auditor of the county in which the property is located.

(13) The director of enterprise services may delegate any or all of the functions specified in this section to any agency upon such terms and conditions as the director deems advisable. By January 1st of each year, beginning January 1, 2008, the department shall submit an annual report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature on all delegated leases.

(14) This section does not apply to the acquisition of real estate by:

(a) The state college and universities for research or experimental purposes;

(b) The state liquor and cannabis board for liquor stores and warehouses;

(c) The department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife, the department of transportation, and the state parks and recreation commission for purposes other than the leasing of offices, warehouses, and real estate for similar purposes; and

(d) The department of commerce for community college health career training programs, offices for the department of commerce or other appropriate state agencies, and other nonprofit community uses, including community meeting and training facilities, where the real estate is acquired during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium.

(15) Notwithstanding any provision in this chapter to the contrary, the department of enterprise services may negotiate ground leases for public lands on which property is to be acquired under a financing contract pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW under terms approved by the state finance committee.

(16) The department of enterprise services shall report annually to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature on facility leases executed for all state agencies for the preceding year, lease terms, and annual lease costs. The report must include leases executed under RCW 43.82.045 and subsection (13) of this section.

Sec. 8033. RCW 43.83B.430 and 2022 c 297 s 957 and 2022 c 296 s 7008 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The state drought preparedness and response account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from appropriated funds designated for the account and all cost recovery revenues collected under RCW 43.83B.410(5) must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used for drought preparedness and response activities under this chapter, including grants issued under RCW 43.83B.415. ((During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account may be used for water banking pilot projects.)) Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. During the 2021-2023 and 2023-2025 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for activities related to water banking.

Sec. 8034. RCW 43.88D.010 and 2021 c 332 s 7034 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) By October 1st of each even-numbered year, the office of financial management shall complete an objective analysis and scoring of all capital budget projects proposed by the public four-year institutions of higher education and submit the results of the scoring process to the legislative fiscal committees and the four-year institutions. Each project must be reviewed and scored within one of the following categories, according to the project's principal purpose. Each project may be scored in only one category. The categories are:

(a) Access-related projects to accommodate enrollment growth at all campuses, at existing or new university centers, or through distance learning. Growth projects should provide significant additional student capacity. Proposed projects must demonstrate that they are based on solid enrollment demand projections, more cost-effectively provide enrollment access than alternatives such as university centers and distance learning, and make cost-effective use of existing and proposed new space;

(b) Projects that replace failing permanent buildings. Facilities that cannot be economically renovated are considered replacement projects. New space may be programmed for the same or a different use than the space being replaced and may include additions to improve access and enhance the relationship of program or support space;

(c) Projects that renovate facilities to restore building life and upgrade space to meet current program requirements. Renovation projects should represent a complete renovation of a total facility or an isolated wing of a facility. A reasonable renovation project should cost between sixty to eighty percent of current replacement value and restore the renovated area to at least twenty-five years of useful life. New space may be programmed for the same or a different use than the space being renovated and may include additions to improve access and enhance the relationship of program or support space;

(d) Major stand-alone campus infrastructure projects;

(e) Projects that promote economic growth and innovation through expanded research activity. The acquisition and installation of specialized equipment is authorized under this category; and

(f) Other project categories as determined by the office of financial management in consultation with the legislative fiscal committees.

(2) The office of financial management, in consultation with the legislative fiscal committees, shall establish a scoring system and process for each four-year project category that is based on the framework used in the community and technical college system of prioritization. Staff from the state board for community and technical colleges and the four-year institutions shall provide technical assistance on the development of a scoring system and process.

(3) The office of financial management shall consult with the legislative fiscal committees in the scoring of four-year institution project proposals, and may also solicit participation by independent experts.

(a) For each four-year project category, the scoring system must, at a minimum, include an evaluation of enrollment trends, reasonableness of cost, the ability of the project to enhance specific strategic master plan goals, age and condition of the facility if applicable, and impact on space utilization.

(b) Each four-year project category may include projects at the predesign, design, or construction funding phase.

(c) To the extent possible, the objective analysis and scoring system of all capital budget projects shall occur within the context of any and all performance agreements between the office of financial management and the governing board of a public, four-year institution of higher education that aligns goals, priorities, desired outcomes, flexibility, institutional mission, accountability, and levels of resources.

(4) In evaluating and scoring four-year institution projects, the office of financial management shall take into consideration project schedules that result in realistic, balanced, and predictable expenditure patterns over the ensuing three biennia.

(5) The office of financial management shall distribute common definitions, the scoring system, and other information required for the project proposal and scoring process as part of its biennial budget instructions. The office of financial management, in consultation with the legislative fiscal committees, shall develop common definitions that four-year institutions must use in developing their project proposals and lists under this section.

(6) In developing any scoring system for capital projects proposed by the four-year institutions, the office of financial management:

(a) Shall be provided with all required information by the four-year institutions as deemed necessary by the office of financial management;

(b) May utilize independent services to verify, sample, or evaluate information provided to the office of financial management by the four-year institutions; and

(c) Shall have full access to all data maintained by the joint legislative audit and review committee concerning the condition of higher education facilities.

(7) By August 1st of each even-numbered year each public four-year higher education institution shall prepare and submit prioritized lists of the individual projects proposed by the institution for the ensuing six-year period in each category. The lists must be submitted to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees. The four-year institutions may aggregate minor works project proposals by primary purpose for ranking purposes. Proposed minor works projects must be prioritized within the aggregated proposal, and supporting documentation, including project descriptions and cost estimates, must be provided to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees.

(8) For ((the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium and)) the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, by November 1, 2022, the office of financial management must score higher education capital project criteria with a rating scale that assesses how well a particular project satisfies those criteria. The office of financial management may not use a rating scale that weighs the importance of those criteria.

(9) For ((the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium and)) the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, pursuant to subsection (6)(a) of this section and in lieu of the requirements of subsection (7) of this section, by August 15, 2022, the institutions of higher education shall prepare and submit or resubmit to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees:

(a) Individual project proposals developed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;

(b) Individual project proposals scored in prior biennia pursuant to subsection (1) of this section; and

(c) A prioritized list of up to five project proposals submitted pursuant to (a) and (b) of this subsection.

(10) The requirements of this section are suspended during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium. However, instead of these requirements, the public four-year institutions of higher education must submit additional supporting information for major project funding requests for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium that is equivalent to the information produced for the 2022 higher education scoring process under subsection (9) of this section. Examples of the information required under this subsection include, but are not limited to, measures of: (a) Space efficiency, (b) reasonableness of project cost, (c) facility condition, and (d) anticipated impacts of the requested major projects on projected degree totals. The public four-year institutions of higher education shall consult with the office of financial management and legislative fiscal staff regarding the implementation of this requirement and the content of the additional information.

Sec. 8035. RCW 43.99N.060 and 2021 c 334 s 976 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The stadium and exhibition center account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the taxes imposed under RCW 82.14.0494 and distributions under RCW 67.70.240(1)(d) shall be deposited into the account. Only the director of the office of financial management or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. An appropriation is not required for expenditures from this account.

(2) Until bonds are issued under RCW 43.99N.020, up to ((five million dollars))$5,000,000 per year beginning January 1, 1999, shall be used for the purposes of subsection (3)(b) of this section, all remaining moneys in the account shall be transferred to the public stadium authority, created under RCW 36.102.020, to be used for public stadium authority operations and development of the stadium and exhibition center.

(3) After bonds are issued under RCW 43.99N.020, all moneys in the stadium and exhibition center account shall be used exclusively for the following purposes in the following priority:

(a) On or before June 30th of each year, the office of financial management shall accumulate in the stadium and exhibition center account an amount at least equal to the amount required in the next succeeding twelve months for the payment of principal of and interest on the bonds issued under RCW 43.99N.020;

(b) An additional reserve amount not in excess of the expected average annual principal and interest requirements of bonds issued under RCW 43.99N.020 shall be accumulated and maintained in the account, subject to withdrawal by the state treasurer at any time if necessary to meet the requirements of (a) of this subsection, and, following any withdrawal, reaccumulated from the first tax revenues and other amounts deposited in the account after meeting the requirements of (a) of this subsection; and

(c) The balance, if any, shall be transferred to the youth athletic facility account under subsection (4) of this section.

Any revenues derived from the taxes authorized by RCW 36.38.010(5) and 36.38.040 or other amounts that if used as provided under (a) and (b) of this subsection would cause the loss of any tax exemption under federal law for interest on bonds issued under RCW 43.99N.020 shall be deposited in and used exclusively for the purposes of the youth athletic facility account and shall not be used, directly or indirectly, as a source of payment of principal of or interest on bonds issued under RCW 43.99N.020, or to replace or reimburse other funds used for that purpose.

(4) Any moneys in the stadium and exhibition center account not required or permitted to be used for the purposes described in subsection (3)(a) and (b) of this section shall be deposited in the youth athletic facility account hereby created in the state treasury. Expenditures from the account may be used only for purposes of grants or loans to cities, counties, and qualified nonprofit organizations for community outdoor athletic facilities. Only the director of the recreation and conservation office or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures. The athletic facility grants or loans may be used for acquiring, developing, equipping, maintaining, and improving community outdoor athletic facilities. Funds shall be divided equally between the development of new community outdoor athletic facilities, the improvement of existing community outdoor athletic facilities, and the maintenance of existing community outdoor athletic facilities. Cities, counties, and qualified nonprofit organizations must submit proposals for grants or loans from the account. To the extent that funds are available, cities, counties, and qualified nonprofit organizations must meet eligibility criteria as established by the director of the recreation and conservation office. The grants and loans shall be awarded on a competitive application process and the amount of the grant or loan shall be in proportion to the population of the city or county for where the community outdoor athletic facility is located. Grants or loans awarded in any one year need not be distributed in that year. ((In the 2009-2011 biennium, if there are not enough project applications submitted in a category within the account to meet the requirement of equal distribution of funds to each category, the director of the recreation and conservation office may distribute any remaining funds to other categories within the account.)) The director of the recreation and conservation office may expend up to one and one-half percent of the moneys deposited in the account created in this subsection for administrative purposes. During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the youth athletic facility account to support a task force to consider ways to improve equitable access to K-12 schools' fields and athletic facilities and local parks agency facilities with the goal of increasing physical activity for youth and families. A portion of the appropriation must be used to inventory K-12 school fields and athletic facilities and park agency facilities.During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the director of the recreation and conservation office may expend up to four percent of the moneys deposited in the account created in this subsection for administrative purposes, and expenditures from the account may include grants and loans to political subdivisions of the state other than cities and counties as well as federally recognized Indian tribes.

Sec. 8036. RCW 43.155.050 and 2022 c 296 s 7009, 2022 c 182 s 302, and 2022 c 157 s 15 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The public works assistance account is hereby established in the state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance account shall be used to make loans and grants and to give financial guarantees to local governments for public works projects. Moneys in the account may also be appropriated or transferred to the water pollution control revolving fund and the drinking water assistance account to provide for state match requirements under federal law. Moneys in the account may be transferred to the move ahead WA account to provide support of public works projects funded in the move ahead WA program. Not more than 20 percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the public works board from this account may be expended or obligated for preconstruction loans and grants, emergency loans and grants, or loans and grants for capital facility planning under this chapter. Not more than 10 percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the public works board from this account may be expended or obligated as grants for preconstruction, emergency, capital facility planning, and construction projects. During the 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for activities related to rural economic development, the growth management act, the aviation revitalization loan program, the community economic revitalization board broadband program, and the voluntary stewardship program. During the 2021-2023 ((biennium))and 2023-2025 fiscal biennia, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for activities related to the community aviation revitalization board. During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the public works assistance account to the education legacy trust account. During the 2019-2021 and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the public works assistance account to the statewide broadband account. The legislature may appropriate moneys from the public works assistance account for activities related to the voluntary stewardship program, rural economic development, and the growth management act. During the 2021-2023 biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for projects identified in section 1033, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.

(2) For fiscal year 2024 through fiscal year 2038, the state treasurer must transfer from the public works assistance account to the move ahead WA account created in RCW 46.68.510 $57,000,000 each fiscal year in four equal quarterly transfers.

Sec. 8037. RCW 43.160.060 and 2014 c 112 s 108 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board is authorized to make direct loans to political subdivisions of the state and to federally recognized Indian tribes for the purposes of assisting the political subdivisions and federally recognized Indian tribes in financing the cost of public facilities, including development of land and improvements for public facilities, project-specific environmental, capital facilities, land use, permitting, feasibility, and marketing studies and plans; project design, site planning, and analysis; project debt and revenue impact analysis; as well as the construction, rehabilitation, alteration, expansion, or improvement of the facilities. A grant may also be authorized for purposes designated in this chapter, but only when, and to the extent that, a loan is not reasonably possible, given the limited resources of the political subdivision or the federally recognized Indian tribe and the finding by the board that financial circumstances require grant assistance to enable the project to move forward. However, no more than ((twenty-five))25 percent of all financial assistance approved by the board in any biennium may consist of grants to political subdivisions and federally recognized Indian tribes, except that rural broadband grants awarded during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium do not count toward the 25 percent limit on awarding assistance as grants.

(2) Application for funds must be made in the form and manner as the board may prescribe. In making grants or loans the board must conform to the following requirements:

(a) The board may not provide financial assistance:

(i) For a project the primary purpose of which is to facilitate or promote a retail shopping development or expansion.

(ii) For any project that evidence exists would result in a development or expansion that would displace existing jobs in any other community in the state.

(iii) For a project the primary purpose of which is to facilitate or promote gambling.

(iv) For a project located outside the jurisdiction of the applicant political subdivision or federally recognized Indian tribe.

(b) The board may only provide financial assistance:

(i) For a project demonstrating convincing evidence that a specific private development or expansion is ready to occur and will occur only if the public facility improvement is made that:

(A) Results in the creation of significant private sector jobs or significant private sector capital investment as determined by the board; and

(B) Will improve the opportunities for the successful maintenance, establishment, or expansion of industrial or commercial plants or will otherwise assist in the creation or retention of long-term economic opportunities;

(ii) For a project that cannot meet the requirement of (b)(i) of this subsection but is a project that:

(A) Results in the creation of significant private sector jobs or significant private sector capital investment as determined by the board;

(B) Is part of a local economic development plan consistent with applicable state planning requirements;

(C) Can demonstrate project feasibility using standard economic principles; and

(D) Is located in a rural community as defined by the board, or a rural county;

(iii) For site-specific plans, studies, and analyses that address environmental impacts, capital facilities, land use, permitting, feasibility, marketing, project engineering, design, site planning, and project debt and revenue impacts, as grants not to exceed fifty thousand dollars.

(c) The board must develop guidelines for local participation and allowable match and activities.

(d) An application must demonstrate local match and local participation, in accordance with guidelines developed by the board.

(e) An application must be approved by the political subdivision and supported by the local associate development organization or local workforce development council or approved by the governing body of the federally recognized Indian tribe.

(f) The board may allow de minimis general system improvements to be funded if they are critically linked to the viability of the project.

(g) An application must demonstrate convincing evidence that the median hourly wage of the private sector jobs created after the project is completed will exceed the countywide median hourly wage.

(h) The board must prioritize each proposed project according to:

(i) The relative benefits provided to the community by the jobs the project would create, not just the total number of jobs it would create after the project is completed, but also giving consideration to the unemployment rate in the area in which the jobs would be located;

(ii) The rate of return of the state's investment, including, but not limited to, the leveraging of private sector investment, anticipated job creation and retention, and expected increases in state and local tax revenues associated with the project;

(iii) Whether the proposed project offers a health insurance plan for employees that includes an option for dependents of employees;

(iv) Whether the public facility investment will increase existing capacity necessary to accommodate projected population and employment growth in a manner that supports infill and redevelopment of existing urban or industrial areas that are served by adequate public facilities. Projects should maximize the use of existing infrastructure and provide for adequate funding of necessary transportation improvements;

(v) Whether the applicant's permitting process has been certified as streamlined by the office of regulatory assistance; and

(vi) Whether the applicant has developed and adhered to guidelines regarding its permitting process for those applying for development permits consistent with section 1(2), chapter 231, Laws of 2007.

(i) A responsible official of the political subdivision or the federally recognized Indian tribe must be present during board deliberations and provide information that the board requests.

(3) Before any financial assistance application is approved, the political subdivision or the federally recognized Indian tribe seeking the assistance must demonstrate to the community economic revitalization board that no other timely source of funding is available to it at costs reasonably similar to financing available from the community economic revitalization board.

(4) During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the board may award broadband grants in accordance with state appropriations and requirements for the broadband equity, access, and deployment program in section 60102 of P.L. 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act) and section 1002, chapter . . ., Laws of 2023 (section 1002 of this act).

Sec. 8038. RCW 43.185.050 and 2021 c 332 s 7032 and 2021 c 130 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The department must use moneys from the housing trust fund and other legislative appropriations to finance in whole or in part any loans or grant projects that will provide housing for persons and families with special housing needs and with incomes at or below ((fifty))50 percent of the median family income for the county or standard metropolitan statistical area where the project is located. At least ((thirty))30 percent of these moneys used in any given funding cycle must be for the benefit of projects located in rural areas of the state as defined by the department. If the department determines that it has not received an adequate number of suitable applications for rural projects during any given funding cycle, the department may allocate unused moneys for projects in nonrural areas of the state.

(2) Activities eligible for assistance from the housing trust fund and other legislative appropriations include, but are not limited to:

(a) New construction, rehabilitation, or acquisition of low and very low-income housing units;

(b) Rent subsidies;

(c) Matching funds for social services directly related to providing housing for special-need tenants in assisted projects;

(d) Technical assistance, design and finance services and consultation, and administrative costs for eligible nonprofit community or neighborhood-based organizations;

(e) Administrative costs for housing assistance groups or organizations when such grant or loan will substantially increase the recipient's access to housing funds other than those available under this chapter;

(f) Shelters and related services for the homeless, including emergency shelters and overnight youth shelters;

(g) Mortgage subsidies, including temporary rental and mortgage payment subsidies to prevent homelessness;

(h) Mortgage insurance guarantee or payments for eligible projects;

(i) Down payment or closing cost assistance for eligible first-time home buyers;

(j) Acquisition of housing units for the purpose of preservation as low-income or very low-income housing;

(k) Projects making housing more accessible to families with members who have disabilities; and

(l) Remodeling and improvements as required to meet building code, licensing requirements, or legal operations to residential properties owned and operated by an entity eligible under RCW 43.185A.040, which were transferred as described in RCW 82.45.010(3)(t) by the parent of a child with developmental disabilities.

(3) Preference must be given for projects that include an early learning facility, as defined in RCW 43.31.565.

(4) Legislative appropriations from capital bond proceeds may be used only for the costs of projects authorized under subsection (2)(a), (i), and (j) of this section, and not for the administrative costs of the department, except that during the 2021-2023 and 2023-2025 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, the department may use up to three percent of the appropriations from capital bond proceeds for administrative costs associated with application, distribution, and project development activities of the housing assistance program.

(5) Moneys from repayment of loans from appropriations from capital bond proceeds may be used for all activities necessary for the proper functioning of the housing assistance program except for activities authorized under subsection (2)(b) and (c) of this section.

(6) Administrative costs associated with application, distribution, and project development activities of the department may not exceed three percent of the annual funds available for the housing assistance program. Reappropriations must not be included in the calculation of the annual funds available for determining the administrative costs.

(7) Administrative costs associated with compliance and monitoring activities of the department may not exceed one-quarter of one percent annually of the contracted amount of state investment in the housing assistance program.

Sec. 8039. RCW 87.03.136 and 2011 c 50 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

An irrigation district has the power to sell or lease real property owned by the district whenever its board of directors, by resolution: Determines that the property is not necessary or needed for the use of the district; and authorizes the sale or lease. Notice of the district's intention to sell or lease the property shall be made by publication at least ((twenty))20 days before the transaction is executed regarding the property in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the property or part of the property is located or, if there is no such newspaper in the county, in a newspaper of general circulation published in an adjoining county. The publication shall be made at least once a week during three consecutive weeks. The notice shall state whether the sale or lease will be negotiated by the district or will be awarded by bid.

The district may lease the property for a duration determined by the board, afford the lessee the option to purchase the property, sell the property on contract for deferred payments, sell the property pursuant to a promissory note secured by a mortgage or deed of trust, or sell the property for cash and conveyance by deed. The appropriate documents shall be executed by the president of the board and acknowledged by the secretary.

The resolution authorizing the sale or lease shall be entered in the minutes of the board and shall fix the price at which the lease, option, or sale may be made. The price shall be not less than the reasonable market value of the property; however, the board may, without consideration, dedicate, grant, or convey district land or easements in district land for highway or public utility purposes that convenience the inhabitants of the district if the board deems that the action will enhance the value of the remaining district land to an extent equal to or greater than the value of the land or easement dedicated, granted, or conveyed.

During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the limitations under this section on the power of an irrigation district to sell or lease real property owned by the district do not apply to property transferred to the bureau of reclamation or to a public owner under section 3080, chapter . . ., Laws of 2023 (section 3080 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8040. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8041. Section 8038 of this act takes effect if Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5301 (concerning housing programs administered by the department of commerce), is not enacted by June 30, 2023.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8042. Except for section 8038 of this act, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

(End of part)

--- END ---