BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9A.42.100 and 2005 c 218 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

A person is guilty of the crime of endangerment with a controlled substance if the person knowingly or intentionally permits a dependent child or dependent adult to be exposed to, ingest, inhale, or have contact with ((methamphetamine))any controlled substance as defined in RCW 69.50.101 or ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or anhydrous ammonia, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, that are being used in the manufacture of methamphetamine, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers. Endangerment with a controlled substance is a class B felony.

Sec. 2. RCW 9.94A.518 and 2022 c 16 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

TABLE 4

DRUG OFFENSES

INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

III

Any felony offense under chapter 69.50 RCW with a deadly weapon special verdict under RCW 9.94A.825

Controlled Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Create or deliver a counterfeit controlled substance (RCW 69.50.4011(1)(a))

Deliver or possess with intent to deliver methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(2)(b))

Delivery of imitation controlled substance by person eighteen or over to person under eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Involving a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.4015)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to deliver amphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(2)(b))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(2)(a))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or V or nonnarcotics form Schedule I-V (except marijuana, amphetamine, methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(2) (c) through (e))

Manufacture of methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(2)(b))

Over 18 and deliver heroin, methamphetamine, a narcotic from Schedule I or II, or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)

Over 18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or a nonnarcotic, except flunitrazepam or methamphetamine, from Schedule I-V to someone under 18 ((and 3 years junior)) (RCW 69.50.406)

Possession of Ephedrine, Pseudoephedrine, or Anhydrous Ammonia with intent to manufacture methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Selling for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

II

((Create, deliver, or possess a counterfeit controlled substance (RCW 69.50.4011)

Deliver or possess with intent to deliver methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(2)(b))))

Delivery of a material in lieu of a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.4012)

Maintaining a Dwelling or Place for Controlled Substances (RCW 69.50.402(1)(f))

((Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to deliver amphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(2)(b))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(2)(a))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V (except cannabis as defined in RCW 69.50.101, amphetamine, methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(2) (c) through (e))))

Manufacture, distribute, or possess with intent to distribute an imitation controlled substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

Possess a counterfeit controlled substance (RCW 69.50.4011(1)(b))

I

Forged Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged Prescription for a Controlled Substance (RCW 69.50.403)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to deliver cannabis as defined in RCW 69.50.101 (RCW 69.50.401(2)(c))

Possess Controlled Substance that is a Narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or Nonnarcotic from Schedule I-V (RCW 69.50.4013)

Possession of Controlled Substance that is either heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or II (RCW 69.50.4013)

Unlawful Use of Building for Drug Purposes (RCW 69.53.010)

Sec. 3. RCW 69.50.406 and 2019 c 379 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person eighteen years of age or over who violates RCW 69.50.401 by distributing a controlled substance listed in Schedules I or II which is a narcotic drug or methamphetamine, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, or flunitrazepam, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, listed in Schedule IV, to a person under eighteen years of age is guilty of a class A felony punishable by the fine authorized by RCW 69.50.401(2) (a) or (b), by a term of imprisonment of up to twice that authorized by RCW 69.50.401(2) (a) or (b), or by both.

(2) Except as provided in RCW 69.50.475, any person eighteen years of age or over who violates RCW 69.50.401 by distributing any other controlled substance listed in Schedules I, II, III, IV, and V to a person under eighteen years of age ((who is at least three years his or her junior)) is guilty of a class B felony punishable by the fine authorized by RCW 69.50.401(2) (c), (d), or (e), by a term of imprisonment up to twice that authorized by RCW 69.50.401(2) (c), (d), or (e), or both.

(3) Any person convicted under this section shall receive a mandatory term of confinement of not less than seven years.

Sec. 4. RCW 69.50.4011 and 2003 c 53 s 332 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as authorized by this chapter, it is unlawful for any person to ((create,)):

(a) Create or deliver((, or possess)) a counterfeit substance; or

(b) Possess a counterfeit substance.

(2) Any person who violates this section with respect to:

(a) A counterfeit substance classified in Schedule I or II which is a narcotic drug, or flunitrazepam classified in Schedule IV, is guilty of a class B felony and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than ten years, fined not more than twenty-five thousand dollars, or both;

(b) A counterfeit substance which is methamphetamine, is guilty of a class B felony and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than ten years, fined not more than twenty-five thousand dollars, or both;

(c) Any other counterfeit substance classified in Schedule I, II, or III, is guilty of a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW;

(d) A counterfeit substance classified in Schedule IV, except flunitrazepam, is guilty of a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW;

(e) A counterfeit substance classified in Schedule V, is guilty of a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

Sec. 5. RCW 69.50.410 and 2022 c 16 s 90 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as authorized by this chapter it is a class ((C))B felony for any person to sell for profit any controlled substance or counterfeit substance classified in Schedule I, RCW 69.50.204, except leaves and flowering tops of cannabis.

For the purposes of this section only, the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings:

(a) "To sell" means the passing of title and possession of a controlled substance from the seller to the buyer for a price whether or not the price is paid immediately or at a future date.

(b) "For profit" means the obtaining of anything of value in exchange for a controlled substance.

(c) "Price" means anything of value.

(2)(a) Any person convicted of a violation of subsection (1) of this section shall receive a sentence of not more than five years in a correctional facility of the department of social and health services for the first offense.

(b) Any person convicted on a second or subsequent cause, the sale having transpired after prosecution and conviction on the first cause, of subsection (1) of this section shall receive a mandatory sentence of five years in a correctional facility of the department of social and health services and no judge of any court shall suspend or defer the sentence imposed for the second or subsequent violation of subsection (1) of this section.

(3)(a) Any person convicted of a violation of subsection (1) of this section by selling heroin shall receive a mandatory sentence of two years in a correctional facility of the department of social and health services and no judge of any court shall suspend or defer the sentence imposed for such violation.

(b) Any person convicted on a second or subsequent sale of heroin, the sale having transpired after prosecution and conviction on the first cause of the sale of heroin shall receive a mandatory sentence of ten years in a correctional facility of the department of social and health services and no judge of any court shall suspend or defer the sentence imposed for this second or subsequent violation: PROVIDED, That the indeterminate sentence review board under RCW 9.95.040 shall not reduce the minimum term imposed for a violation under this subsection.

(4) Whether or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence under this section may be granted an extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(1)(c).

(5) In addition to the sentences provided in subsection (2) of this section, any person convicted of a violation of subsection (1) of this section shall be fined in an amount calculated to at least eliminate any and all proceeds or profits directly or indirectly gained by such person as a result of sales of controlled substances in violation of the laws of this or other states, or the United States, up to the amount of five hundred thousand dollars on each count.

(6) Any person, addicted to the use of controlled substances, who voluntarily applies to the department of social and health services for the purpose of participating in a rehabilitation program approved by the department for addicts of controlled substances shall be immune from prosecution for subsection (1) offenses unless a filing of an information or indictment against such person for a violation of subsection (1) of this section is made prior to his or her voluntary participation in the program of the department of social and health services. All applications for immunity under this section shall be sent to the department of social and health services in Olympia. It shall be the duty of the department to stamp each application received pursuant to this section with the date and time of receipt.

(7) This section shall not apply to offenses defined and punishable under the provisions of RCW 69.50.401 through 69.50.4015.

Sec. 6. RCW 69.50.4015 and 2003 c 53 s 336 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful to compensate, threaten, solicit, or in any other manner involve a person under the age of eighteen years in a transaction unlawfully to manufacture, sell, or deliver a controlled substance.

(2) A violation of this section is a class ((C))B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

--- END ---