BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature intends to repeal the statutory authority directing the department of ecology to adopt California motor vehicle emissions standards. The legislature finds that significant federal and state government action has occurred subsequent to enactment of that law that will reduce transportation sector emissions. In 2021, the federal government has adopted new corporate average fuel economy standards that will reduce greenhouse gas emissions 33 percent over 2021 emissions. In 2021, the president of the United States also signed an executive order to set a target that electric vehicles represent one-half of new vehicles sold in 2030, with automakers voluntarily announcing they would position the United States auto market to reach a 40 percent to 50 percent electric vehicle sales share in 2030. In 2022, the federal government enacted the inflation reduction act that provides significant tax credits to consumers who buy new and used zero emission cars and trucks. The federal government has also provided substantial funds for the build out of electric vehicle infrastructure. Finally, the state of Washington has enacted a clean fuel program to reduce the carbon intensity of vehicle fuels by 20 percent by 2035. Therefore, with federal government action to incentivize electric vehicle purchases, federal regulations to make the remaining liquid fuel vehicles dramatically more fuel efficient, and state regulations to reduce the carbon intensity of liquid fuels, a freedom restricting state mandate on the types of vehicles consumers will be allowed to purchase in Washington is not needed to drive down transportation sector emissions significantly. With these policies in place to reduce transportation sector emissions, the legislature finds that the previously enacted law requiring adoption of California vehicle emissions standards should be repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 70A.30.010 (Department of ecology to adopt rules to implement California motor vehicle emission standards) and 2020 c 143 s 1, 2020 c 20 s 1366, 2010 c 76 s 1, & 2005 c 295 s 2; and

(2) RCW 70A.30.030 (New vehicle greenhouse gas emissions disclosure—Rule-making authority) and 2020 c 143 s 2, 2014 c 76 s 8, & 2008 c 32 s 2.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 70A.15 RCW to read as follows:

Nothing in this chapter may be interpreted to provide authority to the department to adopt any motor vehicle emissions standard of the state of California.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act takes effect January 1, 2024.

--- END ---