BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The sentencing guidelines commission shall study public transparency in the criminal plea negotiation process.

(2) The sentencing guidelines commission shall:

(a) Identify how often plea negotiations are used to resolve criminal charges;

(b) Identify methods to improve public transparency for victims and their families during the criminal justice process; and

(c) Analyze methods used by other states to provide opportunities for victim participation in or observation of plea negotiations.

(3) To achieve the purposes provided in subsection (2) of this section the sentencing guidelines commission may consult with affected stakeholders, including crime victims, prosecuting attorneys, defense attorneys, law enforcement representatives, and any other stakeholders the commission deems appropriate.

(4) By December 13, 2024, the sentencing guidelines commission shall submit a final report in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, including findings and recommendations, to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(5) This section expires December 31, 2024.

--- END ---