BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 64.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1) An association of apartment owners may not adopt or enforce a restriction, covenant, condition, bylaw, rule, regulation, provision of a governing document, or master deed provision that effectively prohibits, unreasonably restricts, or limits, directly or indirectly, the use of an apartment as a licensed family home child care operated by a family day care provider or as a licensed child day care center.

(2) Nothing in this section prohibits an association from imposing reasonable regulations on a family home child care or a child day care center including, but not limited to, architectural standards, as long as those regulations are identical to those applied to all other apartments within the same association as the family home child care or the child day care center.

(3) An association of apartment owners that willfully violates this section is liable to the family day care provider or the child day care center for actual damages, and shall pay a civil penalty to the family day care provider or the child day care center in an amount not to exceed $1,000.

(4) For the purposes of this section, the terms "family day care provider" and "child day care center" have the same meanings as in RCW 43.216.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 64.34 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A unit owners' association may not adopt or enforce a restriction, covenant, condition, bylaw, rule, regulation, provision of a governing document, or master deed provision that effectively prohibits, unreasonably restricts, or limits, directly or indirectly, the use of a unit as a licensed family home child care operated by a family day care provider or as a licensed child day care center.

(2) Nothing in this section prohibits an association from imposing reasonable regulations on a family home child care or a child day care center including, but not limited to, architectural standards, as long as those regulations are identical to those applied to all other units within the same association as the family home child care or the child day care center.

(3) A unit owners' association that willfully violates this section is liable to the family day care provider or the child day care center for actual damages, and shall pay a civil penalty to the family day care provider or the child day care center in an amount not to exceed $1,000.

(4) For the purposes of this section, the terms "family day care provider" and "child day care center" have the same meanings as in RCW 43.216.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A homeowners' association may not adopt or enforce a restriction, covenant, condition, bylaw, rule, regulation, provision of a governing document, or master deed provision that effectively prohibits, unreasonably restricts, or limits, directly or indirectly, the use of a lot as a licensed family home child care operated by a family day care provider or as a licensed child day care center.

(2) Nothing in this section prohibits an association from imposing reasonable regulations on a family home child care or a child day care center including, but not limited to, architectural standards, as long as those regulations are identical to those applied to all other lots within the same association as the family home child care or the child day care center.

(3) A homeowners' association that willfully violates this section is liable to the family day care provider or the child day care center for actual damages, and shall pay a civil penalty to the family day care provider or the child day care center in an amount not to exceed $1,000.

(4) For the purposes of this section, the terms "family day care provider" and "child day care center" have the same meanings as in RCW 43.216.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 64.90 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A unit owners association may not adopt or enforce a restriction, covenant, condition, bylaw, rule, regulation, provision of a governing document, or master deed provision that effectively prohibits, unreasonably restricts, or limits, directly or indirectly, the use of a unit as a licensed family home child care operated by a family day care provider or as a licensed child day care center.

(2) Nothing in this section prohibits an association from imposing reasonable regulations on a family home child care or a child day care center including, but not limited to, architectural standards, as long as those regulations are identical to those applied to all other units within the same association as the family home child care or the child day care center.

(3) A unit owners association that willfully violates this section is liable to the family day care provider or the child day care center for actual damages, and shall pay a civil penalty to the family day care provider or the child day care center in an amount not to exceed $1,000.

(4) For the purposes of this section, the terms "family day care provider" and "child day care center" have the same meanings as in RCW 43.216.010.

--- END ---