BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.17.130 and 2010 c 161 s 514 are each amended to read as follows:

Before accepting an application for a certificate of title, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall require an applicant to pay a ((sixty-five dollar))$65 inspection fee if an inspection of the vehicle was completed by the Washington state patrol. The inspection fee must be distributed under RCW ((46.68.020))46.68.410.

Sec. 2. RCW 46.68.410 and 2022 c 186 s 706 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1))) The vehicle identification number inspection fee collected under RCW 46.17.130 must be distributed ((as follows:

(a) $15)) to the state patrol highway account created in RCW 46.68.030((; and

(b) $50 to the motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070.

(2) During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the entire vehicle identification number inspection fee collected under RCW 46.17.130 must be distributed to the state patrol highway account created in RCW 46.68.030)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2023.

--- END ---