BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 69.50.360 and 2022 c 16 s 72 are each amended to read as follows:

The following acts, when performed by a validly licensed cannabis retailer or employee of a validly licensed retail outlet in compliance with rules adopted by the board to implement and enforce chapter 3, Laws of 2013, do not constitute criminal or civil offenses under Washington state law:

(1) Purchase and receipt of cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, or cannabis-infused products that have been properly packaged and labeled from a cannabis processor validly licensed under this chapter;

(2) Possession of quantities of cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, or cannabis-infused products that do not exceed the maximum amounts established by the board under RCW 69.50.345(5);

(3) Delivery, distribution, and sale, on the premises of the retail outlet, of any combination of the following amounts of cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, or cannabis-infused product to any person ((twenty-one))21 years of age or older:

(a) One ounce of useable cannabis;

(b) ((Sixteen))16 ounces of cannabis-infused product in solid form;

(c) ((Seventy-two))72 ounces of cannabis-infused product in liquid form unless the cannabis-infused product in liquid form is packaged in individual units containing no more than four milligrams of THC per unit; ((or))

(d) 200 milligrams of THC within a cannabis-infused product in liquid form if the product is packaged in individual units containing no more than four milligrams of THC per unit; or

(e) Seven grams of cannabis concentrate; and

(4) Purchase and receipt of cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, or cannabis-infused products that have been properly packaged and labeled from a federally recognized Indian tribe as permitted under an agreement between the state and the tribe entered into under RCW 43.06.490.

Sec. 2. RCW 69.50.4013 and 2023 sp.s. c 1 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise authorized by this chapter, it is unlawful for any person to:

(a) Knowingly possess a controlled substance unless the substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to, a valid prescription or order of a practitioner while acting in the course of his or her professional practice; or

(b) Knowingly use a controlled substance in a public place, unless the substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to, a valid prescription or order of a practitioner while acting in the course of his or her professional practice.

(2)(a) Except as provided in RCW 69.50.4014 or 69.50.445, a violation of subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section is a gross misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment of up to 180 days in jail, or by a fine of not more than $1,000, or by both such imprisonment and fine, however, if the defendant has two or more prior convictions under subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section occurring after July 1, 2023, a violation of subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section is punishable by imprisonment for up to 364 days, or by a fine of not more than $1,000, or by both such imprisonment and fine. The prosecutor is encouraged to divert such cases for assessment, treatment, or other services.

(b) No person may be charged under both subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section relating to the same course of conduct.

(c) In lieu of jail booking and referral to the prosecutor, law enforcement is encouraged to offer a referral to assessment and services available under RCW 10.31.110 or other program or entity responsible for receiving referrals in lieu of legal system involvement, which may include, but are not limited to, arrest and jail alternative programs established under RCW 36.28A.450, law enforcement assisted diversion programs established under RCW 71.24.589, and the recovery navigator program established under RCW 71.24.115.

(3)(a) The possession, by a person 21 years of age or older, of useable cannabis, cannabis concentrates, or cannabis-infused products in amounts that do not exceed those set forth in RCW 69.50.360(3) is not a violation of this section, this chapter, or any other provision of Washington state law.

(b) The possession of cannabis, useable cannabis, cannabis concentrates, and cannabis-infused products being physically transported or delivered within the state, in amounts not exceeding those that may be established under RCW 69.50.385(3), by a licensed employee of a common carrier when performing the duties authorized in accordance with RCW 69.50.382 and 69.50.385, is not a violation of this section, this chapter, or any other provision of Washington state law.

(4)(a) The delivery by a person 21 years of age or older to one or more persons 21 years of age or older, during a single 24 hour period, for noncommercial purposes and not conditioned upon or done in connection with the provision or receipt of financial consideration, of any of the following cannabis products, is not a violation of this section, this chapter, or any other provisions of Washington state law:

(i) One-half ounce of useable cannabis;

(ii) Eight ounces of cannabis-infused product in solid form;

(iii) 36 ounces of cannabis-infused product in liquid form unless the cannabis-infused product in liquid form is packaged in individual units containing no more than four milligrams of THC per unit; ((or))

(iv) 100 milligrams of THC within a cannabis-infused product in liquid form if the product is packaged in individual units containing no more than four milligrams of THC per unit; or

(v) Three and one-half grams of cannabis concentrates.

(b) The act of delivering cannabis or a cannabis product as authorized under this subsection (4) must meet one of the following requirements:

(i) The delivery must be done in a location outside of the view of general public and in a nonpublic place; or

(ii) The cannabis or cannabis product must be in the original packaging as purchased from the cannabis retailer.

(5) No person under 21 years of age may manufacture, sell, distribute, or knowingly possess cannabis, cannabis-infused products, or cannabis concentrates, regardless of THC concentration. This does not include qualifying patients with a valid authorization.

(6) The possession by a qualifying patient or designated provider of cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, cannabis-infused products, or plants in accordance with chapter 69.51A RCW is not a violation of this section, this chapter, or any other provision of Washington state law.

(7) For the purposes of this section, "public place" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 66.04.010, but the exclusions in RCW 66.04.011 do not apply.

(8) For the purposes of this section, "use a controlled substance" means to introduce the substance into the human body by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means.

--- END ---