BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) Washington state ports were created to preserve public ownership of public resources, giving local governments the ability and statutory authority to support economic development for the public benefit.

(2) The legislature finds and declares that Washington public port districts that carry out or seek to carry out operations involving the movement of cargo or passengers are a vital part of the economy and trade infrastructure within the state.

(3) The legislature further finds that there is an important public purpose for qualified cargo and passenger ports to coordinate, reach agreement on, and implement all actions under their authority with other qualified cargo and passenger ports. The legislature intends by this act to grant qualified cargo and passenger ports with the authority to operate in furtherance of this public purpose, including the specified powers granted in this act relating to cargo and passenger transportation, without liability under federal antitrust laws.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 53.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) For the purpose of this section, "qualified cargo and passenger port" means a Washington public port district that carries out or seeks to carry out operations involving the movement of cargo or passengers or both.

(2) Qualified cargo and passenger ports have the power to coordinate, reach agreement on, and implement all actions under their authority with other qualified cargo and passenger ports. This includes the power to meet with qualified cargo and passenger ports and other port authorities to discuss and agree on issues of mutual interest relating to maritime operations, including:

(a) Rates and charges to be assessed at the qualified cargo and passenger ports;

(b) Rules, practices, and procedures relating to cargo and passenger service operations;

(c) Matters concerning the planning, development, management, marketing, operation, and use of their facilities; and

(d) Any other matters relating to cargo and passenger service operations.

--- END ---