BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.384.040 and 2018 c 275 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The statewide tourism marketing account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from tax revenues under RCW 82.08.225 must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for expenditures of the department that are related to implementation of a statewide tourism marketing program and operation of the authority. A ((two-to-one))one-to-one nonstate or state fund, other than general fund state, match must be provided for all expenditures from the account. A match may consist of nonstate or state fund, other than general fund state, cash contributions deposited in the private local account created under RCW 43.384.020(4), the value of an advertising equivalency contribution, or an in-kind contribution. The board must determine criteria for what qualifies as an in-kind contribution.

Sec. 2. RCW 82.08.225 and 2018 c 275 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1))) Beginning July 1, 2018, 0.2 percent of taxes collected pursuant to RCW 82.08.020(1) on retail sales of lodging, car rentals, and restaurants must be deposited into the statewide tourism marketing account created in RCW 43.384.040. ((Except as provided otherwise for fiscal year 2019 in subsection (2) of this section, future))Future revenue collections under this section may be up to ((three million dollars))$9,000,000 per biennium and must be deposited into the statewide tourism marketing account created in RCW 43.384.040. The deposit under this subsection to the statewide tourism marketing account may only occur if the legislature authorizes the deposit in the biennial omnibus appropriations act.

(((2) For fiscal year 2019, up to a maximum of one million five hundred thousand dollars must be deposited in the statewide tourism marketing account created in RCW 43.384.040. The deposit under this subsection to the statewide tourism marketing account may only occur if the legislature authorizes the deposit in the biennial omnibus appropriations act.))

--- END ---