BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that promoting career awareness, exploration, and preparation is important for all students as they progress through their educational experiences. This promotion is consistent with ongoing legislative efforts to create an education system focused on individualized student learning that is relevant and culturally responsive to Washington's diverse student population, and empowers students to make progress towards their own education and career goals.

(2) The legislature finds also that the promotion of a consistent and equitable continuum of career development supports is fostered by a system that helps to guide each student's career and college exploration and preparation efforts. This system should include access to an online course and goal planning platform that allows each student to work with teachers, parents or guardians, school counselors, and other adults who support their academic progress and career development. This platform should allow students, in partnership with these supportive adults, to develop meaningful high school and beyond plans that promote the attainment of their career and college goals.

(3) The legislature recognizes the need for a uniform, online high school and beyond plan platform that enables students and others to understand the steps needed to meet graduation requirements and to prepare for postsecondary education and training. A statewide high school and beyond plan platform can also ensure that qualified adults who support students can have access to applicable information as they guide students' high school experiences and assist in preparing students for postsecondary education or training and career engagement.

(4) The legislature, therefore, intends to revise and strengthen high school and beyond plan requirements and to direct the office of the superintendent of public instruction to facilitate the transition to and adoption of a statewide online platform for high school and beyond plans to guide students' secondary education experiences and ensure preparation for their postsecondary plans.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.230.090 and 2021 c 307 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The state board of education shall establish high school graduation requirements or equivalencies for students, except as provided in RCW 28A.230.122 and 28A.655.250 and except those equivalencies established by local high schools or school districts under RCW 28A.230.097. The purpose of a high school diploma is to declare that a student is ready for success in postsecondary education, gainful employment, and citizenship, and is equipped with the skills to be a lifelong learner.

(a) Any course in Washington state history and government used to fulfill high school graduation requirements shall consider including information on the culture, history, and government of the American Indian peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state.

(b) Except as provided otherwise in this subsection, the certificate of academic achievement requirements under RCW 28A.655.061 or the certificate of individual achievement requirements under RCW 28A.155.045 are required for graduation from a public high school but are not the only requirements for graduation. The requirement to earn a certificate of academic achievement to qualify for graduation from a public high school concludes with the graduating class of 2019. The obligation of qualifying students to earn a certificate of individual achievement as a prerequisite for graduation from a public high school concludes with the graduating class of 2021.

(c)(((i))) Each student must have a high school and beyond plan to guide the student's high school experience and inform course taking that is aligned with the student's goals for education or training and career after high school((.

(ii)(A) A high school and beyond plan must be initiated for each student during the seventh or eighth grade. In preparation for initiating that plan, each student must first be administered a career interest and skills inventory.

(B) For students with an individualized education program, the high school and beyond plan must be developed in alignment with their individualized education program. The high school and beyond plan must be developed in a similar manner and with similar school personnel as for all other students.

(iii)(A) The high school and beyond plan must be updated to reflect high school assessment results in RCW 28A.655.070(3)(b) and to review transcripts, assess progress toward identified goals, and revised as necessary for changing interests, goals, and needs. The plan must identify available interventions and academic support, courses, or both, that are designed for students who are not on track to graduate, to enable them to fulfill high school graduation requirements. Each student's high school and beyond plan must be updated to inform junior year course taking.

(B) For students with an individualized education program, the high school and beyond plan must be updated in alignment with their school to postschool transition plan. The high school and beyond plan must be updated in a similar manner and with similar school personnel as for all other students.

(iv) School districts are encouraged to involve parents and guardians in the process of developing and updating the high school and beyond plan, and the plan must be provided to the students' parents or guardians in their native language if that language is one of the two most frequently spoken non-English languages of students in the district. Nothing in this subsection (1)(c)(iv) prevents districts from providing high school and beyond plans to parents and guardians in additional languages that are not required by this subsection.

(v) All high school and beyond plans must, at a minimum, include the following elements:

(A) Identification of career goals, aided by a skills and interest assessment;

(B) Identification of educational goals;

(C) Identification of dual credit programs and the opportunities they create for students, including eligibility for automatic enrollment in advanced classes under RCW 28A.320.195, career and technical education programs, running start programs, AP courses, international baccalaureate programs, and college in the high school programs;

(D) Information about the college bound scholarship program established in chapter 28B.118 RCW;

(E) A four-year plan for course taking that:

(I) Includes information about options for satisfying state and local graduation requirements;

(II) Satisfies state and local graduation requirements;

(III) Aligns with the student's secondary and postsecondary goals, which can include education, training, and career;

(IV) Identifies course sequences to inform academic acceleration, as described in RCW 28A.320.195 that include dual credit courses or programs and are aligned with the student's goals; and

(V) Includes information about the college bound scholarship program, the Washington college grant, and other scholarship opportunities;

(F) Evidence that the student has received the following information on federal and state financial aid programs that help pay for the costs of a postsecondary program:

(I) Information about the documentation necessary for completing the applications; application timeliness and submission deadlines; the importance of submitting applications early; information specific to students who are or have been in foster care; information specific to students who are, or are at risk of being, homeless; information specific to students whose family member or guardians will be required to provide financial and tax information necessary to complete applications; and

(II) Opportunities to participate in sessions that assist students and, when necessary, their family members or guardians, fill out financial aid applications; and

(G) By the end of the twelfth grade, a current resume or activity log that provides a written compilation of the student's education, any work experience, and any community service and how the school district has recognized the community service pursuant to RCW 28A.320.193.))

(((d) Any decision on whether a student has met the state board's high school graduation requirements for a high school and beyond plan shall remain at the local level. Effective with the graduating class of 2015, the state board of education may not establish a requirement for students to complete a culminating project for graduation. A district may establish additional, local requirements for a high school and beyond plan to serve the needs and interests of its students and the purposes of this section.

(e)))that meets the requirements established in section 3 of this act.

(d)(i) The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement the career and college ready graduation requirement proposal adopted under board resolution on November 10, 2010, and revised on January 9, 2014, to take effect beginning with the graduating class of 2019 or as otherwise provided in this subsection (1)(((e)))(d). The rules must include authorization for a school district to waive up to two credits for individual students based on a student's circumstances, provided that none of the waived credits are identified as mandatory core credits by the state board of education. School districts must adhere to written policies authorizing the waivers that must be adopted by each board of directors of a school district that grants diplomas. The rules must also provide that the content of the third credit of mathematics and the content of the third credit of science may be chosen by the student based on the student's interests and high school and beyond plan with agreement of the student's parent or guardian or agreement of the school counselor or principal, or as provided in RCW 28A.230.300(4).

(ii) School districts may apply to the state board of education for a waiver to implement the career and college ready graduation requirement proposal beginning with the graduating class of 2020 or 2021 instead of the graduating class of 2019. In the application, a school district must describe why the waiver is being requested, the specific impediments preventing timely implementation, and efforts that will be taken to achieve implementation with the graduating class proposed under the waiver. The state board of education shall grant a waiver under this subsection (1)(((e)))(d) to an applying school district at the next subsequent meeting of the board after receiving an application.

(((iii) A school district must update the high school and beyond plans for each student who has not earned a score of level 3 or level 4 on the middle school mathematics assessment identified in RCW 28A.655.070 by ninth grade, to ensure that the student takes a mathematics course in both ninth and tenth grades. This course may include career and technical education equivalencies in mathematics adopted pursuant to RCW 28A.230.097.))

(2)(a) In recognition of the statutory authority of the state board of education to establish and enforce minimum high school graduation requirements, the state board shall periodically reevaluate the graduation requirements and shall report such findings to the legislature in a timely manner as determined by the state board.

(b) The state board shall reevaluate the graduation requirements for students enrolled in vocationally intensive and rigorous career and technical education programs, particularly those programs that lead to a certificate or credential that is state or nationally recognized. The purpose of the evaluation is to ensure that students enrolled in these programs have sufficient opportunity to ((earn a certificate of academic achievement,)) complete the program and earn the program's certificate or credential, and complete other state and local graduation requirements.

(c) The state board shall forward any proposed changes to the high school graduation requirements to the education committees of the legislature for review. The legislature shall have the opportunity to act during a regular legislative session before the changes are adopted through administrative rule by the state board. Changes that have a fiscal impact on school districts, as identified by a fiscal analysis prepared by the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall take effect only if formally authorized and funded by the legislature through the omnibus appropriations act or other enacted legislation.

(d) The state board of education may not require students to complete a culminating project as a graduation prerequisite.

(3) Pursuant to any requirement for instruction in languages other than English established by the state board of education or a local school district, or both, for purposes of high school graduation, students who receive instruction in American sign language or one or more American Indian languages shall be considered to have satisfied the state or local school district graduation requirement for instruction in one or more languages other than English.

(4) Unless requested otherwise by the student and the student's family, a student who has completed high school courses before attending high school shall be given high school credit which shall be applied to fulfilling high school graduation requirements if:

(a) The course was taken with high school students, if the academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth grade classes, and the student has successfully passed by completing the same course requirements and examinations as the high school students enrolled in the class; or

(b) The academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth grade classes and the course would qualify for high school credit, because the course is similar or equivalent to a course offered at a high school in the district as determined by the school district board of directors.

(5) Students who have taken and successfully completed high school courses under the circumstances in subsection (4) of this section shall not be required to take an additional competency examination or perform any other additional assignment to receive credit.

(6) At the college or university level, five quarter or three semester hours equals one high school credit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 28A.230 RCW to read as follows:

(1) This section establishes the school district, content, and other substantiative requirements for the high school and beyond plan required by RCW 28A.230.090.

(2)(a) Beginning in grade seven, each student must be administered a career interest and skills inventory that is intended to inform grade eight course taking and the development of a high school and beyond plan. No later than grade eight, each student must have a high school and beyond plan that includes a proposed plan for first-year high school courses aligned with graduation requirements and secondary and postsecondary goals.

(b) For each student who has not earned a score of level 3 or 4 on the middle school mathematics assessment identified in RCW 28A.655.070 by grade nine, the high school and beyond plan must be updated to ensure that the student takes a mathematics course in grades nine and 10. These courses may include career and technical education equivalencies in mathematics adopted pursuant to RCW 28A.230.097.

(3) Students, with staff support, must update their high school and beyond plan annually, at a minimum, to review academic progress and inform future course taking.

(a) The high school and beyond plan must be updated in grade 10 to reflect high school assessment results in RCW 28A.655.061, ensure student access to advanced course options in accordance with the district's academic acceleration policy under RCW 28A.320.195, assess progress toward identified goals, and revised as necessary for the student's changing interests, goals, and needs.

(b) Each school district shall provide students who have not met the standard on state assessments or who are behind in completion of credits or graduation pathway options with the opportunity to access interventions and academic supports, courses, or both, designed to enable students to meet all high school graduation requirements. The parent or legal guardian must be notified about these opportunities as included in the student's high school and beyond plan, preferably through a parent conference and at least annually until the student is on track to graduate.

(c) For students with an individualized education program, the high school and beyond plan must be developed and updated in alignment with their school to postschool transition plan. The high school and beyond plan must be developed and updated in a similar manner and with similar school personnel as with other students.

(4) School districts shall involve parents and legal guardians to the greatest extent feasible in the process of developing and updating the high school and beyond plan. The plan must be provided to the student and the students' parents or legal guardians in a language the student and parents or legal guardians understand.

(5) School districts must annually provide students in grades eight through 12 and their parents or legal guardians with comprehensive information about the graduation pathway options offered by the district and are strongly encouraged to begin providing this information to students in grade six.

(6) School districts are strongly encouraged to partner with student serving community-based organizations that support career exploration and preparation for postsecondary and career pathways. These partnerships may include high school and beyond plan coordination and planning, data-sharing agreements, and secure access to individual student high school and beyond plans.

(7) All high school and beyond plans must, at a minimum, include the following elements:

(a) Identification of career goals, aided by a skills and interest assessment;

(b) Identification of secondary and postsecondary education and training goals;

(c) An academic plan for course taking that:

(i) Includes information about options for satisfying state and local graduation requirements;

(ii) Satisfies state and local graduation requirements;

(iii) Aligns with the student's secondary and postsecondary goals, which can include education, training, and career preparation;

(iv) Identifies available advanced course sequences per the school district's academic acceleration policy, as described in RCW 28A.320.195, that include dual credit courses or other programs and are aligned with the student's goals;

(v) Includes information on the potential impacts of their course selections on postsecondary opportunities;

(vi) Identifies available career and technical education equivalency courses that can satisfy core subject area graduation requirements under RCW 28A.230.097;

(vii) Identifies, if applicable, career and technical education and paid work experience opportunities that can lead to technical college certifications and apprenticeships; and

(viii) Identifies, if applicable, opportunities for partial credit accrual, including accrual of mastery-based credit, to eliminate barriers for on-time grade level progression and graduation per RCW 28A.320.192;

(d) Evidence that the student has received the following information on federal and state financial aid programs that help pay for the costs of a postsecondary program:

(i) The college bound scholarship program established in chapter 28B.118 RCW, the Washington college grant, and other scholarship opportunities;

(ii) The documentation necessary for completing state and federal financial aid scholarship applications; application timeliness and submission deadlines; and the importance of submitting applications early;

(iii) Information specific to students who are or have been the subject of a dependency proceeding pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW, who are or are at risk of being homeless, and whose family member or legal guardian will be required to provide financial and tax information necessary to complete applications; and

(iv) Opportunities to participate in advising days and seminars that assist students and, when necessary, their family members or legal guardians, with filling out financial aid applications in accordance with RCW 28A.300.815; and

(e) By the end of grade 12, a current resume or activity log that provides a written compilation of the student's education, any work experience, extracurricular activities, and any community service including how the school district has recognized the community service pursuant to RCW 28A.320.193.

(8) Any decision on whether a student has met the high school graduation requirements established by the state board of education for a high school and beyond plan remain at the local level.

(9) School districts may establish additional, local requirements for a high school and beyond plan to serve the needs and interests of their students and the purposes of this section.

(10) The state board of education shall adopt and revise rules as necessary to implement this section.

Sec. 4. RCW 28A.230.215 and 2020 c 307 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature finds that fully realizing the potential of high school and beyond plans as meaningful tools for articulating and revising pathways for graduation will require additional school counselors and family coordinators. The legislature further finds that the development and implementation of an online electronic platform for high school and beyond plans will be an appropriate and supportive action that will assist students, parents and guardians, educators, ((and))school counselors, and other staff who support students' career and college preparation as the legislature explores options for funding additional school counselors.

(2) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall facilitate the creation of a list of available electronic platforms for the high school and beyond plan. Platforms eligible to be included on the list must meet the following requirements:

(a) Enable students to create, personalize, and revise their high school and beyond plan as required by ((RCW 28A.230.090))section 3 of this act;

(b) Grant parents or guardians, educators, and counselors appropriate access to students' high school and beyond plans;

(c) Employ a sufficiently flexible technology that allows for subsequent modifications necessitated by statutory changes, administrative changes, or both, as well as enhancements to improve the features and functionality of the platform;

(d) Include a sample financial aid letter and a link to the financial aid calculator created in RCW 28B.77.280, at such a time as those materials are finalized;

(e) Comply with state and federal requirements for student privacy;

(f) Allow for the portability between platforms so that students moving between school districts are able to easily transfer their high school and beyond plans; and

(g) To the extent possible, include platforms in use by school districts during the 2018-19 school year.

(3) Beginning in the 2020-21 school year, each school district must ensure that an electronic high school and beyond plan platform is available to all students who are required to have a high school and beyond plan. School districts shall subsequently adopt a statewide online platform for high school and beyond plans in accordance with section 5 of this act.

(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may adopt and revise rules as necessary to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 28A.230 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall facilitate the transition to and adoption of a statewide online platform for high school and beyond plans required by RCW 28A.230.090. In meeting the requirements of this subsection (1), the office of the superintendent of public instruction must conduct a cost analysis and feasibility study to inform development or adoption of the platform. The analysis must:

(i) Include an inventory of existing vendors who meet the criteria provided in (b) of this subsection (1) and RCW 28A.230.215(2) and section 3 of this act;

(ii) Include an estimate of the anticipated costs associated with the development of the platform that incorporates the requirements provided in (b) of this subsection (1) and RCW 28A.230.215(2);

(iii) Address the need for technical assistance and professional development to support the transition to a statewide platform; and

(iv) Be submitted to the governor, and the education policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by September 2024.

(b) The statewide platform must include the following features and capabilities to ensure equity in high school and beyond plan implementation and engagement throughout the state:

(i) Full integration between high school and beyond plan course planning capabilities and the most commonly used student information data platforms;

(ii) College, career, and aptitude assessments that provide relevant career exploration recommendations to students;

(iii) Capabilities permitting students, parents or legal guardians, applicable school district personnel, and approved community partners who support students' career and college preparation to develop support and recovery plans for students, if needed;

(iv) Accessibility options for students needing accommodations including visual aids and voice dictation;

(v) Document printing capabilities that align with student and staff needs;

(vi) The ability to retrieve student course and grade information;

(vii) Sufficient flexibility for incorporating differing and locally determined school district requirements; and

(viii) The ability to grant secure access to the platform to student serving community-based providers that support career exploration and postsecondary and career pathways.

(c) In meeting the requirements of this section, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must also address how the statewide online platform will align with school to postschool transition plans for students with an individualized education program transition plan.

(2)(a) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, and after the requirements in subsection (1) of this section have been met, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop and adopt a statewide online platform for the high school and beyond plans required by RCW 28A.230.090.

(b) Within two years of adoption of the statewide platform required by this subsection (2), school districts must transition to the adopted platform.

(c) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop guidance, provide technical assistance, and support the facilitation of statewide professional development for school districts and partner organizations in transitioning to the statewide platform.

(3) In implementing subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall seek input from the state board of education, educators, school and district administrators, school counselors, families, students, the student achievement council, institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, and community partners who support students' career and college preparation.

(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may partner with community and regional networks and organizations that support students' career and college preparation in the analysis, selection, and implementation of a statewide platform for the high school and beyond plans.

(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may adopt and revise rules as necessary to implement this section.

Sec. 6. RCW 28A.230.091 and 2018 c 229 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall work with school districts, including teachers, principals, and school counselors, educational service districts, the Washington state school directors' association, institutions of higher education ((as defined in RCW 28B.10.016))that are authorized to participate in state student financial aid programs under chapter 28B.92 RCW, students, and parents and guardians to identify best practices for high school and beyond plans that districts and schools may employ when complying with high school and beyond plan requirements adopted ((in accordance with RCW 28A.230.090))under section 3 of this act. The identified best practices, which must consider differences in enrollment and other factors that distinguish districts from one another, must be posted on the website of the office of the superintendent of public instruction by September 1, 2019, and may be revised periodically as necessary.

Sec. 7. RCW 28A.230.310 and 2020 c 307 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Beginning with the 2020-21 school year, all school districts with a high school must provide a financial aid advising day, as defined in RCW 28A.300.815.

(b) Districts must provide both a financial aid advising day and notification of financial aid opportunities at the beginning of each school year to parents and guardians of any student entering the twelfth grade. The notification must include information regarding:

(i) The eligibility requirements of the Washington college grant;

(ii) The requirements of the financial aid advising day;

(iii) The process for opting out of the financial aid advising day; and

(iv) Any community-based resources available to assist parents and guardians in understanding the requirements of and how to complete the free application for federal student aid and the Washington application for state financial aid.

(2) Districts may administer the financial aid advising day, as defined in RCW 28A.300.815, in accordance with information-sharing requirements ((set in))for the high school and beyond plan ((in))required by RCW 28A.230.090.

(3) The Washington state school directors' association, with assistance from the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the Washington student achievement council, shall develop a model policy and procedure that school district board of directors may adopt. The model policy and procedure must describe minimum standards for a financial aid advising day as defined in RCW 28A.300.815.

(4) School districts are encouraged to engage in the Washington student achievement council's financial aid advising training.

(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules for the implementation of this section.

Sec. 8. RCW 28A.230.320 and 2021 c 7 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning with the class of 2020, the state board of education may authorize school districts to grant individual student emergency waivers from credit and subject area graduation requirements established in RCW 28A.230.090, the graduation pathway requirement established in RCW 28A.655.250, or both if:

(a) The student's ability to complete the requirement was impeded due to a significant disruption resulting from a local, state, or national emergency;

(b) The school district demonstrates a good faith effort to support the individual student in meeting the requirement before considering an emergency waiver;

(c) The student was reasonably expected to graduate in the school year when the emergency waiver is granted; and

(d) The student has demonstrated skills and knowledge indicating preparation for the next steps identified in their high school and beyond plan ((under))required by RCW 28A.230.090 and for success in postsecondary education, gainful employment, and civic engagement.

(2) A school district that is granted emergency waiver authority under this section shall:

(a) Maintain a record of courses and requirements waived as part of the individual student record;

(b) Include a notation of waived credits on the student's high school transcript;

(c) Maintain records as necessary and as required by rule of the state board of education to document compliance with subsection (1)(b) of this section;

(d) Report student level emergency waiver data to the office of the superintendent of public instruction in a manner determined by the superintendent of public instruction in consultation with the state board of education;

(e) Determine if there is disproportionality among student subgroups receiving emergency waivers and, if so, take appropriate corrective actions to ensure equitable administration. At a minimum, the subgroups to be examined must include those referenced in RCW 28A.300.042(3). If further disaggregation of subgroups is available, the school district shall also examine those subgroups; and

(f) Adopt by resolution a written plan that describes the school district's process for students to request or decline an emergency waiver, and a process for students to appeal within the school district a decision to not grant an emergency waiver.

(3)(a) By November 1, 2021, and annually thereafter, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide the data reported under subsection (2) of this section to the state board of education.

(b) The state board of education, by December 15, 2021, and within existing resources, shall provide the education committees of the legislature with a summary of the emergency waiver data provided by the office of the superintendent of public instruction under this subsection (3) for students in the graduating classes of 2020 and 2021. The summary must include the following information:

(i) The total number of emergency waivers requested and issued, by school district, including an indication of what requirement or requirements were waived. Information provided in accordance with this subsection (([(3)]))(3)(b)(i) must also indicate the number of students in the school district grade cohort of each student receiving a waiver; and

(ii) An analysis of any concerns regarding school district implementation, including any concerns related to school district demonstrations of good faith efforts as required by subsection (1)(b) of this section, identified by the state board of education during its review of the data.

(4) The state board of education shall adopt and may periodically revise rules for eligibility and administration of emergency waivers under this section. The rules may include:

(a) An application and approval process that allows school districts to apply to the state board of education to receive authority to grant emergency waivers in response to an emergency;

(b) Eligibility criteria for meeting the requirements established in subsection (1) of this section;

(c) Limitations on the number and type of credits that can be waived; and

(d) Expectations of the school district regarding communication with students and their parents or guardians.

(5) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Emergency" has the same meaning as "emergency or disaster" in RCW 38.52.010. "Emergency" may also include a national declaration of emergency by an authorized federal official.

(b) "School district" means any school district, charter school established under chapter 28A.710 RCW, tribal compact school operated according to the terms of state-tribal education compacts authorized under chapter 28A.715 RCW, private school, state school established under chapter 72.40 RCW, and community and technical college granting high school diplomas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. RCW 28A.655.270 (Student support for graduation—Student learning plans) and 2019 c 252 s 203 are each repealed.

--- END ---