BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW to read as follows:

By September 1, 2023, the department, in consultation with the department of health, shall produce and make available to department staff a child malnutrition field guide. This child malnutrition field guide must:

(1) Be concise, but provide references to additional comprehensive and trauma-informed resources for department staff to access if needed;

(2) Be easily accessible by department staff;

(3) Describe how to identify signs of child malnutrition;

(4) Include appropriate questions to ask the child and others close to the child when child malnutrition is suspected;

(5) Include the appropriate next steps department staff may take when child malnutrition is suspected; and

(6) Include any additional information the department deems relevant.

--- END ---