BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.101.230 and 2021 c 323 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

Tribal police officers and employees who are engaged in law enforcement activities and who do not qualify as "criminal justice personnel" or "law enforcement personnel" under RCW 43.101.010 shall be provided training under this chapter if: (((a) [(1)]))(1) The tribe is recognized by the federal government, and (((b) [(2)] the tribe pays))(2) tribal agencies with tribal officer certification agreements with the commission under RCW 43.101.157 shall reimburse the commission for 25 percent of the cost of training its personnel. Tribes without current written tribal officer certification agreements with the commission shall pay to the commission the full cost of providing such training. The commission shall place all money received under this section into the criminal justice training account.

--- END ---