BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.88B.080 and 2012 c 164 s 501 are each amended to read as follows:

A long-term care worker disqualified from working with vulnerable persons under chapter 74.39A RCW may not be certified or maintain certification as a home care aide under this chapter. To allow the department to satisfy its certification responsibilities under this chapter, the department of social and health services shall share the results of state and federal background checks conducted pursuant to RCW 74.39A.056 with the department, but only to the extent such dissemination and use is authorized under 28 U.S.C. Sec. 534 and related federal regulations. Neither department may share the federal background check results with any other state agency or person.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.43.832 and 2021 c 203 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington state patrol identification and criminal history section shall disclose conviction records as follows:

(a) An applicant's conviction record, upon the request of a business or organization as defined in RCW 43.43.830, a developmentally disabled person, or a vulnerable adult as defined in RCW 43.43.830 or his or her guardian;

(b) The conviction record of an applicant for certification, upon the request of the Washington professional educator standards board;

(c) Any conviction record to aid in the investigation and prosecution of child, developmentally disabled person, and vulnerable adult abuse cases and to protect children and adults from further incidents of abuse, upon the request of a law enforcement agency, the office of the attorney general, prosecuting authority, or the department of social and health services; and

(d) A prospective client's or resident's conviction record, upon the request of a business or organization that qualifies for exemption under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)) and that provides emergency shelter or transitional housing for children, persons with developmental disabilities, or vulnerable adults.

(2) The secretary of the department of social and health services and the secretary of children, youth, and families must establish rules and set standards to require specific action when considering the information received pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, and when considering additional information including but not limited to civil adjudication proceedings as defined in RCW 43.43.830 and any out-of-state equivalent, in the following circumstances:

(a) When considering persons for state employment in positions directly responsible for the supervision, care, or treatment of children, vulnerable adults, or individuals with mental illness or developmental disabilities provided that: For persons residing in a home that will be utilized to provide foster care for dependent youth, a criminal background check will be required for all persons aged sixteen and older and the department of ((social and health services))children, youth, and families may require a criminal background check for persons who are younger than sixteen in situations where it may be warranted to ensure the safety of youth in foster care;

(b) When considering persons for state positions involving unsupervised access to vulnerable adults to conduct comprehensive assessments, financial eligibility determinations, licensing and certification activities, investigations, surveys, or case management; or for state positions otherwise required by federal law to meet employment standards;

(c) When licensing agencies or facilities with individuals in positions directly responsible for the care, supervision, or treatment of children, developmentally disabled persons, or vulnerable adults, including but not limited to agencies or facilities licensed under chapter 74.15 or 18.51 RCW;

(d) When contracting with individuals or businesses or organizations for the care, supervision, case management, or treatment, including peer counseling, of children, developmentally disabled persons, or vulnerable adults, including but not limited to services contracted for under chapter 18.20, 70.127, 70.128, 72.36, or 74.39A RCW or Title 71A RCW;

(e) When individual providers as defined in RCW 74.39A.240 or providers paid by home care agencies provide in-home services involving unsupervised access to persons with physical, mental, or developmental disabilities or mental illness, or to vulnerable adults as defined in chapter 74.34 RCW, including but not limited to services provided under chapter 74.39 or 74.39A RCW.

(3) The secretary of the department of children, youth, and families shall investigate the conviction records, pending charges, and other information including civil adjudication proceeding records of current employees and of any person actively being considered for any position with the department who will or may have unsupervised access to children, or for state positions otherwise required by federal law to meet employment standards. "Considered for any position" includes decisions about (a) initial hiring, layoffs, reallocations, transfers, promotions, or demotions, or (b) other decisions that result in an individual being in a position that will or may have unsupervised access to children as an employee, an intern, or a volunteer.

(4) The secretary of the department of children, youth, and families shall adopt rules and investigate conviction records, pending charges, and other information including civil adjudication proceeding records, in the following circumstances:

(a) When licensing or certifying agencies with individuals in positions that will or may have unsupervised access to children who are in child day care, in early learning programs, or receiving early childhood education services, including but not limited to licensees, agency staff, interns, volunteers, contracted providers, and persons living on the premises who are sixteen years of age or older;

(b) When authorizing individuals who will or may have unsupervised access to children who are in child day care, in early learning programs, or receiving early childhood learning education services in licensed or certified agencies, including but not limited to licensees, agency staff, interns, volunteers, contracted providers, and persons living on the premises who are sixteen years of age or older;

(c) When contracting with any business or organization for activities that will or may have unsupervised access to children who are in child day care, in early learning programs, or receiving early childhood learning education services;

(d) When establishing the eligibility criteria for individual providers to receive state paid subsidies to provide child day care or early learning services that will or may involve unsupervised access to children; and

(e) When responding to a request from an individual for a certificate of parental improvement under chapter 74.13 RCW.

(5) Whenever a state conviction record check is required by state law, persons may be employed or engaged as volunteers or independent contractors on a conditional basis pending completion of the state background investigation. Whenever a national criminal record check through the federal bureau of investigation is required by state law, a person may be employed or engaged as a volunteer or independent contractor on a conditional basis pending completion of the national check. The office of financial management shall adopt rules to accomplish the purposes of this subsection as it applies to state employees. The department of social and health services shall adopt rules to accomplish the purpose of this subsection as it applies to long-term care workers subject to RCW 74.39A.056.

(6)(a) For purposes of facilitating timely access to criminal background information and to reasonably minimize the number of requests made under this section, recognizing that certain health care providers change employment frequently, health care facilities may, upon request from another health care facility, share copies of completed Washington state criminal background inquiry information.

(b) Completed state criminal background inquiry information may be shared by a willing health care facility only if the following conditions are satisfied: The licensed health care facility sharing the state criminal background inquiry information is reasonably known to be the person's most recent employer, no more than twelve months has elapsed from the date the person was last employed at a licensed health care facility to the date of their current employment application, and the state criminal background information is no more than two years old.

(c) If state criminal background inquiry information is shared, the health care facility employing the subject of the inquiry must require the applicant to sign a disclosure statement indicating that there has been no conviction or finding as described in RCW 43.43.842 since the completion date of the most recent criminal background inquiry.

(d) Any health care facility that knows or has reason to believe that an applicant has or may have a disqualifying conviction or finding as described in RCW 43.43.842, subsequent to the completion date of their most recent criminal background inquiry, shall be prohibited from relying on the applicant's previous employer's state criminal background inquiry information. A new state criminal background inquiry shall be requested pursuant to RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.842.

(e) Health care facilities that share state criminal background inquiry information shall be immune from any claim of defamation, invasion of privacy, negligence, or any other claim in connection with any dissemination of this information in accordance with this subsection.

(f) Health care facilities shall transmit and receive the state criminal background inquiry information in a manner that reasonably protects the subject's rights to privacy and confidentiality.

(g) Nothing in this section allows sharing of federal background check information received pursuant to a federal fingerprint check except as allowed by 28 U.S.C. Sec. 534 and related federal regulations.

(7) The department of social and health services may not consider any final founded finding of physical abuse or negligent treatment or maltreatment of a child made pursuant to chapter 26.44 RCW that is accompanied by a certificate of parental improvement or dependency as a result of a finding of abuse or neglect pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW that is accompanied by a certificate of parental improvement when evaluating an applicant or employee's character, competency, and suitability pursuant to any background check authorized or required by this chapter, RCW 43.20A.710 or 74.39A.056, or any of the rules adopted thereunder.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.43.837 and 2022 c 297 s 954 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, in))In order to determine the character, competence, and suitability of ((any))an applicant ((or service provider)) to have unsupervised access to vulnerable adults, children, or juveniles, the secretary of the department of social and health services ((and the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families may require a fingerprint-based background check through both the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation at any time, but shall require a fingerprint-based background check when the applicant or service provider has resided in the state less than three consecutive years before application, and))shall require the applicant to submit fingerprints for the purpose of investigating conviction records through both the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation when the applicant:

(a) ((Is an applicant or service provider providing services to children or people with developmental disabilities under RCW 74.15.030;

(b) Is an individual sixteen years of age or older who: (i) Is not under the placement and care authority of the department of children, youth, and families; and (ii) resides in an applicant or service provider's home, facility, entity, agency, or business or who is authorized by the department of children, youth, and families to provide services to children under RCW 74.15.030;

(c) Is an individual who is authorized by the department of social and health services to provide services to people with developmental disabilities under RCW 74.15.030; or

(d) Is an applicant or service provider providing in-home services funded by:

(i) Medicaid personal care under RCW 74.09.520;

(ii) Community options program entry system waiver services under RCW 74.39A.030;

(iii) Chore services under RCW 74.39A.110; or

(iv) Other))Has resided in the state less than three consecutive years before application and:

(i) Is applying for employment, promotion, reallocation, or transfer to a position the department of social and health services has identified as one that will, or may, require the applicant to have unsupervised access to vulnerable adults, children, or juveniles because of the nature of the work;

(ii) Is a contractor providing services funded by other home and community long-term care programs, established pursuant to chapters 71A.12, 74.09, 74.39, and 74.39A RCW, administered by the department of social and health services;

(iii) Is an individual who is authorized by the department of social and health services to provide services to people with developmental disabilities under RCW 74.15.030; or

(iv) Is an employee of an area agency on aging or federally recognized Indian tribe, or an employee of a contractor of an area agency on aging or federally recognized Indian tribe, that will, or may, have unsupervised access to vulnerable adults, children, or juveniles when engaging in the activities described in RCW 74.09.520(5);

(b) Is an employee at any secure facility operated by the department of social and health services under chapter 71.09 RCW;

(c) Is applying to be an adult family home licensee, entity representative, or resident manager under chapter 70.128 RCW;

(d) Is applying to be an assisted living facility licensee or administrator under chapter 18.20 RCW;

(e) Is applying to be an enhanced services facility licensee or administrator under chapter 70.97 RCW;

(f) Is applying to be a certified community residential services and supports provider or administrator under chapter 71A.12 RCW; or

(g) Has been categorized by the department as a high-risk provider in accordance with 42 C.F.R. Secs. 455.434 and 455.450.

(2) Long-term care workers, as defined in RCW 74.39A.009, who are hired after January 7, 2012, are subject to fingerprint-based background checks under RCW 74.39A.056.

(3) In order to determine the character, competence, and suitability of an applicant or service provider to have unsupervised access to children or juveniles, the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families shall require the applicant or service provider to submit fingerprints for the purpose of investigating conviction records through both the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation when the applicant or service provider:

(a) Is applying for a license under RCW 74.15.030 or is an adult living in a home where a child is placed;

(b) Is applying for employment or already employed at a group care facility, regardless of whether the applicant is working directly with children;

(c) Is newly applying for an agency license, is newly licensed, is an employee of an agency that is newly licensed, or will newly have unsupervised access to children in child care, pursuant to RCW 43.216.270; or

(d) Has resided in the state less than three consecutive years before application; and:

(i) Is applying for employment, promotion, reallocation, or transfer to a position the department of children, youth, and families has identified as one that will, or may, require the applicant to have unsupervised access to children or juveniles because of the nature of the work;

(ii) Is a business or individual contracted to provide services to children or people with developmental disabilities under RCW 74.15.030; or

(iii) Is an individual 16 years of age or older who: (A) Is not under the placement and care authority of the department of children, youth, and families; and (B) resides in an applicant or service provider's home, facility, entity, agency, or business or who is authorized by the department of children, youth, and families to provide services to children under RCW 74.15.030.

(4) To satisfy the shared background check requirements provided for in RCW 43.216.270 and 43.20A.710, the department of children, youth, and families and the department of social and health services ((shall share federal fingerprint-based))may share state background check results with each other as permitted under the law, and may share federal fingerprint background checks only as permitted under 28 U.S.C. Sec. 534, 34 U.S.C. Sec. 40316 and their related federal regulations. The purpose of this provision is to allow both departments to fulfill their joint background check responsibility of checking any individual who may have unsupervised access to vulnerable adults, children, or juveniles. Neither department may share the federal background check results with any other state agency or person except as allowed by 28 U.S.C. Sec. 534 and related federal regulations.

(((4)))(5) The secretary of the department of children, youth, and families shall require a fingerprint-based background check through the Washington state patrol identification and criminal history section and the federal bureau of investigation when the department seeks to approve an applicant or service provider for a foster or adoptive placement of children in accordance with federal and state law. Fees charged by the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation for fingerprint-based background checks shall be paid by the department of children, youth, and families for applicants and service providers providing foster care as required in RCW 74.15.030.

(((5) Any secure facility operated by the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families under chapter 71.09 RCW shall require applicants and service providers to undergo a fingerprint-based background check through the Washington state patrol identification and criminal history section and the federal bureau of investigation.))

(6) ((Service providers and service provider applicants))Applicants of the department of social and health services, except for ((those)) long-term care workers ((exempted in subsection (2) of this section))subject to RCW 74.39A.056, who are required to complete a fingerprint-based background check may be hired for a one hundred twenty-day provisional period as allowed under law or program rules when:

(a) A fingerprint-based background check is pending; and

(b) The applicant ((or service provider)) is not disqualified based on the immediate result of the background check.

(7) Fees charged by the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation for fingerprint-based background checks shall be paid by the applicable department for applicants ((or service providers)) providing:

(a) Services to people with a developmental disability under RCW 74.15.030;

(b) In-home services funded by medicaid personal care under RCW 74.09.520;

(c) Community options program entry system waiver services under RCW 74.39A.030;

(d) Chore services under RCW 74.39A.110;

(e) Services under other home and community long-term care programs, established pursuant to chapters 74.39 and 74.39A RCW, administered by the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families;

(f) Services in, or to residents of, a secure facility under RCW 71.09.115; and

(g) For fiscal year 2023, applicants for child care and early learning services to children under RCW 43.216.270.

(8) ((Service providers))Applicants licensed under RCW 74.15.030 must pay fees charged by the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation for conducting fingerprint-based background checks.

(9) Department of children, youth, and families ((service providers licensed))licensees under RCW 74.15.030 may not pass on the cost of the background check fees to their ((applicants))employees unless the individual is determined to be disqualified due to the background information.

(10) The department of social and health services and the department of children, youth, and families shall develop rules identifying the financial responsibility of service providers, applicants, and the respective department for paying the fees charged by law enforcement to roll, print, or scan fingerprints-based for the purpose of a Washington state patrol or federal bureau of investigation fingerprint-based background check.

(((11) For purposes of this section, unless the context plainly indicates otherwise:

(a) "Applicant" means a current or prospective department of social and health services, department of children, youth, and families, or service provider employee, volunteer, student, intern, researcher, contractor, or any other individual who will or may have unsupervised access because of the nature of the work or services he or she provides. "Applicant" includes but is not limited to any individual who will or may have unsupervised access and is:

(i) Applying for a license or certification from the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families;

(ii) Seeking a contract with the department of social and health services, the department of children, youth, and families, or a service provider;

(iii) Applying for employment, promotion, reallocation, or transfer;

(iv) An individual that a department of social and health services or department of children, youth, and families client or guardian of a department of social and health services or department of children, youth, and families client chooses to hire or engage to provide services to himself or herself or another vulnerable adult, juvenile, or child and who might be eligible to receive payment from the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families for services rendered; or

(v) A department of social and health services or department of children, youth, and families applicant who will or may work in a department-covered position.

(b) "Authorized" means the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families grants an applicant, home, or facility permission to:

(i) Conduct licensing, certification, or contracting activities;

(ii) Have unsupervised access to vulnerable adults, juveniles, and children;

(iii) Receive payments from a department of social and health services or department of children, youth, and families program; or

(iv) Work or serve in a department of social and health services or department of children, youth, and families-covered position.

(c) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social and health services.

(d) "Secure facility" has the meaning provided in RCW 71.09.020.

(e) "Service provider" means entities, facilities, agencies, businesses, or individuals who are licensed, certified, authorized, or regulated by, receive payment from, or have contracts or agreements with the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families to provide services to vulnerable adults, juveniles, or children. "Service provider" includes individuals whom a department of social and health services or department of children, youth, and families client or guardian of a department of social and health services or department of children, youth, and families client may choose to hire or engage to provide services to himself or herself or another vulnerable adult, juvenile, or child and who might be eligible to receive payment from the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families for services rendered.))

Sec. 4. RCW 74.39A.056 and 2021 c 203 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) All long-term care workers shall be screened through state and federal background checks in a uniform and timely manner to verify that they do not have a history that would disqualify them from working with vulnerable persons. The department must process background checks for long-term care workers and ((make the information available to employers, prospective employers, and others as authorized by law))based on this screening, inform prospective employers whether screened applicants are eligible or ineligible for employment. Records obtained from the federal bureau of investigation fingerprint identification records system, or its successor program, may not be disseminated except as allowed by 28 U.S.C. Sec. 534 and related federal regulations.

(b)(i) For long-term care workers hired on or after January 7, 2012, the background checks required under this section shall include checking against the federal bureau of investigation fingerprint identification records system or its successor program. The department shall require these long-term care workers to submit fingerprints for the purpose of investigating conviction records through both the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation. The department shall not pass on the cost of these criminal background checks to the workers or their employers.

(ii) A long-term care worker who is not disqualified by the state background check can work and have unsupervised access pending the results of the federal bureau of investigation fingerprint background check as allowed by rules adopted by the department.

(c) The department shall share state and federal background check results with the department of health in accordance with RCW 18.88B.080, but only to the extent such dissemination and use is authorized under 28 U.S.C. Sec. 534 and related federal regulations.

(d) ((Background check screening required under this section and department rules is not required for an employee of a consumer directed employer if all of the following circumstances apply:

(i) The individual has an individual provider contract with the department;

(ii) The last background check on the contracted individual provider is still valid under department rules and did not disqualify the individual from providing personal care services;

(iii) Employment by the consumer directed employer is the only reason a new background check would be required; and

(iv) The department's background check results have been shared with the consumer directed employer.

(e))) The department may require a fingerprint-based background check through both the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation at any time.

(2) A provider may not be employed in the care of and have unsupervised access to vulnerable adults if:

(a) The provider is on the vulnerable adult abuse registry or on any other registry based upon a finding of abuse, abandonment, neglect, or financial exploitation of a vulnerable adult;

(b) On or after October 1, 1998, the department of children, youth, and families, or its predecessor agency, has made a founded finding of abuse or neglect of a child against the provider. If the provider has received a certificate of parental improvement under chapter 74.13 RCW pertaining to the finding, the provider is not disqualified under this section;

(c) A disciplining authority, including the department of health, has made a finding of abuse, abandonment, neglect, or financial exploitation of a minor or a vulnerable adult against the provider; or

(d) A court has issued an order that includes a finding of fact or conclusion of law that the provider has committed abuse, abandonment, neglect, or financial exploitation of a minor or vulnerable adult. If the provider has received a certificate of parental improvement under chapter 74.13 RCW pertaining to the finding of fact or conclusion of law, the provider is not disqualified under this section.

(3) The department shall establish, by rule, a state registry which contains identifying information about long-term care workers identified under this chapter who have final substantiated findings of abuse, neglect, financial exploitation, or abandonment of a vulnerable adult as defined in RCW 74.34.020. The rule must include disclosure, disposition of findings, notification, findings of fact, appeal rights, and fair hearing requirements. The department shall disclose, upon request, final substantiated findings of abuse, neglect, financial exploitation, or abandonment to any person so requesting this information. This information must also be shared with the department of health to advance the purposes of chapter 18.88B RCW.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "provider" means:

(a) An individual provider as defined in RCW 74.39A.240;

(b) An employee, licensee, or contractor of any of the following: A home care agency licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW; a nursing home under chapter 18.51 RCW; an assisted living facility under chapter 18.20 RCW; an enhanced services facility under chapter 70.97 RCW; a certified resident services and supports agency licensed or certified under chapter 71A.12 RCW; an adult family home under chapter 70.128 RCW; or any long-term care facility certified to provide medicaid or medicare services; and

(c) Any contractor of the department who may have unsupervised access to vulnerable adults.

(5) The department shall adopt rules to implement this section.

--- END ---