BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 64.35.105 and 2004 c 201 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Affiliate" has the meaning in RCW 64.34.020 and 64.90.010.

(2) "Association" has the meaning in RCW 64.34.020 and 64.90.010.

(3) "Building envelope" means the assemblies, components, and materials of a building that are intended to separate and protect the interior space of the building from the adverse effects of exterior climatic conditions.

(4) "Common element" has the meaning in RCW 64.34.020 and 64.90.010.

(5) "Condominium" has the meaning in RCW 64.34.020 and 64.90.010.

(6) "Construction professional" has the meaning in RCW 64.50.010.

(7) "Conversion condominium" has the meaning in RCW 64.34.020 and 64.90.010.

(8) "Declarant" has the meaning in RCW 64.34.020 and 64.90.010.

(9) "Declarant control" has the meaning in RCW 64.34.020 and 64.90.010.

(10) "Defect" means any aspect of a condominium unit or common element which constitutes a breach of the implied warranties set forth in RCW 64.34.445 or 64.90.670.

(11) "Limited common element" has the meaning in RCW 64.34.020 and 64.90.010.

(12) "Material" means substantive, not simply formal; significant to a reasonable person; not trivial or insignificant. When used with respect to a particular construction defect, "material" does not require that the construction defect render the unit or common element unfit for its intended purpose or uninhabitable.

(13) "Mediation" means a collaborative process in which two or more parties meet and attempt, with the assistance of a mediator, to resolve issues in dispute between them.

(14) "Mediation session" means a meeting between two or more parties to a dispute during which they are engaged in mediation.

(15) "Mediator" means a neutral and impartial facilitator with no decision-making power who assists parties in negotiating a mutually acceptable settlement of issues in dispute between them.

(16) "Person" has the meaning in RCW 64.34.020 and 64.90.010.

(17) "Public offering statement" has the meaning in RCW 64.34.410 and in chapter 64.90 RCW.

(18) "Qualified insurer" means an entity that holds a certificate of authority under RCW 48.05.030, or an eligible insurer under chapter 48.15 RCW.

(19) "Qualified warranty" means an insurance policy issued by a qualified insurer that complies with the requirements of this chapter. A qualified warranty includes coverage for repair of physical damage caused by the defects covered by the qualified warranty, except to the extent of any exclusions and limitations under this chapter.

(20) "Resale certificate" means the statement to be delivered by the association under RCW 64.34.425 or chapter 64.90 RCW.

(21) "Transition date" means the date on which the declarant is required to deliver to the association the property of the association under RCW 64.34.312 or 64.90.420.

(22) "Unit" has the meaning in RCW 64.34.020 and 64.90.010.

(23) "Unit owner" has the meaning in RCW 64.34.020 and 64.90.010.

Sec. 2. RCW 64.38.010 and 2021 c 227 s 9 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

For purposes of this chapter:

(1) "Assessment" means all sums chargeable to an owner by an association in accordance with RCW 64.38.020.

(2) "Baseline funding plan" means establishing a reserve funding goal of maintaining a reserve account balance above ((zero dollars))$0 throughout the ((thirty-year))30-year study period described under RCW 64.38.065.

(3) "Board of directors" or "board" means the body, regardless of name, with primary authority to manage the affairs of the association.

(4) "Common areas" means property owned, or otherwise maintained, repaired or administered by the association.

(5) "Common expense" means the costs incurred by the association to exercise any of the powers provided for in this chapter.

(6) "Contribution rate" means, in a reserve study as described in RCW 64.38.065, the amount contributed to the reserve account so that the association will have cash reserves to pay major maintenance, repair, or replacement costs without the need of a special assessment.

(7) "Effective age" means the difference between the estimated useful life and remaining useful life.

(8) "Electronic transmission" or "electronically transmitted" means any electronic communication not directly involving the physical transfer of a writing in a tangible medium, but that may be retained, retrieved, and reviewed by the sender and the recipient of the communication, and that may be directly reproduced in a tangible medium by a sender and recipient.

(9) "Full funding plan" means setting a reserve funding goal of achieving one hundred percent fully funded reserves by the end of the ((thirty-year))30-year study period described under RCW 64.38.065, in which the reserve account balance equals the sum of the deteriorated portion of all reserve components.

(10) "Fully funded balance" means the current value of the deteriorated portion, not the total replacement value, of all the reserve components. The fully funded balance for each reserve component is calculated by multiplying the current replacement cost of the reserve component by its effective age, then dividing the result by the reserve component's useful life. The sum total of all reserve components' fully funded balances is the association's fully funded balance.

(11) "Governing documents" means the articles of incorporation, bylaws, plat, declaration of covenants, conditions, and restrictions, rules and regulations of the association, or other written instrument by which the association has the authority to exercise any of the powers provided for in this chapter or to manage, maintain, or otherwise affect the property under its jurisdiction.

(12) "Homeowners' association" or "association" means a corporation, unincorporated association, or other legal entity, each member of which is an owner of residential real property located within the association's jurisdiction, as described in the governing documents, and by virtue of membership or ownership of property is obligated to pay real property taxes, insurance premiums, maintenance costs, or for improvement of real property other than that which is owned by the member. "Homeowners' association" does not mean an association created under chapter 64.32 ((or)), 64.34, or 64.90 RCW.

(13) "Lot" means a physical portion of the real property located within an association's jurisdiction designated for separate ownership.

(14) "Owner" means the owner of a lot, but does not include a person who has an interest in a lot solely as security for an obligation. "Owner" also means the vendee, not the vendor, of a lot under a real estate contract.

(15) "Remaining useful life" means the estimated time, in years, before a reserve component will require major maintenance, repair, or replacement to perform its intended function.

(16) "Replacement cost" means the current cost of replacing, repairing, or restoring a reserve component to its original functional condition.

(17) "Reserve component" means a common element whose cost of maintenance, repair, or replacement is infrequent, significant, and impractical to include in an annual budget.

(18) "Reserve study professional" means an independent person who is suitably qualified by knowledge, skill, experience, training, or education to prepare a reserve study in accordance with RCW 64.38.065 and 64.38.070.

(19) "Residential real property" means any real property, the use of which is limited by law, covenant or otherwise to primarily residential or recreational purposes.

(20) "Significant assets" means that the current replacement value of the major reserve components is ((seventy-five))75 percent or more of the gross budget of the association, excluding the association's reserve account funds.

(21) "Tangible medium" means a writing, copy of a writing, facsimile, or a physical reproduction, each on paper or on other tangible material.

(22) "Useful life" means the estimated time, between years, that major maintenance, repair, or replacement is estimated to occur.

Sec. 3. RCW 64.50.010 and 2020 c 18 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Action" means any civil lawsuit or action in contract or tort for damages or indemnity brought against a construction professional to assert a claim, whether by complaint, counterclaim, or cross-claim, for damage or the loss of use of real or personal property caused by a defect in the construction of a residence or in the substantial remodel of a residence. "Action" does not include any civil action in tort alleging personal injury or wrongful death to a person or persons resulting from a construction defect.

(2) "Association" means an association, master association, or subassociation as defined and provided for in RCW 64.34.020(4), 64.34.276, 64.34.278, and 64.38.010(((11)))(12).

(3) "Claimant" means a homeowner or association who asserts a claim against a construction professional concerning a defect in the construction of a residence or in the substantial remodel of a residence.

(4) "Construction defect professional" means a qualified expert witness governed by rule 702 of the Washington state court rules: Rules of evidence. An expert whose compensation is, for services rendered under this chapter, in any way dependent on the outcome of an action is not a qualified construction defect professional.

(5) "Construction professional" means an architect, builder, builder vendor, contractor, subcontractor, engineer, or inspector, including, but not limited to, a dealer as defined in RCW 64.34.020 and a declarant as defined in RCW 64.34.020, performing or furnishing the design, supervision, inspection, construction, or observation of the construction of any improvement to real property, whether operating as a sole proprietor, partnership, corporation, or other business entity.

(((5)))(6) "Homeowner" means: (a) Any person, company, firm, partnership, corporation, or association who contracts with a construction professional for the construction, sale, or construction and sale of a residence; and (b) an "association" as defined in this section. "Homeowner" includes, but is not limited to, a subsequent purchaser of a residence from any homeowner.

(((6)))(7) "Residence" means a single-family house, duplex, triplex, quadraplex, or a unit in a multiunit residential structure in which title to each individual unit is transferred to the owner under a condominium or cooperative system, and shall include common elements as defined in RCW 64.34.020 and common areas as defined in RCW 64.38.010(4).

(((7)))(8) "Serve" or "service" means personal service or delivery by certified mail to the last known address of the addressee.

(((8)))(9) "Substantial remodel" means a remodel of a residence, for which the total cost exceeds one-half of the assessed value of the residence for property tax purposes at the time the contract for the remodel work was made.

Sec. 4. RCW 64.50.020 and 2002 c 323 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In every construction defect action brought against a construction professional, the claimant shall, no later than ((forty-five))45 days before filing an action, serve (a) written notice of claim and (b) written defect assessment report on the construction professional.

(i) The notice of claim shall state that the claimant asserts a construction defect claim against the construction professional and shall describe the claim in reasonable detail sufficient to determine the general nature of the defect.

(ii) The report required in this subsection (1)(b) shall be executed under oath by a construction defect professional, or an equivalent reliable source, and shall state with particularity:

(A) The construction defect professional's qualifications, training, and experience with construction defect issues;

(B) The manner and type of inspection forming the basis for the report;

(C) A reasonably detailed description sufficient to identify the location and nature of the defect based on the scope of the inspection, and the extent of the defect;

(D) The recommended repair proposed to correct the observed defect; and

(E) The construction defect professional's opinion as to the applicable code or building standard implicated by the defect.

(2) Within ((twenty-one))21 days after service of the notice of claim, the construction professional shall serve a written response on the claimant by registered mail or personal service. The written response shall:

(a) Propose to inspect the residence that is the subject of the claim and to complete the inspection within a specified time frame. The proposal shall include the statement that the construction professional shall, based on the inspection, offer to remedy the defect, compromise by payment, or dispute the claim;

(b) Offer to compromise and settle the claim by monetary payment without inspection. A construction professional's offer under this subsection (2)(b) to compromise and settle a homeowner's claim may include, but is not limited to, an express offer to purchase the claimant's residence that is the subject of the claim, and to pay the claimant's reasonable relocation costs; or

(c) State that the construction professional disputes the claim and will neither remedy the construction defect nor compromise and settle the claim.

(3)(a) If the construction professional disputes the claim or does not respond to the claimant's notice of claim within the time stated in subsection (2) of this section, the claimant may bring an action against the construction professional for the claim described in the notice of claim without further notice.

(b) If the claimant rejects the inspection proposal or the settlement offer made by the construction professional pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the claimant shall serve written notice of the claimant's rejection on the construction professional. After service of the rejection, the claimant may bring an action against the construction professional for the construction defect claim described in the notice of claim. If the construction professional has not received from the claimant, within ((thirty))30 days after the claimant's receipt of the construction professional's response, either an acceptance or rejection of the inspection proposal or settlement offer, then at anytime thereafter the construction professional may terminate the proposal or offer by serving written notice to the claimant, and the claimant may thereafter bring an action against the construction professional for the construction defect claim described in the notice of claim.

(4)(a) If the claimant elects to allow the construction professional to inspect in accordance with the construction professional's proposal pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section, the claimant shall provide the construction professional and its contractors or other agents reasonable access to the claimant's residence during normal working hours to inspect the premises and the claimed defect.

(b) Within ((fourteen))14 days following completion of the inspection, the construction professional shall serve on the claimant:

(i) A written offer to remedy the construction defect at no cost to the claimant, including a report of the scope of the inspection, the findings and results of the inspection, a description of the additional construction necessary to remedy the defect described in the claim, and a timetable for the completion of such construction;

(ii) A written offer to compromise and settle the claim by monetary payment pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section; or

(iii) A written statement that the construction professional will not proceed further to remedy the defect.

(c) If the construction professional does not proceed further to remedy the construction defect within the agreed timetable, or if the construction professional fails to comply with the provisions of (b) of this subsection, the claimant may bring an action against the construction professional for the claim described in the notice of claim and written defect assessment report under subsection (1)(b) of this section without further notice.

(d) If the claimant rejects the offer made by the construction professional pursuant to (b)(i) or (ii) of this subsection to either remedy the construction defect or to compromise and settle the claim by monetary payment, the claimant shall serve written notice of the claimant's rejection on the construction professional. After service of the rejection notice, the claimant may bring an action against the construction professional for the construction defect claim described in the notice of claim and written defect assessment report under subsection (1)(b) of this section. If the construction professional has not received from the claimant, within ((thirty))30 days after the claimant's receipt of the construction professional's response, either an acceptance or rejection of the offer made pursuant to (b)(i) or (ii) of this subsection, then at anytime thereafter the construction professional may terminate the offer by serving written notice to the claimant.

(5)(a) Any claimant accepting the offer of a construction professional to remedy the construction defect pursuant to subsection (4)(b)(i) of this section shall do so by serving the construction professional with a written notice of acceptance within a reasonable time period after receipt of the offer, and no later than ((thirty))30 days after receipt of the offer. The claimant shall provide the construction professional and its contractors or other agents reasonable access to the claimant's residence during normal working hours to perform and complete the construction by the timetable stated in the offer.

(b) The claimant and construction professional may, by written mutual agreement, alter the extent of construction or the timetable for completion of construction stated in the offer, including, but not limited to, repair of additional defects.

(6) Any action commenced by a claimant prior to compliance with the requirements of this section shall be subject to dismissal without prejudice, and may not be recommenced until the claimant has complied with the requirements of this section.

(7) Nothing in this section may be construed to prevent a claimant from commencing an action on the construction defect claim described in the notice of claim and written defect assessment report under subsection (1)(b) of this section if the construction professional fails to perform the construction agreed upon, fails to remedy the defect, or fails to perform by the timetable agreed upon pursuant to subsection (2)(a) or (5) of this section.

(8) Prior to commencing any action alleging a construction defect, or after the dismissal of any action without prejudice pursuant to subsection (6) of this section, the claimant may amend the notice of claim to include construction defects discovered after the service of the original notice of claim, and must otherwise comply with the requirements of this section for the additional claims including amending the written defect assessment report under subsection (1)(b) of this section. The service of an amended notice of claim shall relate back to the original notice of claim for purposes of tolling statutes of limitations and repose. Claims for defects discovered after the commencement or recommencement of an action may be added to such action only after providing notice to the construction professional of the defect, the amended written defect assessment report, and allowing for response under subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 5. RCW 64.50.040 and 2002 c 323 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) In the event the board of directors, pursuant to RCW 64.34.304(1)(d) or 64.38.020(4), institutes an action asserting defects in the construction of two or more residences, common elements, or common areas, this section shall apply. For purposes of this section, "action" has the same meaning as set forth in RCW 64.50.010.

(b) The board of directors shall substantially comply with the provisions of this section.

(2)(a) Prior to the service of the summons and complaint on any defendant with respect to an action governed by this section, the board of directors shall mail or deliver (i) written notice of the commencement or anticipated commencement of such action and (ii) written defect assessment report to each homeowner at the last known address described in the association's records.

(b) The notice required by (a) of this subsection shall state a general description of the following:

(i) The nature of the action and the relief sought; and

(ii) The expenses and fees that the board of directors anticipates will be incurred in prosecuting the action.

(c) The report required by (a) of this subsection shall comply with RCW 64.50.020.

(3) Nothing in this section may be construed to:

(a) Require the disclosure in the notice or the disclosure to a unit owner of attorney-client communications or other privileged communications;

(b) Permit the notice to serve as a basis for any person to assert the waiver of any applicable privilege or right of confidentiality resulting from, or to claim immunity in connection with, the disclosure of information in the notice; or

(c) Limit or impair the authority of the board of directors to contract for legal services, or limit or impair the ability to enforce such a contract for legal services.

Sec. 6. RCW 64.50.050 and 2002 c 323 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The construction professional shall provide notice to each homeowner upon entering into a contract for sale, construction, or substantial remodel of a residence, of the construction professional's right to offer to cure construction defects before a homeowner may commence litigation against the construction professional. Such notice shall be conspicuous and may be included as part of the underlying contract signed by the homeowner. In the sale of a condominium unit, the requirement for delivery of such notice shall be deemed satisfied if contained in a public offering statement delivered in accordance with chapter 64.34 RCW.

(2) The notice required by this subsection shall be in substantially the following form:

CHAPTER 64.50 RCW CONTAINS IMPORTANT REQUIREMENTS YOU MUST FOLLOW BEFORE YOU MAY FILE A LAWSUIT FOR DEFECTIVE CONSTRUCTION AGAINST THE SELLER OR BUILDER OF YOUR HOME. FORTY-FIVE DAYS BEFORE YOU FILE YOUR LAWSUIT, YOU MUST DELIVER TO THE SELLER OR BUILDER A WRITTEN NOTICE OF ANY CONSTRUCTION CONDITIONS YOU ALLEGE ARE DEFECTIVE, A WRITTEN DEFECT NOTICE REPORT PURSUANT TO RCW 64.50.020(1)(b), AND PROVIDE YOUR SELLER OR BUILDER THE OPPORTUNITY TO MAKE AN OFFER TO REPAIR OR PAY FOR THE DEFECTS. YOU ARE NOT OBLIGATED TO ACCEPT ANY OFFER MADE BY THE BUILDER OR SELLER. IF YOU REJECT A REASONABLE OFFER OR DO NOT PERMIT THE CONTRACTOR OR INDEPENDENT CONTRACTOR A REASONABLE OPPORTUNITY TO INSPECT OR REPAIR THE DEFECT PURSUANT TO AN ACCEPTED OFFER TO REPAIR OR PAY FOR THE DEFECTS, YOU:

(1) MAY NOT RECOVER AN AMOUNT IN EXCESS OF THE FAIR MARKET VALUE OF THE CONTRACTOR'S OFFER; AND

(2) MAY RECOVER ONLY THE AMOUNT OF REASONABLE AND NECESSARY COSTS AND ATTORNEYS' FEES INCURRED BEFORE THE OFFER WAS REJECTED OR CONSIDERED REJECTED.THERE ARE STRICT DEADLINES AND PROCEDURES UNDER STATE LAW, AND FAILURE TO FOLLOW THEM MAY AFFECT YOUR ABILITY TO FILE A LAWSUIT.

(3) This chapter shall not preclude or bar any action if notice is not given to the homeowner as required by this section.

Sec. 7. RCW 64.90.250 and 2018 c 277 s 211 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To exercise any development right reserved under RCW 64.90.225(1)(((h)))(g), the declarant must prepare, execute, and record any amendments to the declaration and map in accordance with the requirements of RCW 64.90.245 and 64.90.285(3). The declarant is the unit owner of any units created. The amendment to the declaration must assign an identifying number to each new unit created and, except in the case of subdivision, combination, or conversion of units described in subsection (3) of this section, reallocate the allocated interests among all units. The amendment must describe any common elements and any limited common elements created and, in the case of limited common elements, designate the unit to which each is allocated to the extent required under RCW 64.90.240. The amendments are effective upon recording.

(2) Development rights may be reserved within any real estate added to the common interest community if the amendment to the declaration adding that real estate includes all matters required under RCW 64.90.225 and 64.90.230 and the amendment to the map includes all matters required under RCW 64.90.245. This subsection does not extend the time limit on the exercise of development rights imposed by the declaration pursuant to RCW 64.90.225(1)(h).

(3) When a declarant exercises a development right to subdivide, combine, or convert a unit previously created into additional units or common elements, or both:

(a) If the declarant converts the unit entirely into common elements, the amendment to the declaration must reallocate all the allocated interests of that unit among the other units as if that unit had been taken by condemnation under RCW 64.90.030; or

(b) If the declarant subdivides the unit into two or more units, whether or not any part of the unit is converted into common elements, the amendment to the declaration must reallocate all the allocated interests of the unit among the units created by the subdivision in any reasonable manner prescribed by the declarant.

(4) If the declaration provides, pursuant to RCW 64.90.225(1)(h), that all or a portion of the real estate is subject to a right of withdrawal:

(a) If all the real estate is subject to withdrawal, and the declaration or map or amendment to the declaration or map does not describe separate portions of real estate subject to that right, none of the real estate may be withdrawn if a unit in that real estate has been conveyed to a purchaser; or

(b) If any portion of the real estate is subject to withdrawal as described in the declaration or map or amendment to the declaration or map, none of that portion of the real estate may be withdrawn if a unit in that portion has been conveyed to a purchaser.

(5) If the declarant combines two or more units into a lesser number of units, whether or not any part of a unit is converted into common elements or common elements are converted units, the amendment to the declaration must reallocate all of the allocated interests of the units being combined into the unit or units created by the combination in any reasonable manner prescribed by the declarant.

(6) A unit conveyed to a purchaser may not be withdrawn pursuant to subsection (4)(a) or (b) of this section without the consent of the unit owner of that unit and the holder of a security interest in the unit.

Sec. 8. RCW 64.90.605 and 2018 c 277 s 402 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in subsection (2) of this section, a declarant required to deliver a public offering statement pursuant to subsection (3) of this section must prepare a public offering statement conforming to the requirements of RCW 64.90.610, 64.90.615, and 64.90.620.

(2) A declarant may transfer responsibility for preparation of all or a part of the public offering statement to a successor declarant or to a dealer who intends to offer units in the ((condominium))common interest community.

(3)(a) Any declarant or dealer who offers to convey a unit for the person's own account to a purchaser must provide the purchaser of the unit with a copy of a public offering statement and all material amendments to the public offering statement before conveyance of that unit.

(b) Any agent, attorney, or other person assisting the declarant or dealer in preparing the public offering statement may rely upon information provided by the declarant or dealer without independent investigation. The agent, attorney, or other person is not liable for any material misrepresentation in or omissions of material facts from the public offering statement unless the person had actual knowledge of the misrepresentation or omission at the time the public offering statement was prepared.

(c) The declarant or dealer is liable for any misrepresentation contained in the public offering statement or for any omission of material fact from the public offering statement if the declarant or dealer had actual knowledge of the misrepresentation or omission or, in the exercise of reasonable care, should have known of the misrepresentation or omission.

(4) If a unit is part of a common interest community and is part of any other real estate regime in connection with the sale of which the delivery of a public offering statement is required under the laws of this state, a single public offering statement conforming to the requirements of RCW 64.90.610, 64.90.615, and 64.90.620 as those requirements relate to each regime in which the unit is located, and to any other requirements imposed under the laws of this state, may be prepared and delivered in lieu of providing two or more public offering statements.

(5) A declarant is not required to prepare and deliver a public offering statement in connection with the sale of any unit owned by the declarant, or to obtain for or provide to the purchaser a report or statement required under RCW 64.90.610(1)(oo), 64.90.620(1), or 64.90.655, upon the later of:

(a) The termination or expiration of all special declarant rights;

(b) The expiration of all periods within which claims or actions for a breach of warranty arising from defects involving the common elements under RCW 64.90.680 must be filed or commenced, respectively, by the association against the declarant; or

(c) The time when the declarant ceases to meet the definition of a dealer under RCW 64.90.010.

(6) After the last to occur of any of the events described in subsection (5) of this section, a declarant must deliver to the purchaser of a unit owned by the declarant a resale certificate under RCW 64.90.640(2) together with:

(a) The identification of any real property not in the common interest community that unit owners have a right to use and a description of the terms of such use;

(b) A brief description or a copy of any express construction warranties to be provided to the purchaser;

(c) A statement of any litigation brought by an owners' association, unit owner, or governmental entity in which the declarant or any affiliate of the declarant has been a defendant arising out of the construction, sale, or administration of any common interest community within the state of Washington within the previous five years, together with the results of the litigation, if known;

(d) Whether timesharing is permitted or prohibited, and, if permitted, a statement that the purchaser of a time share unit is entitled to receive the disclosure document required under chapter 64.36 RCW; and

(e) Any other information and cross-references that the declarant believes will be helpful in describing the common interest community to the purchaser, all of which may be included or not included at the option of the declarant.

(7) A declarant is not liable to a purchaser for the failure or delay of the association to provide the resale certificate in a timely manner, but the purchase contract is voidable by the purchaser of a unit sold by the declarant until the resale certificate required under RCW 64.90.640(2) and the information required under subsection (6) of this section have been provided and for five days thereafter or until conveyance, whichever occurs first.

Sec. 9. RCW 64.90.645 and 2021 c 260 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any earnest money deposit, as defined in RCW 64.04.005, made in connection with the right to purchase a unit from a person required to deliver a public offering statement pursuant to RCW 64.90.605(3) must be placed in escrow and held in this state in an escrow or trust account designated solely for that purpose by a licensed title insurance company or agent, a licensed attorney, a real estate broker or independent bonded escrow company, or an institution whose accounts are insured by a governmental agency or instrumentality until: (a) Delivered to the declarant at closing, (b) delivered to the declarant because of the purchaser's default under a contract to purchase the unit, (c) refunded to the purchaser, or (d) delivered to a court in connection with the filing of an interpleader action.

(2)(a) If a purchase agreement for the sale of a unit provides that deposit funds may be used for construction costs and the declarant obtains and maintains a surety bond as required by this section, the declarant may withdraw escrow funds when construction of improvements has begun. The funds may be used only for actual building and construction costs of the project in which the unit is located.

(b) The bond must be issued by a surety insurer licensed in this state in favor of the purchaser in an amount adequate to cover the amount of the deposit to be withdrawn. The declarant may not withdraw more than the face amount of the bond. The bond must be payable to the purchaser if the purchaser obtains a final judgment against the declarant requiring the declarant to return the deposit pursuant to the purchase agreement. The bond may be either in the form of an individual bond for each deposit accepted by the declarant or in the form of a blanket bond assuring the return of all deposits received by the declarant.

(c) The party holding escrow funds who releases all or any
portion of the funds to the declarant has no obligation to monitor the
progress of construction or the expenditure of the funds by the
declarant and is not liable to any purchaser for the release of funds
pursuant to this section.

(3) ((A))The amount of deposit ((under))funds that may be used pursuant to subsection (2) of this section may not exceed five percent of the purchase price.

Sec. 10. RCW 64.90.665 and 2018 c 277 s 414 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to subsections (2) and (3) of this section, express warranties made by any declarant or dealer to a purchaser of a unit in a condominium, if relied upon by the purchaser in purchasing the unit, are created as follows:

(a) Any written affirmation of fact or written promise that relates to the unit, its use, or rights appurtenant to the unit or its use, improvements to the condominium that would directly benefit the unit, or the right to use or have the benefit of facilities not located in the condominium creates an express warranty that the unit and related rights and uses will not materially deviate from the affirmation or promise.

(b) Any written description of the physical characteristics of the condominium at the time the purchase agreement is executed, including plans and specifications of or for improvements, creates an express warranty that the condominium will conform to the written description in all material respects.

(c) Any written description of the quantity or extent of the real estate comprising the condominium, including plats or surveys, creates an express warranty that the condominium will conform to the description, subject to customary tolerances.

(d) A written statement that a purchaser may put a unit only to a specified use is an express warranty that the specified use is lawful.

(2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, neither formal words, such as "warranty" or "guarantee," nor a specific intention to make a warranty are necessary to create an express warranty, but a statement of opinion or a commendation of the real estate, its quality, or its value does not create a warranty, and a statement, promise, model, depiction, or description does not create a warranty if it discloses that it is only proposed, is not representative, or is subject to change.

(3) A purchaser may not rely on any ((statement,)) affirmation, promise, ((model, depiction, or)) description, plans, specifications, plat, survey, statement, or other item unless it is contained in the public offering statement delivered to the purchaser or made in a record signed by the declarant or dealer, or the declarant's or dealer's agent identified in the public offering statement.

(4) Any conveyance of a unit transfers to the purchaser all express warranties of quality made by the declarant or dealer.

Sec. 11. RCW 64.90.670 and 2019 c 238 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A declarant and any dealer warrants to a purchaser of a condominium unit that the unit will be in at least as good condition at the earlier of the time of the conveyance or delivery of possession as it was at the time of contracting, except for reasonable wear and tear and damage by casualty or condemnation.

(2) A declarant and any dealer impliedly warrants to a purchaser of a condominium unit that the unit and the common elements in the condominium are suitable for the ordinary uses of real estate of its type and that any improvements made or contracted for by such declarant or dealer will be:

(a) Free from defective materials;

(b) Constructed in accordance with engineering and construction standards, including applicable building codes, generally accepted in the state of Washington at the time of construction; and

(c) Constructed in a workmanlike manner.

(3) A declarant and any dealer warrants to a purchaser of a condominium unit that may be used for residential use that an existing use, continuation of which is contemplated by the parties, does not violate applicable law at the earlier of the time of conveyance or delivery of possession.

(4) Warranties imposed under this section may be excluded or modified as specified in RCW 64.90.675.

(5) For purposes of this section, improvements made or contracted for by an affiliate of a declarant are made or contracted for by the declarant.

(6) Any conveyance of a condominium unit transfers to the purchaser all of a declarant's or dealer's implied warranties of quality.

(7)(a) In a proceeding for breach of any of the obligations arising under this section, the purchaser must show that the alleged breach has adversely affected or will adversely affect the performance of that portion of the unit or common elements alleged to be in breach. Nothing in this section limits the ability of a board to bring claims on behalf of two or more unit owners pursuant to RCW 64.90.405(2)(d).

(b) To establish an adverse effect on performance, the purchaser is required to prove that the alleged breach:

(i) Is more than technical;

(ii) Is significant to a reasonable person; and

(iii) Has caused or will cause physical damage to the unit or common elements; has materially impaired the performance of mechanical, electrical, plumbing, elevator, or similar building equipment; or presents an actual, unreasonable safety risk to the occupants of the condominium.

(8) Proof of breach of any obligation arising under this section is not proof of damages. Damages awarded for a breach of a warranty arising under subsection (2) of this section are the reasonable cost of repairs. However, if it is established that the cost of such repairs is clearly disproportionate to the loss in market value caused by the breach, damages are limited to the loss in market value.

(9) The warranties described in subsections (1) through (3) of this section are not implied in the purchase and sale of a condominium unit in a building containing 12 or fewer units or three or fewer stories.

Sec. 12. RCW 64.90.675 and 2018 c 277 s 416 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as limited under subsection (2) of this section with respect to a purchaser of a condominium unit that may be used for residential use, implied warranties of quality under RCW 64.90.670:

(a) May be excluded or modified by written agreement of the parties; and

(b) Are excluded by written expression of disclaimer, such as "as is," "with all faults," or other language that in common understanding calls the buyer's attention to the exclusion of warranties.

(2) With respect to a purchaser of a condominium unit that may be ((used))occupied for residential use, no general disclaimer of implied warranties of quality under RCW 64.90.670 is effective, ((except that))but a declarant and any dealer may disclaim liability in an instrument for one or more specified defects or failures to comply with applicable law, if:

(a) ((The declarant or dealer knows or has reason to believe that the specific defects or failures exist at the time of disclosure;

(b))) The ((disclaimer))instrument specifically describes the defects or failures;

(((c)))(b) The ((disclaimer))instrument includes a statement as to the effect of the defects or failures;

(((d)))(c) The ((disclaimer))instrument is bold faced, capitalized, underlined, or otherwise set out from surrounding material so as to be conspicuous; and

(((e)))(d) The ((disclaimer))instrument is signed by the purchaser.

(3) A declarant or dealer may not make an express written warranty of quality that limits the implied warranties of quality made to the purchaser set forth in RCW 64.90.670.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. A new section is added to chapter 19.27 RCW to read as follows:

The building code council shall adopt specific building and energy code provisions for multiunit residential buildings between two and 12 units and three or fewer stories, including approval of a variety of complete building designs and styles that are compatible in size and form with single-family neighborhoods and capable of being constructed on common residential lot sizes. The purpose of this section is to direct the council to support homeownership by adopting code provisions and complete building designs that minimize the costs of design, permitting, and construction. The code provisions and building designs approved by the council will apply statewide, and a local government may modify code provisions or building designs only to decrease design, permitting, or construction costs.

Sec. 14. RCW 82.45.010 and 2022 c 199 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As used in this chapter, the term "sale" has its ordinary meaning and includes any conveyance, grant, assignment, quitclaim, or transfer of the ownership of or title to real property, including standing timber, or any estate or interest therein for a valuable consideration, and any contract for such conveyance, grant, assignment, quitclaim, or transfer, and any lease with an option to purchase real property, including standing timber, or any estate or interest therein or other contract under which possession of the property is given to the purchaser, or any other person at the purchaser's direction, and title to the property is retained by the vendor as security for the payment of the purchase price. The term also includes the grant, assignment, quitclaim, sale, or transfer of improvements constructed upon leased land.

(2)(a) The term "sale" also includes the transfer or acquisition within any ((thirty-six))36 month period of a controlling interest in any entity with an interest in real property located in this state for a valuable consideration.

(b) For the sole purpose of determining whether, pursuant to the exercise of an option, a controlling interest was transferred or acquired within a ((thirty-six))36 month period, the date that the option agreement was executed is the date on which the transfer or acquisition of the controlling interest is deemed to occur. For all other purposes under this chapter, the date upon which the option is exercised is the date of the transfer or acquisition of the controlling interest.

(c) For purposes of this subsection, all acquisitions of persons acting in concert must be aggregated for purposes of determining whether a transfer or acquisition of a controlling interest has taken place. The department must adopt standards by rule to determine when persons are acting in concert. In adopting a rule for this purpose, the department must consider the following:

(i) Persons must be treated as acting in concert when they have a relationship with each other such that one person influences or controls the actions of another through common ownership; and

(ii) When persons are not commonly owned or controlled, they must be treated as acting in concert only when the unity with which the purchasers have negotiated and will consummate the transfer of ownership interests supports a finding that they are acting as a single entity. If the acquisitions are completely independent, with each purchaser buying without regard to the identity of the other purchasers, then the acquisitions are considered separate acquisitions.

(3) The term "sale" does not include:

(a) A transfer by gift, devise, or inheritance.

(b) A transfer by transfer on death deed, to the extent that it is not in satisfaction of a contractual obligation of the decedent owed to the recipient of the property.

(c) A transfer of any leasehold interest other than of the type mentioned above.

(d) A cancellation or forfeiture of a vendee's interest in a contract for the sale of real property, whether or not such contract contains a forfeiture clause, or deed in lieu of foreclosure of a mortgage.

(e) The partition of property by tenants in common by agreement or as the result of a court decree.

(f) The assignment of property or interest in property from one spouse or one domestic partner to the other spouse or other domestic partner in accordance with the terms of a decree of dissolution of marriage or state registered domestic partnership or in fulfillment of a property settlement agreement.

(g) The assignment or other transfer of a vendor's interest in a contract for the sale of real property, even though accompanied by a conveyance of the vendor's interest in the real property involved.

(h) Transfers by appropriation or decree in condemnation proceedings brought by the United States, the state or any political subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation.

(i) A mortgage or other transfer of an interest in real property merely to secure a debt, or the assignment thereof.

(j) Any transfer or conveyance made pursuant to a deed of trust or an order of sale by the court in any mortgage, deed of trust, or lien foreclosure proceeding or upon execution of a judgment, or deed in lieu of foreclosure to satisfy a mortgage or deed of trust.

(k) A conveyance to the federal housing administration or veterans administration by an authorized mortgagee made pursuant to a contract of insurance or guaranty with the federal housing administration or veterans administration.

(l) A transfer in compliance with the terms of any lease or contract upon which the tax as imposed by this chapter has been paid or where the lease or contract was entered into prior to the date this tax was first imposed.

(m) The sale of any grave or lot in an established cemetery.

(n) A sale by the United States, this state or any political subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation of this state.

(o) A sale to a regional transit authority or public corporation under RCW 81.112.320 under a sale/leaseback agreement under RCW 81.112.300.

(p) A transfer of real property, however effected, if it consists of a mere change in identity or form of ownership of an entity where there is no change in the beneficial ownership. These include transfers to a corporation or partnership which is wholly owned by the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner. However, if thereafter such transferee corporation or partnership voluntarily transfers such real property, or such transferor, spouse or domestic partner, or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner voluntarily transfer stock in the transferee corporation or interest in the transferee partnership capital, as the case may be, to other than (i) the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner, (ii) a trust having the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner as the only beneficiaries at the time of the transfer to the trust, or (iii) a corporation or partnership wholly owned by the original transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner, within three years of the original transfer to which this exemption applies, and the tax on the subsequent transfer has not been paid within ((sixty))60 days of becoming due, excise taxes become due and payable on the original transfer as otherwise provided by law.

(q)(i) A transfer that for federal income tax purposes does not involve the recognition of gain or loss for entity formation, liquidation or dissolution, and reorganization, including but not limited to nonrecognition of gain or loss because of application of 26 U.S.C. Sec. 332, 337, 351, 368(a)(1), 721, or 731 of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended.

(ii) However, the transfer described in (q)(i) of this subsection cannot be preceded or followed within a ((thirty-six))36 month period by another transfer or series of transfers, that, when combined with the otherwise exempt transfer or transfers described in (q)(i) of this subsection, results in the transfer of a controlling interest in the entity for valuable consideration, and in which one or more persons previously holding a controlling interest in the entity receive cash or property in exchange for any interest the person or persons acting in concert hold in the entity. This subsection (3)(q)(ii) does not apply to that part of the transfer involving property received that is the real property interest that the person or persons originally contributed to the entity or when one or more persons who did not contribute real property or belong to the entity at a time when real property was purchased receive cash or personal property in exchange for that person or persons' interest in the entity. The real estate excise tax under this subsection (3)(q)(ii) is imposed upon the person or persons who previously held a controlling interest in the entity.

(r) A qualified sale of a manufactured/mobile home community, as defined in RCW 59.20.030.

(s)(i) A transfer of a qualified low-income housing development or controlling interest in a qualified low-income housing development, unless, due to noncompliance with federal statutory requirements, the seller is subject to recapture, in whole or in part, of its allocated federal low-income housing tax credits within the four years prior to the date of transfer.

(ii) For purposes of this subsection (3)(s), "qualified low-income housing development" means real property and improvements in respect to which the seller or, in the case of a transfer of a controlling interest, the owner or beneficial owner, was allocated federal low-income housing tax credits authorized under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 42 or successor statute, by the Washington state housing finance commission or successor state-authorized tax credit allocating agency.

(iii) This subsection (3)(s) does not apply to transfers of a qualified low-income housing development or controlling interest in a qualified low-income housing development occurring on or after July 1, 2035.

(iv) The Washington state housing finance commission, in consultation with the department, must gather data on: (A) The fiscal savings, if any, accruing to transferees as a result of the exemption provided in this subsection (3)(s); (B) the extent to which transferors of qualified low-income housing developments receive consideration, including any assumption of debt, as part of a transfer subject to the exemption provided in this subsection (3)(s); and (C) the continued use of the property for low-income housing. The Washington state housing finance commission must provide this information to the joint legislative audit and review committee. The committee must conduct a review of the tax preference created under this subsection (3)(s) in calendar year 2033, as required under chapter 43.136 RCW.

(t)(i) A qualified transfer of residential property by a legal representative of a person with developmental disabilities to a qualified entity subject to the following conditions:

(A) The adult child with developmental disabilities of the transferor of the residential property must be allowed to reside in the residence or successor property so long as the placement is safe and appropriate as determined by the department of social and health services;

(B) The title to the residential property is conveyed without the receipt of consideration by the legal representative of a person with developmental disabilities to a qualified entity;

(C) The residential property must have no more than four living units located on it; and

(D) The residential property transferred must remain in continued use for ((fifty))50 years by the qualified entity as supported living for persons with developmental disabilities by the qualified entity or successor entity. If the qualified entity sells or otherwise conveys ownership of the residential property the proceeds of the sale or conveyance must be used to acquire similar residential property and such similar residential property must be considered the successor for continued use. The property will not be considered in continued use if the department of social and health services finds that the property has failed, after a reasonable time to remedy, to meet any health and safety statutory or regulatory requirements. If the department of social and health services determines that the property fails to meet the requirements for continued use, the department of social and health services must notify the department and the real estate excise tax based on the value of the property at the time of the transfer into use as residential property for persons with developmental disabilities becomes immediately due and payable by the qualified entity. The tax due is not subject to penalties, fees, or interest under this title.

(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(t) the definitions in RCW 71A.10.020 apply.

(iii) A "qualified entity" is:

(A) A nonprofit organization under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, as of June 7, 2018, or a subsidiary under the same taxpayer identification number that provides residential supported living for persons with developmental disabilities; or

(B) A nonprofit adult family home, as defined in RCW 70.128.010, that exclusively serves persons with developmental disabilities.

(iv) In order to receive an exemption under this subsection (3)(t) an affidavit must be submitted by the transferor of the residential property and must include a copy of the transfer agreement and any other documentation as required by the department.

(u)(i) The sale by an affordable homeownership facilitator of self-help housing to a low-income household.

(ii) The definitions in this subsection (3)(u) apply to this subsection (3)(u) unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(A) "Affordable homeownership facilitator" means a nonprofit community or neighborhood-based organization that is exempt from income tax under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c) of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, as of October 1, 2019, and that is the developer of self-help housing.

(B) "Low-income" means household income as defined by the department, provided that the definition may not exceed eighty percent of median household income, adjusted for household size, for the county in which the dwelling is located.

(C) "Self-help housing" means dwelling residences provided for ownership by low-income individuals and families whose ownership requirement includes labor participation. "Self-help housing" does not include residential rental housing provided on a commercial basis to the general public.

(v)(i) A sale or transfer of real property to a qualifying grantee that uses the property for housing for low-income persons and receives or otherwise qualifies the property for an exemption from real and personal property taxes under RCW 84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210, 35.21.755, or 84.36.010. For purposes of this subsection (3)(v), "qualifying grantee" means a nonprofit entity as defined in RCW 84.36.560, a nonprofit entity or qualified cooperative association as defined in RCW 84.36.049, a housing authority created under RCW 35.82.030 or 35.82.300, a public corporation established under RCW 35.21.660 or 35.21.730, or a county or municipal corporation. A qualifying grantee that is a county or municipal corporation must record a covenant at the time of transfer that prohibits using the property for any purpose other than for low-income housing for a period of at least 10 years. At a minimum, the covenant must address price restrictions and household income limits for the low-income housing. A qualifying grantee must comply with the requirements described in (v)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection and must also certify, by affidavit at the time of sale or transfer, that it intends to comply with those requirements.

(A) If the qualifying grantee intends to operate existing housing on the property, within one year of the sale or transfer:

(I) The qualifying grantee must receive or qualify the property for a tax exemption under RCW 84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210, 35.21.755, or 84.36.010; and

(II) The property must be used as housing for low-income persons.

(B) If the qualifying grantee intends to develop new housing on the site, within five years of the sale or transfer:

(I) The qualifying grantee must receive or qualify the property for a tax exemption under RCW 84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210, 35.21.755, or 84.36.010; and

(II) The property must be used as housing for low-income persons.

(C) If the qualifying grantee intends to substantially rehabilitate the premises as defined in RCW 59.18.200, within three years:

(I) The qualifying grantee must receive or qualify the property for a tax exemption under RCW 84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210, 35.21.755, or 84.36.010; and

(II) The property must be used as housing for low-income persons.

(ii) If the qualifying grantee fails to satisfy the requirements described in (v)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, within the timelines described in (v)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, the qualifying grantee must pay the tax that would have otherwise been due at the time of initial transfer, plus interest calculated from the date of initial transfer pursuant to RCW 82.32.050.

(iii) If a qualifying grantee transfers the property to a different qualifying grantee within the original timelines described in (v)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, neither the original qualifying grantee nor the new qualifying grantee is required to pay the tax, so long as the new qualifying grantee satisfies the requirements as described in (v)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection within the exemption period of the initial transfer. If the new qualifying grantee fails to satisfy the requirements described in (v)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, only the new qualifying grantee is liable for the payment of taxes required by (v)(ii) of this subsection. There is no limit on the number of transfers between qualifying grantees within the original timelines.

(iv) Each affidavit must be filed with the department upon completion of the sale or transfer of property, including transfers from a qualifying grantee to a different qualifying grantee. The qualifying grantee must provide proof to the department as required by the department once the requirements as described in (v)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection have been satisfied.

(v) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(v), "low-income" has the same meaning as in (u) of this subsection.

(w) A sale of a condominium unit to a person who is a first-time homebuyer who either uses or meets the eligibility requirements for the first-time homebuyer program offered by the Washington state housing finance commission.

Sec. 15. RCW 82.45.010 and 2022 c 199 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As used in this chapter, the term "sale" has its ordinary meaning and includes any conveyance, grant, assignment, quitclaim, or transfer of the ownership of or title to real property, including standing timber, or any estate or interest therein for a valuable consideration, and any contract for such conveyance, grant, assignment, quitclaim, or transfer, and any lease with an option to purchase real property, including standing timber, or any estate or interest therein or other contract under which possession of the property is given to the purchaser, or any other person at the purchaser's direction, and title to the property is retained by the vendor as security for the payment of the purchase price. The term also includes the grant, assignment, quitclaim, sale, or transfer of improvements constructed upon leased land.

(2)(a) The term "sale" also includes the transfer or acquisition within any ((thirty-six))36 month period of a controlling interest in any entity with an interest in real property located in this state for a valuable consideration.

(b) For the sole purpose of determining whether, pursuant to the exercise of an option, a controlling interest was transferred or acquired within a ((thirty-six))36 month period, the date that the option agreement was executed is the date on which the transfer or acquisition of the controlling interest is deemed to occur. For all other purposes under this chapter, the date upon which the option is exercised is the date of the transfer or acquisition of the controlling interest.

(c) For purposes of this subsection, all acquisitions of persons acting in concert must be aggregated for purposes of determining whether a transfer or acquisition of a controlling interest has taken place. The department must adopt standards by rule to determine when persons are acting in concert. In adopting a rule for this purpose, the department must consider the following:

(i) Persons must be treated as acting in concert when they have a relationship with each other such that one person influences or controls the actions of another through common ownership; and

(ii) When persons are not commonly owned or controlled, they must be treated as acting in concert only when the unity with which the purchasers have negotiated and will consummate the transfer of ownership interests supports a finding that they are acting as a single entity. If the acquisitions are completely independent, with each purchaser buying without regard to the identity of the other purchasers, then the acquisitions are considered separate acquisitions.

(3) The term "sale" does not include:

(a) A transfer by gift, devise, or inheritance.

(b) A transfer by transfer on death deed, to the extent that it is not in satisfaction of a contractual obligation of the decedent owed to the recipient of the property.

(c) A transfer of any leasehold interest other than of the type mentioned above.

(d) A cancellation or forfeiture of a vendee's interest in a contract for the sale of real property, whether or not such contract contains a forfeiture clause, or deed in lieu of foreclosure of a mortgage.

(e) The partition of property by tenants in common by agreement or as the result of a court decree.

(f) The assignment of property or interest in property from one spouse or one domestic partner to the other spouse or other domestic partner in accordance with the terms of a decree of dissolution of marriage or state registered domestic partnership or in fulfillment of a property settlement agreement.

(g) The assignment or other transfer of a vendor's interest in a contract for the sale of real property, even though accompanied by a conveyance of the vendor's interest in the real property involved.

(h) Transfers by appropriation or decree in condemnation proceedings brought by the United States, the state or any political subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation.

(i) A mortgage or other transfer of an interest in real property merely to secure a debt, or the assignment thereof.

(j) Any transfer or conveyance made pursuant to a deed of trust or an order of sale by the court in any mortgage, deed of trust, or lien foreclosure proceeding or upon execution of a judgment, or deed in lieu of foreclosure to satisfy a mortgage or deed of trust.

(k) A conveyance to the federal housing administration or veterans administration by an authorized mortgagee made pursuant to a contract of insurance or guaranty with the federal housing administration or veterans administration.

(l) A transfer in compliance with the terms of any lease or contract upon which the tax as imposed by this chapter has been paid or where the lease or contract was entered into prior to the date this tax was first imposed.

(m) The sale of any grave or lot in an established cemetery.

(n) A sale by the United States, this state or any political subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation of this state.

(o) A sale to a regional transit authority or public corporation under RCW 81.112.320 under a sale/leaseback agreement under RCW 81.112.300.

(p) A transfer of real property, however effected, if it consists of a mere change in identity or form of ownership of an entity where there is no change in the beneficial ownership. These include transfers to a corporation or partnership which is wholly owned by the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner. However, if thereafter such transferee corporation or partnership voluntarily transfers such real property, or such transferor, spouse or domestic partner, or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner voluntarily transfer stock in the transferee corporation or interest in the transferee partnership capital, as the case may be, to other than (i) the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner, (ii) a trust having the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner as the only beneficiaries at the time of the transfer to the trust, or (iii) a corporation or partnership wholly owned by the original transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner, within three years of the original transfer to which this exemption applies, and the tax on the subsequent transfer has not been paid within ((sixty))60 days of becoming due, excise taxes become due and payable on the original transfer as otherwise provided by law.

(q)(i) A transfer that for federal income tax purposes does not involve the recognition of gain or loss for entity formation, liquidation or dissolution, and reorganization, including but not limited to nonrecognition of gain or loss because of application of 26 U.S.C. Sec. 332, 337, 351, 368(a)(1), 721, or 731 of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended.

(ii) However, the transfer described in (q)(i) of this subsection cannot be preceded or followed within a ((thirty-six))36 month period by another transfer or series of transfers, that, when combined with the otherwise exempt transfer or transfers described in (q)(i) of this subsection, results in the transfer of a controlling interest in the entity for valuable consideration, and in which one or more persons previously holding a controlling interest in the entity receive cash or property in exchange for any interest the person or persons acting in concert hold in the entity. This subsection (3)(q)(ii) does not apply to that part of the transfer involving property received that is the real property interest that the person or persons originally contributed to the entity or when one or more persons who did not contribute real property or belong to the entity at a time when real property was purchased receive cash or personal property in exchange for that person or persons' interest in the entity. The real estate excise tax under this subsection (3)(q)(ii) is imposed upon the person or persons who previously held a controlling interest in the entity.

(r) A qualified sale of a manufactured/mobile home community, as defined in RCW 59.20.030, that takes place on or after June 12, 2008, but before December 31, 2018.

(s)(i) A transfer of a qualified low-income housing development or controlling interest in a qualified low-income housing development, unless, due to noncompliance with federal statutory requirements, the seller is subject to recapture, in whole or in part, of its allocated federal low-income housing tax credits within the four years prior to the date of transfer.

(ii) For purposes of this subsection (3)(s), "qualified low-income housing development" means real property and improvements in respect to which the seller or, in the case of a transfer of a controlling interest, the owner or beneficial owner, was allocated federal low-income housing tax credits authorized under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 42 or successor statute, by the Washington state housing finance commission or successor state-authorized tax credit allocating agency.

(iii) This subsection (3)(s) does not apply to transfers of a qualified low-income housing development or controlling interest in a qualified low-income housing development occurring on or after July 1, 2035.

(iv) The Washington state housing finance commission, in consultation with the department, must gather data on: (A) The fiscal savings, if any, accruing to transferees as a result of the exemption provided in this subsection (3)(s); (B) the extent to which transferors of qualified low-income housing developments receive consideration, including any assumption of debt, as part of a transfer subject to the exemption provided in this subsection (3)(s); and (C) the continued use of the property for low-income housing. The Washington state housing finance commission must provide this information to the joint legislative audit and review committee. The committee must conduct a review of the tax preference created under this subsection (3)(s) in calendar year 2033, as required under chapter 43.136 RCW.

(t)(i) A qualified transfer of residential property by a legal representative of a person with developmental disabilities to a qualified entity subject to the following conditions:

(A) The adult child with developmental disabilities of the transferor of the residential property must be allowed to reside in the residence or successor property so long as the placement is safe and appropriate as determined by the department of social and health services;

(B) The title to the residential property is conveyed without the receipt of consideration by the legal representative of a person with developmental disabilities to a qualified entity;

(C) The residential property must have no more than four living units located on it; and

(D) The residential property transferred must remain in continued use for ((fifty))50 years by the qualified entity as supported living for persons with developmental disabilities by the qualified entity or successor entity. If the qualified entity sells or otherwise conveys ownership of the residential property the proceeds of the sale or conveyance must be used to acquire similar residential property and such similar residential property must be considered the successor for continued use. The property will not be considered in continued use if the department of social and health services finds that the property has failed, after a reasonable time to remedy, to meet any health and safety statutory or regulatory requirements. If the department of social and health services determines that the property fails to meet the requirements for continued use, the department of social and health services must notify the department and the real estate excise tax based on the value of the property at the time of the transfer into use as residential property for persons with developmental disabilities becomes immediately due and payable by the qualified entity. The tax due is not subject to penalties, fees, or interest under this title.

(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(t) the definitions in RCW 71A.10.020 apply.

(iii) A "qualified entity" is:

(A) A nonprofit organization under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, as of June 7, 2018, or a subsidiary under the same taxpayer identification number that provides residential supported living for persons with developmental disabilities; or

(B) A nonprofit adult family home, as defined in RCW 70.128.010, that exclusively serves persons with developmental disabilities.

(iv) In order to receive an exemption under this subsection (3)(t) an affidavit must be submitted by the transferor of the residential property and must include a copy of the transfer agreement and any other documentation as required by the department.

(u)(i) A sale or transfer of real property to a qualifying grantee that uses the property for housing for low-income persons and receives or otherwise qualifies the property for an exemption from real and personal property taxes under RCW 84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210, 35.21.755, or 84.36.010. For purposes of this subsection (3)(u), "qualifying grantee" means a nonprofit entity as defined in RCW 84.36.560, a nonprofit entity or qualified cooperative association as defined in RCW 84.36.049, a housing authority created under RCW 35.82.030 or 35.82.300, a public corporation established under RCW 35.21.660 or 35.21.730, or a county or municipal corporation. A qualifying grantee that is a county or municipal corporation must record a covenant at the time of transfer that prohibits using the property for any purpose other than for low-income housing for a period of at least 10 years. At a minimum, the covenant must address price restrictions and household income limits for the low-income housing. A qualifying grantee must comply with the requirements described in (u)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection and must also certify, by affidavit at the time of sale or transfer, that it intends to comply with those requirements.

(A) If the qualifying grantee intends to operate existing housing on the property, within one year of the sale or transfer:

(I) The qualifying grantee must receive or qualify the property for a tax exemption under RCW 84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210, 35.21.755, or 84.36.010; and

(II) The property must be used as housing for low-income persons.

(B) If the qualifying grantee intends to develop new housing on the site, within five years of the sale or transfer:

(I) The qualifying grantee must receive or qualify the property for a tax exemption under RCW 84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210, 35.21.755, or 84.36.010; and

(II) The property must be used as housing for low-income persons.

(C) If the qualifying grantee intends to substantially rehabilitate the premises as defined in RCW 59.18.200, within three years:

(I) The qualifying grantee must receive or qualify the property for a tax exemption under RCW 84.36.560, 84.36.049, 35.82.210, 35.21.755, or 84.36.010; and

(II) The property must be used as housing for low-income persons.

(ii) If the qualifying grantee fails to satisfy the requirements described in (u)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, within the timelines described in (u)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, the qualifying grantee must pay the tax that would have otherwise been due at the time of initial transfer, plus interest calculated from the date of initial transfer pursuant to RCW 82.32.050.

(iii) If a qualifying grantee transfers the property to a different qualifying grantee within the original timelines described in (u)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, neither the original qualifying grantee nor the new qualifying grantee is required to pay the tax, so long as the new qualifying grantee satisfies the requirements as described in (u)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection within the exemption period of the initial transfer. If the new qualifying grantee fails to satisfy the requirements described in (u)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection, only the new qualifying grantee is liable for the payment of taxes required by (u)(ii) of this subsection. There is no limit on the number of transfers between qualifying grantees within the original timelines.

(iv) Each affidavit must be filed with the department upon completion of the sale or transfer of property, including transfers from a qualifying grantee to a different qualifying grantee. The qualifying grantee must provide proof to the department as required by the department once the requirements as described in (u)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection have been satisfied.

(v) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(u), "low-income" means household income as defined by the department, provided that the definition may not exceed 80 percent of median household income, adjusted for household size, for the county in which the dwelling is located.

(v) A sale of a condominium unit to a person who is a first-time homebuyer who either uses or meets the eligibility requirements for the first-time homebuyer program offered by the Washington state housing finance commission.

Sec. 16. RCW 82.02.060 and 2021 c 72 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The local ordinance by which impact fees are imposed:

(1) Shall include a schedule of impact fees which shall be adopted for each type of development activity that is subject to impact fees, specifying the amount of the impact fee to be imposed for each type of system improvement. The schedule shall be based upon a formula or other method of calculating such impact fees. The schedule shall reflect the proportionate impact of new housing units, including multifamily and condominium units, based on the square footage and number of bedrooms in the housing unit in order to produce a proportionally lower impact fee for smaller housing units. In determining proportionate share, the formula or other method of calculating impact fees shall incorporate, among other things, the following:

(a) The cost of public facilities necessitated by new development;

(b) An adjustment to the cost of the public facilities for past or future payments made or reasonably anticipated to be made by new development to pay for particular system improvements in the form of user fees, debt service payments, taxes, or other payments earmarked for or proratable to the particular system improvement;

(c) The availability of other means of funding public facility improvements;

(d) The cost of existing public facilities improvements; and

(e) The methods by which public facilities improvements were financed;

(2) May provide an exemption for low-income housing, and other development activities with broad public purposes, including development of an early learning facility, from these impact fees, provided that the impact fees for such development activity shall be paid from public funds other than impact fee accounts;

(3)(a) May not impose an impact fee on development activities of an early learning facility greater than that imposed on commercial retail or commercial office development activities that generate a similar number, volume, type, and duration of vehicle trips;

(b) When a facility or development has more than one use, the limitations in this subsection (3) or the exemption applicable to an early learning facility in subsections (2) and (4) of this section only apply to that portion that is developed as an early learning facility. The impact fee assessed on an early learning facility in such a development or facility may not exceed the least of the impact fees assessed on comparable businesses in the facility or development;

(4) May provide an exemption from impact fees for low-income housing or for early learning facilities. Local governments that grant exemptions for low-income housing or for early learning facilities under this subsection (4) may either: Grant a partial exemption of not more than eighty percent of impact fees, in which case there is no explicit requirement to pay the exempted portion of the fee from public funds other than impact fee accounts; or provide a full waiver, in which case the remaining percentage of the exempted fee must be paid from public funds other than impact fee accounts, except as provided in (b) of this subsection. These exemptions are subject to the following requirements:

(a) An exemption for low-income housing granted under subsection (2) of this section or this subsection (4) must be conditioned upon requiring the developer to record a covenant that, except as provided otherwise by this subsection, prohibits using the property for any purpose other than for low-income housing. At a minimum, the covenant must address price restrictions and household income limits for the low-income housing, and that if the property is converted to a use other than for low-income housing, the property owner must pay the applicable impact fees in effect at the time of conversion;

(b) An exemption for early learning facilities granted under subsection (2) of this section or this subsection (4) may be a full waiver without an explicit requirement to pay the exempted portion of the fee from public funds other than impact fee accounts if the local government requires the developer to record a covenant that requires that at least 25 percent of the children and families using the early learning facility qualify for state subsidized child care, including early childhood education and assistance under chapter 43.216 RCW, and that provides that if the property is converted to a use other than for an early learning facility, the property owner must pay the applicable impact fees in effect at the time of conversion, and that also provides that if at no point during a calendar year does the early learning facility achieve the required percentage of children and families qualified for state subsidized child care using the early learning facility, the property owner must pay 20 percent of the impact fee that would have been imposed on the development had there not been an exemption within 90 days of the local government notifying the property owner of the breach, and any balance remaining thereafter shall be a lien on the property; and

(c) Covenants required by (a) and (b) of this subsection must be recorded with the applicable county auditor or recording officer. A local government granting an exemption under subsection (2) of this section or this subsection (4) for low-income housing or an early learning facility may not collect revenue lost through granting an exemption by increasing impact fees unrelated to the exemption. A school district who receives school impact fees must approve any exemption under subsection (2) of this section or this subsection (4);

(5) Shall provide a credit for the value of any dedication of land for, improvement to, or new construction of any system improvements provided by the developer, to facilities that are identified in the capital facilities plan and that are required by the county, city, or town as a condition of approving the development activity;

(6) Shall allow the county, city, or town imposing the impact fees to adjust the standard impact fee at the time the fee is imposed to consider unusual circumstances in specific cases to ensure that impact fees are imposed fairly;

(7) Shall include a provision for calculating the amount of the fee to be imposed on a particular development that permits consideration of studies and data submitted by the developer to adjust the amount of the fee;

(8) Shall establish one or more reasonable service areas within which it shall calculate and impose impact fees for various land use categories per unit of development; and

(9) May provide for the imposition of an impact fee for system improvement costs previously incurred by a county, city, or town to the extent that new growth and development will be served by the previously constructed improvements provided such fee shall not be imposed to make up for any system improvement deficiencies.

For purposes of this section, "low-income housing" means housing with a monthly housing expense, that is no greater than thirty percent of eighty percent of the median family income adjusted for family size, for the county where the project is located, as reported by the United States department of housing and urban development.

For the purposes of this section, "early learning facility" has the same meaning as in RCW 43.31.565.

Sec. 17. RCW 58.17.060 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 51 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislative body of a city, town, or county shall adopt regulations and procedures, and appoint administrative personnel for the summary approval of short plats and short subdivisions or alteration or vacation thereof. When an alteration or vacation involves a public dedication, the alteration or vacation shall be processed as provided in RCW 58.17.212 or 58.17.215. Such regulations shall be adopted by ordinance and shall provide that a short plat and short subdivision may be approved only if written findings that are appropriate, as provided in RCW 58.17.110, are made by the administrative personnel, and may contain wholly different requirements than those governing the approval of preliminary and final plats of subdivisions and may require surveys and monumentations and shall require filing of a short plat, or alteration or vacation thereof, for record in the office of the county auditor: PROVIDED, That such regulations must contain a requirement that land in short subdivisions may not be further divided in any manner within a period of five years without the filing of a final plat, except that when the short plat contains fewer than four parcels, nothing in this section shall prevent the owner who filed the short plat from filing an alteration within the five-year period to create up to a total of four lots within the original short plat boundaries: PROVIDED FURTHER, That such regulations are not required to contain a penalty clause as provided in RCW 36.32.120 and may provide for wholly injunctive relief.

An ordinance requiring a survey shall require that the survey be completed and filed with the application for approval of the short subdivision.

(2) Cities, towns, and counties shall include in their short plat regulations and procedures pursuant to subsection (1) of this section provisions for considering sidewalks and other planning features that assure safe walking conditions for students who walk to and from school.

(3) All cities, towns, and counties shall include in their short plat regulations procedures for unit lot subdivisions allowing division of a parent lot into separately owned unit lots. Portions of the parent lot not subdivided for individual unit lots shall be owned in common by the owners of the individual unit lots, or by a homeowners' association comprised of the owners of the individual unit lots.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18. Sections 3 through 6, 10, and 11 of this act apply only to condominium units for which a public offering statement is made after the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19. Section 14 of this act expires January 1, 2030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20. Section 15 of this act takes effect January 1, 2030.

--- END ---