BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 66.44.318 and 2021 c 123 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in this section, nothing is construed to permit a nonretail class liquor licensee's employee or intern between the ages of ((eighteen))18 and ((twenty-one))21 years to handle, transport, or otherwise possess liquor.

(2) Licensees holding nonretail class liquor licenses are permitted to allow their employees between the ages of ((eighteen))18 and ((twenty-one))21 years to stock, merchandise, and handle liquor on or about the:

(a) Nonretail premises if there is an adult ((twenty-one))21 years of age or older on duty supervising such activities on the premises; and

(b) Retail licensee's premises, except between 11:00 p.m. and 4:00 a.m., as long as there is an adult ((twenty-one))21 years of age or older, employed by the retail licensee, and present at the retail licensee's premises during the activities described in this subsection (2).

(3)(a) Employees of ((a domestic winery))licensees identified in (b) of this subsection who are at least age 18 but under 21 years of age may engage in ((wine production and work in a winery's))the manufacture and production of liquor as authorized under the terms of their employer's license, and may work in the licensee's production facility, so long as there is an adult age 21 years of age or older on duty supervising such activities on the premises. Nothing in this subsection authorizes ((a winery))an employee under age 21 to taste, consume, sell, or serve ((wine or)) liquor.

(b) This subsection (3) applies to all licensees with privileges for manufacturing or producing beer, wine, spirits, or any type of liquor under a license issued under this title.

(4) Any act or omission of the nonretail class liquor licensee's employee occurring at or about the retail licensee's premises, which violates any provision of this title, is the sole responsibility of the nonretail class liquor licensee.

(5) Nothing in this section absolves the retail licensee from responsibility for the acts or omissions of its own employees who violate any provision of this title.

(6)(a) Licensees holding a ((domestic winery))nonretail class liquor license are permitted to allow their interns who are between the ages of ((eighteen))18 and ((twenty-one))21 years old to engage in ((wine-production))liquor manufacturing and liquor production-related work at the ((domestic winery's))liquor licensee's licensed location, so long as the intern is enrolled as a student:

(i) At a community or technical college, regional university, or state university with a special permit issued in accordance with RCW 66.20.010; and

(ii) In a required or elective class as part of a degree program identified in RCW 66.20.010(12)(b).

(b) Any act or omission of the ((domestic winery's))liquor licensee's intern occurring at or about the ((domestic winery's))liquor licensee's premises, which violates any provision of this title, is the sole responsibility of the ((domestic winery))liquor licensee.

--- END ---