BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 35.92 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Municipal utilities formed under this chapter may waive connection charges for properties owned or developed by, or on the behalf of, a nonprofit organization, public development authority, housing authority, or local agency that provides emergency shelter, transitional housing, permanent supportive housing, or affordable housing, including a limited partnership as described in RCW 84.36.560(7)(f)(ii) and a limited liability company as described in RCW 84.36.560(7)(f)(iii).

(2) Connection charges waived under this chapter shall be funded using general funds, grant dollars, or other identified revenue stream.

(3) At such time as a property receiving a waiver under subsection (1) of this section is no longer operating under the eligibility requirements under subsection (1) of this section:

(a) The waiver of connection charges required under subsection (1) of this section is no longer required; and

(b) Any connection charges waived under subsection (1) of this section are immediately due and payable to the utility as a condition of continued service.

(4) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Affordable housing" has the same meaning as in RCW 36.70A.030.

(b) "Connection charges" means the one-time capital and administrative charges imposed by a utility on a building or facility owner for a new utility service and costs borne or assessed by a utility for the labor, materials, and services necessary to physically connect a designated facility to the respective utility service.

(c) "Emergency shelter" means any facility that has, as its sole purpose, the provision of a temporary shelter for the homeless and that does not require occupants to sign a lease or occupancy agreement.

(d) "Permanent supportive housing" has the same meaning as in RCW 36.70A.030.

(e) "Transitional housing" has the same meaning as in RCW 84.36.043.

Sec. 2. RCW 35.92.380 and 1980 c 150 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever a city or town waives or delays collection of tap-in charges, connection fees, or hookup fees for ((low income))low-income persons, ((or))a class of ((low income))low-income persons, or a nonprofit organization, public development authority, housing authority, or local agency that provides emergency shelter, transitional housing, permanent supportive housing, or affordable housing as defined in section 1 of this act to connect to lines or pipes used by the city or town to provide utility service, the waiver or delay shall be pursuant to a program established by ordinance. As used in this section, the provision of "utility service" includes, but is not limited to, water, sanitary or storm sewer service, electricity, gas, other means of power, and heat.

--- END ---