BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.36.381 and 2019 c 453 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A person is exempt from any legal obligation to pay all or a portion of the amount of excess and regular real property taxes due and payable in the year following the year in which a claim is filed, and thereafter, in accordance with the following:

(1)(a) The property taxes must have been imposed upon a residence which was occupied by the person claiming the exemption as a principal place of residence as of the time of filing. However, any person who sells, transfers, or is displaced from his or her residence may transfer his or her exemption status to a replacement residence, but no claimant may receive an exemption on more than one residence in any year. Moreover, confinement of the person to a hospital, nursing home, assisted living facility, adult family home, or home of a relative for the purpose of long-term care does not disqualify the claim of exemption if:

(i) The residence is temporarily unoccupied;

(ii) The residence is occupied by a spouse or a domestic partner and/or a person financially dependent on the claimant for support; or

(iii) The residence is rented for the purpose of paying nursing home, hospital, assisted living facility, or adult family home costs.

(b) For the purpose of this subsection (1), "relative" means any individual related to the claimant by blood, marriage, or adoption;

(2) The person claiming the exemption must have owned, at the time of filing, in fee, as a life estate, or by contract purchase, the residence on which the property taxes have been imposed or if the person claiming the exemption lives in a cooperative housing association, corporation, or partnership, such person must own a share therein representing the unit or portion of the structure in which he or she resides. For purposes of this subsection, a residence owned by a marital community or state registered domestic partnership or owned by cotenants is deemed to be owned by each spouse or each domestic partner or each cotenant, and any lease for life is deemed a life estate;

(3)(a) The person claiming the exemption must be:

(i) Sixty-one years of age or older on December 31st of the year in which the exemption claim is filed, or must have been, at the time of filing, retired from regular gainful employment by reason of disability; or

(ii) A veteran of the armed forces of the United States entitled to and receiving compensation from the United States department of veterans affairs at:

(A) A combined service-connected evaluation rating of ((eighty))80 percent or higher; or

(B) A total disability rating for a service-connected disability without regard to evaluation percent.

(b) However, any surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner of a person who was receiving an exemption at the time of the person's death will qualify if the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner is ((fifty-seven))57 years of age or older and otherwise meets the requirements of this section;

(4)(a) The amount that the person is exempt from an obligation to pay is calculated on the basis of combined disposable income, as defined in RCW 84.36.383.

(b) If the person claiming the exemption was retired for two months or more of the assessment year, the combined disposable income of such person must be calculated by multiplying the average monthly combined disposable income of such person during the months such person was retired by ((twelve))12.

(c) If the income of the person claiming exemption is reduced for two or more months of the assessment year by reason of the death of the person's spouse or the person's domestic partner, or when other substantial changes occur in disposable income that are likely to continue for an indefinite period of time, the combined disposable income of such person must be calculated by multiplying the average monthly combined disposable income of such person after such occurrences by ((twelve))12.

(d)(i) If the income of the person claiming the exemption increases as a result of a cost-of-living adjustment to social security benefits or supplemental security income in an amount that would disqualify the applicant from eligibility, the applicant is not disqualified but instead maintains eligibility.

(ii) The continued eligibility under this subsection applies to applications for property taxes levied for collection in calendar year 2024.

(e) If it is necessary to estimate income to comply with this subsection (4), the assessor may require confirming documentation of such income prior to May 31st of the year following application;

(5)(a) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined disposable income equal (([to]))to or less than income threshold 3 is exempt from all excess property taxes, the additional state property tax imposed under RCW 84.52.065(2), and the portion of the regular property taxes authorized pursuant to RCW 84.55.050 and approved by the voters, if the legislative authority of the county or city imposing the additional regular property taxes identified this exemption in the ordinance placing the RCW 84.55.050 measure on the ballot; and

(b)(i) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined disposable income equal to or less than income threshold 2 but greater than income threshold 1 is exempt from all regular property taxes on the greater of ((fifty thousand dollars))$50,000 or ((thirty-five))35 percent of the valuation of his or her residence, but not to exceed ((seventy thousand dollars))$70,000 of the valuation of his or her residence; or

(ii) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined disposable income equal to or less than income threshold 1 is exempt from all regular property taxes on the greater of ((sixty thousand dollars))$60,000 or ((sixty))60 percent of the valuation of his or her residence;

(6)(a) For a person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined disposable income equal (([to]))to or less than income threshold 3, the valuation of the residence is the assessed value of the residence on the later of January 1, 1995, or January 1st of the assessment year the person first qualifies under this section. If the person subsequently fails to qualify under this section only for one year because of high income, this same valuation must be used upon requalification. If the person fails to qualify for more than one year in succession because of high income or fails to qualify for any other reason, the valuation upon requalification is the assessed value on January 1st of the assessment year in which the person requalifies. If the person transfers the exemption under this section to a different residence, the valuation of the different residence is the assessed value of the different residence on January 1st of the assessment year in which the person transfers the exemption.

(b) In no event may the valuation under this subsection be greater than the true and fair value of the residence on January 1st of the assessment year.

(c) This subsection does not apply to subsequent improvements to the property in the year in which the improvements are made. Subsequent improvements to the property must be added to the value otherwise determined under this subsection at their true and fair value in the year in which they are made.

Sec. 2. RCW 84.36.383 and 2021 c 220 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(1) "Combined disposable income" means the disposable income of the person claiming the exemption, plus the disposable income of his or her spouse or domestic partner, and the disposable income of each cotenant occupying the residence for the assessment year, less amounts paid by the person claiming the exemption or his or her spouse or domestic partner during the assessment year for:

(a) Drugs supplied by prescription of a medical practitioner authorized by the laws of this state or another jurisdiction to issue prescriptions;

(b) The treatment or care of either person received in the home or in a nursing home, assisted living facility, or adult family home;

(c) Health care insurance premiums for medicare under Title XVIII of the social security act;

(d) Costs related to medicare supplemental policies as defined in Title 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395ss;

(e) Durable medical equipment, mobility enhancing equipment, medically prescribed oxygen, and prosthetic devices as defined in RCW 82.08.0283;

(f) Long-term care insurance as defined in RCW 48.84.020;

(g) Cost-sharing amounts as defined in RCW 48.43.005;

(h) Nebulizers as defined in RCW 82.08.803;

(i) Medicines of mineral, animal, and botanical origin prescribed, administered, dispensed, or used in the treatment of an individual by a person licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;

(j) Ostomic items as defined in RCW 82.08.804;

(k) Insulin for human use;

(l) Kidney dialysis devices; and

(m) Disposable devices used to deliver drugs for human use as defined in RCW 82.08.935.

(2) "Cotenant" means a person who resides with the person claiming the exemption and who has an ownership interest in the residence.

(3) "County median household income" means the median household income estimates for the state of Washington by county of the legal address of the principal place of residence, as published by the office of financial management.

(4) "Department" means the state department of revenue.

(5) "Disability" has the same meaning as provided in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 423(d)(1)(A) as amended prior to January 1, 2005, or such subsequent date as the department may provide by rule consistent with the purpose of this section.

(6) "Disposable income" means adjusted gross income as defined in the federal internal revenue code, as amended prior to January 1, 1989, or such subsequent date as the director may provide by rule consistent with the purpose of this section, plus all of the following items to the extent they are not included in or have been deducted from adjusted gross income:

(a) Capital gains, other than gain excluded from income under section 121 of the federal internal revenue code to the extent it is reinvested in a new principal residence;

(b) Amounts deducted for loss;

(c) Amounts deducted for depreciation;

(d) Pension and annuity receipts;

(e) Military pay and benefits other than attendant-care and medical-aid payments;

(f) Veterans benefits, other than:

(i) Attendant-care payments;

(ii) Medical-aid payments;

(iii) Disability compensation, as defined in Title 38, part 3, section 3.4 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as of January 1, 2008; and

(iv) Dependency and indemnity compensation, as defined in Title 38, part 3, section 3.5 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as of January 1, 2008;

(g) Federal social security act and railroad retirement benefits;

(h) Dividend receipts; and

(i) Interest received on state and municipal bonds.

(7) "Income threshold 1" means:

(a) For taxes levied for collection in calendar years prior to 2020, a combined disposable income equal to ((thirty thousand dollars))$30,000; ((and))

(b) For taxes levied for collection in calendar years 2020 ((and thereafter))through 2023, a combined disposable income equal to the greater of "income threshold 1" for the previous year or ((forty-five))45 percent of the county median household income((, adjusted every five years beginning August 1, 2019, as provided in RCW 84.36.385(8))); and

(c) For taxes levied for collection in calendar year 2024 and thereafter, a combined disposable income equal to the greater of "income threshold 1" for the previous year or 50 percent of the county median household income, adjusted every three years beginning August 1, 2023, as provided in RCW 84.36.385(8).

(8) "Income threshold 2" means:

(a) For taxes levied for collection in calendar years prior to 2020, a combined disposable income equal to ((thirty-five thousand dollars))$35,000; ((and))

(b) For taxes levied for collection in calendar years 2020 ((and thereafter))through 2023, a combined disposable income equal to the greater of "income threshold 2" for the previous year or ((fifty-five))55 percent of the county median household income((, adjusted every five years beginning August 1, 2019, as provided in RCW 84.36.385(8))); and

(c) For taxes levied for collection in calendar year 2024 and thereafter, a combined disposable income equal to the greater of "income threshold 2" for the previous year or 60 percent of the county median household income, adjusted every three years beginning August 1, 2023, as provided in RCW 84.36.385(8).

(9) "Income threshold 3" means:

(a) For taxes levied for collection in calendar years prior to 2020, a combined disposable income equal to ((forty thousand dollars))$40,000; ((and))

(b) For taxes levied for collection in calendar years 2020 ((and thereafter))through 2023, a combined disposable income equal to the greater of "income threshold 3" for the previous year or ((sixty-five))65 percent of the county median household income((, adjusted every five years beginning August 1, 2019, as provided in RCW 84.36.385(8))); and

(c) For taxes levied for collection in calendar year 2024 and thereafter, a combined disposable income equal to the greater of "income threshold 3" for the previous year or 70 percent of the county median household income, adjusted every three years beginning August 1, 2023, as provided in RCW 84.36.385(8).

(10) "Principal place of residence" means a residence occupied for more than six months each calendar year by a person claiming an exemption under RCW 84.36.381.

(11) The term "real property" also includes a mobile home which has substantially lost its identity as a mobile unit by virtue of its being fixed in location upon land owned or leased by the owner of the mobile home and placed on a foundation (posts or blocks) with fixed pipe, connections with sewer, water, or other utilities. A mobile home located on land leased by the owner of the mobile home is subject, for tax billing, payment, and collection purposes, only to the personal property provisions of chapter 84.56 RCW and RCW 84.60.040.

(12) The term "residence" means a single-family dwelling unit whether such unit be separate or part of a multiunit dwelling, including the land on which such dwelling stands not to exceed one acre, except that a residence includes any additional property up to a total of five acres that comprises the residential parcel if this larger parcel size is required under land use regulations. The term also includes a share ownership in a cooperative housing association, corporation, or partnership if the person claiming exemption can establish that his or her share represents the specific unit or portion of such structure in which he or she resides. The term also includes a single-family dwelling situated upon lands the fee of which is vested in the United States or any instrumentality thereof including an Indian tribe or in the state of Washington, and notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 84.04.080 and 84.04.090, such a residence is deemed real property.

Sec. 3. RCW 84.36.385 and 2021 c 145 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A claim for exemption under RCW 84.36.381 as now or hereafter amended, may be made and filed at any time during the year for exemption from taxes payable the following year and thereafter and solely upon forms as prescribed and furnished by the department of revenue. However, an exemption from tax under RCW 84.36.381 continues for no more than six years unless a renewal application is filed as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(2) A person granted an exemption under RCW 84.36.381 must inform the county assessor of any change in status affecting the person's entitlement to the exemption on forms prescribed and furnished by the department of revenue.

(3) Each person exempt from taxes under RCW 84.36.381 in 1993 and thereafter must file with the county assessor a renewal application not later than December 31st of the year the assessor notifies such person of the requirement to file the renewal application. Renewal applications must be on forms prescribed and furnished by the department of revenue.

(4) At least once every six years, the county assessor must notify those persons receiving an exemption from taxes under RCW 84.36.381 of the requirement to file a renewal application. The county assessor may also require a renewal application following an amendment of the income requirements set forth in RCW 84.36.381.

(5) If the assessor finds that the applicant does not meet the qualifications as set forth in RCW 84.36.381, as now or hereafter amended, the claim or exemption must be denied but such denial is subject to appeal under the provisions of RCW 84.48.010 and in accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038. If the applicant had received exemption in prior years based on erroneous information, the taxes must be collected subject to penalties as provided in RCW 84.40.130 for a period of not to exceed five years.

(6) The department and each local assessor is hereby directed to publicize the qualifications and manner of making claims under RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389, through communications media, including such paid advertisements or notices as it deems appropriate. Notice of the qualifications, method of making applications, the penalties for not reporting a change in status, and availability of further information must be included on or with property tax statements and revaluation notices for all residential property including mobile homes, except rental properties.

(7) The department must authorize an option for electronic filing of applications and renewal applications for the exemption under RCW 84.36.381.

(8) Beginning August 1, ((2019))2023, and by March 1st every ((fifth))third year thereafter, the department must publish updated income thresholds. The adjusted thresholds must be rounded up to the nearest one thousand dollars. If the income threshold adjustment is negative, the income threshold for the prior year continues to apply. The department must adjust income thresholds for each county to reflect the most recent year available of estimated county median household incomes, including preliminary estimates or projections, as published by the office of financial management. For the purposes of this subsection, "county median household income" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 84.36.383.

(9) Beginning with the adjustment made by ((March 1, 2024))August 1, 2023, as provided in subsection (8) of this section, and every ((second)) adjustment thereafter, if an income threshold in a county is not adjusted based on percentage of county median income, then the income threshold must be adjusted based on the growth of the seasonally adjusted consumer price index for all urban consumers (CPI-U) for the prior twelve month period as published by the United States bureau of labor statistics. In no case may the adjustment be greater than one percent. The adjusted thresholds must be rounded to the nearest one dollar. If the income threshold adjustment is negative, the income threshold for the prior year continues to apply.

Sec. 4. RCW 84.38.020 and 2019 c 453 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)(a) "Claimant" means a person who either elects or is required under RCW 84.64.050 to defer payment of the special assessments and/or real property taxes accrued on the claimant's residence by filing a declaration to defer as provided by this chapter.

(b) When two or more individuals of a household file or seek to file a declaration to defer, they may determine between them as to who the claimant is.

(2) "Devisee" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 21.35.005.

(3) "Equity value" means the amount by which the fair market value of a residence as determined from the records of the county assessor exceeds the total amount of any liens or other obligations against the property.

(4) "Heir" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 21.35.005.

(5) "Income threshold" means: (a) For taxes levied for collection in calendar years prior to 2020, a combined disposable income equal to ((forty-five thousand dollars))$45,000; and (b) for taxes levied for collection in calendar year 2020 and thereafter, a combined disposable income equal to the greater of the income threshold for the previous year, or ((seventy-five))75 percent of the county median household income, adjusted every ((five))three years beginning August 1, ((2019))2023, as provided in RCW 84.36.385(8). Beginning with the adjustment made by ((March 1, 2024))August 1, 2023, as provided in RCW 84.36.385(8), ((and every second adjustment thereafter,)) if the income threshold in a county is not adjusted based on percentage of county median income as provided in this subsection, then the income threshold must be adjusted based on the growth of the consumer price index for all urban consumers (CPI-U) for the prior twelve-month period as published by the United States bureau of labor statistics. In no case may the adjustment be greater than one percent. The adjusted threshold must be rounded to the nearest one dollar. If the income threshold adjustment is negative, the income threshold for the prior year continues to apply.

(6) "Local government" means any city, town, county, water-sewer district, public utility district, port district, irrigation district, flood control district, or any other municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or other political subdivision authorized to levy special assessments.

(7) "Real property taxes" means ad valorem property taxes levied on a residence in this state in the preceding calendar year.

(8) "Residence" has the meaning given in RCW 84.36.383.

(9) "Special assessment" means the charge or obligation imposed by a local government upon property specially benefited.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. (1) Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the department of revenue must engage in statewide outreach to provide public notification of the changes in income thresholds as the result of this act, as well as information on the application process for the exemption under RCW 84.36.381.

(2) This section expires June 30, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to this act.

--- END ---