BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Each carrier offering a health plan issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2024, shall comply with the following standards related to prior authorization for health care services and prescription drugs:

(a) The carrier shall meet the following time frames for prior authorization determinations and notifications to a participating provider or facility that submits the prior authorization request through an electronic prior authorization process, as designated by each carrier:

(i) For electronic standard prior authorization requests, the carrier shall make a decision and notify the provider or facility of the results of the decision within three calendar days, excluding holidays, of submission of an electronic prior authorization request by the provider or facility that contains the necessary information to make a determination. If insufficient information has been provided to the carrier to make a decision, the carrier shall request any additional information from the provider or facility within one calendar day of submission of the electronic prior authorization request.

(ii) For electronic expedited prior authorization requests, the carrier shall make a decision and notify the provider or facility of the results of the decision within one calendar day of submission of an electronic prior authorization request by the provider or facility that contains the necessary information to make a determination. If insufficient information has been provided to the carrier to make a decision, the carrier shall request any additional information from the provider or facility within one calendar day of submission of the electronic prior authorization request.

(b) The carrier shall meet the following time frames for prior authorization determinations and notifications to a participating provider or facility that submits the prior authorization request through a process other than an electronic prior authorization process:

(i) For nonelectronic standard prior authorization requests, the carrier shall make a decision and notify the provider or facility of the results of the decision within five calendar days of submission of a nonelectronic prior authorization request by the provider or facility that contains the necessary information to make a determination. If insufficient information has been provided to the carrier to make a decision, the carrier shall request any additional information from the provider or facility within five calendar days of submission of the nonelectronic prior authorization request.

(ii) For nonelectronic expedited prior authorization requests, the carrier shall make a decision and notify the provider or facility of the results of the decision within two calendar days of submission of a nonelectronic prior authorization request by the provider or facility that contains the necessary information to make a determination. If insufficient information has been provided to the carrier to make a decision, the carrier shall request any additional information from the provider or facility within one calendar day of submission of the nonelectronic prior authorization request.

(c) In any instance in which a carrier has determined that a provider or facility has not provided sufficient information for making a determination under (a) and (b) of this subsection, a carrier may establish a specific reasonable time frame for submission of the additional information. This time frame must be communicated to the provider or enrollee with a carrier's request for additional information.

(d) The carrier's prior authorization requirements must be described in detail and written in easily understandable language. The carrier shall make its most current prior authorization requirements and restrictions, including the written clinical review criteria, available to providers and facilities in an electronic format upon request. The prior authorization requirements must be based on peer-reviewed clinical review criteria. The clinical review criteria must be evidence-based criteria and must accommodate new and emerging information related to the appropriateness of clinical criteria with respect to black and indigenous people, other people of color, gender, and underserved populations. The clinical review criteria must be evaluated and updated, if necessary, at least annually.

(2)(a) Each carrier shall build and maintain a prior authorization application programming interface that automates the process for in-network providers to determine whether a prior authorization is required, identify prior authorization information and documentation requirements, and facilitate the exchange of prior authorization requests and determinations from its electronic health records or practice management system. The application programming interface must:

(i) Use fast health care interoperability resources;

(ii) Automate the process to determine whether a prior authorization is required for durable medical equipment, a health care service, or a prescription drug;

(iii) Allow providers to query the carrier's prior authorization documentation requirements;

(iv) Support an automated approach using nonproprietary open workflows to compile and exchange the necessary data elements to populate the prior authorization requirements that are compliant with the federal health insurance portability and accountability act of 1996 or have an exception from the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services; and

(v) Indicate that a prior authorization denial or authorization of a service less intensive than that included in the original request is an adverse benefit determination and is subject to the carrier's grievance and appeal process under RCW 48.43.535.

(b)(i) Beginning January 1, 2025, the application programming interface must support the exchange of prior authorization requests and determinations for health care services.

(ii) Beginning January 1, 2027, the application programming interface must support the exchange of prior authorization requests and determinations for prescription drugs, including information on covered alternative prescription drugs in the event of denials.

(c) If federal rules related to standards for using an application programming interface to communicate prior authorization status to providers are not finalized by the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services by September 13, 2023, the requirements of (b)(i) of this subsection may not be enforced until January 1, 2026.

(d)(i) If a carrier determines that it will not be able to satisfy the requirements of (a) of this subsection by January 1, 2025, the carrier shall submit a narrative justification to the commissioner describing:

(A) The reasons that the carrier cannot reasonably satisfy the requirements;

(B) The impact of noncompliance upon providers and enrollees;

(C) The current or proposed means of providing health information to the providers; and

(D) A timeline and implementation plan to achieve compliance with the requirements.

(ii) The commissioner may grant a one-year delay in enforcement of the requirements of (a) of this subsection (2) if the commissioner determines that the carrier has made a good faith effort to comply with the requirements.

(iii) This subsection (2)(d) shall not apply if the delay in enforcement in (c) of this subsection takes effect because the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services did not finalize the applicable regulations by September 13, 2023.

(3) Nothing in this section applies to prior authorization determinations made pursuant to RCW 48.43.761.

(4) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Expedited prior authorization request" means a request by a provider or facility for approval of a health care service or prescription drug where:

(i) The passage of time:

(A) Could seriously jeopardize the life or health of the enrollee;

(B) Could seriously jeopardize the enrollee's ability to regain maximum function; or

(C) In the opinion of a provider or facility with knowledge of the enrollee's medical condition, would subject the enrollee to severe pain that cannot be adequately managed without the health care service or prescription drug that is the subject of the request; or

(ii) The enrollee is undergoing a current course of treatment using a nonformulary drug.

(b) "Standard prior authorization request" means a request by a provider or facility for approval of a health care service or prescription drug where the request is made in advance of the enrollee obtaining a health care service or prescription drug that is not required to be expedited.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A health plan offered to public employees, retirees, and their covered dependents under this chapter issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2024, shall comply with the following standards related to prior authorization for health care services and prescription drugs:

(a) The health plan shall meet the following time frames for prior authorization determinations and notifications to a participating provider or facility that submits the prior authorization request through an electronic prior authorization process:

(i) For electronic standard prior authorization requests, the health plan shall make a decision and notify the provider or facility of the results of the decision within three calendar days, excluding holidays, of submission of an electronic prior authorization request by the provider or facility that contains the necessary information to make a determination. If insufficient information has been provided to the health plan to make a decision, the health plan shall request any additional information from the provider or facility within one calendar day of submission of the electronic prior authorization request.

(ii) For electronic expedited prior authorization requests, the health plan shall make a decision and notify the provider or facility of the results of the decision within one calendar day of submission of an electronic prior authorization request by the provider or facility that contains the necessary information to make a determination. If insufficient information has been provided to the health plan to make a decision, the health plan shall request any additional information from the provider or facility within one calendar day of submission of the electronic prior authorization request.

(b) The health plan shall meet the following time frames for prior authorization determinations and notifications to a participating provider or facility that submits the prior authorization request through a process other than an electronic prior authorization process described in subsection (2) of this section:

(i) For nonelectronic standard prior authorization requests, the health plan shall make a decision and notify the provider or facility of the results of the decision within five calendar days of submission of a nonelectronic prior authorization request by the provider or facility that contains the necessary information to make a determination. If insufficient information has been provided to the health plan to make a decision, the health plan shall request any additional information from the provider or facility within five calendar days of submission of the nonelectronic prior authorization request.

(ii) For nonelectronic expedited prior authorization requests, the health plan shall make a decision and notify the provider or facility of the results of the decision within two calendar days of submission of a nonelectronic prior authorization request by the provider or facility that contains the necessary information to make a determination. If insufficient information has been provided to the health plan to make a decision, the health plan shall request any additional information from the provider or facility within one calendar day of submission of the nonelectronic prior authorization request.

(c) In any instance in which the health plan has determined that a provider or facility has not provided sufficient information for making a determination under (a) and (b) of this subsection, the health plan may establish a specific reasonable time frame for submission of the additional information. This time frame must be communicated to the provider or enrollee with the health plan's request for additional information.

(d) The prior authorization requirements of the health plan must be described in detail and written in easily understandable language. The health plan shall make its most current prior authorization requirements and restrictions, including the written clinical review criteria, available to providers and facilities in an electronic format upon request. The prior authorization requirements must be based on peer-reviewed clinical review criteria. The clinical review criteria must be evidence-based criteria and must accommodate new and emerging information related to the appropriateness of clinical criteria with respect to black and indigenous people, other people of color, gender, and underserved populations. The clinical review criteria must be evaluated and updated, if necessary, at least annually.

(2)(a) Each health plan offered to public employees, retirees, and their covered dependents under this chapter shall build and maintain a prior authorization application programming interface that automates the process for in-network providers to determine whether a prior authorization is required, identify prior authorization information and documentation requirements, and facilitate the exchange of prior authorization requests and determinations from its electronic health records or practice management system. The application programming interface must:

(i) Use fast health care interoperability resources;

(ii) Automate the process to determine whether a prior authorization is required for durable medical equipment, a health care service, or a prescription drug;

(iii) Allow providers to query the health plan's prior authorization documentation requirements;

(iv) Support an automated approach using nonproprietary open workflows to compile and exchange the necessary data elements to populate the prior authorization requirements that are compliant with the federal health insurance portability and accountability act of 1996 or have an exception from the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services; and

(v) Indicate that a prior authorization denial or authorization of a service less intensive than that included in the original request is an adverse benefit determination and is subject to the health plan's grievance and appeal process under RCW 48.43.535.

(b)(i) Beginning January 1, 2025, the application programming interface must support the exchange of prior authorization requests and determinations for health care services.

(ii) Beginning January 1, 2027, the application programming interface must support the exchange of prior authorization requests and determinations for prescription drugs, including information on covered alternative prescription drugs in the event of denials.

(c) If federal rules related to standards for using an application programming interface to communicate prior authorization status to providers are not finalized by the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services by September 13, 2023, the requirements of (b)(i) of this subsection may not be enforced until January 1, 2026.

(d)(i) If the health plan determines that it will not be able to satisfy the requirements of (a) of this subsection by January 1, 2025, the health plan shall submit a narrative justification to the authority describing:

(A) The reasons that the health plan cannot reasonably satisfy the requirements;

(B) The impact of noncompliance upon providers and enrollees;

(C) The current or proposed means of providing health information to the providers; and

(D) A timeline and implementation plan to achieve compliance with the requirements.

(ii) The authority may grant a one-year delay in enforcement of the requirements of (a) of this subsection (2) if the authority determines that the health plan has made a good faith effort to comply with the requirements.

(iii) This subsection (2)(d) shall not apply if the delay in enforcement in (c) of this subsection takes effect because the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services did not finalize the applicable regulations by September 13, 2023.

(3) Nothing in this section applies to prior authorization determinations made pursuant to RCW 41.05.526.

(4) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Expedited prior authorization request" means a request by a provider or facility for approval of a health care service or prescription drug where:

(i) The passage of time:

(A) Could seriously jeopardize the life or health of the enrollee;

(B) Could seriously jeopardize the enrollee's ability to regain maximum function; or

(C) In the opinion of a provider or facility with knowledge of the enrollee's medical condition, would subject the enrollee to severe pain that cannot be adequately managed without the health care service or prescription drug that is the subject of the request; or

(ii) The enrollee is undergoing a current course of treatment using a nonformulary drug.

(b) "Standard prior authorization request" means a request by a provider or facility for approval of a health care service or prescription drug where the request is made in advance of the enrollee obtaining a health care service that is not required to be expedited.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning January 1, 2024, the authority shall require each managed care organization to comply with the following standards related to prior authorization for health care services and prescription drugs:

(a) The managed care organization shall meet the following time frames for prior authorization determinations and notifications to a participating provider or facility that submits the prior authorization request through an electronic prior authorization process, as designated by each managed care organization:

(i) For electronic standard prior authorization requests, the managed care organization shall make a decision and notify the provider or facility of the results of the decision within three calendar days, excluding holidays, of submission of an electronic prior authorization request by the provider or facility that contains the necessary information to make a determination. If insufficient information has been provided to the managed care organization to make a decision, the managed care organization shall request any additional information from the provider or facility within one calendar day of submission of the electronic prior authorization request.

(ii) For electronic expedited prior authorization requests, the managed care organization shall make a decision and notify the provider or facility of the results of the decision within one calendar day of submission of an electronic prior authorization request by the provider or facility that contains the necessary information to make a determination. If insufficient information has been provided to the managed care organization to make a decision, the managed care organization shall request any additional information from the provider or facility within one calendar day of submission of the electronic prior authorization request.

(b) The managed care organization shall meet the following time frames for prior authorization determinations and notifications to a participating provider or facility that submits the prior authorization request through a process other than an electronic prior authorization process described in subsection (2) of this section:

(i) For nonelectronic standard prior authorization requests, the managed care organization shall make a decision and notify the provider or facility of the results of the decision within five calendar days of submission of a nonelectronic prior authorization request by the provider or facility that contains the necessary information to make a determination. If insufficient information has been provided to the managed care organization to make a decision, the managed care organization shall request any additional information from the provider or facility within five calendar days of submission of the nonelectronic prior authorization request.

(ii) For nonelectronic expedited prior authorization requests, the managed care organization shall make a decision and notify the provider or facility of the results of the decision within two calendar days of submission of a nonelectronic prior authorization request by the provider or facility that contains the necessary information to make a determination. If insufficient information has been provided to the managed care organization to make a decision, the managed care organization shall request any additional information from the provider or facility within one calendar day of submission of the nonelectronic prior authorization request.

(c) In any instance in which a managed care organization has determined that a provider or facility has not provided sufficient information for making a determination under (a) and (b) of this subsection, a managed care organization may establish a specific reasonable time frame for submission of the additional information. This time frame must be communicated to the provider or enrollee with a managed care organization's request for additional information.

(d) The prior authorization requirements of the managed care organization must be described in detail and written in easily understandable language. The managed care organization shall make its most current prior authorization requirements and restrictions, including the written clinical review criteria, available to providers and facilities in an electronic format upon request. The prior authorization requirements must be based on peer-reviewed clinical review criteria. The clinical review criteria must be evidence-based criteria and must accommodate new and emerging information related to the appropriateness of clinical criteria with respect to black and indigenous people, other people of color, gender, and underserved populations. The clinical review criteria must be evaluated and updated, if necessary, at least annually.

(2)(a) Each managed care organization shall build and maintain a prior authorization application programming interface that automates the process for in-network providers to determine whether a prior authorization is required, identify prior authorization information and documentation requirements, and facilitate the exchange of prior authorization requests and determinations from its electronic health records or practice management system. The application programming interface must:

(i) Use fast health care interoperability resources;

(ii) Automate the process to determine whether a prior authorization is required for durable medical equipment, a health care service, or a prescription drug;

(iii) Allow providers to query the managed care organization's prior authorization documentation requirements;

(iv) Support an automated approach using nonproprietary open workflows to compile and exchange the necessary data elements to populate the prior authorization requirements that are compliant with the federal health insurance portability and accountability act of 1996 or have an exception from the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services; and

(v) Indicate that a prior authorization denial or authorization of a service less intensive than that included in the original request is an adverse benefit determination and is subject to the managed care organization's grievance and appeal process under RCW 48.43.535.

(b)(i) Beginning January 1, 2025, the application programming interface must support the exchange of prior authorization requests and determinations for health care services.

(ii) Beginning January 1, 2027, the application programming interface must support the exchange of prior authorization requests and determinations for prescription drugs, including information on covered alternative prescription drugs in the event of denials.

(c) If federal rules related to standards for using an application programming interface to communicate prior authorization status to providers are not finalized by September 13, 2023, the requirements of (b)(i) of this subsection may not be enforced until January 1, 2026.

(d)(i) If a managed care organization determines that it will not be able to satisfy the requirements of (a) of this subsection by January 1, 2025, the managed care organization shall submit a narrative justification to the authority describing:

(A) The reasons that the managed care organization cannot reasonably satisfy the requirements;

(B) The impact of noncompliance upon providers and enrollees;

(C) The current or proposed means of providing health information to the providers; and

(D) A timeline and implementation plan to achieve compliance with the requirements.

(ii) The authority may grant a one-year delay in enforcement of the requirements of (a) of this subsection (2) if the authority determines that the managed care organization has made a good faith effort to comply with the requirements.

(iii) This subsection (2)(d) shall not apply if the delay in enforcement in (c) of this subsection takes effect because the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services did not finalize the applicable regulations by September 13, 2023.

(3) Nothing in this section applies to prior authorization determinations made pursuant to RCW 71.24.618.

(4) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Expedited prior authorization request" means a request by a provider or facility for approval of a health care service or prescription drug where:

(i) The passage of time:

(A) Could seriously jeopardize the life or health of the enrollee;

(B) Could seriously jeopardize the enrollee's ability to regain maximum function; or

(C) In the opinion of a provider or facility with knowledge of the enrollee's medical condition, would subject the enrollee to severe pain that cannot be adequately managed without the health care service or prescription drug that is the subject of the request; or

(ii) The enrollee is undergoing a current course of treatment using a nonformulary drug.

(b) "Standard prior authorization request" means a request by a provider or facility for approval of a health care service or prescription drug where the request is made in advance of the enrollee obtaining a health care service or prescription drug that is not required to be expedited.

Sec. 4. RCW 48.43.0161 and 2020 c 316 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, by))By October 1, 2020, and annually thereafter, for individual and group health plans issued by a carrier that has written at least one percent of the total accident and health insurance premiums written by all companies authorized to offer accident and health insurance in Washington in the most recently available year, the carrier shall report to the commissioner the following aggregated and deidentified data related to the carrier's prior authorization practices and experience for the prior plan year:

(a) Lists of the ((ten))10 inpatient medical or surgical codes:

(i) With the highest total number of prior authorization requests during the previous plan year, including the total number of prior authorization requests for each code and the percent of approved requests for each code;

(ii) With the highest percentage of approved prior authorization requests during the previous plan year, including the total number of prior authorization requests for each code and the percent of approved requests for each code; and

(iii) With the highest percentage of prior authorization requests that were initially denied and then subsequently approved on appeal, including the total number of prior authorization requests for each code and the percent of requests that were initially denied and then subsequently approved for each code;

(b) Lists of the ((ten))10 outpatient medical or surgical codes:

(i) With the highest total number of prior authorization requests during the previous plan year, including the total number of prior authorization requests for each code and the percent of approved requests for each code;

(ii) With the highest percentage of approved prior authorization requests during the previous plan year, including the total number of prior authorization requests for each code and the percent of approved requests for each code; and

(iii) With the highest percentage of prior authorization requests that were initially denied and then subsequently approved on appeal, including the total number of prior authorization requests for each code and the percent of requests that were initially denied and then subsequently approved for each code;

(c) Lists of the ((ten))10 inpatient mental health and substance use disorder service codes:

(i) With the highest total number of prior authorization requests during the previous plan year, including the total number of prior authorization requests for each code and the percent of approved requests for each code;

(ii) With the highest percentage of approved prior authorization requests during the previous plan year, including the total number of prior authorization requests for each code and the percent of approved requests for each code; (([and]))and

(iii) With the highest percentage of prior authorization requests that were initially denied and then subsequently approved on appeal, including the total number of prior authorization requests for each code and the percent of requests that were initially denied and then subsequently approved for each code;

(d) Lists of the ((ten))10 outpatient mental health and substance use disorder service codes:

(i) With the highest total number of prior authorization requests during the previous plan year, including the total number of prior authorization requests for each code and the percent of approved requests for each code;

(ii) With the highest percentage of approved prior authorization requests during the previous plan year, including the total number of prior authorization requests for each code and the percent of approved requests for each code; (([and]))and

(iii) With the highest percentage of prior authorization requests that were initially denied and then subsequently approved on appeal, including the total number of prior authorization requests for each code and the percent of requests that were initially denied and then subsequently approved;

(e) Lists of the ((ten))10 durable medical equipment codes:

(i) With the highest total number of prior authorization requests during the previous plan year, including the total number of prior authorization requests for each code and the percent of approved requests for each code;

(ii) With the highest percentage of approved prior authorization requests during the previous plan year, including the total number of prior authorization requests for each code and the percent of approved requests for each code; (([and]))and

(iii) With the highest percentage of prior authorization requests that were initially denied and then subsequently approved on appeal, including the total number of prior authorization requests for each code and the percent of requests that were initially denied and then subsequently approved for each code;

(f) Lists of the ((ten))10 diabetes supplies and equipment codes:

(i) With the highest total number of prior authorization requests during the previous plan year, including the total number of prior authorization requests for each code and the percent of approved requests for each code;

(ii) With the highest percentage of approved prior authorization requests during the previous plan year, including the total number of prior authorization requests for each code and the percent of approved requests for each code; (([and]))and

(iii) With the highest percentage of prior authorization requests that were initially denied and then subsequently approved on appeal, including the total number of prior authorization requests for each code and the percent of requests that were initially denied and then subsequently approved for each code;

(g) Lists of the 10 prescription drugs:

(i) With the highest total number of prior authorization requests during the previous plan year, including the total number of prior authorization requests for each prescription drug and the percent of approved requests for each prescription drug;

(ii) With the highest percentage of approved prior authorization requests during the previous plan year, including the total number of prior authorization requests for each prescription drug and the percent of approved requests for each prescription drug; and

(iii) With the highest percentage of prior authorization requests that were initially denied and then subsequently approved on appeal, including the total number of prior authorization requests for each prescription drug and the percent of requests that were initially denied and then subsequently approved for each prescription drug; and

(h) The average determination response time in hours for prior authorization requests to the carrier with respect to each code reported under (a) through (f) of this subsection for each of the following categories of prior authorization:

(i) Expedited decisions;

(ii) Standard decisions; and

(iii) Extenuating circumstances decisions.

(2) ((For the October 1, 2020, reporting deadline, a carrier is not required to report data pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(iii), (b)(iii), (c)(iii), (d)(iii), (e)(iii), or (f)(iii) of this section until April 1, 2021, if the commissioner determines that doing so constitutes a hardship.

(3))) By January 1, 2021, and annually thereafter, the commissioner shall aggregate and deidentify the data collected under subsection (1) of this section into a standard report and may not identify the name of the carrier that submitted the data. ((The initial report due on January 1, 2021, may omit data for which a hardship determination is made by the commissioner under subsection (2) of this section. Such data must be included in the report due on January 1, 2022.)) The commissioner must make the report available to interested parties.

(((4)))(3) The commissioner may request additional information from carriers reporting data under this section.

(((5)))(4) The commissioner may adopt rules to implement this section. In adopting rules, the commissioner must consult stakeholders including carriers, health care practitioners, health care facilities, and patients.

(((6)))(5) For the purpose of this section, "prior authorization" means a mandatory process that a carrier or its designated or contracted representative requires a provider or facility to follow before a service is delivered, to determine if a service is a benefit and meets the requirements for medical necessity, clinical appropriateness, level of care, or effectiveness in relation to the applicable plan, including any term used by a carrier or its designated or contracted representative to describe this process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. Section 4 of this act takes effect January 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2023, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.

--- END ---