BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.410.277 and 2021 c 77 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The Washington professional educator standards board must adopt rules for renewal of administrator certificates and teacher certificates that meet the continuing education requirements of this section.

(2) To renew an administrator certificate on or after July 1, 2023, continuing education must meet the following requirements: 10 percent must focus on equity-based school practices, 10 percent must focus on the national professional standards for education leaders, and five percent must focus on government-to-government relationships with federally recognized tribes.

(3) To renew a teacher certificate on or after July 1, 2023, 15 percent of continuing education must focus on equity-based school practices. This subsection (3) does not apply to a person renewing both a teacher certificate and an administrator certificate.

(4)(a) ((Except as provided under (b) of this subsection (4), continuing education must be provided by one or more of the following entities, if they are an approved clock hour provider:

(i) The office of the superintendent of public instruction;

(ii) A school district;

(iii) An educational service district;

(iv) A Washington professional educator standards board-approved administrator or teacher preparation program;

(v) The association of Washington school principals; or

(vi) The Washington education association.

(b) Continuing))To meet the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, continuing education related to government-to-government relationships with federally recognized tribes must be provided by one or more subject matter experts approved by the governor's office on Indian affairs in collaboration with the tribal leaders congress on education and the office of Native education in the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(((5)))(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the Washington professional educator standards board must maintain a list of subject matter experts approved under (a) of this subsection on their respective websites.

(5) An entity providing an administrator or teacher continuing education program focused on equity-based school practices or the national professional standards for education leaders must publicly post the learning objectives of the program on its website. If the entity does not have a website, it must post the learning objectives of the program in a conspicuous place in the entity's main office and submit a copy of the learning objectives to the Washington professional educator standards board.

(6) Continuing education focused on equity-based school practices must be aligned with the standards ((for cultural competency developed))of practice developed by the Washington professional educator standards board under RCW 28A.410.260.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.410 RCW to read as follows:

(1) As required by this section, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall audit approved providers of administrator or teacher continuing education programs focused on equity-based school practices or the national professional standards for education leaders.

(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must audit a representative sample of each of the following categories of approved providers each year:

(i) Washington professional educator standards board-approved educator preparation programs and other college and university programs;

(ii) School districts, public schools, educational service districts, and any other local, state, or federal agencies;

(iii) Private schools approved by the state board of education under RCW 28A.305.130; and

(iv) Any other organizations or entities.

(b) If an organization or entity is not an approved provider prior to the effective date of this section, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must audit the provider within two years of initial approval by the Washington professional educator standards board.

(3) The purpose of audits is to confirm that approved providers are meeting provider approval standards under chapter 181-85 WAC, including whether the provider is in substantial compliance with the requirements of RCW 28A.410.277.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "approved provider" and "provider" have the same meaning as "approved in-service education agency" in WAC 181-85-045, but apply only to providers of administrator or teacher continuing education programs focused on either equity-based school practices or the national professional standards for education leaders.

(5) This section expires June 30, 2034.

--- END ---