BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 79A.05.065 and 2011 c 171 s 115 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) The commission shall grant to any person who meets the eligibility requirements specified in this section a senior citizen's pass which shall: (i) Entitle such a person, and members of his or her camping unit, to a ((fifty))50 percent reduction in the campsite rental fee prescribed by the commission; and (ii) entitle such a person to free admission to any state park.

(b) The commission shall grant a senior citizen's pass to any person who applies for the senior citizen's pass and who meets the following requirements:

(i) The person is at least ((sixty-two))62 years of age;

(ii) The person is a domiciliary of the state of Washington and meets reasonable residency requirements prescribed by the commission; and

(iii) The person and his or her spouse have a combined income that would qualify the person for a property tax exemption pursuant to RCW 84.36.381. The financial eligibility requirements of this subsection (1)(b)(iii) apply regardless of whether the applicant for a senior citizen's pass owns taxable property or has obtained or applied for such property tax exemption.

(c) Each senior citizen's pass granted pursuant to this section is valid as long as the senior citizen meets the requirements of (b)(ii) of this subsection. A senior citizen meeting the eligibility requirements of this section may make a voluntary donation for the upkeep and maintenance of state parks.

(d) A holder of a senior citizen's pass shall surrender the pass upon request of a commission employee when the employee has reason to believe the holder fails to meet the criteria in (b) of this subsection. The holder shall have the pass returned upon providing proof to the satisfaction of the director that the holder meets the eligibility criteria for obtaining the senior citizen's pass.

(2)(a) Any resident of Washington who is disabled as defined by the social security administration and who receives social security benefits for that disability, or any other benefits for that disability from any other governmental or nongovernmental source, or who is entitled to benefits for permanent disability under RCW 71A.10.020(((3)))(6) due to unemployability full time at the minimum wage, or who is legally blind or profoundly deaf, or who has been issued a card, decal, or special license plate for a permanent disability under RCW 46.19.010 shall be entitled to receive, regardless of age and upon making application therefor, a disability pass at no cost to the holder. The pass shall: (i) Entitle such a person, and members of his or her camping unit, to a ((fifty))50 percent reduction in the campsite rental fee prescribed by the commission; and (ii) entitle such a person to free admission to any state park.

(b) A card, decal, or special license plate issued for a permanent disability under RCW 46.19.010 may serve as a pass for the holder to entitle that person and members of the person's camping unit to a ((fifty))50 percent reduction in the campsite rental fee prescribed by the commission, and to allow the holder free admission to state parks.

(3) Any resident of Washington who is a veteran and has a service-connected disability of at least thirty percent shall be entitled to receive a lifetime veteran's disability pass at no cost to the holder. The pass shall: (a) Entitle such a person, and members of his or her camping unit, to free use of any campsite within any state park; (b) entitle such a person to free admission to any state park; and (c) entitle such a person to an exemption from any reservation fees.

(4) Except as provided in this subsection, any resident of Washington who is a veteran and is receiving benefits from the Washington basic food program, as verified by the department of social and health services, shall be eligible to receive a pass that entitles the holder to free admission to any state park. A pass under this subsection is valid for five years from the date of issuance and may be renewed every five years provided that the holder meets eligibility requirements. A veteran that has been subject to entry-level separation, bad conduct discharge, dishonorable discharge, or officer dismissal is not eligible for a pass under this subsection.

(5)(a) Any Washington state resident who provides out-of-home care to a child, as either a licensed foster family home or a person related to the child, is entitled to a foster home pass.

(b) An applicant for a foster home pass must request a pass in the manner required by the commission. Upon receipt of a properly submitted request, the commission shall verify with the department of social and health services that the applicant qualifies under (a) of this subsection. Once issued, a foster home pass is valid for the period, which may not be less than one year, designated by the commission.

(c) When accompanied by a child receiving out-of-home care from the pass holder, a foster home pass: (i) Entitles such a person, and members of his or her camping unit, to free use of any campsite within any state park; and (ii) entitles such a person to free admission to any state park.

(d) For the purposes of this subsection (((4)))(5):

(i) "Out-of-home care" means placement in a foster family home or with a person related to the child under the authority of chapter 13.32A, 13.34, or 74.13 RCW;

(ii) "Foster family home" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 74.15.020; and

(iii) "Person related to the child" means those persons referred to in RCW 74.15.020(2)(a) (i) through (vi).

(((5)))(6) All passes issued pursuant to this section are valid at all parks any time during the year. However, the pass is not valid for admission to concessionaire operated facilities.

(((6)))(7) The commission shall negotiate payment and costs, to allow holders of a foster home pass free access and usage of park campsites, with the following nonoperated, nonstate-owned parks: Central Ferry, Chief Timothy, Crow Butte, and Lyons Ferry. The commission shall seek state general fund reimbursement on a biennial basis.

(((7)))(8) The commission may deny or revoke any Washington state park pass issued under this section for cause, including but not limited to the following:

(a) Residency outside the state of Washington;

(b) Violation of laws or state park rules resulting in eviction from a state park;

(c) Intimidating, obstructing, or assaulting a park employee or park volunteer who is engaged in the performance of official duties;

(d) Fraudulent use of a pass;

(e) Providing false information or documentation in the application for a state parks pass;

(f) Refusing to display or show the pass to park employees when requested; or

(g) Failing to provide current eligibility information upon request by the agency or when eligibility ceases or changes.

(((8)))(9) This section shall not affect or otherwise impair the power of the commission to continue or discontinue any other programs it has adopted for senior citizens.

(((9)))(10) The commission may engage in a mutually agreed upon reciprocal or discounted program for all or specific pass programs with other outdoor recreation agencies.

(((10)))(11) The commission shall adopt those rules as it finds appropriate for the administration of this section. Among other things, the rules shall prescribe a definition of "camping unit" which will authorize a reasonable number of persons traveling with the person having a pass to stay at the campsite rented by such a person, a minimum Washington residency requirement for applicants for a senior citizen's pass, and an application form to be completed by applicants for a senior citizen's pass.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The parks and recreation commission shall conduct a comprehensive study of the discount pass programs established in RCW 79A.05.065. The study must review and analyze the following:

(a) Data on the utilization of discount passes, including a review of any gaps in utilization data and any challenges associated with tracking usage;

(b) Any challenges in administering discount pass programs and policy options for improving the operation, efficiency, and sustainability of the programs; and

(c) Policy options for expanding the discount pass programs to additional groups, including all Washington veterans, with consideration for increasing access to state parks in an equitable manner.

(2) The parks and recreation commission shall report on the results of the study to the governor and the relevant committees of the legislature by September 1, 2024.

--- END ---