BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall develop and implement a grant program that provides grant funding to youth development programs in the state that provide:

(a) Learning acceleration;

(b) Social-emotional learning;

(c) Mentorship;

(d) Connection to nonschool-based resources;

(e) Support related to postsecondary access and career pathways;

(f) Arts programming including but not limited to the performing arts, visual arts, literature, fine arts, craft arts, creative writing, architecture, and music; or

(g) Cultural programming.

(2) In designing the grant program required under this section, the department shall engage with and consider feedback from the following groups with representation from all six department of children, youth, and families regions of the state:

(a) Youth ages 14 through 26;

(b) People with lived experience providing or receiving services from a youth development program;

(c) Youth development program providers serving local communities and operating statewide;

(d) Youth development program providers serving local communities and not operating statewide; and

(e) Tribes within Washington state.

(3) The design of the grant program for youth development programs required under this section must include the following components:

(a) Equity in:

(i) Size and type of organizations receiving the grants;

(ii) Geographic distribution of grant funding throughout all six department of children, youth, and families regions of the state; and

(iii) Distribution of grant funding to urban, suburban, and rural areas;

(b) Prioritization of grants to:

(i) Support youth from historically marginalized communities; and

(ii) Youth development providers that represent the historically marginalized communities of the youth that they serve;

(c) Distribution of grants to nonprofit entities, entities sponsored by a nonprofit organization, tribes within Washington state, and city or county parks and recreation entities;

(d) The prohibition of grant distribution to school districts;

(e) Distribution of grant funding for the full fiscal biennium;

(f) An outcome framework for grant funding recipients that demonstrate positive youth outcomes including program attendance;

(g) A requirement that grant recipients include youth with physical and developmental disabilities;

(h) A process for providing training regarding youth behavioral health and trauma-informed service delivery to youth development program staff at no cost or little cost to the youth development program; and

(i) A requirement that grant recipients take steps to encourage parent and family engagement.

(4) To the extent possible, the department shall include youth, who are compensated for their time, in reviewing grant applications.

(5) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Expanded learning opportunities" means a structured learning environment that occurs outside the traditional school day through before school, after school, and summer programs. Expanded learning opportunities offer a safe place for students where education can be supported and supplemented. Expanded learning opportunities offer personalized learning opportunities for youth in areas such as:

(i) The arts including but not limited to the performing arts, visual arts, literature, fine arts, craft arts, creative writing, architecture, and music;

(ii) Civic engagement;

(iii) Science;

(iv) Technology;

(v) Engineering;

(vi) Math;

(vii) Mentorship; and

(viii) General academic support.

(b) "Youth development" means an intentional, strength-based approach that inclusively and equitably engages young people within their communities in a manner that centers youth voice and leadership. Youth development is culturally responsive, fosters positive relationships, and helps young people develop skills and competencies to achieve their goals.

(c) "Youth development program" means a program for youth that focus on holistic outcomes by complementing school-day academics, promotes social and emotional well-being, and supports access to postsecondary career pathways. Youth development programs may not provide basic needs services such as shelter or food outside of program time, but they can function as a referral resource to help young people and families identify and navigate those services. A youth development program may include mentoring, expanded learning opportunities, afterschool or summer programs, school-aged child care, or other child supports that address the comprehensive needs of young people.

--- END ---