BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The commission shall convene a work group to study and make recommendations regarding requiring the commission to establish a program to recruit, and issue certifications to, a pool of candidates who may be hired as peace officers by city and county law enforcement agencies in the state.

(2) The work group must be composed of individuals representing the following:

(a) The commission;

(b) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs;

(c) The Washington council of police and sheriffs;

(d) The Washington state fraternal order of police;

(e) The association of Washington cities;

(f) The Washington state association of counties;

(g) The Washington state office of equity;

(h) The Washington coalition for police accountability;

(i) A statewide organization advocating on behalf of crime victims and survivors;

(j) Experts in human resources best practices; and

(k) Any other stakeholder deemed appropriate by the commission.

(3) The commission must study and make recommendations regarding the following:

(a) A plan to establish a program to recruit, and issue certifications to, a pool of candidates who may be hired as peace officers by city and county law enforcement agencies in the state;

(b) The qualifications of applicants who may participate in the pool;

(c) Best human resources practices to produce an applicant pool with a broad spectrum of backgrounds and experience;

(d) The types of law enforcement agencies that may hire applicants from the pool and the timing of when offers of employment may be made;

(e) The manner in which the commission should be reimbursed for the ongoing costs of recruiting and training pool applicants;

(f) Methods to encourage law enforcement agencies to hire applicants from the pool; and

(g) Any statutory or regulatory barriers to establishing the pool.

(4) The commission shall report its findings and recommendations to the governor and the legislature no later than November 15, 2024. The recommendations must include draft legislation implementing the recommendations.

(5) The commission may contract with a consultant to implement the requirements of this act. The commission may hire an employee to oversee the contracting process and manage the implementation of the contract.

(6) For purposes of this section, "commission" means the criminal justice training commission.

(7) This section expires January 1, 2025.

--- END ---