BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department must collect the following information in the possession of the department of revenue, the department of labor and industries, the employment security department, and the department of licensing about each business in Washington state:

(a) The business's annual revenue;

(b) The number of employees that the business employs, and their occupations;

(c) The business's aggregated payroll; and

(d) The North American industry classification system (NAICS) code assigned to that business.

(2) The information obtained by the department under this section and in the department's possession is exempt from public inspection and copying pursuant to chapter 42.56 RCW. This section does not affect whether another agency may be required or prohibited by law to disclose any of this information that is in its possession.

(3) The department must permit contracting associate development organizations to have access to the data collected under this section from the county for which they are designated. The organizations must keep confidential any data received under this section, except that they may provide organizations applying for grant funding with aggregated data.

Sec. 2. RCW 39.12.015 and 2019 c 29 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All determinations of the prevailing rate of wage shall be made by the industrial statistician of the department of labor and industries.

(2) The time period for recovery of any wages owed to a worker affected by the determination is tolled until the prevailing wage determination is final.

(3)(a) Except as provided in RCW 39.12.017, and notwithstanding RCW 39.12.010(1), the industrial statistician shall establish the prevailing rate of wage by adopting the hourly wage, usual benefits, and overtime paid for the geographic jurisdiction established in collective bargaining agreements for those trades and occupations that have collective bargaining agreements. For trades and occupations with more than one collective bargaining agreement in the county, the higher rate will prevail.

(b) For trades and occupations in which there are no collective bargaining agreements in the county, the industrial statistician shall establish the prevailing rate of wage as defined in RCW 39.12.010 by conducting wage and hour surveys. In instances when there are no applicable collective bargaining agreements and conducting wage and hour surveys is not feasible, the industrial statistician may employ other appropriate methods to establish the prevailing rate of wage.

(4) Beginning January 1, 2024, the department shall publish on its website copies of the collective bargaining agreements the industrial statistician relied upon to establish the prevailing rate of wage for each trade and occupation. Whenever the industrial statistician updates the prevailing wage rate for a trade or occupation, the department shall update its website to publish the most recent collective bargaining agreement relied upon to establish the updated prevailing rate of wage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 49.04 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning January 1, 2024, the department of labor and industries shall compile aggregate data on the number of apprentices residing in each county categorized by occupation and publish the aggregate data on its website. The department shall update the aggregate data on its website every quarter.

--- END ---