BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 13.32A.040 and 2020 c 51 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department, or a designated contractor of the department, shall ((offer)):

(a) Offer family reconciliation services to families or youth who are experiencing conflict and who may be in need of services upon request from the family or youth and subject to the availability of funding appropriated for this specific purpose; and

(b) Offer family reconciliation services to families or youth after receiving a report that a youth is away from a lawfully prescribed residence or home without parental permission under RCW 13.32A.082(1). If the family or youth is being served by the community support team created under section 5 of this act, the department or designated contractor of the department must:

(i) Still offer family reconciliation services; and

(ii) Coordinate with the community support team created in section 5 of this act.

(2) The department may involve a local multidisciplinary team in its response in determining the services to be provided and in providing those services. Such services shall be provided to alleviate personal or family situations which present a serious and imminent threat to the health or stability of the child or family and to maintain families intact wherever possible.

Sec. 2. RCW 13.32A.082 and 2013 c 4 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, any person, unlicensed youth shelter, or runaway and homeless youth program that, without legal authorization, provides shelter to a minor and that knows at the time of providing the shelter that the minor is away from a lawfully prescribed residence or home without parental permission, shall promptly report the location of the child to the parent, the law enforcement agency of the jurisdiction in which the person lives, or the department.

(b)(i) If a licensed overnight youth shelter, or another licensed organization with a stated mission to provide services to homeless or runaway youth and their families, shelters a child and knows at the time of providing the shelter that the child is away from a lawfully prescribed residence or home without parental permission, it must contact the youth's parent within ((seventy-two))72 hours, but preferably within ((twenty-four))24 hours, following the time that the youth is admitted to the shelter or other licensed organization's program. The notification must include the whereabouts of the youth, a description of the youth's physical and emotional condition, and the circumstances surrounding the youth's contact with the shelter or organization. If there are compelling reasons not to notify the parent, the shelter or organization must instead notify the department. When a minor remains in a licensed overnight youth shelter or with another licensed organization with a stated mission to provide services to homeless or runaway youth and their families under subsection (1)(b)(i)(A) and (B) of this section, the shelter or organization must also notify the department. A minor may provide authorization to remain in a licensed overnight youth shelter or with another licensed organization with a stated mission to provide services to homeless or runaway youth and their families, subject to any limits established by those licensed shelters or organizations, for up to 90 days if:

(A) The licensed overnight youth shelter or other licensed organization with a stated mission to provide services to homeless or runaway youth and their families is unable to make contact with a parent despite their notification efforts required under this section; or

(B) The licensed overnight youth shelter or other licensed organization with a stated mission to provide services to homeless or runaway youth and their families makes contact with a parent, but the parent does not request that the child return home even if the parent does not provide consent for the minor remaining in the licensed overnight youth shelter or other licensed organization with a stated mission to provide services to homeless or runaway youth.

(ii) At least once every eight hours after learning that a youth receiving services or shelter under this section is away from home without permission, the shelter or organization staff must consult the information that the Washington state patrol makes publicly available under RCW 43.43.510(2). If the youth is publicly listed as missing, the shelter or organization must immediately notify the department of its contact with the youth listed as missing. The notification must include a description of the minor's physical and emotional condition and the circumstances surrounding the youth's contact with the shelter or organization.

(c) Reports required under this section may be made by telephone or any other reasonable means.

(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section.

(a) "Shelter" means the person's home or any structure over which the person has any control.

(b) "Promptly report" means to report within eight hours after the person has knowledge that the minor is away from a lawfully prescribed residence or home without parental permission.

(c) "Compelling reasons" include, but are not limited to, circumstances that indicate that notifying the parent or legal guardian will subject the minor to abuse or neglect as defined in RCW 26.44.020.

(3) When the department receives a report under subsection (1) of this section, it shall make a good faith attempt to notify the parent that a report has been received and offer services to the youth and the family designed to resolve the conflict, including offering family reconciliation services, and accomplish a reunification of the family. The department shall offer services under this subsection as soon as possible, but no later than three days, excluding weekends and holidays, following the receipt of a report under subsection (1) of this section.

(4) Nothing in this section prohibits any person, unlicensed youth shelter, or runaway and homeless youth program from immediately reporting the identity and location of any minor who is away from a lawfully prescribed residence or home without parental permission more promptly than required under this section.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.185C.010 and 2019 c 124 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Administrator" means the individual who has the daily administrative responsibility of a crisis residential center.

(2) "Child in need of services petition" means a petition filed in juvenile court by a parent, child, or the department of children, youth, and families seeking adjudication of placement of the child.

(3) "Community action agency" means a nonprofit private or public organization established under the economic opportunity act of 1964.

(4) "Crisis residential center" means a secure or semi-secure facility established pursuant to chapter 74.13 RCW.

(5) "Department" means the department of commerce.

(6) "Director" means the director of the department of commerce.

(7) "Home security fund account" means the state treasury account receiving the state's portion of income from revenue from the sources established by RCW 36.22.179 and 36.22.1791, and all other sources directed to the homeless housing and assistance program.

(8) "Homeless housing grant program" means the vehicle by which competitive grants are awarded by the department, utilizing moneys from the home security fund account, to local governments for programs directly related to housing homeless individuals and families, addressing the root causes of homelessness, preventing homelessness, collecting data on homeless individuals, and other efforts directly related to housing homeless persons.

(9) "Homeless housing plan" means the five-year plan developed by the county or other local government to address housing for homeless persons.

(10) "Homeless housing program" means the program authorized under this chapter as administered by the department at the state level and by the local government or its designated subcontractor at the local level.

(11) "Homeless housing strategic plan" means the five-year plan developed by the department, in consultation with the interagency council on homelessness, the affordable housing advisory board, and the state advisory council on homelessness.

(12) "Homeless person" means an individual living outside or in a building not meant for human habitation or which they have no legal right to occupy, in an emergency shelter, or in a temporary housing program which may include a transitional and supportive housing program if habitation time limits exist. This definition includes substance abusers, people with mental illness, and sex offenders who are homeless.

(13) "HOPE center" means an agency licensed by the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families to provide temporary residential placement and other services to street youth. A street youth may remain in a HOPE center for ((thirty))90 days while services are arranged and permanent placement is coordinated. No street youth may stay longer than ((thirty))90 days unless approved by the department and any additional days approved by the department must be based on the unavailability of a long-term placement option. A street youth whose parent wants him or her returned to home may remain in a HOPE center until his or her parent arranges return of the youth, not longer. All other street youth must have court approval under chapter 13.34 or 13.32A RCW to remain in a HOPE center up to ((thirty))90 days.

(14) "Housing authority" means any of the public corporations created by chapter 35.82 RCW.

(15) "Housing continuum" means the progression of individuals along a housing-focused continuum with homelessness at one end and homeownership at the other.

(16) "Interagency council on homelessness" means a committee appointed by the governor and consisting of, at least, policy level representatives of the following entities: (a) The department of commerce; (b) the department of corrections; (c) the department of children, youth, and families; (d) the department of veterans affairs; and (e) the department of health.

(17) "Local government" means a county government in the state of Washington or a city government, if the legislative authority of the city affirmatively elects to accept the responsibility for housing homeless persons within its borders.

(18) "Local homeless housing task force" means a voluntary local committee created to advise a local government on the creation of a local homeless housing plan and participate in a local homeless housing program. It must include a representative of the county, a representative of the largest city located within the county, at least one homeless or formerly homeless person, such other members as may be required to maintain eligibility for federal funding related to housing programs and services and if feasible, a representative of a private nonprofit organization with experience in low-income housing.

(19) "Long-term private or public housing" means subsidized and unsubsidized rental or owner-occupied housing in which there is no established time limit for habitation of less than two years.

(20) "Performance measurement" means the process of comparing specific measures of success against ultimate and interim goals.

(21) "Secure facility" means a crisis residential center, or portion thereof, that has locking doors, locking windows, or a secured perimeter, designed and operated to prevent a child from leaving without permission of the facility staff.

(22) "Semi-secure facility" means any facility including, but not limited to, crisis residential centers or specialized foster family homes, operated in a manner to reasonably assure that youth placed there will not run away. Pursuant to rules established by the facility administrator, the facility administrator shall establish reasonable hours for residents to come and go from the facility such that no residents are free to come and go at all hours of the day and night. To prevent residents from taking unreasonable actions, the facility administrator, where appropriate, may condition a resident's leaving the facility upon the resident being accompanied by the administrator or the administrator's designee and the resident may be required to notify the administrator or the administrator's designee of any intent to leave, his or her intended destination, and the probable time of his or her return to the center.

(23) "Staff secure facility" means a structured group care facility licensed under rules adopted by the department of children, youth, and families with a ratio of at least one adult staff member to every two children.

(24) "Street outreach services" means a program that provides services and resources either directly or through referral to street youth and unaccompanied young adults as defined in RCW 43.330.702. Services including crisis intervention, emergency supplies, case management, and referrals may be provided through community-based outreach or drop-in centers.

(25) "Washington homeless census" means an annual statewide census conducted as a collaborative effort by towns, cities, counties, community-based organizations, and state agencies, with the technical support and coordination of the department, to count and collect data on all homeless individuals in Washington.

(26) "Washington homeless client management information system" means a database of information about homeless individuals in the state used to coordinate resources to assist homeless clients to obtain and retain housing and reach greater levels of self-sufficiency or economic independence when appropriate, depending upon their individual situations.

Sec. 4. RCW 43.185C.265 and 2019 c 312 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An officer taking a child into custody under RCW 43.185C.260(1) (a) or (b) shall inform the child of the reason for such custody and shall:

(a) Transport the child to his or her home or to a parent at his or her place of employment, if no parent is at home. The parent may request that the officer take the child to the home of an adult extended family member, responsible adult, crisis residential center, the department of children, youth, and families, or a licensed youth shelter. In responding to the request of the parent, the officer shall take the child to a requested place which, in the officer's belief, is within a reasonable distance of the parent's home. The officer releasing a child into the custody of a parent, an adult extended family member, responsible adult, or a licensed youth shelter shall inform the person receiving the child of the reason for taking the child into custody and inform all parties of the nature and location of appropriate services available in the community; or

(b) After attempting to notify the parent, take the child to a designated crisis residential center's secure facility or a center's semi-secure facility if a secure facility is full, not available, or not located within a reasonable distance if:

(i) The child expresses fear or distress at the prospect of being returned to his or her home which leads the officer to believe there is a possibility that the child is experiencing some type of abuse or neglect;

(ii) It is not practical to transport the child to his or her home or place of the parent's employment; or

(iii) There is no parent available to accept custody of the child; or

(c) After attempting to notify the parent, if a crisis residential center is full, not available, or not located within a reasonable distance, request the department of children, youth, and families to accept custody of the child. If the department of children, youth, and families determines that an appropriate placement is currently available, the department of children, youth, and families shall accept custody and place the child in an out-of-home placement. Upon accepting custody of a child from the officer, the department of children, youth, and families may place the child in an out-of-home placement for up to seventy-two hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, without filing a child in need of services petition, obtaining parental consent, or obtaining an order for placement under chapter 13.34 RCW. Upon transferring a child to the department of children, youth, and families' custody, the officer shall provide written documentation of the reasons and the statutory basis for taking the child into custody. If the department of children, youth, and families declines to accept custody of the child, the officer may release the child after attempting to take the child to the following, in the order listed: The home of an adult extended family member; a responsible adult; or a licensed youth shelter. The officer shall immediately notify the department of children, youth, and families if no placement option is available and the child is released.

(2) An officer taking a child into custody under RCW 43.185C.260(1)(c) shall inform the child of the reason for custody. An officer taking a child into custody under RCW 43.185C.260(1)(c) may release the child to the supervising agency, may return the child to the placement authorized by the supervising agency, or shall take the child to a designated crisis residential center.

(3) Every officer taking a child into custody shall provide the child and his or her parent or parents or responsible adult with a copy of the statement specified in RCW 43.185C.290(6).

(4) Whenever an officer transfers custody of a child to a crisis residential center or the department of children, youth, and families, the child may reside in the crisis residential center or may be placed by the department of children, youth, and families in an out-of-home placement for an aggregate total period of time not to exceed seventy-two hours excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. Thereafter, the child may continue in out-of-home placement only if the ((parents have consented))parent has not requested that the child return home, a child in need of services petition has been filed, or an order for placement has been entered under chapter 13.34 RCW.

(5) The department of children, youth, and families shall ensure that all law enforcement authorities are informed on a regular basis as to the location of all designated secure and semi-secure facilities within centers in their jurisdiction, where children taken into custody under RCW 43.185C.260 may be taken.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs shall provide additional funding and assistance to contracted youth service providers or other entities who convene a community support team as described in this section. The purpose of the community support team is to help identify supports for a youth focused on resolving family conflict and obtaining or maintaining long-term and stable housing.

(a) The community support team is required to prioritize reunification between the youth and the youth's family to the extent possible without endangering the health, safety, or welfare of the child.

(b) The community support team may not engage with a family member other than the youth if the parent, guardian, or legal custodian objects to the support or assistance that is offered or provided.

(2) A community support team under this section must include:

(a) The youth; and

(b) Supportive adults identified by the youth, which may include:

(i) Licensed shelter staff;

(ii) A case manager;

(iii) Individuals from the youth's school;

(iv) Juvenile court staff;

(v) The youth's attorney;

(vi) Behavioral health providers;

(vii) Community support providers;

(viii) Family members;

(ix) Mentors;

(x) Peer support;

(xi) Housing navigation;

(xii) Legal assistance; or

(xiii) Other community members.

(3) The community support team described in this section shall develop a process that allows youth who enter a licensed overnight youth shelter, or another licensed organization with a stated mission to provide services to homeless or runaway youth and their families to request assistance from the community support team.

(4) Any youth who enters a licensed overnight youth shelter, or another licensed organization with a stated mission to provide services to homeless or runaway youth and their families in an area served by the community support team is eligible for the community support team.

(5) The community support team described in this section shall coordinate efforts, if appropriate, with:

(a) The department or the designated contractor of the department providing family reconciliation services to a youth or family;

(b) Multidisciplinary teams established under RCW 43.185C.250 and 43.185C.255; and

(c) Other nearby youth homelessness assistance programs that may provide assistance to the youth.

--- END ---