BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 71A.16.040 and 1989 c 175 s 141 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) On receipt of an application for services submitted under RCW 71A.16.030, the secretary in a timely manner shall make a written determination as to whether the applicant is eligible for services provided under this title for persons with developmental disabilities.

(2) The secretary shall give notice of the secretary's determination on eligibility to the person who submitted the application and to the applicant, if the applicant is a person other than the person who submitted the application for services. The notice shall also include a statement advising the recipient of the right to an adjudicative proceeding under RCW 71A.10.050 and the right to judicial review of the secretary's final decision.

(3) The secretary may establish rules for redetermination of eligibility for services under this title; however, the rules may not terminate or require redetermination of eligibility for a child under the age of 18 based solely on the child's age if the child has been determined to be eligible for services on or after the child's third birthday.

--- END ---