BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The department of children, youth, and families shall contract with an external organization to:

(a) Conduct a performance evaluation of department of children, youth, and families policies, procedures, and practices related to communication between the department and caregivers of children receiving child welfare services;

(b) Provide recommendations regarding improving department of children, youth, and families policies, procedures, and practices related to communication between the department and caregivers of children receiving child welfare services; and

(c) Consult with existing or former foster parents and a statewide organization dedicated to supporting adoptive, foster, kinship, and birth parent voices in conducting the evaluation and providing recommendations required under this subsection (1).

(2) The department of children, youth, and families shall make the evaluation and recommendations from the external organization under subsection (1) of this section available to the public on its website.

(3) This section expires June 30, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) By October 1, 2024, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the department of children, youth, and families shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor describing:

(a) How the department of children, youth, and families could implement an automated notification system that would provide electronic or telephonic notifications to caregivers of children receiving child welfare services regarding upcoming changes in placements for the child, court hearings, or other relevant and appropriate information; and

(b) Any statutory, policy, or funding changes needed to accomplish the automated notification system described in (a) of this subsection.

(2) This section expires April 1, 2025.

--- END ---