BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.515 RCW to read as follows:

When moneys in the common school construction fund exceed the costs of the school construction assistance program grants for small school districts' prioritized project list established in RCW 28A.525.159 then the common school construction fund must finance the school construction assistance program grants for small school districts' prioritized project list before funding can be appropriated or spent on other capital projects.

--- END ---