BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The employment security department shall convene a work group for the purpose of identifying and addressing legal and procedural barriers faced by eligible claimants participating in apprenticeship programs when those claimants seek timely access to unemployment insurance benefits. The work group must include representatives of apprenticeship programs and staff of the department, as well as other appropriate stakeholders identified by the department.

(2) The employment security department must submit a report with findings and recommendations, including a status update on applicable administrative efforts to reduce procedural barriers identified by the work group, to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023, in accordance with the requirements under RCW 43.01.036.

--- END ---