BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.03 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A state employee or an elected or appointed official of the state is entitled to transportation from the employee's or elected official's jobsite to his or her home when the following conditions are met:

(a) The employee or elected or appointed official has a disability that inhibits or prevents the employee or official from safely driving at the time the employee or official requires transportation to his or her home;

(b) The employee's or official's position of employment requires him or her to work hours that are not regularly scheduled, predictable, or set; and

(c) The employee or official is required to be physically present at the jobsite past the time any public transportation is available due to the location or the time when the employee or official requires transportation.

(2) The state must provide transportation to the employee or elected or appointed official under this section at no cost to the employee or elected or appointed official.

(3) For purposes of this section, "public transportation" includes buses, trains, taxis, and ride share services, including services operating on digital platforms.

--- END ---