BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.23.290 and 2010 c 68 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director of the department may exercise powers and duties with respect to the administration of food assistance programs in the department. It is the intent of the legislature in administering the food assistance programs transferred to the department by chapter 68, Laws of 2010, that programs continue to be provided through community-based organizations. It is the intent of the legislature that in accepting the administration of food assistance programs, the department's core programs administered by the department by July 1, 2010, not be impacted.

(2) The director of the department may adopt rules necessary to implement the food assistance programs.

(3) The director of the department may enter into contracts and agreements to implement food assistance programs, including contracts and agreements with the United States department of agriculture, to implement federal food assistance programs.

(4) The department may not restrict the amount of food assistance program funding provided to food banks that may be used for essential nonfood items, including diapers, feminine products, and hygiene products, to less than 25 percent of total funding.

--- END ---