BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.22.350 and 2008 c 181 s 202 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In compliance with any applicable provisions of this chapter, the director of the department of labor and industries shall establish a schedule of fees, whether on the basis of plan approval or inspection, for the issuance of an insigne which indicates that the mobile home, commercial coach, conversion vending units, medical units, recreational vehicle, and/or park trailer complies with the provisions of RCW 43.22.340 through 43.22.410 or for any other purpose specifically authorized by any applicable provision of this chapter.

(2) Insignia are not required on mobile homes, commercial coaches, conversion vending units, medical units, recreational vehicles, and/or park trailers manufactured within this state for sale outside this state which are sold to persons outside this state.

(3) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12), the governor may waive or suspend the collection of fees under this section or any portion of this section or under any administrative rule, and issue any orders to facilitate the operation of state or local government or to promote and secure the safety and protection of the civilian population.

(4) The department of labor and industries shall permit the purchase and distribution of insignia to a manufacturer of recreational vehicles and/or park trailers with an approved quality control program, upon such manufacturer's submission of plans and specifications of a model or production prototype of a recreational vehicle and/or park trailer and the payment of plan and specification review fees to the department of labor and industries.

--- END ---