BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 60.28 RCW to read as follows:

(1) An owner, contractor, or subcontractor may withhold as retainage an amount equal to not more than five percent of the contract price of the work completed for nonpublic works projects. Partial payment allowed under this subsection is not acceptance or approval of some of the work or a waiver of defects in the work.

(2) The owner, contractor, or subcontractor shall pay interest at the rate of one percent per month on the final payment due the contractor or subcontractor. The interest shall commence 30 days after the contractor or subcontractor has completed and the owner has accepted the work under the contract for construction for which the final payment is due. The interest shall run until the date when final payment is tendered to the contractor or subcontractor.

(3) When the contractor or subcontractor considers the work that the contractor or subcontractor is contracted to perform to be complete, the contractor or subcontractor shall notify the party to whom the contractor or subcontractor is responsible for performing the construction work under the contract.

(4) The party shall, within 15 days after receiving the notice, either accept the work or notify the contractor or subcontractor of work yet to be performed under the contract. If the party does not accept the work or does not notify the contractor or subcontractor of work yet to be performed within the time allowed, the interest required under this subsection shall commence 30 days after the end of the 15-day period.

(5) This section does not apply to single-family residential construction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 60.28 RCW to read as follows:

(1) When a contractor pays a subcontractor in full, including the amount the contractor withheld as retainage, the owner with whom the contractor has the contract shall pay the contractor, out of the amount that the owner withheld from the contractor as retainage, a sum equal to the amount of retainage that the contractor paid the subcontractor.

(2) The contractor shall notify the owner when the contractor pays a subcontractor in full under this section and the owner shall, within 15 days after receiving the notice, pay the contractor the amount due the contractor under this subsection. Interest on the amount due the contractor at the rate of one percent per month shall commence 30 days after the owner receives notice of full payment to the subcontractor.

(3) This section does not apply to single-family residential construction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 60.28 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In lieu of retainage, a subcontractor may tender, and a contractor or owner must accept, a retainage bond in an amount not to exceed five percent of the moneys earned by the contractor.

(2) A contractor must provide a good and sufficient bond from an authorized surety company, conditioned that such person or persons must:

(a) Faithfully perform all the provisions of such contract;

(b) Pay all laborers, mechanics, and subcontractors and material suppliers, and all persons who supply such person or persons, or subcontractors, with provisions and supplies for the carrying on of such work; and

(c) Pay the taxes, increases, and penalties incurred on the project.

(3) The contractor may require that the authorized surety have a minimum A.M. Best financial strength rating so long as that minimum rating does not exceed A-. The contractor may withhold the subcontractor's portion of the bond premium. Within 30 days of receipt of the request, the contractor shall accept a bond meeting these requirements. The contractor's bond and any proceeds therefrom are subject to all claims and liens and in the same manner and priority as set forth for retained percentages in this chapter. Whenever a contractor accepts a bond in lieu of retained funds from a contractor, the contractor must accept like bonds from any subcontractors or suppliers from which the contractor has retained funds. The contractor must then release the funds retained from the subcontractor or supplier to the subcontractor or supplier within 30 days of accepting the bond from the subcontractor or supplier.

(4) This section does not apply to single-family residential construction.

--- END ---