BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.27.010 and 2015 c 52 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)(a) "Contractor" includes any person, firm, corporation, or other entity who or which, in the pursuit of an independent business undertakes to, or offers to undertake, or submits a bid to, construct, alter, repair, add to, subtract from, improve, develop, move, wreck, or demolish any building, highway, road, railroad, excavation or other structure, project, development, or improvement attached to real estate or to do any part thereof including the installation of carpeting or other floor covering, the erection of scaffolding or other structures or works in connection therewith, the installation or repair of roofing or siding, performing tree removal services, or cabinet or similar installation; or, who, to do similar work upon his or her own property, employs members of more than one trade upon a single job or project or under a single building permit except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

(b) "Contractor" also includes a consultant acting as a general contractor.

(c) "Contractor" also includes any person, firm, corporation, or other entity covered by this subsection (1), whether or not registered as required under this chapter or who are otherwise required to be registered or licensed by law, who offer to sell their property without occupying or using the structures, projects, developments, or improvements for more than one year from the date the structure, project, development, or improvement was substantially completed or abandoned. A person, firm, corporation, or other entity is not a contractor under this subsection (1)(c) if the person, firm, corporation, or other entity contracts with a registered general contractor and does not superintend the work.

(2) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.

(3) "Director" means the director of the department of labor and industries or designated representative employed by the department.

(4) "Filing" means delivery of a document that is required to be filed with an agency to a place designated by the agency.

(5) "General contractor" means a contractor whose business operations require the use of more than one building trade or craft upon a single job or project or under a single building permit. A general contractor also includes one who superintends, or consults on, in whole or in part, work falling within the definition of a contractor.

(6) "Notice of infraction" means a form used by the department to notify contractors that an infraction under this chapter has been filed against them.

(7) "Partnership" means a business formed under Title 25 RCW.

(8) "Registration cancellation" means a written notice from the department that a contractor's action is in violation of this chapter and that the contractor's registration has been revoked.

(9) "Registration suspension" means either an automatic suspension as provided in this chapter, or a written notice from the department that a contractor's action is a violation of this chapter and that the contractor's registration has been suspended for a specified time, or until the contractor shows evidence of compliance with this chapter.

(10) "Residential homeowner" means an individual person or persons owning or leasing real property:

(a) Upon which one single-family residence is to be built and in which the owner or lessee intends to reside upon completion of any construction; or

(b) Upon which there is a single-family residence to which improvements are to be made and in which the owner or lessee intends to reside upon completion of any construction.

(11) "Service," except as otherwise provided in RCW 18.27.225 and 18.27.370, means posting in the United States mail, properly addressed, postage prepaid, return receipt requested, or personal service. Service by mail is complete upon deposit in the United States mail to the last known address provided to the department.

(12) "Specialty contractor" means a contractor whose operations do not fall within the definition of "general contractor". A specialty contractor may only subcontract work that is incidental to the specialty contractor's work.

(13) "Substantial completion" means the same as "substantial completion of construction" in RCW 4.16.310.

(14) "Successor" means an applicant operating with all or part of the assets of another entity previously registered under this chapter, where the applicant is under substantially common ownership, management, or control of the other entity.

(15) "Unregistered contractor" means a person, firm, corporation, or other entity doing work as a contractor without being registered in compliance with this chapter. "Unregistered contractor" includes contractors whose registration is expired, revoked, or suspended. "Unregistered contractor" does not include a contractor who has maintained a valid bond and the insurance or assigned account required by RCW 18.27.050, and whose registration has lapsed for ((thirty))30 or fewer days.

(((15)))(16) "Unsatisfied final judgment" means a judgment or final tax warrant that has not been satisfied either through payment, court approved settlement, discharge in bankruptcy, or assignment under RCW 19.72.070.

(((16)))(17) "Verification" means the receipt and duplication by the city, town, or county of a contractor registration card that is current on its face, checking the department's contractor registration database, or calling the department to confirm that the contractor is registered.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.27.030 and 2008 c 120 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An applicant for registration as a contractor shall submit an application under oath upon a form to be prescribed by the director and which shall include the following information pertaining to the applicant:

(a) Employer social security number or individual taxpayer identification number.

(b) Unified business identifier number.

(c) Evidence of workers' compensation coverage for the applicant's employees working in Washington, as follows:

(i) The applicant's industrial insurance account number issued by the department;

(ii) The applicant's self-insurer number issued by the department; or

(iii) For applicants domiciled in a state or province of Canada subject to an agreement entered into under RCW 51.12.120(7), as permitted by the agreement, filing a certificate of coverage issued by the agency that administers the workers' compensation law in the applicant's state or province of domicile certifying that the applicant has secured the payment of compensation under the other state's or province's workers' compensation law.

(d) Employment security department number.

(e) Unified business identifier (UBI) account number may be substituted for the information required by (c) and (d) of this subsection if the applicant will not employ employees in Washington.

(f) Type of contracting activity, whether a general or a specialty contractor and if the latter, the type of specialty.

(g) The name and address of each partner if the applicant is a firm or partnership, or the name and address of the owner if the applicant is an individual proprietorship, or the name and address of the corporate officers and statutory agent, if any, if the applicant is a corporation or the name and address of all members of other business entities. The information contained in such application is a matter of public record and open to public inspection.

(2) The department may verify the workers' compensation coverage information provided by the applicant under subsection (1)(c) of this section, including but not limited to information regarding the coverage of an individual employee of the applicant. If coverage is provided under the laws of another state, the department may notify the other state that the applicant is employing employees in Washington.

(3)(a) The department shall deny an application for registration if: (i) The applicant has been previously performing work subject to this chapter as a sole proprietor, partnership, corporation, or other entity and the department has notice that the applicant has an unsatisfied final judgment against him or her in an action based on work performed subject to this chapter or the applicant owes the department money for penalties assessed or fees due under this chapter as a result of a final judgment; (ii) the applicant was an owner, principal, or officer of a partnership, corporation, or other entity that either has an unsatisfied final judgment against it in an action that was incurred for work performed subject to this chapter or owes the department money for penalties assessed or fees due under this chapter as a result of a final judgment; (iii) the applicant is a successor to an entity with an unsatisfied final judgment against it in an action that was incurred for work performed subject to this chapter or owes the department money for penalties assessed or fees due under this chapter as a result of a final judgment, except as provided under (d) of this subsection (3); (iv) the applicant does not have a valid unified business identifier number; (((iv)))(v) the department determines that the applicant has falsified information on the application, unless the error was inadvertent; ((or (v)))(vi) the applicant does not have an active and valid certificate of registration with the department of revenue; or (vii) the applicant is under 18 years old at the time of application.

(b) The department shall suspend an active registration if (i) the department has determined that the registrant has an unsatisfied final judgment against it for work within the scope of this chapter; (ii) the department has determined that the registrant is a sole proprietor or an owner, principal, or officer of a registered contractor that has an unsatisfied final judgment against it for work within the scope of this chapter; (iii) the registrant does not maintain a valid unified business identifier number; (iv) the department has determined that the registrant falsified information on the application, unless the error was inadvertent; or (v) the registrant does not have an active and valid certificate of registration with the department of revenue.

(c) The department may suspend an active registration if the department has determined that an owner, principal, partner, or officer of the registrant was an owner, principal, or officer of a previous partnership, corporation, or other entity that has an unsatisfied final judgment against it.

(d) For the purposes of (a)(iii) of this subsection (3), it is presumed that an applicant knew or should have known of the relevant unsatisfied final judgment. If an applicant demonstrates by a preponderance of the evidence that the applicant did not know of the unsatisfied final judgment, by having exercised due diligence and timely verifying with the department that the other contractor was in good standing, then the department may grant the application for registration under this section, provided that the applicant meets applicable requirements under this chapter. The department shall adopt rules for the purposes of implementing this subsection (3)(d).

(4) The department shall not deny an application or suspend a registration because of an unsatisfied final judgment if the applicant's or registrant's unsatisfied final judgment was determined by the director to be the result of the fraud or negligence of another party, unless the applicant or registrant is a successor to said party under subsection (3)(a)(iii) of this section.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.27.040 and 2019 c 155 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each applicant shall file with the department a surety bond issued by a surety insurer who meets the requirements of chapter 48.28 RCW in the sum of ((twelve thousand dollars))$30,000 if the applicant is a general contractor ((and six thousand dollars))or $15,000 if the applicant is a specialty contractor. If no valid bond is already on file with the department at the time the application is filed, a bond must accompany the registration application. The bond shall have the state of Washington named as obligee with good and sufficient surety in a form to be approved by the department. The bond shall be continuous and may be canceled by the surety upon the surety giving written notice to the director. A cancellation or revocation of the bond or withdrawal of the surety from the bond automatically suspends the registration issued to the contractor until a new bond or reinstatement notice has been filed and approved as provided in this section. The bond shall be conditioned that the applicant will pay all persons performing labor, including employee benefits, for the contractor, will pay all taxes and contributions due to the state of Washington, and will pay all persons furnishing material or renting or supplying equipment to the contractor and will pay all amounts that may be adjudged against the contractor by reason of breach of contract including improper work in the conduct of the contracting business. A change in the name of a business or a change in the type of business entity shall not impair a bond for the purposes of this section so long as one of the original applicants for such bond maintains partial ownership in the business covered by the bond.

(2) At the time of initial registration or renewal, the contractor shall provide a bond or other security deposit as required by this chapter and comply with all of the other provisions of this chapter before the department shall issue or renew the contractor's certificate of registration. Any contractor registered as of ((July 1, 2001))June 30, 2024, who maintains that registration in accordance with this chapter is in compliance with this chapter until the next renewal of the contractor's certificate of registration.

(3) Any person, firm, or corporation having a claim against the contractor for any of the items referred to in this section may bring suit against the contractor and the bond or deposit in the superior court of the county in which the work was done or of any county in which jurisdiction of the contractor may be had. The surety issuing the bond shall be named as a party to any suit upon the bond. Action upon the bond or deposit brought by a residential homeowner for breach of contract by a party to the construction contract shall be commenced by filing the summons and complaint with the clerk of the appropriate superior court within two years from the date the claimed contract work was substantially completed or abandoned, whichever occurred first. Action upon the bond or deposit brought by any other authorized party shall be commenced by filing the summons and complaint with the clerk of the appropriate superior court within one year from the date the claimed labor was performed and benefits accrued, taxes and contributions owing the state of Washington became due, materials and equipment were furnished, or the claimed contract work was substantially completed or abandoned, whichever occurred first. Service of process in an action filed under this chapter against the contractor and the contractor's bond or the deposit shall be exclusively by service upon the department. Three copies of the summons and complaint and a fee adopted by rule of not less than ((fifty dollars))$50 to cover the costs shall be served by registered or certified mail, or other delivery service requiring notice of receipt, upon the department at the time suit is started and the department shall maintain a record, available for public inspection, of all suits so commenced. Service is not complete until the department receives the fee and three copies of the summons and complaint. The service shall constitute service and confer personal jurisdiction on the contractor and the surety for suit on claimant's claim against the contractor and the bond or deposit and the department shall transmit the summons and complaint or a copy thereof to the contractor at the address listed in the contractor's application and to the surety within two days after it shall have been received.

(4) The surety upon the bond shall not be liable in an aggregate amount in excess of the amount named in the bond nor for any monetary penalty assessed pursuant to this chapter for an infraction. The liability of the surety shall not cumulate where the bond has been renewed, continued, reinstated, reissued or otherwise extended. The surety upon the bond may, upon notice to the department and the parties, tender to the clerk of the court having jurisdiction of the action an amount equal to the claims thereunder or the amount of the bond less the amount of judgments, if any, previously satisfied therefrom and to the extent of such tender the surety upon the bond shall be exonerated but if the actions commenced and pending and provided to the department as required in subsection (3) of this section, at any one time exceed the amount of the bond then unimpaired, claims shall be satisfied from the bond in the following order:

(a) Employee labor and claims of laborers, including employee benefits;

(b) Claims for breach of contract by a party to the construction contract;

(c) Registered or licensed subcontractors, material, and equipment;

(d) Taxes and contributions due the state of Washington;

(e) Any court costs, interest, and attorneys' fees plaintiff may be entitled to recover. The surety is not liable for any amount in excess of the penal limit of its bond.

A payment made by the surety in good faith exonerates the bond to the extent of any payment made by the surety.

(5) The total amount paid from a bond or deposit ((required of a general contractor by this section)) to claimants other than residential homeowners must not exceed one-half of the bond ((amount. The total amount paid from a bond or deposit required of a specialty contractor by this section to claimants other than residential homeowners must not exceed one-half of the bond amount or four thousand dollars, whichever is greater))or deposit.

(6) The prevailing party in an action filed under this section against the contractor and contractor's bond or deposit, for breach of contract by a party to the construction contract involving a residential homeowner, is entitled to costs, interest, and reasonable attorneys' fees. The surety upon the bond or deposit is not liable in an aggregate amount in excess of the amount named in the bond or deposit nor for any monetary penalty assessed pursuant to this chapter for an infraction.

(7) If a final judgment impairs the liability of the surety upon the bond or deposit so furnished that there is not in effect a bond or deposit in the full amount prescribed in this section, the registration of the contractor is automatically suspended until the bond or deposit liability in the required amount unimpaired by unsatisfied judgment claims is furnished.

(8) In lieu of the surety bond required by this section the contractor may file with the department an assigned savings account, upon forms provided by the department.

(9) Any person having filed and served a summons and complaint as required by this section having an unsatisfied final judgment against the registrant for any items referred to in this section may execute upon the security held by the department by serving a certified copy of the unsatisfied final judgment by registered or certified mail upon the department within one year of the date of entry of such judgment. Upon the receipt of service of such certified copy the department shall pay or order paid from the deposit, through the registry of the superior court which rendered judgment, towards the amount of the unsatisfied judgment. The priority of payment by the department shall be the order of receipt by the department, but the department shall have no liability for payment in excess of the amount of the deposit.

(10) Within ((ten))10 days after resolution of the case, a certified copy of the final judgment and order, or any settlement documents where a case is not disposed of by a court trial, a certified copy of the dispositive settlement documents must be provided to the department by the prevailing party. Failure to provide a copy of the final judgment and order or the dispositive settlement documents to the department within ((ten))10 days of entry of such an order constitutes a violation of this chapter and a penalty adopted by rule of not less than ((two hundred fifty dollars))$250 may be assessed against the prevailing party.

(11) The director may require an applicant applying to renew or reinstate a registration or applying for a new registration to file a bond of up to three times the normally required amount, if the director determines that an applicant, or a previous registration of a corporate officer, owner, or partner of a current applicant, has had in the past five years one final judgment in actions under this chapter involving a residential single-family dwelling.

(12) The director may adopt rules necessary for the proper administration of the security.

(((13)(a) The department must convene a work group no later than August 1, 2019, to consider additional safeguards for consumers who engage contractors. The department must provide staff support for the work group and include in the work group: Department staff; large and small contractors that primarily contract with residential homeowners, those that build new and rehabilitate residences, and other interested contractors; surety bond companies; realtors or their representatives; workers and/or their representatives; representatives from the consumer protection division of the office of the attorney general; consumers and/or advocates representing them; and local building officials.

The work group shall submit a report with recommendations to the department and, if applicable, the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2020. The report must address whether:

(i) Bond amounts are sufficient and appropriate to protect consumers, workers, and suppliers and meet tax obligations;

(ii) Additional criteria for contractors would provide a greater level of protection;

(iii) Strategies to discourage the transfer of a business to a different entity for the purpose of evading penalties or judgments under this chapter should be implemented;

(iv) Any other registration requirements or options for consumer recovery under this chapter should be changed to increase protections for consumers; and

(v) Incentives to adopt industry best practices would increase consumer protections.

(b) The work group must dissolve once the report is submitted.))

Sec. 4. RCW 18.27.340 and 1997 c 314 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, a contractor found to have committed an infraction under RCW 18.27.200 shall be assessed a monetary penalty of not less than ((two hundred dollars))$200 and not more than ((five thousand dollars))$5,000.

(2) The director may waive collection in favor of payment of restitution to a consumer complainant.

(3) A contractor found to have committed an infraction under RCW 18.27.200 for failure to register shall be assessed a fine of not less than ((one thousand dollars))$1,200, nor more than ((five thousand dollars))$6,000. The director may reduce the penalty for failure to register, but in no case below ((five hundred dollars))$600, if the person becomes registered within ((ten))10 days of receiving a notice of infraction and the notice of infraction is for a first offense.

(4) Monetary penalties collected under this ((chapter))section shall be deposited in the ((general fund))homeowner recovery account under section 7 of this act.

Sec. 5. RCW 18.27.400 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 11 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

All moneys, except fines and penalties, received or collected under the terms of this chapter must be deposited into the construction registration inspection account. All fines and penalties received or collected under the terms of this chapter shall be deposited in the ((general fund))homeowner recovery account under section 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 18.27 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this purpose, the homeowner recovery program is created and administered by the department. The department shall have such rule-making authority as the department deems necessary to administer the program.

(2)(a) Beginning July 1, 2026, a person is eligible to recover from the homeowner recovery program, provided that each of the following conditions is satisfied:

(i) The person is a claimant with a final judgment in a court of competent jurisdiction against a registered contractor for a claim brought under RCW 18.27.040(3) on his or her primary residence. For purposes of a claim brought on a multifamily dwelling consisting of more than one unit, only the unit in which the claimant actually resides is considered the claimant's primary residence;

(ii) The judgment specifies the actual damages suffered as a consequence of such a claim;

(iii) The claimant has proceeded against any existing bond covering the contractor;

(iv) The judgment has not been satisfied in full; and

(v) An application for recovery under (b) of this subsection is made within 90 days after the conclusion of the civil action brought under RCW 18.27.040(3).

(b) The department shall publish a form on its website for claimants to apply for payment from the account under this section. The department may determine by rule additional documentation required to complete an application under this section.

(3)(a) The priority of payment for eligible applicants must be by the order of receipt by the department, subject to the limitations in this subsection (3). Payment for an eligible application must be to the full extent of eligibility, without proration, before consideration of payment for a subsequent application in the order of receipt. Determinations regarding payments must be made by the department in its sole discretion.

(b) Payment from the account is limited to actual damages awarded in a final judgment, after recovery against the bond, for a claim brought under RCW 18.27.040(3). Payment from the account for other costs related to or pursuant to civil proceedings, such as attorneys' fees, court costs, or punitive damages, is prohibited.

(c) Payment from the account may not exceed $25,000 per contractor per parcel, or the amount unpaid on the judgment, whichever is less.

(d)(i) Total payments under the homeowner recovery program for a fiscal year may not be greater than 80 percent of the account balance calculated at the end of the previous fiscal year.

(ii) The department shall create and maintain a waitlist for any eligible applications unpaid due to an insufficient account balance under (d)(i) of this subsection. The waitlist must preserve the order of receipt in accordance with (a) of this subsection.

(e) Eligibility for payment under subsection (2) of this section does not create a right to payment under this section. Payments under this section are discretionary. This section does not create an entitlement to payment or services. This section does not create a right of action.

(f) The department is not criminally or civilly liable and may not have any penalty or cause of action of any nature arise against it regarding the provision or lack of provision of funds for payments under this section.

(4)(a) At the time of payment from the account under this section, the claimant shall assign his or her right, title, and interest in any final judgment on his or her claim against the contractor to the department to the extent of such payment. The department shall be subrogated to the right, title, and interest of the claimant, and may pursue an insurer or other third party to recover amounts paid from the account. Any amount subsequently recovered on the judgment must be for the purpose of reimbursing the account.

(b) A claimant in receipt of payment from the account pursuant to an application under this section is prohibited from pursuing collection, or authorizing another entity to pursue collection on the claimant's behalf, of the damages attributable to the same claims to the extent of such payment.

(c) Upon any payment from the account, the department shall notify the contractor that a payment has been made and the claimant has made an assignment under this section. The department shall include any additional information about the process for reimbursing the account under subsection (5) of this section.

(5)(a) The department may pursue reimbursement to the account from the contractor for the amount paid from the account, as well as interest on that amount, in accordance with rules adopted by the department. The department may establish reimbursement payment plans up to 36 months. Any payment plan longer than 12 months must assess interest as provided in RCW 43.17.240. The department must deposit all moneys recovered in the account.

(b) Where a contractor defaults in payment of reimbursement, collection of amounts will be handled pursuant to the procedures in RCW 49.48.086.

(c) The department's duties with respect to obtaining reimbursement from the contractor to the account are limited to those specified within this subsection (5).

(6) Nothing contained herein limits the authority of the department to take action against a contractor for a violation under this chapter or the rules promulgated thereunder; nor does the reimbursement in full of all obligations to the account by a contractor effect any enforcement of a violation under this chapter or the rules promulgated thereunder.

(7) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Account" means the homeowner recovery account created in section 7 of this act.

(b) "Claimant" means the owner of an owner-occupied residential property in the state.

(c) "Residential property" means a single-family dwelling, or a multifamily dwelling consisting of four or fewer units, but does not include a condominium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. A new section is added to chapter 18.27 RCW to read as follows:

The homeowner recovery account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All repayments under section 6 of this act, private contributions, and other moneys transferred or directed to the account must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may only be used for the homeowner recovery program to satisfy unpaid judgments for eligible claims under section 6 of this act. Administrative costs of the program may not be paid from the account. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. A new section is added to chapter 18.27 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By December 1st of each year through 2034, the department must submit an annual report to the appropriate committees of the legislature, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, on the homeowner recovery program under section 6 of this act, including the following information for the previous fiscal year:

(a) The applications made under the program, including data as to claim amounts;

(b) The payments made under the program;

(c) The status of any waitlist;

(d) The status and solvency of the homeowner recovery account under section 7 of this act; and

(e) Recommendations for any changes to the program, if deemed necessary by the department.

(2) By December 1, 2035, and each year thereafter, the department shall notify the appropriate committees of the legislature, by submitting a report in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, if the department finds there is a significant waitlist of eligible applicants or otherwise finds there is insufficient funds in the homeowner recovery account to sustain the homeowner recovery program.

Sec. 9. RCW 43.79A.040 and 2022 c 244 s 3, 2022 c 206 s 8, 2022 c 183 s 16, and 2022 c 162 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested, and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the state treasury, and may be commingled with moneys in the state treasury for cash management and cash balance purposes.

(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust fund must be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment income account.

(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments must occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer must distribute the earnings credited to the investment income account to the state general fund except under (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection.

(b) The following accounts and funds must receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The 24/7 sobriety account, the Washington promise scholarship account, the Gina Grant Bull memorial legislative page scholarship account, the Rosa Franklin legislative internship program scholarship account, the Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the Washington college savings program account, the accessible communities account, the Washington achieving a better life experience program account, the Washington career and college pathways innovation challenge program account, the community and technical college innovation account, the agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the behavioral health loan repayment program account, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care endowed scholarship trust fund, the contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the county ((enhanced)) 911 excise tax account, the county road administration board emergency loan account, the toll collection account, the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the energy facility site evaluation council account, the fair fund, the family and medical leave insurance account, the fish and wildlife federal lands revolving account, the natural resources federal lands revolving account, the food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship account, the forest health revolving account, the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the educator conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the GET ready for math and science scholarship account, the Washington global health technologies and product development account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the Washington history day account, the industrial insurance rainy day fund, the juvenile accountability incentive account, the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism promotion account, the low-income home rehabilitation revolving loan program account, the homeowner recovery account, the multiagency permitting team account, the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management account, the produce railcar pool account, the public use general aviation airport loan revolving account, the regional transportation investment district account, the rural rehabilitation account, the Washington sexual assault kit account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the children's trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred owners' bonus fund and breeder awards account, the Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account, the individual development account program account, the Washington horse racing commission operating account, the life sciences discovery fund, the Washington state library-archives building account, the reduced cigarette ignition propensity account, the center for deaf and hard of hearing youth account, the school for the blind account, the Millersylvania park trust fund, the public employees' and retirees' insurance reserve fund, the school employees' benefits board insurance reserve fund, the public employees' and retirees' insurance account, the school employees' insurance account, the long-term services and supports trust account, the radiation perpetual maintenance fund, the Indian health improvement reinvestment account, the department of licensing tuition recovery trust fund, the student achievement council tuition recovery trust fund, the tuition recovery trust fund, the Washington student loan account, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the natural resources deposit fund, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the federal forest revolving account, and the library operations account.

(c) The following accounts and funds must receive 80 percent of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period: The advance right-of-way revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving account, the federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle account, the local rail service assistance account, and the miscellaneous transportation programs account.

(d) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the custody of the state treasurer that deposits funds into a fund or account in the custody of the state treasurer pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.

(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 10. RCW 51.44.190 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 11 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The construction registration inspection account is created in the state treasury. All moneys, except fines and penalties, received or collected under the terms of chapters 18.27 and 70.87 RCW and under the terms of RCW 43.22.335 through 43.22.430 and 43.22.432 through 43.22.495 must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may only be spent after appropriation. Expenditures from the account, not including moneys transferred to the general fund, may be used only to carry out the purposes of chapters 18.27 and 70.87 RCW and RCW 43.22.335 through 43.22.430 and 43.22.432 through 43.22.495.

(2) The department shall set the fees deposited in the account at a level that generates revenue that is as near as practicable to the amount of the appropriation to carry out the duties specified in this section.

(3) ((Until June 30, 2023, on))On the last working day of the first month following each quarterly period, ((seven))three and one-half percent of all revenues received into the account during the previous quarter from licenses, permits, and registrations, net of refunds paid to customers, must be transferred into the general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. Sections 3 through 9 of this act take effect July 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. Section 10 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect June 30, 2023.

--- END ---