BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that there is great public interest in accelerating the building of affordable homes by having an ample supply of code officials. To that end, the legislature intends to accelerate the licensing process for entities seeking to operate private vocational schools that offer classes to train permit technicians, inspectors, plans examiners, code officials, building officials, and other related areas.

Sec. 2. RCW 28C.10.060 and 2014 c 11 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any entity desiring to operate a private vocational school shall apply for a license to the agency on a form provided by the agency. The agency shall issue a license if the school:

(((1)))(a) Files a completed application with information satisfactory to the agency. Misrepresentation by an applicant shall be grounds for the agency, at its discretion, to deny or revoke a license.

(((2)))(b) Complies with the requirements for the tuition recovery trust fund under RCW 28C.10.084.

(((3)))(c) Pays the required fees.

(((4)))(d) Meets the minimum standards adopted by the agency under RCW 28C.10.050.

(2) Applications from entities that offer training for workers that will contribute to adding affordable housing to the state, such as permit technicians, inspectors, plans examiners, code officials, building officials, and other related fields, shall be prioritized and expedited.

(3) Licenses shall be valid for one year from the date of issue unless revoked or suspended. If a school fails to file a completed renewal application at least ((thirty))30 days before the expiration date of its current license the school shall be subject to payment of a late filing fee fixed by the agency.

--- END ---