BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any employer with employees who operate, maintain, or construct high voltage lines and equipment or who conduct line-clearance tree trimming in close proximity to high voltage lines and equipment shall:

(a) Make an automated external defibrillator available and accessible to employees when work is being performed on, or in close proximity to, high voltage lines and equipment by two or more employees;

(b) Conduct regular maintenance and annual inspections of the automated external defibrillator to ensure operability and availability; and

(c) Provide training or facilitate the provision of training to ensure there are at least two employees proficient on the proper and safe use of the automated external defibrillator at any site involving work on, or in close proximity to, high voltage lines and equipment. To be considered proficient, an employee must have completed initial or updated training within the previous two years.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "high voltage lines and equipment" refers to any energized communication line, electric supply line, or equipment with a voltage of 601 or greater.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect January 1, 2024.

--- END ---