BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW to read as follows:

(1) An institution of higher education may not require a student to receive any vaccination or immunization as a condition of enrollment if the student is only attending classes online and is not regularly visiting the institution's physical campus.

(2) Any rule, policy, or procedure adopted by the institution of higher education is null and void to the extent it conflicts with the requirements of this section.

(3) For purposes of this section, "institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in RCW 28B.92.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---