BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 18.79 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A registered nurse, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or licensed practical nurse may practice in the state for up to 30 days before obtaining an expedited temporary practice permit under section 2 of this act or a temporary practice permit under RCW 18.130.075 if:

(a) The person is licensed and in good standing in the state of Alaska, California, Idaho, or Oregon;

(b) The person has accepted an employment offer requiring the person to be licensed in Washington as a registered nurse, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or licensed practical nurse; and

(c) The person's employer requests authorization for the person to begin practicing in this state by submitting a form to the commission that includes the person's name, license number, and date of birth, and the commission certifies that the person is licensed and in good standing in the state of Alaska, California, Idaho, or Oregon. The commission must inform the employer of the decision and the authorization within two business days.

(2)(a) A person qualified to practice under this section may only practice in this state to the extent authorized by this chapter as if the person were licensed in this state.

(b) The commission may modify or restrict the services that a person qualified to practice under this section may provide.

(c) An employer of a person qualified to practice under this section may restrict the services that the person may provide.

(3) The right to practice in this state pursuant to this section shall be subject to discipline by order of the commission upon a finding by the commission of an act of unprofessional conduct as defined in RCW 18.130.180 or that the individual is unable to practice with reasonable skill or safety due to a mental or physical condition as described in RCW 18.130.170. A person qualified to practice under this section shall have the same rights of notice, hearing, and judicial review as provided generally under this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 18.79 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The commission shall issue an expedited temporary practice permit to practice as a registered nurse, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or licensed practical nurse to a person who:

(a) Holds a current license to practice as a registered nurse, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or licensed practical nurse issued by a professional licensing board in the state of Alaska, California, Idaho, or Oregon;

(b) Provides to the commission, in a manner determined by the commission, sufficient proof that the person is in good standing with the issuing out-of-state professional licensing board;

(c) Submits information required for the national background check fingerprint process, if applicable; and

(d) Meets all other requirements and qualifications for a temporary practice permit in accordance with RCW 18.130.075.

(2) An expedited temporary practice permit issued under this section permits a person to practice as a registered nurse, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or licensed practical nurse in Washington, pending the results of the fingerprint-based national background check, to the extent allowed by rules adopted by the commission, and is valid until the earliest of the following:

(a) The date the person is granted a full license to practice as a registered nurse, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or licensed practical nurse in Washington; or

(b) The date the expedited temporary practice permit expires.

(3) An expedited temporary practice permit issued under this section is not renewable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2023.

--- END ---