BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 51.44 RCW to read as follows:

There shall be, in the office of the state treasurer, a fund to be known and designated as the "self-insurance reserve fund."

Sec. 2. RCW 43.84.092 and 2022 c 182 s 403 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.

(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the ambulance transport fund, the brownfield redevelopment trust fund account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the Chehalis basin taxable account, the cleanup settlement account, the climate active transportation account, the climate transit programs account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community services account, the diesel idle reduction account, the drinking water assistance account, the administrative subaccount of the drinking water assistance account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the fair start for kids account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the public health services account, the state higher education construction account, the higher education construction account, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the move ahead WA account, the move ahead WA flexible account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the second injury fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state reclamation revolving account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the statewide broadband account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.

(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.

(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.84.092 and 2022 c 182 s 404 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.

(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the brownfield redevelopment trust fund account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the Chehalis basin taxable account, the cleanup settlement account, the climate active transportation account, the climate transit programs account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community services account, the diesel idle reduction account, the drinking water assistance account, the administrative subaccount of the drinking water assistance account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the fair start for kids account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the public health services account, the state higher education construction account, the higher education construction account, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the move ahead WA account, the move ahead WA flexible account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the second injury fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state reclamation revolving account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the statewide broadband account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.

(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.

(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 4. RCW 51.16.120 and 2015 c 137 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever a worker has a previous bodily disability from any previous injury or disease, whether known or unknown to the employer, and suffers a further disability from injury or occupational disease in employment covered by this title and becomes totally and permanently disabled from the combined effects thereof or dies when death was substantially accelerated by the combined effects thereof, then the experience record of an employer insured with the state fund at the time of the further injury or disease must be charged and a self-insured employer must pay directly into the self-insurance reserve fund only the accident cost which would have resulted solely from the further injury or disease, had there been no preexisting disability, and which accident cost must be based upon an evaluation of the disability by medical experts. The difference between the charge thus assessed to such employer at the time of the further injury or disease and the total cost of the pension reserve must be assessed against the second injury fund. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the department must pass upon the application of this section in all cases where benefits are paid for total permanent disability or death and issue an order thereon appealable by the employer. Pending outcome of such appeal the transfer or payment must be made as required by such order.

(2) If a self-insured employer is in default or the director has withdrawn the certification of a self-insured employer, the department may not pass on the application of this section. In such cases, the total cost of the pension reserve must first be assessed against the defaulting self-insured employer's deposit required by RCW 51.14.020 and in cases where the surety funds are insufficient the remaining cost of the pension reserve must be assessed against the insolvency trust fund.

(3) The department must, in cases of claims of workers sustaining injuries or occupational diseases in the employ of state fund employers, recompute the experience record of such employers when the claims of workers injured in their employ have been found to qualify for payments from the second injury fund after the regular time for computation of such experience records and the department may make appropriate adjustments in such cases including cash refunds or credits to such employers.

(4) To encourage employment of injured workers who have a developmental disability as defined in RCW 71A.10.020, the department may adopt rules providing for the reduction or elimination of premiums or assessments from employers of such workers and may also adopt rules for the reduction or elimination of charges against their employers in the event of further injury to such workers in their employ.

Sec. 5. RCW 51.32.242 and 2008 c 280 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, each self-insured employer shall retain from the earnings of each of its workers that amount as shall be fixed from time to time by the director, the basis for measuring said amount to be determined by the director. These moneys shall only be retained from employees and remitted to the department in such manner and at such intervals as the department directs and shall be placed in the self-insured employer overpayment reimbursement fund. The moneys so collected shall be used exclusively for reimbursement to the self-insurance reserve fund and to self-insured employers for benefits overpaid during the pendency of board or court appeals in which the self-insured employer prevails and has not recovered, and shall be no more than necessary to make such payments on a current basis.

(2) None of the amount assessed for the employer overpayment reimbursement fund under this section may be retained from the earnings of workers covered under RCW 51.16.210.

Sec. 6. RCW 51.44.070 and 2018 c 282 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

For every case resulting in death or permanent total disability the department shall transfer on its books from the accident fund of the proper class and/or appropriate account to the "reserve fund" a sum of money for that case equal to the estimated present cash value of the monthly payments provided for it, to be calculated upon the basis of an annuity covering the payments in this title provided to be made for the case. Such annuity values shall be based upon rates of mortality, disability, remarriage, and interest as determined by the department, taking into account the experience of the reserve fund and self-insurance reserve fund in such respects.

Sec. 7. RCW 51.44.073 and 2018 c 282 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For every case resulting in death or permanent total disability, a self-insurer in these circumstances shall pay into the self-insurance reserve fund a sum of money for that case equal to the estimated present cash value of the monthly payments provided for it, to be calculated upon the basis of an annuity covering the payments in this title provided to be made for the case. Such annuity values shall be based upon rates of mortality, disability, remarriage, and interest as determined by the department, taking into account the experience of the reserve fund and self-insurance reserve fund in such respects.

(2) As an alternative to payment procedures otherwise provided under law, in the event of death or permanent total disability to workers of self-insured employers, a self-insured employer may upon establishment of such obligation file with the department a bond, an assignment of account from a federally or state chartered commercial banking institution authorized to conduct business in the state of Washington, or purchase an annuity, in an amount deemed by the department to be reasonably sufficient to insure payment of the pension benefits provided by law. Any purchase of an annuity shall be from an institution meeting the following minimum requirements: (a) The institution must be rated no less than "A+" by A.M. Best, and no less than "AA" by Moody's and by Standard & Poor's; (b) the value of the assets of the institution must not be less than ten billion dollars; (c) not more than ten percent of the institution's assets may include bonds that are rated less than "BBB" by Moody's and Standard & Poor's; (d) not more than five percent of the assets may be held as equity in real estate; and (e) not more than twenty-five percent of the assets may be first mortgages, and not more than five percent may be second mortgages. The department shall adopt rules governing assignments of account and annuities. Such rules shall ensure that the funds are available if needed, even in the case of failure of the banking institution, the institution authorized to provide annuities, or the employer's business.

The annuity value for every such case shall be determined by the department based upon the department's experience as to rates of mortality, disability, remarriage, and interest. The amount of the required bond, assignment of account, or annuity may be reviewed and adjusted periodically by the department, based upon periodic redeterminations by the department as to the outstanding annuity value for the case.

Under such an alternative, the department shall administer the payment of this obligation to the beneficiary or beneficiaries. The department shall be reimbursed for all such payments from the self-insured employer through periodic charges not less than quarterly in a manner to be determined by the director. The self-insured employer shall additionally pay to the department a deposit equal to the first three months' payments otherwise required under RCW 51.32.050 and 51.32.060. Such deposit shall be placed in the self-insurance reserve fund in accordance with RCW 51.44.140 and shall be returned to the respective self-insured employer when monthly payments are no longer required for such particular obligation.

If a self-insurer delays or refuses to reimburse the department beyond fifteen days after the reimbursement charges become due, there shall be a penalty paid by the self-insurer upon order of the director of an additional amount equal to twenty-five percent of the amount then due which shall be paid into the ((pension))self-insurance reserve fund. Such an order shall conform to the requirements of RCW 51.52.050.

Sec. 8. RCW 51.44.080 and 1989 c 190 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall notify the state treasurer from time to time, of ((such)) transfers as a whole from the state fund to the reserve fund and from self-insured employers to the self-insurance reserve fund and the interest or other earnings of the reserve fund shall become a part of the reserve fund itself. Interest or other earnings of the self-insurance reserve fund shall become a part of the self-insurance reserve fund itself. As soon as possible after June 30th of each year the department shall expert the reserve fund and self-insurance reserve fund separately to ascertain ((its))the standing of the funds as of June 30th of that year and the relation of ((its))the outstanding annuities at their then value to the cash on hand or at interest belonging to the ((fund))funds. The department shall promptly report the result of the ((examination))examinations to the state treasurer in writing not later than September 30th following. If the report shows that there was on said June 30th, in the reserve fund or self-insurance reserve fund in cash or at interest, a greater sum than the then annuity value of the outstanding pension obligations, the surplus in the reserve fund shall be forthwith turned over to the state fund and the surplus in the self-insurance reserve fund shall be forthwith turned over to the appropriate self-insured employer accounts under RCW 51.44.140 but, if the report shows the contrary condition ((of the reserve fund)), the deficiency of the reserve fund shall be forthwith made good out of the state fund and the deficiency in the self-insurance fund shall be made good from the appropriate self-insured employer accounts under RCW 51.44.140.

Sec. 9. RCW 51.44.100 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 37 s 602 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever, in the judgment of the state investment board, there shall be in the accident fund, medical aid fund, reserve fund, self-insurance reserve fund, industrial insurance rainy day fund, or the supplemental pension fund, funds in excess of that amount deemed by the state investment board to be sufficient to meet the current expenditures properly payable therefrom, the state investment board may invest and reinvest such excess funds in the manner prescribed by RCW 43.84.150, and not otherwise.

The state investment board may give consideration to the investment of excess funds in federally insured student loans made to persons in vocational training or retraining or reeducation programs. The state investment board may make such investments by purchasing from savings and loan associations, commercial banks, mutual savings banks, credit unions and other institutions authorized to be lenders under the federally insured student loan act, organized under federal or state law and operating in this state loans made by such institutions to residents of the state of Washington particularly for the purpose of vocational training or reeducation: PROVIDED, That the state investment board shall purchase only that portion of any loan which is guaranteed or insured by the United States of America, or by any agency or instrumentality of the United States of America: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the state investment board is authorized to enter into contracts with such savings and loan associations, commercial banks, mutual savings banks, credit unions, and other institutions authorized to be lenders under the federally insured student loan act to service loans purchased pursuant to this section at an agreed upon contract price.

Sec. 10. RCW 51.44.115 and 2005 c 387 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall:

(a) Prepare financial statements on the state fund in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, including but not limited to financial statements on the accident fund, the medical aid fund, the pension reserve fund, the self-insurance reserve fund, the supplemental pension fund, and the second injury fund. Statements must be presented separately by fund and in the aggregate; and

(b) Prepare financial information for the accident fund, medical aid fund, ((and)) pension reserve fund, and self-insurance reserve fund based on statutory accounting practices and principles promulgated by the national association of insurance commissioners for the purpose of maintaining actuarial solvency of these funds.

(2) Beginning in 2006, and, to avoid duplication, coordinated with any audit that may be conducted under RCW 43.09.310, the state auditor shall conduct annual audits of the state fund. As part of the audits required under this section, the state auditor may contract with firms qualified to perform all or part of the financial audit, as necessary.

(a) The firm or firms conducting the reviews shall be familiar with the accounting standards applicable to the accounts under review and shall have experience in workers' compensation reserving, discounting, and rate making.

(b) The scope of the financial audit shall include, but is not limited to:

(i) An opinion on whether the financial statements were prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles;

(ii) An assessment of the financial impact of the proposed rate level on the actuarial solvency of the accident, medical aid, and pension reserve funds, taking into consideration the risks inherent with insurance and the effects of the actuarial assumptions, discount rates, reserving, retrospective rating program, refunds, and individual employer rate classes, as well as the standard accounting principles used for insurance underwriting purposes; and

(iii) A statement of actuarial opinion on whether the loss and loss adjustment expense reserves for the accident, medical aid, and pension reserve funds were prepared in accordance with generally accepted actuarial principles.

(c) The department shall cooperate with the state auditor in all respects and shall permit the state auditor full access to all information deemed necessary for a true and complete review.

(d) The cost of the audit shall be paid by the state fund under separate contract.

(3) The state auditor shall issue an annual report to the governor, the leaders of the majority and minority caucuses in the senate and the house of representatives, the director of the office of financial management, and the director of the department, on the results of the financial audit and reviews, within six months of the end of the fiscal year. The report may include recommendations.

(4) The audit report shall be available for public inspection.

(5) Within ninety days after the state auditor completes and delivers to the appropriate authority an audit under subsection (2) of this section, the director of the department shall notify the state auditor in writing of the measures taken and proposed to be taken, if any, to respond to the recommendations of the audit report. The state auditor may extend the ninety-day period for good cause.

Sec. 11. RCW 51.44.140 and 2018 c 282 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Each self-insurer shall make such deposits, into the self-insurance reserve fund, as the department shall require pursuant to RCW 51.44.073, as are necessary to guarantee the payments of the pensions established pursuant to RCW 51.32.050 and 51.32.060.

Each self-insurer shall have an account within the self-insurance reserve fund. Each such account shall be credited with its proportionate share of interest or other earnings as determined in RCW 51.44.080.

Each such account in the self-insurance reserve fund shall be experted as required in RCW 51.44.080. Any surpluses shall be forthwith returned to the respective self-insurers, and each deficit shall forthwith be made good to the self-insurance reserve fund by the self-insurer.

Sec. 12. RCW 51.44.142 and 2008 c 280 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The self-insured employer overpayment reimbursement fund is created in the custody of the state treasurer. Expenditures from the account may be used only for reimbursing the self-insurance reserve fund and self-insured employers for benefits overpaid during the pendency of board or court appeals in which the self-insured employer prevails and has not recovered. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

Sec. 13. RCW 51.44.160 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 224 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

The director is authorized to make periodic temporary interfund transfers between the reserve, self-insurance reserve, and supplemental pension funds as may be necessary to provide for payments from the supplemental pension fund as prescribed in this title. At least once annually, the director shall cause an audit to be made of all pension funds administered by the department to insure that proper crediting of funds has been made, and further to direct transfers between the funds for any interfund loans which may have been made in the preceding year and not fully reimbursed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. Section 2 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2023.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15. Section 2 of this act expires July 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16. Section 3 of this act takes effect July 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17. Sections 1 and 4 through 13 of this act take effect July 1, 2025.

--- END ---