BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)(a) A joint select committee on supporting and strengthening the teacher workforce through recruitment, preparation, and retention strategies is established, with eight members as provided in this subsection.

(i) The president of the senate shall appoint four members from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate. One member from each caucus must be a member of the senate's early learning and K-12 education committee, or successor committee. One member from each caucus must be a member of the senate's higher education and workforce development committee, or successor committee.

(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint four members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives. One member from each caucus must be a member of the house of representatives' education committee, or successor committee. One member from each caucus must be a member of the house of representatives' postsecondary education and workforce committee, or successor committee.

(b) The committee shall choose its cochairs from among its membership. A member from the house of representatives' education committee, or successor committee, shall convene the initial meeting of the committee.

(2) At a minimum, the committee shall review:

(a) The reports of the professional educator collaborative established in section 402, chapter 295, Laws of 2019;

(b) State and national data on teacher recruitment, preparation, and retention, including demographic data;

(c) Models for teacher preparation for undergraduates and bachelor's degree holders, including residency and registered apprenticeship models;

(d) Alignment of teacher preparation models; and

(e) Teacher licensing requirements, including use of state compacts.

(3) Staff support for the committee must be provided by the senate committee services and the house of representatives office of program research.

(4) Legislative members of the committee are reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120.

(5) The expenses of the committee must be paid jointly by the senate and the house of representatives. Committee expenditures are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees.

(6) The committee shall report its findings and recommendations to the governor, the superintendent of public instruction, and the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1, 2024.

(7) This section expires August 1, 2025.

--- END ---