BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning January 1, 2024, the tax levied by RCW 82.08.150 does not apply to sales of spirits purchased on a military base by a Washington veterans' service organization that is used as a fund-raising prize for a veterans' service organization fund-raising event.

(2) For purposes of this section, "veterans' service organization" means a nonprofit entity whose principal focus is raising funds to assist veterans of the armed forces of the United States and meets at least one of the following criteria:

(a) An organization exempt from tax under section 501(c) (3), (4), or (10) of the internal revenue code;

(b) A nonprofit organization that would qualify under (a) of this subsection except that it is not organized as a nonprofit corporation; or

(c) A nonprofit organization if:

(i) The members, stockholders, officers, directors, or trustees of the organization do not receive any part of the organization's gross income, except as payment for services rendered; and

(ii) The compensation received by any person for services rendered to the organization does not exceed an amount reasonable under the circumstances.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to this act.

--- END ---