BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 71.05.620 and 2018 c 201 s 3028 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The files and records of court proceedings under this chapter and chapter 71.34 RCW shall be closed but shall be accessible to:

(a) The department;

(b) The department of social and health services;

(c) The authority;

(d) The state hospitals as defined in RCW 72.23.010;

(e) Any person who is the subject of a petition;

(f) The attorney or guardian of the person;

(g) Resource management services for that person; ((and))

(h) Service providers authorized to receive such information by resource management services; and

(i) The Washington state patrol firearms background division to conduct background checks for processing and purchasing firearms, concealed pistol licenses, alien firearms licenses, and release of firearms from evidence, including appeals of denial.

(2) The authority shall adopt rules to implement this section.

--- END ---