BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 35.02.010 and 1994 c 216 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

Any contiguous area containing not less than ((one thousand five hundred))1,500 inhabitants lying outside the limits of an incorporated city or town may become incorporated as a city or town operating under Title 35 or 35A RCW as provided in this chapter((: PROVIDED, That no area which lies within five air miles of the boundary of any city having a population of fifteen thousand or more shall be incorporated which contains less than three thousand inhabitants)).

Sec. 2. RCW 35.02.010 and 1994 c 216 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

Any contiguous area containing not less than ((one thousand five hundred))1,500 inhabitants lying outside the limits of an incorporated city or town may become incorporated as a city or town operating under Title 35 or 35A RCW as provided in this chapter: PROVIDED, That no area which lies within five air miles of the boundary of any city having a population of ((fifteen thousand))15,000 or more shall be incorporated which contains less than ((three thousand))3,000 inhabitants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. Section 1 of this act expires June 30, 2028.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. Section 2 of this act takes effect June 30, 2028.

--- END ---