BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 48.18 RCW to read as follows:

(1) An insurer licensed to write residential insurance policies in this state shall not deny an application for a residential insurance policy, or cancel, refuse to renew, or modify an existing residential insurance policy for the principal reason that the applicant or insured owns or possesses a specific breed or mixture of breeds of a dog that is harbored or owned on an applicable property.

(2) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section do not prohibit an insurer from refusing to issue, canceling, refusing to renew, or imposing a reasonable increase to a premium or rate for a residential insurance policy based on sound underwriting and actuarial principles, including but not limited to whether a particular dog which is harbored or owned on an applicable property is known to be dangerous or has been declared to be dangerous in accordance with chapter 16.08 RCW.

(3) An insurer of residential insurance policies may not ask or inquire about the specific breed or mixture of breeds of a dog which is harbored or owned on an applicable property.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "residential insurance policy" means insurance that covers damage or loss to all types of homes and tenure type including, but not limited to, renters and owners for site-built homes, manufactured homes, factory-built homes, and mobile homes. "Residential insurance policy" does not include commercial insurance.

--- END ---