BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 64.32.200 and 2021 c 222 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The declaration may provide for the collection of all sums assessed by the association of apartment owners for the share of the common expenses chargeable to any apartment and the collection may be enforced in any manner provided in the declaration including, but not limited to, (a) ((ten))10 days notice shall be given the delinquent apartment owner to the effect that unless such assessment is paid within ((ten))10 days any or all utility services will be forthwith severed and shall remain severed until such assessment is paid, or (b) collection of such assessment may be made by such lawful method of enforcement, judicial or extra-judicial, as may be provided in the declaration and/or bylaws.

(2) All sums assessed by the association of apartment owners but unpaid for the share of the common expenses chargeable to any apartment shall constitute a lien on such apartment prior to all other liens except only (a) tax liens on the apartment in favor of any assessing unit and/or special district, and (b) all sums unpaid on all mortgages of record. Such lien is not subject to the ban against execution or forced sales of homesteads under RCW 6.13.080 and, subject to the provisions in subsection (((4)))(5) of this section, may be foreclosed by suit by the manager or board of directors, acting on behalf of the apartment owners, in like manner as a mortgage of real property. In any such foreclosure the apartment owner shall be required to pay a reasonable rental for the apartment, if so provided in the bylaws, and the plaintiff in such foreclosures shall be entitled to the appointment of a receiver to collect the same. The manager or board of directors, acting on behalf of the apartment owners, shall have power, unless prohibited by the declaration, to bid on the apartment at foreclosure sale, and to acquire and hold, lease, mortgage, and convey the same. Upon an express waiver in the complaint of any right to a deficiency judgment, the period of redemption shall be eight months after the sale. Suit to recover any judgment for any unpaid common expenses shall be maintainable without foreclosing or waiving the liens securing the same.

(3) Where the mortgagee of a mortgage of record or other purchaser of an apartment obtains possession of the apartment as a result of foreclosure of the mortgage, such possessor, his or her successors and assigns shall not be liable for the share of the common expenses or assessments by the association of apartment owners chargeable to such apartment which became due prior to such possession. Such unpaid share of common expenses of assessments shall be deemed to be common expenses collectible from all of the apartment owners including such possessor, his or her successors and assigns.

(4)(a) When the association, or the manager or board of directors on its behalf, mails to the apartment owner by first-class mail the first notice of delinquency for past due assessments to the apartment address and to any other address that the owner has provided to the association, the association shall include a first preforeclosure notice that states as follows:

THIS IS A NOTICE OF DELINQUENCY FOR PAST DUE ASSESSMENTS

FROM THE APARTMENT OWNERS' ASSOCIATION TO WHICH YOUR HOME BELONGS.

THIS NOTICE IS ONE STEP IN A PROCESS THAT COULD RESULT IN YOUR LOSING YOUR HOME.

CONTACT A HOUSING COUNSELOR OR AN ATTORNEY LICENSED IN WASHINGTON NOW to assess your situation and refer you to mediation if you might benefit. DO NOT DELAY.

BE CAREFUL of people who claim they can help you. There are many individuals and businesses that prey upon borrowers in distress.

REFER TO THE CONTACTS BELOW for sources of assistance.

SEEKING ASSISTANCE

Housing counselors and legal assistance may be available at little or no cost to you. If you would like assistance in determining your rights and opportunities to keep your house, you may contact the following:

The statewide foreclosure hotline for assistance and referral to housing counselors recommended by the Housing Finance Commission

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The United States Department of Housing and Urban Development

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The statewide civil legal aid hotline for assistance and referrals to other housing counselors and attorneys

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The association shall obtain the toll-free numbers and website information from the department of commerce for inclusion in the notice.

(b) If, when a delinquent account is referred to an association's attorney, the first preforeclosure notice required under (a) of this subsection has not yet been mailed to the apartment owner, the association or the association's attorney shall mail the first preforeclosure notice to the apartment owner in order to satisfy the requirement in (a) of this subsection.

(c) Mailing the first preforeclosure notice pursuant to (a) of this subsection does not satisfy the requirement in subsection (5)(b) of this section to mail a second preforeclosure notice at or after the date that assessments have become past due for at least 90 days. The second preforeclosure notice may not be mailed sooner than 60 days after the first preforeclosure notice is mailed.

(5) An association, or the manager or board of directors on its behalf, may not commence an action to foreclose a lien on an apartment under this section unless:

(a) The apartment owner, at the time the action is commenced, owes at least a sum equal to the greater of:

(i) Three months or more of assessments, not including fines, late charges, interest, attorneys' fees, or costs incurred by the association in connection with the collection of a delinquent owner's account; or

(ii) $200 of assessments, not including fines, late charges, interest, attorneys' fees, or costs incurred by the association in connection with the collection of a delinquent owner's account;

(b) At or after the date that assessments have become past due for at least 90 days, but no sooner than 60 days after the first preforeclosure notice required in subsection (4)(a) of this section is mailed, the association has mailed, by first-class mail, to the owner, at the apartment address and to any other address which the owner has provided to the association, a second notice of delinquency, which ((shall state as follows:

THIS IS A NOTICE OF DELINQUENCY FOR PAST DUE ASSESSMENTS

FROM THE APARTMENT OWNERS' ASSOCIATION TO WHICH YOUR HOME BELONGS.

THIS NOTICE IS ONE STEP IN A PROCESS THAT COULD RESULT IN YOUR LOSING YOUR HOME.

CONTACT A HOUSING COUNSELOR OR AN ATTORNEY LICENSED IN WASHINGTON NOW to assess your situation and refer you to mediation if you might benefit. DO NOT DELAY.

BE CAREFUL of people who claim they can help you. There are many individuals and businesses that prey upon borrowers in distress.

REFER TO THE CONTACTS BELOW for sources of assistance.

SEEKING ASSISTANCE

Housing counselors and legal assistance may be available at little or no cost to you. If you would like assistance in determining your rights and opportunities to keep your house, you may contact the following:

The statewide foreclosure hotline for assistance and referral to housing counselors recommended by the Housing Finance Commission

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The United States Department of Housing and Urban Development

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The statewide civil legal aid hotline for assistance and referrals to other housing counselors and attorneys

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The association shall obtain the toll-free numbers and website information from the department of commerce for inclusion in the notice))must include a second preforeclosure notice that contains the same information as the first preforeclosure notice provided to the apartment owner pursuant to subsection (4)(a) of this section. The second preforeclosure notice may not be mailed sooner than 60 days after the first preforeclosure notice required in subsection (4)(a) of this section is mailed;

(c) At least 180 days have elapsed from the date the minimum amount required in (a) of this subsection has accrued; and

(d) The board approves commencement of a foreclosure action specifically against that apartment.

(((5)))(6) Every aspect of a collection, foreclosure, sale, or other conveyance under this section, including the method, advertising, time, date, place, and terms, must be commercially reasonable.

Sec. 2. RCW 64.32.200 and 2021 c 222 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The declaration may provide for the collection of all sums assessed by the association of apartment owners for the share of the common expenses chargeable to any apartment and the collection may be enforced in any manner provided in the declaration including, but not limited to, (a) ((ten))10 days notice shall be given the delinquent apartment owner to the effect that unless such assessment is paid within ((ten))10 days any or all utility services will be forthwith severed and shall remain severed until such assessment is paid, or (b) collection of such assessment may be made by such lawful method of enforcement, judicial or extra-judicial, as may be provided in the declaration and/or bylaws.

(2) All sums assessed by the association of apartment owners but unpaid for the share of the common expenses chargeable to any apartment shall constitute a lien on such apartment prior to all other liens except only (a) tax liens on the apartment in favor of any assessing unit and/or special district, and (b) all sums unpaid on all mortgages of record. Such lien is not subject to the ban against execution or forced sales of homesteads under RCW 6.13.080 and, subject to the provisions in subsection (((4)))(5) of this section, may be foreclosed by suit by the manager or board of directors, acting on behalf of the apartment owners, in like manner as a mortgage of real property. In any such foreclosure the apartment owner shall be required to pay a reasonable rental for the apartment, if so provided in the bylaws, and the plaintiff in such foreclosures shall be entitled to the appointment of a receiver to collect the same. The manager or board of directors, acting on behalf of the apartment owners, shall have power, unless prohibited by the declaration, to bid on the apartment at foreclosure sale, and to acquire and hold, lease, mortgage, and convey the same. Upon an express waiver in the complaint of any right to a deficiency judgment, the period of redemption shall be eight months after the sale. Suit to recover any judgment for any unpaid common expenses shall be maintainable without foreclosing or waiving the liens securing the same.

(3) Where the mortgagee of a mortgage of record or other purchaser of an apartment obtains possession of the apartment as a result of foreclosure of the mortgage, such possessor, his or her successors and assigns shall not be liable for the share of the common expenses or assessments by the association of apartment owners chargeable to such apartment which became due prior to such possession. Such unpaid share of common expenses of assessments shall be deemed to be common expenses collectible from all of the apartment owners including such possessor, his or her successors and assigns.

(4)(a) When the association, or the manager or board of directors on its behalf, mails to the apartment owner by first-class mail the first notice of delinquency for past due assessments to the apartment address and to any other address that the owner has provided to the association, the association shall include a first preforeclosure notice that states as follows:

THIS IS A NOTICE OF DELINQUENCY FOR PAST DUE ASSESSMENTS

FROM THE APARTMENT OWNERS' ASSOCIATION TO WHICH YOUR HOME BELONGS.

THIS NOTICE IS ONE STEP IN A PROCESS THAT COULD RESULT IN YOUR LOSING YOUR HOME.

CONTACT A HOUSING COUNSELOR OR AN ATTORNEY LICENSED IN WASHINGTON NOW to assess your situation and refer you to mediation if you might benefit. DO NOT DELAY.

BE CAREFUL of people who claim they can help you. There are many individuals and businesses that prey upon borrowers in distress.

REFER TO THE CONTACTS BELOW for sources of assistance.

SEEKING ASSISTANCE

Housing counselors and legal assistance may be available at little or no cost to you. If you would like assistance in determining your rights and opportunities to keep your house, you may contact the following:

The statewide foreclosure hotline for assistance and referral to housing counselors recommended by the Housing Finance Commission

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The United States Department of Housing and Urban Development

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The statewide civil legal aid hotline for assistance and referrals to other housing counselors and attorneys

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The association shall obtain the toll-free numbers and website information from the department of commerce for inclusion in the notice.

(b) If, when a delinquent account is referred to an association's attorney, the first preforeclosure notice required under (a) of this subsection has not yet been mailed to the apartment owner, the association or the association's attorney shall mail the first preforeclosure notice to the apartment owner in order to satisfy the requirement in (a) of this subsection.

(c) Mailing the first preforeclosure notice pursuant to (a) of this subsection does not satisfy the requirement in subsection (5)(b) of this section to mail a second preforeclosure notice at or after the date that assessments have become past due for at least 90 days. The second preforeclosure notice may not be mailed sooner than 60 days after the first preforeclosure notice is mailed.

(5) An association, or the manager or board of directors on its behalf, may not commence an action to foreclose a lien on an apartment under this section unless:

(a) The apartment owner, at the time the action is commenced, owes at least a sum equal to the greater of:

(i) Three months or more of assessments, not including fines, late charges, interest, attorneys' fees, or costs incurred by the association in connection with the collection of a delinquent owner's account; or

(ii) $200 of assessments, not including fines, late charges, interest, attorneys' fees, or costs incurred by the association in connection with the collection of a delinquent owner's account;

(b) At or after the date that assessments have become past due for at least 90 days, but no sooner than 60 days after the first preforeclosure notice required in subsection (4)(a) of this section is mailed, the association has mailed, by first-class mail, to the owner, at the apartment address and to any other address which the owner has provided to the association, a second notice of delinquency, which ((shall state as follows:

THIS IS A NOTICE OF DELINQUENCY FOR PAST DUE ASSESSMENTS

FROM THE APARTMENT OWNERS' ASSOCIATION TO WHICH YOUR HOME BELONGS.

THIS NOTICE IS ONE STEP IN A PROCESS THAT COULD RESULT IN YOUR LOSING YOUR HOME.

CONTACT A HOUSING COUNSELOR OR AN ATTORNEY LICENSED IN WASHINGTON NOW to assess your situation and refer you to mediation if you might benefit. DO NOT DELAY.

BE CAREFUL of people who claim they can help you. There are many individuals and businesses that prey upon borrowers in distress.

REFER TO THE CONTACTS BELOW for sources of assistance.

SEEKING ASSISTANCE

Housing counselors and legal assistance may be available at little or no cost to you. If you would like assistance in determining your rights and opportunities to keep your house, you may contact the following:

The statewide foreclosure hotline for assistance and referral to housing counselors recommended by the Housing Finance Commission

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The United States Department of Housing and Urban Development

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The statewide civil legal aid hotline for assistance and referrals to other housing counselors and attorneys

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The association shall obtain the toll-free numbers and website information from the department of commerce for inclusion in the notice))must include a second preforeclosure notice that contains the same information as the first preforeclosure notice provided to the apartment owner pursuant to subsection (4)(a) of this section. The second preforeclosure notice may not be mailed sooner than 60 days after the first preforeclosure notice required in subsection (4)(a) of this section is mailed;

(c) At least 90 days have elapsed from the date the minimum amount required in (a) of this subsection has accrued; and

(d) The board approves commencement of a foreclosure action specifically against that apartment.

(((5)))(6) Every aspect of a collection, foreclosure, sale, or other conveyance under this section, including the method, advertising, time, date, place, and terms, must be commercially reasonable.

Sec. 3. RCW 64.34.364 and 2021 c 222 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The association has a lien on a unit for any unpaid assessments levied against a unit from the time the assessment is due.

(2) A lien under this section shall be prior to all other liens and encumbrances on a unit except: (a) Liens and encumbrances recorded before the recording of the declaration; (b) a mortgage on the unit recorded before the date on which the assessment sought to be enforced became delinquent; and (c) liens for real property taxes and other governmental assessments or charges against the unit. A lien under this section is not subject to the provisions of chapter 6.13 RCW.

(3) Except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section, the lien shall also be prior to the mortgages described in subsection (2)(b) of this section to the extent of assessments for common expenses, excluding any amounts for capital improvements, based on the periodic budget adopted by the association pursuant to RCW 64.34.360(1) which would have become due during the six months immediately preceding the date of a sheriff's sale in an action for judicial foreclosure by either the association or a mortgagee, the date of a trustee's sale in a nonjudicial foreclosure by a mortgagee, or the date of recording of the declaration of forfeiture in a proceeding by the vendor under a real estate contract.

(4) The priority of the association's lien against units encumbered by a mortgage held by an eligible mortgagee or by a mortgagee which has given the association a written request for a notice of delinquent assessments shall be reduced by up to three months if and to the extent that the lien priority under subsection (3) of this section includes delinquencies which relate to a period after such holder becomes an eligible mortgagee or has given such notice and before the association gives the holder a written notice of the delinquency. This subsection does not affect the priority of mechanics' or material suppliers' liens, or the priority of liens for other assessments made by the association.

(5) If the association forecloses its lien under this section nonjudicially pursuant to chapter 61.24 RCW, as provided by subsection (9) of this section, the association shall not be entitled to the lien priority provided for under subsection (3) of this section.

(6) Unless the declaration otherwise provides, if two or more associations have liens for assessments created at any time on the same real estate, those liens have equal priority.

(7) Recording of the declaration constitutes record notice and perfection of the lien for assessments. While no further recording of any claim of lien for assessment under this section shall be required to perfect the association's lien, the association may record a notice of claim of lien for assessments under this section in the real property records of any county in which the condominium is located. Such recording shall not constitute the written notice of delinquency to a mortgagee referred to in subsection (2) of this section.

(8) A lien for unpaid assessments and the personal liability for payment of assessments is extinguished unless proceedings to enforce the lien or collect the debt are instituted within three years after the amount of the assessments sought to be recovered becomes due.

(9) The lien arising under this section may be enforced judicially by the association or its authorized representative in the manner set forth in chapter 61.12 RCW. The lien arising under this section may be enforced nonjudicially in the manner set forth in chapter 61.24 RCW for nonjudicial foreclosure of deeds of trust if the declaration (a) contains a grant of the condominium in trust to a trustee qualified under RCW 61.24.010 to secure the obligations of the unit owners to the association for the payment of assessments, (b) contains a power of sale, (c) provides in its terms that the units are not used principally for agricultural or farming purposes, and (d) provides that the power of sale is operative in the case of a default in the obligation to pay assessments. The association or its authorized representative shall have the power, unless prohibited by the declaration, to purchase the unit at the foreclosure sale and to acquire, hold, lease, mortgage, or convey the same. Upon an express waiver in the complaint of any right to a deficiency judgment in a judicial foreclosure action, the period of redemption shall be eight months. Nothing in this section shall prohibit an association from taking a deed in lieu of foreclosure.

(10) From the time of commencement of an action by the association to foreclose a lien for nonpayment of delinquent assessments against a unit that is not occupied by the owner thereof, the association shall be entitled to the appointment of a receiver to collect from the lessee thereof the rent for the unit as and when due. If the rental is not paid, the receiver may obtain possession of the unit, refurbish it for rental up to a reasonable standard for rental units in this type of condominium, rent the unit or permit its rental to others, and apply the rents first to the cost of the receivership and attorneys' fees thereof, then to the cost of refurbishing the unit, then to applicable charges, then to costs, fees, and charges of the foreclosure action, and then to the payment of the delinquent assessments. Only a receiver may take possession and collect rents under this subsection, and a receiver shall not be appointed less than ((ninety))90 days after the delinquency. The exercise by the association of the foregoing rights shall not affect the priority of preexisting liens on the unit.

(11) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the holder of a mortgage or other purchaser of a unit who obtains the right of possession of the unit through foreclosure shall not be liable for assessments or installments thereof that became due prior to such right of possession. Such unpaid assessments shall be deemed to be common expenses collectible from all the unit owners, including such mortgagee or other purchaser of the unit. Foreclosure of a mortgage does not relieve the prior owner of personal liability for assessments accruing against the unit prior to the date of such sale as provided in this subsection.

(12) In addition to constituting a lien on the unit, each assessment shall be the joint and several obligation of the owner or owners of the unit to which the same are assessed as of the time the assessment is due. In a voluntary conveyance, the grantee of a unit shall be jointly and severally liable with the grantor for all unpaid assessments against the grantor up to the time of the grantor's conveyance, without prejudice to the grantee's right to recover from the grantor the amounts paid by the grantee therefor. Suit to recover a personal judgment for any delinquent assessment shall be maintainable in any court of competent jurisdiction without foreclosing or waiving the lien securing such sums.

(13) The association may from time to time establish reasonable late charges and a rate of interest to be charged on all subsequent delinquent assessments or installments thereof. In the absence of another established nonusurious rate, delinquent assessments shall bear interest from the date of delinquency at the maximum rate permitted under RCW 19.52.020 on the date on which the assessments became delinquent.

(14) The association shall be entitled to recover any costs and reasonable attorneys' fees incurred in connection with the collection of delinquent assessments, whether or not such collection activities result in suit being commenced or prosecuted to judgment. In addition, the association shall be entitled to recover costs and reasonable attorneys' fees if it prevails on appeal and in the enforcement of a judgment.

(15) The association upon written request shall furnish to a unit owner or a mortgagee a statement signed by an officer or authorized agent of the association setting forth the amount of unpaid assessments against that unit. The statement shall be furnished within fifteen days after receipt of the request and is binding on the association, the board of directors, and every unit owner, unless and to the extent known by the recipient to be false.

(16) To the extent not inconsistent with this section, the declaration may provide for such additional remedies for collection of assessments as may be permitted by law.

(17)(a) When the association mails to the unit owner by first-class mail the first notice of delinquency for past due assessments to the unit address and to any other address that the owner has provided to the association, the association shall include a first preforeclosure notice that states as follows:

THIS IS A NOTICE OF DELINQUENCY FOR PAST DUE ASSESSMENTS

FROM THE UNIT OWNERS' ASSOCIATION TO WHICH YOUR HOME BELONGS.

THIS NOTICE IS ONE STEP IN A PROCESS THAT COULD RESULT IN YOUR LOSING YOUR HOME.

CONTACT A HOUSING COUNSELOR OR AN ATTORNEY LICENSED IN WASHINGTON NOW to assess your situation and refer you to mediation if you might benefit. DO NOT DELAY.

BE CAREFUL of people who claim they can help you. There are many individuals and businesses that prey upon borrowers in distress.

REFER TO THE CONTACTS BELOW for sources of assistance.

SEEKING ASSISTANCE

Housing counselors and legal assistance may be available at little or no cost to you. If you would like assistance in determining your rights and opportunities to keep your house, you may contact the following:

The statewide foreclosure hotline for assistance and referral to housing counselors recommended by the Housing Finance Commission

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The United States Department of Housing and Urban Development

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The statewide civil legal aid hotline for assistance and referrals to other housing counselors and attorneys

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The association shall obtain the toll-free numbers and website information from the department of commerce for inclusion in the notice.

(b) If, when a delinquent account is referred to an association's attorney, the first preforeclosure notice required under (a) of this subsection has not yet been mailed to the unit owner, the association or the association's attorney shall mail the first preforeclosure notice to the unit owner in order to satisfy the requirement in (a) of this subsection.

(c) Mailing the first preforeclosure notice pursuant to (a) of this subsection does not satisfy the requirement in subsection (18)(b) of this section to mail a second preforeclosure notice at or after the date that assessments have become past due for at least 90 days. The second preforeclosure notice may not be mailed sooner than 60 days after the first preforeclosure notice is mailed.

(18) An association may not commence an action to foreclose a lien on a unit under this section unless:

(a) The unit owner, at the time the action is commenced, owes at least a sum equal to the greater of:

(i) Three months or more of assessments, not including fines, late charges, interest, attorneys' fees, or costs incurred by the association in connection with the collection of a delinquent owner's account; or

(ii) $200 of assessments, not including fines, late charges, interest, attorneys' fees, or costs incurred by the association in connection with the collection of a delinquent owner's account;

(b) At or after the date that assessments have become past due for at least 90 days, but no sooner than 60 days after the first preforeclosure notice required in subsection (17)(a) of this section is mailed, the association has mailed, by first-class mail, to the owner, at the unit address and to any other address which the owner has provided to the association, a second notice of delinquency, which ((shall state as follows:

THIS IS A NOTICE OF DELINQUENCY FOR PAST DUE ASSESSMENTS

FROM THE UNIT OWNERS' ASSOCIATION TO WHICH YOUR HOME BELONGS.

THIS NOTICE IS ONE STEP IN A PROCESS THAT COULD RESULT IN YOUR LOSING YOUR HOME.

CONTACT A HOUSING COUNSELOR OR AN ATTORNEY LICENSED IN WASHINGTON NOW to assess your situation and refer you to mediation if you might benefit. DO NOT DELAY.

BE CAREFUL of people who claim they can help you. There are many individuals and businesses that prey upon borrowers in distress.

REFER TO THE CONTACTS BELOW for sources of assistance.

SEEKING ASSISTANCE

Housing counselors and legal assistance may be available at little or no cost to you. If you would like assistance in determining your rights and opportunities to keep your house, you may contact the following:

The statewide foreclosure hotline for assistance and referral to housing counselors recommended by the Housing Finance Commission

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The United States Department of Housing and Urban Development

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The statewide civil legal aid hotline for assistance and referrals to other housing counselors and attorneys

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The association shall obtain the toll-free numbers and website information from the department of commerce for inclusion in the notice))must include a second preforeclosure notice that contains the same information as the first preforeclosure notice provided to the unit owner pursuant to subsection (17)(a) of this section. The second preforeclosure notice may not be mailed sooner than 60 days after the first preforeclosure notice required in subsection (17)(a) of this section is mailed;

(c) At least 180 days have elapsed from the date the minimum amount required in (a) of this subsection has accrued; and

(d) The board approves commencement of a foreclosure action specifically against that unit.

(((18)))(19) Every aspect of a collection, foreclosure, sale, or other conveyance under this section, including the method, advertising, time, date, place, and terms, must be commercially reasonable.

Sec. 4. RCW 64.34.364 and 2021 c 222 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The association has a lien on a unit for any unpaid assessments levied against a unit from the time the assessment is due.

(2) A lien under this section shall be prior to all other liens and encumbrances on a unit except: (a) Liens and encumbrances recorded before the recording of the declaration; (b) a mortgage on the unit recorded before the date on which the assessment sought to be enforced became delinquent; and (c) liens for real property taxes and other governmental assessments or charges against the unit. A lien under this section is not subject to the provisions of chapter 6.13 RCW.

(3) Except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section, the lien shall also be prior to the mortgages described in subsection (2)(b) of this section to the extent of assessments for common expenses, excluding any amounts for capital improvements, based on the periodic budget adopted by the association pursuant to RCW 64.34.360(1) which would have become due during the six months immediately preceding the date of a sheriff's sale in an action for judicial foreclosure by either the association or a mortgagee, the date of a trustee's sale in a nonjudicial foreclosure by a mortgagee, or the date of recording of the declaration of forfeiture in a proceeding by the vendor under a real estate contract.

(4) The priority of the association's lien against units encumbered by a mortgage held by an eligible mortgagee or by a mortgagee which has given the association a written request for a notice of delinquent assessments shall be reduced by up to three months if and to the extent that the lien priority under subsection (3) of this section includes delinquencies which relate to a period after such holder becomes an eligible mortgagee or has given such notice and before the association gives the holder a written notice of the delinquency. This subsection does not affect the priority of mechanics' or material suppliers' liens, or the priority of liens for other assessments made by the association.

(5) If the association forecloses its lien under this section nonjudicially pursuant to chapter 61.24 RCW, as provided by subsection (9) of this section, the association shall not be entitled to the lien priority provided for under subsection (3) of this section.

(6) Unless the declaration otherwise provides, if two or more associations have liens for assessments created at any time on the same real estate, those liens have equal priority.

(7) Recording of the declaration constitutes record notice and perfection of the lien for assessments. While no further recording of any claim of lien for assessment under this section shall be required to perfect the association's lien, the association may record a notice of claim of lien for assessments under this section in the real property records of any county in which the condominium is located. Such recording shall not constitute the written notice of delinquency to a mortgagee referred to in subsection (2) of this section.

(8) A lien for unpaid assessments and the personal liability for payment of assessments is extinguished unless proceedings to enforce the lien or collect the debt are instituted within three years after the amount of the assessments sought to be recovered becomes due.

(9) The lien arising under this section may be enforced judicially by the association or its authorized representative in the manner set forth in chapter 61.12 RCW. The lien arising under this section may be enforced nonjudicially in the manner set forth in chapter 61.24 RCW for nonjudicial foreclosure of deeds of trust if the declaration (a) contains a grant of the condominium in trust to a trustee qualified under RCW 61.24.010 to secure the obligations of the unit owners to the association for the payment of assessments, (b) contains a power of sale, (c) provides in its terms that the units are not used principally for agricultural or farming purposes, and (d) provides that the power of sale is operative in the case of a default in the obligation to pay assessments. The association or its authorized representative shall have the power, unless prohibited by the declaration, to purchase the unit at the foreclosure sale and to acquire, hold, lease, mortgage, or convey the same. Upon an express waiver in the complaint of any right to a deficiency judgment in a judicial foreclosure action, the period of redemption shall be eight months. Nothing in this section shall prohibit an association from taking a deed in lieu of foreclosure.

(10) From the time of commencement of an action by the association to foreclose a lien for nonpayment of delinquent assessments against a unit that is not occupied by the owner thereof, the association shall be entitled to the appointment of a receiver to collect from the lessee thereof the rent for the unit as and when due. If the rental is not paid, the receiver may obtain possession of the unit, refurbish it for rental up to a reasonable standard for rental units in this type of condominium, rent the unit or permit its rental to others, and apply the rents first to the cost of the receivership and attorneys' fees thereof, then to the cost of refurbishing the unit, then to applicable charges, then to costs, fees, and charges of the foreclosure action, and then to the payment of the delinquent assessments. Only a receiver may take possession and collect rents under this subsection, and a receiver shall not be appointed less than ((ninety))90 days after the delinquency. The exercise by the association of the foregoing rights shall not affect the priority of preexisting liens on the unit.

(11) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the holder of a mortgage or other purchaser of a unit who obtains the right of possession of the unit through foreclosure shall not be liable for assessments or installments thereof that became due prior to such right of possession. Such unpaid assessments shall be deemed to be common expenses collectible from all the unit owners, including such mortgagee or other purchaser of the unit. Foreclosure of a mortgage does not relieve the prior owner of personal liability for assessments accruing against the unit prior to the date of such sale as provided in this subsection.

(12) In addition to constituting a lien on the unit, each assessment shall be the joint and several obligation of the owner or owners of the unit to which the same are assessed as of the time the assessment is due. In a voluntary conveyance, the grantee of a unit shall be jointly and severally liable with the grantor for all unpaid assessments against the grantor up to the time of the grantor's conveyance, without prejudice to the grantee's right to recover from the grantor the amounts paid by the grantee therefor. Suit to recover a personal judgment for any delinquent assessment shall be maintainable in any court of competent jurisdiction without foreclosing or waiving the lien securing such sums.

(13) The association may from time to time establish reasonable late charges and a rate of interest to be charged on all subsequent delinquent assessments or installments thereof. In the absence of another established nonusurious rate, delinquent assessments shall bear interest from the date of delinquency at the maximum rate permitted under RCW 19.52.020 on the date on which the assessments became delinquent.

(14) The association shall be entitled to recover any costs and reasonable attorneys' fees incurred in connection with the collection of delinquent assessments, whether or not such collection activities result in suit being commenced or prosecuted to judgment. In addition, the association shall be entitled to recover costs and reasonable attorneys' fees if it prevails on appeal and in the enforcement of a judgment.

(15) The association upon written request shall furnish to a unit owner or a mortgagee a statement signed by an officer or authorized agent of the association setting forth the amount of unpaid assessments against that unit. The statement shall be furnished within fifteen days after receipt of the request and is binding on the association, the board of directors, and every unit owner, unless and to the extent known by the recipient to be false.

(16) To the extent not inconsistent with this section, the declaration may provide for such additional remedies for collection of assessments as may be permitted by law.

(17)(a) When the association mails to the unit owner by first-class mail the first notice of delinquency for past due assessments to the unit address and to any other address that the owner has provided to the association, the association shall include a first preforeclosure notice that states as follows:

THIS IS A NOTICE OF DELINQUENCY FOR PAST DUE ASSESSMENTS

FROM THE UNIT OWNERS' ASSOCIATION TO WHICH YOUR HOME BELONGS.

THIS NOTICE IS ONE STEP IN A PROCESS THAT COULD RESULT IN YOUR LOSING YOUR HOME.

CONTACT A HOUSING COUNSELOR OR AN ATTORNEY LICENSED IN WASHINGTON NOW to assess your situation and refer you to mediation if you might benefit. DO NOT DELAY.

BE CAREFUL of people who claim they can help you. There are many individuals and businesses that prey upon borrowers in distress.

REFER TO THE CONTACTS BELOW for sources of assistance.

SEEKING ASSISTANCE

Housing counselors and legal assistance may be available at little or no cost to you. If you would like assistance in determining your rights and opportunities to keep your house, you may contact the following:

The statewide foreclosure hotline for assistance and referral to housing counselors recommended by the Housing Finance Commission

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The United States Department of Housing and Urban Development

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The statewide civil legal aid hotline for assistance and referrals to other housing counselors and attorneys

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The association shall obtain the toll-free numbers and website information from the department of commerce for inclusion in the notice.

(b) If, when a delinquent account is referred to an association's attorney, the first preforeclosure notice required under (a) of this subsection has not yet been mailed to the unit owner, the association or the association's attorney shall mail the first preforeclosure notice to the unit owner in order to satisfy the requirement in (a) of this subsection.

(c) Mailing the first preforeclosure notice pursuant to (a) of this subsection does not satisfy the requirement in subsection (18)(b) of this section to mail a second preforeclosure notice at or after the date that assessments have become past due for at least 90 days. The second preforeclosure notice may not be mailed sooner than 60 days after the first preforeclosure notice is mailed.

(18) An association may not commence an action to foreclose a lien on a unit under this section unless:

(a) The unit owner, at the time the action is commenced, owes at least a sum equal to the greater of:

(i) Three months or more of assessments, not including fines, late charges, interest, attorneys' fees, or costs incurred by the association in connection with the collection of a delinquent owner's account; or

(ii) $200 of assessments, not including fines, late charges, interest, attorneys' fees, or costs incurred by the association in connection with the collection of a delinquent owner's account;

(b) At or after the date that assessments have become past due for at least 90 days, but no sooner than 60 days after the first preforeclosure notice required in subsection (17)(a) of this section is mailed, the association has mailed, by first-class mail, to the owner, at the unit address and to any other address which the owner has provided to the association, a second notice of delinquency, which ((shall state as follows:

THIS IS A NOTICE OF DELINQUENCY FOR PAST DUE ASSESSMENTS

FROM THE UNIT OWNERS' ASSOCIATION TO WHICH YOUR HOME BELONGS.

THIS NOTICE IS ONE STEP IN A PROCESS THAT COULD RESULT IN YOUR LOSING YOUR HOME.

CONTACT A HOUSING COUNSELOR OR AN ATTORNEY LICENSED IN WASHINGTON NOW to assess your situation and refer you to mediation if you might benefit. DO NOT DELAY.

BE CAREFUL of people who claim they can help you. There are many individuals and businesses that prey upon borrowers in distress.

REFER TO THE CONTACTS BELOW for sources of assistance.

SEEKING ASSISTANCE

Housing counselors and legal assistance may be available at little or no cost to you. If you would like assistance in determining your rights and opportunities to keep your house, you may contact the following:

The statewide foreclosure hotline for assistance and referral to housing counselors recommended by the Housing Finance Commission

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The United States Department of Housing and Urban Development

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The statewide civil legal aid hotline for assistance and referrals to other housing counselors and attorneys

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The association shall obtain the toll-free numbers and website information from the department of commerce for inclusion in the notice))must include a second preforeclosure notice that contains the same information as the first preforeclosure notice provided to the unit owner pursuant to subsection (17)(a) of this section. The second preforeclosure notice may not be mailed sooner than 60 days after the first preforeclosure notice required in subsection (17)(a) of this section is mailed;

(c) At least 90 days have elapsed from the date the minimum amount required in (a) of this subsection has accrued; and

(d) The board approves commencement of a foreclosure action specifically against that unit.

(((18)))(19) Every aspect of a collection, foreclosure, sale, or other conveyance under this section, including the method, advertising, time, date, place, and terms, must be commercially reasonable.

Sec. 5. RCW 64.38.100 and 2021 c 222 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) If the governing documents of an association provide for a lien on the lot of any owner for unpaid assessments, the association shall include the following first preforeclosure notice when mailing to the lot owner by first-class mail the first notice of delinquency to the lot address and to any other address that the owner has provided to the association:

THIS IS A NOTICE OF DELINQUENCY FOR PAST DUE ASSESSMENTS

FROM THE HOMEOWNERS' ASSOCIATION TO WHICH YOUR HOME BELONGS.

THIS NOTICE IS ONE STEP IN A PROCESS THAT COULD RESULT IN YOUR LOSING YOUR HOME.

CONTACT A HOUSING COUNSELOR OR AN ATTORNEY LICENSED IN WASHINGTON NOW to assess your situation and refer you to mediation if you might benefit. DO NOT DELAY.

BE CAREFUL of people who claim they can help you. There are many individuals and businesses that prey upon borrowers in distress.

REFER TO THE CONTACTS BELOW for sources of assistance.

SEEKING ASSISTANCE

Housing counselors and legal assistance may be available at little or no cost to you. If you would like assistance in determining your rights and opportunities to keep your house, you may contact the following:

The statewide foreclosure hotline for assistance and referral to housing counselors recommended by the Housing Finance Commission

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The United States Department of Housing and Urban Development

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The statewide civil legal aid hotline for assistance and referrals to other housing counselors and attorneys

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The association shall obtain the toll-free numbers and website information from the department of commerce for inclusion in the notice.

(b) If, when a delinquent account is referred to an association's attorney, the first preforeclosure notice required under (a) of this subsection has not yet been mailed to the lot owner, the association or the association's attorney shall mail the first preforeclosure notice to the lot owner in order to satisfy the requirement in (a) of this subsection.

(c) Mailing the first preforeclosure notice pursuant to (a) of this subsection does not satisfy the requirement in subsection (2)(b) of this section to mail a second preforeclosure notice at or after the date that assessments have become past due for at least 90 days. The second preforeclosure notice may not be mailed sooner than 60 days after the first preforeclosure notice is mailed.

(2) If the governing documents of an association provide for a lien on the lot of any owner for unpaid assessments, the association may not commence an action to foreclose the lien unless:

(a) The lot owner, at the time the action is commenced, owes at least a sum equal to the greater of:

(i) Three months or more of assessments, not including fines, late charges, interest, attorneys' fees, or costs incurred by the association in connection with the collection of a delinquent owner's account; or

(ii) $200 of assessments, not including fines, late charges, interest, attorneys' fees, or costs incurred by the association in connection with the collection of a delinquent owner's account;

(b) At or after the date that assessments have become past due for at least 90 days, but no sooner than 60 days after the first preforeclosure notice required in subsection (1)(a) of this section is mailed, the association has mailed, by first-class mail, to the owner, at the lot address and to any other address which the owner has provided to the association, a second notice of delinquency, which ((shall state as follows:

THIS IS A NOTICE OF DELINQUENCY FOR PAST DUE ASSESSMENTS

FROM THE HOMEOWNERS' ASSOCIATION TO WHICH YOUR HOME BELONGS.

THIS NOTICE IS ONE STEP IN A PROCESS THAT COULD RESULT IN YOUR LOSING YOUR HOME.

CONTACT A HOUSING COUNSELOR OR AN ATTORNEY LICENSED IN WASHINGTON NOW to assess your situation and refer you to mediation if you might benefit. DO NOT DELAY.

BE CAREFUL of people who claim they can help you. There are many individuals and businesses that prey upon borrowers in distress.

REFER TO THE CONTACTS BELOW for sources of assistance.

SEEKING ASSISTANCE

Housing counselors and legal assistance may be available at little or no cost to you. If you would like assistance in determining your rights and opportunities to keep your house, you may contact the following:

The statewide foreclosure hotline for assistance and referral to housing counselors recommended by the Housing Finance Commission

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The United States Department of Housing and Urban Development

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The statewide civil legal aid hotline for assistance and referrals to other housing counselors and attorneys

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The association shall obtain the toll-free numbers and website information from the department of commerce for inclusion in the notice))must include a second preforeclosure notice that contains the same information as the first preforeclosure notice provided to the lot owner pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section. The second preforeclosure notice may not be mailed sooner than 60 days after the first preforeclosure notice required in subsection (1)(a) of this section is mailed;

(c) At least 180 days have elapsed from the date the minimum amount required in (a) of this subsection has accrued; and

(d) The board approves commencement of a foreclosure action specifically against that lot.

(((2)))(3) Every aspect of a collection, foreclosure, sale, or other conveyance under this section, including the method, advertising, time, date, place, and terms, must be commercially reasonable.

Sec. 6. RCW 64.38.100 and 2021 c 222 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) If the governing documents of an association provide for a lien on the lot of any owner for unpaid assessments, the association shall include the following first preforeclosure notice when mailing to the lot owner by first-class mail the first notice of delinquency to the lot address and to any other address that the owner has provided to the association:

THIS IS A NOTICE OF DELINQUENCY FOR PAST DUE ASSESSMENTS

FROM THE HOMEOWNERS' ASSOCIATION TO WHICH YOUR HOME BELONGS.

THIS NOTICE IS ONE STEP IN A PROCESS THAT COULD RESULT IN YOUR LOSING YOUR HOME.

CONTACT A HOUSING COUNSELOR OR AN ATTORNEY LICENSED IN WASHINGTON NOW to assess your situation and refer you to mediation if you might benefit. DO NOT DELAY.

BE CAREFUL of people who claim they can help you. There are many individuals and businesses that prey upon borrowers in distress.

REFER TO THE CONTACTS BELOW for sources of assistance.

SEEKING ASSISTANCE

Housing counselors and legal assistance may be available at little or no cost to you. If you would like assistance in determining your rights and opportunities to keep your house, you may contact the following:

The statewide foreclosure hotline for assistance and referral to housing counselors recommended by the Housing Finance Commission

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The United States Department of Housing and Urban Development

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The statewide civil legal aid hotline for assistance and referrals to other housing counselors and attorneys

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The association shall obtain the toll-free numbers and website information from the department of commerce for inclusion in the notice.

(b) If, when a delinquent account is referred to an association's attorney, the first preforeclosure notice required under (a) of this subsection has not yet been mailed to the lot owner, the association or the association's attorney shall mail the first preforeclosure notice to the lot owner in order to satisfy the requirement in (a) of this subsection.

(c) Mailing the first preforeclosure notice pursuant to (a) of this subsection does not satisfy the requirement in subsection (2)(b) of this section to mail a second preforeclosure notice at or after the date that assessments have become past due for at least 90 days. The second preforeclosure notice may not be mailed sooner than 60 days after the first preforeclosure notice is mailed.

(2) If the governing documents of an association provide for a lien on the lot of any owner for unpaid assessments, the association may not commence an action to foreclose the lien unless:

(a) The lot owner, at the time the action is commenced, owes at least a sum equal to the greater of:

(i) Three months or more of assessments, not including fines, late charges, interest, attorneys' fees, or costs incurred by the association in connection with the collection of a delinquent owner's account; or

(ii) $200 of assessments, not including fines, late charges, interest, attorneys' fees, or costs incurred by the association in connection with the collection of a delinquent owner's account;

(b) At or after the date that assessments have become past due for at least 90 days, but no sooner than 60 days after the first preforeclosure notice required in subsection (1)(a) of this section is mailed, the association has mailed, by first-class mail, to the owner, at the lot address and to any other address which the owner has provided to the association, a second notice of delinquency, which ((shall state as follows:

THIS IS A NOTICE OF DELINQUENCY FOR PAST DUE ASSESSMENTS

FROM THE HOMEOWNERS' ASSOCIATION TO WHICH YOUR HOME BELONGS.

THIS NOTICE IS ONE STEP IN A PROCESS THAT COULD RESULT IN YOUR LOSING YOUR HOME.

CONTACT A HOUSING COUNSELOR OR AN ATTORNEY LICENSED IN WASHINGTON NOW to assess your situation and refer you to mediation if you might benefit. DO NOT DELAY.

BE CAREFUL of people who claim they can help you. There are many individuals and businesses that prey upon borrowers in distress.

REFER TO THE CONTACTS BELOW for sources of assistance.

SEEKING ASSISTANCE

Housing counselors and legal assistance may be available at little or no cost to you. If you would like assistance in determining your rights and opportunities to keep your house, you may contact the following:

The statewide foreclosure hotline for assistance and referral to housing counselors recommended by the Housing Finance Commission

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The United States Department of Housing and Urban Development

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The statewide civil legal aid hotline for assistance and referrals to other housing counselors and attorneys

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The association shall obtain the toll-free numbers and website information from the department of commerce for inclusion in the notice))must include a second preforeclosure notice that contains the same information as the first preforeclosure notice provided to the lot owner pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section. The second preforeclosure notice may not be mailed sooner than 60 days after the first preforeclosure notice required in subsection (1)(a) of this section is mailed;

(c) At least 90 days have elapsed from the date the minimum amount required in (a) of this subsection has accrued; and

(d) The board approves commencement of a foreclosure action specifically against that lot.

(((2)))(3) Every aspect of a collection, foreclosure, sale, or other conveyance under this section, including the method, advertising, time, date, place, and terms, must be commercially reasonable.

Sec. 7. RCW 64.90.485 and 2021 c 222 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The association has a statutory lien on each unit for any unpaid assessment against the unit from the time such assessment is due.

(2) A lien under this section has priority over all other liens and encumbrances on a unit except:

(a) Liens and encumbrances recorded before the recordation of the declaration and, in a cooperative, liens and encumbrances that the association creates, assumes, or takes subject to;

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, a security interest on the unit recorded before the date on which the unpaid assessment became due or, in a cooperative, a security interest encumbering only the unit owner's interest and perfected before the date on which the unpaid assessment became due; and

(c) Liens for real estate taxes and other state or local governmental assessments or charges against the unit or cooperative.

(3)(a) A lien under this section also has priority over the security interests described in subsection (2)(b) of this section to the extent of an amount equal to the following:

(i) The common expense assessments, excluding any amounts for capital improvements, based on the periodic budget adopted by the association pursuant to RCW 64.90.480(1), along with any specially allocated assessments that are properly assessable against the unit under such periodic budget, which would have become due in the absence of acceleration during the six months immediately preceding the institution of proceedings to foreclose either the association's lien or a security interest described in subsection (2)(b) of this section;

(ii) The association's actual costs and reasonable attorneys' fees incurred in foreclosing its lien but incurred after the giving of the notice described in (a)(iii) of this subsection; provided, however, that the costs and reasonable attorneys' fees that will have priority under this subsection (3)(a)(ii) shall not exceed ((two thousand dollars))$2,000 or an amount equal to the amounts described in (a)(i) of this subsection, whichever is less;

(iii) The amounts described in (a)(ii) of this subsection shall be prior only to the security interest of the holder of a security interest on the unit recorded before the date on which the unpaid assessment became due and only if the association has given that holder not less than ((sixty))60 days' prior written notice that the owner of the unit is in default in payment of an assessment. The notice shall contain:

(A) Name of the borrower;

(B) Recording date of the trust deed or mortgage;

(C) Recording information;

(D) Name of condominium, unit owner, and unit designation stated in the declaration or applicable supplemental declaration;

(E) Amount of unpaid assessment; and

(F) A statement that failure to, within ((sixty))60 days of the written notice, submit the association payment of six months of assessments as described in (a)(i) of this subsection will result in the priority of the amounts described in (a)(ii) of this subsection; and

(iv) Upon payment of the amounts described in (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection by the holder of a security interest, the association's lien described in this subsection (3)(a) shall thereafter be fully subordinated to the lien of such holder's security interest on the unit.

(b) For the purposes of this subsection:

(i) "Institution of proceedings" means either:

(A) The date of recording of a notice of trustee's sale by a deed of trust beneficiary;

(B) The date of commencement, pursuant to applicable court rules, of an action for judicial foreclosure either by the association or by the holder of a recorded security interest; or

(C) The date of recording of a notice of intention to forfeit in a real estate contract forfeiture proceeding by the vendor under a real estate contract.

(ii) "Capital improvements" does not include making, in the ordinary course of management, repairs to common elements or replacements of the common elements with substantially similar items, subject to: (A) Availability of materials and products, (B) prevailing law, or (C) sound engineering and construction standards then prevailing.

(c) The adoption of a periodic budget that purports to allocate to a unit any fines, late charges, interest, attorneys' fees and costs incurred for services unrelated to the foreclosure of the association's lien, other collection charges, or specially allocated assessments assessed under RCW 64.90.480 (6) or (7) does not cause any such items to be included in the priority amount affecting such unit.

(4) Subsections (2) and (3) of this section do not affect the priority of mechanics' or material suppliers' liens to the extent that law of this state other than chapter 277, Laws of 2018 gives priority to such liens, or the priority of liens for other assessments made by the association.

(5) A lien under this section is not subject to chapter 6.13 RCW.

(6) If the association forecloses its lien under this section nonjudicially pursuant to chapter 61.24 RCW, as provided under subsection (13) of this section, the association is not entitled to the lien priority provided for under subsection (3) of this section, and is subject to the limitations on deficiency judgments as provided in chapter 61.24 RCW.

(7) Unless the declaration provides otherwise, if two or more associations have liens for assessments created at any time on the same property, those liens have equal priority as to each other, and any foreclosure of one such lien shall not affect the lien of the other.

(8) Recording of the declaration constitutes record notice and perfection of the statutory lien created under this section. Further notice or recordation of any claim of lien for assessment under this section is not required, but is not prohibited.

(9) A lien for unpaid assessments and the personal liability for payment of those assessments are extinguished unless proceedings to enforce the lien or collect the debt are instituted within six years after the full amount of the assessments sought to be recovered becomes due.

(10) This section does not prohibit actions against unit owners to recover sums for which subsection (1) of this section creates a lien or prohibit an association from taking a deed in lieu of foreclosure.

(11) The association upon written request must furnish to a unit owner or a mortgagee a statement signed by an officer or authorized agent of the association setting forth the amount of unpaid assessments or the priority amount against that unit, or both. The statement must be furnished within ((fifteen))15 days after receipt of the request and is binding on the association, the board, and every unit owner unless, and to the extent, known by the recipient to be false. The liability of a recipient who reasonably relies upon the statement must not exceed the amount set forth in any statement furnished pursuant to this section or RCW 64.90.640(1)(b).

(12) In a cooperative, upon nonpayment of an assessment on a unit, the unit owner may be evicted in the same manner as provided by law in the case of an unlawful holdover by a commercial tenant, and the lien may be foreclosed as provided under this section.

(13) The association's lien may be foreclosed in accordance with (a) and (b) of this subsection.

(a) In a common interest community other than a cooperative, the association's lien may be foreclosed judicially in accordance with chapter 61.12 RCW, subject to any rights of redemption under chapter 6.23 RCW.

(b) The lien may be enforced nonjudicially in the manner set forth in chapter 61.24 RCW for nonjudicial foreclosure of deeds of trust if the declaration: Contains a grant of the common interest community in trust to a trustee qualified under RCW 61.24.010 to secure the obligations of the unit owners to the association for the payment of assessments, contains a power of sale, provides in its terms that the units are not used principally for agricultural purposes, and provides that the power of sale is operative in the case of a default in the obligation to pay assessments. The association or its authorized representative may purchase the unit at the foreclosure sale and acquire, hold, lease, mortgage, or convey the unit. Upon an express waiver in the complaint of any right to a deficiency judgment in a judicial foreclosure action, the period of redemption is eight months.

(c) In a cooperative in which the unit owners' interests in the units are real estate, the association's lien must be foreclosed in like manner as a mortgage on real estate or by power of sale under (b) of this subsection.

(d) In a cooperative in which the unit owners' interests in the units are personal property, the association's lien must be foreclosed in like manner as a security interest under chapter 62A.9A RCW.

(14) If the unit owner's interest in a unit in a cooperative is real estate, the following requirements apply:

(a) The association, upon nonpayment of assessments and compliance with this subsection, may sell that unit at a public sale or by private negotiation, and at any time and place. The association must give to the unit owner and any lessee of the unit owner reasonable notice in a record of the time, date, and place of any public sale or, if a private sale is intended, of the intention of entering into a contract to sell and of the time and date after which a private conveyance may be made. Such notice must also be sent to any other person that has a recorded interest in the unit that would be cut off by the sale, but only if the recorded interest was on record seven weeks before the date specified in the notice as the date of any public sale or seven weeks before the date specified in the notice as the date after which a private sale may be made. The notices required under this subsection may be sent to any address reasonable in the circumstances. A sale may not be held until five weeks after the sending of the notice. The association may buy at any public sale and, if the sale is conducted by a fiduciary or other person not related to the association, at a private sale.

(b) Unless otherwise agreed to or as stated in this section, the unit owner is liable for any deficiency in a foreclosure sale.

(c) The proceeds of a foreclosure sale must be applied in the following order:

(i) The reasonable expenses of sale;

(ii) The reasonable expenses of securing possession before sale; the reasonable expenses of holding, maintaining, and preparing the unit for sale, including payment of taxes and other governmental charges and premiums on insurance; and, to the extent provided for by agreement between the association and the unit owner, reasonable attorneys' fees, costs, and other legal expenses incurred by the association;

(iii) Satisfaction of the association's lien;

(iv) Satisfaction in the order of priority of any subordinate claim of record; and

(v) Remittance of any excess to the unit owner.

(d) A good-faith purchaser for value acquires the unit free of the association's debt that gave rise to the lien under which the foreclosure sale occurred and any subordinate interest, even though the association or other person conducting the sale failed to comply with this section. The person conducting the sale must execute a conveyance to the purchaser sufficient to convey the unit and stating that it is executed by the person after a foreclosure of the association's lien by power of sale and that the person was empowered to make the sale. Signature and title or authority of the person signing the conveyance as grantor and a recital of the facts of nonpayment of the assessment and of the giving of the notices required under this subsection are sufficient proof of the facts recited and of the authority to sign. Further proof of authority is not required even though the association is named as grantee in the conveyance.

(e) At any time before the association has conveyed a unit in a cooperative or entered into a contract for its conveyance under the power of sale, the unit owners or the holder of any subordinate security interest may cure the unit owner's default and prevent sale or other conveyance by tendering the performance due under the security agreement, including any amounts due because of exercise of a right to accelerate, plus the reasonable expenses of proceeding to foreclosure incurred to the time of tender, including reasonable attorneys' fees and costs of the creditor.

(15) In an action by an association to collect assessments or to foreclose a lien on a unit under this section, the court may appoint a receiver to collect all sums alleged to be due and owing to a unit owner before commencement or during pendency of the action. The receivership is governed under chapter 7.60 RCW. During pendency of the action, the court may order the receiver to pay sums held by the receiver to the association for any assessments against the unit. The exercise of rights under this subsection by the association does not affect the priority of preexisting liens on the unit.

(16) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the holder of a mortgage or other purchaser of a unit who obtains the right of possession of the unit through foreclosure is not liable for assessments or installments of assessments that became due prior to such right of possession. Such unpaid assessments are deemed to be common expenses collectible from all the unit owners, including such mortgagee or other purchaser of the unit. Foreclosure of a mortgage does not relieve the prior unit owner of personal liability for assessments accruing against the unit prior to the date of such sale as provided in this subsection.

(17) In addition to constituting a lien on the unit, each assessment is the joint and several obligation of the unit owner of the unit to which the same are assessed as of the time the assessment is due. A unit owner may not exempt himself or herself from liability for assessments. In a voluntary conveyance other than by foreclosure, the grantee of a unit is jointly and severally liable with the grantor for all unpaid assessments against the grantor up to the time of the grantor's conveyance, without prejudice to the grantee's right to recover from the grantor the amounts paid by the grantee. Suit to recover a personal judgment for any delinquent assessment is maintainable in any court of competent jurisdiction without foreclosing or waiving the lien securing such sums.

(18) The association may from time to time establish reasonable late charges and a rate of interest to be charged, not to exceed the maximum rate calculated under RCW 19.52.020, on all subsequent delinquent assessments or installments of assessments. If the association does not establish such a rate, delinquent assessments bear interest from the date of delinquency at the maximum rate calculated under RCW 19.52.020 on the date on which the assessments became delinquent.

(19) The association is entitled to recover any costs and reasonable attorneys' fees incurred in connection with the collection of delinquent assessments, whether or not such collection activities result in a suit being commenced or prosecuted to judgment. The prevailing party is also entitled to recover costs and reasonable attorneys' fees in such suits, including any appeals, if it prevails on appeal and in the enforcement of a judgment.

(20) To the extent not inconsistent with this section, the declaration may provide for such additional remedies for collection of assessments as may be permitted by law.

(21)(a) When the association mails to the unit owner by first-class mail the first notice of delinquency for past due assessments to the unit address and to any other address that the owner has provided to the association, the association shall include a first preforeclosure notice that states as follows:

THIS IS A NOTICE OF DELINQUENCY FOR PAST DUE ASSESSMENTS

FROM THE UNIT OWNERS ASSOCIATION TO WHICH YOUR HOME BELONGS.

THIS NOTICE IS ONE STEP IN A PROCESS THAT COULD RESULT IN YOUR LOSING YOUR HOME.

CONTACT A HOUSING COUNSELOR OR AN ATTORNEY LICENSED IN WASHINGTON NOW to assess your situation and refer you to mediation if you might benefit. DO NOT DELAY.

BE CAREFUL of people who claim they can help you. There are many individuals and businesses that prey upon borrowers in distress.

REFER TO THE CONTACTS BELOW for sources of assistance.

SEEKING ASSISTANCE

Housing counselors and legal assistance may be available at little or no cost to you. If you would like assistance in determining your rights and opportunities to keep your house, you may contact the following:

The statewide foreclosure hotline for assistance and referral to housing counselors recommended by the Housing Finance Commission

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The United States Department of Housing and Urban Development

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . . .

The statewide civil legal aid hotline for assistance and referrals to other housing counselors and attorneys

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The association shall obtain the toll-free numbers and website information from the department of commerce for inclusion in the notice.

(b) If, when a delinquent account is referred to an association's attorney, the first preforeclosure notice required under (a) of this subsection has not yet been mailed to the unit owner, the association or the association's attorney shall mail the first preforeclosure notice to the unit owner in order to satisfy the requirement in (a) of this subsection.

(c) Mailing the first preforeclosure notice pursuant to (a) of this subsection does not satisfy the requirement in subsection (22)(b) of this section to mail a second preforeclosure notice at or after the date that assessments have become past due for at least 90 days. The second preforeclosure notice may not be mailed sooner than 60 days after the first preforeclosure notice is mailed.

(22) An association may not commence an action to foreclose a lien on a unit under this section unless:

(a) The unit owner, at the time the action is commenced, owes at least a sum equal to the greater of:

(i) Three months or more of assessments, not including fines, late charges, interest, attorneys' fees, or costs incurred by the association in connection with the collection of a delinquent owner's account; or

(ii) $200 of assessments, not including fines, late charges, interest, attorneys' fees, or costs incurred by the association in connection with the collection of a delinquent owner's account;

(b) At or after the date that assessments have become past due for at least 90 days, but no sooner than 60 days after the first preforeclosure notice required in subsection (21)(a) of this section is mailed, the association has mailed, by first-class mail, to the owner, at the unit address and to any other address which the owner has provided to the association, a second notice of delinquency, which ((shall state as follows:

THIS IS A NOTICE OF DELINQUENCY FOR PAST DUE ASSESSMENTS

FROM THE UNIT OWNERS' ASSOCIATION TO WHICH YOUR HOME BELONGS.

THIS NOTICE IS ONE STEP IN A PROCESS THAT COULD RESULT IN YOUR LOSING YOUR HOME.

CONTACT A HOUSING COUNSELOR OR AN ATTORNEY LICENSED IN WASHINGTON NOW to assess your situation and refer you to mediation if you might benefit. DO NOT DELAY.

BE CAREFUL of people who claim they can help you. There are many individuals and businesses that prey upon borrowers in distress.

REFER TO THE CONTACTS BELOW for sources of assistance.

SEEKING ASSISTANCE

Housing counselors and legal assistance may be available at little or no cost to you. If you would like assistance in determining your rights and opportunities to keep your house, you may contact the following:

The statewide foreclosure hotline for assistance and referral to housing counselors recommended by the Housing Finance Commission

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The United States Department of Housing and Urban Development

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . . .

The statewide civil legal aid hotline for assistance and referrals to other housing counselors and attorneys

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The association shall obtain the toll-free numbers and website information from the department of commerce for inclusion in the notice))must include a second preforeclosure notice that contains the same information as the first preforeclosure notice provided to the owner pursuant to subsection (21)(a) of this section. The second preforeclosure notice may not be mailed sooner than 60 days after the first preforeclosure notice required in subsection (21)(a) of this section is mailed;

(c) At least 180 days have elapsed from the date the minimum amount required in (a) of this subsection has accrued; and

(d) The board approves commencement of a foreclosure action specifically against that unit.

(((22)))(23) Every aspect of a collection, foreclosure, sale, or other conveyance under this section, including the method, advertising, time, date, place, and terms, must be commercially reasonable.

Sec. 8. RCW 64.90.485 and 2021 c 222 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The association has a statutory lien on each unit for any unpaid assessment against the unit from the time such assessment is due.

(2) A lien under this section has priority over all other liens and encumbrances on a unit except:

(a) Liens and encumbrances recorded before the recordation of the declaration and, in a cooperative, liens and encumbrances that the association creates, assumes, or takes subject to;

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, a security interest on the unit recorded before the date on which the unpaid assessment became due or, in a cooperative, a security interest encumbering only the unit owner's interest and perfected before the date on which the unpaid assessment became due; and

(c) Liens for real estate taxes and other state or local governmental assessments or charges against the unit or cooperative.

(3)(a) A lien under this section also has priority over the security interests described in subsection (2)(b) of this section to the extent of an amount equal to the following:

(i) The common expense assessments, excluding any amounts for capital improvements, based on the periodic budget adopted by the association pursuant to RCW 64.90.480(1), along with any specially allocated assessments that are properly assessable against the unit under such periodic budget, which would have become due in the absence of acceleration during the six months immediately preceding the institution of proceedings to foreclose either the association's lien or a security interest described in subsection (2)(b) of this section;

(ii) The association's actual costs and reasonable attorneys' fees incurred in foreclosing its lien but incurred after the giving of the notice described in (a)(iii) of this subsection; provided, however, that the costs and reasonable attorneys' fees that will have priority under this subsection (3)(a)(ii) shall not exceed ((two thousand dollars))$2,000 or an amount equal to the amounts described in (a)(i) of this subsection, whichever is less;

(iii) The amounts described in (a)(ii) of this subsection shall be prior only to the security interest of the holder of a security interest on the unit recorded before the date on which the unpaid assessment became due and only if the association has given that holder not less than ((sixty))60 days' prior written notice that the owner of the unit is in default in payment of an assessment. The notice shall contain:

(A) Name of the borrower;

(B) Recording date of the trust deed or mortgage;

(C) Recording information;

(D) Name of condominium, unit owner, and unit designation stated in the declaration or applicable supplemental declaration;

(E) Amount of unpaid assessment; and

(F) A statement that failure to, within ((sixty))60 days of the written notice, submit the association payment of six months of assessments as described in (a)(i) of this subsection will result in the priority of the amounts described in (a)(ii) of this subsection; and

(iv) Upon payment of the amounts described in (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection by the holder of a security interest, the association's lien described in this subsection (3)(a) shall thereafter be fully subordinated to the lien of such holder's security interest on the unit.

(b) For the purposes of this subsection:

(i) "Institution of proceedings" means either:

(A) The date of recording of a notice of trustee's sale by a deed of trust beneficiary;

(B) The date of commencement, pursuant to applicable court rules, of an action for judicial foreclosure either by the association or by the holder of a recorded security interest; or

(C) The date of recording of a notice of intention to forfeit in a real estate contract forfeiture proceeding by the vendor under a real estate contract.

(ii) "Capital improvements" does not include making, in the ordinary course of management, repairs to common elements or replacements of the common elements with substantially similar items, subject to: (A) Availability of materials and products, (B) prevailing law, or (C) sound engineering and construction standards then prevailing.

(c) The adoption of a periodic budget that purports to allocate to a unit any fines, late charges, interest, attorneys' fees and costs incurred for services unrelated to the foreclosure of the association's lien, other collection charges, or specially allocated assessments assessed under RCW 64.90.480 (6) or (7) does not cause any such items to be included in the priority amount affecting such unit.

(4) Subsections (2) and (3) of this section do not affect the priority of mechanics' or material suppliers' liens to the extent that law of this state other than chapter 277, Laws of 2018 gives priority to such liens, or the priority of liens for other assessments made by the association.

(5) A lien under this section is not subject to chapter 6.13 RCW.

(6) If the association forecloses its lien under this section nonjudicially pursuant to chapter 61.24 RCW, as provided under subsection (13) of this section, the association is not entitled to the lien priority provided for under subsection (3) of this section, and is subject to the limitations on deficiency judgments as provided in chapter 61.24 RCW.

(7) Unless the declaration provides otherwise, if two or more associations have liens for assessments created at any time on the same property, those liens have equal priority as to each other, and any foreclosure of one such lien shall not affect the lien of the other.

(8) Recording of the declaration constitutes record notice and perfection of the statutory lien created under this section. Further notice or recordation of any claim of lien for assessment under this section is not required, but is not prohibited.

(9) A lien for unpaid assessments and the personal liability for payment of those assessments are extinguished unless proceedings to enforce the lien or collect the debt are instituted within six years after the full amount of the assessments sought to be recovered becomes due.

(10) This section does not prohibit actions against unit owners to recover sums for which subsection (1) of this section creates a lien or prohibit an association from taking a deed in lieu of foreclosure.

(11) The association upon written request must furnish to a unit owner or a mortgagee a statement signed by an officer or authorized agent of the association setting forth the amount of unpaid assessments or the priority amount against that unit, or both. The statement must be furnished within ((fifteen))15 days after receipt of the request and is binding on the association, the board, and every unit owner unless, and to the extent, known by the recipient to be false. The liability of a recipient who reasonably relies upon the statement must not exceed the amount set forth in any statement furnished pursuant to this section or RCW 64.90.640(1)(b).

(12) In a cooperative, upon nonpayment of an assessment on a unit, the unit owner may be evicted in the same manner as provided by law in the case of an unlawful holdover by a commercial tenant, and the lien may be foreclosed as provided under this section.

(13) The association's lien may be foreclosed in accordance with (a) and (b) of this subsection.

(a) In a common interest community other than a cooperative, the association's lien may be foreclosed judicially in accordance with chapter 61.12 RCW, subject to any rights of redemption under chapter 6.23 RCW.

(b) The lien may be enforced nonjudicially in the manner set forth in chapter 61.24 RCW for nonjudicial foreclosure of deeds of trust if the declaration: Contains a grant of the common interest community in trust to a trustee qualified under RCW 61.24.010 to secure the obligations of the unit owners to the association for the payment of assessments, contains a power of sale, provides in its terms that the units are not used principally for agricultural purposes, and provides that the power of sale is operative in the case of a default in the obligation to pay assessments. The association or its authorized representative may purchase the unit at the foreclosure sale and acquire, hold, lease, mortgage, or convey the unit. Upon an express waiver in the complaint of any right to a deficiency judgment in a judicial foreclosure action, the period of redemption is eight months.

(c) In a cooperative in which the unit owners' interests in the units are real estate, the association's lien must be foreclosed in like manner as a mortgage on real estate or by power of sale under (b) of this subsection.

(d) In a cooperative in which the unit owners' interests in the units are personal property, the association's lien must be foreclosed in like manner as a security interest under chapter 62A.9A RCW.

(14) If the unit owner's interest in a unit in a cooperative is real estate, the following requirements apply:

(a) The association, upon nonpayment of assessments and compliance with this subsection, may sell that unit at a public sale or by private negotiation, and at any time and place. The association must give to the unit owner and any lessee of the unit owner reasonable notice in a record of the time, date, and place of any public sale or, if a private sale is intended, of the intention of entering into a contract to sell and of the time and date after which a private conveyance may be made. Such notice must also be sent to any other person that has a recorded interest in the unit that would be cut off by the sale, but only if the recorded interest was on record seven weeks before the date specified in the notice as the date of any public sale or seven weeks before the date specified in the notice as the date after which a private sale may be made. The notices required under this subsection may be sent to any address reasonable in the circumstances. A sale may not be held until five weeks after the sending of the notice. The association may buy at any public sale and, if the sale is conducted by a fiduciary or other person not related to the association, at a private sale.

(b) Unless otherwise agreed to or as stated in this section, the unit owner is liable for any deficiency in a foreclosure sale.

(c) The proceeds of a foreclosure sale must be applied in the following order:

(i) The reasonable expenses of sale;

(ii) The reasonable expenses of securing possession before sale; the reasonable expenses of holding, maintaining, and preparing the unit for sale, including payment of taxes and other governmental charges and premiums on insurance; and, to the extent provided for by agreement between the association and the unit owner, reasonable attorneys' fees, costs, and other legal expenses incurred by the association;

(iii) Satisfaction of the association's lien;

(iv) Satisfaction in the order of priority of any subordinate claim of record; and

(v) Remittance of any excess to the unit owner.

(d) A good-faith purchaser for value acquires the unit free of the association's debt that gave rise to the lien under which the foreclosure sale occurred and any subordinate interest, even though the association or other person conducting the sale failed to comply with this section. The person conducting the sale must execute a conveyance to the purchaser sufficient to convey the unit and stating that it is executed by the person after a foreclosure of the association's lien by power of sale and that the person was empowered to make the sale. Signature and title or authority of the person signing the conveyance as grantor and a recital of the facts of nonpayment of the assessment and of the giving of the notices required under this subsection are sufficient proof of the facts recited and of the authority to sign. Further proof of authority is not required even though the association is named as grantee in the conveyance.

(e) At any time before the association has conveyed a unit in a cooperative or entered into a contract for its conveyance under the power of sale, the unit owners or the holder of any subordinate security interest may cure the unit owner's default and prevent sale or other conveyance by tendering the performance due under the security agreement, including any amounts due because of exercise of a right to accelerate, plus the reasonable expenses of proceeding to foreclosure incurred to the time of tender, including reasonable attorneys' fees and costs of the creditor.

(15) In an action by an association to collect assessments or to foreclose a lien on a unit under this section, the court may appoint a receiver to collect all sums alleged to be due and owing to a unit owner before commencement or during pendency of the action. The receivership is governed under chapter 7.60 RCW. During pendency of the action, the court may order the receiver to pay sums held by the receiver to the association for any assessments against the unit. The exercise of rights under this subsection by the association does not affect the priority of preexisting liens on the unit.

(16) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the holder of a mortgage or other purchaser of a unit who obtains the right of possession of the unit through foreclosure is not liable for assessments or installments of assessments that became due prior to such right of possession. Such unpaid assessments are deemed to be common expenses collectible from all the unit owners, including such mortgagee or other purchaser of the unit. Foreclosure of a mortgage does not relieve the prior unit owner of personal liability for assessments accruing against the unit prior to the date of such sale as provided in this subsection.

(17) In addition to constituting a lien on the unit, each assessment is the joint and several obligation of the unit owner of the unit to which the same are assessed as of the time the assessment is due. A unit owner may not exempt himself or herself from liability for assessments. In a voluntary conveyance other than by foreclosure, the grantee of a unit is jointly and severally liable with the grantor for all unpaid assessments against the grantor up to the time of the grantor's conveyance, without prejudice to the grantee's right to recover from the grantor the amounts paid by the grantee. Suit to recover a personal judgment for any delinquent assessment is maintainable in any court of competent jurisdiction without foreclosing or waiving the lien securing such sums.

(18) The association may from time to time establish reasonable late charges and a rate of interest to be charged, not to exceed the maximum rate calculated under RCW 19.52.020, on all subsequent delinquent assessments or installments of assessments. If the association does not establish such a rate, delinquent assessments bear interest from the date of delinquency at the maximum rate calculated under RCW 19.52.020 on the date on which the assessments became delinquent.

(19) The association is entitled to recover any costs and reasonable attorneys' fees incurred in connection with the collection of delinquent assessments, whether or not such collection activities result in a suit being commenced or prosecuted to judgment. The prevailing party is also entitled to recover costs and reasonable attorneys' fees in such suits, including any appeals, if it prevails on appeal and in the enforcement of a judgment.

(20) To the extent not inconsistent with this section, the declaration may provide for such additional remedies for collection of assessments as may be permitted by law.

(21)(a) When the association mails to the unit owner by first-class mail the first notice of delinquency for past due assessments to the unit address and to any other address that the owner has provided to the association, the association shall include a first preforeclosure notice that states as follows:

THIS IS A NOTICE OF DELINQUENCY FOR PAST DUE ASSESSMENTS

FROM THE UNIT OWNERS ASSOCIATION TO WHICH YOUR HOME BELONGS.

THIS NOTICE IS ONE STEP IN A PROCESS THAT COULD RESULT IN YOUR LOSING YOUR HOME.

CONTACT A HOUSING COUNSELOR OR AN ATTORNEY LICENSED IN WASHINGTON NOW to assess your situation and refer you to mediation if you might benefit. DO NOT DELAY.

BE CAREFUL of people who claim they can help you. There are many individuals and businesses that prey upon borrowers in distress.

REFER TO THE CONTACTS BELOW for sources of assistance.

SEEKING ASSISTANCE

Housing counselors and legal assistance may be available at little or no cost to you. If you would like assistance in determining your rights and opportunities to keep your house, you may contact the following:

The statewide foreclosure hotline for assistance and referral to housing counselors recommended by the Housing Finance Commission

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The United States Department of Housing and Urban Development

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . . .

The statewide civil legal aid hotline for assistance and referrals to other housing counselors and attorneys

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The association shall obtain the toll-free numbers and website information from the department of commerce for inclusion in the notice.

(b) If, when a delinquent account is referred to an association's attorney, the first preforeclosure notice required under (a) of this subsection has not yet been mailed to the unit owner, the association or the association's attorney shall mail the first preforeclosure notice to the unit owner in order to satisfy the requirement in (a) of this subsection.

(c) Mailing the first preforeclosure notice pursuant to (a) of this subsection does not satisfy the requirement in subsection (22)(b) of this section to mail a second preforeclosure notice at or after the date that assessments have become past due for at least 90 days. The second preforeclosure notice may not be mailed sooner than 60 days after the first preforeclosure notice is mailed.

(22) An association may not commence an action to foreclose a lien on a unit under this section unless:

(a) The unit owner, at the time the action is commenced, owes at least a sum equal to the greater of:

(i) Three months or more of assessments, not including fines, late charges, interest, attorneys' fees, or costs incurred by the association in connection with the collection of a delinquent owner's account; or

(ii) $200 of assessments, not including fines, late charges, interest, attorneys' fees, or costs incurred by the association in connection with the collection of a delinquent owner's account;

(b) At or after the date that assessments have become past due for at least 90 days, but no sooner than 60 days after the first preforeclosure notice required in subsection (21)(a) of this section is mailed, the association has mailed, by first-class mail, to the owner, at the unit address and to any other address which the owner has provided to the association, a second notice of delinquency, which ((shall state as follows:

THIS IS A NOTICE OF DELINQUENCY FOR PAST DUE ASSESSMENTS

FROM THE UNIT OWNERS' ASSOCIATION TO WHICH YOUR HOME BELONGS.

THIS NOTICE IS ONE STEP IN A PROCESS THAT COULD RESULT IN YOUR LOSING YOUR HOME.

CONTACT A HOUSING COUNSELOR OR AN ATTORNEY LICENSED IN WASHINGTON NOW to assess your situation and refer you to mediation if you might benefit. DO NOT DELAY.

BE CAREFUL of people who claim they can help you. There are many individuals and businesses that prey upon borrowers in distress.

REFER TO THE CONTACTS BELOW for sources of assistance.

SEEKING ASSISTANCE

Housing counselors and legal assistance may be available at little or no cost to you. If you would like assistance in determining your rights and opportunities to keep your house, you may contact the following:

The statewide foreclosure hotline for assistance and referral to housing counselors recommended by the Housing Finance Commission

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The United States Department of Housing and Urban Development

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . . .

The statewide civil legal aid hotline for assistance and referrals to other housing counselors and attorneys

Telephone: . . . . . . . Website: . . . . . .

The association shall obtain the toll-free numbers and website information from the department of commerce for inclusion in the notice))must include a second preforeclosure notice that contains the same information as the first preforeclosure notice provided to the owner pursuant to subsection (21)(a) of this section. The second preforeclosure notice may not be mailed sooner than 60 days after the first preforeclosure notice required in subsection (21)(a) of this section is mailed;

(c) At least 90 days have elapsed from the date the minimum amount required in (a) of this subsection has accrued; and

(d) The board approves commencement of a foreclosure action specifically against that unit.

(((22)))(23) Every aspect of a collection, foreclosure, sale, or other conveyance under this section, including the method, advertising, time, date, place, and terms, must be commercially reasonable.

Sec. 9. 2021 c 222 s 9 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

Sections 1, 3, 5, and 7 of this act expire January 1, ((2024))2025.

Sec. 10. 2021 c 222 s 10 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

Sections 2, 4, 6, and 8 of this act take effect January 1, ((2024))2025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. Sections 1, 3, 5, and 7 of this act expire January 1, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. Sections 2, 4, 6, and 8 of this act take effect January 1, 2025.

--- END ---