BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 36.32.080 and 2016 c 189 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The county legislative authority of each county shall hold regular meetings at the county seat or at a location designated in accordance with subsection (2) or (3) of this section to transact any business required or permitted by law.

(2)(a) Any two or more county legislative authorities may hold a joint regular meeting solely in the county seat of a participating county if the agenda item or items relate to actions or considerations of mutual interest or concern to the participating legislative authorities.

(b) A legislative authority participating in a joint regular meeting held in accordance with this subsection (2) must, for purposes of the meeting, comply with notice requirements for special meetings provided in RCW 42.30.080. This subsection (2)(b) does not apply to the legislative authority of the county in which the meeting will be held.

(3)(a) As an alternative option ((that may be exercised no more than once per calendar quarter)), regular meetings may be held at a location outside of the county seat but within the county if the county legislative authority determines that holding a meeting at an alternate location would be in the interest of supporting greater citizen engagement in local government at the following intervals:

(i) Once per calendar month in a city with a greater population than the city in which the county seat is located; and

(ii) Once per calendar quarter in any other location.

(b) No more than one meeting per calendar month may be held at an alternate location as provided for in this subsection (3).

(((b)))(c) The county legislative authority must give notice of any regular meeting held pursuant to this subsection (3) at least ((thirty))30 days before the time of the meeting specified in the notice. At a minimum, notice must be:

(i) Posted on the county's website;

(ii) Published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county; and

(iii) Sent via electronic transmission to any resident of the county who has chosen to receive the notice required under this section at an email address.

--- END ---