BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning January 1, 2024, this chapter does not apply to amounts derived from animal adoption fees collected by a nonprofit as defined in RCW 84.36.800.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to this act.

--- END ---