BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 50.32.040 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

In any proceeding before an appeal tribunal involving ((a)):

(1) A dispute of an individual's initial determination, determination of allowance or denial of allowance of benefits, or redetermination of allowance or denial of benefits, all matters covered by such initial determination, determination, or redetermination shall be deemed to be in issue irrespective of the particular ground or grounds set forth in the notice of appeal.

((In any proceeding before an appeal tribunal involving a dispute of an individual's claim for waiting period credit or claim for benefits, all matters and provisions of this title relating to the individual's right to receive such credit or benefits for the period in question, including but not limited to the question and nature of the claimant's availability for work within the meaning of RCW 50.20.010(1)(c) and 50.20.080, shall be deemed to be in issue irrespective of the particular ground or grounds set forth in the notice of appeal in single claimant cases. The claimant's availability for work shall be determined apart from all other matters.

In any proceeding before an appeal tribunal involving an))(2) An individual's right to benefits, all parties shall be afforded an opportunity for hearing after not less than seven days' notice in accordance with RCW 34.05.434.

((In any proceeding involving an))(3) An appeal relating to benefit determinations or benefit claims, the appeal tribunal, after affording the parties reasonable opportunity for fair hearing, shall render its decision affirming, modifying, or setting aside the determination or decisions of the unemployment compensation division. The parties shall be duly notified of such appeal tribunal's decision together with its reasons therefor, which shall be deemed to be the final decision on the initial determination or the claim for waiting period credit or the claim for benefits unless, within thirty days after the date of notification or mailing, whichever is the earlier, of such decision, further appeal is perfected pursuant to the provisions of this title relating to review by the commissioner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. If any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

--- END ---