BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 26.04.050 and 2019 c 52 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The following named officers and persons, active or retired, are hereby authorized to solemnize marriages, to wit: Justices of the supreme court((,)); judges of the court of appeals((,)); judges of the superior courts((,)); supreme court commissioners((,)); court of appeals commissioners((,)); superior court commissioners((,)); judges and commissioners of courts of limited jurisdiction as defined in RCW 3.02.010((,)); justices of the supreme court of the United States; judges and judicial officers of the federal courts; judges of tribal courts from a federally recognized tribe((,)); and any regularly licensed or ordained minister or any priest, imam, rabbi, or similar official of any religious organization. The solemnization of a marriage by a tribal court judge pursuant to authority under this section does not create tribal court jurisdiction and does not affect state court authority as otherwise provided by law to enter a judgment for purposes of any dissolution, legal separation, or other proceedings related to the marriage that is binding on the parties and entitled to full faith and credit.

--- END ---