BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall establish and maintain on its website a school safety dashboard that would enable the public to review annually updated school safety data statewide and for each public school and school district. In meeting the requirements of this section, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must examine and consider the practices of other states in establishing comparable dashboards.

(2) To the extent practicable and not in conflict with student privacy requirements, school safety data to be included in the dashboard must, at a minimum, include quantitative and descriptive information regarding:

(a) Controlled substance and alcohol-related incidents involving students during school hours, on school property, or during school events;

(b) Violations of RCW 28A.600.420;

(c) Violent incidents involving students, including fighting and harassment, intimidation, and bullying, during school hours, on school property, or during school events;

(d) Student suspensions and expulsions; and

(e) Other student behaviors that adversely impact the health or safety of students or educational staff.

(3) For purposes of this section, "public school" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.150.010.

--- END ---