BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Every health carrier offering dental only coverage and every health carrier offering dental coverage included with the health plan delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed by a health carrier on and after January 1, 2024, shall permit denturists licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW to provide dental services or care included in their benefits package, to the extent that:

(a) The provision of such dental services or care is within the health care providers' permitted scope of practice; and

(b) The providers agree to abide by standards related to:

(i) Provision, utilization review, and cost containment of dental services;

(ii) Management and administrative procedures; and

(iii) Provision of cost-effective and clinically efficacious dental services.

(2) The requirements of subsection (1) of this section do not apply to a licensed health care profession regulated under Title 18 RCW when the licensing statute for the profession states that such requirements do not apply.

(3) For purposes of this section, "health carrier" means health care service contractors, limited health care service contractors, and disability insurers offering dental only coverage.

(4) This act does not apply to a plan that offers dental only coverage when the plan relies solely on employees of the health carrier for provision of the benefits.

--- END ---