BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.61.024 and 2010 c 8 s 9065 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Any driver of a motor vehicle who willfully fails or refuses to immediately bring his or her vehicle to a stop and who drives his or her vehicle in a reckless manner while attempting to elude a pursuing police vehicle, after being given a visual or audible signal to bring the vehicle to a stop, shall be guilty of a class C felony ranked as a seriousness level I offense, except as provided in (b) of this subsection. The signal given by the police officer may be by hand, voice, emergency light, or siren. The officer giving such a signal shall be in uniform and the vehicle shall be equipped with lights and sirens.

(b) Any driver of a motor vehicle who commits the offense described in (a) of this subsection while there is also reasonable suspicion that the driver has committed or is in the act of committing theft of a motor vehicle in violation of RCW 9A.56.065, or taking a motor vehicle without permission in the first degree in violation of RCW 9A.56.070, shall be guilty of a class C felony ranked as a seriousness level III offense.

(2) It is an affirmative defense to this section which must be established by a preponderance of the evidence that: (a) A reasonable person would not believe that the signal to stop was given by a police officer; and (b) driving after the signal to stop was reasonable under the circumstances.

(3) The license or permit to drive or any nonresident driving privilege of a person convicted of a violation of this section shall be revoked by the department of licensing.

Sec. 2. RCW 9.94A.515 and 2022 c 231 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVI

Aggravated Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XV

Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIV

Murder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

Trafficking 1 (RCW 9A.40.100(1))

XIII

Malicious explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1 (RCW 70.74.270(1))

XII

Assault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Promoting Commercial Sexual Abuse of a Minor (RCW 9.68A.101)

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

Trafficking 2 (RCW 9A.40.100(3))

XI

Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

X

Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW 9A.42.020)

Indecent Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Sexually Violent Predator Escape (RCW 9A.76.115)

IX

Abandonment of Dependent Person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Hit and Run—Death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide by Watercraft, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2 (RCW 70.74.270(2))

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

VIII

Arson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Commercial Sexual Abuse of a Minor (RCW 9.68A.100)

Homicide by Watercraft, by the operation of any vessel in a reckless manner (RCW 79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)

Theft of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

VII

Air bag diagnostic systems (causing bodily injury or death) (RCW 46.37.660(2)(b))

Air bag replacement requirements (causing bodily injury or death) (RCW 46.37.660(1)(b))

Burglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Civil Disorder Training (RCW 9A.48.120)

Dealing in depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.050(1))

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

False Reporting 1 (RCW 9A.84.040(2)(a))

Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Malicious placement of an explosive 3 (RCW 70.74.270(3))

Manufacture or import counterfeit, nonfunctional, damaged, or previously deployed air bag (causing bodily injury or death) (RCW 46.37.650(1)(b))

Negligently Causing Death By Use of a Signal Preemption Device (RCW 46.37.675)

Sell, install, or reinstall counterfeit, nonfunctional, damaged, or previously deployed airbag (RCW 46.37.650(2)(b))

Sending, bringing into state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.060(1))

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1))

Use of a Machine Gun or Bump-fire Stock in Commission of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)

VI

Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Possession of Depictions of a Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.070(1))

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Theft from a Vulnerable Adult 1 (RCW 9A.56.400(1))

Unlawful Storage of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.020)

V

Abandonment of Dependent Person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Advancing money or property for extortionate extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Air bag diagnostic systems (RCW 46.37.660(2)(c))

Air bag replacement requirements (RCW 46.37.660(1)(c))

Bail Jumping with class A Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW 9A.44.160)

Dealing in Depictions of Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 2 (RCW 9.68A.050(2))

Domestic Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 7.105.450, 10.99.040, 10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220, 26.26B.050, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or 74.34.145)

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect Extensions of Credit (RCW 9A.82.040)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Manufacture or import counterfeit, nonfunctional, damaged, or previously deployed air bag (RCW 46.37.650(1)(c))

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Sell, install, or reinstall counterfeit, nonfunctional, damaged, or previously deployed airbag (RCW 46.37.650(2)(c))

Sending, Bringing into State Depictions of Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 2 (RCW 9.68A.060(2))

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070)

IV

Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault 3 (of a Peace Officer with a Projectile Stun Gun) (RCW 9A.36.031(1)(h))

Assault 4 (third domestic violence offense) (RCW 9A.36.041(3))

Assault by Watercraft (RCW 79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW 9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Cheating 1 (RCW 9.46.1961)

Commercial Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Driving While Under the Influence (RCW 46.61.502(6))

Endangerment with a Controlled Substance (RCW 9A.42.100)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hate Crime (RCW 9A.36.080)

Hit and Run—Injury (RCW 46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit and Run with Vessel—Injury Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under Age 14 (subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Physical Control of a Vehicle While Under the Influence (RCW 46.61.504(6))

Possession of Depictions of a Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 2 (RCW 9.68A.070(2))

Residential Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.82.050)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or payment card transaction (RCW 9A.56.290(4)(b))

Unlawful transaction of health coverage as a health care service contractor (RCW 48.44.016(3))

Unlawful transaction of health coverage as a health maintenance organization (RCW 48.46.033(3))

Unlawful transaction of insurance business (RCW 48.15.023(3))

Unlicensed practice as an insurance professional (RCW 48.17.063(2))

Use of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Vehicle Prowling 2 (third or subsequent offense) (RCW 9A.52.100(3))

Vehicular Assault, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Viewing of Depictions of a Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.075(1))

Willful Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

III

Animal Cruelty 1 (Sexual Conduct or Contact) (RCW 16.52.205(3))

Assault 3 (Except Assault 3 of a Peace Officer With a Projectile Stun Gun) (RCW 9A.36.031 except subsection (1)(h))

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (where there is a reasonable suspicion the offender has violated or is violating RCW 9A.56.065 or 9A.56.070) (RCW 46.61.024(1)(b))

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW 9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Cyber Harassment (RCW 9A.90.120(2)(b))

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

False Reporting 2 (RCW 9A.84.040(2)(b))

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)

Manufacture of Untraceable Firearm with Intent to Sell (RCW 9.41.190)

Manufacture or Assembly of an Undetectable Firearm or Untraceable Firearm (RCW 9.41.325)

Mortgage Fraud (RCW 19.144.080)

Negligently Causing Substantial Bodily Harm By Use of a Signal Preemption Device (RCW 46.37.674)

Organized Retail Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.350(2))

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun, Bump-Fire Stock, Undetectable Firearm, or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Retail Theft with Special Circumstances 1 (RCW 9A.56.360(2))

Securities Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent conviction or threat of death) (RCW 9.61.230(2))

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.083)

Theft with the Intent to Resell 1 (RCW 9A.56.340(2))

Trafficking in Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.82.055)

Unlawful Hunting of Big Game 1 (RCW 77.15.410(3)(b))

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Unlawful Misbranding of Fish or Shellfish 1 (RCW 77.140.060(3))

Unlawful possession of firearm in the second degree (RCW 9.41.040(2))

Unlawful Taking of Endangered Fish or Wildlife 1 (RCW 77.15.120(3)(b))

Unlawful Trafficking in Fish, Shellfish, or Wildlife 1 (RCW 77.15.260(3)(b))

Unlawful Use of a Nondesignated Vessel (RCW 77.15.530(4))

Vehicular Assault, by the operation or driving of a vehicle with disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW 72.65.070)

II

Commercial Fishing Without a License 1 (RCW 77.15.500(3)(b))

Computer Trespass 1 (RCW 9A.90.040)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))

Electronic Data Service Interference (RCW 9A.90.060)

Electronic Data Tampering 1 (RCW 9A.90.080)

Electronic Data Theft (RCW 9A.90.100)

Engaging in Fish Dealing Activity Unlicensed 1 (RCW 77.15.620(3))

Escape from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

Failure to Register as a Sex Offender (second or subsequent offense) (RCW 9A.44.130 prior to June 10, 2010, and RCW 9A.44.132)

Health Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Identity Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(3))

Improperly Obtaining Financial Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Organized Retail Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.350(3))

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Possession of a Stolen Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.068)

Retail Theft with Special Circumstances 2 (RCW 9A.56.360(3))

Scrap Processing, Recycling, or Supplying Without a License (second or subsequent offense) (RCW 19.290.100)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of a Motor Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.065)

Theft of Rental, Leased, Lease-purchased, or Loaned Property (valued at $5,000 or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(a))

Theft with the Intent to Resell 2 (RCW 9A.56.340(3))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or payment card transaction (RCW 9A.56.290(4)(a))

Unlawful Participation of Non-Indians in Indian Fishery (RCW 77.15.570(2))

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Unlawful Purchase or Use of a License (RCW 77.15.650(3)(b))

Unlawful Trafficking in Fish, Shellfish, or Wildlife 2 (RCW 77.15.260(3)(a))

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

Voyeurism 1 (RCW 9A.44.115)

I

Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (except where there is a reasonable suspicion the offender has violated or is violating RCW 9A.56.065 or 9A.56.070) (RCW 46.61.024 except subsection (1)(b))

False Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Fraudulent Creation or Revocation of a Mental Health Advance Directive (RCW 9A.60.060)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Mineral Trespass (RCW 78.44.330)

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Spotlighting Big Game 1 (RCW 77.15.450(3)(b))

Suspension of Department Privileges 1 (RCW 77.15.670(3)(b))

Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2 (RCW 9A.56.075)

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft from a Vulnerable Adult 2 (RCW 9A.56.400(2))

Theft of Rental, Leased, Lease-purchased, or Loaned Property (valued at $750 or more but less than $5,000) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(b))

Transaction of insurance business beyond the scope of licensure (RCW 48.17.063)

Unlawful Fish and Shellfish Catch Accounting (RCW 77.15.630(3)(b))

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful Possession of Fictitious Identification (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Instruments of Financial Fraud (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Payment Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of a Personal Identification Device (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Production of Payment Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Releasing, Planting, Possessing, or Placing Deleterious Exotic Wildlife (RCW 77.15.250(2)(b))

Unlawful Trafficking in Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.142)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.144)

Unlawful Use of Net to Take Fish 1 (RCW 77.15.580(3)(b))

Unlawful Use of Prohibited Aquatic Animal Species (RCW 77.15.253(3))

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Violating Commercial Fishing Area or Time 1 (RCW 77.15.550(3)(b))

Sec. 3. RCW 9.94A.834 and 2008 c 219 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The prosecuting attorney may file a special allegation of endangerment by eluding in every criminal case involving a charge of attempting to elude a police vehicle under RCW 46.61.024, when sufficient admissible evidence exists, to show that one or more persons other than the defendant or the pursuing law enforcement officer were threatened with physical injury or harm by the actions of the person committing the crime of attempting to elude a police vehicle, or that the defendant committed or was committing any of the following acts:

(a) Theft of a motor vehicle under RCW 9A.56.065;

(b) Taking a motor vehicle without permission in the first degree under RCW 9A.56.070; or

(c) Evading the enforcement of an active warrant for arrest.

(2) In a criminal case in which there has been a special allegation, the state shall prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the accused committed the crime while endangering one or more persons other than the defendant or the pursuing law enforcement officer, or that the accused committed the crime and committed or was committing an act described in subsection (1)(a) through (c) of this section. The court shall make a finding of fact of whether or not one or more persons other than the defendant or the pursuing law enforcement officer were endangered at the time of the commission of the crime or whether or not the accused also committed or was committing an act described in subsection (1)(a) through (c) of this section, or if a jury trial is had, the jury shall, if it finds the defendant guilty, also find a special verdict as to whether or not one or more persons other than the defendant or the pursuing law enforcement officer were endangered during the commission of the crime or whether or not the accused also committed or was committing an act described in subsection (1)(a) through (c) of this section.

Sec. 4. RCW 9.94A.533 and 2020 c 330 s 1 and 2020 c 141 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of this section apply to the standard sentence ranges determined by RCW 9.94A.510 or 9.94A.517.

(2) For persons convicted of the anticipatory offenses of criminal attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the standard sentence range is determined by locating the sentencing grid sentence range defined by the appropriate offender score and the seriousness level of the completed crime, and multiplying the range by seventy-five percent.

(3) The following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the offender or an accomplice was armed with a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any firearm enhancements based on the classification of the completed felony crime. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the firearm enhancement or enhancements must be added to the total period of confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject to a firearm enhancement. If the offender or an accomplice was armed with a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any firearm enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW 9A.28.020:

(a) Five years for any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;

(b) Three years for any felony defined under any law as a class B felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;

(c) Eighteen months for any felony defined under any law as a class C felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;

(d) If the offender is being sentenced for any firearm enhancements under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection and the offender has previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or subsection (4)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all firearm enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of the enhancement listed;

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all firearm enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence under this subsection may be:

(i) Granted an extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(1)(c); or

(ii) Released under the provisions of RCW 9.94A.730;

(f) The firearm enhancements in this section shall apply to all felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun or bump-fire stock, possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and use of a machine gun or bump-fire stock in a felony;

(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a persistent offender. If the addition of a firearm enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the enhancement may not be reduced.

(4) The following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any deadly weapon enhancements based on the classification of the completed felony crime. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the deadly weapon enhancement or enhancements must be added to the total period of confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject to a deadly weapon enhancement. If the offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any deadly weapon enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW 9A.28.020:

(a) Two years for any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;

(b) One year for any felony defined under any law as a class B felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;

(c) Six months for any felony defined under any law as a class C felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;

(d) If the offender is being sentenced under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection for any deadly weapon enhancements and the offender has previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or subsection (3)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all deadly weapon enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of the enhancement listed;

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all deadly weapon enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence under this subsection may be:

(i) Granted an extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(1)(c); or

(ii) Released under the provisions of RCW 9.94A.730;

(f) The deadly weapon enhancements in this section shall apply to all felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun or bump-fire stock, possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and use of a machine gun or bump-fire stock in a felony;

(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a persistent offender. If the addition of a deadly weapon enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the enhancement may not be reduced.

(5) The following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range if the offender or an accomplice committed the offense while in a county jail or state correctional facility and the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection. If the offender or an accomplice committed one of the crimes listed in this subsection while in a county jail or state correctional facility, and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection, the following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section:

(a) Eighteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(2) (a) or (b) or 69.50.410;

(b) Fifteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(2) (c), (d), or (e);

(c) Twelve months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.4013.

For the purposes of this subsection, all of the real property of a state correctional facility or county jail shall be deemed to be part of that facility or county jail.

(6) An additional twenty-four months shall be added to the standard sentence range for any ranked offense involving a violation of chapter 69.50 RCW if the offense was also a violation of RCW 69.50.435 or 9.94A.827. All enhancements under this subsection shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter.

(7) An additional two years shall be added to the standard sentence range for vehicular homicide committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502 for each prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all impaired driving enhancements under this subsection are mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including other impaired driving enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter.

An offender serving a sentence under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(1)(c).

(8)(a) The following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range for felony crimes committed on or after July 1, 2006, if the offense was committed with sexual motivation, as that term is defined in RCW 9.94A.030. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the sexual motivation enhancement must be added to the total period of total confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject to a sexual motivation enhancement. If the offender committed the offense with sexual motivation and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW 9A.28.020:

(i) Two years for any felony defined under the law as a class A felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years, or both;

(ii) Eighteen months for any felony defined under any law as a class B felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both;

(iii) One year for any felony defined under any law as a class C felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both;

(iv) If the offender is being sentenced for any sexual motivation enhancements under (a)(i), (ii), and/or (iii) of this subsection and the offender has previously been sentenced for any sexual motivation enhancements on or after July 1, 2006, under (a)(i), (ii), and/or (iii) of this subsection, all sexual motivation enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of the enhancement listed;

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all sexual motivation enhancements under this subsection are mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including other sexual motivation enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence under this subsection may be:

(i) Granted an extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(1)(c); or

(ii) Released under the provisions of RCW 9.94A.730;

(c) The sexual motivation enhancements in this subsection apply to all felony crimes;

(d) If the standard sentence range under this subsection exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a persistent offender. If the addition of a sexual motivation enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the enhancement may not be reduced;

(e) The portion of the total confinement sentence which the offender must serve under this subsection shall be calculated before any earned early release time is credited to the offender;

(f) Nothing in this subsection prevents a sentencing court from imposing a sentence outside the standard sentence range pursuant to RCW 9.94A.535.

(9) An additional one-year enhancement shall be added to the standard sentence range for the felony crimes of RCW 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.079, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, or 9A.44.089 committed on or after July 22, 2007, if the offender engaged, agreed, or offered to engage the victim in the sexual conduct in return for a fee. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the one-year enhancement must be added to the total period of total confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject to the enhancement. If the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense for the felony crimes of RCW 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.079, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, or 9A.44.089, and the offender attempted, solicited another, or conspired to engage, agree, or offer to engage the victim in the sexual conduct in return for a fee, an additional one-year enhancement shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section. For purposes of this subsection, "sexual conduct" means sexual intercourse or sexual contact, both as defined in chapter 9A.44 RCW.

(10)(a) For a person age eighteen or older convicted of any criminal street gang-related felony offense for which the person compensated, threatened, or solicited a minor in order to involve the minor in the commission of the felony offense, the standard sentence range is determined by locating the sentencing grid sentence range defined by the appropriate offender score and the seriousness level of the completed crime, and multiplying the range by one hundred twenty-five percent. If the standard sentence range under this subsection exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum sentence is the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a persistent offender.

(b) This subsection does not apply to any criminal street gang-related felony offense for which involving a minor in the commission of the felony offense is an element of the offense.

(c) The increased penalty specified in (a) of this subsection is unavailable in the event that the prosecution gives notice that it will seek an exceptional sentence based on an aggravating factor under RCW 9.94A.535.

(11) An additional twelve months and one day shall be added to the standard sentence range for a conviction of attempting to elude a police vehicle as defined by RCW 46.61.024, if the conviction included a finding by special allegation of endangering one or more persons or committing an enumerated act under RCW 9.94A.834.

(12) An additional twelve months shall be added to the standard sentence range for an offense that is also a violation of RCW 9.94A.831.

(13) An additional twelve months shall be added to the standard sentence range for vehicular homicide committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.520 or for vehicular assault committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.522, or for any felony driving under the influence (RCW 46.61.502(6)) or felony physical control under the influence (RCW 46.61.504(6)) for each child passenger under the age of sixteen who is an occupant in the defendant's vehicle. These enhancements shall be mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including other minor child enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. If the addition of a minor child enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the enhancement shall be mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions.

(14) An additional twelve months shall be added to the standard sentence range for an offense that is also a violation of RCW 9.94A.832.

(15) Regardless of any provisions in this section, if a person is being sentenced in adult court for a crime committed under age eighteen, the court has full discretion to depart from mandatory sentencing enhancements and to take the particular circumstances surrounding the defendant's youth into account.

--- END ---