BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the Washington fish and wildlife commission provides an important service to the state of Washington by protecting and preserving wildlife, fish, and habitat. The commission also provides sustainable fish and wildlife recreational and commercial opportunities that have significant impacts on local economies through sporting and tourism endeavors. In order to carry out these important duties, appointed commissioners must make difficult sacrifices as they volunteer their time and energy. Unfortunately, not all Washingtonians have the opportunity to dedicate the time and resources necessary to serve in this position and, therefore, they may be unable to accept a nomination. This makes the commission less representative and leaves out valuable voices from across all regions of the state.

Therefore, the legislature intends to provide a salary to the fish and wildlife commissioners in an effort to reduce the burdens placed on the commissioners and create a more inclusive and representative commission.

Sec. 2. RCW 77.04.060 and 2013 c 23 s 238 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission shall hold at least one regular meeting during the first two months of each calendar quarter, and special meetings when called by the chair and by five members. Five members constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

The commission at a meeting in each odd-numbered year shall elect one of its members as chair and another member as vice chair, each of whom shall serve for a term of two years or until a successor is elected and qualified.

((Members))The annual salary for members of the commission shall be ((compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250))established by the governor in accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.040. In addition, members are allowed their travel expenses incurred while absent from their usual places of residence in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.03.028 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 451 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The office of financial management shall study the duties and salaries of the directors of the several departments and the members of the several boards and commissions of state government, who are subject to appointment by the governor or whose salaries are fixed by the governor, and of the chief executive officers of the following agencies of state government:

The arts commission; the human rights commission; the board of accountancy; the eastern Washington historical society; the Washington state historical society; the recreation and conservation office; the criminal justice training commission; the traffic safety commission; the horse racing commission; the public disclosure commission; the state conservation commission; the commission on Hispanic affairs; the commission on Asian Pacific American affairs; the state board for volunteer firefighters and reserve officers; the transportation improvement board; the public employment relations commission; the fish and wildlife commission; and the energy facilities site evaluation council.

(2) The office of financial management shall report to the governor or the chairperson of the appropriate salary fixing authority at least once in each fiscal biennium on such date as the governor may designate, but not later than seventy-five days prior to the convening of each regular session of the legislature during an odd-numbered year, its recommendations for the salaries to be fixed for each position.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2023.

--- END ---