BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.34 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any cultural landscape feature established on the capitol campus to commemorate the geological and cultural diversity of eastern Washington must recognize the flora and fauna, rich agriculture and forestry, and history of eastern Washington. Any such cultural landscape feature must include floral components such as ponderosa pine trees, quaking aspen trees, and western larch trees, or other site-adapted species. The design of such a cultural landscape feature must serve to celebrate the unique beauty of eastern Washington, its unparalleled agricultural significance to the state and world, and the deep history of these lands. The cultural landscape feature will also serve as a place of enjoyment and familiarity for those who call eastern Washington home.

(2) The capitol committee, or any subcommittee within, must consult with the department of enterprise services and the department of natural resources in its planning, planting, and placement of any floral components to be used as part of the eastern Washington cultural landscape feature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.34 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The Washington state eastern Washington cultural landscape feature account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. The purpose of the account is to support the establishment and maintenance of the cultural landscape feature. The secretary of state may solicit and accept moneys from gifts, grants, or endowments for this purpose. All receipts from federal funds, gifts, or grants from the private sector, foundations, or other sources must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the design, siting, permitting, construction, maintenance, dedication, or creation of educational materials related to placement of this cultural landscape feature on the capitol campus. Only the secretary of state, or the secretary of state's designee, may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(2) The secretary of state may adopt rules governing the receipt and use of funds in the account.

--- END ---