BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 50.04.075 and 2018 c 179 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) With respect to claims with an effective date prior to July 1, 2012, "dislocated worker" means any individual who:

(a) Has been terminated or received a notice of termination from employment;

(b) Is eligible for or has exhausted entitlement to unemployment compensation benefits; and

(c) Is unlikely to return to employment in the individual's principal occupation or previous industry because of a diminishing demand for their skills in that occupation or industry.

(2) With respect to claims with an effective date on or after July 1, 2012, "dislocated worker" means any individual who:

(a) Has been involuntarily and indefinitely separated from employment as a result of a permanent reduction of operations at the individual's place of employment, has separated from a declining occupation, ((or)) has separated from employment as a result of chapter 179, Laws of 2018, or has separated from employment as a result of the denial of commercial finfish net pen aquaculture lease renewal applications or the issuance of order number 202211 by the commissioner of public lands on November 17, 2022; and

(b) Is eligible for or has exhausted entitlement to unemployment compensation benefits.

--- END ---