BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that the COVID-19 pandemic created extreme labor shortages in certain industries, especially in the food service and hospitality industry.

(2) The legislature further finds that establishments traditionally classified as off-limits to persons under the age of 21 have experienced even greater labor challenges in occupations that do not involve the serving of alcohol or interacting with patrons, such as dishwashers, sanitation specialists, line cooks, prep cooks, fry cooks, and chefs.

(3) The legislature further finds that these occupations are critical entry-level jobs that help youth develop strong skills that translate into success in other workplaces and occupations later in life.

(4) Therefore, the legislature intends to allow, under specific and limited circumstances, youth between the ages of 18 to 21 to be employed in establishments traditionally classified as off-limits to persons under the age of 21.

Sec. 2. RCW 66.44.316 and 1985 c 323 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is lawful for:

(((1)))(a) Professional musicians, professional disc jockeys, or professional sound or lighting technicians actively engaged in support of professional musicians or professional disc jockeys, ((eighteen))18 years of age and older, to enter and to remain in any premises licensed under the provisions of ((Title 66 RCW))this title, but only during and in the course of their employment as musicians, disc jockeys, or sound or lighting technicians;

(((2)))(b) Persons ((eighteen))18 years of age and older performing janitorial services to enter and remain on premises licensed under the provisions of ((Title 66 RCW))this title when the premises are closed but only during and in the course of their performance of janitorial services;

(((3)))(c) Employees of amusement device companies, which employees are ((eighteen))18 years of age or older, to enter and to remain in any premises licensed under the provisions of ((Title 66 RCW))this title, but only during and in the course of their employment for the purpose of installing, maintaining, repairing, or removing an amusement device. For the purposes of this section amusement device means coin-operated video games, pinball machines, juke boxes, or other similar devices; ((and

(4)))(d) Security and law enforcement officers, and firefighters ((eighteen))18 years of age or older to enter and to remain in any premises licensed under ((Title 66 RCW))this title, but only during and in the course of their official duties and only if they are not the direct employees of the licensee. However, the application of ((the [this]))this subsection to security officers is limited to casual, isolated incidents arising in the course of their duties and does not extend to continuous or frequent entering or remaining in any licensed premises; and

(e) Persons 18 years of age and older performing services unrelated to the sale or service of alcohol to enter and remain on premises licensed under this title, but only during and in the course of their employment as a dishwasher, cook, chef, sanitation specialist, or other kitchen staff and only under the following conditions:

(i) The individual may not perform any services or work in the bar, lounge, or dining area of the licensed premises;

(ii) The individual may not serve food, drinks, or otherwise interact with the patrons of the licensee;

(iii) The individual may never be in possession of or consume alcohol at any time; and

(iv) The licensee must ensure that a supervisor, who is at least 21 years of age, is present at all times that an individual employed under this section is working.

(2) This section shall not be construed as permitting the sale or distribution of any alcoholic beverages to any person under the age of ((twenty-one))21 years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---