BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 66.20.010 and 2019 c 112 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon application in the prescribed form being made to any employee authorized by the board to issue permits, accompanied by payment of the prescribed fee, and upon the employee being satisfied that the applicant should be granted a permit under this title, the employee must issue to the applicant under such regulations and at such fee as may be prescribed by the board a permit of the class applied for, as follows:

(1) Where the application is for a special permit by a physician or dentist, or by any person in charge of an institution regularly conducted as a hospital or sanatorium for the care of persons in ill health, or as a home devoted exclusively to the care of aged people, a special liquor purchase permit, except that the governor may waive the requirement for a special liquor purchase permit under this subsection pursuant to an order issued under RCW 43.06.220(2);

(2) Where the application is for a special permit by a person engaged within the state in mechanical or manufacturing business or in scientific pursuits requiring alcohol for use therein, or by any private individual, a special permit to purchase alcohol for the purpose named in the permit, except that the governor may waive the requirement for a special liquor purchase permit under this subsection pursuant to an order issued under RCW 43.06.220(2);

(3) Where the application is for a special permit to consume liquor at a banquet, at a specified date and place, a special permit to purchase liquor for consumption at such banquet, to such applicants as may be fixed by the board;

(4) Where the application is for a special permit to consume liquor on the premises of a business not licensed under this title, a special permit to purchase liquor for consumption thereon for such periods of time and to such applicants as may be fixed by the board;

(5) Where the application is for a special permit by a manufacturer to import or purchase within the state alcohol, malt, and other materials containing alcohol to be used in the manufacture of liquor, or other products, a special permit;

(6) Where the application is for a special permit by a person operating a drug store to purchase liquor at retail prices only, to be thereafter sold by such person on the prescription of a physician, a special liquor purchase permit, except that the governor may waive the requirement for a special liquor purchase permit under this subsection pursuant to an order issued under RCW 43.06.220(2);

(7) Where the application is for a special permit by an authorized representative of a military installation operated by or for any of the armed forces within the geographical boundaries of the state of Washington, a special permit to purchase liquor for use on such military installation;

(8) Where the application is for a special permit by a vendor that manufactures or sells a product which cannot be effectively presented to potential buyers without serving it with liquor or by a manufacturer, importer, or distributor, or representative thereof, to serve liquor without charge to delegates and guests at a convention of a trade association composed of licensees of the board, when the said liquor is served in a hospitality room or from a booth in a board-approved suppliers' display room at the convention, and when the liquor so served is for consumption in the said hospitality room or display room during the convention, anything in this title to the contrary notwithstanding. Any such spirituous liquor must be purchased from a spirits retailer or distributor, and any such liquor is subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 82.08.150, 66.24.290, and 66.24.210;

(9) Where the application is for a special permit by a manufacturer, importer, or distributor, or representative thereof, to donate liquor for a reception, breakfast, luncheon, or dinner for delegates and guests at a convention of a trade association composed of licensees of the board, when the liquor so donated is for consumption at the said reception, breakfast, luncheon, or dinner during the convention, anything in this title to the contrary notwithstanding. Any such spirituous liquor must be purchased from a spirits retailer or distributor, and any such liquor is subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 82.08.150, 66.24.290, and 66.24.210;

(10) Where the application is for a special permit by a manufacturer, importer, or distributor, or representative thereof, to donate and/or serve liquor without charge to delegates and guests at an international trade fair, show, or exposition held under the auspices of a federal, state, or local governmental entity or organized and promoted by a nonprofit organization, anything in this title to the contrary notwithstanding. Any such spirituous liquor must be purchased from a liquor spirits retailer or distributor, and any such liquor is subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 82.08.150, 66.24.290, and 66.24.210;

(11) Where the application is for an annual special permit by a person operating a bed and breakfast lodging facility to donate or serve wine or beer without charge to overnight guests of the facility if the wine or beer is for consumption on the premises of the facility. "Bed and breakfast lodging facility," as used in this subsection, means a facility offering from one to eight lodging units and breakfast to travelers and guests;

(12) Where the application is for a special permit to allow tasting of alcohol by persons at least ((eighteen))18 years of age under the following circumstances:

(a) The application is from a community or technical college as defined in RCW 28B.50.030, a regional university, or a state university;

(b) The person who is permitted to taste under this subsection is enrolled as a student in a required or elective class that is part of a culinary, sommelier, wine business, enology, viticulture, wine technology, beer technology, or spirituous technology-related degree program;

(c) The alcohol served to any person in the degree-related programs under (b) of this subsection is tasted but not consumed for the purposes of educational training as part of the class curriculum with the approval of the educational provider;

(d) The service and tasting of alcoholic beverages is supervised by a faculty or staff member of the educational provider who is ((twenty-one))21 years of age or older. The supervising faculty or staff member shall possess a class 12 or 13 alcohol server permit under the provisions of RCW 66.20.310;

(e) The enrolled student permitted to taste the alcoholic beverages does not purchase the alcoholic beverages;

(f) The enrolled student permitted to taste the alcoholic beverages conducts the tasting either: (i) On the premises of the college or university at which the student is enrolled; or (ii) while on a field trip to a grape-growing area or production facility so long as the enrolled student is accompanied by a faculty or staff member with a class 12 or 13 alcohol server permit who supervises as provided in (d) of this subsection and all other requirements of this subsection (12) are met; and

(g) The permit fee for the special permit provided for in this subsection (12) must be waived by the board;

(13) Where the application is for a special permit by a distillery or craft distillery for an event not open to the general public to be held or conducted at a specific place, including at the licensed premise of the applying distillery or craft distillery, upon a specific date for the purpose of tasting and selling spirits of its own production. The distillery or craft distillery must obtain a permit for a fee of ((ten dollars))$10 per event. An application for the permit must be submitted for private banquet permits prior to the event and, once issued, must be posted in a conspicuous place at the premises for which the permit was issued during all times the permit is in use. No licensee may receive more than ((twelve))12 permits under this subsection (13) each year;

(14) Where the application is for a special permit by a manufacturer of wine for an event not open to the general public to be held or conducted at a specific place upon a specific date for the purpose of tasting and selling wine of its own production. The winery must obtain a permit for a fee of ((ten dollars))$10 per event. An application for the permit must be submitted at least ten days before the event and once issued, must be posted in a conspicuous place at the premises for which the permit was issued during all times the permit is in use. No more than ((twelve))12 events per year may be held by a single manufacturer under this subsection;

(15) Where the application is for a special permit by a manufacturer of beer for an event not open to the general public to be held or conducted at a specific place upon a specific date for the purpose of tasting and selling beer of its own production. The brewery or microbrewery must obtain a permit for a fee of ((ten dollars))$10 per event. An application for the permit must be submitted at least ((ten))10 days before the event and, once issued, must be posted in a conspicuous place at the premises for which the permit was issued during all times the permit is in use. No more than ((twelve))12 events per year may be held by a single manufacturer under this subsection;

(16) Where the application is for a special permit by an individual or business to sell a private collection of wine or spirits to an individual or business. The seller must obtain a permit at least five business days before the sale, for a fee of ((twenty-five dollars))$25 per sale. The seller must provide an inventory of products sold and the agreed price on a form provided by the board. The seller shall submit the report and taxes due to the board no later than ((twenty))20 calendar days after the sale. A permit may be issued under this section to allow the sale of a private collection to licensees, but may not be issued to a licensee to sell to a private individual or business which is not otherwise authorized under the license held by the seller. If the liquor is purchased by a licensee, all sales are subject to taxes assessed as on liquor acquired from any other source. The board may adopt rules to implement this section;

(17)(a) A special permit, where the application is for a special permit by a nonprofit organization to sell wine through an auction, not open to the public, to be conducted at a specific place, upon a specific date, and to allow wine tastings at the auction of the wine to be auctioned.

(b) A permit holder under this subsection (17) may at the specified event:

(i) Sell wine by auction for off-premises consumption; and

(ii) Allow tastings of samples of the wine to be auctioned at the event.

(c) An application is required for a permit under this subsection (17). The application must be submitted prior to the event and once issued must be posted in a conspicuous place at the premises for which the permit was issued during all times the permit is in use.

(d) Wine from more than one winery may be sold at the auction; however, each winery selling wine at the auction must be listed on the permit application. Only a single application form may be required for each auction, regardless of the number of wineries that are selling wine at the auction. The total fee per event for a permit issued under this subsection (17) is ((twenty-five dollars))$25 multiplied by the number of wineries that are selling wine at the auction.

(e) For the purposes of this subsection (17), "nonprofit organization" means an entity incorporated as a nonprofit organization under Washington state law.

(f) The board may adopt rules to implement this section; and

(18) An annual special permit to allow a short-term rental operator to provide one complimentary bottle of wine to rental guests who are age 21 or over. The annual special permit fee is $75. A single permit applies to all rental properties owned or operated by the short-term rental operator and identified in the permit application. One complimentary bottle of wine per booking may be provided, regardless of the total number of rental guests. The provision of the complimentary bottle of wine may occur only after an operator or staff person of the short-term rental, who is present at the short-term rental property, verifies that each rental guest who will consume the complimentary bottle of wine is age 21 or over by checking a valid form of identification of each such rental guest at the time rental guests arrive. The rental guests must be informed the rental guests are being offered one complimentary bottle of wine and that opening or consuming the bottle of wine in a public place is illegal pursuant to RCW 66.44.100. The rental guests must not have notified the operator that the rental guests decline the complimentary bottle of wine. The complimentary bottle of wine may be consumed on the premises of the rental property or removed and consumed off the premises of the rental property. A permit holder may purchase wine from wine distributors in accordance with RCW 66.24.200, and from retailers and other suppliers of wine authorized under this title to sell wine at retail to consumers for off-premises consumption. For purposes of this subsection, the terms "short-term rental," "operator," and "guest" have the same meanings as in RCW 64.37.010. Moneys received by the board from annual special permits issued under this subsection must be deposited in the statewide tourism marketing account in RCW 43.384.040.

Sec. 2. RCW 66.24.200 and 2004 c 160 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be a license for wine distributors to sell wine, purchased from licensed Washington wineries, wine certificate of approval holders, licensed wine importers, or suppliers of foreign wine located outside of the United States, to licensed wine retailers ((and)), other wine distributors, and holders of annual special permits issued under RCW 66.20.010(18), and to export the same from the state; fee ((six hundred sixty dollars))$660 per year for each distributing unit.

Sec. 3. RCW 43.384.040 and 2018 c 275 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The statewide tourism marketing account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from tax revenues under RCW 82.08.225, and all receipts from fees from annual special permits issued to short-term rental operators under RCW 66.20.010(18), must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for expenditures of the department that are related to implementation of a statewide tourism marketing program and operation of the authority. A two-to-one nonstate or state fund, other than general fund state, match must be provided for all expenditures from the account. A match may consist of nonstate or state fund, other than general fund state, cash contributions deposited in the private local account created under RCW 43.384.020(4), the value of an advertising equivalency contribution, or an in-kind contribution. The board must determine criteria for what qualifies as an in-kind contribution.

Sec. 4. RCW 66.08.170 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 978 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be a fund, known as the "liquor revolving fund," which shall consist of all license fees, permit fees other than as provided in RCW 66.20.010(18), penalties, forfeitures, and all other moneys, income, or revenue received by the board. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. All moneys received by the board or any employee thereof, except for change funds and an amount of petty cash as fixed by the board within the authority of law shall be deposited each day in a depository approved by the state treasurer and transferred to the state treasurer to be credited to the liquor revolving fund. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer funds from the liquor revolving ((account [fund]))fund to the state general fund and may direct an additional amount of liquor profits to be distributed to local governments. Neither the transfer of funds nor the additional distribution of liquor profits to local governments during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium may reduce the excess fund distributions that otherwise would occur under RCW 66.08.190. During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the state treasurer shall transfer from the liquor revolving fund to the state general fund ((forty-two million five hundred thousand dollars))$42,500,000 for fiscal year 2012 and ((forty-two million five hundred thousand dollars))$42,500,000 for fiscal year 2013. The transfer during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium may not reduce the excess fund distributions that otherwise would occur under RCW 66.08.190. Sales to licensees are exempt from any liquor price increases that may result from the transfer of funds from the liquor revolving fund to the state general fund during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium. Disbursements from the revolving fund shall be on authorization of the board or a duly authorized representative thereof. During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the legislature may also appropriate from the account for local government studies. In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control the liquor revolving fund shall be subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW but no appropriation shall be required to permit expenditures and payment of obligations from such fund. During the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal biennia, the legislature may transfer from the liquor revolving fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

--- END ---