BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.216 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By December 1, 2023, the department must create an instructional handbook for all child care providers. The handbook must provide educational material on the following topics related to care of children:

(a) Health, safety, and nutritional needs of children;

(b) How to establish a nurturing relationship; and

(c) The fundamentals of instruction.

(2) The handbook must be made available free of charge in both physical and online formats.

(3) A child care provider is exempt from any requirement to obtain an early childhood education certificate if, by July 1, 2024, for persons employed as a child care provider prior to January 1, 2024, or within the first six months of hire, for persons employed on or after January 1, 2024:

(a) The provider has read the handbook and has submitted to the department a signed attestation indicating that they have read the handbook; and

(b) The child care center director or center assistant director has submitted to the department a signed attestation that the provider has read the handbook and has implemented the instructional material.

(4) For purposes of this section:

(a) A "child care provider" includes an employee of a child care center who provides direct care to children; and

(b) A "child care center" includes a child day care center, an outdoor nature-based child care provider, or a family day care provider.

--- END ---