BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature recognizes that Washington state has a vibrant Filipino American population that enriches our cultural, economic, and societal institutions. The legislature recognizes also that Filipino Americans have served honorably in the United States' armed services, defending and protecting the country throughout its history. The legislature, therefore, intends to direct the office of the superintendent of public instruction to identify and make available educational materials and resources that acknowledge the numerous and valuable contributions of Filipino Americans to the history and culture of Washington and the United States.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By September 1, 2024, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall identify and make available materials and resources for use in grades kindergarten through 12 that recognize the contributions of Filipino Americans to the history and culture of the United States and Washington state. The materials must be designed to promote an understanding and appreciation for the numerous and diverse contributions of Filipino Americans, and to deepen students' appreciation of other cultures. The materials and resources must be posted on the website of the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(2) Public schools are encouraged to provide instruction to students in kindergarten through grade 12 using the materials made available under this section.

--- END ---