BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 59.21.010 and 2019 c 390 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Assignee" means an individual or entity who has agreed to advance allowable relocation assistance expenses in exchange for the assignment and transfer of a right to reimbursement from the fund.

(2) "Department" means the department of commerce.

(3) "Director" means the director of the department of commerce.

(4) "Fund" means the manufactured/mobile home park relocation fund established under RCW 59.21.050.

(5) "Landlord" or "park-owner" means the owner of the manufactured/mobile home park that is being closed at the time relocation assistance is provided.

(6) "Low-income household" means a single person, family, or unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is less than ((eighty))80 percent of the median family income, adjusted for household size, for the county where the manufactured/mobile home is located.

(7) "Manufactured/mobile home park" or "park" means real property that is rented or held out for rent to others for the placement of two or more manufactured/mobile homes for the primary purpose of production of income, except where the real property is rented or held out for rent for seasonal recreational purpose only and is not intended for year-round occupancy.

(8) "Relocate" means to do one of the following:

(a) Remove a manufactured/mobile home from a manufactured/mobile home park being closed and reinstall it in another location; ((or))

(b) Remove a manufactured/mobile home from a manufactured/mobile home park being closed and demolish and dispose of it and secure other housing; or

(c) Remove a manufactured/mobile home from a manufactured/mobile home park being closed by selling or gifting the home to a third party and secure other housing.

(9) "Relocation assistance" means the monetary assistance provided under this chapter, including reimbursement for the costs of relocation as well as cash assistance provided to allow the tenant to secure new housing.

(10) "Tenant" means a person that owns a manufactured/mobile home located on a rented lot in a manufactured/mobile home park.

(11) "Third party" means a person or persons who purchase or are gifted a tenant's home, with the condition they are responsible for removing the home on or prior to the park closure date and relocate the home under subsection (8)(a) or (b) of this section. The third party is not entitled to relocation assistance related to relocation of the purchased or gifted home.

Sec. 2. RCW 59.21.021 and 2021 c 28 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If a manufactured/mobile home park is, or is scheduled to be(([,])), closed or converted to another use, eligible tenants shall be entitled to relocation assistance on a first-come, first-serve basis. The department shall give priority for distribution of relocation assistance to eligible tenants residing in parks that are closed as a result of park-owner fraud or as a result of health and safety concerns as determined by the local board of health. Payments shall be made upon the department's verification of eligibility, subject to the availability of remaining funds.

(2) Eligibility for relocation assistance funds is limited to low-income households in manufactured/mobile home parks that are, or are scheduled to be, closed or converted to another use.

(3) Eligible tenants are entitled to financial assistance from the fund, up to a maximum of $17,000 for a multisection home and up to a maximum of $11,000 for a single-section home. The department shall distribute relocation assistance for each eligible tenant as follows:

(a) $12,000 for a multisection home and $8,000 for a single-section home shall be disbursed in the form of cash assistance to help the tenant relocate the home or secure alternative housing; and

(b) The remainder of the total assistance shall be disbursed once the tenant has transferred the title to the park-owner, relocated the home, or demolished and disposed of the home. The tenant must either transfer title of the manufactured/mobile home to the park-owner, relocate, or demolish and dispose of the home ((within 90 days of receiving the assistance under (a) of this subsection))by the park closure date to receive the remainder of the assistance. A tenant who removes the tenant's home on or before the park closure date and reinstalls the home in another location within 12 months after the closure date is eligible to receive the remainder of the assistance.

(4) In the event that the tenant does not relocate or demolish and dispose of the home ((within 90 days of receiving assistance from the fund))by the park closure date, the park-owner may seek reimbursement from the fund in the amount of $4,000 for a multisection home and $2,500 for a single-section home.

(a) To receive such reimbursement, the park-owner must provide documentation to the department demonstrating costs incurred for demolition and disposal of the home.

(b) The park-owner may seek reimbursement for additional costs incurred for demolition and disposal of the home up to an additional $4,500 for a multisection home and $3,000 for a single-section home from the portion of the relocation fund to which park-owners must contribute pursuant to RCW 59.30.050.

(5) Any individual or organization may apply to receive relocation assistance from the fund, for use in combination with funds from public or private sources, toward relocation of tenants eligible under this section, with agreement from the tenant.

(6) The legislature intends the cash assistance provided under subsection (3) of this section to be considered a one-time direct grant payment that shall be excluded from household income calculations for purposes of determining the eligibility of the recipient for benefits or assistance under any state program financed in whole or in part with state funds.

Sec. 3. RCW 59.21.040 and 1998 c 124 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

A tenant is not entitled to relocation assistance under this chapter if: (1) The tenant has given notice to the landlord of his or her intent to vacate the park and terminate the tenancy before any written notice of closure pursuant to RCW 59.20.080(1)(e) has been given; or (2) the tenant purchased a mobile home already situated in the park or moved a mobile home into the park after a written notice of closure pursuant to RCW 59.20.090 has been given and the person received actual prior notice of the change or closure((; or (3) the tenant receives assistance from an outside source that exceeds the maximum amounts of assistance to which a person is entitled under RCW 59.21.021(3))). However, no tenant may be denied relocation assistance under subsection (1) of this section if the tenant has remained on the premises and continued paying rent for a period of at least six months after giving notice of intent to vacate and before receiving formal notice of a closure or change of use.

--- END ---