BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW to read as follows:

It is unlawful to manufacture, import, offer, or sell in this state a consumable product that contains cannabis or any form of tetrahydrocannabinol in combination with beer, wine, spirits, or any other type of liquor in the same product.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 66.28 RCW to read as follows:

In accordance with section 1 of this act, it is unlawful to manufacture, import, offer, or sell in this state a consumable product that contains cannabis or any form of tetrahydrocannabinol in combination with beer, wine, spirits, or any other type of liquor in the same product.

--- END ---