BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that carbon monoxide poisoning kills at least 430 people in the United States every year and 50,000 people seek medical care to treat the adverse effects of carbon monoxide poisoning. Carbon monoxide gas is odorless and colorless, making it difficult for people to protect themselves and detect an issue that can cause sudden illness, death, and lifelong disability. Washington state has already enacted requirements for carbon monoxide alarms in residences. Therefore, the legislature intends to direct state agencies to collaborate on a study of what Washington state is doing to prevent carbon monoxide poisoning from sources outside of the home and what the state might reasonably do to keep people safe.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) By September 1, 2023, the department of health must convene an interagency carbon monoxide work group consisting of representatives of the department of ecology, the director of the forensic laboratory services at the Washington state patrol, the department of transportation, and the office of the attorney general. The interagency carbon monoxide work group must nominate a chair and the chair may designate up to two additional participants with subject matter expertise to participate on the work group.

(2) The purpose of the interagency carbon monoxide work group is to produce a report regarding current and recommended future state agency activities to:

(a) Prevent carbon monoxide poisoning from sources outside of the home;

(b) Increase awareness of carbon monoxide among the most at-risk populations;

(c) Collect data on the number of incidents of carbon monoxide poisoning and their causes in Washington, in order to track the reduction of such incidents over time; and

(d) Identify any opportunities to seek federal grants or other sources of funding available for public awareness campaigns related to carbon monoxide harm avoidance.

(3) The interagency carbon monoxide work group must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor by December 1, 2024, that contains recommendations on new policy changes and other actions that could be taken to reduce carbon monoxide poisoning in Washington.

(4) This section expires July 1, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act may be known and cited as Mary's law.

--- END ---