BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.650 RCW to read as follows:

The learning device and technology account is created in the state treasury. Revenues to the account consist of revenues collected under section 3 of this act and appropriations, grants, and donations directed for deposit into the account. Expenditures from the account must be used for the purposes of this chapter and RCW 43.330.5393. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Buyer" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.010.

(2)(a) "Retail sale" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.050.

(b) "Retail sale" also means the transfer of a smart wireless device to a buyer that is partially or fully discounted by the seller in exchange for the buyer purchasing other products or services furnished in connection with the smart wireless device.

(3) "Seller" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.010.

(4)(a) "Selling price" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.010.

(b) "Selling price" also means:

(i) In the case of a smart wireless device that is sold to the buyer under conditions where the selling price does not represent the true value of the smart wireless device and is sold together with other products or services for one nonitemized price, the retail selling price of the same product or similar products of like quality and character, sold in an arm's length transaction; and

(ii) In the case of installment sales of a smart wireless device, the total aggregate consideration to be paid by the buyer to the seller for the smart wireless device.

(5) "Smart wireless device" means any type of instrument, device, machine, or equipment that is capable of wireless access to the internet. This includes, but is not limited to, smart phones, laptop computers, tablets, wearable devices, smart speakers, gaming consoles, smart gyms, and smart televisions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) There is levied and collected a tax on each retail sale in this state of a smart wireless device. The amount of the tax is $2 for a device with a selling price of more than $250.

(2) The revenue collected under this section must be deposited in the learning device and technology account created in section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) The tax imposed in this chapter must be paid by the buyer to the seller. Each seller must collect from the buyer the full amount of the tax payable with respect to each taxable sale.

(2) The tax required by this chapter, to be collected by the seller, is held in trust by the seller until paid to the department. Any seller who appropriates or converts the tax collected to the seller's own use or to any use other than the payment of the tax to the extent that the money required to be collected is not available for payment on the due date as prescribed in this chapter is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(3) If any seller fails to collect the tax imposed in this chapter or, having collected the tax, fails to pay it to the department in the manner prescribed by this chapter, whether such failure is the result of the seller's own acts or the result of acts or conditions beyond the seller's control, the seller is, nevertheless, personally liable to the state for the amount of the tax.

(4) The tax required by this chapter to be collected by the seller must be stated separately from the selling price in any sales invoice or other instrument of sale.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the administration of this chapter.

Sec. 6. RCW 82.32.145 and 2020 c 301 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever the department has issued a warrant under RCW 82.32.210 for the collection of unpaid trust fund taxes from a limited liability business entity and that business entity has been terminated, dissolved, or abandoned, or is insolvent, the department may pursue collection of the entity's unpaid trust fund taxes, including penalties and interest on those taxes, against any or all of the responsible individuals. For purposes of this subsection, "insolvent" means the condition that results when the sum of the entity's debts exceeds the fair market value of its assets. The department may presume that an entity is insolvent if the entity refuses to disclose to the department the nature of its assets and liabilities.

(2) Personal liability under this section may be imposed for state and local trust fund taxes.

(3)(a) For a responsible individual who is the current or a former chief executive or chief financial officer, liability under this section applies regardless of fault or whether the individual was or should have been aware of the unpaid trust fund tax liability of the limited liability business entity.

(b) For any other responsible individual, liability under this section applies only if he or she willfully fails to pay or to cause to be paid to the department the trust fund taxes due from the limited liability business entity.

(4)(a) Except as provided in this subsection (4)(a), a responsible individual who is the current or a former chief executive or chief financial officer is liable under this section only for trust fund tax liability accrued during the period that he or she was the chief executive or chief financial officer. However, if the responsible individual had the responsibility or duty to remit payment of the limited liability business entity's trust fund taxes to the department during any period of time that the person was not the chief executive or chief financial officer, that individual is also liable for trust fund tax liability that became due during the period that he or she had the duty to remit payment of the limited liability business entity's taxes to the department but was not the chief executive or chief financial officer.

(b) All other responsible individuals are liable under this section only for trust fund tax liability that became due during the period he or she had the responsibility or duty to remit payment of the limited liability business entity's taxes to the department.

(5) Persons described in subsection (3)(b) of this section are exempt from liability under this section in situations where nonpayment of the limited liability business entity's trust fund taxes is due to reasons beyond their control as determined by the department by rule.

(6) Any person having been issued a notice of assessment under this section is entitled to the appeal procedures under RCW 82.32.160, 82.32.170, 82.32.180, 82.32.190, and 82.32.200.

(7) This section does not relieve the limited liability business entity of its trust fund tax liability or otherwise impair other tax collection remedies afforded by law.

(8) Collection authority and procedures prescribed in this chapter apply to collections under this section.

(9) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Chief executive" means: The president of a corporation; or for other entities or organizations other than corporations or if the corporation does not have a president as one of its officers, the highest ranking executive manager or administrator in charge of the management of the company or organization.

(b) "Chief financial officer" means: The treasurer of a corporation; or for entities or organizations other than corporations or if a corporation does not have a treasurer as one of its officers, the highest senior manager who is responsible for overseeing the financial activities of the entire company or organization.

(c) "Limited liability business entity" means a type of business entity that generally shields its owners from personal liability for the debts, obligations, and liabilities of the entity, or a business entity that is managed or owned in whole or in part by an entity that generally shields its owners from personal liability for the debts, obligations, and liabilities of the entity. Limited liability business entities include corporations, limited liability companies, limited liability partnerships, trusts, general partnerships and joint ventures in which one or more of the partners or parties are also limited liability business entities, and limited partnerships in which one or more of the general partners are also limited liability business entities.

(d) "Manager" has the same meaning as in RCW 25.15.006.

(e) "Member" has the same meaning as in RCW 25.15.006, except that the term only includes members of member-managed limited liability companies.

(f) "Officer" means any officer or assistant officer of a corporation, including the president, vice president, secretary, and treasurer.

(g)(i) "Responsible individual" includes any current or former officer, manager, member, partner, or trustee of a limited liability business entity with an unpaid tax warrant issued by the department.

(ii) "Responsible individual" also includes any current or former employee or other individual, but only if the individual had the responsibility or duty to remit payment of the limited liability business entity's unpaid trust fund tax liability reflected in a tax warrant issued by the department.

(iii) Whenever any taxpayer has one or more limited liability business entities as a member, manager, or partner, "responsible individual" also includes any current and former officers, members, or managers of the limited liability business entity or entities or of any other limited liability business entity involved directly in the management of the taxpayer. For purposes of this subsection (9)(g)(iii), "taxpayer" means a limited liability business entity with an unpaid tax warrant issued against it by the department.

(h) "Trust fund taxes" means taxes collected from purchasers and held in trust under RCW 82.08.050, including taxes imposed under RCW 82.08.020, 82.08.150, ((and)) 82.51.010, and section 3 of this act.

(i) "Willfully fails to pay or to cause to be paid" means that the failure was the result of an intentional, conscious, and voluntary course of action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. Sections 2 through 5 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. This act takes effect January 1, 2024.

--- END ---