BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.01 RCW to read as follows:

(1) An employer may not require any person hired on or after the effective date of this section, or any perspective employee or applicant, as a condition of employment, to present proof that the person has received a vaccine for COVID-19 or any variant thereof.

(2) Any rule, order, or directive that requires a person hired on or after the effective date of this section or any perspective employee or applicant, to be vaccinated against COVID-19 as a condition of employment is unenforceable.

(3) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "COVID-19" means a respiratory disease caused by the acute respiratory syndrome coronavirus 2 (SARS-CoV-2).

(b) "Employer" means any executive branch state agency and includes the governor's office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---