BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that governor executive order 22-13 required nearly all state employees to be vaccinated and boosted against COVID-19. This order resulted in the loss of nearly 1,900 state employees, including 400 transportation workers, which led to curtailed ferry service, reduced snowplow service, and fewer state patrol officers. The legislature further finds that vaccine requirements for state employees continue to evolve as the most recently negotiated state employee collective bargaining agreements remove the vaccine booster requirement and replace it with a $1,000 incentive payment. In light of recent and future changes to employer mandated vaccination policies, it is the intent of the legislature to facilitate the efficient return of state employees who separated from employment due to mandatory vaccination policies, by providing a hiring preference. It is also the intent of the legislature to permit these individuals, employed by both the state and local governments, to make employee contributions and receive state retirement system service credit for specified periods of work missed due to employer mandated vaccination policies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) In all competitive examinations, unless otherwise provided in this section, to determine the qualifications of applicants for public offices, positions, or employment, either the state, and all of its political subdivisions and all municipal corporations, or private companies or agencies contracted with by the state to give the competitive examinations shall give a scoring criteria status to individuals separated from employment due to vaccination status during the 2020, 2021, or 2022 calendar years. This preference must be implemented by adding 10 percent to the passing mark, grade or rating only, based upon a possible rating of 100 points.

(2) The vaccination status scoring criteria may be claimed upon submission by an applicant to a prospective employer, as listed in subsection (1) of this section, of either proof of dismissal related to vaccination status, or proof of the prior employer's vaccination policy, and an affidavit that the applicant separated from employment due to the employer policy.

Sec. 3. RCW 41.26.520 and 2016 c 115 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A member who is on a paid leave of absence authorized by a member's employer shall continue to receive service credit as provided for under the provisions of RCW 41.26.410 through 41.26.550.

(2) A member who receives compensation from an employer while on an authorized leave of absence to serve as an elected official of a labor organization, and whose employer is reimbursed by the labor organization for the compensation paid to the member during the period of absence, may also be considered to be on a paid leave of absence. This subsection shall only apply if the member's leave of absence is authorized by a collective bargaining agreement that provides that the member retains seniority rights with the employer during the period of leave. The basic salary reported for a member who establishes service credit under this subsection may not be greater than the salary paid to the highest paid job class covered by the collective bargaining agreement.

(3) Except as specified in subsection (7) of this section, a member shall be eligible to receive a maximum of two years service credit during a member's entire working career for those periods when a member is on an unpaid leave of absence authorized by an employer. Such credit may be obtained only if the member makes the employer, member, and state contributions plus interest as determined by the department for the period of the authorized leave of absence within five years of resumption of service or prior to retirement whichever comes sooner.

(4) A law enforcement member may be authorized by an employer to work part time and to go on a part-time leave of absence. During a part-time leave of absence a member is prohibited from any other employment with their employer. A member is eligible to receive credit for any portion of service credit not earned during a month of part-time leave of absence if the member makes the employer, member, and state contributions, plus interest, as determined by the department for the period of the authorized leave within five years of resumption of full-time service or prior to retirement whichever comes sooner. Any service credit purchased for a part-time leave of absence is included in the two-year maximum provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(5) If a member fails to meet the time limitations of subsection (3) or (4) of this section, the member may receive a maximum of two years of service credit during a member's working career for those periods when a member is on unpaid leave of absence authorized by an employer. This may be done by paying the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2) prior to retirement.

(6) For the purpose of subsection (3) or (4) of this section the contribution shall not include the contribution for the unfunded supplemental present value as required by RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.061, and 41.45.067. The contributions required shall be based on the average of the member's basic salary at both the time the authorized leave of absence was granted and the time the member resumed employment.

(7) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of the United States shall be entitled to retirement system service credit for up to five years of military service. This subsection shall be administered in a manner consistent with the requirements of the federal uniformed services employment and reemployment rights act.

(a) The member qualifies for service credit under this subsection if:

(i) Within ninety days of the member's honorable discharge from the uniformed services of the United States, the member applies for reemployment with the employer who employed the member immediately prior to the member entering the uniformed services; and

(ii) The member makes the employee contributions required under RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.061, and 41.45.067 within five years of resumption of service or prior to retirement, whichever comes sooner; or

(iii) Prior to retirement and not within ninety days of the member's honorable discharge or five years of resumption of service the member pays the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2); or

(iv) Prior to retirement the member provides to the director proof that the member's interruptive military service was during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005. Any member who made payments for service credit for interruptive military service during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005 may, prior to retirement and on a form provided by the department, request a refund of the funds standing to his or her credit for up to five years of such service, and this amount shall be paid to him or her. Members with one or more periods of interruptive military service credit during a period of war may receive no more than five years of free retirement system service credit under this subsection.

(b) Upon receipt of member contributions under (a)(ii), (d)(iii), or (e)(iii) of this subsection, or adequate proof under (a)(iv), (d)(iv), or (e)(iv) of this subsection, the department shall establish the member's service credit and shall bill the employer and the state for their respective contributions required under RCW 41.26.450 for the period of military service, plus interest as determined by the department.

(c) The contributions required under (a)(ii), (d)(iii), or (e)(iii) of this subsection shall be based on the compensation the member would have earned if not on leave, or if that cannot be estimated with reasonable certainty, the compensation reported for the member in the year prior to when the member went on military leave.

(d) The surviving spouse, domestic partner, or eligible child or children of a member who left the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of the United States and died while serving in the uniformed services may, on behalf of the deceased member, apply for retirement system service credit under this subsection up to the date of the member's death in the uniformed services. The department shall establish the deceased member's service credit if the surviving spouse or eligible child or children:

(i) Provides to the director proof of the member's death while serving in the uniformed services;

(ii) Provides to the director proof of the member's honorable service in the uniformed services prior to the date of death; and

(iii) Pays the employee contributions required under chapter 41.45 RCW within five years of the date of death or prior to the distribution of any benefit, whichever comes first; or

(iv) Prior to the distribution of any benefit, provides to the director proof that the member's interruptive military service was during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005. If the deceased member made payments for service credit for interruptive military service during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005, the surviving spouse or eligible child or children may, prior to the distribution of any benefit and on a form provided by the department, request a refund of the funds standing to the deceased member's credit for up to five years of such service, and this amount shall be paid to the surviving spouse or children. Members with one or more periods of interruptive military service during a period of war may receive no more than five years of free retirement system service credit under this subsection.

(e) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of the United States and becomes totally incapacitated for continued employment by an employer while serving in the uniformed services is entitled to retirement system service credit under this subsection up to the date of discharge from the uniformed services if:

(i) The member obtains a determination from the director that he or she is totally incapacitated for continued employment due to conditions or events that occurred while serving in the uniformed services;

(ii) The member provides to the director proof of honorable discharge from the uniformed services; and

(iii) The member pays the employee contributions required under chapter 41.45 RCW within five years of the director's determination of total disability or prior to the distribution of any benefit, whichever comes first; or

(iv) Prior to retirement the member provides to the director proof that the member's interruptive military service was during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005. Any member who made payments for service credit for interruptive military service during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005 may, prior to retirement and on a form provided by the department, request a refund of the funds standing to his or her credit for up to five years of such service, and this amount shall be paid to him or her. Members with one or more periods of interruptive military service credit during a period of war may receive no more than five years of free retirement system service credit under this subsection.

(f) The surviving spouse, domestic partner, or eligible child or children of a member who left the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of the United States, federal emergency management agency, or national disaster medical system of the United States department of health and human services and died while performing service in response to a disaster, major emergency, special event, federal exercise, or official training on or after March 22, 2014, may, on behalf of the deceased member, apply for retirement system service credit under this subsection up to the date of the member's death in such service. The department shall establish the deceased member's service credit if the surviving spouse or eligible child or children provides to the director proof of the member's death while in such service.

(g) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of the United States, federal emergency management agency, or national disaster medical system of the United States department of health and human services and becomes totally incapacitated for continued employment by an employer while providing such service is entitled to retirement system service credit under this subsection up to the date of separation from such service if the member obtains a determination from the director that he or she is totally incapacitated for continued employment due to conditions or events that occurred while performing such service.

(8) A member who leaves the employ of an employer voluntarily or involuntarily due to the imposition of an employer mandate to receive a vaccination after January 1, 2020, is entitled to retirement system service credit for up to five years of service credit.

(a) The member qualifies for service credit under this subsection if:

(i)(A) Within 90 days of the member's return to retirement system-covered employment related to a vaccination mandate-related separation, the member applies for vaccination mandate service credit; and

(B) The member makes the employee contributions required under RCW 41.45.061 and 41.45.067 within five years of resumption of service or prior to retirement, whichever comes sooner; or

(ii) Prior to retirement and not within 90 days of the member's return to retirement system-covered employment related to a vaccination mandate-related separation or five years of resumption of service the member pays the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2).

(b) Upon receipt of member contributions under (a) of this subsection the department shall establish the member's service credit and shall bill the employer for its contribution required under RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.061, and 41.45.067 for the period of vaccination mandate-related separation, plus interest as determined by the department.

(c) The contributions required under (a) of this subsection shall be based on the compensation the member would have earned if no vaccination mandate-related separation had occurred, or if that cannot be estimated with reasonable certainty, the compensation reported for the member in the year prior to when the member was subject to a vaccination mandate-related separation.

(9) A member receiving benefits under Title 51 RCW who is not receiving benefits under this chapter shall be deemed to be on unpaid, authorized leave of absence.

Sec. 4. RCW 41.32.810 and 2009 c 205 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A member who is on a paid leave of absence authorized by a member's employer shall continue to receive service credit as provided for under the provisions of RCW 41.32.755 through 41.32.825.

(2) A member who receives compensation from an employer while on an authorized leave of absence to serve as an elected official of a labor organization, and whose employer is reimbursed by the labor organization for the compensation paid to the member during the period of absence, may also be considered to be on a paid leave of absence. This subsection shall only apply if the member's leave of absence is authorized by a collective bargaining agreement that provides that the member retains seniority rights with the employer during the period of leave. The earnable compensation reported for a member who establishes service credit under this subsection may not be greater than the salary paid to the highest paid job class covered by the collective bargaining agreement.

(3) Except as specified in subsection (6) of this section, a member shall be eligible to receive a maximum of two years service credit during a member's entire working career for those periods when a member is on an unpaid leave of absence authorized by an employer. Such credit may be obtained only if the member makes both the employer and member contributions plus interest as determined by the department for the period of the authorized leave of absence within five years of resumption of service or prior to retirement whichever comes sooner.

(4) If a member fails to meet the time limitations of subsection (3) of this section, the member may receive a maximum of two years of service credit during a member's working career for those periods when a member is on unpaid leave of absence authorized by an employer. This may be done by paying the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2) prior to retirement.

(5) For the purpose of subsection (3) of this section, the contribution shall not include the contribution for the unfunded supplemental present value as required by RCW 41.32.775. The contributions required shall be based on the average of the member's earnable compensation at both the time the authorized leave of absence was granted and the time the member resumed employment.

(6) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of the United States shall be entitled to retirement system service credit for up to five years of military service. This subsection shall be administered in a manner consistent with the requirements of the federal uniformed services employment and reemployment rights act.

(a) The member qualifies for service credit under this subsection if:

(i) Within ninety days of the member's honorable discharge from the uniformed services of the United States, the member applies for reemployment with the employer who employed the member immediately prior to the member entering the uniformed services; and

(ii) The member makes the employee contributions required under RCW 41.32.775 within five years of resumption of service or prior to retirement, whichever comes sooner; or

(iii) Prior to retirement and not within ninety days of the member's honorable discharge or five years of resumption of service the member pays the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2); or

(iv) Prior to retirement the member provides to the director proof that the member's interruptive military service was during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005. Any member who made payments for service credit for interruptive military service during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005 may, prior to retirement and on a form provided by the department, request a refund of the funds standing to his or her credit for up to five years of such service, and this amount shall be paid to him or her. Members with one or more periods of interruptive military service credit during a period of war may receive no more than five years of free retirement system service credit under this subsection.

(b) Upon receipt of member contributions under (a)(ii), (d)(iii), or (e)(iii) of this subsection, or adequate proof under (a)(iv), (d)(iv), or (e)(iv) of this subsection, the department shall establish the member's service credit and shall bill the employer for its contribution required under RCW 41.32.775 for the period of military service, plus interest as determined by the department.

(c) The contributions required under (a)(ii), (d)(iii), or (e)(iii) of this subsection shall be based on the compensation the member would have earned if not on leave, or if that cannot be estimated with reasonable certainty, the compensation reported for the member in the year prior to when the member went on military leave.

(d) The surviving spouse or eligible child or children of a member who left the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of the United States and died while serving in the uniformed services may, on behalf of the deceased member, apply for retirement system service credit under this subsection up to the date of the member's death in the uniformed services. The department shall establish the deceased member's service credit if the surviving spouse or eligible child or children:

(i) Provides to the director proof of the member's death while serving in the uniformed services;

(ii) Provides to the director proof of the member's honorable service in the uniformed services prior to the date of death; and

(iii) Pays the employee contributions required under chapter 41.45 RCW within five years of the date of death or prior to the distribution of any benefit, whichever comes first; or

(iv) Prior to the distribution of any benefit, provides to the director proof that the member's interruptive military service was during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005. If the deceased member made payments for service credit for interruptive military service during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005, the surviving spouse or eligible child or children may, prior to the distribution of any benefit and on a form provided by the department, request a refund of the funds standing to the deceased member's credit for up to five years of such service, and this amount shall be paid to the surviving spouse or children. Members with one or more periods of interruptive military service during a period of war may receive no more than five years of free retirement system service credit under this subsection.

(e) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of the United States and becomes totally incapacitated for continued employment by an employer while serving in the uniformed services is entitled to retirement system service credit under this subsection up to the date of discharge from the uniformed services if:

(i) The member obtains a determination from the director that he or she is totally incapacitated for continued employment due to conditions or events that occurred while serving in the uniformed services;

(ii) The member provides to the director proof of honorable discharge from the uniformed services; and

(iii) The member pays the employee contributions required under chapter 41.45 RCW within five years of the director's determination of total disability or prior to the distribution of any benefit, whichever comes first; or

(iv) Prior to retirement the member provides to the director proof that the member's interruptive military service was during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005. Any member who made payments for service credit for interruptive military service during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005 may, prior to retirement and on a form provided by the department, request a refund of the funds standing to his or her credit for up to five years of such service, and this amount shall be paid to him or her. Members with one or more periods of interruptive military service credit during a period of war may receive no more than five years of free retirement system service credit under this subsection.

(7) A member who leaves the employ of an employer voluntarily or involuntarily due to the imposition of an employer mandate to receive a vaccination after January 1, 2020, is entitled to retirement system service credit for up to five years of service credit.

(a) The member qualifies for service credit under this subsection if:

(i)(A) Within 90 days of the member's return to retirement system-covered employment related to a vaccination mandate-related separation, the member applies for vaccination mandate service credit; and

(B) The member makes the employee contributions required under RCW 41.45.061 and 41.45.067 within five years of resumption of service or prior to retirement, whichever comes sooner; or

(ii) Prior to retirement and not within 90 days of the member's return to retirement system-covered employment related to a vaccination mandate-related separation or five years of resumption of service the member pays the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2).

(b) Upon receipt of member contributions under (a) of this subsection the department shall establish the member's service credit and shall bill the employer for its contribution required under RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.061, and 41.45.067 for the period of vaccination mandate-related separation, plus interest as determined by the department.

(c) The contributions required under (a) of this subsection shall be based on the compensation the member would have earned if no vaccination mandate-related separation had occurred, or if that cannot be estimated with reasonable certainty, the compensation reported for the member in the year prior to when the member was subject to a vaccination mandate-related separation.

Sec. 5. RCW 41.32.865 and 2009 c 205 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A member who is on a paid leave of absence authorized by a member's employer shall continue to receive service credit.

(2) A member who receives compensation from an employer while on an authorized leave of absence to serve as an elected official of a labor organization, and whose employer is reimbursed by the labor organization for the compensation paid to the member during the period of absence, may also be considered to be on a paid leave of absence. This subsection shall only apply if the member's leave of absence is authorized by a collective bargaining agreement that provides that the member retains seniority rights with the employer during the period of leave. The earnable compensation reported for a member who establishes service credit under this subsection may not be greater than the salary paid to the highest paid job class covered by the collective bargaining agreement.

(3) Except as specified in subsection (4) of this section, a member shall be eligible to receive a maximum of two years service credit during a member's entire working career for those periods when a member is on an unpaid leave of absence authorized by an employer. Such credit may be obtained only if:

(a) The member makes the contribution on behalf of the employer, plus interest, as determined by the department; and

(b) The member makes the employee contribution, plus interest, as determined by the department, to the defined contribution portion.

The contributions required shall be based on the average of the member's earnable compensation at both the time the authorized leave of absence was granted and the time the member resumed employment.

(4) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of the United States shall be entitled to retirement system service credit for up to five years of military service if within ninety days of the member's honorable discharge from the uniformed services of the United States, the member applies for reemployment with the employer who employed the member immediately prior to the member entering the uniformed services. This subsection shall be administered in a manner consistent with the requirements of the federal uniformed services employment and reemployment rights act.

The department shall establish the member's service credit and shall bill the employer for its contribution required under chapter 239, Laws of 1995 for the period of military service, plus interest as determined by the department. Service credit under this subsection may be obtained only if the member makes the employee contribution to the defined contribution portion as determined by the department, or prior to retirement, the member provides to the director proof that the member's interruptive military service was during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005. Any member who made payments for service credit for interruptive military service during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005 may, prior to retirement and on a form provided by the department, request a refund of the funds standing to his or her credit for up to five years of such service, and this amount shall be paid to him or her. Members with one or more periods of interruptive military service during a period of war may receive no more than five years of free retirement system service credit under this subsection.

The contributions required shall be based on the compensation the member would have earned if not on leave, or if that cannot be estimated with reasonable certainty, the compensation reported for the member in the year prior to when the member went on military leave.

(a) The surviving spouse or eligible child or children of a member who left the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of the United States and died while serving in the uniformed services may, on behalf of the deceased member, apply for retirement system service credit under this subsection up to the date of the member's death in the uniformed services. The department shall establish the deceased member's service credit if the surviving spouse or eligible child or children:

(i) Provides to the director proof of the member's death while serving in the uniformed services;

(ii) Provides to the director proof of the member's honorable service in the uniformed services prior to the date of death; and

(iii) Pays the employee contributions required under this subsection within five years of the date of death or prior to the distribution of any benefit, whichever comes first; or

(iv) Prior to the distribution of any benefit, provides to the director proof that the member's interruptive military service was during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005. If the deceased member made payments for service credit for interruptive military service during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005, the surviving spouse or eligible child or children may, prior to the distribution of any benefit and on a form provided by the department, request a refund of the funds standing to the deceased member's credit for up to five years of such service, and this amount shall be paid to the surviving spouse or children. Members with one or more periods of interruptive military service during a period of war may receive no more than five years of free retirement system service credit under this subsection.

(b) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of the United States and becomes totally incapacitated for continued employment by an employer while serving in the uniformed services is entitled to retirement system service credit under this subsection up to the date of discharge from the uniformed services if:

(i) The member obtains a determination from the director that he or she is totally incapacitated for continued employment due to conditions or events that occurred while serving in the uniformed services;

(ii) The member provides to the director proof of honorable discharge from the uniformed services; and

(iii) The member pays the employee contributions required under this subsection within five years of the director's determination of total disability or prior to the distribution of any benefit, whichever comes first; or

(iv) Prior to retirement the member provides to the director proof that the member's interruptive military service was during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005. Any member who made payments for service credit for interruptive military service during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005 may, prior to retirement and on a form provided by the department, request a refund of the funds standing to his or her credit for up to five years of such service, and this amount shall be paid to him or her. Members with one or more periods of interruptive military service during a period of war may receive no more than five years of free retirement system service credit under this subsection.

(5) A member who leaves the employ of an employer voluntarily or involuntarily due to the imposition of an employer mandate to receive a vaccination after January 1, 2020, is entitled to retirement system service credit for up to five years of service credit.

(a) The member qualifies for service credit under this subsection if:

(i)(A) Within 90 days of the member's return to retirement system-covered employment related to a vaccination mandate-related separation, the member applies for vaccination mandate service credit; and

(B) The member makes the employee contributions required under RCW 41.45.061 and 41.45.067 within five years of resumption of service or prior to retirement, whichever comes sooner; or

(ii) Prior to retirement and not within 90 days of the member's return to retirement system-covered employment related to a vaccination mandate-related separation or five years of resumption of service the member pays the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2).

(b) Upon receipt of member contributions under (a) of this subsection the department shall establish the member's service credit and shall bill the employer for its contribution required under RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.061, and 41.45.067 for the period of vaccination mandate-related separation, plus interest as determined by the department.

(c) The contributions required under (a) of this subsection shall be based on the compensation the member would have earned if no vaccination mandate-related separation had occurred, or if that cannot be estimated with reasonable certainty, the compensation reported for the member in the year prior to when the member was subject to a vaccination mandate-related separation.

Sec. 6. RCW 41.35.470 and 2009 c 205 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A member who is on a paid leave of absence authorized by a member's employer shall continue to receive service credit as provided for under the provisions of RCW 41.35.400 through 41.35.599.

(2) A member who receives compensation from an employer while on an authorized leave of absence to serve as an elected official of a labor organization, and whose employer is reimbursed by the labor organization for the compensation paid to the member during the period of absence, may also be considered to be on a paid leave of absence. This subsection shall only apply if the member's leave of absence is authorized by a collective bargaining agreement that provides that the member retains seniority rights with the employer during the period of leave. The compensation earnable reported for a member who establishes service credit under this subsection may not be greater than the salary paid to the highest paid job class covered by the collective bargaining agreement.

(3) Except as specified in subsection (4) of this section, a member shall be eligible to receive a maximum of two years service credit during a member's entire working career for those periods when a member is on an unpaid leave of absence authorized by an employer. Such credit may be obtained only if:

(a) The member makes both the plan 2 employer and member contributions plus interest as determined by the department for the period of the authorized leave of absence within five years of resumption of service or prior to retirement whichever comes sooner; or

(b) If not within five years of resumption of service but prior to retirement, pay the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2).

The contributions required under (a) of this subsection shall be based on the average of the member's compensation earnable at both the time the authorized leave of absence was granted and the time the member resumed employment.

(4) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of the United States shall be entitled to retirement system service credit for up to five years of military service. This subsection shall be administered in a manner consistent with the requirements of the federal uniformed services employment and reemployment rights act.

(a) The member qualifies for service credit under this subsection if:

(i) Within ninety days of the member's honorable discharge from the uniformed services of the United States, the member applies for reemployment with the employer who employed the member immediately prior to the member entering the uniformed services; and

(ii) The member makes the employee contributions required under RCW 41.35.430 within five years of resumption of service or prior to retirement, whichever comes sooner; or

(iii) Prior to retirement and not within ninety days of the member's honorable discharge or five years of resumption of service the member pays the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2); or

(iv) Prior to retirement the member provides to the director proof that the member's interruptive military service was during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005. Any member who made payments for service credit for interruptive military service during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005 may, prior to retirement and on a form provided by the department, request a refund of the funds standing to his or her credit for up to five years of such service, and this amount shall be paid to him or her. Members with one or more periods of interruptive military service credit during a period of war may receive no more than five years of free retirement system service credit under this subsection.

(b) Upon receipt of member contributions under (a)(ii), (d)(iii), or (e)(iii) of this subsection, or adequate proof under (a)(iv), (d)(iv), or (e)(iv) of this subsection, the department shall establish the member's service credit and shall bill the employer for its contribution required under RCW 41.35.430 for the period of military service, plus interest as determined by the department.

(c) The contributions required under (a)(ii), (d)(iii), or (e)(iii) of this subsection shall be based on the compensation the member would have earned if not on leave, or if that cannot be estimated with reasonable certainty, the compensation reported for the member in the year prior to when the member went on military leave.

(d) The surviving spouse or eligible child or children of a member who left the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of the United States and died while serving in the uniformed services may, on behalf of the deceased member, apply for retirement system service credit under this subsection up to the date of the member's death in the uniformed services. The department shall establish the deceased member's service credit if the surviving spouse or eligible child or children:

(i) Provides to the director proof of the member's death while serving in the uniformed services;

(ii) Provides to the director proof of the member's honorable service in the uniformed services prior to the date of death; and

(iii) Pays the employee contributions required under chapter 41.45 RCW within five years of the date of death or prior to the distribution of any benefit, whichever comes first; or

(iv) Prior to the distribution of any benefit, provides to the director proof that the member's interruptive military service was during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005. If the deceased member made payments for service credit for interruptive military service during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005, the surviving spouse or eligible child or children may, prior to the distribution of any benefit and on a form provided by the department, request a refund of the funds standing to the deceased member's credit for up to five years of such service, and this amount shall be paid to the surviving spouse or children. Members with one or more periods of interruptive military service during a period of war may receive no more than five years of free retirement system service credit under this subsection.

(e) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of the United States and becomes totally incapacitated for continued employment by an employer while serving in the uniformed services is entitled to retirement system service credit under this subsection up to the date of discharge from the uniformed services if:

(i) The member obtains a determination from the director that he or she is totally incapacitated for continued employment due to conditions or events that occurred while serving in the uniformed services;

(ii) The member provides to the director proof of honorable discharge from the uniformed services; and

(iii) The member pays the employee contributions required under chapter 41.45 RCW within five years of the director's determination of total disability or prior to the distribution of any benefit, whichever comes first; or

(iv) Prior to retirement the member provides to the director proof that the member's interruptive military service was during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005. Any member who made payments for service credit for interruptive military service during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005 may, prior to retirement and on a form provided by the department, request a refund of the funds standing to his or her credit for up to five years of such service, and this amount shall be paid to him or her. Members with one or more periods of interruptive military service credit during a period of war may receive no more than five years of free retirement system service credit under this subsection.

(5) A member who leaves the employ of an employer voluntarily or involuntarily due to the imposition of an employer mandate to receive a vaccination after January 1, 2020, is entitled to retirement system service credit for up to five years of service credit.

(a) The member qualifies for service credit under this subsection if:

(i)(A) Within 90 days of the member's return to retirement system-covered employment related to a vaccination mandate-related separation, the member applies for vaccination mandate service credit; and

(B) The member makes the employee contributions required under RCW 41.45.061 and 41.45.067 within five years of resumption of service or prior to retirement, whichever comes sooner; or

(ii) Prior to retirement and not within 90 days of the member's return to retirement system-covered employment related to a vaccination mandate-related separation or five years of resumption of service the member pays the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2).

(b) Upon receipt of member contributions under (a) of this subsection the department shall establish the member's service credit and shall bill the employer for its contribution required under RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.061, and 41.45.067 for the period of vaccination mandate-related separation, plus interest as determined by the department.

(c) The contributions required under (a) of this subsection shall be based on the compensation the member would have earned if no vaccination mandate-related separation had occurred, or if that cannot be estimated with reasonable certainty, the compensation reported for the member in the year prior to when the member was subject to a vaccination mandate-related separation.

Sec. 7. RCW 41.35.650 and 2009 c 205 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A member who is on a paid leave of absence authorized by a member's employer shall continue to receive service credit.

(2) A member who receives compensation from an employer while on an authorized leave of absence to serve as an elected official of a labor organization, and whose employer is reimbursed by the labor organization for the compensation paid to the member during the period of absence, may also be considered to be on a paid leave of absence. This subsection shall only apply if the member's leave of absence is authorized by a collective bargaining agreement that provides that the member retains seniority rights with the employer during the period of leave. The earnable compensation reported for a member who establishes service credit under this subsection may not be greater than the salary paid to the highest paid job class covered by the collective bargaining agreement.

(3) Except as specified in subsection (4) of this section, a member shall be eligible to receive a maximum of two years service credit during a member's entire working career for those periods when a member is on an unpaid leave of absence authorized by an employer. Such credit may be obtained only if:

(a) The member makes the contribution on behalf of the employer, plus interest, as determined by the department; and

(b) The member makes the employee contribution, plus interest, as determined by the department, to the defined contribution portion.

The contributions required shall be based on the average of the member's earnable compensation at both the time the authorized leave of absence was granted and the time the member resumed employment.

(4) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of the United States shall be entitled to retirement system service credit for up to five years of military service if within ninety days of the member's honorable discharge from the uniformed services of the United States, the member applies for reemployment with the employer who employed the member immediately prior to the member entering the uniformed services. This subsection shall be administered in a manner consistent with the requirements of the federal uniformed services employment and reemployment rights act.

The department shall establish the member's service credit and shall bill the employer for its contribution required under RCW 41.35.720 for the period of military service, plus interest as determined by the department. Service credit under this subsection may be obtained only if the member makes the employee contribution to the defined contribution portion as determined by the department, or prior to retirement, the member provides to the director proof that the member's interruptive military service was during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005. Any member who made payments for service credit for interruptive military service during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005 may, prior to retirement and on a form provided by the department, request a refund of the funds standing to his or her credit for up to five years of such service, and this amount shall be paid to him or her. Members with one or more periods of interruptive military service during a period of war may receive no more than five years of free retirement system service credit under this subsection.

The contributions required shall be based on the compensation the member would have earned if not on leave, or if that cannot be estimated with reasonable certainty, the compensation reported for the member in the year prior to when the member went on military leave.

(a) The surviving spouse or eligible child or children of a member who left the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of the United States and died while serving in the uniformed services may, on behalf of the deceased member, apply for retirement system service credit under this subsection up to the date of the member's death in the uniformed services. The department shall establish the deceased member's service credit if the surviving spouse or eligible child or children:

(i) Provides to the director proof of the member's death while serving in the uniformed services;

(ii) Provides to the director proof of the member's honorable service in the uniformed services prior to the date of death; and

(iii) Pays the employee contributions required under this subsection within five years of the date of death or prior to the distribution of any benefit, whichever comes first; or

(iv) Prior to the distribution of any benefit, provides to the director proof that the member's interruptive military service was during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005. If the deceased member made payments for service credit for interruptive military service during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005, the surviving spouse or eligible child or children may, prior to the distribution of any benefit and on a form provided by the department, request a refund of the funds standing to the deceased member's credit for up to five years of such service, and this amount shall be paid to the surviving spouse or children. Members with one or more periods of interruptive military service during a period of war may receive no more than five years of free retirement system service credit under this subsection.

(b) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of the United States and becomes totally incapacitated for continued employment by an employer while serving in the uniformed services is entitled to retirement system service credit under this subsection up to the date of discharge from the uniformed services if:

(i) The member obtains a determination from the director that he or she is totally incapacitated for continued employment due to conditions or events that occurred while serving in the uniformed services;

(ii) The member provides to the director proof of honorable discharge from the uniformed services; and

(iii) The member pays the employee contributions required under this subsection within five years of the director's determination of total disability or prior to the distribution of any benefit, whichever comes first; or

(iv) Prior to retirement the member provides to the director proof that the member's interruptive military service was during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005. Any member who made payments for service credit for interruptive military service during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005 may, prior to retirement and on a form provided by the department, request a refund of the funds standing to his or her credit for up to five years of such service, and this amount shall be paid to him or her. Members with one or more periods of interruptive military service credit during a period of war may receive no more than five years of free retirement system service credit under this subsection.

(5) A member who leaves the employ of an employer voluntarily or involuntarily due to the imposition of an employer mandate to receive a vaccination after January 1, 2020, is entitled to retirement system service credit for up to five years of service credit.

(a) The member qualifies for service credit under this subsection if:

(i)(A) Within 90 days of the member's return to retirement system-covered employment related to a vaccination mandate-related separation, the member applies for vaccination mandate service credit; and

(B) The member makes the employee contributions required under RCW 41.45.061 and 41.45.067 within five years of resumption of service or prior to retirement, whichever comes sooner; or

(ii) Prior to retirement and not within 90 days of the member's return to retirement system-covered employment related to a vaccination mandate-related separation or five years of resumption of service the member pays the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2).

(b) Upon receipt of member contributions under (a) of this subsection the department shall establish the member's service credit and shall bill the employer for its contribution required under RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.061, and 41.45.067 for the period of vaccination mandate-related separation, plus interest as determined by the department.

(c) The contributions required under (a) of this subsection shall be based on the compensation the member would have earned if no vaccination mandate-related separation had occurred, or if that cannot be estimated with reasonable certainty, the compensation reported for the member in the year prior to when the member was subject to a vaccination mandate-related separation.

Sec. 8. RCW 41.37.260 and 2009 c 205 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A member who is on a paid leave of absence authorized by a member's employer shall continue to receive service credit as provided for under RCW 41.37.190 through 41.37.290.

(2) A member who receives compensation from an employer while on an authorized leave of absence to serve as an elected official of a labor organization, and whose employer is reimbursed by the labor organization for the compensation paid to the member during the period of absence, may also be considered to be on a paid leave of absence. This subsection shall only apply if the member's leave of absence is authorized by a collective bargaining agreement that provides that the member retains seniority rights with the employer during the period of leave. The compensation earnable reported for a member who establishes service credit under this subsection may not be greater than the salary paid to the highest paid job class covered by the collective bargaining agreement.

(3) Except as specified in subsection (4) of this section, a member shall be eligible to receive a maximum of two years service credit during a member's entire working career for those periods when a member is on an unpaid leave of absence authorized by an employer. This credit may be obtained only if:

(a) The member makes both the employer and member contributions plus interest as determined by the department for the period of the authorized leave of absence within five years of resumption of service or prior to retirement whichever comes sooner; or

(b) If not within five years of resumption of service but prior to retirement, pay the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2).

The contributions required under (a) of this subsection shall be based on the average of the member's compensation earnable at both the time the authorized leave of absence was granted and the time the member resumed employment.

(4) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of the United States shall be entitled to retirement system service credit for up to five years of military service. This subsection shall be administered in a manner consistent with the requirements of the federal uniformed services employment and reemployment rights act.

(a) The member qualifies for service credit under this subsection if:

(i) Within ninety days of the member's honorable discharge from the uniformed services of the United States, the member applies for reemployment with the employer who employed the member immediately prior to the member entering the uniformed services; and

(ii) The member makes the employee contributions required under RCW 41.37.220 within five years of resumption of service or prior to retirement, whichever comes sooner; or

(iii) Prior to retirement and not within ninety days of the member's honorable discharge or five years of resumption of service the member pays the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2); or

(iv) Prior to retirement the member provides to the director proof that the member's interruptive military service was during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005. Any member who made payments for service credit for interruptive military service during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005 may, prior to retirement and on a form provided by the department, request a refund of the funds standing to his or her credit for up to five years of such service, and this amount shall be paid to him or her. Members with one or more periods of interruptive military service credit during a period of war may receive no more than five years of free retirement system service credit under this subsection.

(b) Upon receipt of member contributions under (a)(ii), (d)(iii), or (e)(iii) of this subsection, or adequate proof under (a)(iv), (d)(iv), or (e)(iv) of this subsection, the department shall establish the member's service credit and shall bill the employer for its contribution required under RCW 41.37.220 for the period of military service, plus interest as determined by the department.

(c) The contributions required under (a)(ii), (d)(iii), or (e)(iii) of this subsection shall be based on the compensation the member would have earned if not on leave, or if that cannot be estimated with reasonable certainty, the compensation reported for the member in the year prior to when the member went on military leave.

(d) The surviving spouse or eligible child or children of a member who left the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of the United States and died while serving in the uniformed services may, on behalf of the deceased member, apply for retirement system service credit under this subsection up to the date of the member's death in the uniformed services. The department shall establish the deceased member's service credit if the surviving spouse or eligible child or children:

(i) Provides to the director proof of the member's death while serving in the uniformed services;

(ii) Provides to the director proof of the member's honorable service in the uniformed services prior to the date of death; and

(iii) Pays the employee contributions required under chapter 41.45 RCW within five years of the date of death or prior to the distribution of any benefit, whichever comes first; or

(iv) Prior to the distribution of any benefit, provides to the director proof that the member's interruptive military service was during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005. If the deceased member made payments for service credit for interruptive military service during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005, the surviving spouse or eligible child or children may, prior to the distribution of any benefit and on a form provided by the department, request a refund of the funds standing to the deceased member's credit for up to five years of such service, and this amount shall be paid to the surviving spouse or children. Members with one or more periods of interruptive military service during a period of war may receive no more than five years of free retirement system service credit under this subsection.

(e) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of the United States and becomes totally incapacitated for continued employment by an employer while serving in the uniformed services is entitled to retirement system service credit under this subsection up to the date of discharge from the uniformed services if:

(i) The member obtains a determination from the director that he or she is totally incapacitated for continued employment due to conditions or events that occurred while serving in the uniformed services;

(ii) The member provides to the director proof of honorable discharge from the uniformed services; and

(iii) The member pays the employee contributions required under chapter 41.45 RCW within five years of the director's determination of total disability or prior to the distribution of any benefit, whichever comes first; or

(iv) Prior to retirement the member provides to the director proof that the member's interruptive military service was during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005. Any member who made payments for service credit for interruptive military service during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005 may, prior to retirement and on a form provided by the department, request a refund of the funds standing to his or her credit for up to five years of such service, and this amount shall be paid to him or her. Members with one or more periods of interruptive military service credit during a period of war may receive no more than five years of free retirement system service credit under this subsection.

(5) A member who leaves the employ of an employer voluntarily or involuntarily due to the imposition of an employer mandate to receive a vaccination after January 1, 2020, is entitled to retirement system service credit for up to five years of service credit.

(a) The member qualifies for service credit under this subsection if:

(i)(A) Within 90 days of the member's return to retirement system-covered employment related to a vaccination mandate-related separation, the member applies for vaccination mandate service credit; and

(B) The member makes the employee contributions required under RCW 41.45.061 and 41.45.067 within five years of resumption of service or prior to retirement, whichever comes sooner; or

(ii) Prior to retirement and not within 90 days of the member's return to retirement system-covered employment related to a vaccination mandate-related separation or five years of resumption of service the member pays the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2).

(b) Upon receipt of member contributions under (a) of this subsection the department shall establish the member's service credit and shall bill the employer for its contribution required under RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.061, and 41.45.067 for the period of vaccination mandate-related separation, plus interest as determined by the department.

(c) The contributions required under (a) of this subsection shall be based on the compensation the member would have earned if no vaccination mandate-related separation had occurred, or if that cannot be estimated with reasonable certainty, the compensation reported for the member in the year prior to when the member was subject to a vaccination mandate-related separation.

Sec. 9. RCW 41.40.710 and 2009 c 205 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A member who is on a paid leave of absence authorized by a member's employer shall continue to receive service credit as provided for under the provisions of RCW 41.40.610 through 41.40.740.

(2) A member who receives compensation from an employer while on an authorized leave of absence to serve as an elected official of a labor organization, and whose employer is reimbursed by the labor organization for the compensation paid to the member during the period of absence, may also be considered to be on a paid leave of absence. This subsection shall only apply if the member's leave of absence is authorized by a collective bargaining agreement that provides that the member retains seniority rights with the employer during the period of leave. The compensation earnable reported for a member who establishes service credit under this subsection may not be greater than the salary paid to the highest paid job class covered by the collective bargaining agreement.

(3) Except as specified in subsection (4) of this section, a member shall be eligible to receive a maximum of two years service credit during a member's entire working career for those periods when a member is on an unpaid leave of absence authorized by an employer. Such credit may be obtained only if:

(a) The member makes both the plan 2 employer and member contributions plus interest as determined by the department for the period of the authorized leave of absence within five years of resumption of service or prior to retirement whichever comes sooner; or

(b) If not within five years of resumption of service but prior to retirement, pay the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2).

The contributions required under (a) of this subsection shall be based on the average of the member's compensation earnable at both the time the authorized leave of absence was granted and the time the member resumed employment.

(4) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of the United States shall be entitled to retirement system service credit for up to five years of military service. This subsection shall be administered in a manner consistent with the requirements of the federal uniformed services employment and reemployment rights act.

(a) The member qualifies for service credit under this subsection if:

(i) Within ninety days of the member's honorable discharge from the uniformed services of the United States, the member applies for reemployment with the employer who employed the member immediately prior to the member entering the uniformed services; and

(ii) The member makes the employee contributions required under RCW 41.45.061 and 41.45.067 within five years of resumption of service or prior to retirement, whichever comes sooner; or

(iii) Prior to retirement and not within ninety days of the member's honorable discharge or five years of resumption of service the member pays the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2); or

(iv) Prior to retirement the member provides to the director proof that the member's interruptive military service was during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005. Any member who made payments for service credit for interruptive military service in a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005 may, prior to retirement and on a form provided by the department, request a refund of the funds standing to his or her credit for up to five years of such service, and this amount shall be paid to him or her. Members with one or more periods of interruptive military service during a period of war may receive no more than five years of free retirement system service credit under this subsection.

(b) Upon receipt of member contributions under (a)(ii), (d)(iii), or (e)(iii) of this subsection, or adequate proof under (a)(iv), (d)(iv), or (e)(iv) of this subsection, the department shall establish the member's service credit and shall bill the employer for its contribution required under RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.061, and 41.45.067 for the period of military service, plus interest as determined by the department.

(c) The contributions required under (a)(ii), (d)(iii), or (e)(iii) of this subsection shall be based on the compensation the member would have earned if not on leave, or if that cannot be estimated with reasonable certainty, the compensation reported for the member in the year prior to when the member went on military leave.

(d) The surviving spouse or eligible child or children of a member who left the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of the United States and died while serving in the uniformed services may, on behalf of the deceased member, apply for retirement system service credit under this subsection up to the date of the member's death in the uniformed services. The department shall establish the deceased member's service credit if the surviving spouse or eligible child or children:

(i) Provides to the director proof of the member's death while serving in the uniformed services;

(ii) Provides to the director proof of the member's honorable service in the uniformed services prior to the date of death; and

(iii) Pays the employee contributions required under chapter 41.45 RCW within five years of the date of death or prior to the distribution of any benefit, whichever comes first; or

(iv) Prior to the distribution of any benefit, provides to the director proof that the member's interruptive military service was during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005. If the deceased member made payments for service credit for interruptive military service during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005, the surviving spouse or eligible child or children may, prior to the distribution of any benefit and on a form provided by the department, request a refund of the funds standing to the deceased member's credit for up to five years of such service, and this amount shall be paid to the surviving spouse or eligible child or children. Members with one or more periods of interruptive military service during a period of war may receive no more than five years of free retirement system service credit under this subsection.

(e) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of the United States and becomes totally incapacitated for continued employment by an employer while serving in the uniformed services is entitled to retirement system service credit under this subsection up to the date of discharge from the uniformed services if:

(i) The member obtains a determination from the director that he or she is totally incapacitated for continued employment due to conditions or events that occurred while serving in the uniformed services;

(ii) The member provides to the director proof of honorable discharge from the uniformed services; and

(iii) The member pays the employee contributions required under chapter 41.45 RCW within five years of the director's determination of total disability or prior to the distribution of any benefit, whichever comes first; or

(iv) Prior to retirement the member provides to the director proof that the member's interruptive military service was during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005. Any member who made payments for service credit for interruptive military service during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005 may, prior to retirement and on a form provided by the department, request a refund of the funds standing to his or her credit for up to five years of such service, and this amount shall be paid to him or her. Members with one or more periods of interruptive military service credit during a period of war may receive no more than five years of free retirement system service credit under this subsection.

(5) A member who leaves the employ of an employer voluntarily or involuntarily due to the imposition of an employer mandate to receive a vaccination after January 1, 2020, is entitled to retirement system service credit for up to five years of service credit.

(a) The member qualifies for service credit under this subsection if:

(i)(A) Within 90 days of the member's return to retirement system-covered employment related to a vaccination mandate-related separation, the member applies for vaccination mandate service credit; and

(B) The member makes the employee contributions required under RCW 41.45.061 and 41.45.067 within five years of resumption of service or prior to retirement, whichever comes sooner; or

(ii) Prior to retirement and not within 90 days of the member's return to retirement system-covered employment related to a vaccination mandate-related separation or five years of resumption of service the member pays the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2).

(b) Upon receipt of member contributions under (a) of this subsection the department shall establish the member's service credit and shall bill the employer for its contribution required under RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.061, and 41.45.067 for the period of vaccination mandate-related separation, plus interest as determined by the department.

(c) The contributions required under (a) of this subsection shall be based on the compensation the member would have earned if no vaccination mandate-related separation had occurred, or if that cannot be estimated with reasonable certainty, the compensation reported for the member in the year prior to when the member was subject to a vaccination mandate-related separation.

Sec. 10. RCW 41.40.805 and 2009 c 205 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A member who is on a paid leave of absence authorized by a member's employer shall continue to receive service credit.

(2) A member who receives compensation from an employer while on an authorized leave of absence to serve as an elected official of a labor organization, and whose employer is reimbursed by the labor organization for the compensation paid to the member during the period of absence, may also be considered to be on a paid leave of absence. This subsection shall only apply if the member's leave of absence is authorized by a collective bargaining agreement that provides that the member retains seniority rights with the employer during the period of leave. The earnable compensation reported for a member who establishes service credit under this subsection may not be greater than the salary paid to the highest paid job class covered by the collective bargaining agreement.

(3) Except as specified in subsection (4) of this section, a member shall be eligible to receive a maximum of two years service credit during a member's entire working career for those periods when a member is on an unpaid leave of absence authorized by an employer. Such credit may be obtained only if:

(a) The member makes the contribution on behalf of the employer, plus interest, as determined by the department; and

(b) The member makes the employee contribution, plus interest, as determined by the department, to the defined contribution portion.

The contributions required shall be based on the average of the member's earnable compensation at both the time the authorized leave of absence was granted and the time the member resumed employment.

(4) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of the United States shall be entitled to retirement system service credit for up to five years of military service if within ninety days of the member's honorable discharge from the uniformed services of the United States, the member applies for reemployment with the employer who employed the member immediately prior to the member entering the uniformed services. This subsection shall be administered in a manner consistent with the requirements of the federal uniformed services employment and reemployment rights act.

The department shall establish the member's service credit and shall bill the employer for its contribution required under RCW 41.45.060 and 41.45.067 for the period of military service, plus interest as determined by the department. Service credit under this subsection may be obtained only if the member makes the employee contribution to the defined contribution portion as determined by the department, or prior to retirement, the member provides to the director proof that the member's interruptive military service was during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005. Any member who made payments for service credit for interruptive military service during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005 may, prior to retirement and on a form provided by the department, request a refund of the funds standing to his or her credit for up to five years of such service, and this amount shall be paid to him or her. Members with one or more periods of interruptive military service during a period of war may receive no more than five years of free retirement system service credit under this subsection.

The contributions required shall be based on the compensation the member would have earned if not on leave, or if that cannot be estimated with reasonable certainty, the compensation reported for the member in the year prior to when the member went on military leave.

(a) The surviving spouse or eligible child or children of a member who left the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of the United States and died while serving in the uniformed services may, on behalf of the deceased member, apply for retirement system service credit under this subsection up to the date of the member's death in the uniformed services. The department shall establish the deceased member's service credit if the surviving spouse or eligible child or children:

(i) Provides to the director proof of the member's death while serving in the uniformed services;

(ii) Provides to the director proof of the member's honorable service in the uniformed services prior to the date of death; and

(iii) Pays the employee contributions required under this subsection within five years of the date of death or prior to the distribution of any benefit, whichever comes first; or

(iv) Prior to the distribution of any benefit, provides to the director proof that the member's interruptive military service was during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005. If the deceased member made payments for service credit for interruptive military service during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005, the surviving spouse or eligible child or children may, prior to the distribution of any benefit and on a form provided by the department, request a refund of the funds standing to the deceased member's credit for up to five years of such service, and this amount shall be paid to the surviving spouse or children. Members with one or more periods of interruptive military service during a period of war may receive no more than five years of free retirement system service credit under this subsection.

(b) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of the United States and becomes totally incapacitated for continued employment by an employer while serving in the uniformed services is entitled to retirement system service credit under this subsection up to the date of discharge from the uniformed services if:

(i) The member obtains a determination from the director that he or she is totally incapacitated for continued employment due to conditions or events that occurred while serving in the uniformed services;

(ii) The member provides to the director proof of honorable discharge from the uniformed services; and

(iii) The member pays the employee contributions required under this subsection within five years of the director's determination of total disability or prior to the distribution of any benefit, whichever comes first; or

(iv) Prior to retirement the member provides to the director proof that the member's interruptive military service was during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005. Any member who made payments for service credit for interruptive military service during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005 may, prior to retirement and on a form provided by the department, request a refund of the funds standing to his or her credit for up to five years of such service, and this amount shall be paid to him or her. Members with one or more periods of interruptive military service credit during a period of war may receive no more than five years of free retirement system service credit under this subsection.

(5) A member who leaves the employ of an employer voluntarily or involuntarily due to the imposition of an employer mandate to receive a vaccination after January 1, 2020, is entitled to retirement system service credit for up to five years of service credit.

(a) The member qualifies for service credit under this subsection if:

(i)(A) Within 90 days of the member's return to retirement system-covered employment related to a vaccination mandate-related separation, the member applies for vaccination mandate service credit; and

(B) The member makes the employee contributions required under RCW 41.45.061 and 41.45.067 within five years of resumption of service or prior to retirement, whichever comes sooner; or

(ii) Prior to retirement and not within 90 days of the member's return to retirement system-covered employment related to a vaccination mandate-related separation or five years of resumption of service the member pays the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2).

(b) Upon receipt of member contributions under (a) of this subsection the department shall establish the member's service credit and shall bill the employer for its contribution required under RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.061, and 41.45.067 for the period of vaccination mandate-related separation, plus interest as determined by the department.

(c) The contributions required under (a) of this subsection shall be based on the compensation the member would have earned if no vaccination mandate-related separation had occurred, or if that cannot be estimated with reasonable certainty, the compensation reported for the member in the year prior to when the member was subject to a vaccination mandate-related separation.

Sec. 11. RCW 43.43.260 and 2021 c 98 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon retirement from service as provided in RCW 43.43.250, a member shall be granted a retirement allowance which shall consist of:

(1) A prior service allowance which shall be equal to two percent of the member's average final salary multiplied by the number of years of prior service rendered by the member.

(2) A current service allowance which shall be equal to two percent of the member's average final salary multiplied by the number of years of service rendered while a member of the retirement system.

(3)(a) Any member commissioned prior to January 1, 2003, with twenty-five years service in the Washington state patrol may have the member's service in the uniformed services credited as a member whether or not the individual left the employ of the Washington state patrol to enter such uniformed services: PROVIDED, That in no instance shall military service in excess of five years be credited: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That in each instance, a member must restore all withdrawn accumulated contributions, which restoration must be completed on the date of the member's retirement, or as provided under RCW 43.43.130, whichever occurs first: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That this section shall not apply to any individual, not a veteran within the meaning of RCW 41.06.150.

(b) A member who leaves the Washington state patrol to enter the uniformed services of the United States shall be entitled to retirement system service credit for up to five years of military service. This subsection shall be administered in a manner consistent with the requirements of the federal uniformed services employment and reemployment rights act.

(i) The member qualifies for service credit under this subsection if:

(A) Within ninety days of the member's honorable discharge from the uniformed services of the United States, the member applies for reemployment with the employer who employed the member immediately prior to the member entering the uniformed services; and

(B) The member makes the employee contributions required under RCW 41.45.0631 and 41.45.067 within five years of resumption of service or prior to retirement, whichever comes sooner; or

(C) Prior to retirement and not within ninety days of the member's honorable discharge or five years of resumption of service the member pays the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2); or

(D) If the member was commissioned on or after January 1, 2003, and, prior to retirement, the member provides to the director proof that the member's interruptive military service was during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005. Any member who made payments for service credit for interruptive military service during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005 may, prior to retirement and on a form provided by the department, request a refund of the funds standing to his or her credit for up to five years of such service, and this amount shall be paid to him or her. Members with one or more periods of interruptive military service credit during a period of war may receive no more than five years of free retirement system service credit under this subsection.

(ii) Upon receipt of member contributions under (b)(i)(B), (b)(iv)(C), and (b)(v)(C) of this subsection, or adequate proof under (b)(i)(D), (b)(iv)(D), or (b)(v)(D) of this subsection, the department shall establish the member's service credit and shall bill the employer for its contribution required under RCW 41.45.060 for the period of military service, plus interest as determined by the department.

(iii) The contributions required under (b)(i)(B), (b)(iv)(C), and (b)(v)(C) of this subsection shall be based on the compensation the member would have earned if not on leave, or if that cannot be estimated with reasonable certainty, the compensation reported for the member in the year prior to when the member went on military leave.

(iv) The surviving spouse or lawful domestic partner or eligible child or children of a member who left the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of the United States and died while serving in the uniformed services may, on behalf of the deceased member, apply for retirement system service credit under this subsection up to the date of the member's death in the uniformed services. The department shall establish the deceased member's service credit if the surviving spouse or lawful domestic partner or eligible child or children:

(A) Provides to the director proof of the member's death while serving in the uniformed services;

(B) Provides to the director proof of the member's honorable service in the uniformed services prior to the date of death; and

(C) If the member was commissioned on or after January 1, 2003, pays the employee contributions required under chapter 41.45 RCW within five years of the date of death or prior to the distribution of any benefit, whichever comes first; or

(D) If the member was commissioned on or after January 1, 2003, and, prior to the distribution of any benefit, provides to the director proof that the member's interruptive military service was during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005. If the deceased member made payments for service credit for interruptive military service during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005, the surviving spouse or eligible child or children may, prior to the distribution of any benefit and on a form provided by the department, request a refund of the funds standing to the deceased member's credit for up to five years of such service, and this amount shall be paid to the surviving spouse or children. Members with one or more periods of interruptive military service during a period of war may receive no more than five years of free retirement system service credit under this subsection.

(v) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of the United States and becomes totally incapacitated for continued employment by an employer while serving in the uniformed services is entitled to retirement system service credit under this subsection up to the date of discharge from the uniformed services if:

(A) The member obtains a determination from the director that he or she is totally incapacitated for continued employment due to conditions or events that occurred while serving in the uniformed services;

(B) The member provides to the director proof of honorable discharge from the uniformed services; and

(C) If the member was commissioned on or after January 1, 2003, the member pays the employee contributions required under chapter 41.45 RCW within five years of the director's determination of total disability or prior to the distribution of any benefit, whichever comes first; or

(D) If the member was commissioned on or after January 1, 2003, and, prior to retirement, the member provides to the director proof that the member's interruptive military service was during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005. Any member who made payments for service credit for interruptive military service during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005 may, prior to retirement and on a form provided by the department, request a refund of the funds standing to his or her credit for up to five years of such service, and this amount shall be paid to him or her. Members with one or more periods of interruptive military service during a period of war may receive no more than five years of free retirement system service credit under this subsection.

(4) A member who leaves the employ of an employer voluntarily or involuntarily due to the imposition of an employer mandate to receive a vaccination after January 1, 2020, is entitled to retirement system service credit for up to five years of service credit.

(a) The member qualifies for service credit under this subsection if:

(i)(A) Within 90 days of the member's return to retirement system-covered employment related to a vaccination mandate-related separation, the member applies for vaccination mandate service credit; and

(B) The member makes the employee contributions required under RCW 41.45.061 and 41.45.067 within five years of resumption of service or prior to retirement, whichever comes sooner; or

(ii) Prior to retirement and not within 90 days of the member's return to retirement system-covered employment related to a vaccination mandate-related separation or five years of resumption of service the member pays the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2).

(b) Upon receipt of member contributions under (a) of this subsection the department shall establish the member's service credit and shall bill the employer for its contribution required under RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.061, and 41.45.067 for the period of vaccination mandate-related separation, plus interest as determined by the department.

(c) The contributions required under (a) of this subsection shall be based on the compensation the member would have earned if no vaccination mandate-related separation had occurred, or if that cannot be estimated with reasonable certainty, the compensation reported for the member in the year prior to when the member was subject to a vaccination mandate-related separation.

(5) In no event shall the total retirement benefits from subsections (1), (2), ((and)) (3), and (4) of this section, of any member exceed seventy-five percent of the member's average final salary.

(((5)))(6) Beginning July 1, 2001, and every year thereafter, the department shall determine the following information for each retired member or beneficiary whose retirement allowance has been in effect for at least one year:

(a) The original dollar amount of the retirement allowance;

(b) The index for the calendar year prior to the effective date of the retirement allowance, to be known as "index A";

(c) The index for the calendar year prior to the date of determination, to be known as "index B"; and

(d) The ratio obtained when index B is divided by index A.

The value of the ratio obtained shall be the annual adjustment to the original retirement allowance and shall be applied beginning with the July payment. In no event, however, shall the annual adjustment:

(i) Produce a retirement allowance which is lower than the original retirement allowance;

(ii) Exceed three percent in the initial annual adjustment; or

(iii) Differ from the previous year's annual adjustment by more than three percent.

For the purposes of this section, "index" means, for any calendar year, that year's average consumer price index for the Seattle, Washington area for urban wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor.

The provisions of this section shall apply to all members presently retired and to all members who shall retire in the future.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---