BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. Washington has been a leader in K-12 arts education by being one of the first states to adopt arts graduation requirements and state policy requiring students have access to arts instruction and courses by appropriately endorsed certificated educators.

The legislature recognizes the value and benefit of music education for students' academic, cognitive, and social-emotional growth and well-being. Research shows that students with regular access to music instruction often perform better on reading and math assessments, and are more confident, focused, and collaborative.

However, opportunities for music education at the elementary level are uneven across school districts with some students receiving far less time and opportunity with music instruction than other students. Often it is music programs that get dismantled first when school districts determine budget reductions.

The legislature, therefore, intends to emphasize the importance of music instruction for elementary students by requiring a set amount of weekly time for music instruction.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.230.305 and 2022 c 250 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning with the 2023-24 school year, school districts with more than 200 enrolled students shall offer regular instruction in at least one visual art or at least one performing art, throughout the school year. Each student must receive instruction in at least one arts discipline throughout their elementary and middle education experience. For grades nine through 12, all students must be given the opportunity to take arts coursework each academic year.

(2) Every student must have access to arts education, as part of basic education under RCW 28A.150.210. Arts instruction must be accessible by all students, in a manner that is commensurate with instruction in other core subject areas.

(3)(a) Beginning with the 2023-24 school year, school districts shall provide 100 minutes per week of music instruction to each student in grades one through five.

(b) School districts shall adopt a policy and procedure to implement (a) of this subsection (3) by the beginning of the 2024-25 school year.

(4)(a) Except as provided ((in (b) of))otherwise by this subsection (4), arts instruction must be provided by either: A certificated teacher with an endorsement in the relevant arts discipline; or a certificated teacher actively pursuing an endorsement in the relevant arts discipline.

(b) A person holding a limited teaching certificate may provide arts instruction while either: (i) The school district recruits and hires a certificated teacher with the qualifications provided in (a) of this subsection; or (ii) the certificated teacher with qualifications provided in (a) of this subsection takes leave as provided in the school district's written leave policy required by RCW 28A.400.300.

(((4)))(c) Music instruction required by subsection (3) of this section may be provided by a teacher with an elementary education endorsement.

(5) Instruction under this section must be solely for the arts discipline in the skills and craft of each specific arts discipline as their own end, rather than as a vehicle to enhance learning in any other nonarts subject area. If schools wish to integrate or infuse the arts into other subject matter, they must do so in addition to the regular, formal arts instruction required by this section.

(((5)))(6) The arts instructors in each school district, as subject matter experts, shall be consulted to determine which specific visual and performing arts courses to offer at given grade levels, so that instruction is properly aligned to state learning standards in the arts and students' developmental stages and vertically aligned to give arts-focused students the best chance for success in their arts college or career pathway.

(7) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt and revise rules as necessary to implement subsection (3) of this section. In developing rules in accordance with this subsection (7), the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall seek input from music instructors and other interested stakeholders.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 28A.345 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By December 15, 2023, the Washington state school directors' association, in consultation with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall adopt a model policy and procedure that school districts may use to implement the requirements of RCW 28A.230.305(3).

(2) The model policy and procedure required by this section must:

(a) Address the importance of access to music instruction for elementary students and provide that daily music instruction be equivalent to 20 minutes per day or 100 minutes per week for elementary students in grades one through five;

(b) Consider any needed exemptions to the requirements of RCW 28A.230.305(3);

(c) Recognize the importance of music instruction being taught by an appropriately endorsed certificated teacher while acknowledging shortages of endorsed teachers and considering options for filling positions with the intent that those teachers have or seek the proper endorsement; and

(d) Be periodically reviewed by the Washington state school directors' association and be revised as necessary.

--- END ---