BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.14.450 and 2021 c 296 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A county legislative authority may submit an authorizing proposition to the county voters at a primary or general election and, if the proposition is approved by a majority of persons voting, impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The title of each ballot measure must clearly state the purposes for which the proposed sales and use tax will be used. The rate of tax under this section may not exceed three-tenths of one percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use tax.

(2)(a) A city legislative authority may submit an authorizing proposition to the city voters at a primary or general election and, if the proposition is approved by a majority of persons voting, impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The title of each ballot measure must clearly state the purposes for which the proposed sales and use tax will be used. The rate of tax under this subsection may not exceed one-tenth of one percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use tax. A city may not begin imposing a tax approved by the voters under this subsection prior to January 1, 2011.

(b) If a county adopts an ordinance or resolution to submit a ballot proposition to the voters to impose the sales and use tax under subsection (1) of this section prior to a city within the county adopting an ordinance or resolution to submit a ballot proposition to the voters to impose the tax under this subsection, the rate of tax by the city under this subsection may not exceed an amount that would cause the total county and city tax rate under this section to exceed three-tenths of one percent. This subsection (2)(b) also applies if the county and city adopt an ordinance or resolution to impose sales and use taxes under this section on the same date.

(c) If the city adopts an ordinance or resolution to submit a ballot proposition to the voters to impose the sales and use tax under this subsection prior to the county in which the city is located, the county must provide a credit against its tax under subsection (1) of this section for the city tax under this subsection to the extent the total county and city tax rate under this section would exceed three-tenths of one percent.

(3) The tax authorized in this section is in addition to any other taxes authorized by law and must be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the county.

(4) The retail sale or use of motor vehicles, and the lease of motor vehicles for up to the first thirty-six months of the lease, are exempt from tax imposed under this section.

(5) One-third of all money received under this section must be used solely for criminal justice purposes, fire protection purposes, emergency medical services purposes, or ((both))all. For the purposes of this subsection, "criminal justice purposes" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.14.340, except that from May 13, 2021, through December 31, 2023, "criminal justice purposes" includes local government programs which have a reasonable relationship to reducing the numbers of people interacting with the criminal justice system including, but not limited to, reducing homelessness or improving behavioral health.

(6) Money received by a county under subsection (1) of this section must be shared between the county and the cities as follows: 60 percent must be retained by the county and 40 percent must be distributed on a per capita basis to cities in the county.

(7) Tax proceeds received by a city imposing a tax under this section must be shared between the county and city as follows: 15 percent must be distributed to the county and 85 percent is retained by the city.

--- END ---