BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1) There is an annual permit to allow short-term rental operators to provide a complimentary prerolled useable cannabis product, not to exceed one gram of useable cannabis for each prerolled useable cannabis product, to each rental guest who is age 21 or over. The annual permit fee is $75. A single permit applies to all rental properties owned or operated by a short-term rental operator and identified in the permit application.

(2) Upon application in the prescribed form being made to any employee authorized by the board to issue permits, accompanied by payment of the prescribed fee, and upon the employee being satisfied that the applicant should be granted a permit under this section, the employee must issue to the applicant under such regulations as may be prescribed by the board a permit under this section.

(3) Moneys collected from the permit fee in this section must be deposited in the domestic violence prevention account in RCW 70.123.150.

(4) For purposes of this section, "short-term rental," "operator," and "guest" have the same meanings as in RCW 64.37.010.

Sec. 2. RCW 70.123.150 and 2015 c 275 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The domestic violence prevention account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from fees imposed for deposit in the domestic violence prevention account under RCW 36.18.016, and all receipts from fees imposed under section 1 of this act, must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for funding the following:

(1) Culturally specific prevention efforts and culturally appropriate community-based domestic violence services for victims of domestic violence from populations that have been traditionally underserved or unserved;

(2) Age appropriate prevention and intervention services for children who have been exposed to domestic violence or youth who have been victims of dating violence; and

(3) Outreach and education efforts by community-based domestic violence programs designed to increase public awareness about, and primary and secondary prevention of, domestic and dating violence.

--- END ---