BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 9.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The legislature hereby authorizes bona fide charitable or nonprofit organizations to conduct, without the necessity of obtaining a permit or license to do so from the commission, shooting sports and activities sweepstakes permitting wagers of money, and the same shall not constitute gambling or lottery as otherwise prohibited in this chapter, or be subject to civil or criminal penalties thereunder, but this only when the outcome of such sweepstakes is dependent upon the score, or scores, or the shooting ability, or abilities, of a shooting sports contest between individual shooters or teams of such shooters, conducted in the following manner:

(a) Wagers are placed by buying tickets on any players in a shooting sports contest to "win," "place," or "show" and those holding tickets on the three winners may receive a payoff similar to the system of betting identified as parimutuel, such moneys placed as wagers to be used primarily as winners' proceeds, except moneys used to defray the expenses of such shooting sports contest or otherwise used to carry out the purposes of such organization; or

(b) Participants in any shooting sports contest(s) pay a like sum of money into a common fund on the basis of attaining a stated number of points ascertainable from the score of such participants, and those participants attaining such stated number of points share equally in the moneys in the common fund, without any percentage of such moneys going to the sponsoring organization; or

(c) An auction is held in which persons may bid on the shooters or teams of shooters in the shooting sports contest, and the person placing the highest bid on the shooter or team that wins the shooting sports contest receives the proceeds of the auction, except moneys used to defray the expenses of the shooting sports sweepstakes or otherwise used to carry out the purposes of the organizations; and

(d) Participation is limited to members of the sponsoring organization and their bona fide guests.

(2) For purposes of this section, "shooting sports" means shooting sports and activities such as target shooting, skeet, trap, sporting clays, "5" stand, and archery.

--- END ---