BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.70.010 and 1995 c 269 s 2201 are each amended to read as follows:

((As used in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise:))The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Assessment" means the regular collection, analysis, and sharing of information about health conditions, risks, and resources in a community. Assessment activities identify trends in illness, injury, and death and the factors that may cause these events. They also identify environmental risk factors, community concerns, community health resources, and the use of health services. Assessment includes gathering statistical data as well as conducting epidemiologic and other investigations and evaluations of health emergencies and specific ongoing health problems((;)).

(2) "Board" means the state board of health((;)).

(3) "Department" means the department of health((;)).

(4) "Immunization registry" means the automated, electronic, and centralized database and registry of immunizations created by the department.

(5) "Policy development" means the establishment of social norms, organizational guidelines, operational procedures, rules, ordinances, or statutes that promote health or prevent injury, illness, or death((; and)).

(((5)))(6) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) An immunization registry created within the department is available to all licensed health care providers in Washington to support the department's immunization activities. The registry must serve as the primary vaccine management tool for providers enrolled in the childhood vaccine program and its successors, assist schools in assessing immunization compliance, and provide official immunization certificates. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the department must include all children born in this state in the immunization registry by using the birth records from the state office of vital statistics. The department must add other children to the registry as immunization services are provided.

(2) The department may not require enrollment in the immunization registry or otherwise require persons to submit to any form of immunization tracking.

(3) Any person may refuse to be included in the immunization registry. A person may refuse to be included in the immunization registry by signing a form obtained from the department of health, or from the health care provider or entity that provides the immunization. A parent or guardian of a child may refuse on behalf of the child. The form must indicate that the person does not wish to be included in the immunization registry. Each consent to treatment form provided by a health care provider or by an entity that administers vaccinations or causes vaccinations to be administered must contain a notice stating that the person may refuse to be included in the immunization registry. A person may either submit the opt-out form directly to the department or provide it to the health care provider upon administration of the vaccination. If submitted to the health care provider, the health care provider must submit the form to the department. If a person has refused to be included in an immunization registry, any records or identifying information pertaining to the person must be removed from the registry.

(4) The immunization registry must allow for immunization records to be electronically available to entities that are required by law to have such records, including, but not limited to, schools and licensed day care centers. However, the department may not include a person's immunization records in any interstate or federal immunization tracking system or otherwise allow an entity not required by law to have such records without first obtaining written informed consent from the person or the person's parent or guardian, if the person is a minor, to release the immunization records for such purpose.

(5) A health care provider licensed under Title 18 RCW who administers vaccinations or causes vaccinations to be administered is required to report vaccination data to the immunization registry unless a person has refused to be included in the immunization registry by meeting the requirements of subsection (3) of this section. The upload of data from existing automated systems is an acceptable method for updating immunization information in the immunization registry. The information in the immunization registry may include the person's name, date of birth, address, and any other unique identifier necessary to correctly identify the person; the immunization record, including the date, type of administered vaccine, and vaccine lot number; and the presence or absence of any adverse reaction or contraindication related to the immunization. Information received by the department for the immunization registry retains its status as confidential medical information, and the department must maintain the confidentiality of that information as otherwise required by law. A health care provider or entity that obtains information from the immunization registry must maintain the confidentiality of any medical records in accordance with federal and state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A business entity operating in this state may not require patrons or customers to provide any documentation certifying vaccination or postinfection recovery from any disease to gain access to, entry upon, or service from the business operations in this state. This subsection does not otherwise restrict businesses from instituting screening protocols consistent with government-issued guidance to protect public health. "Business entity" means corporation, association, partnership, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or other legal entity registered, licensed, or authorized to conduct business in the state.

(2) A governmental entity may not require persons to provide any documentation certifying vaccination or postinfection recovery from any disease to gain access to, entry upon, or service from the governmental entity's operations in this state. This subsection does not otherwise restrict governmental entities from instituting screening protocols consistent with government-issued guidance to protect public health. "Governmental entity" means the state of Washington, state agencies and any agencies or commissions funded, in whole or in part, by the state, counties, cities, towns, special purpose districts, municipal corporations, or quasi-municipal corporations in the state of Washington.

(3) An educational institution may not require students or residents to provide any documentation certifying vaccination or postinfection recovery from any disease for attendance or enrollment, or to gain access to, entry upon, or service from such educational institution in this state. This subsection does not otherwise restrict educational institutions from instituting screening protocols consistent with government-issued guidance to protect public health. This subsection does not apply to immunizations required in RCW 28A.210.060 through 28A.210.170. "Educational institution" means an institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 or an educational institution as defined in RCW 28C.04.410, including equivalent educational institutions in other states and public and private schools serving students in K-12 education.

(4) This section does not apply to a health care provider. However, a health care provider may not make the provision of any health care service contingent upon a person receiving or having received a particular vaccine or having recovered from infection from a particular disease.

(5) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 4. RCW 49.60.010 and 2020 c 52 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

This chapter shall be known as the "law against discrimination." It is an exercise of the police power of the state for the protection of the public welfare, health, and peace of the people of this state, and in fulfillment of the provisions of the Constitution of this state concerning civil rights. The legislature hereby finds and declares that practices of discrimination against any of its inhabitants because of race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, vaccination or immunity status, families with children, sex, marital status, sexual orientation, age, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability are a matter of state concern, that such discrimination threatens not only the rights and proper privileges of its inhabitants but menaces the institutions and foundation of a free democratic state. A state agency is herein created with powers with respect to elimination and prevention of discrimination in employment, in credit and insurance transactions, in places of public resort, accommodation, or amusement, and in real property transactions because of race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, vaccination or immunity status, families with children, sex, marital status, sexual orientation, age, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability; and the commission established hereunder is hereby given general jurisdiction and power for such purposes.

Sec. 5. RCW 49.60.020 and 2020 c 52 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The provisions of this chapter shall be construed liberally for the accomplishment of the purposes thereof. Nothing contained in this chapter shall be deemed to repeal any of the provisions of any other law of this state relating to discrimination because of race, color, creed, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, vaccination or immunity status, sex, marital status, sexual orientation, age, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability, other than a law which purports to require or permit doing any act which is an unfair practice under this chapter. However, to the extent that distinction or differential treatment on the basis of citizenship or immigration status or vaccine or immunity status is authorized by federal or state law, regulation, or government contract, it is not an unfair practice. Nor shall anything herein contained be construed to deny the right to any person to institute any action or pursue any civil or criminal remedy based upon an alleged violation of his or her civil rights. This chapter shall not be construed to endorse any specific belief, practice, behavior, or orientation. Inclusion of sexual orientation in this chapter shall not be construed to modify or supersede state law relating to marriage.

Sec. 6. RCW 49.60.030 and 2020 c 52 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The right to be free from discrimination because of race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, vaccination or immunity status, sex, honorably discharged veteran or military status, sexual orientation, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability is recognized as and declared to be a civil right. This right shall include, but not be limited to:

(a) The right to obtain and hold employment without discrimination;

(b) The right to the full enjoyment of any of the accommodations, advantages, facilities, or privileges of any place of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement;

(c) The right to engage in real estate transactions without discrimination, including discrimination against families with children;

(d) The right to engage in credit transactions without discrimination;

(e) The right to engage in insurance transactions or transactions with health maintenance organizations without discrimination: PROVIDED, That a practice which is not unlawful under RCW 48.30.300, 48.44.220, or 48.46.370 does not constitute an unfair practice for the purposes of this ((subparagraph))subsection (1)(e);

(f) The right to engage in commerce free from any discriminatory boycotts or blacklists. Discriminatory boycotts or blacklists for purposes of this section shall be defined as the formation or execution of any express or implied agreement, understanding, policy or contractual arrangement for economic benefit between any persons which is not specifically authorized by the laws of the United States and which is required or imposed, either directly or indirectly, overtly or covertly, by a foreign government or foreign person in order to restrict, condition, prohibit, or interfere with or in order to exclude any person or persons from any business relationship on the basis of race, color, creed, religion, sex, honorably discharged veteran or military status, sexual orientation, the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability, or national origin, citizenship or immigration status, vaccination or immunity status, or lawful business relationship: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That nothing herein contained shall prohibit the use of boycotts as authorized by law pertaining to labor disputes and unfair labor practices; and

(g) The right of a mother to breastfeed her child in any place of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement.

(2) Any person deeming himself or herself injured by any act in violation of this chapter shall have a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin further violations, or to recover the actual damages sustained by the person, or both, together with the cost of suit including reasonable attorneys' fees or any other appropriate remedy authorized by this chapter or the United States Civil Rights Act of 1964 as amended, or the Federal Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3601 et seq.).

(3) Except for any unfair practice committed by an employer against an employee or a prospective employee, or any unfair practice in a real estate transaction which is the basis for relief specified in the amendments to RCW 49.60.225 contained in chapter 69, Laws of 1993, any unfair practice prohibited by this chapter which is committed in the course of trade or commerce as defined in the Consumer Protection Act, chapter 19.86 RCW, is, for the purpose of applying that chapter, a matter affecting the public interest, is not reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business, and is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce.

Sec. 7. RCW 49.60.040 and 2020 c 85 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Aggrieved person" means any person who: (a) Claims to have been injured by an unfair practice in a real estate transaction; or (b) believes that he or she will be injured by an unfair practice in a real estate transaction that is about to occur.

(2) "Any place of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement" includes, but is not limited to, any place, licensed or unlicensed, kept for gain, hire, or reward, or where charges are made for admission, service, occupancy, or use of any property or facilities, whether conducted for the entertainment, housing, or lodging of transient guests, or for the benefit, use, or accommodation of those seeking health, recreation, or rest, or for the burial or other disposition of human remains, or for the sale of goods, merchandise, services, or personal property, or for the rendering of personal services, or for public conveyance or transportation on land, water, or in the air, including the stations and terminals thereof and the garaging of vehicles, or where food or beverages of any kind are sold for consumption on the premises, or where public amusement, entertainment, sports, or recreation of any kind is offered with or without charge, or where medical service or care is made available, or where the public gathers, congregates, or assembles for amusement, recreation, or public purposes, or public halls, public elevators, and public washrooms of buildings and structures occupied by two or more tenants, or by the owner and one or more tenants, or any public library or educational institution, or schools of special instruction, or nursery schools, or day care centers or children's camps: PROVIDED, That nothing contained in this definition shall be construed to include or apply to any institute, bona fide club, or place of accommodation, which is by its nature distinctly private, including fraternal organizations, though where public use is permitted that use shall be covered by this chapter; nor shall anything contained in this definition apply to any educational facility, columbarium, crematory, mausoleum, or cemetery operated or maintained by a bona fide religious or sectarian institution.

(3) "Commission" means the Washington state human rights commission.

(4) "Complainant" means the person who files a complaint in a real estate transaction.

(5) "Covered multifamily dwelling" means: (a) Buildings consisting of four or more dwelling units if such buildings have one or more elevators; and (b) ground floor dwelling units in other buildings consisting of four or more dwelling units.

(6) "Credit transaction" includes any open or closed end credit transaction, whether in the nature of a loan, retail installment transaction, credit card issue or charge, or otherwise, and whether for personal or for business purposes, in which a service, finance, or interest charge is imposed, or which provides for repayment in scheduled payments, when such credit is extended in the regular course of any trade or commerce, including but not limited to transactions by banks, savings and loan associations or other financial lending institutions of whatever nature, stock brokers, or by a merchant or mercantile establishment which as part of its ordinary business permits or provides that payment for purchases of property or service therefrom may be deferred.

(7)(a) "Disability" means the presence of a sensory, mental, or physical impairment that:

(i) Is medically cognizable or diagnosable; or

(ii) Exists as a record or history; or

(iii) Is perceived to exist whether or not it exists in fact.

(b) A disability exists whether it is temporary or permanent, common or uncommon, mitigated or unmitigated, or whether or not it limits the ability to work generally or work at a particular job or whether or not it limits any other activity within the scope of this chapter.

(c) For purposes of this definition, "impairment" includes, but is not limited to:

(i) Any physiological disorder, or condition, cosmetic disfigurement, or anatomical loss affecting one or more of the following body systems: Neurological, musculoskeletal, special sense organs, respiratory, including speech organs, cardiovascular, reproductive, digestive, ((genitor-urinary [genitourinary]))genitourinary, hemic and lymphatic, skin, and endocrine; or

(ii) Any mental, developmental, traumatic, or psychological disorder, including but not limited to cognitive limitation, organic brain syndrome, emotional or mental illness, and specific learning disabilities.

(d) Only for the purposes of qualifying for reasonable accommodation in employment, an impairment must be known or shown through an interactive process to exist in fact and:

(i) The impairment must have a substantially limiting effect upon the individual's ability to perform his or her job, the individual's ability to apply or be considered for a job, or the individual's access to equal benefits, privileges, or terms or conditions of employment; or

(ii) The employee must have put the employer on notice of the existence of an impairment, and medical documentation must establish a reasonable likelihood that engaging in job functions without an accommodation would aggravate the impairment to the extent that it would create a substantially limiting effect.

(e) For purposes of (d) of this subsection, a limitation is not substantial if it has only a trivial effect.

(8) "Dog guide" means a dog that is trained for the purpose of guiding blind persons or a dog that is trained for the purpose of assisting hearing impaired persons.

(9) "Dwelling" means any building, structure, or portion thereof that is occupied as, or designed or intended for occupancy as, a residence by one or more families, and any vacant land that is offered for sale or lease for the construction or location thereon of any such building, structure, or portion thereof.

(10) "Employee" does not include any individual employed by his or her parents, spouse, or child, or in the domestic service of any person.

(11) "Employer" includes any person acting in the interest of an employer, directly or indirectly, who employs eight or more persons, and does not include any religious or sectarian organization not organized for private profit.

(12) "Employment agency" includes any person undertaking with or without compensation to recruit, procure, refer, or place employees for an employer.

(13) "Families with children status" means one or more individuals who have not attained the age of eighteen years being domiciled with a parent or another person having legal custody of such individual or individuals, or with the designee of such parent or other person having such legal custody, with the written permission of such parent or other person. Families with children status also applies to any person who is pregnant or is in the process of securing legal custody of any individual who has not attained the age of eighteen years.

(14) "Full enjoyment of" includes the right to purchase any service, commodity, or article of personal property offered or sold on, or by, any establishment to the public, and the admission of any person to accommodations, advantages, facilities, or privileges of any place of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement, without acts directly or indirectly causing persons of any particular race, creed, color, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, or with any sensory, mental, or physical disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability, to be treated as not welcome, accepted, desired, or solicited.

(15) "Honorably discharged veteran or military status" means a person who is:

(a) A veteran, as defined in RCW 41.04.007; or

(b) An active or reserve member in any branch of the armed forces of the United States, including the national guard, coast guard, and armed forces reserves.

(16) "Labor organization" includes any organization which exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing with employers concerning grievances or terms or conditions of employment, or for other mutual aid or protection in connection with employment.

(17) "Marital status" means the legal status of being married, single, separated, divorced, or widowed.

(18) "National origin" includes "ancestry."

(19) "Person" includes one or more individuals, partnerships, associations, organizations, corporations, cooperatives, legal representatives, trustees and receivers, or any group of persons; it includes any owner, lessee, proprietor, manager, agent, or employee, whether one or more natural persons; and further includes any political or civil subdivisions of the state and any agency or instrumentality of the state or of any political or civil subdivision thereof.

(20) "Premises" means the interior or exterior spaces, parts, components, or elements of a building, including individual dwelling units and the public and common use areas of a building.

(21) "Race" is inclusive of traits historically associated or perceived to be associated with race including, but not limited to, hair texture and protective hairstyles. For purposes of this subsection, "protective hairstyles" includes, but is not limited to, such hairstyles as afros, braids, locks, and twists.

(22) "Real estate transaction" includes the sale, appraisal, brokering, exchange, purchase, rental, or lease of real property, transacting or applying for a real estate loan, or the provision of brokerage services.

(23) "Real property" includes buildings, structures, dwellings, real estate, lands, tenements, leaseholds, interests in real estate cooperatives, condominiums, and hereditaments, corporeal and incorporeal, or any interest therein.

(24) "Respondent" means any person accused in a complaint or amended complaint of an unfair practice in a real estate transaction.

(25) "Service animal" means any dog or miniature horse, as discussed in RCW 49.60.214, that is individually trained to do work or perform tasks for the benefit of an individual with a disability, including a physical, sensory, psychiatric, intellectual, or other mental disability. The work or tasks performed by the service animal must be directly related to the individual's disability. Examples of work or tasks include, but are not limited to, assisting individuals who are blind or have low vision with navigation and other tasks, alerting individuals who are deaf or hard of hearing to the presence of people or sounds, providing nonviolent protection or rescue work, pulling a wheelchair, assisting an individual during a seizure, alerting individuals to the presence of allergens, retrieving items such as medicine or the telephone, providing physical support and assistance with balance and stability to individuals with mobility disabilities, and helping persons with psychiatric and neurological disabilities by preventing or interrupting impulsive or destructive behaviors. The crime deterrent effects of an animal's presence and the provision of emotional support, well-being, comfort, or companionship do not constitute work or tasks. This subsection does not apply to RCW 49.60.222 through 49.60.227 with respect to housing accommodations or real estate transactions.

(26) "Sex" means gender.

(27) "Sexual orientation" means heterosexuality, homosexuality, bisexuality, and gender expression or identity. As used in this definition, "gender expression or identity" means having or being perceived as having a gender identity, self-image, appearance, behavior, or expression, whether or not that gender identity, self-image, appearance, behavior, or expression is different from that traditionally associated with the sex assigned to that person at birth.

(28) "Vaccination or immunity status" means whether a person has been administered a vaccine for, or is otherwise immune, to a particular disease.

Sec. 8. RCW 49.60.130 and 2020 c 52 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission has power to create such advisory agencies and conciliation councils, local, regional, or statewide, as in its judgment will aid in effectuating the purposes of this chapter. The commission may empower them to study the problems of discrimination in all or specific fields of human relationships or in specific instances of discrimination because of sex, race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, vaccination or immunity status, marital status, sexual orientation, age, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability; to foster through community effort or otherwise good will, cooperation, and conciliation among the groups and elements of the population of the state, and to make recommendations to the commission for the development of policies and procedures in general and in specific instances, and for programs of formal and informal education which the commission may recommend to the appropriate state agency.

Such advisory agencies and conciliation councils shall be composed of representative citizens, serving without pay, but with reimbursement for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended, and the commission may make provision for technical and clerical assistance to such agencies and councils and for the expenses of such assistance. The commission may use organizations specifically experienced in dealing with questions of discrimination.

Sec. 9. RCW 49.60.175 and 2020 c 52 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall be an unfair practice to use the sex, race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, vaccination or immunity status, marital status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, sexual orientation, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability of any person, or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability, concerning an application for credit in any credit transaction to determine the creditworthiness of an applicant.

Sec. 10. RCW 49.60.176 and 2020 c 52 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is an unfair practice for any person whether acting for himself, herself, or another in connection with any credit transaction because of race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, vaccination or immunity status, sex, marital status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, sexual orientation, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability:

(a) To deny credit to any person;

(b) To increase the charges or fees for or collateral required to secure any credit extended to any person;

(c) To restrict the amount or use of credit extended or to impose different terms or conditions with respect to the credit extended to any person or any item or service related thereto;

(d) To attempt to do any of the unfair practices defined in this section.

(2) Nothing in this section shall prohibit any party to a credit transaction from considering the credit history of any individual applicant.

(3) Further, nothing in this section shall prohibit any party to a credit transaction from considering the application of the community property law to the individual case or from taking reasonable action thereon.

Sec. 11. RCW 49.60.178 and 2021 c 280 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is an unfair practice for any person whether acting for himself, herself, or another in connection with an insurance transaction or transaction with a health maintenance organization to cancel or fail or refuse to issue or renew insurance or a health maintenance agreement to any person because of sex, marital status, sexual orientation, race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, vaccination or immunity status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with disabilities: PROVIDED, That a practice which is not unlawful under RCW 48.30.300, 48.44.220, 48.46.370, or 48.43.0128 does not constitute an unfair practice for the purposes of this section. For the purposes of this section, "insurance transaction" is defined in RCW 48.01.060, health maintenance agreement is defined in RCW 48.46.020, and "health maintenance organization" is defined in RCW 48.46.020.

(2) The fact that such unfair practice may also be a violation of chapter 48.30, 48.43, 48.44, or 48.46 RCW does not constitute a defense to an action brought under this section.

(3) The insurance commissioner, under RCW 48.30.300 and 48.43.0128, and the human rights commission, under this chapter (( 49.60 RCW)), shall have concurrent jurisdiction under this section and shall enter into a working agreement as to procedure to be followed in complaints under this section.

Sec. 12. RCW 49.60.180 and 2020 c 52 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

It is an unfair practice for any employer:

(1) To refuse to hire any person because of age, sex, marital status, sexual orientation, race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, vaccination or immunity status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability, unless based upon a bona fide occupational qualification: PROVIDED, That the prohibition against discrimination because of such disability shall not apply if the particular disability prevents the proper performance of the particular worker involved: PROVIDED, That this section shall not be construed to require an employer to establish employment goals or quotas based on sexual orientation.

(2) To discharge or bar any person from employment because of age, sex, marital status, sexual orientation, race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, vaccination or immunity status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability.

(3) To discriminate against any person in compensation or in other terms or conditions of employment because of age, sex, marital status, sexual orientation, race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, vaccination or immunity status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability: PROVIDED, That it shall not be an unfair practice for an employer to segregate washrooms or locker facilities on the basis of sex, or to base other terms and conditions of employment on the sex of employees where the commission by regulation or ruling in a particular instance has found the employment practice to be appropriate for the practical realization of equality of opportunity between the sexes.

(4) To print, or circulate, or cause to be printed or circulated any statement, advertisement, or publication, or to use any form of application for employment, or to make any inquiry in connection with prospective employment, which expresses any limitation, specification, or discrimination as to age, sex, marital status, sexual orientation, race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, vaccination or immunity status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability, or any intent to make any such limitation, specification, or discrimination, unless based upon a bona fide occupational qualification: PROVIDED, Nothing contained herein shall prohibit advertising in a foreign language.

Sec. 13. RCW 49.60.190 and 2020 c 52 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

It is an unfair practice for any labor union or labor organization:

(1) To deny membership and full membership rights and privileges to any person because of age, sex, marital status, sexual orientation, race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, vaccination or immunity status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability.

(2) To expel from membership any person because of age, sex, marital status, sexual orientation, race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, vaccination or immunity status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability.

(3) To discriminate against any member, employer, employee, or other person to whom a duty of representation is owed because of age, sex, marital status, sexual orientation, race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, vaccination or immunity status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability.

Sec. 14. RCW 49.60.200 and 2020 c 52 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

It is an unfair practice for any employment agency to fail or refuse to classify properly or refer for employment, or otherwise to discriminate against, an individual because of age, sex, marital status, sexual orientation, race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, vaccination or immunity status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability, or to print or circulate, or cause to be printed or circulated any statement, advertisement, or publication, or to use any form of application for employment, or to make any inquiry in connection with prospective employment, which expresses any limitation, specification or discrimination as to age, sex, race, sexual orientation, creed, color, or national origin, citizenship or immigration status, vaccination or immunity status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability, or any intent to make any such limitation, specification, or discrimination, unless based upon a bona fide occupational qualification: PROVIDED, Nothing contained herein shall prohibit advertising in a foreign language.

Sec. 15. RCW 49.60.215 and 2020 c 52 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall be an unfair practice for any person or the person's agent or employee to commit an act which directly or indirectly results in any distinction, restriction, or discrimination, or the requiring of any person to pay a larger sum than the uniform rates charged other persons, or the refusing or withholding from any person the admission, patronage, custom, presence, frequenting, dwelling, staying, or lodging in any place of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement, except for conditions and limitations established by law and applicable to all persons, regardless of race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, vaccination or immunity status, sexual orientation, sex, honorably discharged veteran or military status, status as a mother breastfeeding her child, the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability: PROVIDED, That this section shall not be construed to require structural changes, modifications, or additions to make any place accessible to a person with a disability except as otherwise required by law: PROVIDED, That behavior or actions constituting a risk to property or other persons can be grounds for refusal and shall not constitute an unfair practice.

Sec. 16. RCW 49.60.222 and 2020 c 52 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is an unfair practice for any person, whether acting for himself, herself, or another, because of sex, marital status, sexual orientation, race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, vaccination or immunity status, families with children status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability:

(a) To refuse to engage in a real estate transaction with a person;

(b) To discriminate against a person in the terms, conditions, or privileges of a real estate transaction or in the furnishing of facilities or services in connection therewith;

(c) To refuse to receive or to fail to transmit a bona fide offer to engage in a real estate transaction from a person;

(d) To refuse to negotiate for a real estate transaction with a person;

(e) To represent to a person that real property is not available for inspection, sale, rental, or lease when in fact it is so available, or to fail to bring a property listing to his or her attention, or to refuse to permit the person to inspect real property;

(f) To discriminate in the sale or rental, or to otherwise make unavailable or deny a dwelling, to any person; or to a person residing in or intending to reside in that dwelling after it is sold, rented, or made available; or to any person associated with the person buying or renting;

(g) To make, print, circulate, post, or mail, or cause to be so made or published a statement, advertisement, or sign, or to use a form of application for a real estate transaction, or to make a record or inquiry in connection with a prospective real estate transaction, which indicates, directly or indirectly, an intent to make a limitation, specification, or discrimination with respect thereto;

(h) To offer, solicit, accept, use, or retain a listing of real property with the understanding that a person may be discriminated against in a real estate transaction or in the furnishing of facilities or services in connection therewith;

(i) To expel a person from occupancy of real property;

(j) To discriminate in the course of negotiating, executing, or financing a real estate transaction whether by mortgage, deed of trust, contract, or other instrument imposing a lien or other security in real property, or in negotiating or executing any item or service related thereto including issuance of title insurance, mortgage insurance, loan guarantee, or other aspect of the transaction. Nothing in this section shall limit the effect of RCW 49.60.176 relating to unfair practices in credit transactions; or

(k) To attempt to do any of the unfair practices defined in this section.

(2) For the purposes of this chapter discrimination based on the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person who is blind, deaf, or physically disabled includes:

(a) A refusal to permit, at the expense of the person with a disability, reasonable modifications of existing premises occupied or to be occupied by such person if such modifications may be necessary to afford such person full enjoyment of the dwelling, except that, in the case of a rental, the landlord may, where it is reasonable to do so, condition permission for a modification on the renter agreeing to restore the interior of the dwelling to the condition that existed before the modification, reasonable wear and tear excepted;

(b) To refuse to make reasonable accommodation in rules, policies, practices, or services when such accommodations may be necessary to afford a person with the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability and/or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person who is blind, deaf, or physically disabled equal opportunity to use and enjoy a dwelling; or

(c) To fail to design and construct covered multifamily dwellings and premises in conformance with the federal fair housing amendments act of 1988 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3601 et seq.) and all other applicable laws or regulations pertaining to access by persons with any sensory, mental, or physical disability or use of a trained dog guide or service animal. Whenever the requirements of applicable laws or regulations differ, the requirements which require greater accessibility for persons with any sensory, mental, or physical disability shall govern.

Nothing in (a) or (b) of this subsection shall apply to: (i) A single-family house rented or leased by the owner if the owner does not own or have an interest in the proceeds of the rental or lease of more than three such single-family houses at one time, the rental or lease occurred without the use of a salesperson, or a broker as defined in RCW 18.85.011, and the rental or lease occurred without the publication, posting, or mailing of any advertisement, sign, or statement in violation of subsection (1)(g) of this section; or (ii) rooms or units in dwellings containing living quarters occupied or intended to be occupied by no more than four families living independently of each other if the owner maintains and occupies one of the rooms or units as his or her residence.

(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, it shall not be an unfair practice or a denial of civil rights for any public or private educational institution to separate the sexes or give preference to or limit use of dormitories, residence halls, or other student housing to persons of one sex or to make distinctions on the basis of marital or families with children status.

(4) Except pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section, this section shall not be construed to require structural changes, modifications, or additions to make facilities accessible to a person with a disability except as otherwise required by law. Nothing in this section affects the rights, responsibilities, and remedies of landlords and tenants pursuant to chapter 59.18 or 59.20 RCW, including the right to post and enforce reasonable rules of conduct and safety for all tenants and their guests, provided that chapters 59.18 and 59.20 RCW are only affected to the extent they are inconsistent with the nondiscrimination requirements of this chapter. Nothing in this section limits the applicability of any reasonable federal, state, or local restrictions regarding the maximum number of occupants permitted to occupy a dwelling.

(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, it shall not be an unfair practice for any public establishment providing for accommodations offered for the full enjoyment of transient guests as defined by RCW 9.91.010(1)(c) to make distinctions on the basis of families with children status. Nothing in this section shall limit the effect of RCW 49.60.215 relating to unfair practices in places of public accommodation.

(6) Nothing in this chapter prohibiting discrimination based on families with children status applies to housing for older persons as defined by the federal fair housing amendments act of 1988, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 3607(b)(1) through (3), as amended by the housing for older persons act of 1995, P.L. 104-76, as enacted on December 28, 1995. Nothing in this chapter authorizes requirements for housing for older persons different than the requirements in the federal fair housing amendments act of 1988, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 3607(b)(1) through (3), as amended by the housing for older persons act of 1995, P.L. 104-76, as enacted on December 28, 1995.

(7) Nothing in this chapter shall apply to real estate transactions involving the sharing of a dwelling unit, or rental or sublease of a portion of a dwelling unit, when the dwelling unit is to be occupied by the owner or subleasor. For purposes of this section, "dwelling unit" has the same meaning as in RCW 59.18.030.

Sec. 17. RCW 49.60.223 and 2020 c 52 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

It is an unfair practice for any person, for profit, to induce or attempt to induce any person to sell or rent any real property by representations regarding the entry or prospective entry into the neighborhood of a person or persons of a particular race, creed, color, sex, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, vaccination or immunity status, sexual orientation, families with children status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or with any sensory, mental, or physical disability and/or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person who is blind, deaf, or physically disabled.

Sec. 18. RCW 49.60.224 and 2020 c 52 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every provision in a written instrument relating to real property which purports to forbid or restrict the conveyance, encumbrance, occupancy, or lease thereof to individuals of a specified race, creed, color, sex, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, vaccination or immunity status, sexual orientation, families with children status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or with any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person who is blind, deaf, or physically disabled, and every condition, restriction, or prohibition, including a right of entry or possibility of reverter, which directly or indirectly limits the use or occupancy of real property on the basis of race, creed, color, sex, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, vaccination or immunity status, sexual orientation, families with children status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person who is blind, deaf, or physically disabled is void.

(2) It is an unfair practice to insert in a written instrument relating to real property a provision that is void under this section or to honor or attempt to honor such a provision in the chain of title.

Sec. 19. RCW 49.60.225 and 2020 c 52 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a reasonable cause determination has been made under RCW 49.60.240 that an unfair practice in a real estate transaction has been committed and a finding has been made that the respondent has engaged in any unfair practice under RCW 49.60.250, the administrative law judge shall promptly issue an order for such relief suffered by the aggrieved person as may be appropriate, which may include actual damages as provided by the federal fair housing amendments act of 1988 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3601 et seq.), and injunctive or other equitable relief. Such order may, to further the public interest, assess a civil penalty against the respondent:

(a) In an amount up to ten thousand dollars if the respondent has not been determined to have committed any prior unfair practice in a real estate transaction;

(b) In an amount up to twenty-five thousand dollars if the respondent has been determined to have committed one other unfair practice in a real estate transaction during the five-year period ending on the date of the filing of this charge; or

(c) In an amount up to fifty thousand dollars if the respondent has been determined to have committed two or more unfair practices in a real estate transaction during the seven-year period ending on the date of the filing of this charge, for loss of the right secured by RCW 49.60.010, 49.60.030, 49.60.040, and 49.60.222 through 49.60.224, as now or hereafter amended, to be free from discrimination in real property transactions because of sex, marital status, race, creed, color, national origin, citizenship or immigration status, vaccination or immunity status, sexual orientation, families with children status, honorably discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person who is blind, deaf, or physically disabled. Enforcement of the order and appeal therefrom by the complainant or respondent may be made as provided in RCW 49.60.260 and 49.60.270. If acts constituting the unfair practice in a real estate transaction that is the object of the charge are determined to have been committed by the same natural person who has been previously determined to have committed acts constituting an unfair practice in a real estate transaction, then the civil penalty of up to fifty thousand dollars may be imposed without regard to the period of time within which any subsequent unfair practice in a real estate transaction occurred. All civil penalties assessed under this section shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the general fund.

(2) Such order shall not affect any contract, sale, conveyance, encumbrance, or lease consummated before the issuance of an order that involves a bona fide purchaser, encumbrancer, or tenant who does not have actual notice of the charge filed under this chapter.

(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, persons awarded damages under this section may not receive additional damages pursuant to RCW 49.60.250.

Sec. 20. RCW 49.60.405 and 2020 c 52 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

It is not an unfair practice when a distinction or differential treatment on the basis of citizenship or immigration status or vaccine or immunity status is authorized by federal or state law, regulation, rule, or government contract.

Sec. 21. RCW 28A.210.080 and 2007 c 276 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The attendance of every child at every public and private school in the state and licensed day care center shall be conditioned upon the presentation before or on each child's first day of attendance at a particular school or center, of proof of either (a) full immunization, (b) the initiation of and compliance with a schedule of immunization, as required by rules of the state board of health, or (c) a certificate of exemption as provided for in RCW 28A.210.090. The attendance at the school or the day care center during any subsequent school year of a child who has initiated a schedule of immunization shall be conditioned upon the presentation of proof of compliance with the schedule on the child's first day of attendance during the subsequent school year. Once proof of full immunization or proof of completion of an approved schedule has been presented, no further proof shall be required as a condition to attendance at the particular school or center.

(2)(a) Beginning with sixth grade entry, every public and private school in the state shall provide parents and guardians with information about meningococcal disease and its vaccine at the beginning of every school year. The information about meningococcal disease shall include:

(i) Its causes and symptoms, how meningococcal disease is spread, and the places where parents and guardians may obtain additional information and vaccinations for their children; and

(ii) Current recommendations from the United States centers for disease control and prevention regarding the receipt of vaccines for meningococcal disease and where the vaccination can be received.

(b) This subsection shall not be construed to require the department of health or the school to provide meningococcal vaccination to students.

(c) The department of health shall prepare the informational materials and shall consult with the office of superintendent of public instruction.

(d) This subsection does not create a private right of action.

(3)(a) Beginning with sixth grade entry, every public school in the state shall provide parents and guardians with information about human papillomavirus disease and its vaccine at the beginning of every school year. The information about human papillomavirus disease shall include:

(i) Its causes and symptoms, how human papillomavirus disease is spread, and the places where parents and guardians may obtain additional information and vaccinations for their children; and

(ii) Current recommendations from the United States centers for disease control and prevention regarding the receipt of vaccines for human papillomavirus disease and where the vaccination can be received.

(b) This subsection shall not be construed to require the department of health or the school to provide human papillomavirus vaccination to students.

(c) The department of health shall prepare the informational materials and shall consult with the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(d) This subsection does not create a private right of action.

(4) Private schools are required by state law to notify parents that information on the human papillomavirus disease prepared by the department of health is available.

(5) Any immunization approved by the United States food and drug administration only for emergency use may not be required for attendance at a public or private school in the state or licensed day care center.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22. This act may be known and cited as the medical freedom act.

--- END ---