BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.160.020 and 2012 c 225 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Board" means the community economic revitalization board.

(2) "Department" means the department of commerce.

(3) "Frontier county" means a county with a population density of fewer than 50 persons per square mile as determined by the office of financial management and published each year by the department. A county with a population density of 21 or fewer persons per square mile is a "frontier one" county. A county with a population density of more than 21 but fewer than 50 persons per square mile is a "frontier two" county. Every frontier county is also a rural county under this chapter and eligible for all benefits, services, and programs of a rural county unless a frontier county is specifically excluded in the authorizing statute.

(4) "Local government" or "political subdivision" means any port district, county, city, town, special purpose district, and any other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations in the state providing for public facilities under this chapter.

(((4)))(5) "Public facilities" means a project of a local government or a federally recognized Indian tribe for the planning, acquisition, construction, repair, reconstruction, replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of: Bridges; roads; research, testing, training, and incubation facilities in areas designated as innovation partnership zones under RCW 43.330.270; buildings or structures; domestic and industrial water, earth stabilization, sanitary sewer, storm sewer, railroad, electricity, telecommunications, transportation, natural gas, and port facilities; all for the purpose of job creation, job retention, or job expansion.

(((5)))(6) "Rural county" means a county with a population density of fewer than ((one hundred))100 persons per square mile or a county smaller than ((two hundred twenty-five))225 square miles, as determined by the office of financial management and published each year by the department for the period July 1st to June 30th.

Sec. 2. RCW 43.330.010 and 2021 c 39 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Associate development organization" means a local economic development nonprofit corporation that is broadly representative of community interests.

(2) "Department" means the department of commerce.

(3) "Director" means the director of the department of commerce.

(4) "Family resource center" means a unified single point of entry where families, individuals, children, and youth in communities can obtain information, an assessment of needs, referral to, or direct delivery of family services in a manner that is welcoming and strength-based.

(a) A family resource center is designed to meet the needs, cultures, and interests of the communities that the family resource center serves.

(b) Family services may be delivered directly to a family at the family resource center by family resource center staff or by providers who contract with or have provider agreements with the family resource center. Any family resource center that provides family services shall comply with applicable state and federal laws and regulations regarding the delivery of such family services, unless required waivers or exemptions have been granted by the appropriate governing body.

(c) Each family resource center shall have one or more family advocates who screen and assess a family's needs and strengths. If requested by the family, the family advocate shall assist the family with setting its own goals and, together with the family, develop a written plan to pursue the family's goals in working towards a greater level of self-reliance or in attaining self-sufficiency.

(5) "Financial institution" means a bank, trust company, mutual savings bank, savings and loan association, or credit union authorized to do business in this state under state or federal law.

(6) "Frontier county" means a county with a population density of fewer than 50 persons per square mile as determined by the office of financial management and published each year by the department. A county with a population density of 21 or fewer persons per square mile is a "frontier one" county. A county with a population density of more than 21 but fewer than 50 persons per square mile is a "frontier two" county. Every frontier county is also a rural county under this chapter and eligible for all benefits, services, and programs of a rural county unless a frontier county is specifically excluded in the authorizing statute.

(7) "Small business" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 39.26.010.

Sec. 3. RCW 82.02.010 and 2022 c 16 s 137 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purpose of this title, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(1) "Cannabis," "cannabis-infused products," and "useable cannabis" have the meanings provided in RCW 69.50.101;

(2) "Department" means the department of revenue of the state of Washington;

(3) "Director" means the director of the department of revenue of the state of Washington;

(4) "Frontier county" means a county with a population density of fewer than 50 persons per square mile as determined by the office of financial management and published each year by the department. A county with a population density of 21 or fewer persons per square mile is a "frontier one" county. A county with a population density of more than 21 but fewer than 50 persons per square mile is a "frontier two" county. Every frontier county is also a rural county as defined in RCW 82.14.370 and eligible for all benefits, services, and programs unless a frontier county is specifically excluded in the authorizing statute;

(5) "Taxpayer" includes any individual, group of individuals, corporation, or association liable for any tax or the collection of any tax hereunder, or who engages in any business or performs any act for which a tax is imposed by this title. "Taxpayer" also includes any person liable for any fee or other charge collected by the department under any provision of law, including registration assessments and delinquency fees imposed under RCW 59.30.050; and

(((5)))(6) Words in the singular number include the plural and the plural include the singular. Words in one gender include all other genders.

--- END ---