BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 48.43.047 and 2018 c 14 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A health plan issued on or after June 7, 2018, must, at a minimum, provide coverage for the same preventive services required to be covered under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-13 (((2016)))(2022) and any federal rules or guidance in effect on ((December))January 31, ((2016))2023, implementing 42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-13.

(2) The health plan may not impose cost-sharing requirements for the preventive services required to be covered under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The insurance commissioner shall enforce this section consistent with federal rules, guidance, and case law in effect on ((December))January 31, ((2016))2023, applicable to 42 U.S.C. 300gg-13 (((2016)))(2022).

--- END ---