BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 79.105.120 and 2005 c 155 s 108 are each amended to read as follows:

The department may cause any state-owned aquatic lands to be surveyed for the purpose of ascertaining and determining the area subject to sale or lease. The department may not require a current or prospective lessee of such lands to pay for the cost of such a survey.

--- END ---