BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)(a) The legislature finds that, unlike the children of migratory agricultural workers and fishers, who may qualify to receive supplemental academic and other support services funded by federal grant dollars, the children of nonmigratory seasonal farmworkers do not have access to additional resources or supports even though they have similar experiences as migrant children. Both groups of children may experience low socioeconomic status, limited English proficiency, limited family engagement with schools, gaps in school attendance, and limited access to health supports, nutritious meals, and technology supports at home and in the community, especially in rural and remote locations.

(b) The legislature intends to commission a study of the needs of children of seasonal farmworkers to determine whether the state should provide these children with academic and other support services that are modeled after services provided to migrant children.

(2) By June 1, 2025, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature with the results of the study described in subsection (4) of this section. The report must also include a recommended definition for "child of a seasonal farmworker" and recommendations for meeting the academic and other needs of children of seasonal farmworkers.

(3) The department of agriculture and the department of labor and industries must collaborate and coordinate with the office of the superintendent of public instruction on the study and report required by this section.

(4) At a minimum, the study must examine factors that impact children of seasonal farmworkers in comparison to migrant students in the following areas: School and program access, school readiness, attendance, grade promotion and retention, performance on state assessments, academic growth, graduation rates, discipline rates, and teacher qualifications and years of experience. The study must also investigate student access to postsecondary education and career opportunities in formerly rural or agricultural communities.

(5) This section expires August 1, 2026.

--- END ---