BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The Washington state ferries may not require any person hired on or after the effective date of this section, or any perspective employee or applicant, as a condition of employment, to present proof that the person has received a vaccine for COVID-19 or any variant thereof.

(2) Any rule, order, or directive that requires a person hired on or after the effective date of this section or any perspective employee or applicant, to be vaccinated against COVID-19 as a condition of employment is unenforceable.

(3) When rehiring employees that ended employment with the Washington state ferries from August 5, 2021, to May 11, 2023, the employee may request that COVID-19 or any variant vaccination status be removed from the employee's personnel files along with any associated management's adverse actions against the employee. In addition, to the extent possible, any rehired employees must be restored to their previous level of seniority.

--- END ---