BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 71.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A tribe has the right to intervene at any point in any court proceeding under this chapter involving a member of their tribe.

(a) For purposes of this section, "right to intervene" means the right of a tribe to:

(i) Attend court proceedings;

(ii) Speak in court;

(iii) Request copies of orders issued by the court and petitions filed;

(iv) Submit information to the court including, but not limited to, information about available tribal resources to coordinate services; and

(v) Petition the court under RCW 71.05.201.

(b) Information provided to the tribe under this section is subject to any federal and state laws and regulations including the requirements in RCW 70.02.230 (2)(ee) and (3).

(2) Behavioral health service providers shall accept tribal court orders from tribes located within the state on the same basis as state court orders issued under this chapter.

(3) The administrative office of the courts, in consultation with the authority, shall develop and update court forms as needed in proceedings under this chapter for use by designated crisis responders and make them available by December 1, 2024. After January 1, 2025, superior courts must allow tribal designated crisis responders to use court forms developed by the administrative office of the courts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 71.34 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A federally recognized Indian tribe has the right to intervene at any point in any court proceeding under this chapter involving a member of their tribe.

(a) For purposes of this section, "right to intervene" means the right of a tribe to:

(i) Attend court proceedings;

(ii) Speak in court;

(iii) Request copies of orders issued by the court and petitions filed;

(iv) Submit information to the court including, but not limited to, information about available tribal resources to coordinate services; and

(v) Petition the court under RCW 71.05.201.

(b) Information provided to the tribe under this section is subject to any federal and state laws and regulations including the requirements in RCW 70.02.240.

(2) Behavioral health service providers shall accept tribal court orders from tribes located within the state on the same basis as state court orders issued under this chapter.

(3) The administrative office of the courts, in consultation with the authority, shall develop and update court forms as needed in proceedings under this chapter for use by designated crisis responders and make them available by December 1, 2024. After January 1, 2025, superior courts must allow tribal designated crisis responders to use court forms developed by the administrative office of the courts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 71.05 RCW to read as follows:

Nothing in this chapter may be read as an assertion of state jurisdiction or regulatory authority over a tribe.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 71.34 RCW to read as follows:

Nothing in this chapter may be read as an assertion of state jurisdiction or regulatory authority over a tribe.

Sec. 5. RCW 71.05.020 and 2023 c 433 s 3 and 2023 c 425 s 20 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "23-hour crisis relief center" has the same meaning as under RCW 71.24.025;

(2) "Admission" or "admit" means a decision by a physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner that a person should be examined or treated as a patient in a hospital;

(3) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning;

(4) "Antipsychotic medications" means that class of drugs primarily used to treat serious manifestations of mental illness associated with thought disorders, which includes, but is not limited to atypical antipsychotic medications;

(5) "Approved substance use disorder treatment program" means a program for persons with a substance use disorder provided by a treatment program certified by the department as meeting standards adopted under chapter 71.24 RCW;

(6) "Attending staff" means any person on the staff of a public or private agency having responsibility for the care and treatment of a patient;

(7) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority;

(8) "Behavioral health disorder" means either a mental disorder as defined in this section, a substance use disorder as defined in this section, or a co-occurring mental disorder and substance use disorder;

(9) "Behavioral health service provider" means a public or private agency that provides mental health, substance use disorder, or co-occurring disorder services to persons with behavioral health disorders as defined under this section and receives funding from public sources. This includes, but is not limited to: Hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW; evaluation and treatment facilities as defined in this section; community mental health service delivery systems or community behavioral health programs as defined in RCW 71.24.025; licensed or certified behavioral health agencies under RCW 71.24.037; an entity with a tribal attestation that it meets minimum standards or a licensed or certified behavioral health agency as defined in RCW 71.24.025; facilities conducting competency evaluations and restoration under chapter 10.77 RCW; approved substance use disorder treatment programs as defined in this section; secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities as defined in this section; and correctional facilities operated by state ((and)), local, and tribal governments;

(10) "Co-occurring disorder specialist" means an individual possessing an enhancement granted by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW that certifies the individual to provide substance use disorder counseling subject to the practice limitations under RCW 18.205.105;

(11) "Commitment" means the determination by a court that a person should be detained for a period of either evaluation or treatment, or both, in an inpatient or a less restrictive setting;

(12) "Community behavioral health agency" has the same meaning as "licensed or certified behavioral health agency" defined in RCW 71.24.025;

(13) "Conditional release" means a revocable modification of a commitment, which may be revoked upon violation of any of its terms;

(14) "Crisis stabilization unit" means a short-term facility or a portion of a facility licensed or certified by the department, such as an evaluation and treatment facility or a hospital, which has been designed to assess, diagnose, and treat individuals experiencing an acute crisis without the use of long-term hospitalization, or to determine the need for involuntary commitment of an individual;

(15) "Custody" means involuntary detention under the provisions of this chapter or chapter 10.77 RCW, uninterrupted by any period of unconditional release from commitment from a facility providing involuntary care and treatment;

(16) "Department" means the department of health;

(17) "Designated crisis responder" means a mental health professional appointed by the county, by an entity appointed by the county, or by the authority in consultation with a ((federally recognized Indian)) tribe or after meeting and conferring with an Indian health care provider, to perform the duties specified in this chapter;

(18) "Detention" or "detain" means the lawful confinement of a person, under the provisions of this chapter;

(19) "Developmental disabilities professional" means a person who has specialized training and three years of experience in directly treating or working with persons with developmental disabilities and is a psychiatrist, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or social worker, and such other developmental disabilities professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary of the department of social and health services;

(20) "Developmental disability" means that condition defined in RCW 71A.10.020(6);

(21) "Director" means the director of the authority;

(22) "Discharge" means the termination of hospital medical authority. The commitment may remain in place, be terminated, or be amended by court order;

(23) "Drug addiction" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on psychoactive chemicals, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning;

(24) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means any facility which can provide directly, or by direct arrangement with other public or private agencies, emergency evaluation and treatment, outpatient care, and timely and appropriate inpatient care to persons suffering from a mental disorder, and which is licensed or certified as such by the department. The authority may certify single beds as temporary evaluation and treatment beds under RCW 71.05.745. A physically separate and separately operated portion of a state hospital may be designated as an evaluation and treatment facility. A facility which is part of, or operated by, the department of social and health services or any federal agency will not require certification. No correctional institution or facility, or jail, shall be an evaluation and treatment facility within the meaning of this chapter;

(25) "Gravely disabled" means a condition in which a person, as a result of a behavioral health disorder: (a) Is in danger of serious physical harm resulting from a failure to provide for his or her essential human needs of health or safety; or (b) manifests severe deterioration in routine functioning evidenced by repeated and escalating loss of cognitive or volitional control over his or her actions and is not receiving such care as is essential for his or her health or safety;

(26) "Habilitative services" means those services provided by program personnel to assist persons in acquiring and maintaining life skills and in raising their levels of physical, mental, social, and vocational functioning. Habilitative services include education, training for employment, and therapy. The habilitative process shall be undertaken with recognition of the risk to the public safety presented by the person being assisted as manifested by prior charged criminal conduct;

(27) "Hearing" means any proceeding conducted in open court that conforms to the requirements of RCW 71.05.820;

(28) "History of one or more violent acts" refers to the period of time ten years prior to the filing of a petition under this chapter, excluding any time spent, but not any violent acts committed, in a behavioral health facility, or in confinement as a result of a criminal conviction;

(29) "Imminent" means the state or condition of being likely to occur at any moment or near at hand, rather than distant or remote;

(30) "In need of assisted outpatient treatment" refers to a person who meets the criteria for assisted outpatient treatment established under RCW 71.05.148;

(31) "Individualized service plan" means a plan prepared by a developmental disabilities professional with other professionals as a team, for a person with developmental disabilities, which shall state:

(a) The nature of the person's specific problems, prior charged criminal behavior, and habilitation needs;

(b) The conditions and strategies necessary to achieve the purposes of habilitation;

(c) The intermediate and long-range goals of the habilitation program, with a projected timetable for the attainment;

(d) The rationale for using this plan of habilitation to achieve those intermediate and long-range goals;

(e) The staff responsible for carrying out the plan;

(f) Where relevant in light of past criminal behavior and due consideration for public safety, the criteria for proposed movement to less-restrictive settings, criteria for proposed eventual discharge or release, and a projected possible date for discharge or release; and

(g) The type of residence immediately anticipated for the person and possible future types of residences;

(32) "Intoxicated person" means a person whose mental or physical functioning is substantially impaired as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals;

(33) "Judicial commitment" means a commitment by a court pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

(34) "Legal counsel" means attorneys and staff employed by county prosecutor offices or the state attorney general acting in their capacity as legal representatives of public behavioral health service providers under RCW 71.05.130;

(35) "Less restrictive alternative treatment" means a program of individualized treatment in a less restrictive setting than inpatient treatment that includes the services described in RCW 71.05.585. This term includes: Treatment pursuant to a less restrictive alternative treatment order under RCW 71.05.240 or 71.05.320; treatment pursuant to a conditional release under RCW 71.05.340; and treatment pursuant to an assisted outpatient treatment order under RCW 71.05.148;

(36) "Licensed physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine and surgery in the state of Washington;

(37) "Likelihood of serious harm" means:

(a) A substantial risk that: (i) Physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on oneself; (ii) physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon another, as evidenced by behavior which has caused such harm or which places another person or persons in reasonable fear of sustaining such harm; or (iii) physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon the property of others, as evidenced by behavior which has caused substantial loss or damage to the property of others; or

(b) The person has threatened the physical safety of another and has a history of one or more violent acts;

(38) "Medical clearance" means a physician or other health care provider, including an Indian health care provider, has determined that a person is medically stable and ready for referral to the designated crisis responder or facility. For a person presenting in the community, no medical clearance is required prior to investigation by a designated crisis responder;

(39) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional impairment which has substantial adverse effects on a person's cognitive or volitional functions;

(40) "Mental health professional" means an individual practicing within the mental health professional's statutory scope of practice who is:

(a) A psychiatrist, psychologist, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, psychiatric nurse, or social worker, as defined in this chapter and chapter 71.34 RCW;

(b) A mental health counselor, mental health counselor associate, marriage and family therapist, or marriage and family therapist associate, as defined in chapter 18.225 RCW; or

(c) A certified or licensed agency affiliated counselor, as defined in chapter 18.19 RCW;

(41) "Peace officer" means a law enforcement official of a public agency or governmental unit, and includes persons specifically given peace officer powers by any state law, local ordinance, or judicial order of appointment;

(42) "Physician assistant" means a person licensed as a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW;

(43) "Private agency" means any person, partnership, corporation, or association that is not a public agency, whether or not financed in whole or in part by public funds, which constitutes an evaluation and treatment facility or private institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, which is conducted for, or includes a department or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with behavioral health disorders;

(44) "Professional person" means a mental health professional, substance use disorder professional, or designated crisis responder and shall also mean a physician, physician assistant, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, registered nurse, and such others as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

(45) "Psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner" means a person who is licensed as an advanced registered nurse practitioner pursuant to chapter 18.79 RCW; and who is board certified in advanced practice psychiatric and mental health nursing;

(46) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician and surgeon in this state who has in addition completed three years of graduate training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American medical association or the American osteopathic association and is certified or eligible to be certified by the American board of psychiatry and neurology;

(47) "Psychologist" means a person who has been licensed as a psychologist pursuant to chapter 18.83 RCW;

(48) "Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment facility or institution, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, approved substance use disorder treatment program, or hospital which is conducted for, or includes a department or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with behavioral health disorders, if the agency is operated directly by federal, state, county, or municipal government, or a combination of such governments;

(49) "Release" means legal termination of the commitment under the provisions of this chapter;

(50) "Resource management services" has the meaning given in chapter 71.24 RCW;

(51) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health, or his or her designee;

(52) "Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility" means a facility operated by either a public or private agency or by the program of an agency which provides care to voluntary individuals and individuals involuntarily detained and committed under this chapter for whom there is a likelihood of serious harm or who are gravely disabled due to the presence of a substance use disorder. Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities must:

(a) Provide the following services:

(i) Assessment and treatment, provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists;

(ii) Clinical stabilization services;

(iii) Acute or subacute detoxification services for intoxicated individuals; and

(iv) Discharge assistance provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists, including facilitating transitions to appropriate voluntary or involuntary inpatient services or to less restrictive alternatives as appropriate for the individual;

(b) Include security measures sufficient to protect the patients, staff, and community; and

(c) Be licensed or certified as such by the department of health;

(53) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further advanced degree from a social work educational program accredited and approved as provided in RCW 18.320.010;

(54) "Substance use disorder" means a cluster of cognitive, behavioral, and physiological symptoms indicating that an individual continues using the substance despite significant substance-related problems. The diagnosis of a substance use disorder is based on a pathological pattern of behaviors related to the use of the substances;

(55) "Substance use disorder professional" means a person certified as a substance use disorder professional by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW;

(56) "Therapeutic court personnel" means the staff of a mental health court or other therapeutic court which has jurisdiction over defendants who are dually diagnosed with mental disorders, including court personnel, probation officers, a court monitor, prosecuting attorney, or defense counsel acting within the scope of therapeutic court duties;

(57) "Treatment records" include registration and all other records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time have received services for behavioral health disorders, which are maintained by the department of social and health services, the department, the authority, behavioral health administrative services organizations and their staffs, managed care organizations and their staffs, and by treatment facilities. Treatment records include mental health information contained in a medical bill including but not limited to mental health drugs, a mental health diagnosis, provider name, and dates of service stemming from a medical service. Treatment records do not include notes or records maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment services for the department of social and health services, the department, the authority, behavioral health administrative services organizations, managed care organizations, or a treatment facility if the notes or records are not available to others;

(58) "Tribe" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.24.025;

(59) "Video," unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, means the delivery of behavioral health services through the use of interactive audio and video technology, permitting real-time communication between a person and a designated crisis responder, for the purpose of evaluation. "Video" does not include the use of audio-only telephone, facsimile, email, or store and forward technology. "Store and forward technology" means use of an asynchronous transmission of a person's medical information from a mental health service provider to the designated crisis responder which results in medical diagnosis, consultation, or treatment;

(((59)))(60) "Violent act" means behavior that resulted in homicide, attempted suicide, injury, or substantial loss or damage to property.

Sec. 6. RCW 71.05.020 and 2023 c 433 s 4 and 2023 c 425 s 21 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "23-hour crisis relief center" has the same meaning as under RCW 71.24.025;

(2) "Admission" or "admit" means a decision by a physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner that a person should be examined or treated as a patient in a hospital;

(3) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning;

(4) "Antipsychotic medications" means that class of drugs primarily used to treat serious manifestations of mental illness associated with thought disorders, which includes, but is not limited to atypical antipsychotic medications;

(5) "Approved substance use disorder treatment program" means a program for persons with a substance use disorder provided by a treatment program certified by the department as meeting standards adopted under chapter 71.24 RCW;

(6) "Attending staff" means any person on the staff of a public or private agency having responsibility for the care and treatment of a patient;

(7) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority;

(8) "Behavioral health disorder" means either a mental disorder as defined in this section, a substance use disorder as defined in this section, or a co-occurring mental disorder and substance use disorder;

(9) "Behavioral health service provider" means a public or private agency that provides mental health, substance use disorder, or co-occurring disorder services to persons with behavioral health disorders as defined under this section and receives funding from public sources. This includes, but is not limited to: Hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW; evaluation and treatment facilities as defined in this section; community mental health service delivery systems or community behavioral health programs as defined in RCW 71.24.025; licensed or certified behavioral health agencies under RCW 71.24.037; an entity with a tribal attestation that it meets minimum standards or a licensed or certified behavioral health agency as defined in RCW 71.24.025; facilities conducting competency evaluations and restoration under chapter 10.77 RCW; approved substance use disorder treatment programs as defined in this section; secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities as defined in this section; and correctional facilities operated by state ((and)), local, and tribal governments;

(10) "Co-occurring disorder specialist" means an individual possessing an enhancement granted by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW that certifies the individual to provide substance use disorder counseling subject to the practice limitations under RCW 18.205.105;

(11) "Commitment" means the determination by a court that a person should be detained for a period of either evaluation or treatment, or both, in an inpatient or a less restrictive setting;

(12) "Community behavioral health agency" has the same meaning as "licensed or certified behavioral health agency" defined in RCW 71.24.025;

(13) "Conditional release" means a revocable modification of a commitment, which may be revoked upon violation of any of its terms;

(14) "Crisis stabilization unit" means a short-term facility or a portion of a facility licensed or certified by the department, such as an evaluation and treatment facility or a hospital, which has been designed to assess, diagnose, and treat individuals experiencing an acute crisis without the use of long-term hospitalization, or to determine the need for involuntary commitment of an individual;

(15) "Custody" means involuntary detention under the provisions of this chapter or chapter 10.77 RCW, uninterrupted by any period of unconditional release from commitment from a facility providing involuntary care and treatment;

(16) "Department" means the department of health;

(17) "Designated crisis responder" means a mental health professional appointed by the county, by an entity appointed by the county, or by the authority in consultation with a ((federally recognized Indian)) tribe or after meeting and conferring with an Indian health care provider, to perform the duties specified in this chapter;

(18) "Detention" or "detain" means the lawful confinement of a person, under the provisions of this chapter;

(19) "Developmental disabilities professional" means a person who has specialized training and three years of experience in directly treating or working with persons with developmental disabilities and is a psychiatrist, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or social worker, and such other developmental disabilities professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary of the department of social and health services;

(20) "Developmental disability" means that condition defined in RCW 71A.10.020(6);

(21) "Director" means the director of the authority;

(22) "Discharge" means the termination of hospital medical authority. The commitment may remain in place, be terminated, or be amended by court order;

(23) "Drug addiction" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on psychoactive chemicals, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning;

(24) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means any facility which can provide directly, or by direct arrangement with other public or private agencies, emergency evaluation and treatment, outpatient care, and timely and appropriate inpatient care to persons suffering from a mental disorder, and which is licensed or certified as such by the department. The authority may certify single beds as temporary evaluation and treatment beds under RCW 71.05.745. A physically separate and separately operated portion of a state hospital may be designated as an evaluation and treatment facility. A facility which is part of, or operated by, the department of social and health services or any federal agency will not require certification. No correctional institution or facility, or jail, shall be an evaluation and treatment facility within the meaning of this chapter;

(25) "Gravely disabled" means a condition in which a person, as a result of a behavioral health disorder: (a) Is in danger of serious physical harm resulting from a failure to provide for his or her essential human needs of health or safety; or (b) manifests severe deterioration from safe behavior evidenced by repeated and escalating loss of cognitive or volitional control over his or her actions and is not receiving such care as is essential for his or her health or safety;

(26) "Habilitative services" means those services provided by program personnel to assist persons in acquiring and maintaining life skills and in raising their levels of physical, mental, social, and vocational functioning. Habilitative services include education, training for employment, and therapy. The habilitative process shall be undertaken with recognition of the risk to the public safety presented by the person being assisted as manifested by prior charged criminal conduct;

(27) "Hearing" means any proceeding conducted in open court that conforms to the requirements of RCW 71.05.820;

(28) "History of one or more violent acts" refers to the period of time ten years prior to the filing of a petition under this chapter, excluding any time spent, but not any violent acts committed, in a behavioral health facility, or in confinement as a result of a criminal conviction;

(29) "Imminent" means the state or condition of being likely to occur at any moment or near at hand, rather than distant or remote;

(30) "In need of assisted outpatient treatment" refers to a person who meets the criteria for assisted outpatient treatment established under RCW 71.05.148;

(31) "Individualized service plan" means a plan prepared by a developmental disabilities professional with other professionals as a team, for a person with developmental disabilities, which shall state:

(a) The nature of the person's specific problems, prior charged criminal behavior, and habilitation needs;

(b) The conditions and strategies necessary to achieve the purposes of habilitation;

(c) The intermediate and long-range goals of the habilitation program, with a projected timetable for the attainment;

(d) The rationale for using this plan of habilitation to achieve those intermediate and long-range goals;

(e) The staff responsible for carrying out the plan;

(f) Where relevant in light of past criminal behavior and due consideration for public safety, the criteria for proposed movement to less-restrictive settings, criteria for proposed eventual discharge or release, and a projected possible date for discharge or release; and

(g) The type of residence immediately anticipated for the person and possible future types of residences;

(32) "Intoxicated person" means a person whose mental or physical functioning is substantially impaired as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals;

(33) "Judicial commitment" means a commitment by a court pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

(34) "Legal counsel" means attorneys and staff employed by county prosecutor offices or the state attorney general acting in their capacity as legal representatives of public behavioral health service providers under RCW 71.05.130;

(35) "Less restrictive alternative treatment" means a program of individualized treatment in a less restrictive setting than inpatient treatment that includes the services described in RCW 71.05.585. This term includes: Treatment pursuant to a less restrictive alternative treatment order under RCW 71.05.240 or 71.05.320; treatment pursuant to a conditional release under RCW 71.05.340; and treatment pursuant to an assisted outpatient treatment order under RCW 71.05.148;

(36) "Licensed physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine and surgery in the state of Washington;

(37) "Likelihood of serious harm" means:

(a) A substantial risk that: (i) Physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on oneself; (ii) physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon another, as evidenced by behavior which has caused harm, substantial pain, or which places another person or persons in reasonable fear of harm to themselves or others; or (iii) physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon the property of others, as evidenced by behavior which has caused substantial loss or damage to the property of others; or

(b) The person has threatened the physical safety of another and has a history of one or more violent acts;

(38) "Medical clearance" means a physician or other health care provider, including an Indian health care provider, has determined that a person is medically stable and ready for referral to the designated crisis responder or facility. For a person presenting in the community, no medical clearance is required prior to investigation by a designated crisis responder;

(39) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional impairment which has substantial adverse effects on a person's cognitive or volitional functions;

(40) "Mental health professional" means an individual practicing within the mental health professional's statutory scope of practice who is:

(a) A psychiatrist, psychologist, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, psychiatric nurse, or social worker, as defined in this chapter and chapter 71.34 RCW;

(b) A mental health counselor, mental health counselor associate, marriage and family therapist, or marriage and family therapist associate, as defined in chapter 18.225 RCW; or

(c) A certified or licensed agency affiliated counselor, as defined in chapter 18.19 RCW;

(41) "Peace officer" means a law enforcement official of a public agency or governmental unit, and includes persons specifically given peace officer powers by any state law, local ordinance, or judicial order of appointment;

(42) "Physician assistant" means a person licensed as a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW;

(43) "Private agency" means any person, partnership, corporation, or association that is not a public agency, whether or not financed in whole or in part by public funds, which constitutes an evaluation and treatment facility or private institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, which is conducted for, or includes a department or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with behavioral health disorders;

(44) "Professional person" means a mental health professional, substance use disorder professional, or designated crisis responder and shall also mean a physician, physician assistant, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, registered nurse, and such others as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

(45) "Psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner" means a person who is licensed as an advanced registered nurse practitioner pursuant to chapter 18.79 RCW; and who is board certified in advanced practice psychiatric and mental health nursing;

(46) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician and surgeon in this state who has in addition completed three years of graduate training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American medical association or the American osteopathic association and is certified or eligible to be certified by the American board of psychiatry and neurology;

(47) "Psychologist" means a person who has been licensed as a psychologist pursuant to chapter 18.83 RCW;

(48) "Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment facility or institution, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, approved substance use disorder treatment program, or hospital which is conducted for, or includes a department or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with behavioral health disorders, if the agency is operated directly by federal, state, county, or municipal government, or a combination of such governments;

(49) "Release" means legal termination of the commitment under the provisions of this chapter;

(50) "Resource management services" has the meaning given in chapter 71.24 RCW;

(51) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health, or his or her designee;

(52) "Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility" means a facility operated by either a public or private agency or by the program of an agency which provides care to voluntary individuals and individuals involuntarily detained and committed under this chapter for whom there is a likelihood of serious harm or who are gravely disabled due to the presence of a substance use disorder. Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities must:

(a) Provide the following services:

(i) Assessment and treatment, provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists;

(ii) Clinical stabilization services;

(iii) Acute or subacute detoxification services for intoxicated individuals; and

(iv) Discharge assistance provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists, including facilitating transitions to appropriate voluntary or involuntary inpatient services or to less restrictive alternatives as appropriate for the individual;

(b) Include security measures sufficient to protect the patients, staff, and community; and

(c) Be licensed or certified as such by the department of health;

(53) "Severe deterioration from safe behavior" means that a person will, if not treated, suffer or continue to suffer severe and abnormal mental, emotional, or physical distress, and this distress is associated with significant impairment of judgment, reason, or behavior;

(54) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further advanced degree from a social work educational program accredited and approved as provided in RCW 18.320.010;

(55) "Substance use disorder" means a cluster of cognitive, behavioral, and physiological symptoms indicating that an individual continues using the substance despite significant substance-related problems. The diagnosis of a substance use disorder is based on a pathological pattern of behaviors related to the use of the substances;

(56) "Substance use disorder professional" means a person certified as a substance use disorder professional by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW;

(57) "Therapeutic court personnel" means the staff of a mental health court or other therapeutic court which has jurisdiction over defendants who are dually diagnosed with mental disorders, including court personnel, probation officers, a court monitor, prosecuting attorney, or defense counsel acting within the scope of therapeutic court duties;

(58) "Treatment records" include registration and all other records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time have received services for behavioral health disorders, which are maintained by the department of social and health services, the department, the authority, behavioral health administrative services organizations and their staffs, managed care organizations and their staffs, and by treatment facilities. Treatment records include mental health information contained in a medical bill including but not limited to mental health drugs, a mental health diagnosis, provider name, and dates of service stemming from a medical service. Treatment records do not include notes or records maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment services for the department of social and health services, the department, the authority, behavioral health administrative services organizations, managed care organizations, or a treatment facility if the notes or records are not available to others;

(59) "Tribe" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.24.025;

(60) "Video," unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, means the delivery of behavioral health services through the use of interactive audio and video technology, permitting real-time communication between a person and a designated crisis responder, for the purpose of evaluation. "Video" does not include the use of audio-only telephone, facsimile, email, or store and forward technology. "Store and forward technology" means use of an asynchronous transmission of a person's medical information from a mental health service provider to the designated crisis responder which results in medical diagnosis, consultation, or treatment;

(((60)))(61) "Violent act" means behavior that resulted in homicide, attempted suicide, injury, or substantial loss or damage to property.

Sec. 7. RCW 71.34.020 and 2023 c 433 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Admission" or "admit" means a decision by a physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner that a minor should be examined or treated as a patient in a hospital.

(2) "Adolescent" means a minor thirteen years of age or older.

(3) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning.

(4) "Antipsychotic medications" means that class of drugs primarily used to treat serious manifestations of mental illness associated with thought disorders, which includes, but is not limited to, atypical antipsychotic medications.

(5) "Approved substance use disorder treatment program" means a program for minors with substance use disorders provided by a treatment program licensed or certified by the department of health as meeting standards adopted under chapter 71.24 RCW.

(6) "Attending staff" means any person on the staff of a public or private agency having responsibility for the care and treatment of a minor patient.

(7) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.

(8) "Behavioral health administrative services organization" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.24.025.

(9) "Behavioral health disorder" means either a mental disorder as defined in this section, a substance use disorder as defined in this section, or a co-occurring mental disorder and substance use disorder.

(10) "Child psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician and surgeon in this state, who has had graduate training in child psychiatry in a program approved by the American Medical Association or the American Osteopathic Association, and who is board eligible or board certified in child psychiatry.

(11) "Children's mental health specialist" means:

(a) A mental health professional who has completed a minimum of one hundred actual hours, not quarter or semester hours, of specialized training devoted to the study of child development and the treatment of children; and

(b) A mental health professional who has the equivalent of one year of full-time experience in the treatment of children under the supervision of a children's mental health specialist.

(12) "Commitment" means a determination by a judge or court commissioner, made after a commitment hearing, that the minor is in need of inpatient diagnosis, evaluation, or treatment or that the minor is in need of less restrictive alternative treatment.

(13) "Conditional release" means a revocable modification of a commitment, which may be revoked upon violation of any of its terms.

(14) "Co-occurring disorder specialist" means an individual possessing an enhancement granted by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW that certifies the individual to provide substance use disorder counseling subject to the practice limitations under RCW 18.205.105.

(15) "Crisis stabilization unit" means a short-term facility or a portion of a facility licensed or certified by the department of health under RCW 71.24.035, such as a residential treatment facility or a hospital, which has been designed to assess, diagnose, and treat individuals experiencing an acute crisis without the use of long-term hospitalization, or to determine the need for involuntary commitment of an individual.

(16) "Custody" means involuntary detention under the provisions of this chapter or chapter 10.77 RCW, uninterrupted by any period of unconditional release from commitment from a facility providing involuntary care and treatment.

(17) "Department" means the department of social and health services.

(18) "Designated crisis responder" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.05.020.

(19) "Detention" or "detain" means the lawful confinement of a person, under the provisions of this chapter.

(20) "Developmental disabilities professional" means a person who has specialized training and three years of experience in directly treating or working with persons with developmental disabilities and is a psychiatrist, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or social worker, and such other developmental disabilities professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary of the department.

(21) "Developmental disability" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 71A.10.020.

(22) "Director" means the director of the authority.

(23) "Discharge" means the termination of hospital medical authority. The commitment may remain in place, be terminated, or be amended by court order.

(24) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means a public or private facility or unit that is licensed or certified by the department of health to provide emergency, inpatient, residential, or outpatient mental health evaluation and treatment services for minors. A physically separate and separately operated portion of a state hospital may be designated as an evaluation and treatment facility for minors. A facility which is part of or operated by the state or federal agency does not require licensure or certification. No correctional institution or facility, juvenile court detention facility, or jail may be an evaluation and treatment facility within the meaning of this chapter.

(25) "Evaluation and treatment program" means the total system of services and facilities coordinated and approved by a county or combination of counties for the evaluation and treatment of minors under this chapter.

(26) "Gravely disabled minor" means a minor who, as a result of a behavioral health disorder, (a) is in danger of serious physical harm resulting from a failure to provide for his or her essential human needs of health or safety, or (b) manifests severe deterioration in routine functioning evidenced by repeated and escalating loss of cognitive or volitional control over his or her actions and is not receiving such care as is essential for his or her health or safety.

(27) "Habilitative services" means those services provided by program personnel to assist minors in acquiring and maintaining life skills and in raising their levels of physical, behavioral, social, and vocational functioning. Habilitative services include education, training for employment, and therapy.

(28) "Hearing" means any proceeding conducted in open court that conforms to the requirements of RCW 71.34.910.

(29) "History of one or more violent acts" refers to the period of time five years prior to the filing of a petition under this chapter, excluding any time spent, but not any violent acts committed, in a mental health facility, a long-term substance use disorder treatment facility, or in confinement as a result of a criminal conviction.

(30) "Individualized service plan" means a plan prepared by a developmental disabilities professional with other professionals as a team, for a person with developmental disabilities, which states:

(a) The nature of the person's specific problems, prior charged criminal behavior, and habilitation needs;

(b) The conditions and strategies necessary to achieve the purposes of habilitation;

(c) The intermediate and long-range goals of the habilitation program, with a projected timetable for the attainment;

(d) The rationale for using this plan of habilitation to achieve those intermediate and long-range goals;

(e) The staff responsible for carrying out the plan;

(f) Where relevant in light of past criminal behavior and due consideration for public safety, the criteria for proposed movement to less-restrictive settings, criteria for proposed eventual discharge or release, and a projected possible date for discharge or release; and

(g) The type of residence immediately anticipated for the person and possible future types of residences.

(31)(a) "Inpatient treatment" means twenty-four-hour-per-day mental health care provided within a general hospital, psychiatric hospital, residential treatment facility licensed or certified by the department of health as an evaluation and treatment facility for minors, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility for minors, or approved substance use disorder treatment program for minors.

(b) For purposes of family-initiated treatment under RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670, "inpatient treatment" has the meaning included in (a) of this subsection and any other residential treatment facility licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW.

(32) "Intoxicated minor" means a minor whose mental or physical functioning is substantially impaired as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals.

(33) "Judicial commitment" means a commitment by a court pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

(34) "Kinship caregiver" has the same meaning as in RCW 74.13.031(((19)(a)))(22)(a).

(35) "Legal counsel" means attorneys and staff employed by county prosecutor offices or the state attorney general acting in their capacity as legal representatives of public behavioral health service providers under RCW 71.05.130.

(36) "Less restrictive alternative" or "less restrictive setting" means outpatient treatment provided to a minor as a program of individualized treatment in a less restrictive setting than inpatient treatment that includes the services described in RCW 71.34.755, including residential treatment.

(37) "Licensed physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine and surgery in the state of Washington.

(38) "Likelihood of serious harm" means:

(a) A substantial risk that: (i) Physical harm will be inflicted by a minor upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on oneself; (ii) physical harm will be inflicted by a minor upon another individual, as evidenced by behavior which has caused such harm or which places another person or persons in reasonable fear of sustaining such harm; or (iii) physical harm will be inflicted by a minor upon the property of others, as evidenced by behavior which has caused substantial loss or damage to the property of others; or

(b) The minor has threatened the physical safety of another and has a history of one or more violent acts.

(39) "Managed care organization" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.24.025.

(40) "Medical clearance" means a physician or other health care provider, including an Indian health care provider, has determined that a person is medically stable and ready for referral to the designated crisis responder or facility. For a person presenting in the community, no medical clearance is required prior to investigation by a designated crisis responder.

(41) "Medical necessity" for inpatient care means a requested service which is reasonably calculated to: (a) Diagnose, correct, cure, or alleviate a mental disorder or substance use disorder; or (b) prevent the progression of a mental disorder or substance use disorder that endangers life or causes suffering and pain, or results in illness or infirmity or threatens to cause or aggravate a disability, or causes physical deformity or malfunction, and there is no adequate less restrictive alternative available.

(42) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional impairment that has substantial adverse effects on an individual's cognitive or volitional functions. The presence of alcohol abuse, drug abuse, juvenile criminal history, antisocial behavior, or intellectual disabilities alone is insufficient to justify a finding of "mental disorder" within the meaning of this section.

(43) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric nurse, social worker, and such other mental health professionals as defined by rules adopted by the secretary of the department of health under this chapter.

(44) "Minor" means any person under the age of eighteen years.

(45) "Outpatient treatment" means any of the nonresidential services mandated under chapter 71.24 RCW and provided by licensed or certified behavioral health agencies as identified by RCW 71.24.025.

(46)(a) "Parent" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 26.26A.010, including either parent if custody is shared under a joint custody agreement, or a person or agency judicially appointed as legal guardian or custodian of the child.

(b) For purposes of family-initiated treatment under RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670, "parent" also includes a person to whom a parent defined in (a) of this subsection has given a signed authorization to make health care decisions for the adolescent, a stepparent who is involved in caring for the adolescent, a kinship caregiver who is involved in caring for the adolescent, or another relative who is responsible for the health care of the adolescent, who may be required to provide a declaration under penalty of perjury stating that he or she is a relative responsible for the health care of the adolescent pursuant to chapter 5.50 RCW. If a dispute arises between individuals authorized to act as a parent for the purpose of RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670, the disagreement must be resolved according to the priority established under RCW 7.70.065(2)(a).

(47) "Peace officer" means a law enforcement official of a public agency or governmental unit, and includes persons specifically given peace officer powers by any state law, local ordinance, or judicial order of appointment.

(48) "Physician assistant" means a person licensed as a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW.

(49) "Private agency" means any person, partnership, corporation, or association that is not a public agency, whether or not financed in whole or in part by public funds, that constitutes an evaluation and treatment facility or private institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, that is conducted for, or includes a distinct unit, floor, or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders.

(50) "Professional person in charge" or "professional person" means a physician, other mental health professional, or other person empowered by an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program with authority to make admission and discharge decisions on behalf of that facility.

(51) "Psychiatric nurse" means a registered nurse who has experience in the direct treatment of persons who have a mental illness or who are emotionally disturbed, such experience gained under the supervision of a mental health professional.

(52) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician in this state who has completed residency training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American Medical Association or the American Osteopathic Association, and is board eligible or board certified in psychiatry.

(53) "Psychologist" means a person licensed as a psychologist under chapter 18.83 RCW.

(54) "Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment facility or institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program that is conducted for, or includes a distinct unit, floor, or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders if the agency is operated directly by federal, state, county, or municipal government, or a combination of such governments.

(55) "Release" means legal termination of the commitment under the provisions of this chapter.

(56) "Resource management services" has the meaning given in chapter 71.24 RCW.

(57) "Responsible other" means the minor, the minor's parent or estate, or any other person legally responsible for support of the minor.

(58) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department or secretary's designee.

(59) "Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility" means a facility operated by either a public or private agency or by the program of an agency which provides care to voluntary individuals and individuals involuntarily detained and committed under this chapter for whom there is a likelihood of serious harm or who are gravely disabled due to the presence of a substance use disorder. Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities must:

(a) Provide the following services:

(i) Assessment and treatment, provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists;

(ii) Clinical stabilization services;

(iii) Acute or subacute detoxification services for intoxicated individuals; and

(iv) Discharge assistance provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists, including facilitating transitions to appropriate voluntary or involuntary inpatient services or to less restrictive alternatives as appropriate for the individual;

(b) Include security measures sufficient to protect the patients, staff, and community; and

(c) Be licensed or certified as such by the department of health.

(60) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further advanced degree from a social work educational program accredited and approved as provided in RCW 18.320.010.

(61) "Start of initial detention" means the time of arrival of the minor at the first evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program offering inpatient treatment if the minor is being involuntarily detained at the time. With regard to voluntary patients, "start of initial detention" means the time at which the minor gives notice of intent to leave under the provisions of this chapter.

(62) "Store and forward technology" means use of an asynchronous transmission of a person's medical information from a mental health service provider to the designated crisis responder which results in medical diagnosis, consultation, or treatment.

(63) "Substance use disorder" means a cluster of cognitive, behavioral, and physiological symptoms indicating that an individual continues using the substance despite significant substance-related problems. The diagnosis of a substance use disorder is based on a pathological pattern of behaviors related to the use of the substances.

(64) "Substance use disorder professional" means a person certified as a substance use disorder professional by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW.

(65) "Therapeutic court personnel" means the staff of a mental health court or other therapeutic court which has jurisdiction over defendants who are dually diagnosed with mental disorders, including court personnel, probation officers, a court monitor, prosecuting attorney, or defense counsel acting within the scope of therapeutic court duties.

(66) "Treatment records" include registration and all other records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time have received services for mental illness, which are maintained by the department, the department of health, the authority, behavioral health organizations and their staffs, and by treatment facilities. Treatment records include mental health information contained in a medical bill including but not limited to mental health drugs, a mental health diagnosis, provider name, and dates of service stemming from a medical service. Treatment records do not include notes or records maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment services for the department, the department of health, the authority, behavioral health organizations, or a treatment facility if the notes or records are not available to others.

(67) "Tribe" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.24.025.

(68) "Video" means the delivery of behavioral health services through the use of interactive audio and video technology, permitting real-time communication between a person and a designated crisis responder, for the purpose of evaluation. "Video" does not include the use of audio-only telephone, facsimile, email, or store and forward technology.

(((68)))(69) "Violent act" means behavior that resulted in homicide, attempted suicide, injury, or substantial loss or damage to property.

Sec. 8. RCW 71.34.020 and 2023 c 433 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Admission" or "admit" means a decision by a physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner that a minor should be examined or treated as a patient in a hospital.

(2) "Adolescent" means a minor thirteen years of age or older.

(3) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning.

(4) "Antipsychotic medications" means that class of drugs primarily used to treat serious manifestations of mental illness associated with thought disorders, which includes, but is not limited to, atypical antipsychotic medications.

(5) "Approved substance use disorder treatment program" means a program for minors with substance use disorders provided by a treatment program licensed or certified by the department of health as meeting standards adopted under chapter 71.24 RCW.

(6) "Attending staff" means any person on the staff of a public or private agency having responsibility for the care and treatment of a minor patient.

(7) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.

(8) "Behavioral health administrative services organization" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.24.025.

(9) "Behavioral health disorder" means either a mental disorder as defined in this section, a substance use disorder as defined in this section, or a co-occurring mental disorder and substance use disorder.

(10) "Child psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician and surgeon in this state, who has had graduate training in child psychiatry in a program approved by the American Medical Association or the American Osteopathic Association, and who is board eligible or board certified in child psychiatry.

(11) "Children's mental health specialist" means:

(a) A mental health professional who has completed a minimum of one hundred actual hours, not quarter or semester hours, of specialized training devoted to the study of child development and the treatment of children; and

(b) A mental health professional who has the equivalent of one year of full-time experience in the treatment of children under the supervision of a children's mental health specialist.

(12) "Commitment" means a determination by a judge or court commissioner, made after a commitment hearing, that the minor is in need of inpatient diagnosis, evaluation, or treatment or that the minor is in need of less restrictive alternative treatment.

(13) "Conditional release" means a revocable modification of a commitment, which may be revoked upon violation of any of its terms.

(14) "Co-occurring disorder specialist" means an individual possessing an enhancement granted by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW that certifies the individual to provide substance use disorder counseling subject to the practice limitations under RCW 18.205.105.

(15) "Crisis stabilization unit" means a short-term facility or a portion of a facility licensed or certified by the department of health under RCW 71.24.035, such as a residential treatment facility or a hospital, which has been designed to assess, diagnose, and treat individuals experiencing an acute crisis without the use of long-term hospitalization, or to determine the need for involuntary commitment of an individual.

(16) "Custody" means involuntary detention under the provisions of this chapter or chapter 10.77 RCW, uninterrupted by any period of unconditional release from commitment from a facility providing involuntary care and treatment.

(17) "Department" means the department of social and health services.

(18) "Designated crisis responder" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.05.020.

(19) "Detention" or "detain" means the lawful confinement of a person, under the provisions of this chapter.

(20) "Developmental disabilities professional" means a person who has specialized training and three years of experience in directly treating or working with persons with developmental disabilities and is a psychiatrist, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or social worker, and such other developmental disabilities professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary of the department.

(21) "Developmental disability" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 71A.10.020.

(22) "Director" means the director of the authority.

(23) "Discharge" means the termination of hospital medical authority. The commitment may remain in place, be terminated, or be amended by court order.

(24) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means a public or private facility or unit that is licensed or certified by the department of health to provide emergency, inpatient, residential, or outpatient mental health evaluation and treatment services for minors. A physically separate and separately operated portion of a state hospital may be designated as an evaluation and treatment facility for minors. A facility which is part of or operated by the state or federal agency does not require licensure or certification. No correctional institution or facility, juvenile court detention facility, or jail may be an evaluation and treatment facility within the meaning of this chapter.

(25) "Evaluation and treatment program" means the total system of services and facilities coordinated and approved by a county or combination of counties for the evaluation and treatment of minors under this chapter.

(26) "Gravely disabled minor" means a minor who, as a result of a behavioral health disorder, (a) is in danger of serious physical harm resulting from a failure to provide for his or her essential human needs of health or safety, or (b) manifests severe deterioration from safe behavior evidenced by repeated and escalating loss of cognitive or volitional control over his or her actions and is not receiving such care as is essential for his or her health or safety.

(27) "Habilitative services" means those services provided by program personnel to assist minors in acquiring and maintaining life skills and in raising their levels of physical, behavioral, social, and vocational functioning. Habilitative services include education, training for employment, and therapy.

(28) "Hearing" means any proceeding conducted in open court that conforms to the requirements of RCW 71.34.910.

(29) "History of one or more violent acts" refers to the period of time five years prior to the filing of a petition under this chapter, excluding any time spent, but not any violent acts committed, in a mental health facility, a long-term substance use disorder treatment facility, or in confinement as a result of a criminal conviction.

(30) "Individualized service plan" means a plan prepared by a developmental disabilities professional with other professionals as a team, for a person with developmental disabilities, which states:

(a) The nature of the person's specific problems, prior charged criminal behavior, and habilitation needs;

(b) The conditions and strategies necessary to achieve the purposes of habilitation;

(c) The intermediate and long-range goals of the habilitation program, with a projected timetable for the attainment;

(d) The rationale for using this plan of habilitation to achieve those intermediate and long-range goals;

(e) The staff responsible for carrying out the plan;

(f) Where relevant in light of past criminal behavior and due consideration for public safety, the criteria for proposed movement to less-restrictive settings, criteria for proposed eventual discharge or release, and a projected possible date for discharge or release; and

(g) The type of residence immediately anticipated for the person and possible future types of residences.

(31)(a) "Inpatient treatment" means twenty-four-hour-per-day mental health care provided within a general hospital, psychiatric hospital, residential treatment facility licensed or certified by the department of health as an evaluation and treatment facility for minors, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility for minors, or approved substance use disorder treatment program for minors.

(b) For purposes of family-initiated treatment under RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670, "inpatient treatment" has the meaning included in (a) of this subsection and any other residential treatment facility licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW.

(32) "Intoxicated minor" means a minor whose mental or physical functioning is substantially impaired as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals.

(33) "Judicial commitment" means a commitment by a court pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

(34) "Kinship caregiver" has the same meaning as in RCW 74.13.031(((19)(a)))(22)(a).

(35) "Legal counsel" means attorneys and staff employed by county prosecutor offices or the state attorney general acting in their capacity as legal representatives of public behavioral health service providers under RCW 71.05.130.

(36) "Less restrictive alternative" or "less restrictive setting" means outpatient treatment provided to a minor as a program of individualized treatment in a less restrictive setting than inpatient treatment that includes the services described in RCW 71.34.755, including residential treatment.

(37) "Licensed physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine and surgery in the state of Washington.

(38) "Likelihood of serious harm" means:

(a) A substantial risk that: (i) Physical harm will be inflicted by a minor upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on oneself; (ii) physical harm will be inflicted by a minor upon another individual, as evidenced by behavior which has caused harm, substantial pain, or which places another person or persons in reasonable fear of harm to themselves or others; or (iii) physical harm will be inflicted by a minor upon the property of others, as evidenced by behavior which has caused substantial loss or damage to the property of others; or

(b) The minor has threatened the physical safety of another and has a history of one or more violent acts.

(39) "Managed care organization" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.24.025.

(40) "Medical clearance" means a physician or other health care provider, including an Indian health care provider, has determined that a person is medically stable and ready for referral to the designated crisis responder or facility. For a person presenting in the community, no medical clearance is required prior to investigation by a designated crisis responder.

(41) "Medical necessity" for inpatient care means a requested service which is reasonably calculated to: (a) Diagnose, correct, cure, or alleviate a mental disorder or substance use disorder; or (b) prevent the progression of a mental disorder or substance use disorder that endangers life or causes suffering and pain, or results in illness or infirmity or threatens to cause or aggravate a disability, or causes physical deformity or malfunction, and there is no adequate less restrictive alternative available.

(42) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional impairment that has substantial adverse effects on an individual's cognitive or volitional functions. The presence of alcohol abuse, drug abuse, juvenile criminal history, antisocial behavior, or intellectual disabilities alone is insufficient to justify a finding of "mental disorder" within the meaning of this section.

(43) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric nurse, social worker, and such other mental health professionals as defined by rules adopted by the secretary of the department of health under this chapter.

(44) "Minor" means any person under the age of eighteen years.

(45) "Outpatient treatment" means any of the nonresidential services mandated under chapter 71.24 RCW and provided by licensed or certified behavioral health agencies as identified by RCW 71.24.025.

(46)(a) "Parent" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 26.26A.010, including either parent if custody is shared under a joint custody agreement, or a person or agency judicially appointed as legal guardian or custodian of the child.

(b) For purposes of family-initiated treatment under RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670, "parent" also includes a person to whom a parent defined in (a) of this subsection has given a signed authorization to make health care decisions for the adolescent, a stepparent who is involved in caring for the adolescent, a kinship caregiver who is involved in caring for the adolescent, or another relative who is responsible for the health care of the adolescent, who may be required to provide a declaration under penalty of perjury stating that he or she is a relative responsible for the health care of the adolescent pursuant to chapter 5.50 RCW. If a dispute arises between individuals authorized to act as a parent for the purpose of RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670, the disagreement must be resolved according to the priority established under RCW 7.70.065(2)(a).

(47) "Peace officer" means a law enforcement official of a public agency or governmental unit, and includes persons specifically given peace officer powers by any state law, local ordinance, or judicial order of appointment.

(48) "Physician assistant" means a person licensed as a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW.

(49) "Private agency" means any person, partnership, corporation, or association that is not a public agency, whether or not financed in whole or in part by public funds, that constitutes an evaluation and treatment facility or private institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, that is conducted for, or includes a distinct unit, floor, or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders.

(50) "Professional person in charge" or "professional person" means a physician, other mental health professional, or other person empowered by an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program with authority to make admission and discharge decisions on behalf of that facility.

(51) "Psychiatric nurse" means a registered nurse who has experience in the direct treatment of persons who have a mental illness or who are emotionally disturbed, such experience gained under the supervision of a mental health professional.

(52) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician in this state who has completed residency training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American Medical Association or the American Osteopathic Association, and is board eligible or board certified in psychiatry.

(53) "Psychologist" means a person licensed as a psychologist under chapter 18.83 RCW.

(54) "Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment facility or institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program that is conducted for, or includes a distinct unit, floor, or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders if the agency is operated directly by federal, state, county, or municipal government, or a combination of such governments.

(55) "Release" means legal termination of the commitment under the provisions of this chapter.

(56) "Resource management services" has the meaning given in chapter 71.24 RCW.

(57) "Responsible other" means the minor, the minor's parent or estate, or any other person legally responsible for support of the minor.

(58) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department or secretary's designee.

(59) "Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility" means a facility operated by either a public or private agency or by the program of an agency which provides care to voluntary individuals and individuals involuntarily detained and committed under this chapter for whom there is a likelihood of serious harm or who are gravely disabled due to the presence of a substance use disorder. Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities must:

(a) Provide the following services:

(i) Assessment and treatment, provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists;

(ii) Clinical stabilization services;

(iii) Acute or subacute detoxification services for intoxicated individuals; and

(iv) Discharge assistance provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists, including facilitating transitions to appropriate voluntary or involuntary inpatient services or to less restrictive alternatives as appropriate for the individual;

(b) Include security measures sufficient to protect the patients, staff, and community; and

(c) Be licensed or certified as such by the department of health.

(60) "Severe deterioration from safe behavior" means that a person will, if not treated, suffer or continue to suffer severe and abnormal mental, emotional, or physical distress, and this distress is associated with significant impairment of judgment, reason, or behavior.

(61) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further advanced degree from a social work educational program accredited and approved as provided in RCW 18.320.010.

(62) "Start of initial detention" means the time of arrival of the minor at the first evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program offering inpatient treatment if the minor is being involuntarily detained at the time. With regard to voluntary patients, "start of initial detention" means the time at which the minor gives notice of intent to leave under the provisions of this chapter.

(63) "Store and forward technology" means use of an asynchronous transmission of a person's medical information from a mental health service provider to the designated crisis responder which results in medical diagnosis, consultation, or treatment.

(64) "Substance use disorder" means a cluster of cognitive, behavioral, and physiological symptoms indicating that an individual continues using the substance despite significant substance-related problems. The diagnosis of a substance use disorder is based on a pathological pattern of behaviors related to the use of the substances.

(65) "Substance use disorder professional" means a person certified as a substance use disorder professional by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW.

(66) "Therapeutic court personnel" means the staff of a mental health court or other therapeutic court which has jurisdiction over defendants who are dually diagnosed with mental disorders, including court personnel, probation officers, a court monitor, prosecuting attorney, or defense counsel acting within the scope of therapeutic court duties.

(67) "Treatment records" include registration and all other records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time have received services for mental illness, which are maintained by the department, the department of health, the authority, behavioral health organizations and their staffs, and by treatment facilities. Treatment records include mental health information contained in a medical bill including but not limited to mental health drugs, a mental health diagnosis, provider name, and dates of service stemming from a medical service. Treatment records do not include notes or records maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment services for the department, the department of health, the authority, behavioral health organizations, or a treatment facility if the notes or records are not available to others.

(68) "Tribe" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.24.025.

(69) "Video" means the delivery of behavioral health services through the use of interactive audio and video technology, permitting real-time communication between a person and a designated crisis responder, for the purpose of evaluation. "Video" does not include the use of audio-only telephone, facsimile, email, or store and forward technology.

(((69)))(70) "Violent act" means behavior that resulted in homicide, attempted suicide, injury, or substantial loss or damage to property.

Sec. 9. RCW 71.05.148 and 2022 c 210 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person is in need of assisted outpatient treatment if the court finds by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence pursuant to a petition filed under this section that:

(a) The person has a behavioral health disorder;

(b) Based on a clinical determination and in view of the person's treatment history and current behavior, at least one of the following is true:

(i) The person is unlikely to survive safely in the community without supervision and the person's condition is substantially deteriorating; or

(ii) The person is in need of assisted outpatient treatment in order to prevent a relapse or deterioration that would be likely to result in grave disability or a likelihood of serious harm to the person or to others;

(c) The person has a history of lack of compliance with treatment for his or her behavioral health disorder that has:

(i) At least twice within the 36 months prior to the filing of the petition been a significant factor in necessitating hospitalization of the person, or the person's receipt of services in a forensic or other mental health unit of a state or tribal correctional facility or local correctional facility, provided that the 36-month period shall be extended by the length of any hospitalization or incarceration of the person that occurred within the 36-month period;

(ii) At least twice within the 36 months prior to the filing of the petition been a significant factor in necessitating emergency medical care or hospitalization for behavioral health-related medical conditions including overdose, infected abscesses, sepsis, endocarditis, or other maladies, or a significant factor in behavior which resulted in the person's incarceration in a state, tribal, or local correctional facility; or

(iii) Resulted in one or more violent acts, threats, or attempts to cause serious physical harm to the person or another within the 48 months prior to the filing of the petition, provided that the 48-month period shall be extended by the length of any hospitalization or incarceration of the person that occurred during the 48-month period;

(d) Participation in an assisted outpatient treatment program would be the least restrictive alternative necessary to ensure the person's recovery and stability; and

(e) The person will benefit from assisted outpatient treatment.

(2) The following individuals may directly file a petition for less restrictive alternative treatment on the basis that a person is in need of assisted outpatient treatment:

(a) The director of a hospital where the person is hospitalized or the director's designee;

(b) The director of a behavioral health service provider providing behavioral health care or residential services to the person or the director's designee;

(c) The person's treating mental health professional or substance use disorder professional or one who has evaluated the person;

(d) A designated crisis responder;

(e) A release planner from a corrections facility; or

(f) An emergency room physician.

(3) A court order for less restrictive alternative treatment on the basis that the person is in need of assisted outpatient treatment may be effective for up to 18 months. The petitioner must personally interview the person, unless the person refuses an interview, to determine whether the person will voluntarily receive appropriate treatment.

(4) The petitioner must allege specific facts based on personal observation, evaluation, or investigation, and must consider the reliability or credibility of any person providing information material to the petition.

(5) The petition must include:

(a) A statement of the circumstances under which the person's condition was made known and the basis for the opinion, from personal observation or investigation, that the person is in need of assisted outpatient treatment. The petitioner must state which specific facts come from personal observation and specify what other sources of information the petitioner has relied upon to form this belief;

(b) A declaration from a physician, physician assistant, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or the person's treating mental health professional or substance use disorder professional, who has examined the person no more than 10 days prior to the submission of the petition and who is willing to testify in support of the petition, or who alternatively has made appropriate attempts to examine the person within the same period but has not been successful in obtaining the person's cooperation, and who is willing to testify to the reasons they believe that the person meets the criteria for assisted outpatient treatment. If the declaration is provided by the person's treating mental health professional or substance use disorder professional, it must be cosigned by a supervising physician, physician assistant, or advanced registered nurse practitioner who certifies that they have reviewed the declaration;

(c) The declarations of additional witnesses, if any, supporting the petition for assisted outpatient treatment;

(d) The name of an agency, provider, or facility that agrees to provide less restrictive alternative treatment if the petition is granted by the court; and

(e) If the person is detained in a state hospital, inpatient treatment facility, jail, or correctional facility at the time the petition is filed, the anticipated release date of the person and any other details needed to facilitate successful reentry and transition into the community.

(6)(a) Upon receipt of a petition meeting all requirements of this section, the court shall fix a date for a hearing:

(i) No sooner than three days or later than seven days after the date of service or as stipulated by the parties or, upon a showing of good cause, no later than 30 days after the date of service; or

(ii) If the respondent is hospitalized at the time of filing of the petition, before discharge of the respondent and in sufficient time to arrange for a continuous transition from inpatient treatment to assisted outpatient treatment.

(b) A copy of the petition and notice of hearing shall be served, in the same manner as a summons, on the petitioner, the respondent, the qualified professional whose affidavit accompanied the petition, a current provider, if any, and a surrogate decision maker or agent under chapter 71.32 RCW, if any.

(c) If the respondent has a surrogate decision maker or agent under chapter 71.32 RCW who wishes to provide testimony at the hearing, the court shall afford the surrogate decision maker or agent an opportunity to testify.

(d) The respondent shall be represented by counsel at all stages of the proceedings.

(e) If the respondent fails to appear at the hearing after notice, the court may conduct the hearing in the respondent's absence; provided that the respondent's counsel is present.

(f) If the respondent has refused to be examined by the qualified professional whose affidavit accompanied the petition, the court may order a mental examination of the respondent. The examination of the respondent may be performed by the qualified professional whose affidavit accompanied the petition. If the examination is performed by another qualified professional, the examining qualified professional shall be authorized to consult with the qualified professional whose affidavit accompanied the petition.

(g) If the respondent has refused to be examined by a qualified professional and the court finds reasonable grounds to believe that the allegations of the petition are true, the court may issue a written order directing a peace officer who has completed crisis intervention training to detain and transport the respondent to a provider for examination by a qualified professional. A respondent detained pursuant to this subsection shall be detained no longer than necessary to complete the examination and in no event longer than 24 hours.

(7) If the petition involves a person whom the petitioner or behavioral health administrative services organization knows, or has reason to know, is an American Indian or Alaska Native who receives medical or behavioral health services from a tribe within this state, the petitioner or behavioral health administrative services organization shall notify the tribe and Indian health care provider. Notification shall be made in person or by telephonic or electronic communication to the tribal contact listed in the authority's tribal crisis coordination plan as soon as possible, but before the hearing and no later than 24 hours from the time the petition is served upon the person and the person's guardian. The notice to the tribe or Indian health care provider must include a copy of the petition, together with any orders issued by the court and a notice of the tribe's right to intervene. The court clerk shall provide copies of any court orders necessary for the petitioner or the behavioral health administrative services organization to provide notice to the tribe or Indian health care provider under this section.

(8) A petition for assisted outpatient treatment filed under this section shall be adjudicated under RCW 71.05.240.

(9) After January 1, 2023, a petition for assisted outpatient treatment must be filed on forms developed by the administrative office of the courts.

Sec. 10. RCW 71.34.815 and 2022 c 210 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An adolescent is in need of assisted outpatient treatment if the court finds by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence in response to a petition filed under this section that:

(a) The adolescent has a behavioral health disorder;

(b) Based on a clinical determination and in view of the adolescent's treatment history and current behavior, at least one of the following is true:

(i) The adolescent is unlikely to survive safely in the community without supervision and the adolescent's condition is substantially deteriorating; or

(ii) The adolescent is in need of assisted outpatient treatment in order to prevent a relapse or deterioration that would be likely to result in grave disability or a likelihood of serious harm to the adolescent or to others;

(c) The adolescent has a history of lack of compliance with treatment for his or her behavioral health disorder that has:

(i) At least twice within the 36 months prior to the filing of the petition been a significant factor in necessitating hospitalization of the adolescent, or the adolescent's receipt of services in a forensic or other mental health unit of a state ((correctional facility or)), local, or tribal correctional facility, provided that the 36-month period shall be extended by the length of any hospitalization or incarceration of the adolescent that occurred within the 36-month period;

(ii) At least twice within the 36 months prior to the filing of the petition been a significant factor in necessitating emergency medical care or hospitalization for behavioral health-related medical conditions including overdose, infected abscesses, sepsis, endocarditis, or other maladies, or a significant factor in behavior which resulted in the adolescent's incarceration in a state ((or)), local, or tribal correctional facility; or

(iii) Resulted in one or more violent acts, threats, or attempts to cause serious physical harm to the adolescent or another within the 48 months prior to the filing of the petition, provided that the 48-month period shall be extended by the length of any hospitalization or incarceration of the person that occurred during the 48-month period;

(d) Participation in an assisted outpatient treatment program would be the least restrictive alternative necessary to ensure the adolescent's recovery and stability; and

(e) The adolescent will benefit from assisted outpatient treatment.

(2) The following individuals may directly file a petition for less restrictive alternative treatment on the basis that an adolescent is in need of assisted outpatient treatment:

(a) The director of a hospital where the adolescent is hospitalized or the director's designee;

(b) The director of a behavioral health service provider providing behavioral health care or residential services to the adolescent or the director's designee;

(c) The adolescent's treating mental health professional or substance use disorder professional or one who has evaluated the person;

(d) A designated crisis responder;

(e) A release planner from a juvenile detention or rehabilitation facility; or

(f) An emergency room physician.

(3) A court order for less restrictive alternative treatment on the basis that the adolescent is in need of assisted outpatient treatment may be effective for up to 18 months. The petitioner must personally interview the adolescent, unless the adolescent refuses an interview, to determine whether the adolescent will voluntarily receive appropriate treatment.

(4) The petitioner must allege specific facts based on personal observation, evaluation, or investigation, and must consider the reliability or credibility of any person providing information material to the petition.

(5) The petition must include:

(a) A statement of the circumstances under which the adolescent's condition was made known and the basis for the opinion, from personal observation or investigation, that the adolescent is in need of assisted outpatient treatment. The petitioner must state which specific facts come from personal observation and specify what other sources of information the petitioner has relied upon to form this belief;

(b) A declaration from a physician, physician assistant, or advanced registered nurse practitioner, or the adolescent's treating mental health professional or substance use disorder professional, who has examined the adolescent no more than 10 days prior to the submission of the petition and who is willing to testify in support of the petition, or who alternatively has made appropriate attempts to examine the adolescent within the same period but has not been successful in obtaining the adolescent's cooperation, and who is willing to testify to the reasons they believe that the adolescent meets the criteria for assisted outpatient treatment. If the declaration is provided by the adolescent's treating mental health professional or substance use disorder professional, it must be cosigned by a supervising physician, physician assistant, or advanced registered nurse practitioner who certifies that they have reviewed the declaration;

(c) The declarations of additional witnesses, if any, supporting the petition for assisted outpatient treatment;

(d) The name of an agency, provider, or facility that agrees to provide less restrictive alternative treatment if the petition is granted by the court; and

(e) If the adolescent is detained in a state hospital, inpatient treatment facility, or juvenile detention or rehabilitation facility at the time the petition is filed, the anticipated release date of the adolescent and any other details needed to facilitate successful reentry and transition into the community.

(6)(a) Upon receipt of a petition meeting all requirements of this section, the court shall fix a date for a hearing:

(i) No sooner than three days or later than seven days after the date of service or as stipulated by the parties or, upon a showing of good cause, no later than 30 days after the date of service; or

(ii) If the adolescent is hospitalized at the time of filing of the petition, before discharge of the adolescent and in sufficient time to arrange for a continuous transition from inpatient treatment to assisted outpatient treatment.

(b) A copy of the petition and notice of hearing shall be served, in the same manner as a summons, on the petitioner, the adolescent, the qualified professional whose affidavit accompanied the petition, a current provider, if any, and a surrogate decision maker or agent under chapter 71.32 RCW, if any.

(c) If the adolescent has a surrogate decision maker or agent under chapter 71.32 RCW who wishes to provide testimony at the hearing, the court shall afford the surrogate decision maker or agent an opportunity to testify.

(d) The adolescent shall be represented by counsel at all stages of the proceedings.

(e) If the adolescent fails to appear at the hearing after notice, the court may conduct the hearing in the adolescent's absence; provided that the adolescent's counsel is present.

(f) If the adolescent has refused to be examined by the qualified professional whose affidavit accompanied the petition, the court may order a mental examination of the adolescent. The examination of the adolescent may be performed by the qualified professional whose affidavit accompanied the petition. If the examination is performed by another qualified professional, the examining qualified professional shall be authorized to consult with the qualified professional whose affidavit accompanied the petition.

(g) If the adolescent has refused to be examined by a qualified professional and the court finds reasonable grounds to believe that the allegations of the petition are true, the court may issue a written order directing a peace officer who has completed crisis intervention training to detain and transport the adolescent to a provider for examination by a qualified professional. An adolescent detained pursuant to this subsection shall be detained no longer than necessary to complete the examination and in no event longer than 24 hours. All papers in the court file must be provided to the adolescent's designated attorney.

(7) If the petition involves an adolescent whom the petitioner or behavioral health administrative services organization knows, or has reason to know, is an American Indian or Alaska Native who receives medical or behavioral health services from a tribe within this state, the petitioner or behavioral health administrative services organization shall notify the tribe and Indian health care provider. Notification shall be made in person or by telephonic or electronic communication to the tribal contact listed in the authority's tribal crisis coordination plan as soon as possible, but before the hearing and no later than 24 hours from the time the petition is served upon the person and the person's guardian. The notice to the tribe or Indian health care provider must include a copy of the petition, together with any orders issued by the court and a notice of the tribe's right to intervene. The court clerk shall provide copies of any court orders necessary for the petitioner or the behavioral health administrative services organization to provide notice to the tribe or Indian health care provider under this section.

(8) A petition for assisted outpatient treatment filed under this section shall be adjudicated under RCW 71.34.740.

(9) After January 1, 2023, a petition for assisted outpatient treatment must be filed on forms developed by the administrative office of the courts.

Sec. 11. RCW 71.05.150 and 2023 c 433 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a designated crisis responder receives information alleging that a person, as a result of a behavioral health disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled, the designated crisis responder may, after investigation and evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the reliability and credibility of any person providing information to initiate detention, if satisfied that the allegations are true and that the person will not voluntarily seek appropriate treatment, file a petition for initial detention under this section. Before filing the petition, the designated crisis responder must personally interview the person, unless the person refuses an interview, and determine whether the person will voluntarily receive appropriate evaluation and treatment at an evaluation and treatment facility, crisis stabilization unit, 23-hour crisis relief center, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program. As part of the assessment, the designated crisis responder must attempt to ascertain if the person has executed a mental health advance directive under chapter 71.32 RCW. The interview performed by the designated crisis responder may be conducted by video provided that a licensed health care professional or professional person who can adequately and accurately assist with obtaining any necessary information is present with the person at the time of the interview.

(2)(a) A superior court judge may issue a warrant to detain a person with a behavioral health disorder to a designated evaluation and treatment facility, a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or an approved substance use disorder treatment program, for a period of not more than ((one hundred twenty))120 hours for evaluation and treatment upon request of a designated crisis responder, subject to (d) of this subsection, whenever it appears to the satisfaction of the judge that:

(i) There is probable cause to support the petition; and

(ii) The person has refused or failed to accept appropriate evaluation and treatment voluntarily.

(b) The petition for initial detention, signed under penalty of perjury, or sworn telephonic testimony may be considered by the court in determining whether there are sufficient grounds for issuing the order.

(c) The order shall designate retained counsel or, if counsel is appointed from a list provided by the court, the name, business address, and telephone number of the attorney appointed to represent the person.

(d) A court may not issue an order to detain a person to a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program unless there is an available secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program that has adequate space for the person.

(e) If the court does not issue an order to detain a person pursuant to this subsection (2), the court shall issue an order to dismiss the initial petition.

(3) The designated crisis responder shall then serve or cause to be served on such person and his or her guardian, if any, a copy of the order together with a notice of rights, and a petition for initial detention. After service on such person the designated crisis responder shall file the return of service in court and provide copies of all papers in the court file to the evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, and the designated attorney. The designated crisis responder shall notify the court and the prosecuting attorney that a probable cause hearing will be held within ((one hundred twenty))120 hours of the date and time of outpatient evaluation or admission to the evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program. The person shall be permitted to be accompanied by one or more of his or her relatives, friends, an attorney, a personal physician, or other professional or religious advisor or traditional cultural healer to the place of evaluation. An attorney accompanying the person to the place of evaluation shall be permitted to be present during the admission evaluation. Any other individual accompanying the person may be present during the admission evaluation. The facility may exclude the individual if his or her presence would present a safety risk, delay the proceedings, or otherwise interfere with the evaluation.

(4) The designated crisis responder may notify a peace officer to take such person or cause such person to be taken into custody and placed in an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program. At the time such person is taken into custody there shall commence to be served on such person, his or her guardian, and conservator, if any, a copy of the original order together with a notice of rights and a petition for initial detention.

(5) ((Tribal court orders for involuntary commitment shall be recognized and enforced in accordance with superior court civil rule 82.5.

(6))) In any investigation and evaluation of an individual under this section or RCW 71.05.153 in which the designated crisis responder knows, or has reason to know, that the individual is an American Indian or Alaska Native who receives medical or behavioral health services from a tribe within this state, the designated crisis responder shall notify the tribe and Indian health care provider ((regarding)) whether or not a petition for initial detention or involuntary outpatient treatment will be filed((. Notification))as soon as possible, but no later than three hours from the time the decision is made. If a petition for initial detention or involuntary outpatient treatment is filed, the designated crisis responder must provide the tribe and Indian health care provider with a copy of the petition, together with any orders issued by the court and a notice of the tribe's right to intervene as soon as possible, but before the hearing, and no later than 24 hours from the time the petition is served upon the person and the person's guardian. The court clerk shall provide copies of any court orders necessary for the designated crisis responder to provide notice to the tribe or Indian health care provider under this section. Notification under this section is subject to any federal and state laws and regulations including the requirements in RCW 70.02.230 (2)(ee) and (3) and shall be made in person or by telephonic or electronic communication to the tribal contact listed in the authority's tribal crisis coordination plan ((as soon as possible but no later than three hours subject to the requirements in RCW 70.02.230 (2)(ee) and (3). A designated crisis responder may restrict the release of information as necessary to comply with 42 C.F.R. Part 2)).

Sec. 12. RCW 71.05.150 and 2023 c 433 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a designated crisis responder receives information alleging that a person, as a result of a behavioral health disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled, the designated crisis responder may, after investigation and evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the reliability and credibility of any person providing information to initiate detention, if satisfied that the allegations are true and that the person will not voluntarily seek appropriate treatment, file a petition for initial detention under this section. Before filing the petition, the designated crisis responder must personally interview the person, unless the person refuses an interview, and determine whether the person will voluntarily receive appropriate evaluation and treatment at an evaluation and treatment facility, crisis stabilization unit, 23-hour crisis relief center, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program. As part of the assessment, the designated crisis responder must attempt to ascertain if the person has executed a mental health advance directive under chapter 71.32 RCW. The interview performed by the designated crisis responder may be conducted by video provided that a licensed health care professional or professional person who can adequately and accurately assist with obtaining any necessary information is present with the person at the time of the interview.

(2)(a) A superior court judge may issue a warrant to detain a person with a behavioral health disorder to a designated evaluation and treatment facility, a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or an approved substance use disorder treatment program, for a period of not more than ((one hundred twenty))120 hours for evaluation and treatment upon request of a designated crisis responder whenever it appears to the satisfaction of the judge that:

(i) There is probable cause to support the petition; and

(ii) The person has refused or failed to accept appropriate evaluation and treatment voluntarily.

(b) The petition for initial detention, signed under penalty of perjury, or sworn telephonic testimony may be considered by the court in determining whether there are sufficient grounds for issuing the order.

(c) The order shall designate retained counsel or, if counsel is appointed from a list provided by the court, the name, business address, and telephone number of the attorney appointed to represent the person.

(d) If the court does not issue an order to detain a person pursuant to this subsection (2), the court shall issue an order to dismiss the initial petition.

(3) The designated crisis responder shall then serve or cause to be served on such person and his or her guardian, if any, a copy of the order together with a notice of rights, and a petition for initial detention. After service on such person the designated crisis responder shall file the return of service in court and provide copies of all papers in the court file to the evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, and the designated attorney. The designated crisis responder shall notify the court and the prosecuting attorney that a probable cause hearing will be held within ((one hundred twenty))120 hours of the date and time of outpatient evaluation or admission to the evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program. The person shall be permitted to be accompanied by one or more of his or her relatives, friends, an attorney, a personal physician, or other professional or religious advisor or traditional cultural healer to the place of evaluation. An attorney accompanying the person to the place of evaluation shall be permitted to be present during the admission evaluation. Any other individual accompanying the person may be present during the admission evaluation. The facility may exclude the individual if his or her presence would present a safety risk, delay the proceedings, or otherwise interfere with the evaluation.

(4) The designated crisis responder may notify a peace officer to take such person or cause such person to be taken into custody and placed in an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program. At the time such person is taken into custody there shall commence to be served on such person, his or her guardian, and conservator, if any, a copy of the original order together with a notice of rights and a petition for initial detention.

(5) ((Tribal court orders for involuntary commitment shall be recognized and enforced in accordance with superior court civil rule 82.5.

(6))) In any investigation and evaluation of an individual under this section or RCW 71.05.153 in which the designated crisis responder knows, or has reason to know, that the individual is an American Indian or Alaska Native who receives medical or behavioral health services from a tribe within this state, the designated crisis responder shall notify the tribe and Indian health care provider ((regarding)) whether or not a petition for initial detention or involuntary outpatient treatment will be filed((. Notification))as soon as possible, but no later than three hours from the time the decision is made. If a petition for initial detention or involuntary outpatient treatment is filed, the designated crisis responder must provide the tribe and Indian health care provider with a copy of the petition, together with any orders issued by the court and a notice of the tribe's right to intervene as soon as possible, but before the hearing, and no later than 24 hours from the time the petition is served upon the person and the person's guardian. The court clerk shall provide copies of any court orders necessary for the designated crisis responder to provide notice to the tribe or Indian health care provider under this section. Notification under this section is subject to any federal and state laws and regulations including the requirements in RCW 70.02.230 (2)(ee) and (3) and shall be made in person or by telephonic or electronic communication to the tribal contact listed in the authority's tribal crisis coordination plan ((as soon as possible but no later than three hours subject to the requirements in RCW 70.02.230 (2)(ee) and (3). A designated crisis responder may restrict the release of information as necessary to comply with 42 C.F.R. Part 2)).

Sec. 13. RCW 71.34.710 and 2021 c 264 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) When a designated crisis responder receives information that an adolescent as a result of a behavioral health disorder presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled, has investigated the specific facts alleged and of the credibility of the person or persons providing the information, and has determined that voluntary admission for inpatient treatment is not possible, the designated crisis responder may take the adolescent, or cause the adolescent to be taken, into custody and transported to an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program providing inpatient treatment.

A secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program must be available and have adequate space for the adolescent.

(b) If a designated crisis responder decides not to detain an adolescent for evaluation and treatment under RCW 71.34.700(2), or ((forty-eight))48 hours have elapsed since a designated crisis responder received a request for investigation and the designated crisis responder has not taken action to have the adolescent detained, an immediate family member or guardian or conservator of the adolescent, or a ((federally recognized Indian)) tribe if the person is a member of such tribe, may petition the superior court for the adolescent's detention using the procedures under RCW 71.05.201 and 71.05.203; however, when the court enters an order of initial detention, except as otherwise expressly stated in this chapter, all procedures must be followed as if the order has been entered under (a) of this subsection.

(c) The interview performed by the designated crisis responder may be conducted by video provided that a licensed health care professional or professional person who can adequately and accurately assist with obtaining any necessary information is present with the person at the time of the interview.

(2)(a) Within ((twelve))12 hours of the adolescent's arrival at the evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, the designated crisis responder shall serve or cause to be served on the adolescent a copy of the petition for initial detention, notice of initial detention, and statement of rights. The designated crisis responder shall file with the court on the next judicial day following the initial detention the original petition for initial detention, notice of initial detention, and statement of rights along with an affidavit of service. The designated crisis responder shall commence service of the petition for initial detention and notice of the initial detention on the adolescent's parent and the adolescent's attorney as soon as possible following the initial detention.

(b) The facility or program may serve the adolescent, notify the adolescent's parents and the adolescent's attorney, and file with the court on the next judicial day following the initial detention the original petition for initial detention, notice of initial detention, and statement of rights along with an affidavit of service when filing with the court at the request of the designated crisis responder.

(3)(a) At the time of initial detention, the designated crisis responder shall advise the adolescent both orally and in writing that if admitted to the evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program for inpatient treatment, a commitment hearing shall be held within ((one hundred twenty))120 hours of the adolescent's provisional acceptance to determine whether probable cause exists to commit the adolescent for further treatment.

(b) The adolescent shall be advised that he or she has a right to communicate immediately with an attorney and that he or she has a right to have an attorney appointed to represent him or her before and at the hearing if the adolescent is indigent.

(4) Subject to subsection (5) of this section, whenever the designated crisis responder petitions for detention of an adolescent under this chapter, an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program providing ((one hundred twenty))120-hour evaluation and treatment must immediately accept on a provisional basis the petition and the person. Within ((twenty-four))24 hours of the adolescent's arrival, the facility must evaluate the adolescent's condition and either admit or release the adolescent in accordance with this chapter.

(5) A designated crisis responder may not petition for detention of an adolescent to a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program unless there is a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program available and that has adequate space for the adolescent.

(6) If an adolescent is not approved for admission by the inpatient evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, the facility shall make such recommendations and referrals for further care and treatment of the adolescent as necessary.

(7) Dismissal of a commitment petition is not the appropriate remedy for a violation of the timeliness requirements of this section, based on the purpose of this chapter under RCW 71.34.010, except in the few cases where the facility staff or the designated crisis responder have totally disregarded the requirements of this section.

(8) ((Tribal court orders for involuntary commitment shall be recognized and enforced in accordance with superior court civil rule 82.5.

(9))) In any investigation and evaluation of ((a juvenile))an adolescent under this section in which the designated crisis responder knows, or has reason to know, that the ((juvenile))adolescent is an American Indian or Alaska Native who receives medical or behavioral health services from a tribe within this state, the designated crisis responder shall notify the tribe and the Indian health care provider ((regarding)) whether or not a petition for initial detention or involuntary outpatient treatment will be filed((. Notification))as soon as possible, but no later than three hours from the time the decision is made. If a petition for initial detention or involuntary outpatient treatment is filed, the designated crisis responder must provide the tribe with a copy of the petition, together with any orders issued by the court and a notice of the tribe's right to intervene as soon as possible, but before the hearing, and no later than 24 hours from the time the petition is served upon the person and the person's guardian. The court clerk shall provide copies of any court orders necessary for the designated crisis responder to provide notice to the tribe or Indian health care provider under this section. Notification under this section is subject to any federal and state laws and regulations including the requirements in RCW 70.02.240 and shall be made in person or by telephonic or electronic communication to the tribal contact listed in the authority's tribal crisis coordination plan ((as soon as possible but no later than three hours subject to the requirements in RCW 70.02.230 (2)(ee) and (3). A designated crisis responder may restrict the release of information as necessary to comply with 42 C.F.R. Part 2)).

Sec. 14. RCW 71.34.710 and 2021 c 264 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) When a designated crisis responder receives information that an adolescent as a result of a behavioral health disorder presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled, has investigated the specific facts alleged and of the credibility of the person or persons providing the information, and has determined that voluntary admission for inpatient treatment is not possible, the designated crisis responder may take the adolescent, or cause the adolescent to be taken, into custody and transported to an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program providing inpatient treatment.

(b) If a designated crisis responder decides not to detain an adolescent for evaluation and treatment under RCW 71.34.700(2), or ((forty-eight))48 hours have elapsed since a designated crisis responder received a request for investigation and the designated crisis responder has not taken action to have the adolescent detained, an immediate family member or guardian or conservator of the adolescent, or a ((federally recognized Indian)) tribe if the person is a member of such tribe, may petition the superior court for the adolescent's detention using the procedures under RCW 71.05.201 and 71.05.203; however, when the court enters an order of initial detention, except as otherwise expressly stated in this chapter, all procedures must be followed as if the order has been entered under (a) of this subsection.

(c) The interview performed by the designated crisis responder may be conducted by video provided that a licensed health care professional or professional person who can adequately and accurately assist with obtaining any necessary information is present with the person at the time of the interview.

(2)(a) Within ((twelve))12 hours of the adolescent's arrival at the evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, the designated crisis responder shall serve or cause to be served on the adolescent a copy of the petition for initial detention, notice of initial detention, and statement of rights. The designated crisis responder shall file with the court on the next judicial day following the initial detention the original petition for initial detention, notice of initial detention, and statement of rights along with an affidavit of service. The designated crisis responder shall commence service of the petition for initial detention and notice of the initial detention on the adolescent's parent and the adolescent's attorney as soon as possible following the initial detention.

(b) The facility or program may serve the adolescent, notify the adolescent's parents and the adolescent's attorney, and file with the court on the next judicial day following the initial detention the original petition for initial detention, notice of initial detention, and statement of rights along with an affidavit of service when filing with the court at the request of the designated crisis responder.

(3)(a) At the time of initial detention, the designated crisis responder shall advise the adolescent both orally and in writing that if admitted to the evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program for inpatient treatment, a commitment hearing shall be held within ((one hundred twenty))120 hours of the adolescent's provisional acceptance to determine whether probable cause exists to commit the adolescent for further treatment.

(b) The adolescent shall be advised that he or she has a right to communicate immediately with an attorney and that he or she has a right to have an attorney appointed to represent him or her before and at the hearing if the adolescent is indigent.

(4) Whenever the designated crisis responder petitions for detention of an adolescent under this chapter, an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program providing ((one hundred twenty))120-hour evaluation and treatment must immediately accept on a provisional basis the petition and the person. Within ((twenty-four))24 hours of the adolescent's arrival, the facility must evaluate the adolescent's condition and either admit or release the adolescent in accordance with this chapter.

(5) If an adolescent is not approved for admission by the inpatient evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, the facility shall make such recommendations and referrals for further care and treatment of the adolescent as necessary.

(6) Dismissal of a commitment petition is not the appropriate remedy for a violation of the timeliness requirements of this section, based on the purpose of this chapter under RCW 71.34.010, except in the few cases where the facility staff or the designated crisis responder have totally disregarded the requirements of this section.

(7) ((Tribal court orders for involuntary commitment shall be recognized and enforced in accordance with superior court civil rule 82.5.

(8))) In any investigation and evaluation of ((a juvenile))an adolescent under this section in which the designated crisis responder knows, or has reason to know, that the ((juvenile))adolescent is an American Indian or Alaska Native who receives medical or behavioral health services from a tribe within this state, the designated crisis responder shall notify the tribe and the Indian health care provider ((regarding)) whether or not a petition for initial detention or involuntary outpatient treatment will be filed((. Notification))as soon as possible, but no later than three hours from the time the decision is made. If a petition for initial detention or involuntary outpatient treatment is filed, the designated crisis responder must provide the tribe with a copy of the petition, together with any orders issued by the court and a notice of the tribe's right to intervene as soon as possible, but before the hearing, and no later than 24 hours from the time the petition is served upon the person and the person's guardian. The court clerk shall provide copies of any court orders necessary for the designated crisis responder to provide notice to the tribe or Indian health care provider under this section. Notification under this section is subject to any federal and state laws and regulations including the requirements in RCW 70.02.240 and shall be made in person or by telephonic or electronic communication to the tribal contact listed in the authority's tribal crisis coordination plan ((as soon as possible but no later than three hours subject to the requirements in RCW 70.02.230 (2)(ee) and (3). A designated crisis responder may restrict the release of information as necessary to comply with 42 C.F.R. Part 2)).

Sec. 15. RCW 71.05.195 and 2020 c 302 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A civil commitment may be initiated under the procedures described in RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153 for a person who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity in a state other than Washington or a tribe and who has fled from detention, commitment, or conditional release in that state or tribe, on the basis of a request by the state or tribe in which the person was found not guilty by reason of insanity for the person to be detained and transferred back to the custody or care of the requesting state or tribe. A finding of likelihood of serious harm or grave disability is not required for a commitment under this section. The detention may occur at either an evaluation and treatment facility or a state hospital. The petition for ((one hundred twenty))120-hour detention filed by the designated crisis responder must be accompanied by the following documents:

(a) A copy of an order for detention, commitment, or conditional release of the person in a state other than Washington or tribe on the basis of a judgment of not guilty by reason of insanity;

(b) A warrant issued by a magistrate in the state or tribe in which the person was found not guilty by reason of insanity indicating that the person has fled from detention, commitment, or conditional release in that state or tribe and authorizing the detention of the person within the state or tribe in which the person was found not guilty by reason of insanity;

(c) A statement from the executive authority of the state or tribe in which the person was found not guilty by reason of insanity requesting that the person be returned to the requesting state or tribe and agreeing to facilitate the transfer of the person to the requesting state or tribe.

(2) The person shall be entitled to a probable cause hearing within the time limits applicable to other detentions under this chapter and shall be afforded the rights described in this chapter including the right to counsel. At the probable cause hearing, the court shall determine the identity of the person and whether the other requirements of this section are met. If the court so finds, the court may order continued detention in a treatment facility for up to ((thirty))30 days for the purpose of the transfer of the person to the custody or care of the requesting state or tribe. The court may order a less restrictive alternative to detention only under conditions which ensure the person's safe transfer to the custody or care of the requesting state or tribe within ((thirty))30 days without undue risk to the safety of the person or others.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "not guilty by reason of insanity" shall be construed to include any provision of law which is generally equivalent to a finding of criminal insanity within the state of Washington; and "state" shall be construed to mean any state, district, or territory of the United States.

Sec. 16. RCW 71.05.201 and 2022 c 210 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If a designated crisis responder decides not to detain a person for evaluation and treatment under RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153 or ((forty-eight))48 hours have elapsed since a designated crisis responder received a request for investigation and the designated crisis responder has not taken action to have the person detained, an immediate family member or guardian of the person, or a ((federally recognized Indian)) tribe if the person is a member of such a tribe, may petition the superior court for the person's initial detention.

(2) A petition under this section must be filed within ((ten))10 calendar days following the designated crisis responder investigation or the request for a designated crisis responder investigation. If more than ((ten))10 days have elapsed, the immediate family member, guardian, ((or)) conservator, or a tribe if the person is a member of such a tribe, may request a new designated crisis responder investigation.

(3)(a) The petition must be filed in the county in which the designated crisis responder investigation occurred or was requested to occur and must be submitted on forms developed by the administrative office of the courts for this purpose. The petition must be accompanied by a sworn declaration from the petitioner, and other witnesses if desired, describing why the person should be detained for evaluation and treatment. The description of why the person should be detained may contain, but is not limited to, the information identified in RCW 71.05.212.

(b) The petition must contain:

(i) A description of the relationship between the petitioner and the person; and

(ii) The date on which an investigation was requested from the designated crisis responder.

(4) The court shall, within one judicial day, review the petition to determine whether the petition raises sufficient evidence to support the allegation. If the court so finds, it shall provide a copy of the petition to the designated crisis responder agency with an order for the agency to provide the court, within one judicial day, with a written sworn statement describing the basis for the decision not to seek initial detention and a copy of all information material to the designated crisis responder's current decision.

(5) Following the filing of the petition and before the court reaches a decision, any person, including a mental health professional, may submit a sworn declaration to the court in support of or in opposition to initial detention.

(6) The court shall dismiss the petition at any time if it finds that a designated crisis responder has filed a petition for the person's initial detention under RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153 or that the person has voluntarily accepted appropriate treatment.

(7) The court must issue a final ruling on the petition within five judicial days after it is filed. After reviewing all of the information provided to the court, the court may enter an order for initial detention if the court finds that: (a) There is probable cause to support a petition for detention; and (b) the person has refused or failed to accept appropriate evaluation and treatment voluntarily. The court shall transmit its final decision to the petitioner.

(8) If the court enters an order for initial detention, it shall provide the order to the designated crisis responder agency and issue a warrant. The designated crisis responder agency serving the jurisdiction of the court must collaborate and coordinate with law enforcement, including tribal law enforcement, regarding apprehensions and detentions under this subsection, including sharing of information relating to risk and which would assist in locating the person. A person may not be detained to jail pursuant to a warrant issued under this subsection. An order for detention under this section should contain the advisement of rights which the person would receive if the person were detained by a designated crisis responder. An order for initial detention under this section expires ((one hundred eighty))180 days from issuance.

(9) Except as otherwise expressly stated in this chapter, all procedures must be followed as if the order had been entered under RCW 71.05.150. RCW 71.05.160 does not apply if detention was initiated under the process set forth in this section.

(10) For purposes of this section, "immediate family member" means a spouse, domestic partner, child, stepchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, or sibling.

Sec. 17. RCW 71.05.212 and 2022 c 210 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever a designated crisis responder or professional person is conducting an evaluation under this chapter, consideration shall include all reasonably available information from credible witnesses and records regarding:

(a) Prior recommendations for evaluation of the need for civil commitments when the recommendation is made pursuant to an evaluation conducted under chapter 10.77 RCW;

(b) Historical behavior, including history of one or more violent acts;

(c) Prior determinations of incompetency or insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW; and

(d) Prior commitments under this chapter.

(2) Credible witnesses may include family members, landlords, neighbors, or others with significant contact and history of involvement with the person. If the designated crisis responder relies upon information from a credible witness in reaching his or her decision to detain the individual, then he or she must provide contact information for any such witness to the prosecutor. The designated crisis responder or prosecutor shall provide notice of the date, time, and location of the probable cause hearing to such a witness.

(3) Symptoms and behavior of the respondent which standing alone would not justify civil commitment may support a finding of grave disability or likelihood of serious harm, or a finding that the person is in need of assisted outpatient treatment, when:

(a) Such symptoms or behavior are closely associated with symptoms or behavior which preceded and led to a past incident of involuntary hospitalization, severe deterioration, or one or more violent acts;

(b) These symptoms or behavior represent a marked and concerning change in the baseline behavior of the respondent; and

(c) Without treatment, the continued deterioration of the respondent is probable.

(4) When conducting an evaluation for offenders identified under RCW 72.09.370, the designated crisis responder or professional person shall consider an offender's history of judicially required or administratively ordered antipsychotic medication while in confinement.

(5) The authority, in consultation with tribes and in coordination with Indian health care providers and the American Indian health commission for Washington state, shall establish written guidelines by December 31, 2024, for conducting culturally appropriate evaluations of American Indians or Alaska Natives.

Sec. 18. RCW 71.05.212 and 2022 c 210 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever a designated crisis responder or professional person is conducting an evaluation under this chapter, consideration shall include all reasonably available information from credible witnesses and records regarding:

(a) Prior recommendations for evaluation of the need for civil commitments when the recommendation is made pursuant to an evaluation conducted under chapter 10.77 RCW;

(b) Historical behavior, including history of one or more violent acts;

(c) Prior determinations of incompetency or insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW; and

(d) Prior commitments under this chapter.

(2) Credible witnesses may include family members, landlords, neighbors, or others with significant contact and history of involvement with the person. If the designated crisis responder relies upon information from a credible witness in reaching his or her decision to detain the individual, then he or she must provide contact information for any such witness to the prosecutor. The designated crisis responder or prosecutor shall provide notice of the date, time, and location of the probable cause hearing to such a witness.

(3) Symptoms and behavior of the respondent which standing alone would not justify civil commitment may support a finding of grave disability or likelihood of serious harm, or a finding that the person is in need of assisted outpatient treatment, when:

(a) Such symptoms or behavior are closely associated with symptoms or behavior which preceded and led to a past incident of involuntary hospitalization, severe deterioration from safe behavior, or one or more violent acts;

(b) These symptoms or behavior represent a marked and concerning change in the baseline behavior of the respondent; and

(c) Without treatment, the continued deterioration of the respondent is probable.

(4) When conducting an evaluation for offenders identified under RCW 72.09.370, the designated crisis responder or professional person shall consider an offender's history of judicially required or administratively ordered antipsychotic medication while in confinement.

(5) The authority, in consultation with tribes and in coordination with Indian health care providers and the American Indian health commission for Washington state, shall establish written guidelines by December 31, 2024, for conducting culturally appropriate evaluations of American Indians or Alaska Natives.

Sec. 19. RCW 71.05.214 and 2020 c 302 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

The authority shall develop statewide protocols to be utilized by professional persons and designated crisis responders in administration of this chapter and chapters 10.77 and 71.34 RCW. The protocols shall be updated at least every three years. The protocols shall provide uniform development and application of criteria in evaluation and commitment recommendations, of persons who have, or are alleged to have, behavioral health disorders and are subject to this chapter.

The initial protocols shall be developed not later than September 1, 1999. The authority shall develop and update the protocols in consultation with representatives of designated crisis responders, the department of social and health services, tribal government, local government, law enforcement, county and city prosecutors, public defenders, and groups concerned with behavioral health disorders. The protocols shall be submitted to the governor and legislature upon adoption by the authority.

Sec. 20. RCW 71.05.217 and 2020 c 302 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Insofar as danger to the individual or others is not created, each person involuntarily detained, treated in a less restrictive alternative course of treatment, or committed for treatment and evaluation pursuant to this chapter shall have, in addition to other rights not specifically withheld by law, the following rights, a list of which shall be prominently posted in all facilities, institutions, and hospitals providing such services:

(a) To wear his or her own clothes and to keep and use his or her own personal possessions, except when deprivation of same is essential to protect the safety of the resident or other persons;

(b) To keep and be allowed to spend a reasonable sum of his or her own money for canteen expenses and small purchases;

(c) To have access to individual storage space for his or her private use;

(d) To have visitors at reasonable times;

(e) To have reasonable access to a telephone, both to make and receive confidential calls;

(f) To have ready access to letter writing materials, including stamps, and to send and receive uncensored correspondence through the mails;

(g) To have the right to individualized care and adequate treatment;

(h) To discuss treatment plans and decisions with professional persons;

(i) To not be denied access to treatment by spiritual means through prayer in accordance with the tenets and practices of a church or religious denomination in addition to the treatment otherwise proposed;

(j) Not to consent to the administration of antipsychotic medications beyond the hearing conducted pursuant to RCW 71.05.320(4) or the performance of electroconvulsant therapy or surgery, except emergency lifesaving surgery, unless ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction pursuant to the following standards and procedures:

(i) The administration of antipsychotic medication or electroconvulsant therapy shall not be ordered unless the petitioning party proves by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that there exists a compelling state interest that justifies overriding the patient's lack of consent to the administration of antipsychotic medications or electroconvulsant therapy, that the proposed treatment is necessary and effective, and that medically acceptable alternative forms of treatment are not available, have not been successful, or are not likely to be effective.

(ii) The court shall make specific findings of fact concerning: (A) The existence of one or more compelling state interests; (B) the necessity and effectiveness of the treatment; and (C) the person's desires regarding the proposed treatment. If the patient is unable to make a rational and informed decision about consenting to or refusing the proposed treatment, the court shall make a substituted judgment for the patient as if he or she were competent to make such a determination.

(iii) The person shall be present at any hearing on a request to administer antipsychotic medication or electroconvulsant therapy filed pursuant to this subsection. The person has the right: (A) To be represented by an attorney; (B) to present evidence; (C) to cross-examine witnesses; (D) to have the rules of evidence enforced; (E) to remain silent; (F) to view and copy all petitions and reports in the court file; and (G) to be given reasonable notice and an opportunity to prepare for the hearing. The court may appoint a psychiatrist, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, psychologist within their scope of practice, physician assistant, or physician to examine and testify on behalf of such person. The court shall appoint a psychiatrist, physician assistant working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, psychologist within their scope of practice, physician assistant, or physician designated by such person or the person's counsel to testify on behalf of the person in cases where an order for electroconvulsant therapy is sought.

(iv) An order for the administration of antipsychotic medications entered following a hearing conducted pursuant to this section shall be effective for the period of the current involuntary treatment order, and any interim period during which the person is awaiting trial or hearing on a new petition for involuntary treatment or involuntary medication.

(v) Any person detained pursuant to RCW 71.05.320(4), who subsequently refuses antipsychotic medication, shall be entitled to the procedures set forth in this subsection.

(vi) Antipsychotic medication may be administered to a nonconsenting person detained or committed pursuant to this chapter without a court order pursuant to RCW 71.05.215(2) or under the following circumstances:

(A) A person presents an imminent likelihood of serious harm;

(B) Medically acceptable alternatives to administration of antipsychotic medications are not available, have not been successful, or are not likely to be effective; and

(C)(I) In the opinion of the physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner with responsibility for treatment of the person, or his or her designee, the person's condition constitutes an emergency requiring the treatment be instituted before a judicial hearing as authorized pursuant to this section can be held.

(II) If antipsychotic medications are administered over a person's lack of consent pursuant to this subsection, a petition for an order authorizing the administration of antipsychotic medications shall be filed on the next judicial day. The hearing shall be held within two judicial days. If deemed necessary by the physician, physician assistant, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner with responsibility for the treatment of the person, administration of antipsychotic medications may continue until the hearing is held;

(k) To dispose of property and sign contracts unless such person has been adjudicated an incompetent in a court proceeding directed to that particular issue;

(l) Not to have psychosurgery performed on him or her under any circumstances;

(m) To not be denied access to treatment by cultural or spiritual means through practices that are in accordance with a tribal or cultural tradition in addition to the treatment otherwise proposed.

(2) Every person involuntarily detained or committed under the provisions of this chapter is entitled to all the rights set forth in this chapter and retains all rights not denied him or her under this chapter except as limited by chapter 9.41 RCW.

(3) No person may be presumed incompetent as a consequence of receiving evaluation or treatment for a behavioral health disorder. Competency may not be determined or withdrawn except under the provisions of chapter 10.77 ((or 11.88)) RCW.

(4) Subject to RCW 71.05.745 and related regulations, persons receiving evaluation or treatment under this chapter must be given a reasonable choice of an available physician, physician assistant, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or other professional person qualified to provide such services.

(5) Whenever any person is detained under this chapter, the person must be advised that unless the person is released or voluntarily admits himself or herself for treatment within ((one hundred twenty))120 hours of the initial detention, a judicial hearing must be held in a superior court within ((one hundred twenty))120 hours to determine whether there is probable cause to detain the person for up to an additional ((fourteen))14 days based on an allegation that because of a behavioral health disorder the person presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled, and that at the probable cause hearing the person has the following rights:

(a) To communicate immediately with an attorney; to have an attorney appointed if the person is indigent; and to be told the name and address of the attorney that has been designated;

(b) To remain silent, and to know that any statement the person makes may be used against him or her;

(c) To present evidence on the person's behalf;

(d) To cross-examine witnesses who testify against him or her;

(e) To be proceeded against by the rules of evidence;

(f) To have the court appoint a reasonably available independent professional person to examine the person and testify in the hearing, at public expense unless the person is able to bear the cost;

(g) To view and copy all petitions and reports in the court file; and

(h) To refuse psychiatric medications, including antipsychotic medication beginning ((twenty-four))24 hours prior to the probable cause hearing.

(6) The judicial hearing described in subsection (5) of this section must be held according to the provisions of subsection (5) of this section and rules promulgated by the supreme court.

(7)(a) Privileges between patients and physicians, physician assistants, psychologists, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioners are deemed waived in proceedings under this chapter relating to the administration of antipsychotic medications. As to other proceedings under this chapter, the privileges are waived when a court of competent jurisdiction in its discretion determines that such waiver is necessary to protect either the detained person or the public.

(b) The waiver of a privilege under this section is limited to records or testimony relevant to evaluation of the detained person for purposes of a proceeding under this chapter. Upon motion by the detained person or on its own motion, the court shall examine a record or testimony sought by a petitioner to determine whether it is within the scope of the waiver.

(c) The record maker may not be required to testify in order to introduce medical or psychological records of the detained person so long as the requirements of RCW 5.45.020 are met except that portions of the record which contain opinions as to the detained person's mental state must be deleted from such records unless the person making such conclusions is available for cross-examination.

(8) Nothing contained in this chapter prohibits the patient from petitioning by writ of habeas corpus for release.

(9) Nothing in this section permits any person to knowingly violate a no-contact order or a condition of an active judgment and sentence or an active condition of supervision by the department of corrections.

(10) The rights set forth under this section apply equally to ((ninety-day))90-day or ((one hundred eighty-day))180-day hearings under RCW 71.05.310.

Sec. 21. RCW 71.05.435 and 2020 c 256 s 306 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever a person who is the subject of an involuntary commitment order under this chapter is discharged from an evaluation and treatment facility, state hospital, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program providing involuntary treatment services, the entity discharging the person shall provide notice of the person's discharge, subject to federal laws and regulations, to the designated crisis responder office responsible for the initial commitment, which may be a ((federally recognized Indian)) tribe or other Indian health care provider if the designated crisis responder is appointed by the authority, and the designated crisis responder office that serves the county in which the person is expected to reside or to the tribal contact listed in the authority's tribal crisis coordination plan if the entity discharging the person knows, or has reason to know, that the person is an American Indian or Alaska Native who receives medical or behavioral health services from a tribe within this state. The entity discharging the person must also provide these offices with a copy of any less restrictive order or conditional release order entered in conjunction with the discharge of the person, unless the entity discharging the person has entered into a memorandum of understanding obligating another entity to provide these documents.

(2) The notice and documents referred to in subsection (1) of this section shall be provided as soon as possible and no later than one business day following the discharge of the person. Notice is not required under this section if the discharge is for the purpose of transferring the person for continued detention and treatment under this chapter at another treatment facility.

(3) The authority shall maintain and make available an updated list of contact information for designated crisis responder offices around the state.

(4) A facility providing substance use disorder services must attempt to obtain a release of information before discharge to meet the notification requirements of subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 22. RCW 71.05.458 and 2019 c 325 s 3010 are each amended to read as follows:

As soon as possible, but no later than ((twenty-four))24 hours from receiving a referral from a law enforcement officer or law enforcement agency, including a tribal law enforcement officer or tribal law enforcement agency, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, a mental health professional contacted by the designated crisis responder agency must attempt to contact the referred person to determine whether additional mental health intervention is necessary, including, if needed, an assessment by a designated crisis responder for initial detention under RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153. Documentation of the mental health professional's attempt to contact and assess the person must be maintained by the designated crisis responder agency.

Sec. 23. RCW 71.05.590 and 2023 c 433 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Either an agency or facility designated to monitor or provide services under a less restrictive alternative order or conditional release, or a designated crisis responder, may take action to enforce, modify, or revoke a less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release order. The agency, facility, or designated crisis responder must determine that:

(a) The person is failing to adhere to the terms and conditions of the order;

(b) Substantial deterioration in the person's functioning has occurred;

(c) There is evidence of substantial decompensation with a reasonable probability that the decompensation can be reversed by further evaluation, intervention, or treatment; or

(d) The person poses a likelihood of serious harm.

(2) Actions taken under this section must include a flexible range of responses of varying levels of intensity appropriate to the circumstances and consistent with the interests of the individual and the public in personal autonomy, safety, recovery, and compliance. Available actions may include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(a) To counsel or advise the person as to their rights and responsibilities under the court order, and to offer incentives to motivate compliance;

(b) To increase the intensity of outpatient services provided to the person by increasing the frequency of contacts with the provider, referring the person for an assessment for assertive community services, or by other means;

(c) To request a court hearing for review and modification of the court order. The request must be directed to the court with jurisdiction over the order and specify the circumstances that give rise to the request and what modification is being sought. The county prosecutor shall assist the entity requesting the hearing and issue an appropriate summons to the person. This subsection does not limit the inherent authority of a treatment provider to alter conditions of treatment for clinical reasons, and is intended to be used only when court intervention is necessary or advisable to secure the person's compliance and prevent decompensation or deterioration;

(d) To detain the person for up to 12 hours for evaluation at an agency, facility providing services under the court order, crisis stabilization unit, 23-hour crisis relief center, emergency department, evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility with available space, or an approved substance use disorder treatment program with available space. The purpose of the evaluation is to determine whether modification, revocation, or commitment proceedings are necessary and appropriate to stabilize the person and prevent decompensation, deterioration, or physical harm. Temporary detention for evaluation under this subsection is intended to occur only following a pattern of noncompliance or the failure of reasonable attempts at outreach and engagement, and may occur only when, based on clinical judgment, temporary detention is appropriate. The agency, facility, or designated crisis responder may request assistance from a peace officer for the purposes of temporary detention under this subsection (2)(d). This subsection does not limit the ability or obligation of the agency, facility, or designated crisis responder to pursue revocation procedures under subsection (5) of this section in appropriate circumstances; and

(e) To initiate revocation procedures under subsection (5) of this section.

(3) A court may supervise a person on an order for less restrictive alternative treatment or a conditional release. While the person is under the order, the court may:

(a) Require appearance in court for periodic reviews; and

(b) Modify the order after considering input from the agency or facility designated to provide or facilitate services. The court may not remand the person into inpatient treatment except as provided under subsection (5) of this section, but may take actions under subsection (2)(a) through (d) of this section.

(4) The facility or agency designated to provide outpatient treatment shall notify the secretary of the department of social and health services or designated crisis responder when a person fails to adhere to terms and conditions of court ordered treatment or experiences substantial deterioration in his or her condition and, as a result, presents an increased likelihood of serious harm.

(5)(a) A designated crisis responder or the secretary of the department of social and health services may, upon their own motion or upon request of the facility or agency designated to provide outpatient care, cause a person to be detained in an evaluation and treatment facility, available secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility with adequate space, or available approved substance use disorder treatment program with adequate space in or near the county in which he or she is receiving outpatient treatment for the purpose of a hearing for revocation of a less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release order under this chapter. The designated crisis responder or secretary of the department of social and health services shall file a petition for revocation within 24 hours and serve the person, their guardian, if any, and their attorney. A hearing for revocation of a less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release order may be scheduled without detention of the person.

(b) A person detained under this subsection (5) must be held until such time, not exceeding five days, as a hearing can be scheduled to determine whether or not the order for less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release should be revoked, modified, or retained. If the person is not detained, the hearing must be scheduled within five days of service on the person. The designated crisis responder or the secretary of the department of social and health services may withdraw its petition for revocation at any time before the court hearing.

(c) A person detained under this subsection (5) has the same rights with respect to notice, hearing, and counsel as in any involuntary treatment proceeding, except as specifically set forth in this section. There is no right to jury trial. The venue for proceedings is the county where the petition is filed. Notice of the filing must be provided to the court that originally ordered commitment, if different from the court where the petition for revocation is filed, within two judicial days of the person's detention.

(d) The issues for the court to determine are whether: (i) The person adhered to the terms and conditions of the order; (ii) substantial deterioration in the person's functioning has occurred; (iii) there is evidence of substantial decompensation with a reasonable probability that the decompensation can be reversed by further inpatient treatment; or (iv) there is a likelihood of serious harm; and, if any of the above conditions apply, whether it is appropriate for the court to reinstate or modify the person's less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release order or order the person's detention for inpatient treatment. The person may waive the court hearing and allow the court to enter a stipulated order upon the agreement of all parties. If the court orders detention for inpatient treatment, the treatment period must be for 14 days from the revocation hearing if the less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release order was based on a petition under RCW 71.05.148, 71.05.160, or 71.05.230. If the court orders detention for inpatient treatment and the less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release order was based on a petition under RCW 71.05.290 or 71.05.320, the number of days remaining on the order must be converted to days of inpatient treatment. A court may not detain a person for inpatient treatment to a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program under this subsection unless there is a facility or program available with adequate space for the person.

(6) In determining whether or not to take action under this section the designated crisis responder, agency, or facility must consider the factors specified under RCW 71.05.212 and the court must consider the factors specified under RCW 71.05.245 as they apply to the question of whether to enforce, modify, or revoke a court order for involuntary treatment.

(7) Prior to taking any action to enforce, modify, or revoke a less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release order in which the agency, facility, or designated crisis responder knows, or has reason to know, that the individual is an American Indian or Alaska Native who receives medical or behavioral health services from a tribe within this state, the agency, facility, or designated crisis responder shall notify the tribe and Indian health care provider regarding any action that will be taken under this section as soon as possible, but no later than three hours from the time the decision to take action is made. The agency, facility, or designated crisis responder must provide the tribe and Indian health care provider with a copy of the petition, together with any orders issued by the court and a notice of the tribe's right to intervene as soon as possible, but before any hearing under this section, and no later than 24 hours from the time the petition is served upon the person and the person's guardian. The court clerk shall provide copies of any court orders necessary for the agency, facility, or designated crisis responder to provide notice to the tribe or Indian health care provider under this section. Notification under this section is subject to any federal and state laws and regulations including the requirements in RCW 70.02.230 (2)(ee) and (3) and shall be made in person or by telephonic or electronic communication to the tribal contact listed in the authority's tribal crisis coordination plan.

Sec. 24. RCW 71.05.590 and 2023 c 433 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Either an agency or facility designated to monitor or provide services under a less restrictive alternative order or conditional release, or a designated crisis responder, may take action to enforce, modify, or revoke a less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release order. The agency, facility, or designated crisis responder must determine that:

(a) The person is failing to adhere to the terms and conditions of the order;

(b) Substantial deterioration in the person's functioning has occurred;

(c) There is evidence of substantial decompensation with a reasonable probability that the decompensation can be reversed by further evaluation, intervention, or treatment; or

(d) The person poses a likelihood of serious harm.

(2) Actions taken under this section must include a flexible range of responses of varying levels of intensity appropriate to the circumstances and consistent with the interests of the individual and the public in personal autonomy, safety, recovery, and compliance. Available actions may include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(a) To counsel or advise the person as to their rights and responsibilities under the court order, and to offer incentives to motivate compliance;

(b) To increase the intensity of outpatient services provided to the person by increasing the frequency of contacts with the provider, referring the person for an assessment for assertive community services, or by other means;

(c) To request a court hearing for review and modification of the court order. The request must be directed to the court with jurisdiction over the order and specify the circumstances that give rise to the request and what modification is being sought. The county prosecutor shall assist the entity requesting the hearing and issue an appropriate summons to the person. This subsection does not limit the inherent authority of a treatment provider to alter conditions of treatment for clinical reasons, and is intended to be used only when court intervention is necessary or advisable to secure the person's compliance and prevent decompensation or deterioration;

(d) To detain the person for up to 12 hours for evaluation at an agency, facility providing services under the court order, crisis stabilization unit, 23-hour crisis relief center, emergency department, evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or an approved substance use disorder treatment program. The purpose of the evaluation is to determine whether modification, revocation, or commitment proceedings are necessary and appropriate to stabilize the person and prevent decompensation, deterioration, or physical harm. Temporary detention for evaluation under this subsection is intended to occur only following a pattern of noncompliance or the failure of reasonable attempts at outreach and engagement, and may occur only when, based on clinical judgment, temporary detention is appropriate. The agency, facility, or designated crisis responder may request assistance from a peace officer for the purposes of temporary detention under this subsection (2)(d). This subsection does not limit the ability or obligation of the agency, facility, or designated crisis responder to pursue revocation procedures under subsection (5) of this section in appropriate circumstances; and

(e) To initiate revocation procedures under subsection (5) of this section.

(3) A court may supervise a person on an order for less restrictive alternative treatment or a conditional release. While the person is under the order, the court may:

(a) Require appearance in court for periodic reviews; and

(b) Modify the order after considering input from the agency or facility designated to provide or facilitate services. The court may not remand the person into inpatient treatment except as provided under subsection (5) of this section, but may take actions under subsection (2)(a) through (d) of this section.

(4) The facility or agency designated to provide outpatient treatment shall notify the secretary of the department of social and health services or designated crisis responder when a person fails to adhere to terms and conditions of court ordered treatment or experiences substantial deterioration in his or her condition and, as a result, presents an increased likelihood of serious harm.

(5)(a) A designated crisis responder or the secretary of the department of social and health services may, upon their own motion or upon request of the facility or agency designated to provide outpatient care, cause a person to be detained in an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program in or near the county in which he or she is receiving outpatient treatment for the purpose of a hearing for revocation of a less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release order under this chapter. The designated crisis responder or secretary of the department of social and health services shall file a petition for revocation within 24 hours and serve the person, their guardian, if any, and their attorney. A hearing for revocation of a less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release order may be scheduled without detention of the person.

(b) A person detained under this subsection (5) must be held until such time, not exceeding five days, as a hearing can be scheduled to determine whether or not the order for less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release should be revoked, modified, or retained. If the person is not detained, the hearing must be scheduled within five days of service on the person. The designated crisis responder or the secretary of the department of social and health services may withdraw its petition for revocation at any time before the court hearing.

(c) A person detained under this subsection (5) has the same rights with respect to notice, hearing, and counsel as in any involuntary treatment proceeding, except as specifically set forth in this section. There is no right to jury trial. The venue for proceedings is the county where the petition is filed. Notice of the filing must be provided to the court that originally ordered commitment, if different from the court where the petition for revocation is filed, within two judicial days of the person's detention.

(d) The issues for the court to determine are whether: (i) The person adhered to the terms and conditions of the order; (ii) substantial deterioration in the person's functioning has occurred; (iii) there is evidence of substantial decompensation with a reasonable probability that the decompensation can be reversed by further inpatient treatment; or (iv) there is a likelihood of serious harm; and, if any of the above conditions apply, whether it is appropriate for the court to reinstate or modify the person's less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release order or order the person's detention for inpatient treatment. The person may waive the court hearing and allow the court to enter a stipulated order upon the agreement of all parties. If the court orders detention for inpatient treatment, the treatment period must be for 14 days from the revocation hearing if the less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release order was based on a petition under RCW 71.05.148, 71.05.160, or 71.05.230. If the court orders detention for inpatient treatment and the less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release order was based on a petition under RCW 71.05.290 or 71.05.320, the number of days remaining on the order must be converted to days of inpatient treatment.

(6) In determining whether or not to take action under this section the designated crisis responder, agency, or facility must consider the factors specified under RCW 71.05.212 and the court must consider the factors specified under RCW 71.05.245 as they apply to the question of whether to enforce, modify, or revoke a court order for involuntary treatment.

(7) Prior to taking any action to enforce, modify, or revoke a less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release order in which the agency, facility, or designated crisis responder knows, or has reason to know, that the individual is an American Indian or Alaska Native who receives medical or behavioral health services from a tribe within this state, the agency, facility, or designated crisis responder shall notify the tribe and Indian health care provider regarding any action that will be taken under this section as soon as possible, but no later than three hours from the time the decision to take action is made. The agency, facility, or designated crisis responder must provide the tribe and Indian health care provider with a copy of the petition, together with any orders issued by the court and a notice of the tribe's right to intervene as soon as possible, but before any hearing under this section, and no later than 24 hours from the time the petition is served upon the person and the person's guardian. The court clerk shall provide copies of any court orders necessary for the agency, facility, or designated crisis responder to provide notice to the tribe or Indian health care provider under this section. Notification under this section is subject to any federal and state laws and regulations including the requirements in RCW 70.02.230 (2)(ee) and (3) and shall be made in person or by telephonic or electronic communication to the tribal contact listed in the authority's tribal crisis coordination plan.

Sec. 25. RCW 71.05.620 and 2023 c 298 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The files and records of court proceedings under this chapter and chapter 71.34 RCW shall be closed but shall be accessible to:

(a) The department;

(b) The department of social and health services;

(c) The authority;

(d) The state hospitals as defined in RCW 72.23.010;

(e) Any person who is the subject of a petition;

(f) The attorney or guardian of the person;

(g) Resource management services for that person;

(h) Service providers authorized to receive such information by resource management services; ((and))

(i) The Washington state patrol firearms background division to conduct background checks for processing and purchasing firearms, concealed pistol licenses, alien firearms licenses, firearm rights restoration petitions under chapter 9.41 RCW, and release of firearms from evidence, including appeals of denial;

(j) The prosecuting attorney of a county or tribe located in this state; and

(k) The tribe or Indian health care provider who has the right to intervene or receive notice and copies of any orders issued by a court in any court proceeding under this chapter and chapter 71.34 RCW.

(2) The authority shall adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 26. RCW 71.34.780 and 2020 c 302 s 97 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the professional person in charge of an outpatient treatment program, a designated crisis responder, or the director or secretary, as appropriate, determines that a minor is failing to adhere to the conditions of the court order for less restrictive alternative treatment or the conditions for the conditional release, or that substantial deterioration in the minor's functioning has occurred, the designated crisis responder, or the director or secretary, as appropriate, may order that the minor be taken into custody and transported to an inpatient evaluation and treatment facility, a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or an approved substance use disorder treatment program. A secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program that has adequate space for the minor must be available.

(2)(a) The designated crisis responder, director, or secretary, as appropriate, shall file the order of apprehension and detention and serve it upon the minor and notify the minor's parent and the minor's attorney, if any, of the detention within two days of return. At the time of service the minor shall be informed of the right to a hearing and to representation by an attorney. The designated crisis responder or the director or secretary, as appropriate, may modify or rescind the order of apprehension and detention at any time prior to the hearing.

(b) If the minor is involuntarily detained for revocation at an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program in a different county from where the minor was initially detained, the facility or program may file the order of apprehension, serve it on the minor and notify the minor's parents and the minor's attorney at the request of the designated crisis responder.

(3) A petition for revocation of less restrictive alternative treatment shall be filed by the designated crisis responder or the director, secretary, or facility, as appropriate, with the court in the county where the minor is detained. The court shall conduct the hearing in that county. A petition for revocation of conditional release must be filed in the county where the minor is detained. A petition shall describe the behavior of the minor indicating violation of the conditions or deterioration of routine functioning and a dispositional recommendation. The hearing shall be held within seven days of the minor's return. The issues to be determined are whether the minor did or did not adhere to the conditions of the less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release, or whether the minor's routine functioning has substantially deteriorated, and, if so, whether the conditions of less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release should be modified or, subject to subsection (4) of this section, whether the minor should be returned to inpatient treatment. Pursuant to the determination of the court, the minor shall be returned to less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release on the same or modified conditions or shall be returned to inpatient treatment. If the minor is returned to inpatient treatment, RCW 71.34.760 regarding the director's placement responsibility shall apply. The hearing may be waived by the minor and the minor returned to inpatient treatment or to less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release on the same or modified conditions.

(4) A court may not order the return of a minor to inpatient treatment in a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program unless there is a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program available with adequate space for the minor.

(5) Prior to taking any action to enforce, modify, or revoke a less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release order in which the agency, facility, or designated crisis responder knows, or has reason to know, that the minor is an American Indian or Alaska Native who receives medical or behavioral health services from a tribe within this state, the agency, facility, or designated crisis responder shall notify the tribe and Indian health care provider regarding any action that will be taken under this section as soon as possible, but no later than three hours from the time the decision to take action is made. The agency, facility, or designated crisis responder must provide the tribe and Indian health care provider with a copy of the petition, together with any orders issued by the court and a notice of the tribe's right to intervene as soon as possible, but before any hearing under this section, and no later than 24 hours from the time the petition is served upon the person and the person's guardian. The court clerk shall provide copies of any court orders necessary for the agency, facility, or designated crisis responder to provide notice to the tribe or Indian health care provider under this section. Notification under this section is subject to any federal and state laws and regulations including the requirements in RCW 70.02.240 and shall be made in person or by telephonic or electronic communication to the tribal contact listed in the authority's tribal crisis coordination plan.

Sec. 27. RCW 71.34.780 and 2020 c 302 s 98 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the professional person in charge of an outpatient treatment program, a designated crisis responder, or the director or secretary, as appropriate, determines that a minor is failing to adhere to the conditions of the court order for less restrictive alternative treatment or the conditions for the conditional release, or that substantial deterioration in the minor's functioning has occurred, the designated crisis responder, or the director or secretary, as appropriate, may order that the minor be taken into custody and transported to an inpatient evaluation and treatment facility, a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or an approved substance use disorder treatment program.

(2)(a) The designated crisis responder, director, or secretary, as appropriate, shall file the order of apprehension and detention and serve it upon the minor and notify the minor's parent and the minor's attorney, if any, of the detention within two days of return. At the time of service the minor shall be informed of the right to a hearing and to representation by an attorney. The designated crisis responder or the director or secretary, as appropriate, may modify or rescind the order of apprehension and detention at any time prior to the hearing.

(b) If the minor is involuntarily detained for revocation at an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program in a different county from where the minor was initially detained, the facility or program may file the order of apprehension, serve it on the minor and notify the minor's parents and the minor's attorney at the request of the designated crisis responder.

(3) A petition for revocation of less restrictive alternative treatment shall be filed by the designated crisis responder or the director, secretary, or facility, as appropriate, with the court in the county where the minor is detained. The court shall conduct the hearing in that county. A petition for revocation of conditional release must be filed in the county where the minor is detained. A petition shall describe the behavior of the minor indicating violation of the conditions or deterioration of routine functioning and a dispositional recommendation. The hearing shall be held within seven days of the minor's return. The issues to be determined are whether the minor did or did not adhere to the conditions of the less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release, or whether the minor's routine functioning has substantially deteriorated, and, if so, whether the conditions of less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release should be modified or whether the minor should be returned to inpatient treatment. Pursuant to the determination of the court, the minor shall be returned to less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release on the same or modified conditions or shall be returned to inpatient treatment. If the minor is returned to inpatient treatment, RCW 71.34.760 regarding the director's placement responsibility shall apply. The hearing may be waived by the minor and the minor returned to inpatient treatment or to less restrictive alternative treatment or conditional release on the same or modified conditions.

(4) Prior to taking any action to enforce, modify, or revoke a less restrictive alternative treatment order or conditional release order in which the agency, facility, or designated crisis responder knows, or has reason to know, that the minor is an American Indian or Alaska Native who receives medical or behavioral health services from a tribe within this state, the agency, facility, or designated crisis responder shall notify the tribe and Indian health care provider regarding any action that will be taken under this section as soon as possible, but no later than three hours from the time the decision to take action is made. The agency, facility, or designated crisis responder must provide the tribe and Indian health care provider with a copy of the petition, together with any orders issued by the court and a notice of the tribe's right to intervene as soon as possible, but before any hearing under this section, and no later than 24 hours from the time the petition is served upon the person and the person's guardian. The court clerk shall provide copies of any court orders necessary for the agency, facility, or designated crisis responder to provide notice to the tribe or Indian health care provider under this section. Notification under this section is subject to any federal and state laws and regulations including the requirements in RCW 70.02.240 and shall be made in person or by telephonic or electronic communication to the tribal contact listed in the authority's tribal crisis coordination plan.

Sec. 28. RCW 71.05.730 and 2019 c 325 s 3011 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A county may apply to its behavioral health administrative services organization on a quarterly basis for reimbursement of its direct costs in providing judicial services for civil commitment cases under this chapter and chapter 71.34 RCW. A tribe may apply to the authority on a quarterly basis for reimbursement of its direct costs in providing judicial services for civil commitment cases under this chapter and chapter 71.34 RCW. The behavioral health administrative services organization shall in turn be entitled to reimbursement from the behavioral health administrative services organization that serves the county of residence of the individual who is the subject of the civil commitment case.

(2) Reimbursement for judicial services shall be provided per civil commitment case at a rate to be determined based on an independent assessment of the county's or tribe's actual direct costs. This assessment must be based on an average of the expenditures for judicial services within the county or tribe over the past three years. In the event that a baseline cannot be established because there is no significant history of similar cases within the county or tribe, the reimbursement rate shall be equal to ((eighty))80 percent of the median reimbursement rate of counties or tribes, if applicable included in the independent assessment.

(3) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Civil commitment case" includes all judicial hearings related to a single episode of hospitalization or less restrictive alternative treatment, except that the filing of a petition for a one hundred eighty-day commitment under this chapter or a petition for a successive ((one hundred eighty-day))180-day commitment under chapter 71.34 RCW shall be considered to be a new case regardless of whether there has been a break in detention. "Civil commitment case" does not include the filing of a petition for a ((one hundred eighty-day))180-day commitment under this chapter on behalf of a patient at a state psychiatric hospital.

(b) "Judicial services" means a county's or tribe's reasonable direct costs in providing prosecutor services, assigned counsel and defense services, court services, and court clerk services for civil commitment cases under this chapter and chapter 71.34 RCW.

(4) To the extent that resources have a shared purpose, the behavioral health administrative services organization may only reimburse counties to the extent such resources are necessary for and devoted to judicial services as described in this section. To the extent that resources have a shared purpose, the authority may only reimburse tribes to the extent the resources are necessary for and devoted to judicial services as described in this section.

(5) No filing fee may be charged or collected for any civil commitment case subject to reimbursement under this section.

Sec. 29. RCW 71.24.030 and 2019 c 325 s 1005 are each amended to read as follows:

The director is authorized to make grants and/or purchase services from counties, tribes, combinations of counties, or other entities, to establish and operate community behavioral health programs.

Sec. 30. RCW 71.24.045 and 2022 c 210 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The behavioral health administrative services organization contracted with the authority pursuant to RCW 71.24.381 shall:

(a) Administer crisis services for the assigned regional service area. Such services must include:

(i) A behavioral health crisis hotline for its assigned regional service area;

(ii) Crisis response services ((twenty-four))24 hours a day, seven days a week, ((three hundred sixty-five))365 days a year;

(iii) Services related to involuntary commitments under chapters 71.05 and 71.34 RCW;

(iv) Tracking of less restrictive alternative orders issued within the region by superior courts, and providing notification to a managed care organization in the region when one of its enrollees receives a less restrictive alternative order so that the managed care organization may ensure that the person is connected to services and that the requirements of RCW 71.05.585 are complied with. If the person receives a less restrictive alternative order and is returning to another region, the behavioral health administrative services organization shall notify the behavioral health administrative services organization in the home region of the less restrictive alternative order so that the home behavioral health administrative services organization may notify the person's managed care organization or provide services if the person is not enrolled in medicaid and does not have other insurance which can pay for those services;

(v) Additional noncrisis behavioral health services, within available resources, to individuals who meet certain criteria set by the authority in its contracts with the behavioral health administrative services organization. These services may include services provided through federal grant funds, provisos, and general fund state appropriations;

(vi) Care coordination, diversion services, and discharge planning for nonmedicaid individuals transitioning from state hospitals or inpatient settings to reduce rehospitalization and utilization of crisis services, as required by the authority in contract; and

(vii) Regional coordination, cross-system and cross-jurisdiction coordination with tribal governments, and capacity building efforts, such as supporting the behavioral health advisory board and efforts to support access to services or to improve the behavioral health system;

(b) Administer and provide for the availability of an adequate network of evaluation and treatment services to ensure access to treatment, investigation, transportation, court-related, and other services provided as required under chapter 71.05 RCW;

(c) Coordinate services for individuals under RCW 71.05.365;

(d) Administer and provide for the availability of resource management services, residential services, and community support services as required under its contract with the authority;

(e) Contract with a sufficient number, as determined by the authority, of licensed or certified providers for crisis services and other behavioral health services required by the authority;

(f) Maintain adequate reserves or secure a bond as required by its contract with the authority;

(g) Establish and maintain quality assurance processes;

(h) Meet established limitations on administrative costs for agencies that contract with the behavioral health administrative services organization; and

(i) Maintain patient tracking information as required by the authority.

(2) The behavioral health administrative services organization must collaborate with the authority and its contracted managed care organizations to develop and implement strategies to coordinate care with tribes and community behavioral health providers for individuals with a history of frequent crisis system utilization.

(3) The behavioral health administrative services organization shall:

(a) Assure that the special needs of minorities, older adults, individuals with disabilities, children, and low-income persons are met;

(b) Collaborate with local and tribal government entities to ensure that policies do not result in an adverse shift of persons with mental illness into state ((and)), local, and tribal correctional facilities; and

(c) Work with the authority to expedite the enrollment or reenrollment of eligible persons leaving state or local correctional facilities and institutions for mental diseases.

(4) The behavioral health administrative services organization shall employ an assisted outpatient treatment program coordinator to oversee system coordination and legal compliance for assisted outpatient treatment under RCW 71.05.148 and 71.34.815.

(5) The behavioral health administrative services organization shall comply and ensure their contractors comply with the tribal crisis coordination plan agreed upon by the authority and tribes for coordination of crisis services, care coordination, and discharge and transition planning with tribes and Indian health care providers applicable to their regional service area.

Sec. 31. RCW 70.02.010 and 2020 c 302 s 112 and 2020 c 256 s 401 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Admission" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.

(2) "Audit" means an assessment, evaluation, determination, or investigation of a health care provider by a person not employed by or affiliated with the provider to determine compliance with:

(a) Statutory, regulatory, fiscal, medical, or scientific standards;

(b) A private or public program of payments to a health care provider; or

(c) Requirements for licensing, accreditation, or certification.

(3) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.

(4) "Commitment" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.

(5) "Custody" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.

(6) "Deidentified" means health information that does not identify an individual and with respect to which there is no reasonable basis to believe that the information can be used to identify an individual.

(7) "Department" means the department of social and health services.

(8) "Designated crisis responder" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020 or 71.34.020, as applicable.

(9) "Detention" or "detain" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.

(10) "Directory information" means information disclosing the presence, and for the purpose of identification, the name, location within a health care facility, and the general health condition of a particular patient who is a patient in a health care facility or who is currently receiving emergency health care in a health care facility.

(11) "Discharge" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.

(12) "Evaluation and treatment facility" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020 or 71.34.020, as applicable.

(13) "Federal, state, or local law enforcement authorities" means an officer of any agency or authority in the United States, a state, a tribe, a territory, or a political subdivision of a state, a tribe, or a territory who is empowered by law to: (a) Investigate or conduct an official inquiry into a potential criminal violation of law; or (b) prosecute or otherwise conduct a criminal proceeding arising from an alleged violation of law.

(14) "General health condition" means the patient's health status described in terms of "critical," "poor," "fair," "good," "excellent," or terms denoting similar conditions.

(15) "Health care" means any care, service, or procedure provided by a health care provider:

(a) To diagnose, treat, or maintain a patient's physical or mental condition; or

(b) That affects the structure or any function of the human body.

(16) "Health care facility" means a hospital, clinic, nursing home, laboratory, office, or similar place where a health care provider provides health care to patients.

(17) "Health care information" means any information, whether oral or recorded in any form or medium, that identifies or can readily be associated with the identity of a patient and directly relates to the patient's health care, including a patient's deoxyribonucleic acid and identified sequence of chemical base pairs. The term includes any required accounting of disclosures of health care information.

(18) "Health care operations" means any of the following activities of a health care provider, health care facility, or third-party payor to the extent that the activities are related to functions that make an entity a health care provider, a health care facility, or a third-party payor:

(a) Conducting: Quality assessment and improvement activities, including outcomes evaluation and development of clinical guidelines, if the obtaining of generalizable knowledge is not the primary purpose of any studies resulting from such activities; population-based activities relating to improving health or reducing health care costs, protocol development, case management and care coordination, contacting of health care providers and patients with information about treatment alternatives; and related functions that do not include treatment;

(b) Reviewing the competence or qualifications of health care professionals, evaluating practitioner and provider performance and third-party payor performance, conducting training programs in which students, trainees, or practitioners in areas of health care learn under supervision to practice or improve their skills as health care providers, training of nonhealth care professionals, accreditation, certification, licensing, or credentialing activities;

(c) Underwriting, premium rating, and other activities relating to the creation, renewal, or replacement of a contract of health insurance or health benefits, and ceding, securing, or placing a contract for reinsurance of risk relating to claims for health care, including stop-loss insurance and excess of loss insurance, if any applicable legal requirements are met;

(d) Conducting or arranging for medical review, legal services, and auditing functions, including fraud and abuse detection and compliance programs;

(e) Business planning and development, such as conducting cost-management and planning-related analyses related to managing and operating the health care facility or third-party payor, including formulary development and administration, development, or improvement of methods of payment or coverage policies; and

(f) Business management and general administrative activities of the health care facility, health care provider, or third-party payor including, but not limited to:

(i) Management activities relating to implementation of and compliance with the requirements of this chapter;

(ii) Customer service, including the provision of data analyses for policyholders, plan sponsors, or other customers, provided that health care information is not disclosed to such policyholder, plan sponsor, or customer;

(iii) Resolution of internal grievances;

(iv) The sale, transfer, merger, or consolidation of all or part of a health care provider, health care facility, or third-party payor with another health care provider, health care facility, or third-party payor or an entity that following such activity will become a health care provider, health care facility, or third-party payor, and due diligence related to such activity; and

(v) Consistent with applicable legal requirements, creating deidentified health care information or a limited data set for the benefit of the health care provider, health care facility, or third-party payor.

(19) "Health care provider" means a person who is licensed, certified, registered, or otherwise authorized by the law of this state to provide health care in the ordinary course of business or practice of a profession.

(20) "Human immunodeficiency virus" or "HIV" has the same meaning as in RCW 70.24.017.

(21) "Imminent" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.

(22) "Indian health care provider" has the same meaning as in RCW 43.71B.010(11).

(23) "Information and records related to mental health services" means a type of health care information that relates to all information and records compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course of providing services by a mental health service agency or mental health professional to persons who are receiving or have received services for mental illness. The term includes mental health information contained in a medical bill, registration records, ((as defined in RCW 70.97.010,)) and all other records regarding the person maintained by the department, by the authority, by behavioral health administrative services organizations and their staff, managed care organizations contracted with the authority under chapter 74.09 RCW and their staff, and by treatment facilities. The term further includes documents of legal proceedings under chapter 71.05, 71.34, or 10.77 RCW, or somatic health care information. For health care information maintained by a hospital as defined in RCW 70.41.020 or a health care facility or health care provider that participates with a hospital in an organized health care arrangement defined under federal law, "information and records related to mental health services" is limited to information and records of services provided by a mental health professional or information and records of services created by a hospital-operated community behavioral health program as defined in RCW 71.24.025. The term does not include psychotherapy notes.

(24) "Information and records related to sexually transmitted diseases" means a type of health care information that relates to the identity of any person upon whom an HIV antibody test or other sexually transmitted infection test is performed, the results of such tests, and any information relating to diagnosis of or treatment for any confirmed sexually transmitted infections.

(25) "Institutional review board" means any board, committee, or other group formally designated by an institution, or authorized under federal or state law, to review, approve the initiation of, or conduct periodic review of research programs to assure the protection of the rights and welfare of human research subjects.

(26) "Legal counsel" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.

(27) "Local public health officer" has the same meaning as the term "local health officer" as defined in RCW 70.24.017.

(28) "Maintain," as related to health care information, means to hold, possess, preserve, retain, store, or control that information.

(29) "Managed care organization" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.24.025.

(30) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, psychiatric nurse, or social worker, and such other mental health professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary of health under chapter 71.05 RCW, whether that person works in a private or public setting.

(31) "Mental health service agency" means a public or private agency that provides services to persons with mental disorders as defined under RCW 71.05.020 or 71.34.020 and receives funding from public sources. This includes evaluation and treatment facilities as defined in RCW 71.34.020, community mental health service delivery systems, or community behavioral health programs, as defined in RCW 71.24.025, and facilities conducting competency evaluations and restoration under chapter 10.77 RCW.

(32) "Minor" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.34.020.

(33) "Parent" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.34.020.

(34) "Patient" means an individual who receives or has received health care. The term includes a deceased individual who has received health care.

(35) "Payment" means:

(a) The activities undertaken by:

(i) A third-party payor to obtain premiums or to determine or fulfill its responsibility for coverage and provision of benefits by the third-party payor; or

(ii) A health care provider, health care facility, or third-party payor, to obtain or provide reimbursement for the provision of health care; and

(b) The activities in (a) of this subsection that relate to the patient to whom health care is provided and that include, but are not limited to:

(i) Determinations of eligibility or coverage, including coordination of benefits or the determination of cost-sharing amounts, and adjudication or subrogation of health benefit claims;

(ii) Risk adjusting amounts due based on enrollee health status and demographic characteristics;

(iii) Billing, claims management, collection activities, obtaining payment under a contract for reinsurance, including stop-loss insurance and excess of loss insurance, and related health care data processing;

(iv) Review of health care services with respect to medical necessity, coverage under a health plan, appropriateness of care, or justification of charges;

(v) Utilization review activities, including precertification and preauthorization of services, and concurrent and retrospective review of services; and

(vi) Disclosure to consumer reporting agencies of any of the following health care information relating to collection of premiums or reimbursement:

(A) Name and address;

(B) Date of birth;

(C) Social security number;

(D) Payment history;

(E) Account number; and

(F) Name and address of the health care provider, health care facility, and/or third-party payor.

(36) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision or agency, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(37) "Professional person" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.

(38) "Psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.

(39) "Psychotherapy notes" means notes recorded, in any medium, by a mental health professional documenting or analyzing the contents of conversations during a private counseling session or group, joint, or family counseling session, and that are separated from the rest of the individual's medical record. The term excludes mediation prescription and monitoring, counseling session start and stop times, the modalities and frequencies of treatment furnished, results of clinical tests, and any summary of the following items: Diagnosis, functional status, the treatment plan, symptoms, prognosis, and progress to date.

(40) "Reasonable fee" means the charges for duplicating or searching the record, but shall not exceed ((sixty-five))65 cents per page for the first ((thirty))30 pages and ((fifty))50 cents per page for all other pages. In addition, a clerical fee for searching and handling may be charged not to exceed ((fifteen dollars))$15. These amounts shall be adjusted biennially in accordance with changes in the consumer price index, all consumers, for Seattle-Tacoma metropolitan statistical area as determined by the secretary of health. However, where editing of records by a health care provider is required by statute and is done by the provider personally, the fee may be the usual and customary charge for a basic office visit.

(41) "Release" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.

(42) "Resource management services" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.

(43) "Serious violent offense" has the same meaning as in RCW 9.94A.030.

(44) "Sexually transmitted infection" or "sexually transmitted disease" has the same meaning as "sexually transmitted disease" in RCW 70.24.017.

(45) "Test for a sexually transmitted disease" has the same meaning as in RCW 70.24.017.

(46) "Third-party payor" means an insurer regulated under Title 48 RCW authorized to transact business in this state or other jurisdiction, including a health care service contractor, and health maintenance organization; or an employee welfare benefit plan, excluding fitness or wellness plans; or a state or federal health benefit program.

(47) "Treatment" means the provision, coordination, or management of health care and related services by one or more health care providers or health care facilities, including the coordination or management of health care by a health care provider or health care facility with a third party; consultation between health care providers or health care facilities relating to a patient; or the referral of a patient for health care from one health care provider or health care facility to another.

(48) "Tribal public health authority" means a tribe that is responsible for public health matters as a part of its official mandate.

(49) "Tribal public health officer" means the individual appointed as the health officer for the tribe.

(50) "Tribe" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.24.025.

Sec. 32. RCW 70.02.230 and 2023 c 295 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The fact of admission to a provider for mental health services and all information and records compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course of providing mental health services to either voluntary or involuntary recipients of services at public or private agencies may not be disclosed except as provided in this section, RCW 70.02.050, 71.05.445, 74.09.295, 70.02.210, 70.02.240, 70.02.250, 70.02.260, and 70.02.265, or pursuant to a valid authorization under RCW 70.02.030.

(2) Information and records related to mental health services, other than those obtained through treatment under chapter 71.34 RCW, may be disclosed:

(a) In communications between qualified professional persons to meet the requirements of chapter 71.05 RCW, including Indian health care providers, in the provision of services or appropriate referrals, or in the course of guardianship proceedings if provided to a professional person:

(i) Employed by the facility;

(ii) Who has medical responsibility for the patient's care;

(iii) Who is a designated crisis responder;

(iv) Who is providing services under chapter 71.24 RCW;

(v) Who is employed by a state or local correctional facility where the person is confined or supervised; or

(vi) Who is providing evaluation, treatment, or follow-up services under chapter 10.77 RCW;

(b) When the communications regard the special needs of a patient and the necessary circumstances giving rise to such needs and the disclosure is made by a facility providing services to the operator of a facility in which the patient resides or will reside;

(c)(i) When the person receiving services, or his or her guardian, designates persons to whom information or records may be released, or if the person is a minor, when his or her parents make such a designation;

(ii) A public or private agency shall release to a person's next of kin, attorney, personal representative, guardian, or conservator, if any:

(A) The information that the person is presently a patient in the facility or that the person is seriously physically ill;

(B) A statement evaluating the mental and physical condition of the patient, and a statement of the probable duration of the patient's confinement, if such information is requested by the next of kin, attorney, personal representative, guardian, or conservator; and

(iii) Other information requested by the next of kin or attorney as may be necessary to decide whether or not proceedings should be instituted to appoint a guardian or conservator;

(d)(i) To the courts, including tribal courts, as necessary to the administration of chapter 71.05 RCW, or equivalent proceedings in tribal courts, or to a court ordering an evaluation or treatment under chapter 10.77 RCW solely for the purpose of preventing the entry of any evaluation or treatment order that is inconsistent with any order entered under chapter 71.05 RCW.

(ii) To a court or its designee in which a motion under chapter 10.77 RCW has been made for involuntary medication of a defendant for the purpose of competency restoration.

(iii) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purpose of the federal health insurance portability and accountability act;

(e)(i) When a mental health professional or designated crisis responder is requested by a representative of a law enforcement or corrections agency, including a police officer, sheriff, community corrections officer, a municipal attorney, or prosecuting attorney to undertake an investigation or provide treatment under RCW 71.05.150, 10.31.110, or 71.05.153, the mental health professional or designated crisis responder shall, if requested to do so, advise the representative in writing of the results of the investigation including a statement of reasons for the decision to detain or release the person investigated. The written report must be submitted within ((seventy-two))72 hours of the completion of the investigation or the request from the law enforcement or corrections representative, whichever occurs later.

(ii) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes of the federal health insurance portability and accountability act;

(f) To the attorney of the detained person;

(g) To the prosecuting attorney, including tribal prosecuting attorney, as necessary to carry out the responsibilities of the office under RCW 71.05.330(2), 71.05.340(1)(b), and 71.05.335. The prosecutor, including tribal prosecutor, must be provided access to records regarding the committed person's treatment and prognosis, medication, behavior problems, and other records relevant to the issue of whether treatment less restrictive than inpatient treatment is in the best interest of the committed person or others. Information must be disclosed only after giving notice to the committed person and the person's counsel;

(h)(i) To appropriate law enforcement agencies, including tribal law enforcement agencies, and to a person, when the identity of the person is known to the public or private agency, whose health and safety has been threatened, or who is known to have been repeatedly harassed, by the patient. The person may designate a representative to receive the disclosure. The disclosure must be made by the professional person in charge of the public or private agency or his or her designee and must include the dates of commitment, admission, discharge, or release, authorized or unauthorized absence from the agency's facility, and only any other information that is pertinent to the threat or harassment. The agency or its employees are not civilly liable for the decision to disclose or not, so long as the decision was reached in good faith and without gross negligence. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted as a waiver of sovereign immunity by a tribe.

(ii) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes of the federal health insurance portability and accountability act;

(i)(i) To appropriate corrections and law enforcement agencies, including tribal corrections and law enforcement agencies, all necessary and relevant information in the event of a crisis or emergent situation that poses a significant and imminent risk to the public. The mental health service agency or its employees are not civilly liable for the decision to disclose or not so long as the decision was reached in good faith and without gross negligence.

(ii) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes of the health insurance portability and accountability act;

(j) To the persons designated in RCW 71.05.425 for the purposes described in those sections;

(k) By a care coordinator, including an Indian health care provider, under RCW 71.05.585 or 10.77.175 assigned to a person ordered to receive less restrictive alternative treatment for the purpose of sharing information to parties necessary for the implementation of proceedings under chapter 71.05 or 10.77 RCW;

(l) Upon the death of a person. The person's next of kin, personal representative, guardian, or conservator, if any, must be notified. Next of kin who are of legal age and competent must be notified under this section in the following order: Spouse, parents, children, brothers and sisters, and other relatives according to the degree of relation. Access to all records and information compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course of providing services to a deceased patient are governed by RCW 70.02.140;

(m) To mark headstones or otherwise memorialize patients interred at state hospital cemeteries. The department of social and health services shall make available the name, date of birth, and date of death of patients buried in state hospital cemeteries fifty years after the death of a patient;

(n) To law enforcement officers and to prosecuting attorneys as are necessary to enforce RCW 9.41.040(2)(a)(iii). The extent of information that may be released is limited as follows:

(i) Only the fact, place, and date of involuntary commitment, an official copy of any order or orders of commitment, and an official copy of any written or oral notice of ineligibility to possess a firearm that was provided to the person pursuant to RCW 9.41.047(1), must be disclosed upon request;

(ii) The law enforcement and prosecuting attorneys may only release the information obtained to the person's attorney as required by court rule and to a jury or judge, if a jury is waived, that presides over any trial at which the person is charged with violating RCW 9.41.040(2)(a)(iii);

(iii) Tribal law enforcement officers and tribal prosecuting attorneys who enforce tribal laws or tribal court orders similar to RCW 9.41.040(2)(a)(v) may also receive confidential information in accordance with this subsection;

(iv) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes of the federal health insurance portability and accountability act;

(o) When a patient would otherwise be subject to the provisions of this section and disclosure is necessary for the protection of the patient or others due to his or her unauthorized disappearance from the facility, and his or her whereabouts is unknown, notice of the disappearance, along with relevant information, may be made to relatives, the department of corrections when the person is under the supervision of the department, and governmental law enforcement agencies designated by the physician or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner in charge of the patient or the professional person in charge of the facility, or his or her professional designee;

(p) Pursuant to lawful order of a court, including a tribal court;

(q) To qualified staff members of the department, to the authority, to behavioral health administrative services organizations, to managed care organizations, to resource management services responsible for serving a patient, or to service providers designated by resource management services as necessary to determine the progress and adequacy of treatment and to determine whether the person should be transferred to a less restrictive or more appropriate treatment modality or facility;

(r) Within the mental health service agency or Indian health care provider facility where the patient is receiving treatment, confidential information may be disclosed to persons employed, serving in bona fide training programs, or participating in supervised volunteer programs, at the facility when it is necessary to perform their duties;

(s) Within the department and the authority as necessary to coordinate treatment for mental illness, developmental disabilities, or substance use disorder of persons who are under the supervision of the department;

(t) Between the department of social and health services, the department of children, youth, and families, and the health care authority as necessary to coordinate treatment for mental illness, developmental disabilities, or substance use disorder of persons who are under the supervision of the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families;

(u) To a licensed physician or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner who has determined that the life or health of the person is in danger and that treatment without the information and records related to mental health services could be injurious to the patient's health. Disclosure must be limited to the portions of the records necessary to meet the medical emergency;

(v)(i) Consistent with the requirements of the federal health insurance portability and accountability act, to:

(A) A health care provider, including an Indian health care provider, who is providing care to a patient, or to whom a patient has been referred for evaluation or treatment; or

(B) Any other person who is working in a care coordinator role for a health care facility, health care provider, or Indian health care provider, or is under an agreement pursuant to the federal health insurance portability and accountability act with a health care facility or a health care provider and requires the information and records to assure coordinated care and treatment of that patient.

(ii) A person authorized to use or disclose information and records related to mental health services under this subsection (2)(v) must take appropriate steps to protect the information and records relating to mental health services.

(iii) Psychotherapy notes may not be released without authorization of the patient who is the subject of the request for release of information;

(w) To administrative and office support staff designated to obtain medical records for those licensed professionals listed in (v) of this subsection;

(x) To a facility that is to receive a person who is involuntarily committed under chapter 71.05 RCW, or upon transfer of the person from one evaluation and treatment facility to another. The release of records under this subsection is limited to the information and records related to mental health services required by law, a record or summary of all somatic treatments, and a discharge summary. The discharge summary may include a statement of the patient's problem, the treatment goals, the type of treatment which has been provided, and recommendation for future treatment, but may not include the patient's complete treatment record;

(y) To the person's counsel or guardian ad litem, without modification, at any time in order to prepare for involuntary commitment or recommitment proceedings, reexaminations, appeals, or other actions relating to detention, admission, commitment, or patient's rights under chapter 71.05 RCW;

(z) To staff members of the protection and advocacy agency or to staff members of a private, nonprofit corporation for the purpose of protecting and advocating the rights of persons with mental disorders or developmental disabilities. Resource management services may limit the release of information to the name, birthdate, and county of residence of the patient, information regarding whether the patient was voluntarily admitted, or involuntarily committed, the date and place of admission, placement, or commitment, the name and address of a guardian of the patient, and the date and place of the guardian's appointment. Any staff member who wishes to obtain additional information must notify the patient's resource management services in writing of the request and of the resource management services' right to object. The staff member shall send the notice by mail to the guardian's address. If the guardian does not object in writing within fifteen days after the notice is mailed, the staff member may obtain the additional information. If the guardian objects in writing within fifteen days after the notice is mailed, the staff member may not obtain the additional information;

(aa) To all current treating providers, including Indian health care providers, of the patient with prescriptive authority who have written a prescription for the patient within the last twelve months. For purposes of coordinating health care, the department or the authority may release without written authorization of the patient, information acquired for billing and collection purposes as described in RCW 70.02.050(1)(d). The department, or the authority, if applicable, shall notify the patient that billing and collection information has been released to named providers, and provide the substance of the information released and the dates of such release. Neither the department nor the authority may release counseling, inpatient psychiatric hospitalization, or drug and alcohol treatment information without a signed written release from the client;

(bb)(i) To the secretary of social and health services and the director of the health care authority for either program evaluation or research, or both so long as the secretary or director, where applicable, adopts rules for the conduct of the evaluation or research, or both. Such rules must include, but need not be limited to, the requirement that all evaluators and researchers sign an oath of confidentiality substantially as follows:

"As a condition of conducting evaluation or research concerning persons who have received services from (fill in the facility, agency, or person) I, . . . . . ., agree not to divulge, publish, or otherwise make known to unauthorized persons or the public any information obtained in the course of such evaluation or research regarding persons who have received services such that the person who received such services is identifiable.

I recognize that unauthorized release of confidential information may subject me to civil liability under the provisions of state law.

/s/ . . . . . ."

(ii) Nothing in this chapter may be construed to prohibit the compilation and publication of statistical data for use by government or researchers under standards, including standards to assure maintenance of confidentiality, set forth by the secretary, or director, where applicable;

(cc) To any person if the conditions in RCW 70.02.205 are met;

(dd) To the secretary of health for the purposes of the maternal mortality review panel established in RCW 70.54.450; or

(ee) To a tribe or Indian health care provider to carry out the requirements of RCW 71.05.150(((6)))(5).

(3) Whenever federal law or federal regulations restrict the release of information contained in the information and records related to mental health services of any patient who receives treatment for a substance use disorder, the department or the authority may restrict the release of the information as necessary to comply with federal law and regulations.

(4) Civil liability and immunity for the release of information about a particular person who is committed to the department of social and health services or the authority under RCW 71.05.280(3) and 71.05.320(4)(c) after dismissal of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, is governed by RCW 4.24.550.

(5) The fact of admission to a provider of mental health services, as well as all records, files, evidence, findings, or orders made, prepared, collected, or maintained pursuant to chapter 71.05 RCW are not admissible as evidence in any legal proceeding outside that chapter without the written authorization of the person who was the subject of the proceeding except as provided in RCW 70.02.260, in a subsequent criminal prosecution of a person committed pursuant to RCW 71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(4)(c) on charges that were dismissed pursuant to chapter 10.77 RCW due to incompetency to stand trial, in a civil commitment proceeding pursuant to chapter 71.09 RCW, or, in the case of a minor, a guardianship or dependency proceeding. The records and files maintained in any court proceeding pursuant to chapter 71.05 RCW must be confidential and available subsequent to such proceedings ((only to the person who was the subject of the proceeding or his or her attorney))in accordance with RCW 71.05.620. In addition, the court may order the subsequent release or use of such records or files only upon good cause shown if the court finds that appropriate safeguards for strict confidentiality are and will be maintained.

(6)(a) Except as provided in RCW 4.24.550, any person may bring an action against an individual who has willfully released confidential information or records concerning him or her in violation of the provisions of this section, for the greater of the following amounts:

(i) One thousand dollars; or

(ii) Three times the amount of actual damages sustained, if any.

(b) It is not a prerequisite to recovery under this subsection that the plaintiff suffered or was threatened with special, as contrasted with general, damages.

(c) Any person may bring an action to enjoin the release of confidential information or records concerning him or her or his or her ward, in violation of the provisions of this section, and may in the same action seek damages as provided in this subsection.

(d) The court may award to the plaintiff, should he or she prevail in any action authorized by this subsection, reasonable attorney fees in addition to those otherwise provided by law.

(e) If an action is brought under this subsection, no action may be brought under RCW 70.02.170.

Sec. 33. RCW 70.02.240 and 2023 c 295 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

The fact of admission and all information and records related to mental health services obtained through inpatient or outpatient treatment of a minor under chapter 71.34 RCW must be kept confidential, except as authorized by this section or under RCW 70.02.050, 70.02.210, 70.02.230, 70.02.250, 70.02.260, and 70.02.265. Confidential information under this section may be disclosed only:

(1) In communications between mental health professionals, including Indian health care providers, to meet the requirements of chapter 71.34 RCW, in the provision of services to the minor, or in making appropriate referrals;

(2) In the course of guardianship or dependency proceedings, including proceedings within tribal jurisdictions;

(3) To the minor, the minor's parent, including those acting as a parent as defined in RCW 71.34.020 for purposes of family-initiated treatment, and the minor's attorney, subject to RCW 13.50.100;

(4) To the courts, including tribal courts, as necessary to administer chapter 71.34 RCW or equivalent proceedings in tribal courts;

(5) By a care coordinator, including an Indian health care provider, under RCW 71.34.755 or 10.77.175 assigned to a person ordered to receive less restrictive alternative treatment for the purpose of sharing information to parties necessary for the implementation of proceedings under chapter 71.34 or 10.77 RCW;

(6) By a care coordinator, including an Indian health care provider, under RCW 71.34.755 assigned to a person ordered to receive less restrictive alternative treatment for the purpose of sharing information to parties necessary for the implementation of proceedings under chapter 71.34 RCW;

(7) To law enforcement officers, including tribal law enforcement officers, or public health officers, including tribal public health officers, as necessary to carry out the responsibilities of their office. However, only the fact and date of admission, and the date of discharge, the name and address of the treatment provider, if any, and the last known address must be disclosed upon request;

(8) To law enforcement officers, including tribal law enforcement officers, public health officers, including tribal public health officers, relatives, and other governmental law enforcement agencies, if a minor has escaped from custody, disappeared from an evaluation and treatment facility, violated conditions of a less restrictive treatment order, or failed to return from an authorized leave, and then only such information as may be necessary to provide for public safety or to assist in the apprehension of the minor. The officers are obligated to keep the information confidential in accordance with this chapter;

(9) To the secretary of social and health services and the director of the health care authority for assistance in data collection and program evaluation or research so long as the secretary or director, where applicable, adopts rules for the conduct of such evaluation and research. The rules must include, but need not be limited to, the requirement that all evaluators and researchers sign an oath of confidentiality substantially as follows:

"As a condition of conducting evaluation or research concerning persons who have received services from (fill in the facility, agency, or person) I, . . . . . ., agree not to divulge, publish, or otherwise make known to unauthorized persons or the public any information obtained in the course of such evaluation or research regarding minors who have received services in a manner such that the minor is identifiable.

I recognize that unauthorized release of confidential information may subject me to civil liability under state law.

/s/ . . . . . . ";

(10) To appropriate law enforcement agencies, including tribal law enforcement agencies, upon request, all necessary and relevant information in the event of a crisis or emergent situation that poses a significant and imminent risk to the public. The mental health service agency or its employees are not civilly liable for the decision to disclose or not, so long as the decision was reached in good faith and without gross negligence;

(11) To appropriate law enforcement agencies, including tribal law enforcement agencies, and to a person, when the identity of the person is known to the public or private agency, whose health and safety has been threatened, or who is known to have been repeatedly harassed, by the patient. The person may designate a representative to receive the disclosure. The disclosure must be made by the professional person in charge of the public or private agency or his or her designee and must include the dates of admission, discharge, authorized or unauthorized absence from the agency's facility, and only any other information that is pertinent to the threat or harassment. The agency or its employees are not civilly liable for the decision to disclose or not, so long as the decision was reached in good faith and without gross negligence. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted as a waiver of sovereign immunity by a tribe;

(12) To a minor's next of kin, attorney, guardian, or conservator, if any, the information that the minor is presently in the facility or that the minor is seriously physically ill and a statement evaluating the mental and physical condition of the minor as well as a statement of the probable duration of the minor's confinement;

(13) Upon the death of a minor, to the minor's next of kin;

(14) To a facility, including a tribal facility, in which the minor resides or will reside;

(15) To law enforcement officers and to prosecuting attorneys as are necessary to enforce RCW 9.41.040(2)(a)(iii). The extent of information that may be released is limited as follows:

(a) Only the fact, place, and date of involuntary commitment, an official copy of any order or orders of commitment, and an official copy of any written or oral notice of ineligibility to possess a firearm that was provided to the person pursuant to RCW 9.41.047(1), must be disclosed upon request;

(b) The law enforcement and prosecuting attorneys may only release the information obtained to the person's attorney as required by court rule and to a jury or judge, if a jury is waived, that presides over any trial at which the person is charged with violating RCW 9.41.040(2)(a)(iii);

(c) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes of the federal health insurance portability and accountability act;

(d) Tribal law enforcement officers and tribal prosecuting attorneys who enforce tribal laws or tribal court orders similar to RCW 9.41.040(2)(a)(v) may also receive confidential information in accordance with this subsection;

(16) This section may not be construed to prohibit the compilation and publication of statistical data for use by government or researchers under standards, including standards to assure maintenance of confidentiality, set forth by the director of the health care authority or the secretary of the department of social and health services, where applicable. The fact of admission and all information obtained pursuant to chapter 71.34 RCW are not admissible as evidence in any legal proceeding outside chapter 71.34 RCW, except guardianship or dependency, without the written consent of the minor or the minor's parent;

(17) For the purpose of a correctional facility participating in the postinstitutional medical assistance system supporting the expedited medical determinations and medical suspensions as provided in RCW 74.09.555 and 74.09.295;

(18) Pursuant to a lawful order of a court, including a tribal court.

Sec. 34. RCW 70.02.260 and 2018 c 201 s 8005 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) A mental health service agency shall release to the persons authorized under subsection (2) of this section, upon request:

(i) The fact, place, and date of an involuntary commitment, the fact and date of discharge or release, and the last known address of a person who has been committed under chapter 71.05 RCW.

(ii) Information and records related to mental health services, in the format determined under subsection (9) of this section, concerning a person who:

(A) Is currently committed to the custody or supervision of the department of corrections or the indeterminate sentence review board under chapter 9.94A or 9.95 RCW;

(B) Has been convicted or found not guilty by reason of insanity of a serious violent offense; or

(C) Was charged with a serious violent offense and the charges were dismissed under RCW 10.77.086.

(b) Legal counsel may release such information to the persons authorized under subsection (2) of this section on behalf of the mental health service agency, so long as nothing in this subsection requires the disclosure of attorney work product or attorney-client privileged information.

(2) The information subject to release under subsection (1) of this section must be released to law enforcement officers, personnel of a county ((or)), city, or tribal jail or tribal detention or holding facility, designated mental health professionals or designated crisis responders, as appropriate, public health officers, therapeutic court personnel as defined in RCW 71.05.020, or personnel of the department of corrections, including the indeterminate sentence review board and personnel assigned to perform board-related duties, when such information is requested during the course of business and for the purpose of carrying out the responsibilities of the requesting person's office. No mental health service agency or person employed by a mental health service agency, or its legal counsel, may be liable for information released to or used under the provisions of this section or rules adopted under this section except under RCW 71.05.680.

(3) A person who requests information under subsection (1)(a)(ii) of this section must comply with the following restrictions:

(a) Information must be requested only for the purposes permitted by this subsection and for the purpose of carrying out the responsibilities of the requesting person's office. Appropriate purposes for requesting information under this section include:

(i) Completing presentence investigations or risk assessment reports;

(ii) Assessing a person's risk to the community;

(iii) Assessing a person's risk of harm to self or others when confined in a city or county jail;

(iv) Planning for and provision of supervision of an offender, including decisions related to sanctions for violations of conditions of community supervision; and

(v) Responding to an offender's failure to report for department of corrections supervision;

(b) Information may not be requested under this section unless the requesting person has reasonable suspicion that the individual who is the subject of the information:

(i) Has engaged in activity indicating that a crime or a violation of community custody or parole has been committed or, based upon his or her current or recent past behavior, is likely to be committed in the near future; or

(ii) Is exhibiting signs of a deterioration in mental functioning which may make the individual appropriate for civil commitment under chapter 71.05 RCW; and

(c) Any information received under this section must be held confidential and subject to the limitations on disclosure outlined in this chapter, except:

(i) The information may be shared with other persons who have the right to request similar information under subsection (2) of this section, solely for the purpose of coordinating activities related to the individual who is the subject of the information in a manner consistent with the official responsibilities of the persons involved;

(ii) The information may be shared with a prosecuting attorney acting in an advisory capacity for a person who receives information under this section. A prosecuting attorney under this subsection is subject to the same restrictions and confidentiality limitations as the person who requested the information; and

(iii) As provided in RCW 72.09.585.

(4) A request for information and records related to mental health services under this section does not require the consent of the subject of the records. The request must be provided in writing, except to the extent authorized in subsection (5) of this section. A written request may include requests made by email or facsimile so long as the requesting person is clearly identified. The request must specify the information being requested.

(5) In the event of an emergency situation that poses a significant risk to the public or the offender, a mental health service agency, or its legal counsel, shall release information related to mental health services delivered to the offender and, if known, information regarding where the offender is likely to be found to the department of corrections or law enforcement upon request. The initial request may be written or oral. All oral requests must be subsequently confirmed in writing. Information released in response to an oral request is limited to a statement as to whether the offender is or is not being treated by the mental health service agency and the address or information about the location or whereabouts of the offender.

(6) Disclosure under this section to state or local law enforcement authorities is mandatory for the purposes of the federal health insurance portability and accountability act.

(7) Whenever federal law or federal regulations restrict the release of information contained in the treatment records of any patient who receives treatment for alcoholism or drug dependency, the release of the information may be restricted as necessary to comply with federal law and regulations.

(8) This section does not modify the terms and conditions of disclosure of information related to sexually transmitted diseases under this chapter.

(9) In collaboration with interested organizations, the authority shall develop a standard form for requests for information related to mental health services made under this section and a standard format for information provided in response to the requests. Consistent with the goals of the health information privacy provisions of the federal health insurance portability and accountability act, in developing the standard form for responsive information, the authority shall design the form in such a way that the information disclosed is limited to the minimum necessary to serve the purpose for which the information is requested.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 35. Section 5 of this act expires when section 6 of this act takes effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 36. Section 6 of this at takes effect when section 4, chapter 433, Laws of 2023 takes effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 37. Section 7 of this act expires when section 8 of this act takes effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 38. Section 8 of this act takes effect when section 13, chapter 433, Laws of 2023 takes effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 39. Sections 11, 13, 23, and 26 of this act expire July 1, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 40. Sections 12, 14, 24, and 27 of this act take effect July 1, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 41. Section 17 of this act expires when section 18 of this act takes effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 42. Section 18 of this act takes effect when section 10, chapter 210, Laws of 2022 takes effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 43. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2024, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.

--- END ---