BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.08.360 and 2019 c 67 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The examination for an architect's certificate of registration shall be held at least annually at such time and place as the board determines.

(2) The board shall determine the content, scope, and grading process of the examination. The board may adopt an appropriate national examination and grading procedure.

(3) Applicants who fail to pass any section of the examination shall be permitted to retake the parts failed as prescribed by the board. Applicants ((have five years from the date of the first passed examination section to pass all remaining sections. If the entire examination is not successfully completed within five years, any sections that were passed more than five years prior must be retaken. If a candidate fails to pass all remaining sections within the initial five-year period, the candidate is given a new five-year period from the date of the second oldest passed section. All sections of the examination must be passed within a single five-year period for the applicant to be deemed to have passed the complete examination))shall pass all sections of the examination as prescribed by the board.

(4) Applicants for registration may begin taking the examination upon enrollment in a structured training program as approved by the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2024.

--- END ---