BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. For the businesses and professions included under this title, except for interstate compacts:

(1) An individual who is not lawfully present in the United States is eligible for a professional license, commercial license, certificate, permit, or registration as allowed under Title 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1621. A state agency, regulatory authority, or disciplining authority shall not deny an application for a professional license, commercial license, certificate, permit, or registration solely on the basis of a person's immigration or citizenship status if the person has met all other qualifications.

(2) An applicant for a professional license, commercial license, certificate, permit, or registration may provide an individual taxpayer identification number in lieu of a social security number when completing an application.

(3) A state agency, regulatory authority, or disciplining authority shall not disclose to any person who is not employed by the state agency, regulatory authority, or disciplining authority the social security number or individual taxpayer identification number of an applicant or licensee for any purpose except:

(a) Tax purposes;

(b) Licensing purposes; and

(c) Enforcement of an order for the payment of child support.

(4) A social security number or individual taxpayer identification number provided to a state agency, regulatory authority, or disciplining authority is confidential and is exempt from disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.

(5) Nothing in this section shall affect the requirements to obtain a professional license, commercial license, certificate, permit, or registration that are not directly related to citizenship status or immigration status.

(6) This chapter does not apply to licensees under chapters 18.165 and 18.170 RCW and RCW 18.185.250.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.235.020 and 2017 c 281 s 37 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This chapter applies only to the director and the boards and commissions having jurisdiction in relation to the businesses and professions licensed under the chapters specified in this section. This chapter does not apply to any business or profession not licensed under the chapters specified in this section.

(2)(a) The director has authority under this chapter in relation to the following businesses and professions:

(i) Auctioneers under chapter 18.11 RCW;

(ii) Bail bond agents and bail bond recovery agents under chapter 18.185 RCW;

(iii) Camping resorts' operators and salespersons under chapter 19.105 RCW;

(iv) Commercial telephone solicitors under chapter 19.158 RCW;

(v) Cosmetologists, barbers, manicurists, and estheticians under chapter 18.16 RCW;

(vi) Court reporters under chapter 18.145 RCW;

(vii) Driver training schools and instructors under chapter 46.82 RCW;

(viii) Employment agencies under chapter 19.31 RCW;

(ix) For hire vehicle operators under chapter 46.72 RCW;

(x) Limousines under chapter 46.72A RCW;

(xi) Notaries public under chapter 42.45 RCW;

(xii) Private investigators under chapter 18.165 RCW;

(xiii) Professional boxing, martial arts, and wrestling under chapter 67.08 RCW;

(xiv) Real estate appraisers under chapter 18.140 RCW;

(xv) Real estate brokers and salespersons under chapters 18.85 and 18.86 RCW;

(xvi) Scrap metal processors, scrap metal recyclers, and scrap metal suppliers under chapter 19.290 RCW;

(xvii) Security guards under chapter 18.170 RCW;

(xviii) Sellers of travel under chapter 19.138 RCW;

(xix) Timeshares and timeshare salespersons under chapter 64.36 RCW;

(xx) Whitewater river outfitters under chapter 79A.60 RCW;

(xxi) Home inspectors under chapter 18.280 RCW;

(xxii) Body artists, body piercers, and tattoo artists, and body art, body piercing, and tattooing shops and businesses, under chapter 18.300 RCW; and

(xxiii) Appraisal management companies under chapter 18.310 RCW.

(b) The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter are as follows:

(i) The state board for architects established in chapter 18.08 RCW;

(ii) The Washington state collection agency board established in chapter 19.16 RCW;

(iii) The state board of registration for professional engineers and land surveyors established in chapter 18.43 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.43 and 18.210 RCW;

(iv) The funeral and cemetery board established in chapter 18.39 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.39 and 68.05 RCW;

(v) The state board of licensure for landscape architects established in chapter 18.96 RCW; and

(vi) The state geologist licensing board established in chapter 18.220 RCW.

(3) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the disciplinary authority may grant or deny licenses based on the conditions and criteria established in this chapter, chapter 18.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 11 of this act), and the chapters specified in subsection (2) of this section. This chapter also governs any investigation, hearing, or proceeding relating to denial of licensure or issuance of a license conditioned on the applicant's compliance with an order entered under RCW 18.235.110 by the disciplinary authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 28A.410 RCW to read as follows:

An individual who is not lawfully present in the United States is eligible for a permit or certificate as allowed under Title 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1621. The professional educator standards board and the superintendent of public instruction shall not deny an application for a permit or certificate solely on the basis of a person's immigration or citizenship status if the person has met all other qualifications.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 28A.413 RCW to read as follows:

An individual who is not lawfully present in the United States is eligible for a certificate as allowed under Title 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1621. The paraeducator board shall not deny an application for a certificate for a person solely on the basis of a person's immigration or citizenship status if the person has met all other qualifications.

Sec. 5. RCW 18.130.040 and 2023 c 469 s 18, 2023 c 460 s 15, 2023 c 425 s 27, 2023 c 270 s 14, 2023 c 175 s 11, and 2023 c 123 s 21 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) This chapter applies only to the secretary and the boards and commissions having jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed under the chapters specified in this section. This chapter does not apply to any business or profession not licensed under the chapters specified in this section.

(2)(a) The secretary has authority under this chapter in relation to the following professions:

(i) Dispensing opticians licensed and designated apprentices under chapter 18.34 RCW;

(ii) Midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW;

(iii) Ocularists licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;

(iv) Massage therapists and businesses licensed under chapter 18.108 RCW;

(v) Dental hygienists licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;

(vi) Acupuncturists or acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioners licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW;

(vii) Radiologic technologists certified and X-ray technicians registered under chapter 18.84 RCW;

(viii) Respiratory care practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89 RCW;

(ix) Hypnotherapists registered, agency affiliated counselors registered, certified, or licensed, and advisors and counselors certified under chapter 18.19 RCW;

(x) Persons licensed as mental health counselors, mental health counselor associates, marriage and family therapists, marriage and family therapist associates, social workers, social work associates—advanced, and social work associates—independent clinical under chapter 18.225 RCW;

(xi) Persons registered as nursing pool operators under chapter 18.52C RCW;

(xii) Nursing assistants registered or certified or medication assistants endorsed under chapter 18.88A RCW;

(xiii) Dietitians and nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138 RCW;

(xiv) Substance use disorder professionals, substance use disorder professional trainees, or co-occurring disorder specialists certified under chapter 18.205 RCW;

(xv) Sex offender treatment providers and certified affiliate sex offender treatment providers certified under chapter 18.155 RCW;

(xvi) Persons licensed and certified under chapter 18.73 RCW or RCW 18.71.205;

(xvii) Orthotists and prosthetists licensed under chapter 18.200 RCW;

(xviii) Surgical technologists registered under chapter 18.215 RCW;

(xix) Recreational therapists under chapter 18.230 RCW;

(xx) Animal massage therapists certified under chapter 18.240 RCW;

(xxi) Athletic trainers licensed under chapter 18.250 RCW;

(xxii) Home care aides certified under chapter 18.88B RCW;

(xxiii) Genetic counselors licensed under chapter 18.290 RCW;

(xxiv) Reflexologists certified under chapter 18.108 RCW;

(xxv) Medical assistants-certified, medical assistants-hemodialysis technician, medical assistants-phlebotomist, forensic phlebotomist, and medical assistants-registered certified and registered under chapter 18.360 RCW;

(xxvi) Behavior analysts, assistant behavior analysts, and behavior technicians under chapter 18.380 RCW;

(xxvii) Birth doulas certified under chapter 18.47 RCW;

(xxviii) Music therapists licensed under chapter 18.233 RCW;

(xxix) Behavioral health support specialists certified under chapter 18.227 RCW; and

(xxx) Certified peer specialists and certified peer specialist trainees under chapter 18.420 RCW.

(b) The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter are as follows:

(i) The podiatric medical board as established in chapter 18.22 RCW;

(ii) The chiropractic quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.25 RCW;

(iii) The dental quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.32 RCW governing licenses issued under chapter 18.32 RCW, licenses and registrations issued under chapter 18.260 RCW, licenses issued under chapter 18.265 RCW, and certifications issued under chapter 18.350 RCW;

(iv) The board of hearing and speech as established in chapter 18.35 RCW;

(v) The board of examiners for nursing home administrators as established in chapter 18.52 RCW;

(vi) The optometry board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW governing licenses issued under chapter 18.53 RCW;

(vii) The board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as established in chapter 18.57 RCW governing licenses issued under chapter 18.57 RCW;

(viii) The pharmacy quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.64 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;

(ix) The Washington medical commission as established in chapter 18.71 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW;

(x) The board of physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74 RCW;

(xi) The board of occupational therapy practice as established in chapter 18.59 RCW;

(xii) The board of nursing as established in chapter 18.79 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under that chapter and under chapter 18.80 RCW;

(xiii) The examining board of psychology and its disciplinary committee as established in chapter 18.83 RCW;

(xiv) The veterinary board of governors as established in chapter 18.92 RCW;

(xv) The board of naturopathy established in chapter 18.36A RCW, governing licenses and certifications issued under that chapter; and

(xvi) The board of denturists established in chapter 18.30 RCW.

(3) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the disciplining authority has the authority to grant or deny licenses. The disciplining authority may also grant a license subject to conditions, which must be in compliance with chapter 18.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 11 of this act).

(4) All disciplining authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure substantially consistent application of this chapter, the uniform disciplinary act, among the disciplining authorities listed in subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 6. RCW 18.53.060 and 1995 c 198 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

From and after January 1, 1940, in order to be eligible for examination for registration, a person ((shall be a citizen of the United States of America, who)) shall have a preliminary education of or equal to four years in a state accredited high school and has completed a full attendance course in a regularly chartered school of optometry maintaining a standard which is deemed sufficient and satisfactory by the optometry board, who is a person of good moral character, who has a visual acuity in at least one eye, of a standard known as 20/40 under correction: PROVIDED, That from and after January 1, 1975, in order to be eligible for examination for a license, a person shall have the following qualifications:

(1) Be a graduate of a state accredited high school or its equivalent;

(2) Have a diploma or other certificate of completion from an accredited college of optometry or school of optometry, maintaining a standard which is deemed sufficient and satisfactory by the optometry board, conferring its degree of doctor of optometry or its equivalent, maintaining a course of four scholastic years in addition to preprofessional college-level studies, and teaching substantially all of the following subjects: General anatomy, anatomy of the eyes, physiology, physics, chemistry, pharmacology, biology, bacteriology, general pathology, ocular pathology, ocular neurology, ocular myology, psychology, physiological optics, optometrical mechanics, clinical optometry, visual field charting and orthoptics, general laws of optics and refraction and use of the ophthalmoscope, retinoscope and other clinical instruments necessary in the practice of optometry; and

(3) Be of good moral character.

Such person shall file an application for an examination and license with said board at any time thirty days prior to the time fixed for such examination, or at a later date if approved by the board, and such application must be on forms approved by the board, and properly attested, and if found to be in accordance with the provisions of this chapter shall entitle the applicant upon payment of the proper fee, to take the examination prescribed by the board. Such examination shall not be out of keeping with the established teachings and adopted textbooks of the recognized schools of optometry, and shall be confined to such subjects and practices as are recognized as essential to the practice of optometry. All candidates without discrimination, who shall successfully pass the prescribed examination, shall be registered by the board and shall, upon payment of the proper fee, be issued a license. Any license to practice optometry in this state issued by the secretary, and which shall be in full force and effect at the time of passage of chapter 69, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess., shall be continued.

Sec. 7. RCW 18.185.020 and 1993 c 260 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

An applicant must meet the following minimum requirements to obtain a bail bond agent license:

(1) Be at least eighteen years of age;

(2) ((Be a citizen or resident alien of the United States;

(3))) Not have been convicted of a crime in any jurisdiction in the preceding ten years, if the director determines that the applicant's particular crime directly relates to a capacity to perform the duties of a bail bond agent and the director determines that the license should be withheld to protect the citizens of Washington state. If the director shall make a determination to withhold a license because of previous convictions, the determination shall be consistent with the restoration of employment rights act, chapter 9.96A RCW;

(((4)))(3) Be employed by a bail bond agency or be licensed as a bail bond agency; and

(((5)))(4) Pay the required fee.

Sec. 8. RCW 19.230.040 and 2017 c 30 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person applying for a money transmitter license under this chapter shall do so in a form and in a medium prescribed in rule by the director. The application must state or contain:

(a) The legal name, business addresses, and residential address, if applicable, of the applicant and any fictitious or trade name used by the applicant in conducting its business;

(b) The legal name, residential and business addresses, date of birth, social security number((,))or tax payer identification number, and employment history for the five-year period preceding the submission of the application of the applicant's proposed responsible individual((, and documentation that the proposed responsible individual is a citizen of the United States or has obtained legal immigration status to work in the United States)). In addition, the proposed responsible individual must reside in the United States, and the applicant shall provide the fingerprints of the proposed responsible individual upon the request of the director;

(c) For the ten-year period preceding submission of the application, a list of any criminal convictions of the proposed responsible individual of the applicant, any material litigation in which the applicant has been involved, and any litigation involving the proposed responsible individual relating to the provision of money services;

(d) A description of any money services previously provided by the applicant and the money services that the applicant seeks to provide to persons in Washington state;

(e) A list of the applicant's proposed authorized delegates and the locations where the applicant and its authorized delegates will engage in the provision of money services to persons in Washington state on behalf of the licensee;

(f) A list of other states in which the applicant is licensed to engage in money transmission, or provide other money services, and any license revocations, suspensions, restrictions, or other disciplinary action taken against the applicant in another state;

(g) A list of any license revocations, suspensions, restrictions, or other disciplinary action taken against any money services business involving the proposed responsible individual;

(h) Information concerning any bankruptcy or receivership proceedings involving or affecting the applicant or the proposed responsible individual;

(i) A sample form of contract for authorized delegates, if applicable;

(j) A description of the source of money and credit to be used by the applicant to provide money services; and

(k) Any other information regarding the background, experience, character, financial responsibility, and general fitness of the applicant, the applicant's responsible individual, or authorized delegates that the director may require in rule.

(2) If an applicant is a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or other entity, the applicant shall also provide:

(a) The date of the applicant's incorporation or formation and state or country of incorporation or formation;

(b) If applicable, a certificate of good standing from the state or country in which the applicant is incorporated or formed;

(c) A brief description of the structure or organization of the applicant, including any parent or subsidiary of the applicant, and whether any parent or subsidiary is publicly traded;

(d) The legal name, any fictitious or trade name, all business and residential addresses, date of birth, social security number, and employment history in the ten-year period preceding the submission of the application for each executive officer, board director, or person that has control of the applicant;

(e) If the applicant or its corporate parent is not a publicly traded entity, the director may request the fingerprints of each executive officer, board director, or person that has control of the applicant;

(f) A list of any criminal convictions, material litigation, and any litigation related to the provision of money services, in the ten-year period preceding the submission of the application in which any executive officer, board director, or person in control of the applicant has been involved;

(g) A copy of the applicant's audited financial statements for the most recent fiscal year or, if the applicant is a wholly owned subsidiary of another corporation, the most recent audited consolidated annual financial statement of the parent corporation or the applicant's most recent audited consolidated annual financial statement, and in each case, if available, for the two-year period preceding the submission of the application;

(h) A copy of the applicant's unconsolidated financial statements for the current fiscal year, whether audited or not, and, if available, for the two-year period preceding the submission of the application;

(i) If the applicant is publicly traded, a copy of the most recent report filed with the United States securities and exchange commission under section 13 of the federal Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 78m);

(j) If the applicant is a wholly owned subsidiary of:

(i) A corporation publicly traded in the United States, a copy of audited financial statements for the parent corporation for the most recent fiscal year or a copy of the parent corporation's most recent report filed under section 13 of the federal Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 78m); or

(ii) A corporation publicly traded outside the United States, a copy of similar documentation filed with the regulator of the parent corporation's domicile outside the United States;

(k) If the applicant has a registered agent in this state, the name and address of the applicant's registered agent in this state; and

(l) Any other information that the director may require in rule regarding the applicant, each executive officer, or each board director to determine the applicant's background, experience, character, financial responsibility, and general fitness.

(3) A nonrefundable application fee and an initial license fee, as determined in rule by the director, must accompany an application for a license under this chapter. The initial license fee must be refunded if the application is denied.

(4) As part of or in connection with an application for any license under this section, or periodically upon license renewal, each officer, director, responsible individual, and owner applicant shall furnish information concerning his or her identity, including fingerprints for submission to the Washington state patrol or the federal bureau of investigation for a state and national criminal history background check, personal history, experience, business record, purposes, and other pertinent facts, as the director may reasonably require. As part of or in connection with an application for a license under this chapter, or periodically upon license renewal, the director is authorized to receive criminal history record information that includes nonconviction data as defined in RCW 10.97.030. The department may only disseminate nonconviction data obtained under this section to criminal justice agencies. This section does not apply to financial institutions regulated under chapters 31.12 and 31.13 RCW and Titles 32 and 33 RCW. The requirements of this subsection do not apply when the applicant or its corporate parents are publicly traded entities.

(5) For business models that store virtual currency on behalf of others, the applicant must provide a third-party security audit of all electronic information and data systems acceptable to the director.

(6) The director or the director's designated representative may deny an application for a proposed license or trade name if the proposed license or trade name is similar to a currently existing licensee name, including trade names.

(7) The director may waive one or more requirements of this section or permit an applicant to submit other information in lieu of the required information.

Sec. 9. RCW 19.230.090 and 2003 c 287 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person applying for a currency exchange license under this chapter shall do so in a form and in a medium prescribed in rule by the director. The application must state or contain:

(a) The legal name, business addresses, and residential address, if applicable, of the applicant and any fictitious or trade name used by the applicant in conducting its business, and the legal name, residential and business addresses, date of birth, social security number or tax payer identification number, employment history for the five-year period preceding the submission of the application; and upon request of the director, fingerprints of the applicant's proposed responsible individual ((and documentation that the proposed responsible individual is a citizen of the United States or has obtained legal immigration status to work in the United States)). In addition, the proposed responsible individual must reside in the United States;

(b) For the ten-year period preceding the submission of the application, a list of any criminal convictions of the proposed responsible individual of the applicant, any material litigation in which the applicant has been involved, and any litigation involving the proposed responsible individual relating to the provision of money services;

(c) A description of any money services previously provided by the applicant and the money services that the applicant seeks to provide in this state;

(d) A list of the applicant's proposed authorized delegates and the locations in this state where the applicant and its authorized delegates propose to engage in currency exchange;

(e) A list of other states in which the applicant engages in currency exchange or provides other money services and any license revocations, suspensions, restrictions, or other disciplinary action taken against the applicant in another state;

(f) A list of any license revocations, suspensions, restrictions, or other disciplinary action taken against any money services business involving the proposed responsible individual;

(g) Information concerning any bankruptcy or receivership proceedings involving or affecting the applicant or the proposed responsible individual;

(h) A sample form of contract for authorized delegates, if applicable;

(i) A description of the source of money and credit to be used by the applicant to provide currency exchange; and

(j) Any other information regarding the background, experience, character, financial responsibility, and general fitness of the applicant, the applicant's responsible individual, or authorized delegates that the director may require in rule.

(2) If an applicant is a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or other entity, the applicant shall also provide:

(a) The date of the applicant's incorporation or formation and state or country of incorporation or formation;

(b) If applicable, a certificate of good standing from the state or country in which the applicant is incorporated or formed;

(c) A brief description of the structure or organization of the applicant, including any parent or subsidiary of the applicant, and whether any parent or subsidiary is publicly traded;

(d) The legal name, any fictitious or trade name, all business and residential addresses, date of birth, social security number, and employment history in the ten-year period preceding the submission of the application for each executive officer, board director, or person that has control of the applicant;

(e) If the applicant or its corporate parent is not a publicly traded entity, the director may request the fingerprints for each executive officer, board director, or person that has control of the applicant; and

(f) A list of any criminal convictions, material litigation, and any litigation related to the provision of money services, in which any executive officer, board director, or person in control of the applicant has been involved in the ten-year period preceding the submission of the application.

(3) A nonrefundable application fee and an initial license fee, as determined in rule by the director, must accompany an application for a currency exchange license under this chapter. The license fee must be refunded if the application is denied.

(4) The director may waive one or more requirements of subsection (1) or (2) of this section or permit an applicant to submit other information in lieu of the required information.

Sec. 10. RCW 42.45.200 and 2017 c 281 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) An individual qualified under subsection (2) of this section may apply to the director for a commission as a notary public. The applicant shall comply with and provide the information required by rules established by the director and pay any application fee.

(2) An applicant for a commission as a notary public must:

(a) Be at least eighteen years of age;

(b) ((Be a citizen or permanent legal resident of the United States;

(c))) Be a resident of or have a place of employment or practice in this state;

(((d)))(c) Be able to read and write English; and

(((e)))(d) Not be disqualified to receive a commission under RCW 42.45.210.

(3) Before issuance of a commission as a notary public, an applicant for the commission shall execute an oath of office and submit it to the department in the format prescribed by the director in rule.

(4) Before issuance of a commission as a notary public, the applicant for a commission shall submit to the director an assurance in the form of a surety bond in the amount established by the director in rule. The assurance must be issued by a surety or other entity licensed or authorized to write surety bonds in this state. The assurance must be effective for a four-year term or for a term that expires on the date the notary public's commission expires. The assurance must cover acts performed during the term of the notary public's commission and must be in the form prescribed by the director. If a notary public violates law with respect to notaries public in this state, the surety or issuing entity is liable under the assurance. The surety or issuing entity shall give at least thirty days' notice to the department before canceling the assurance. The surety or issuing entity shall notify the department not later than thirty days after making a payment to a claimant under the assurance. A notary public may perform notarial acts in this state only during the period that a valid assurance is on file with the department.

(5) On compliance with this section, the director shall issue a commission as a notary public to an applicant for a term of four years or for a term that expires on the date of expiration of the assurance, whichever comes first.

(6) A commission to act as a notary public authorizes the notary public to perform notarial acts. The commission does not provide the notary public any immunity or benefit conferred by law of this state on public officials or employees.

(7) An individual qualified under (a) of this subsection may apply to the director for a commission as an electronic records notary public. The applicant shall comply with and provide the information required by rules established by the director and pay the relevant application fee.

(a) An applicant for a commission as an electronic records notary public must hold a commission as notary public.

(b) An electronic records notary public commission may take the form of an endorsement to the notary public commission if deemed appropriate by the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. Section 1 of this act constitutes a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. This act takes effect July 1, 2024.

--- END ---