BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 82.08.225 and 2018 c 275 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1))) Beginning July 1, ((2018))2025, 0.2 percent of taxes collected pursuant to RCW 82.08.020(1) on retail sales of lodging, car rentals, and restaurants, up to $3,000,000 per biennium, must be deposited into the statewide tourism marketing account created in RCW 43.384.040. ((Except as provided otherwise for fiscal year 2019 in subsection (2) of this section, future revenue collections under this section may be up to three million dollars per biennium and must be deposited into the statewide tourism marketing account created in RCW 43.384.040. The deposit under this subsection to the statewide tourism marketing account may only occur if the legislature authorizes the deposit in the biennial omnibus appropriations act.

(2) For fiscal year 2019, up to a maximum of one million five hundred thousand dollars must be deposited in the statewide tourism marketing account created in RCW 43.384.040. The deposit under this subsection to the statewide tourism marketing account may only occur if the legislature authorizes the deposit in the biennial omnibus appropriations act.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025.

--- END ---