BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.04.015 and 2022 c 85 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1))) It is the policy of this state and the purpose of this chapter:

(((a)))(1) To promote the dependability of information which is used for guidance in financial transactions or for accounting for or assessing the status or performance of commercial and noncommercial enterprises, whether public, private or governmental; and

(((b)))(2) To protect the public interest by requiring that:

(((i)))(a) Persons who hold themselves out as licensees conduct themselves in a competent, ethical, and professional manner;

(((ii)))(b) A public authority be established that is competent to prescribe and assess the qualifications of certified public accountants;

(((iii)))(c) Persons other than licensees refrain from using the words "audit," "review," and "compilation" when designating a report customarily prepared by someone knowledgeable in accounting;

(((iv)))(d) A public authority be established to provide for consumer alerts and public protection information to be published regarding persons or firms who violate the provisions of chapter 294, Laws of 2001 or board rule and to provide general consumer protection information to the public; and

(((v)))(e) The use of accounting titles likely to confuse the public be prohibited. However as of June 30, 2024, an individual holding a CPA-inactive certificate must be designated as a licensee with an inactive status.

(((2) The purpose of chapter 294, Laws of 2001 is to make revisions to chapter 234, Laws of 1983 and chapter 103, Laws of 1992 to: Fortify the public protection provisions of chapter 294, Laws of 2001; establish one set of qualifications to be a licensee; revise the regulations of certified public accountants; make revisions in the ownership of certified public accounting firms; assure to the greatest extent possible that certified public accountants from Washington state are substantially equivalent with certified public accountants in other states and can therefore perform the duties of certified public accountants in as many states and countries as possible; assure certified public accountants from other states and countries have met qualifications that are substantially equivalent to the certified public accountant qualifications of this state; and clarify the authority of the board of accountancy with respect to the activities of persons holding licenses and certificates under this chapter. It is not the intent of chapter 294, Laws of 2001 to in any way restrict or limit the activities of persons not holding licenses or certificates under this chapter except as otherwise specifically restricted or limited by chapter 234, Laws of 1983 and chapter 103, Laws of 1992.

(3) A purpose of chapter 103, Laws of 1992, revising provisions of chapter 234, Laws of 1983, is to clarify the authority of the board of accountancy with respect to the activities of persons holding certificates under this chapter. Furthermore, it is not the intent of chapter 103, Laws of 1992 to in any way restrict or limit the activities of persons not holding certificates under this chapter except as otherwise specifically restricted or limited by chapter 234, Laws of 1983.))

Sec. 2. RCW 18.04.025 and 2022 c 85 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Attest" means providing the following services:

(a) Any audit or other engagement to be performed in accordance with the statements on auditing standards;

(b) Any review of a financial statement to be provided in accordance with the statements on standards for accounting and review services;

(c) Any engagement to be performed in accordance with the statements on standards for attestation engagements; and

(d) Any engagement to be performed in accordance with the public company accounting oversight board auditing standards.

(2) "Board" means the board of accountancy created by RCW 18.04.035.

(3) "Certificate" means an alternative license type issued by the board indicating that the certificate holder had passed the CPA examination, but has not verified the certificate holder's experience and was not fully licensed as a certified public accountant to practice public accounting. The board must allow renewal of certificates until June 30, 2024, at which time any then current and valid certificates automatically convert to a CPA license in an inactive status. As of July 1, 2024, board-issued certificates are no longer a recognized form of licensure.

(4) "Certified public accountant" or "CPA" means a person holding a certified public accountant license or certificate.

(5) "Compilation" means providing a service to be performed in accordance with statements on standards for accounting and review services that is presenting in the form of financial statements, information that is the representation of management (owners) without undertaking to express any assurance on the statements.

(6) "CPE" means continuing professional education.

(7) "Firm" or "CPA firm" means a sole proprietorship, a corporation, ((or)) a partnership, or any other form of organization issued a license under RCW 18.04.195. "Firm" or "CPA firm" also means a limited liability company formed under chapter 25.15 RCW.

(8) "Holding out" means any representation to the public by the use of restricted titles as set forth in RCW 18.04.345 by a person or firm that the person or firm holds a license under this chapter and that the person or firm offers to perform any professional services to the public as a licensee. "Holding out" shall not affect or limit a person or firm not required to hold a license under this chapter from engaging in practices identified in RCW ((18.04.350))18.04.345.

(9) "Inactive" means the status of a license that is prohibited from practicing public accounting. A person holding an inactive license may apply to the board to return the license to an active status through an approval process established by the board.

(10) "Individual" means a living, human being.

(11) "License" means a license to practice public accountancy issued to an individual under this chapter, or a license issued to a firm under this chapter.

(12) "Licensee" means the holder of a license to practice public accountancy issued under this chapter.

(13) "Manager" means a manager of a limited liability company licensed as a firm under this chapter.

(14) "NASBA" means the national association of state boards of accountancy.

(15) "Peer review" means a study, appraisal, or review of one or more aspects of the attest or compilation work of a licensee or licensed firm in the practice of public accountancy, by a person or persons who hold licenses and who are not affiliated with the person or firm being reviewed, including a peer review, or any internal review or inspection intended to comply with quality control policies and procedures, but not including a quality assurance review.

(16) "Person" means any individual, nongovernmental organization, or business entity regardless of legal form, including a sole proprietorship, firm, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, or not-for-profit organization, and including the sole proprietor, partners, members, and, as applied to corporations, the officers.

(17) "Practice of public accounting" means performing or offering to perform by a person or firm holding itself out to the public as a licensee, for a client or potential client, one or more kinds of services involving the use of accounting or auditing skills, including the issuance of "reports," or one or more kinds of management advisory, or consulting services, or the preparation of tax returns, or the furnishing of advice on tax matters. "Practice of public accounting" shall not include practices that are permitted under the provisions of RCW ((18.04.350(10)))18.04.345(9)(b) by persons or firms not required to be licensed under this chapter.

(18) "Practice privilege" means an authorization permitting the practice of public accounting in Washington under RCW 18.04.350.

(19) "Principal place of business" means the office location designated by the licensee for purposes of substantial equivalency and reciprocity.

(((19)))(20) "Quality assurance review" means a process established by and conducted at the direction of the board of study, appraisal, or review of one or more aspects of the attest or compilation work of a licensee or licensed firm in the practice of public accountancy, by a person or persons who hold licenses and who are not affiliated with the person or firm being reviewed.

(((20)))(21) "Report," when used with reference to any attest or compilation service, means an opinion, report, or other form of language that states or implies assurance as to the reliability of the attested information or compiled financial statements and that also includes or is accompanied by any statement or implication that the person or firm issuing it has special knowledge or competence in the practice of public accounting. Such a statement or implication of special knowledge or competence may arise from use by the issuer of the report of names or titles indicating that the person or firm is involved in the practice of public accounting, or from the language of the report itself. "Report" includes any form of language which disclaims an opinion when such form of language is conventionally understood to imply any positive assurance as to the reliability of the attested information or compiled financial statements referred to and/or special competence on the part of the person or firm issuing such language; and it includes any other form of language that is conventionally understood to imply such assurance and/or such special knowledge or competence. "Report" does not include services referenced in RCW ((18.04.350 (10) or (11)))18.04.345(9) (b) and (c) provided by persons not holding a license under this chapter as provided in RCW ((18.04.350(14)))18.04.345(2)(b).

(((21)))(22) "Review committee" means any person carrying out, administering or overseeing a peer review authorized by the reviewee.

(((22)))(23) "Rule" means any rule adopted by the board under authority of this chapter.

(((23) "Sole proprietorship" means a legal form of organization owned by one person meeting the requirements of RCW 18.04.195.))

(24) "State" includes the states of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, Guam, the United States Virgin Islands, and the Commonwealth of the Northern Mariana Islands at such time as the board determines that the Commonwealth of the Northern Mariana Islands is issuing licenses under the ((substantially equivalent))substantial equivalency standards in RCW 18.04.350(((2)))(1)(a).

(25) "Substantial equivalency" ((or "substantially equivalent")) means a determination by the board or its designee that the education, examination, and experience requirements contained in the statutes and administrative rules of another jurisdiction are comparable to or exceed the education, examination, and experience requirements contained in this chapter or that an individual CPA's education, examination, and experience qualifications are comparable to or exceed the education, examination, and experience requirements contained in this chapter. In ascertaining substantial equivalency ((and substantially equivalent)) as used in this chapter the board shall take into account the qualifications without regard to the sequence in which experience, education, or examination requirements were attained.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.04.105 and 2022 c 85 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A license to practice public accounting shall be granted by the board to any person:

(a) Who is of good character. Good character, for purposes of this section, means lack of a history of dishonest or felonious acts. The board may refuse to grant a license on the ground of failure to satisfy this requirement only if there is a substantial connection between the lack of good character of the applicant and the professional and ethical responsibilities of a licensee and if the finding by the board of lack of good character is supported by a preponderance of evidence. When an applicant is found to be unqualified for a license because of a lack of good character, the board shall furnish the applicant a statement containing the findings of the board and a notice of the applicant's right of appeal;

(b) Who has met the educational standards established by rule as the board determines to be appropriate;

(c) Who has passed an examination;

(d) Who has ((had one year of experience))met the experience requirements established by rule by the board as it deems appropriate, which is gained:

(i) Through the use of accounting, issuing reports, management advisory, financial advisory, tax, tax advisory, or consulting skills;

(ii) While employed in government, industry, academia, or public practice; and

(iii) Meeting the competency requirements in a manner as determined by the board to be appropriate and established by board rule; and

(e) Who has paid appropriate application fees as established by rule by the board.

(2) The examination described in subsection (1)(c) of this section shall test the applicant's knowledge of the subjects of accounting and auditing, and other related fields the board may specify by rule. The time for holding the examination is fixed by the board and may be changed from time to time. The board shall prescribe by rule the methods of applying for and taking the examination, including methods for grading examinations and determining a passing grade required of an applicant for a license. The board shall to the extent possible see to it that the grading of the examination, and the passing grades, are uniform with those applicable to all other states. The board may make use of all or a part of the uniform certified public accountant examination and advisory grading service of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants and may contract with third parties to perform administrative services with respect to the examination as the board deems appropriate to assist it in performing its duties under this chapter. The board shall establish by rule provisions for transitioning to a new examination structure or to a new media for administering the examination.

(3) The board shall charge each applicant an examination fee for the initial examination or for reexamination. The applicable fee shall be paid ((by the person)) at the time ((he or she))an individual applies for examination, reexamination, or evaluation of educational qualifications. Fees for examination, reexamination, or evaluation of educational qualifications shall be determined by the board under this chapter. There is established in the state treasury an account to be known as the certified public accountants' account. All fees received from candidates to take any or all sections of the certified public accountant examination shall be used only for costs related to the examination.

(4) Individuals whose certificates are current and valid on June 30, 2024, will automatically be converted to a licensee in an inactive status. To activate a license and become an active licensee, the individual must apply to the board to activate ((his or her))the license and ((must meet the following requirements)):

(a) For applications to activate, the licensees must submit to the board documentation that they have gained one year of experience through the use of accounting, issuing reports, management advisory, financial advisory, tax, tax advisory, or consulting skills, without regard to the eight-year limitation set forth in (b) of this subsection, while employed in government, industry, academia, or public practice((.));

(b) For applications submitted to the board before January 1, 2024, the individual must provide documentation to the board that they have one year of experience acquired within eight years prior to applying for a license through the use of accounting, issuing reports, management advisory, financial advisory, tax, tax advisory, or consulting skills in government, industry, academia, or public practice((.));

(c) Meet competency requirements in a manner as determined by the board to be appropriate and established by board rule((.));

(d) Submit to the board satisfactory proof of having completed an accumulation of one hundred twenty hours of CPE during the thirty-six months preceding the date of filing the petition((.));

(e) Pay the appropriate fees established by rule by the board.

(5) Individuals who did not hold a valid certificate on the conversion date of June 30, 2024, and who wish to apply for a license must apply as a new licensee and meet the requirements under subsection (1) of this section for initial licensure.

(6) ((Any licensee))Licensees in good standing may request to have ((his or her))their license placed on inactive status. All licensees in inactive status, including those who converted from certificate to a license, are subject to the following conditions:

(a) The licensee is prohibited from practicing public accounting;

(b) The licensee must pay a renewal fee to maintain this status;

(c) The licensee must comply with the applicable CPE requirements;

(d) The licensee is subject to the requirements of this chapter and the rules adopted by the board.

Sec. 4. RCW 18.04.180 and 2022 c 85 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board shall issue a license to a holder of a valid certificate((/valid))or license issued by another state that entitles the holder to practice public accountancy, provided that:

(a) Such state makes similar provision to grant reciprocity to a holder of a valid certificate or license in this state;

(b) The applicant meets the CPE requirements of RCW 18.04.215(4);

(c) The applicant meets the good character requirements of RCW 18.04.105(1)(a); and

(d) The applicant passed the examination required for issuance of ((his or her))a certificate or license with grades that would have been passing grades at that time in this state and meets all current requirements in this state for issuance of a license at the time application is made; or at the time of the issuance of the applicant's license in the other state, met all the requirements then applicable in this state; or has three years of experience within the five years immediately preceding application or had five years of experience within the ten years immediately preceding application in the practice of public accountancy that meets the requirements prescribed by the board.

(2) The board may accept NASBA's designation of the applicant as ((substantially equivalent))having substantial equivalency to national standards as meeting the requirement of subsection (1)(d) of this section.

(3) A licensee who has been granted a license under the reciprocity provisions of this section shall notify the board within thirty days if the license or certificate issued in the other jurisdiction has lapsed or if the status of the license or certificate issued in the other jurisdiction becomes otherwise invalid.

Sec. 5. RCW 18.04.183 and 2001 c 294 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The board shall grant a license as a certified public accountant to a holder of a permit, license, or certificate issued by a foreign country's board, agency, or institute, provided that:

(1) The foreign country where the foreign permit, license, or certificate was issued is a party to an agreement on trade with the United States that encourages the mutual recognition of licensing and certification requirements for the provision of covered services by the parties under the trade agreement;

(2) Such foreign country's board, agency, or institute makes similar provision to allow a person who holds a valid license issued by this state to obtain such foreign country's comparable permit, license, or certificate;

(3) The foreign permit, license, or certificate:

(a) Was duly issued by such foreign country's board, agency, or institute that regulates the practice of public accountancy; and

(b) Is in good standing at the time of the application; and

(c) Was issued upon the basis of educational, examination, experience, and ethical requirements ((substantially equivalent))that have substantial equivalency currently or at the time of issuance of the foreign permit, license, or certificate to those in this state;

(4) The applicant has within the thirty-six months prior to application completed an accumulation of one hundred twenty hours of CPE as required under RCW 18.04.215(((5)))(4). The board shall provide for transition from existing to new CPE requirements;

(5) The applicant's foreign permit, license, or certificate was the type of permit, license, or certificate requiring the most stringent qualifications if, in the foreign country, more than one type of permit, license, or certificate is issued. This state's board shall decide which are the most stringent qualifications;

(6) The applicant has passed a written examination or its equivalent, approved by the board, that tests knowledge in the areas of United States accounting principles, auditing standards, commercial law, income tax law, and Washington state rules of professional ethics; and

(7) The applicant has within the eight years prior to applying for a license under this section, demonstrated, in accordance with the rules issued by the board, ((one year of)) public accounting experience, within the foreign country where the foreign permit, license, or certificate was issued, equivalent to the experience required under RCW 18.04.105(1)(d) or such other experience or employment which the board in its discretion regards as ((substantially equivalent))having substantial equivalency.

The board may adopt by rule new CPE standards that differ from those in subsection (4) of this section or RCW 18.04.215 if the new standards are consistent with the CPE standards of other states so as to provide to the greatest extent possible, consistent national standards.

A licensee who has been granted a license under the reciprocity provisions of this section shall notify the board within thirty days if the permit, license, or certificate issued in the other jurisdiction has lapsed or if the status of the permit, license, or certificate issued in the other jurisdiction becomes otherwise invalid.

Sec. 6. RCW 18.04.195 and 2022 c 85 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The board shall grant or renew licenses to practice as a CPA firm to applicants that demonstrate their qualifications therefore in accordance with this section.

(a) The following must hold a license issued under this section:

(i) Any firm with an office in this state performing or offering to perform attest services as defined in RCW 18.04.025(1) or compilations as defined in RCW 18.04.025(5); or

(ii) Any firm that does not have an office in this state but offers or renders attest services described in RCW 18.04.025 in this state, unless it meets each of the following requirements:

(A) Complies with the qualifications described in subsection (((3)(c), (4)(a), or (5)(c)))(2)(a) of this section;

(B) Meets the board's quality assurance review program requirements authorized by RCW 18.04.055(9) and the rules implementing such section;

(C) Performs such services through an individual with practice privileges under RCW 18.04.350(((2))); and

(D) Can lawfully do so in the state where said individuals with practice privileges have their principal place of business.

(b) A firm that is not subject to the requirements of ((subsection (1)))(a) of this subsection may perform compilation services described in RCW 18.04.025(5) and other nonattest professional services while using the title "CPA" or "CPA firm" in this state without a license issued under this section only if:

(i) The firm performs such services through an individual with practice privileges under RCW 18.04.350(((2))); and

(ii) The firm can lawfully do so in the state where said individuals with practice privileges have their principal place of business.

(2) ((A sole proprietorship that performs or offers to perform attest or compilation services as defined in RCW 18.04.025 is required to obtain a license under subsection (1) of this section and shall license, as a firm, every three years with the board.

(a) The sole proprietor shall hold and renew a license to practice under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215, or, in the case of a sole proprietorship that must obtain a license pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(iii) of this section, be a licensee of another state who meets the requirements in RCW 18.04.350(2);

(b) Each resident individual in charge of an office located in this state shall hold and renew a license to practice under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215; and

(c) The licensed firm must meet requirements established by rule by the board.

(3))) A ((partnership))CPA firm that performs or offers to perform attest or compilation services as defined in RCW 18.04.025 is required to obtain a license under subsection (1) of this section, shall license as a firm every three years with the board, and shall meet the following requirements:

(a) ((At least one general partner of the partnership shall hold and renew a license to practice under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215, or, in the case of a partnership that must obtain a license pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(iii) of this section, be a licensee of another state who meets the requirements in RCW 18.04.350(2);

(b) Each resident individual in charge of an office in this state shall hold and renew a license to practice under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215;

(c) At least a simple majority of the ownership of the licensed firm in terms of financial interests and voting rights of all partners or owners shall be held by persons who are licensees or holders of a valid license issued under this chapter or by another state. The principal partner of the partnership and any partner having authority over issuing reports shall hold a license under this chapter or issued by another state; and

(d) The licensed firm must meet requirements established by rule by the board.

(4) A corporation that performs or offers to perform attest or compilation services as defined in RCW 18.04.025 is required to obtain a license under subsection (1) of this section, shall license as a firm every three years with the board, and shall meet the following requirements:

(a) At least a simple majority of the ownership of the licensed firm in terms of financial interests and voting rights of all shareholders or owners shall be held by persons who are licensees or holders of a valid license issued under this chapter or by another state and is principally employed by the corporation or actively engaged in its business. The principal officer of the corporation and any officer or director having authority over issuing reports shall hold a license under this chapter or issued by another state;

(b) At least one shareholder of the corporation shall hold a license under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215, or, in the case of a corporation that must obtain a license pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(iii) of this section, be a licensee of another state who meets the requirements in RCW 18.04.350(2);

(c) Each resident individual in charge of an office located in this state shall hold and renew a license under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215;

(d) A written agreement shall bind the corporation or its shareholders to purchase any shares offered for sale by, or not under the ownership or effective control of, a qualified shareholder, and bind any holder not a qualified shareholder to sell the shares to the corporation or its qualified shareholders. The agreement shall be noted on each certificate of corporate stock. The corporation may purchase any amount of its stock for this purpose, notwithstanding any impairment of capital, as long as one share remains outstanding;

(e) The corporation shall comply with any other rules pertaining to corporations practicing public accounting in this state as the board may prescribe; and

(f) The licensed firm must meet requirements established by rule by the board.

(5) A limited liability company that performs or offers to perform attest or compilation services as defined in RCW 18.04.025 is required to obtain a license under subsection (1) of this section, shall license as a firm every three years with the board, and shall meet the following requirements:

(a) At least one member of the limited liability company shall hold a license under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215, or, in the case of a limited liability company that must obtain a license pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(iii) of this section, be a licensee of another state who meets the requirements in RCW 18.04.350(2);

(b) Each resident manager or member in charge of an office located in this state shall hold and renew a license under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215;

(c) At least a simple majority of the ownership of the licensed firm in terms of financial interests and voting rights of all owners shall be held by persons who are licensees or holders of a valid license issued under this chapter or by another state. The principal member or manager of the limited liability company and any member having authority over issuing reports shall hold a license under this chapter or issued by another state; and

(d) The licensed firm must meet requirements established by rule by the board.

(6)))A simple majority of the ownership of the firm, in terms of financial interests and voting rights of all partners, officers, shareholders, members, or managers, shall hold and renew a license to practice under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215, or be a licensee of another state who meets the requirements in RCW 18.04.350;

(b) All owners of a CPA firm, including nonlicensee owners, must comply with rules promulgated by the board;

(c) The principal member, manager, officer, or partner of a CPA firm having authority over issuing reports shall hold a license under this chapter or be a licensee of another state who meets the requirements in RCW 18.04.350; and

(d) Compliance with the requirements of RCW 18.04.205.

(3) Application for a license as a firm with an office in this state shall be made upon the affidavit of ((the proprietor or individual designated as managing partner, member, or shareholder for Washington. This individual shall hold))an individual holding a license under RCW 18.04.215.

(((7)))(4) In the case of a firm licensed in another state and required to obtain a license under subsection (1)(a)(((iii)))(ii) of this section, the application for the firm license shall be made upon the affidavit of an individual who qualifies for practice privileges in this state under RCW 18.04.350(((2))) who has been authorized by the applicant firm to make the application. The board shall determine in each case whether the applicant is eligible for a license.

(((8)))(5) The board shall be given notification within ninety days after the admission or withdrawal of a partner, shareholder, or member engaged in this state in the practice of public accounting from any partnership, corporation, or limited liability company so licensed.

(((9)))(6) Licensed firms that fall out of compliance with the provisions of this section due to changes in firm ownership, after receiving or renewing a license, shall notify the board in writing within ninety days of its falling out of compliance and propose a time period in which they will come back into compliance. The board may grant a reasonable period of time for a firm to be in compliance with the provisions of this section. Failure to bring the firm into compliance within a reasonable period of time, as determined by the board, may result in suspension, revocation, or imposition of conditions on the firm's license.

(((10)))(7) Fees for the license as a firm and for notification of the board of the admission or withdrawal of a partner, shareholder, or member shall be determined by the board. Fees shall be paid by the firm at the time the license application form or notice of admission or withdrawal of a partner, shareholder, or member is filed with the board.

(((11) Nonlicensee owners of licensed firms are))(8) Any CPA firm licensed under this chapter may include nonlicensee owners provided that the nonlicensee owner is:

(a) Required to fully comply with the provisions of this chapter and board rules;

(b) Required to be an individual;

(c) Required to be of good character, as defined in RCW 18.04.105(1)(a), and an active individual participant in the licensed firm or affiliated entities as these terms are defined by board rule; and

(d) Subject to discipline by the board for violation of this chapter.

(((12)))(9) Resident nonlicensee owners of licensed firms are required to meet:

(a) The ethics examination, registration, and fee requirements as established by the board rules; and

(b) The ethics CPE requirements established by the board rules.

(((13)))(10)(a) Licensed firms must notify the board within thirty days after:

(i) Sanction, suspension, revocation, or modification of their professional license or practice rights by the securities exchange commission, internal revenue service, or another state board of accountancy;

(ii) Sanction or order against the licensee or nonlicensee firm owner by any federal or other state agency related to the licensee's practice of public accounting or violation of ethical or technical standards established by board rule; or

(iii) The licensed firm is notified that it has been charged with a violation of law that could result in the suspension or revocation of the firm's license by a federal or other state agency, as identified by board rule, related to the firm's professional license, practice rights, or violation of ethical or technical standards established by board rule.

(b) The board must adopt rules to implement this subsection and may also adopt rules specifying requirements for licensees to report to the board sanctions or orders relating to the licensee's practice of public accounting or violation of ethical or technical standards entered against the licensee by a nongovernmental professionally related standard-setting entity.

Sec. 7. RCW 18.04.205 and 2019 c 71 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each office established or maintained in this state for the purpose of offering to issue or issuing reports in this state shall register with the board under this chapter every three years.

(2) ((Each office))The practice of public accounting in each office of a CPA firm established or maintained in this state shall ((be))take place under the direct supervision of a resident licensee holding a license under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215, except that the supervisory requirements of this subsection shall not preclude a nonlicensee from being in charge of a CPA firm.

(3) The board shall by rule prescribe the procedure to be followed to register and maintain offices established in this state for the purpose of offering to issue or issuing attest or compilation reports.

(4) Fees for the registration of offices shall be determined by the board. Fees shall be paid by the applicant at the time the registration form is filed with the board.

Sec. 8. RCW 18.04.215 and 2022 c 85 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Three-year licenses shall be issued by the board:

(a) To persons meeting the requirements of RCW 18.04.105(1), 18.04.180, or 18.04.183.

(b) To firms under RCW 18.04.195, meeting the requirements of RCW 18.04.205.

(2) The board shall, by rule, provide for a system of license renewal and reinstatement. Applicants for renewal or reinstatement shall, at the time of filing their applications, list with the board all states and foreign jurisdictions in which they hold or have applied for certificates, permits or licenses to practice.

(3) A license is issued every three years with renewal subject to requirements of CPE and payment of fees, prescribed by the board. Failure to renew the license shall cause the license to lapse and become subject to reinstatement. Persons holding a lapsed license are prohibited from using the title "CPA," "certified public accountant," "CPA-inactive," or "CPA-retired." Persons holding a lapsed license are prohibited from practicing public accountancy. The board shall adopt rules providing for fees and procedures for issuance, renewal, and reinstatement of licenses.

(4) The board shall adopt rules providing for CPE for active or inactive licensees and certificate holders. The rules shall:

(a) Provide that an active licensee shall verify to the board that ((he or she))the licensee has completed at least an accumulation of one hundred twenty hours of CPE during the last three-year period to maintain the active license;

(b) Provide that an individual with an inactive license must verify to the board that ((he or she))the inactive licensee has completed a board-approved ethics course for CPE during the last three-year period to maintain the inactive license;

(c) Establish CPE requirements; and

(d) Establish when new licensees shall verify that they have completed the required CPE.

(5) A certified public accountant who holds a license issued by another state, and applies for a license in this state, may practice in this state from the date of filing a completed application with the board, until the board has acted upon the application provided the application is made prior to holding out as a certified public accountant in this state and no sanctions or investigations, deemed by the board to be pertinent to public accountancy, by other jurisdictions or agencies are in process.

(6)(a) A licensee shall submit to the board satisfactory proof of having completed an accumulation of one hundred twenty hours of CPE recognized and approved by the board during the preceding three years. Failure to furnish this evidence as required shall make the license lapse and subject to reinstatement procedures, unless the board determines the failure to have been due to retirement or reasonable cause.

(b) The board in its discretion may renew a license despite failure to furnish evidence of compliance with requirements of CPE upon condition that the applicant follow a particular program of CPE. In issuing rules and individual orders with respect to CPE requirements, the board, among other considerations, may rely upon guidelines and pronouncements of recognized educational and professional associations, may prescribe course content, duration, and organization, and may take into account the accessibility of CPE to licensees and instances of individual hardship.

(7) Fees for renewal or reinstatement of licenses in this state shall be determined by the board under this chapter. Fees shall be paid by the applicant at the time the application form is filed with the board. The board, by rule, may provide for proration of fees for licenses issued between normal renewal dates.

(8)(a) Licensees and nonlicensee owners must notify the board within thirty days after:

(i) Sanction, suspension, revocation, or modification of their professional license or practice rights by the securities exchange commission, internal revenue service, or another state board of accountancy;

(ii) Sanction or order against the licensee or nonlicensee owner by any federal or other state agency related to the licensee's practice of public accounting or the licensee's or nonlicensee owner's violation of ethical or technical standards established by board rule; or

(iii) The licensee or nonlicensee owner is notified that ((he or she has))they have been charged with a violation of law that could result in the suspension or revocation of a license by a federal or other state agency, as identified by board rule, related to the licensee's or nonlicensee owner's professional license, practice rights, or violation of ethical or technical standards established by board rule.

(b) The board must adopt rules to implement this subsection and may also adopt rules specifying requirements for licensees and nonlicensee owners to report to the board sanctions or orders relating to the licensee's practice of public accounting or the licensee's or nonlicensee owner's violation of ethical or technical standards entered against the licensee or nonlicensee owner by a nongovernmental professionally related standard-setting entity.

Sec. 9. RCW 18.04.295 and 2022 c 85 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The board shall have the power to: Revoke, suspend, or refuse to issue, renew, or reinstate a license; impose a fine in an amount not to exceed thirty thousand dollars plus the board's investigative and legal costs in bringing charges against a certified public accountant, a licensee, a licensed firm, an applicant, a non-CPA violating the provisions of RCW 18.04.345, or a nonlicensee holding an ownership interest in a licensed firm; may impose full restitution to injured parties; may impose conditions precedent to renewal of a license; or may prohibit a nonlicensee from holding an ownership interest in a licensed firm, for any of the following causes:

(1) ((Fraud))Dishonesty, fraud, or deceit in obtaining a license, or in any filings with the board;

(2) Dishonesty, fraud, or negligence while representing oneself as a nonlicensee owner holding an ownership interest in a licensed firm or a licensee;

(3) A violation of any provision of this chapter;

(4) A violation of a rule of professional conduct promulgated by the board under the authority granted by this chapter;

(5) Conviction of a crime or an act constituting a crime under:

(a) The laws of this state;

(b) The laws of another state, and which, if committed within this state, would have constituted a crime under the laws of this state; or

(c) Federal law;

(6) Cancellation, revocation, suspension, or refusal to renew the authority to practice as a certified public accountant by any other state for any cause other than failure to pay a fee or to meet the requirements of CPE in the other state;

(7) Suspension or revocation of the right to practice matters relating to public accounting before any state or federal agency;

For purposes of subsections (6) and (7) of this section, a certified copy of such revocation, suspension, or refusal to renew shall be prima facie evidence;

(8) Failure to maintain compliance with the requirements for issuance, renewal, or reinstatement of a license, or to report changes to the board;

(9) Failure to cooperate with the board by:

(a) Failure to furnish any papers or documents requested or ordered by the board;

(b) Failure to furnish in writing a full and complete explanation covering the matter contained in the complaint filed with the board or the inquiry of the board;

(c) Failure to respond to subpoenas issued by the board, whether or not the recipient of the subpoena is the accused in the proceeding;

(10) Failure by a nonlicensee owner of a licensed firm to comply with the requirements of this chapter or board rule; ((and))

(11) Failure to comply with an order of the board;

(12) Performance of any fraudulent act while holding a license or privilege issued under this chapter; and

(13) Making any false or misleading statement or certification, in support of an application for a license filed by another.

Sec. 10. RCW 18.04.345 and 2022 c 85 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) No individual may assume or use the designation "certified public accountant-inactive" or "CPA-inactive" or any other title, designation, words, letters, abbreviation, sign, card, or device tending to indicate that the individual is a certified public accountant-inactive or CPA-inactive unless the individual holds a license in an inactive status. Individuals holding only an inactive license may not practice public accounting.

(b) Nothing contained in this chapter prohibits any person who holds only a valid license in an inactive status from assuming or using the designation "certified public accountant-inactive" or "CPA-inactive" or any other title, designation, words, letters, sign, card, or device tending to indicate the person is in an inactive status, provided, that such person does not perform or offer to perform for the public one or more kinds of services involving the use of accounting or auditing skills, including issuance of reports or of one or more kinds of management advisory, financial advisory, consulting services, the preparation of tax returns, or the furnishing of advice on tax matters.

(2)(a) No individuals may hold ((himself or herself))themselves out to the public or assume or use the designation "certified public accountant" or "CPA" or any other title, designation, words, letters, abbreviation, sign, card, or device tending to indicate that the individual is a certified public accountant or CPA unless the individual qualifies for the privileges authorized by RCW 18.04.350(((2))) or holds a license under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215.

(b) Nothing in this chapter prohibits the use of the title "accountant" by any person regardless of whether the person holds a license under this chapter. Nothing in this chapter prohibits the use of the title "enrolled agent" or the designation "EA" by any person regardless of whether the person holds a license under this chapter if the person is properly authorized at the time of use to use the title or designation by the United States department of the treasury. The board shall by rule allow the use of other titles by any person regardless of whether the person holds a license under this chapter if the person using the titles or designations is authorized at the time of use by a nationally recognized entity sanctioning the use of board-authorized titles.

(c) Nothing in this chapter prohibits any individual not holding a license and not qualified for the practice privileges authorized by RCW 18.04.350 from serving as an employee of a firm licensed under RCW 18.04.195 and 18.04.215. However, the employee shall not issue any report, as defined in this chapter, on the information of any other persons, firms, or governmental units over the employee's name.

(3)(a) No firm with an office in this state may perform or offer to perform attest services as defined in RCW 18.04.025(1) or compilation services as defined in RCW 18.04.025(5) unless the firm is licensed under RCW 18.04.195 and all offices of the firm in this state are maintained and registered under RCW 18.04.205. This subsection does not limit the services permitted under ((RCW 18.04.350(10)))subsection(9)(b) of this section by persons not required to be licensed under this chapter.

(b) Nothing in this subsection prohibits any act of or the use of any words by a public official or a public employee in the execution of their duties when performing services as described in RCW 18.04.025 (1) and (5).

(4)(a) No firm may perform the services defined in RCW 18.04.025(1) in this state unless the firm is licensed under RCW 18.04.195, renews the firm license as required under RCW 18.04.215, and all offices of the firm in this state are maintained and registered under RCW 18.04.205.

(b) Nothing in this subsection prohibits any act of or the use of any words by a public official or a public employee in the execution of their duties when performing services as described in RCW 18.04.025(1).

(5) No individuals, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation offering public accounting services to the public may hold ((himself, herself,))themselves or itself out to the public, or assume or use along, or in connection with ((his, hers,))their or its name, or any other name the title or designation "certified accountant," "chartered accountant," "licensed accountant," "licensed public accountant," "public accountant," or any other title or designation likely to be confused with "certified public accountant" or any of the abbreviations "CA," "LA," "LPA," or "PA," or similar abbreviations likely to be confused with "CPA."

(6) No licensed firm may operate under an alias, a firm name, title, or "DBA" that differs from the firm name that is registered with the board.

(7)(a) No individual with an office in this state may sign, affix, or associate ((his or her))the individual's name or any trade or assumed name used by the individual in ((his or her))the person's business to any report prescribed by professional standards unless the individual holds a license to practice under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215, a firm holds a license under RCW 18.04.195, and all of the individual's offices in this state are registered under RCW 18.04.205.

(b) Nothing in this chapter prohibits any officer, employee, partner, or principal of any organization:

(i) From affixing the person's signature to any statement or report in reference to the affairs of the organization with any wording designating the position, title, or office which the individual holds in the organization; or

(ii) From using the position, title, or office held by the individual in such organization to describe the individual.

(8) No individual licensed in another state may sign, affix, or associate a firm name to any report prescribed by professional standards, or associate a firm name in conjunction with the title certified public accountant, unless the individual:

(a) Qualifies for the practice privileges authorized by RCW 18.04.350(((2))); or

(b) Is licensed under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215, and all of the individual's offices in this state are maintained and registered under RCW 18.04.205.

(9)(a) No individuals, partnership, limited liability company, ((or)) corporation, or firm not holding a license to practice under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215, or firm not licensed under RCW 18.04.195 or firm not registering all of the firm's offices in this state under RCW 18.04.205, or not qualified for the practice privileges authorized by RCW 18.04.350(((2))), may hold ((himself, herself,))themselves or itself out to the public as an "auditor" with or without any other description or designation by use of such word on any sign, card, letterhead, or in any advertisement or directory.

(((10)))(b) Nothing in this chapter prohibits any person or firm composed of persons not holding a license under this chapter from offering or rendering to the public bookkeeping, accounting, tax services, the devising and installing of financial information systems, management advisory, or consulting services, the preparation of tax returns, or the furnishing of advice on tax matters, or similar services, provided that persons or firms not holding a license who offer or render these services do not designate any written statement as a report as defined in RCW 18.04.025 or use any language in any statement relating to the financial affairs of a person or entity which is conventionally used by licensees in reports or any attest service as defined in this chapter.

(c) Nothing in this chapter prohibits any person or firm composed of persons not holding a license under this chapter from offering or rendering to the public the preparation of financial statements, or written statements describing how such financial statements were prepared, provided that persons or firms not holding a license who offer or render these services do not designate any written statement as a report as defined in RCW 18.04.025, do not issue any written statement that purports to express or disclaim an opinion on financial statements that have been audited, and do not issue any written statement that expresses assurance on financial statements that have been reviewed. The board may prescribe, by rule, language for the written statement describing how such financial statements were prepared for use by persons not holding a license under this chapter.

(d) Nothing in this subsection (9) prohibits any act of or the use of any words by a public official or a public employee in the performance of the person's duties as such.

(10)(a) Nothing in this chapter prohibits a licensee, a licensed firm, any of their employees, or persons qualifying for practice privileges under RCW 18.04.350 from disclosing any data in confidence to other certified public accountants, quality assurance or peer review teams, partnerships, limited liability companies, or corporations of certified public accountants or to the board or any of its employees while engaged in conducting quality assurance or peer reviews, or any one of their employees in connection with quality or peer reviews of that accountant's accounting and auditing practice conducted under the auspices of recognized professional associations.

(b) Nothing in this chapter prohibits a licensee, a licensed firm, any of their employees, or persons qualifying for practice privileges under RCW 18.04.350 from disclosing any data in confidence to any employee, representative, officer, or committee member of a recognized professional association, or to the board, or any of its employees or committees in connection with a professional investigation held under the auspices of recognized professional associations or the board.

(11) A licensee of this state offering or rendering services or using their CPA title in another state shall be subject to disciplinary action in this state for an act committed in another state for which the licensee would be subject to discipline for an act committed in the other state. Notwithstanding RCW 18.04.295 and this section, the board shall cooperate with and investigate any complaint made by the board of accountancy of another state or jurisdiction.

(12) For purposes of this section, because individuals practicing using practice privileges under RCW 18.04.350(((2))) are deemed ((substantially equivalent))to have substantial equivalency to licensees under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215, every word, term, or reference that includes the latter shall be deemed to include the former, provided the conditions of such practice privilege, as set forth in RCW 18.04.350 (((4)))(3) and (((5)))(4) are maintained.

(((11)))(13) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, it is not a violation of this section for a firm that does not hold a valid license under RCW 18.04.195 and that does not have an office in this state to use the title "CPA" or "certified public accountant" as part of the firm's name and to provide its professional services in this state, and licensees and individuals with practice privileges may provide services on behalf of such firms so long as it complies with the requirements of RCW 18.04.195(1). An individual or firm authorized under this subsection to use practice privileges in this state must comply with the requirements otherwise applicable to licensees in this section.

Sec. 11. RCW 18.04.350 and 2022 c 85 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Nothing in this chapter prohibits any individual not holding a license and not qualified for the practice privileges authorized by subsection (2) of this section from serving as an employee of a firm licensed under RCW 18.04.195 and 18.04.215. However, the employee shall not issue any report as defined in this chapter, on the information of any other persons, firms, or governmental units over his or her name.

(2))) An individual whose principal place of business is not in this state shall be presumed to have qualifications ((substantially equivalent))having substantial equivalency to this state's requirements and shall have all the privileges of licensees of this state without the need to obtain a license under RCW 18.04.105 if the individual:

(a) Holds a valid license or certificate as a certified public accountant from any state or jurisdiction of the United States that requires, as a condition of licensure, that an individual((:

(i) Have at least one hundred fifty semester hours of college or university education including a baccalaureate or higher degree conferred by a college or university;

(ii) Achieve a passing grade on the uniform certified public accountant examination; and

(iii) Possess at least one year of experience including service or advice involving the use of accounting, attest, compilation, management advisory, financial advisory, tax, or consulting skills, all of which was verified by a licensee))meets requirements which have substantial equivalency to those requirements set forth by the board for licensees of this state; or

(b) Holds a valid license or certificate as a certified public accountant from any state ((that does not meet the requirements of (a) of this subsection, but such individual's qualifications are substantially equivalent to those requirements))or jurisdiction of the United States whose licensing requirements do not meet the requirements of (a) of this subsection, but the individual's qualifications have substantial equivalency to the requirements of this state. Any individual who passed the uniform certified public accountant examination and holds a valid license issued by any other state prior to January 1, 2012, may be exempt from the education requirements in (a)(((i))) of this subsection for purposes of this section.

(((3)))(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an individual who qualifies for the practice privilege under ((subsection (2) of)) this section may offer or render professional services, whether in person or by mail, telephone, or electronic means, and no notice, fee, or other submission shall be provided by any such individual. Such an individual shall be subject to the requirements of subsection (((4)))(3) of this section.

(((4)))(3) Any individual licensee of another state exercising the privilege afforded under ((subsection (2) of)) this section and the firm that employs that licensee simultaneously consent, as a condition of exercising this privilege:

(a) To the personal and subject matter jurisdiction and disciplinary authority of the board;

(b) To comply with this chapter and the board's rules;

(c) That in the event the license from the state of the individual's principal place of business is no longer valid, the individual will cease offering or rendering professional services in this state individually and on behalf of a firm; and

(d) To the appointment of the state board which issued the certificate or license as their agent upon whom process may be served in any action or proceeding by this state's board against the certificate holder or licensee.

(((5)))(4) An individual who qualifies for practice privileges under ((subsection (2) of)) this section who performs any attest service described in RCW 18.04.025(1) may only do so through a firm which has obtained a license under RCW 18.04.195 and 18.04.215 or which meets the requirements for an exception from the firm licensure requirements under RCW 18.04.195(1) (a)(ii) or (b).

(((6) A licensee of this state offering or rendering services or using their CPA title in another state shall be subject to disciplinary action in this state for an act committed in another state for which the licensee would be subject to discipline for an act committed in the other state. Notwithstanding RCW 18.04.295 and this section, the board shall cooperate with and investigate any complaint made by the board of accountancy of another state or jurisdiction.

(7) Nothing in this chapter prohibits a licensee, a licensed firm, any of their employees, or persons qualifying for practice privileges by this section from disclosing any data in confidence to other certified public accountants, quality assurance or peer review teams, partnerships, limited liability companies, or corporations of certified public accountants or to the board or any of its employees engaged in conducting quality assurance or peer reviews, or any one of their employees in connection with quality or peer reviews of that accountant's accounting and auditing practice conducted under the auspices of recognized professional associations.

(8) Nothing in this chapter prohibits a licensee, a licensed firm, any of their employees, or persons qualifying for practice privileges by this section from disclosing any data in confidence to any employee, representative, officer, or committee member of a recognized professional association, or to the board, or any of its employees or committees in connection with a professional investigation held under the auspices of recognized professional associations or the board.

(9) Nothing in this chapter prohibits any officer, employee, partner, or principal of any organization:

(a) From affixing his or her signature to any statement or report in reference to the affairs of the organization with any wording designating the position, title, or office which he or she holds in the organization; or

(b) From describing himself or herself by the position, title, or office he or she holds in such organization.

(10) Nothing in this chapter prohibits any person or firm composed of persons not holding a license under this chapter from offering or rendering to the public bookkeeping, accounting, tax services, the devising and installing of financial information systems, management advisory, or consulting services, the preparation of tax returns, or the furnishing of advice on tax matters, or similar services, provided that persons, partnerships, limited liability companies, or corporations not holding a license who offer or render these services do not designate any written statement as a report as defined in RCW 18.04.025(20) or use any language in any statement relating to the financial affairs of a person or entity which is conventionally used by licensees in reports or any attest service as defined in this chapter.

(11) Nothing in this chapter prohibits any person or firm composed of persons not holding a license under this chapter from offering or rendering to the public the preparation of financial statements, or written statements describing how such financial statements were prepared, provided that persons, partnerships, limited liability companies, or corporations not holding a license who offer or render these services do not designate any written statement as a report as defined in RCW 18.04.025(20), do not issue any written statement that purports to express or disclaim an opinion on financial statements that have been audited, and do not issue any written statement that expresses assurance on financial statements that have been reviewed. The board may prescribe, by rule, language for the written statement describing how such financial statements were prepared for use by persons not holding a license under this chapter.

(12) Nothing in this chapter prohibits any act of or the use of any words by a public official or a public employee in the performance of his or her duties.

(13) Nothing contained in this chapter prohibits any person who holds only a valid license in an inactive status from assuming or using the designation "certified public accountant-inactive" or "CPA-inactive" or any other title, designation, words, letters, sign, card, or device tending to indicate the person is in an inactive status, provided, that such person does not perform or offer to perform for the public one or more kinds of services involving the use of accounting or auditing skills, including issuance of reports or of one or more kinds of management advisory, financial advisory, consulting services, the preparation of tax returns, or the furnishing of advice on tax matters.

(14) Nothing in this chapter prohibits the use of the title "accountant" by any person regardless of whether the person holds a license under this chapter. Nothing in this chapter prohibits the use of the title "enrolled agent" or the designation "EA" by any person regardless of whether the person holds a license under this chapter if the person is properly authorized at the time of use to use the title or designation by the United States department of the treasury. The board shall by rule allow the use of other titles by any person regardless of whether the person holds a license under this chapter if the person using the titles or designations is authorized at the time of use by a nationally recognized entity sanctioning the use of board authorized titles.))(5) An individual who qualifies for practice privileges under this section who performs services for which a firm license is required under RCW 18.04.195 and 18.04.215, shall not be required to obtain licensure under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215.

Sec. 12. RCW 18.04.380 and 2001 c 294 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The display or presentation by a person of a card, sign, advertisement, or other printed, engraved, or written instrument or device, bearing a person's name in conjunction with the words "certified public accountant" or any abbreviation thereof shall be prima facie evidence in any action brought under this chapter that the person whose name is so displayed, caused or procured the display or presentation of the card, sign, advertisement, or other printed, engraved, or written instrument or device, and that the person is holding ((himself or herself))themself out to be a licensee, a certified public accountant, or a person holding a certificate under this chapter.

(2) The display or presentation by a person of a card, sign, advertisement, or other printed, engraved, or written instrument or device, bearing a person's name in conjunction with the words certified public accountant-inactive or any abbreviation thereof is prima facie evidence in any action brought under this chapter that the person whose name is so displayed caused or procured the display or presentation of the card, sign, advertisement, or other printed, engraved, or written instrument or device, and that the person is holding ((himself or herself))themself out to be a certified public accountant-inactive under this chapter.

(3) In any action under subsection (1) or (2) of this section, evidence of the commission of a single act prohibited by this chapter is sufficient to justify an injunction or a conviction without evidence of a general course of conduct.

Sec. 13. RCW 18.04.390 and 2003 c 290 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In the absence of an express agreement between the licensee or licensed firm and the client to the contrary, all statements, records, schedules, working papers, and memoranda made by a licensee or licensed firm incident to or in the course of professional service to clients, except reports submitted by a licensee or licensed firm, are the property of the licensee or licensed firm.

(2) No statement, record, schedule, working paper, or memorandum may be sold, transferred, or bequeathed without the consent of the client or ((his or her))the client's personal representative or assignee, to anyone other than one or more surviving partners, members, managers, shareholders, or new partners, members, managers, or ((new)) shareholders of the licensee, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation, or any combined or merged partnership, limited liability company, or corporation, or successor in interest.

(3) A licensee shall furnish to the board or to ((his or her))the licensee's client or former client, upon request and reasonable notice:

(a) A copy of the licensee's working papers or electronic documents, to the extent that such working papers or electronic documents include records that would ordinarily constitute part of the client's records and are not otherwise available to the client; and

(b) Any accounting or other records belonging to, or obtained from or on behalf of, the client that the licensee removed from the client's premises or received for the client's account; the licensee may make and retain copies of such documents of the client when they form the basis for work done by ((him or her))the licensee.

(4)(a) For a period of seven years after the end of the fiscal period in which a licensed firm concludes an audit or review of a client's financial statements, the licensed firm must retain records relevant to the audit or review, as determined by board rule.

(b) The board must adopt rules to implement this subsection, including rules relating to working papers and document retention.

(5) Nothing in this section should be construed as prohibiting any temporary transfer of workpapers or other material necessary in the course of carrying out peer reviews or as otherwise interfering with the disclosure of information pursuant to RCW 18.04.405.

Sec. 14. RCW 18.04.405 and 2022 c 85 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A licensee or licensed firm, or any of their employees shall not disclose any confidential information obtained in the course of a professional transaction except with the consent of the client or former client or as disclosure may be required by law, legal process, the standards of the profession, or as disclosure of confidential information is permitted by RCW ((18.04.350 (7) and (8)))18.04.345(10) (a) and (b), 18.04.295(9), 18.04.390, and this section in connection with quality assurance, or peer reviews, investigations, and any proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2) This section shall not be construed as limiting the authority of this state or of the United States or an agency of this state, the board, or of the United States to subpoena and use such confidential information obtained by a licensee, or any of their employees in the course of a professional transaction in connection with any investigation, public hearing, or other proceeding, nor shall this section be construed as prohibiting a licensee or certified public accountant whose professional competence has been challenged in a court of law or before an administrative agency from disclosing confidential information as a part of a defense to the court action or administrative proceeding.

(3) The proceedings, records, and work papers of a review committee shall be privileged and shall not be subject to discovery, subpoena, or other means of legal process or introduction into evidence in any civil action, arbitration, administrative proceeding, or board proceeding and no member of the review committee or person who was involved in the peer review process shall be permitted or required to testify in any such civil action, arbitration, administrative proceeding, or board proceeding as to any matter produced, presented, disclosed, or discussed during or in connection with the peer review process, or as to any findings, recommendations, evaluations, opinions, or other actions of such committees, or any members thereof. Information, documents, or records that are publicly available are not to be construed as immune from discovery or use in any civil action, arbitration, administrative proceeding, or board proceeding merely because they were presented or considered in connection with the quality assurance or peer review process.

Sec. 15. RCW 18.04.430 and 2022 c 85 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

The board shall immediately suspend the license of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order or a ((residential or)) visitation order. If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license ((or certificate)) shall be automatic upon the board's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16. The following sections are decodified:

(1) RCW 18.04.910 (Effective date—1983 c 234); and

(2) RCW 18.04.911 (Effective date—1986 c 295).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---