BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 15.130 RCW under the subchapter heading "general quality standards and requirements" to read as follows:

Beginning January 1, 2027, a person may not manufacture, sell, deliver, distribute, hold, or offer for sale in commerce a food product for human consumption that contains any of the following substances:

(1) Brominated vegetable oil (chemical abstracts service number 8016-94-2 as of July 1, 2023);

(2) Potassium bromate (chemical abstracts service number 7758-01-2 as of July 1, 2023);

(3) Propylparaben (chemical abstracts service number 94-13-3 as of July 1, 2023); and

(4) Red dye 3 (chemical abstracts service number 16423-68-0 as of July 1, 2023).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect January 1, 2027.

--- END ---