BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.210 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the department of health, shall establish and administer a grant program to provide funds to school districts for the purchase and installation of vape detectors in public schools.

(2)(a) Applications for grant funds must be made on forms developed by the office of the superintendent of public instruction. Grant funds awarded under this section must be to school districts demonstrating a need for the detectors based on data from the healthy youth survey or other statewide or local data sources for student health practices or trends.

(b) Grant applicants must identify resources or programs of the school district that may be combined with grant funds to increase student knowledge about the health hazards associated with using vapor products.

(3) School districts that receive a grant under this section:

(a) Must provide annual information to the office of the superintendent of public instruction assessing the effectiveness of the detectors and other health promotion measures of the school district in reducing the student use of vapor products on school properties. The requirement to provide annual information under this subsection expires if the detector is removed or replaced using funds not provided under this section; and

(b) May reapply for grant funds in subsequent years or award cycles.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "school district" includes school districts, charter schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW, and state-tribal education compact schools subject to chapter 28A.715 RCW.

--- END ---