BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 18.36A RCW to read as follows:

(1) When any naturopath licensed under this chapter has reasonable cause to believe that a patient is a victim of trafficking under RCW 9A.40.100, the naturopath shall report the naturopath's reasonable suspicion, or cause a report to be made, to the proper law enforcement agency if a report is not required under RCW 26.44.030 or 74.34.035. A report under this subsection must be made as soon as reasonably practicable.

(2) A naturopath who, in good faith and without gross negligence, reports suspected trafficking under this section is immune from civil liability, criminal liability, or an action against the naturopath's license under this chapter or chapter 18.130 RCW, the uniform disciplinary act, arising from, or related to, the report.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 18.36A RCW to read as follows:

The office of crime victims advocacy shall supply the board with information on methods of recognizing victims of human trafficking, what services are available for these victims, and where to report potential trafficking situations. The information supplied must be culturally sensitive and must include information relating to minor victims. The board shall disseminate this information to licensees by: Providing the information on the board's website; including the information in newsletters; holding trainings at meetings attended by organization members; or another distribution method determined by the board. The board shall report to the office of crime victims advocacy on the method or methods it uses to distribute information under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 18.57 RCW to read as follows:

(1) When any physician licensed under this chapter has reasonable cause to believe that a patient is a victim of trafficking under RCW 9A.40.100, the physician shall report the physician's reasonable suspicion, or cause a report to be made, to the proper law enforcement agency if a report is not required under RCW 26.44.030 or 74.34.035. A report under this subsection must be made as soon as reasonably practicable.

(2) A physician who, in good faith and without gross negligence, reports suspected trafficking under this section is immune from civil liability, criminal liability, or an action against the physician's license under this chapter or chapter 18.130 RCW, the uniform disciplinary act, arising from, or related to, the report.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 18.57 RCW to read as follows:

The office of crime victims advocacy shall supply the board with information on methods of recognizing victims of human trafficking, what services are available for these victims, and where to report potential trafficking situations. The information supplied must be culturally sensitive and must include information relating to minor victims. The board shall disseminate this information to licensees by: Providing the information on the board's website; including the information in newsletters; holding trainings at meetings attended by organization members; or another distribution method determined by the board. The board shall report to the office of crime victims advocacy on the method or methods it uses to distribute information under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 18.71 RCW to read as follows:

(1) When any physician licensed under this chapter has reasonable cause to believe that a patient is a victim of trafficking under RCW 9A.40.100, the physician shall report the physician's reasonable suspicion, or cause a report to be made, to the proper law enforcement agency if a report is not required under RCW 26.44.030 or 74.34.035. A report under this subsection must be made as soon as reasonably practicable.

(2) A physician who, in good faith and without gross negligence, reports suspected trafficking under this section is immune from civil liability, criminal liability, or an action against the physician's license under this chapter or chapter 18.130 RCW, the uniform disciplinary act, arising from, or related to, the report.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 18.71A RCW to read as follows:

(1) When any physician assistant licensed under this chapter has reasonable cause to believe that a patient is a victim of trafficking under RCW 9A.40.100, the physician assistant shall report the physician assistant's reasonable suspicion, or cause a report to be made, to the proper law enforcement agency if a report is not required under RCW 26.44.030 or 74.34.035. A report under this subsection must be made as soon as reasonably practicable.

(2) A physician assistant who, in good faith and without gross negligence, reports suspected trafficking under this section is immune from civil liability, criminal liability, or an action against the physician assistant's license under this chapter or chapter 18.130 RCW, the uniform disciplinary act, arising from, or related to, the report.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. A new section is added to chapter 18.71A RCW to read as follows:

The office of crime victims advocacy shall supply the commission with information on methods of recognizing victims of human trafficking, what services are available for these victims, and where to report potential trafficking situations. The information supplied must be culturally sensitive and must include information relating to minor victims. The commission shall disseminate this information to licensees by: Providing the information on the commission's website; including the information in newsletters; holding trainings at meetings attended by organization members; or another distribution method determined by the commission. The commission shall report to the office of crime victims advocacy on the method or methods it uses to distribute information under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. A new section is added to chapter 18.79 RCW to read as follows:

(1) When any licensed practical nurse, nursing technician, registered nurse, or advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under this chapter has reasonable cause to believe that a patient is a victim of trafficking under RCW 9A.40.100, the licensed practical nurse, nursing technician, registered nurse, or advanced registered nurse practitioner shall report the licensed practical nurse's, nursing technician's, registered nurse's, or advanced registered nurse practitioner's reasonable suspicion, or cause a report to be made, to the proper law enforcement agency if a report is not required under RCW 26.44.030 or 74.34.035. A report under this subsection must be made as soon as reasonably practicable.

(2) A licensed practical nurse, nursing technician, registered nurse, or advanced registered nurse practitioner who, in good faith and without gross negligence, reports suspected trafficking under this section is immune from civil liability, criminal liability, or an action against the licensed practical nurse's, nursing technician's, registered nurse's, or advanced registered nurse practitioner's license under this chapter or chapter 18.130 RCW, the uniform disciplinary act, arising from, or related to, the report.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. A new section is added to chapter 18.79 RCW to read as follows:

The office of crime victims advocacy shall supply the board with information on methods of recognizing victims of human trafficking, what services are available for these victims, and where to report potential trafficking situations. The information supplied must be culturally sensitive and must include information relating to minor victims. The board shall disseminate this information to licensed practical nurses, nursing technicians, registered nurses, and advanced registered nurse practitioners by: Providing the information on the board's website; including the information in newsletters; holding trainings at meetings attended by organization members; or another distribution method determined by the board. The board shall report to the office of crime victims advocacy on the method or methods it uses to distribute information under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. A new section is added to chapter 18.88A RCW to read as follows:

(1) When any nursing assistant registered under this chapter has reasonable cause to believe that a patient is a victim of trafficking under RCW 9A.40.100, the nursing assistant shall report the nursing assistant's reasonable suspicion, or cause a report to be made, to the proper law enforcement agency if a report is not required under RCW 26.44.030 or 74.34.035. A report under this subsection must be made as soon as reasonably practicable.

(2) A nursing assistant who, in good faith and without gross negligence, reports suspected trafficking under this section is immune from civil liability, criminal liability, or an action against the nursing assistant's registration under this chapter or chapter 18.130 RCW, the uniform disciplinary act, arising from, or related to, the report.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. A new section is added to chapter 18.88A RCW to read as follows:

The office of crime victims advocacy shall supply the secretary with information on methods of recognizing victims of human trafficking, what services are available for these victims, and where to report potential trafficking situations. The information supplied must be culturally sensitive and must include information relating to minor victims. The secretary shall disseminate this information to nursing assistants by: Providing the information on the secretary's website; including the information in newsletters; holding trainings at meetings attended by organization members; or another distribution method determined by the secretary. The secretary shall report to the office of crime victims advocacy on the method or methods it uses to distribute information under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Each hospital licensed under this chapter shall adopt a written policy requiring hospital employees to report to the hospital when they have a reasonable suspicion that a patient is a victim of trafficking under RCW 9A.40.100. As soon as reasonably practicable following receipt of the employee's report, the hospital shall report the employee's reasonable suspicion to the proper law enforcement agency, unless a report is required under RCW 26.44.100, 74.34.035, or section 1, 3, or 4 of this act.

(2) A hospital or its employee who, in good faith and without gross negligence, reports suspected trafficking under this section is immune from civil liability, criminal liability, or an action against the hospital's or employee's license, arising from, or related to, the report.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. (1) No later than January 1, 2025, the office of crime victims advocacy shall update the materials on human trafficking it developed under chapter 492, Laws of 2009. The materials must be updated in a manner consistent with current best practices and the requirements of this act.

(2) This section expires February 1, 2025.

--- END ---