BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.130.450 and 2023 c 192 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding RCW 18.130.180, the following shall not constitute unprofessional conduct under this chapter:

(a) The provision of, authorization of, recommendation of, aiding in, assistance in, referral for, or other participation in any reproductive health care services or gender-affirming treatment consistent with the standard of care in Washington by a license holder;

(b) The provision of, authorization of, recommendation of, aiding in, assistance in, referral for, or other participation in any reproductive health care services or gender-affirming treatment, by a license holder, if the participation would have been lawful and consistent with standards of care if it occurred entirely in Washington;

(c) A conviction or disciplinary action based on the license holder's violation of another state's laws prohibiting the provision of, authorization of, recommendation of, aiding in, assistance in, referral for, or other participation in any reproductive health care services or gender-affirming treatment, if the participation would have been lawful and consistent with standards of care if it occurred entirely in Washington.

(2) Except as required by chapter 18.71B RCW, the following, alone or in combination, shall not serve as the basis for a denial of an application for licensure, licensure renewal, or temporary practice permit, or for any other disciplinary action by a disciplining authority against an applicant or license holder:

(a) The provision of, authorization of, recommendation of, aiding in, assistance in, referral for, or other participation in any reproductive health care services or gender-affirming treatment consistent with the standard of care in Washington by a license holder;

(b) The provision of, authorization of, recommendation of, aiding in, assistance in, referral for, or other participation in any reproductive health care services or gender-affirming treatment, by a license holder, if the participation would have been lawful and consistent with standards of care if it occurred entirely in Washington;

(((b)))(c) A conviction or disciplinary action based on the license holder's violation of another state's laws prohibiting the provision of, authorization of, recommendation of, aiding in, assistance in, referral for, or other participation in any reproductive health care services or gender-affirming treatment, if the participation would have been lawful and consistent with standards of care if it occurred entirely in Washington.

(3) Nothing in this section prohibits the disciplining authority from taking action on separate charges that are unrelated to the provision of, authorization of, recommendation of, aiding in, assistance in, referral for, or other participation in any reproductive health care services or gender-affirming treatment that would have been lawful and consistent with standards of care if it occurred entirely in Washington.

(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to expand the scope of practice of any license holder licensed under this title, nor does this section give any such license holder the authority to act outside their scope of practice as defined under this title.

(5) For the purposes of this section the following definitions apply:

(a) "Gender-affirming treatment" means a service or product that a health care provider, as defined in RCW 70.02.010, provides to an individual to support and affirm the individual's gender identity. "Gender-affirming treatment" includes, but is not limited to, treatment for gender dysphoria. "Gender-affirming treatment" can be provided to two spirit, transgender, nonbinary, and other gender diverse individuals.

(b) "Reproductive health care services" means any medical services or treatments, including pharmaceutical and preventive care services or treatments, directly involved in the reproductive system and its processes, functions, and organs involved in reproduction.

--- END ---