BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 29A.08.410 and 2019 c 391 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

A registered voter who changes ((his or her)) residence from one address to another ((within the same county)) may transfer ((his or her))the voter's registration to the new address in one of the following ways:

(1) Sending the county auditor a request stating both the voter's present address and the address from which the voter was last registered received by an election official ((eight days))by the eighth day prior to a primary or election;

(2) Appearing in person before ((the))a county auditor, or at a voting center or other location designated by the county auditor, and making such a request up until 8:00 p.m. on the day of the primary or election;

(3) Telephoning or emailing the county auditor to ((transfer))update the voter's registration address by ((eight days))the eighth day prior to a primary or election;

(4) Submitting a voter registration application received by an election official by ((eight days))the eighth day prior to a primary or election;

(5) Submitting information to the department of licensing and received by an election official by ((eight days))the eighth day prior to a primary or election;

(6) Submitting voter registration information through the health benefit exchange and received by an election official by ((eight days))the eighth day prior to a primary or election; or

(7) Submitting information to an agency designated under RCW 29A.08.365 and received by an election official by ((eight days))the eighth day prior to a primary or election once automatic voter registration is implemented at the agency.

Sec. 2. RCW 29A.08.620 and 2011 c 10 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each county auditor must request change of address information from the postal service for all mail ballots.

(2) ((The county auditor shall transfer the registration of a voter and send an acknowledgment notice to the new address informing the voter of the transfer if))(a) If change of address information received by the county auditor from the postal service, the department of licensing, or another agency designated to provide voter registration services indicates that the voter has moved within the county, the county auditor shall update the registration address for the voter's registration and send an acknowledgment notice to the new address informing the voter of the update.

(((3)))(b) If the change of address information indicates the voter has moved out of the county but within the state:

(i) The county auditor shall ((place a voter on inactive status and send to all known addresses a confirmation notice and a voter registration application if change of address information received by the county auditor from the postal service, the department of licensing, or another agency designated to provide voter registration services indicates that the voter has moved from one county to another.

(4) The))notify the auditor of the voter's new county of residence of the change; and

(ii) The county auditor of the voter's new county of residence shall update the registration information of the voter to the new address within the county and send an acknowledgment notice to the new address informing the voter of the update.

(c) If the information indicates the voter has moved to a residence outside the state, the county auditor shall place ((a voter))the voter's registration on inactive status and send to all known addresses a confirmation notice ((if any of the following occur)). Such information may include any of the following:

(((a)))(i) Any document mailed by the county auditor to a voter is returned by the postal service as undeliverable without address correction information; or

(((b)))(ii) Change of address information received from the postal service, the department of licensing, or another state agency designated to provide voter registration services indicates that the voter has moved out of the state.

Sec. 3. RCW 29A.08.640 and 2009 c 369 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the response to the confirmation notice from the voter indicates that the voter has ((moved within the county, the auditor shall transfer the voter's registration and send the voter an acknowledgment notice.

(2) If the response from the voter indicates that the voter moved out of the county, but))changed residence address or location within the ((state))county, the auditor shall ((cancel the voter's registration and))update the voter record to reflect the new residence address within the auditor's county. If the response indicates that the voter has moved outside the county, but within the state, the auditor shall notify the county auditor of the voter's new county of residence of the change.

(2) The county auditor of the voter's new county of residence, upon receiving notice under subsection (1) of this section, shall transfer the voter's registration record to the new address and send the voter an acknowledgment notice.

(3) If the response from the voter indicates that the voter has left the state, the auditor shall cancel the voter's registration on the official state voter registration list.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. RCW 29A.08.420 (Transfer to another county) and 2018 c 110 s 205, 2009 c 369 s 23, 2004 c 267 s 122, 2003 c 111 s 229, 1999 c 100 s 3, 1994 c 57 s 36, 1991 c 81 s 24, 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 26, 1971 ex.s. c 202 s 26, & 1965 c 9 s 29.10.040 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This act takes effect June 1, 2025.

--- END ---