BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 68.50.230 and 2009 c 102 s 20 and 2009 c 56 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Whenever any human remains shall have been in the lawful possession of any person, firm, corporation, county, or association for a period of ((ninety))45 days or more, and the relatives of, or persons interested in, the deceased person shall fail, neglect, or refuse to direct the disposition, the human remains may be disposed of by the person, firm, corporation, county, or association having such lawful possession thereof, under and in accordance with rules adopted by the funeral and cemetery board, not inconsistent with any statute of the state of Washington or rule adopted by the state board of health.

(2)(a) The department of veterans affairs may certify that the deceased person to whom subsection (1) of this section applies was a veteran or the dependent of a veteran eligible for interment at a federal or state veterans' cemetery.

(b) Upon certification of eligible veteran or dependent of a veteran status under (a) of this subsection, the person, firm, corporation, county, or association in possession of the veteran's or veteran's dependent's remains shall transfer the custody and control of the remains to the department of veterans affairs.

(c) The transfer of human remains under (b) of this subsection does not create:

(i) A private right of action against the state or its officers and employees or instrumentalities, or against any person, firm, corporation, county, or association transferring the remains; or

(ii) Liability on behalf of the state, the state's officers, employees, or instrumentalities; or on behalf of the person, firm, corporation, county, or association transferring the remains.

--- END ---