BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 19.27A.220 and 2022 c 177 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department must establish a state energy performance standard early adoption incentive program consistent with the requirements of this section. This early adoption incentive program may include incentive payments for early adoption of tier 2 covered building owner requirements as described in subsection (6) of this section.

(2) The department must adopt application and reporting requirements for the incentive program. Building energy reporting for the incentive program must be consistent with the energy reporting requirements established under RCW 19.27A.210.

(3) Upon receiving documentation demonstrating that a building owner qualifies for an incentive under this section, the department must authorize each applicable entity administering incentive payments, as provided in RCW 19.27A.240, to make an incentive payment to the building owner. When a building is served by more than one entity offering incentives or more than one type of fuel, incentive payments must be proportional to the energy use intensity reduction of each specific fuel provided by each entity for tier 1 buildings. The department may authorize any participating utility, regardless of fuel specific savings, serving a tier 2 building to administer the incentive payment.

(4) A covered building owner may receive an incentive payment in the amounts specified in subsection (8)(a) of this section only if the following requirements are met:

(a) The building is either: (i) A covered commercial building subject to the requirements of the standard established under RCW 19.27A.210; or (ii) a multifamily residential building where the floor area exceeds 50,000 gross square feet, excluding the parking garage area;

(b) The building's baseline energy use intensity exceeds its applicable energy use intensity target by at least 15 energy use intensity units;

(c) At least one electric utility, gas company, or thermal energy company providing or delivering energy to the covered commercial building or multifamily residential building is participating in the incentive program by administering incentive payments as provided in RCW 19.27A.240; and

(d) The building owner complies with any other requirements established by the department.

(5) A covered building owner who meets the requirements of subsection (4) of this section may submit an application to the department for an incentive payment in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The application must be submitted in accordance with the following schedule:

(a) For a building with more than 220,000 gross square feet, beginning July 1, 2021, through June 1, 2025;

(b) For a building with more than 90,000 gross square feet but less than 220,001 gross square feet, beginning July 1, 2021, through June 1, 2026; and

(c) For a building with more than 50,000 gross square feet but less than 90,001 gross square feet, beginning July 1, 2021, through June 1, 2027.

(6)(a) A tier 2 covered building owner may receive an incentive payment in the amounts specified in subsection (8)(b) of this section only if all required benchmarking, energy management, and operations and maintenance planning documentation as required under RCW 19.27A.250 has been submitted to the department and an incentive application has been completed.

(b) An eligible tier 2 covered building owner may submit an application beginning July 1, 2025, through June 1, 2030.

(7) The department must review each application and determine whether the applicant is eligible for the incentive program and if funds are available for the incentive payment within the limitation established in RCW 19.27A.230. If the department certifies an application, it must provide verification to the building owner and each entity participating as provided in RCW 19.27A.240 and providing service to the building owner.

(8)(a) An eligible owner of a tier 1 covered building or an eligible owner of a multifamily residential building greater than 50,000 gross square feet, excluding the parking area, that demonstrates early compliance with the applicable energy use intensity target under the standard established under RCW 19.27A.210 may receive a base incentive payment of 85 cents per gross square foot of floor area, excluding parking, unconditioned, or semiconditioned spaces. The department may provide incentives greater than the base incentive payment for upgrading tier 1 buildings.

(b) A tier 2 eligible building owner that demonstrates compliance with the applicable benchmarking, energy management, and operations and maintenance planning requirements may receive a base incentive payment of 30 cents per gross square foot of floor area, excluding parking, unconditioned, or semiconditioned spaces. The department may provide incentives greater than the base incentive payment for upgrading tier 2 buildings. The department may implement a tiered incentive structure for upgrading multifamily buildings to provide an enhanced incentive payment to multifamily building owners willing to commit to antidisplacement provisions.

(9) The incentives provided in subsection (8) of this section are subject to the limitations and requirements of this section, including any rules or procedures implementing this section.

(10) The department must establish requirements for the verification of energy consumption by the building owner and each participating electric utility, gas company, and thermal energy company.

(11) The department must provide an administrative process for an eligible building owner to appeal a determination of an incentive eligibility or amount.

(12) By September 30, 2025, and every two years thereafter, the department must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the results of the incentive program under this section and may provide recommendations to improve the effectiveness of the program. The 2025 report to the legislature must include recommendations for aligning the incentive program established under this section consistent with a goal of reducing greenhouse gas emissions from substitutes, as defined in RCW 70A.60.010.

(13) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.

--- END ---