BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 41.32.4992 and 2023 c 397 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beneficiaries who are receiving a monthly benefit from the teachers' retirement system plan 1 on July 1, 2017, shall receive, effective July 1, 2018, an increase to their monthly benefit of one and one-half percent multiplied by the beneficiaries' monthly benefit, not to exceed $62.50.

(2) Beneficiaries who are receiving a monthly benefit from the teachers' retirement system plan 1 on July 1, 2019, shall receive, effective July 1, 2020, an increase to their monthly benefit of three percent multiplied by the beneficiaries' monthly benefit, not to exceed $62.50.

(3) Beneficiaries who are receiving a monthly benefit from the teachers' retirement system plan 1 on July 1, 2021, shall receive, effective July 1, 2022, an increase to their monthly benefit of three percent multiplied by the beneficiaries' monthly benefit, not to exceed $110.00.

(4) Beneficiaries who are receiving a monthly benefit from the teachers' retirement system plan 1 on July 1, 2022, shall receive, effective July 1, 2023, an increase to their monthly benefit of three percent multiplied by the beneficiaries' monthly benefit, not to exceed $110.00.

(5) Beneficiaries who are receiving a monthly benefit from the teachers' retirement system plan 1 on July 1, 2023, shall receive, effective July 1, 2024, an increase to their monthly benefit of three percent multiplied by the beneficiaries' monthly benefit, not to exceed $110.00.

(6) This section does not apply to those receiving benefits pursuant to RCW 41.32.489 or 41.32.540.

Sec. 2. RCW 41.40.1987 and 2023 c 397 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beneficiaries who are receiving a monthly benefit from the public employees' retirement system plan 1 on July 1, 2017, shall receive, effective July 1, 2018, an increase to their monthly benefit of one and one-half percent multiplied by the beneficiaries' monthly benefit, not to exceed $62.50.

(2) Beneficiaries who are receiving a monthly benefit from the public employees' retirement system plan 1 on July 1, 2019, shall receive, effective July 1, 2020, an increase to their monthly benefit of three percent multiplied by the beneficiaries' monthly benefit, not to exceed $62.50.

(3) Beneficiaries who are receiving a monthly benefit from the public employees' retirement system plan 1 on July 1, 2021, shall receive, effective July 1, 2022, an increase to their monthly benefit of three percent multiplied by the beneficiaries' monthly benefit, not to exceed $110.00.

(4) Beneficiaries who are receiving a monthly benefit from the public employees' retirement system plan 1 on July 1, 2022, shall receive, effective July 1, 2023, an increase to their monthly benefit of three percent multiplied by the beneficiaries' monthly benefit, not to exceed $110.00.

(5) Beneficiaries who are receiving a monthly benefit from the public employees' retirement system plan 1 on July 1, 2023, shall receive, effective July 1, 2024, an increase to their monthly benefit of three percent multiplied by the beneficiaries' monthly benefit, not to exceed $110.00.

(6) This section does not apply to those receiving benefits pursuant to RCW 41.40.1984.

--- END ---