BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the department of transportation must complete a graffiti abatement and reduction pilot program that includes, but is not limited to:

(a) Field testing spray drone technology for the purpose of more efficiently painting over existing graffiti;

(b) Investigate and test improvements to systems capable of identifying persons who damage property with graffiti;

(c) The department is directed to test these systems and additional graffiti prevention techniques prioritizing the Interstate 5 Puget Sound region from Tacoma to Seattle and the north Spokane corridor;

(d) The department is directed to report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the graffiti abatement and reduction pilot program, including on the use of funding, the results of actions used to identify people who damage property with graffiti, as well as on the field testing of spray drone technology for painting over graffiti. The report is due by December 1, 2024.

(2) This section expires July 1, 2025.

--- END ---