BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 2.08.063 and 2013 c 210 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be in the county of Lincoln one judge of the superior court; in the county of Skagit, four judges of the superior court; in the county of Walla Walla, two judges of the superior court; in the county of Whitman, one judge of the superior court; in the county of Yakima, eight judges of the superior court; in the county of Adams, one judge of the superior court; in the county of Whatcom, ((four))five judges of the superior court.

--- END ---