BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 79A.05.015 and 1999 c 249 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

There is hereby created a "state parks and recreation commission" consisting of seven citizens of the state. The members of the commission shall be appointed by the governor by and with the advice and consent of the senate and shall serve for a term of six years, expiring on December 31st of even-numbered years, and until their successors are appointed. In case of a vacancy, the governor shall fill the vacancy for the unexpired term of the commissioner whose office has become vacant.

In making the appointments to the commission, the governor ((shall))should strive to choose citizens who are representative of the diversity of Washington, who understand park and recreation needs and interests, and who are from different regions of the state. The commission should include a variety of gender, ethnic, racial, tribal, and other lived experiences in Washington. No person shall serve if ((he or she))the person holds any elective or full-time appointive state, county, or municipal office. Members of the commission shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and in addition shall be allowed their travel expenses incurred while absent from their usual places of residence in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Payment of expenses pertaining to the operation of the commission shall be made upon vouchers certified to by such persons as shall be designated by the commission.

--- END ---