BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Beginning in the 2024-25 academic year, institutions of higher education that offer an early course registration period for any segment of the student population must have a process in place to offer students who are eligible veterans, national guard members, active duty military members, and their spouses, domestic partners, and dependents early course registration as follows:

(a) New students who are eligible under this subsection and who have completed all of their admission processes must be offered an early course registration period; and

(b) Continuing and returning former students who are eligible under this subsection and who have met current enrollment requirements must be offered early course registration among continuing students with the same level of class standing or credit as determined by the attending institution and according to institutional policies.

(2) For purposes of this section, "eligible veterans or national guard members" has the same meaning as in RCW 28B.15.621.

--- END ---