BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)(a) A legislative task force on housing cost driver analysis is established, with members as provided in this subsection.

(i) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate.

(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives.

(iii) The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives jointly shall appoint the following members:

(A) Two economists with expertise in the economic disciplines most relevant to the issue of housing cost drivers;

(B) One member representing nonprofit housing developers;

(C) One member representing for-profit housing developers;

(D) One member representing builders;

(E) One member representing labor;

(F) One member representing realtors;

(G) One member representing cities;

(H) One member representing counties;

(I) One member representing tenants;

(J) One member representing landlords;

(K) One member representing home mortgage lenders;

(L) One member representing multifamily lenders;

(M) One member representing utility providers;

(N) One member representing public housing authorities;

(O) One member representing the Washington state housing finance commission;

(P) One member from a statewide association representing business; and

(Q) One member from an organization representing architects.

(b) The task force shall choose its cochairs from among its legislative membership. The legislative membership shall convene the initial meeting of the task force.

(2) The task force shall research, analyze, and determine the primary cost drivers for housing in Washington state.

(3) Staff support for the task force must be provided by the senate committee services and the house of representatives office of program research.

(4) The task force, in completing the duties prescribed by this section, shall solicit and consider information and perspectives provided by the affordable housing advisory board and persons and entities with relevant interest and expertise.

(5) Legislative members of the task force are reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(6) The expenses of the task force must be paid jointly by the senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees.

(7) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2025.

(8) This section expires June 1, 2026.

--- END ---