BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature intends to align the federal and state definition of "veteran," expanding state veterans' benefits to any veteran who is already eligible for federal department of veterans affairs monetary benefits. The legislature further intends to create eligibility for state benefits for veterans who were separated with less than honorable characterizations of service due solely to sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression or actions or statements related to sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression, regardless of characterization of service.

Sec. 2. RCW 41.04.005 and 2023 c 18 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) As used in this section ((and RCW 41.16.220, 41.20.050, and 41.40.170)), "veteran" includes every person, who at the time he or she seeks the benefits of this section and ((RCW 41.16.220, 41.20.050, or 41.40.170)) has received ((an honorable discharge, is actively serving honorably, or received a discharge for physical reasons with an honorable record))a qualifying discharge as defined in section 4 of this act and who meets at least one of the following criteria:

(a) The person has served between World War I and World War II or during any period of war, as defined in subsection (2) of this section, as either:

(i) A member in any branch of the armed forces of the United States;

(ii) A member of the women's air forces service pilots;

(iii) A U.S. documented merchant mariner with service aboard an oceangoing vessel operated by the war shipping administration, the office of defense transportation, or their agents, from December 7, 1941, through December 31, 1946; or

(iv) A civil service crewmember with service aboard a U.S. army transport service or U.S. naval transportation service vessel in oceangoing service from December 7, 1941, through December 31, 1946; or

(b) The person has received the armed forces expeditionary medal, or marine corps and navy expeditionary medal, for opposed action on foreign soil, for service:

(i) In any branch of the armed forces of the United States; or

(ii) As a member of the women's air forces service pilots.

(2) A "period of war" includes:

(a) World War I;

(b) World War II;

(c) The Korean conflict;

(d) The Vietnam era, which means:

(i) The period beginning on February 28, 1961, and ending on May 7, 1975, in the case of a veteran who served in the Republic of Vietnam during that period;

(ii) The period beginning August 5, 1964, and ending on May 7, 1975;

(e) The Persian Gulf War, which was the period beginning August 2, 1990, and ending on February 28, 1991, or ending on November 30, 1995, if the participant was awarded a campaign badge or medal for such period;

(f) The period beginning on the date of any future declaration of war by the congress and ending on the date prescribed by presidential proclamation or concurrent resolution of the congress; and

(g) Any armed conflicts, if the participant was awarded the respective campaign or expeditionary badge or medal, or if the service was such that a campaign or expeditionary badge or medal would have been awarded, except that the member already received a campaign or expeditionary badge or medal for a prior deployment during that same conflict.

Sec. 3. RCW 41.04.007 and 2017 c 97 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

"Veteran" includes every person who, at the time he or she seeks the benefits of RCW 46.18.212, 46.18.235, 72.36.030, 41.04.010, 73.04.090, or 43.180.250, has received ((an honorable discharge, received a discharge for medical reasons with an honorable record, where applicable, or is in receipt of a United States department of defense discharge document DD form 214, NGB form 22, or their equivalent or successor discharge paperwork, that characterizes his or her service as honorable))a qualifying discharge as defined in section 4 of this act, and who has served in at least one of the following capacities:

(1) As a member in any branch of the armed forces of the United States, including the national guard and armed forces reserves, and has fulfilled his or her initial military service obligation;

(2) As a member of the women's air forces service pilots;

(3) As a member of the armed forces reserves, national guard, or coast guard, and has been called into federal service by a presidential select reserve call up for at least one hundred eighty cumulative days;

(4) As a civil service crewmember with service aboard a U.S. army transport service or U.S. naval transportation service vessel in oceangoing service from December 7, 1941, through December 31, 1946;

(5) As a member of the Philippine armed forces/scouts during the period of armed conflict from December 7, 1941, through August 15, 1945; or

(6) A United States documented merchant mariner with service aboard an oceangoing vessel operated by the department of defense, or its agents, from both June 25, 1950, through July 27, 1953, in Korean territorial waters and from August 5, 1964, through May 7, 1975, in Vietnam territorial waters, and who received a military commendation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 73.04 RCW to read as follows:

For purposes of RCW 9.46.070, 28A.230.120, 28B.15.012, 28B.15.621, 28B.102.020, 41.04.005, 41.04.007, 41.04.010, 41.06.133, 41.08.040, 41.12.040, 43.24.130, 43.70.270, 46.18.270, 46.18.280, 46.20.161, 72.36.030, 73.08.005, and 77.32.480:

(1) A "qualifying discharge" means:

(a) A discharge with an honorable characterization of service;

(b) A discharge with a general under honorable conditions characterization of service;

(c) A discharge with an other than honorable characterization of service if the applicant provides a letter, administrative decision, or other documentation from the United States department of veterans affairs showing eligibility for or receipt of monetary benefits, such as disability compensation or nonservice-connected pension; or

(d) Any characterization of service if the reason for discharge was listed as solely due to: (i) A person's sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression; (ii) statements, consensual sexual conduct, or consensual acts relating to sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression unless the statements, conduct, or acts are or were prohibited by the uniform code of military justice on grounds other than the person's sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression; or (iii) the disclosure of statements, conduct, or acts relating to sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression to military officials.

(2)(a) To prove a "qualifying discharge" under this section, an individual must provide official documentation that shows the following to the agency administering the sought benefit or protection:

(i) The individual's characterization of service; and

(ii) If an individual has a qualifying discharge under subsection (1)(d) of this section, also the individual's reason for discharge or narrative reason for separation.

(b) Proof may include, but is not limited to, a department of defense DD form 214, NGB form 22, or equivalent or successor official paperwork stating the required information from a government agency. Copies of official documents are acceptable as proof.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 43.60A RCW to read as follows:

The department shall develop and implement an outreach program to ensure that veterans as defined in RCW 41.04.005 and 41.04.007 are aware of state veterans' benefits and programs. Outreach information shall explain, in an easy to understand format, changes in the law made by chapter . . ., Laws of 2024 (this act), unchanged eligibility requirements for current benefits, and how to find more information about benefits from the department and other state agencies. The outreach program must begin on the effective date of this section.

Sec. 6. RCW 2.48.070 and 1945 c 181 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person who shall have graduated from any accredited law school and after such graduation shall have served in the armed forces of the United States of America between December 7, 1941, and the termination of the present World War, may be admitted to the practice of law in the state of Washington and to membership in the Washington State Bar Association, upon motion made before the supreme court of the state of Washington, provided the following is made to appear:

(1) That the applicant is a person of good moral character over the age of twenty-one years;

(2) That the applicant, at the time of entering the armed forces of the United States, was a legal resident of the state of Washington;

(3) That the applicant's service in the armed forces of the United States is or was satisfactory ((and honorable)). An applicant's service is satisfactory if he or she meets the definition of "veteran" under RCW 41.04.007.

Sec. 7. RCW 2.48.090 and 2011 c 336 s 64 are each amended to read as follows:

If an applicant under RCW 2.48.070 through 2.48.110 is, at the time he or she applies for admission to practice law in the state of Washington, no longer in the armed forces of the United States, he or she may establish the requirements of the proviso in RCW 2.48.070 as follows:

(1) If he or she shall have been an enlisted person, by producing ((an honorable discharge))documentation he or she is a veteran as defined by RCW 41.04.007, and by the certificates of at least two active members of the Washington state bar association.

(2) If he or she shall have been an officer, by an affidavit showing that he or she ((has been relieved from active duty under circumstances other than dishonorable))is a veteran as defined in RCW 41.04.007, and by the certificates of at least two active members of the Washington state bar association.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. RCW 2.48.100 (Admission of veterans—Effect of disability discharge) and 1945 c 181 s 4 are each repealed.

Sec. 9. RCW 9.46.070 and 2020 c 127 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission shall have the following powers and duties:

(1) To authorize and issue licenses for a period not to exceed one year to bona fide charitable or nonprofit organizations approved by the commission meeting the requirements of this chapter and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto permitting said organizations to conduct bingo games, raffles, amusement games, and social card games, to utilize punchboards and pull-tabs in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto and to revoke or suspend said licenses for violation of any provisions of this chapter or any rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto: PROVIDED, That the commission shall not deny a license to an otherwise qualified applicant in an effort to limit the number of licenses to be issued: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission or director shall not issue, deny, suspend, or revoke any license because of considerations of race, sex, creed, color, or national origin: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission may authorize the director to temporarily issue or suspend licenses subject to final action by the commission;

(2) To authorize and issue licenses for a period not to exceed one year to any person, association, or organization operating a business primarily engaged in the selling of items of food or drink for consumption on the premises, approved by the commission meeting the requirements of this chapter and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto permitting said person, association, or organization to utilize punchboards and pull-tabs and to conduct social card games as a commercial stimulant in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto and to revoke or suspend said licenses for violation of any provisions of this chapter and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto: PROVIDED, That the commission shall not deny a license to an otherwise qualified applicant in an effort to limit the number of licenses to be issued: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission may authorize the director to temporarily issue or suspend licenses subject to final action by the commission;

(3) To authorize and issue licenses for a period not to exceed one year to any person, association, or organization approved by the commission meeting the requirements of this chapter and meeting the requirements of any rules and regulations adopted by the commission pursuant to this chapter as now or hereafter amended, permitting said person, association, or organization to conduct or operate amusement games in such manner and at such locations as the commission may determine. The commission may authorize the director to temporarily issue or suspend licenses subject to final action by the commission;

(4) To authorize, require, and issue, for a period not to exceed one year, such licenses as the commission may by rule provide, to any person, association, or organization to engage in the manufacturing, selling, distributing, or otherwise supplying of devices, equipment, software, hardware, or any gambling-related services for use within this state for those activities authorized by this chapter. The commission may authorize the director to temporarily issue or suspend licenses subject to final action by the commission;

(5) To establish a schedule of annual license fees for carrying on specific gambling activities upon the premises, and for such other activities as may be licensed by the commission, which fees shall provide to the commission not less than an amount of money adequate to cover all costs incurred by the commission relative to licensing under this chapter and the enforcement by the commission of the provisions of this chapter and rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto: PROVIDED, That all licensing fees shall be submitted with an application therefor and such portion of said fee as the commission may determine, based upon its cost of processing and investigation, shall be retained by the commission upon the withdrawal or denial of any such license application as its reasonable expense for processing the application and investigation into the granting thereof: PROVIDED FURTHER, That if in a particular case the basic license fee established by the commission for a particular class of license is less than the commission's actual expenses to investigate that particular application, the commission may at any time charge to that applicant such additional fees as are necessary to pay the commission for those costs. The commission may decline to proceed with its investigation and no license shall be issued until the commission has been fully paid therefor by the applicant: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission may establish fees for the furnishing by it to licensees of identification stamps to be affixed to such devices and equipment as required by the commission and for such other special services or programs required or offered by the commission, the amount of each of these fees to be not less than is adequate to offset the cost to the commission of the stamps and of administering their dispersal to licensees or the cost of administering such other special services, requirements or programs;

(6) To prescribe the manner and method of payment of taxes, fees and penalties to be paid to or collected by the commission;

(7) To require that applications for all licenses contain such information as may be required by the commission: PROVIDED, That all persons (a) having a managerial or ownership interest in any gambling activity, or the building in which any gambling activity occurs, or the equipment to be used for any gambling activity, (b) participating as an employee in the operation of any gambling activity, or (c) participating as an employee in the operation, management, or providing of gambling-related services for sports wagering, shall be listed on the application for the license and the applicant shall certify on the application, under oath, that the persons named on the application are all of the persons known to have an interest in any gambling activity, building, or equipment by the person making such application: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission shall require fingerprinting and national criminal history background checks on any persons seeking licenses, certifications, or permits under this chapter or of any person holding an interest in any gambling activity, building, or equipment to be used therefor, or of any person participating as an employee in the operation of any gambling activity. All national criminal history background checks shall be conducted using fingerprints submitted to the United States department of justice-federal bureau of investigation. The commission must establish rules to delineate which persons named on the application are subject to national criminal history background checks. In identifying these persons, the commission must take into consideration the nature, character, size, and scope of the gambling activities requested by the persons making such applications;

(8) To require that any license holder maintain records as directed by the commission and submit such reports as the commission may deem necessary;

(9) To require that all income from bingo games, raffles, and amusement games be recorded and reported as established by rule or regulation of the commission to the extent deemed necessary by considering the scope and character of the gambling activity in such a manner that will disclose gross income from any gambling activity, amounts received from each player, the nature and value of prizes, and the fact of distributions of such prizes to the winners thereof;

(10) To regulate and establish maximum limitations on income derived from bingo. In establishing limitations pursuant to this subsection the commission shall take into account (a) the nature, character, and scope of the activities of the licensee; (b) the source of all other income of the licensee; and (c) the percentage or extent to which income derived from bingo is used for charitable, as distinguished from nonprofit, purposes. However, the commission's powers and duties granted by this subsection are discretionary and not mandatory;

(11) To regulate and establish the type and scope of and manner of conducting the gambling activities authorized by this chapter, including but not limited to, the extent of wager, money, or other thing of value which may be wagered or contributed or won by a player in any such activities;

(12) To regulate the collection of and the accounting for the fee which may be imposed by an organization, corporation, or person licensed to conduct a social card game on a person desiring to become a player in a social card game in accordance with RCW 9.46.0282;

(13) To cooperate with and secure the cooperation of county, city, and other local or state agencies in investigating any matter within the scope of its duties and responsibilities;

(14) In accordance with RCW 9.46.080, to adopt such rules and regulations as are deemed necessary to carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter. All rules and regulations shall be adopted pursuant to the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW;

(15) To set forth for the perusal of counties, city-counties, cities and towns, model ordinances by which any legislative authority thereof may enter into the taxing of any gambling activity authorized by this chapter;

(16)(a) To establish and regulate a maximum limit on salaries or wages which may be paid to persons employed in connection with activities conducted by bona fide charitable or nonprofit organizations and authorized by this chapter, where payment of such persons is allowed, and to regulate and establish maximum limits for other expenses in connection with such authorized activities, including but not limited to rent or lease payments. However, the commissioner's powers and duties granted by this subsection are discretionary and not mandatory.

(b) In establishing these maximum limits the commission shall take into account the amount of income received, or expected to be received, from the class of activities to which the limits will apply and the amount of money the games could generate for authorized charitable or nonprofit purposes absent such expenses. The commission may also take into account, in its discretion, other factors, including but not limited to, the local prevailing wage scale and whether charitable purposes are benefited by the activities;

(17) To authorize, require, and issue for a period not to exceed one year such licenses or permits, for which the commission may by rule provide, to any person to work for any operator of any gambling activity authorized by this chapter in connection with that activity, or any manufacturer, supplier, or distributor of devices for those activities in connection with such business. The commission may authorize the director to temporarily issue or suspend licenses subject to final action by the commission. The commission shall not require that persons working solely as volunteers in an authorized activity conducted by a bona fide charitable or bona fide nonprofit organization, who receive no compensation of any kind for any purpose from that organization, and who have no managerial or supervisory responsibility in connection with that activity, be licensed to do such work. The commission may require that licensees employing such unlicensed volunteers submit to the commission periodically a list of the names, addresses, and dates of birth of the volunteers. If any volunteer is not approved by the commission, the commission may require that the licensee not allow that person to work in connection with the licensed activity;

(18) To publish and make available at the office of the commission or elsewhere to anyone requesting it a list of the commission licensees, including the name, address, type of license, and license number of each licensee;

(19) To establish guidelines for determining what constitutes active membership in bona fide nonprofit or charitable organizations for the purposes of this chapter;

(20) To renew the license of every person who applies for renewal within six months after being ((honorably)) discharged, removed, or released from active military service in the armed forces of the United States with a qualifying discharge as defined in section 4 of this act, upon payment of the renewal fee applicable to the license period, if there is no cause for denial, suspension, or revocation of the license;

(21) To authorize, require, and issue, for a period not to exceed one year, such licenses as the commission may by rule provide, to any person, association, or organization that engages in any sports wagering-related services for use within this state for sports wagering activities authorized by this chapter. The commission may authorize the director to temporarily issue or suspend licenses subject to final action by the commission;

(22) To issue licenses under subsections (1) through (4) of this section that are valid for a period of up to eighteen months, if it chooses to do so, in order to transition to the use of the business licensing services program through the department of revenue; and

(23) To perform all other matters and things necessary to carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 10. RCW 28A.230.120 and 2022 c 224 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) School districts shall issue diplomas to students signifying graduation from high school upon the students' satisfactory completion of all local and state graduation requirements. Districts shall grant students the option of receiving a final transcript in addition to the regular diploma.

(2) School districts or schools of attendance shall establish policies and procedures to notify senior students of the transcript option and shall direct students to indicate their decisions in a timely manner. School districts shall make appropriate provisions to assure that students who choose to receive a copy of their final transcript shall receive such transcript after graduation.

(3)(a) A school district may issue a high school diploma to a person who:

(i) Is ((an honorably discharged member))a veteran of the armed forces of the United States with a qualifying discharge as defined in section 4 of this act; and

(ii) Left high school before graduation to serve in World War II, the Korean conflict, or the Vietnam era as defined in RCW 41.04.005.

(b) A school district may issue a diploma to or on behalf of a person otherwise eligible under (a) of this subsection notwithstanding the fact that the person holds a high school equivalency certification or is deceased.

(c) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt a form for a diploma application to be used by a veteran or a person acting on behalf of a deceased veteran under this subsection (3). The superintendent of public instruction shall specify what constitutes acceptable evidence of eligibility for a diploma.

(4)(a) A school district, at the request of the parent, guardian, or custodian, may issue a posthumous high school diploma for a deceased student if the student:

(i) Was enrolled in a public school of the district at the time of death;

(ii) Was deemed on-track for graduation before the time of death; and

(iii) Died after matriculating into high school.

(b) A high school diploma issued under this subsection (4) must bear the inscription "honoris causa" and may not be issued before the graduation date of the class in which the student was enrolled.

(c) Nothing in this subsection (4):

(i) Obligates school districts to award a diploma for a deceased student at the same ceremony or event as other graduating students; or

(ii) Limits the retroactive issuance of a high school diploma.

(d) Diplomas issued under this subsection (4) may not be applied toward student graduation counts or for any other purpose of federal and state accountability data collection.

Sec. 11. RCW 28B.15.012 and 2022 c 249 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever used in this chapter:

(1) The term "institution" shall mean a public university, college, or community or technical college within the state of Washington.

(2) The term "resident student" shall mean:

(a) A financially independent student who has had a domicile in the state of Washington for the period of one year immediately prior to the time of commencement of the first day of the semester or quarter for which the student has registered at any institution and has in fact established a bona fide domicile in this state primarily for purposes other than educational;

(b) A dependent student, if one or both of the student's parents or legal guardians have maintained a bona fide domicile in the state of Washington for at least one year immediately prior to commencement of the semester or quarter for which the student has registered at any institution;

(c) A student classified as a resident based upon domicile by an institution on or before May 31, 1982, who was enrolled at a state institution during any term of the 1982-1983 academic year, so long as such student's enrollment (excepting summer sessions) at an institution in this state is continuous;

(d) Any student who has spent at least seventy-five percent of both his or her junior and senior years in high schools in this state, whose parents or legal guardians have been domiciled in the state for a period of at least one year within the five-year period before the student graduates from high school, and who enrolls in a public institution of higher education within six months of leaving high school, for as long as the student remains continuously enrolled for three quarters or two semesters in any calendar year;

(e) Any person who has completed and obtained a high school diploma, or a person who has received the equivalent of a diploma; who has continuously lived in the state of Washington for at least a year primarily for purposes other than postsecondary education before the individual is admitted to an institution of higher education under subsection (1) of this section; and who provides to the institution an affidavit indicating that the individual will file an application to become a permanent resident at the earliest opportunity the individual is eligible to do so and a willingness to engage in any other activities necessary to acquire citizenship, including but not limited to citizenship or civics review courses;

(f) Any person who has lived in Washington, primarily for purposes other than postsecondary education, for at least one year immediately before the date on which the person has enrolled in an institution, and who holds lawful nonimmigrant status pursuant to 8 U.S.C. Sec. (a)(15) (E)(iii), (H)(i), or (L), or who holds lawful nonimmigrant status as the spouse or child of a person having nonimmigrant status under one of those subsections, or who, holding or having previously held such lawful nonimmigrant status as a principal or derivative, has filed an application for adjustment of status pursuant to 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1255(a);

(g) A student who is on active military duty stationed in the state or who is a member of the Washington national guard;

(h) A student who is on active military duty or a member of the Washington national guard who meets the following conditions:

(i) Entered service as a Washington resident;

(ii) Has maintained a Washington domicile; and

(iii) Is stationed out-of-state;

(i) A student who is on active military duty who is stationed out-of-state after having been stationed in Washington and is either:

(i) Admitted to an institution of higher education in Washington before the reassignment and enrolls in that institution for the term the student was admitted;

(ii) Enrolled in an institution of higher education in Washington and remains continuously enrolled at the institution; or

(iii) Enrolls in an institution of higher education in Washington within three years from the date of reassignment out-of-state;

(j) A student who is the spouse, state registered domestic partner, or a dependent as defined in Title 10 U.S.C. Sec. 1072(2) as it existed on January 18, 2022, or such subsequent date as the student achievement council may determine by rule of a person defined in (g) or (h) of this subsection. If the person defined in (g) of this subsection is reassigned out-of-state, the student maintains the status as a resident student so long as the student is either:

(i) Admitted to an institution before the reassignment and enrolls in that institution for the term the student was admitted;

(ii) Enrolled in an institution and remains continuously enrolled at the institution; or

(iii) Enrolled in an institution of higher education in Washington within three years from the date of reassignment out-of-state;

(k) A student who is eligible for veterans administration educational assistance or rehabilitation benefits under Title 38 U.S.C. or educational assistance under Title 10 U.S.C. chapter 1606 as the titles existed on January 18, 2022, or such subsequent date as the student achievement council may determine by rule;

(l) A student who has separated or retired from the uniformed services with at least 10 years of ((honorable)) service and at least 90 days of active duty service, with a qualifying discharge as defined in section 4 of this act, and who enters an institution of higher education in Washington within three years of the date of separation or retirement;

(m) A student who is the spouse, state registered domestic partner, or child under the age of 26 years of an individual who has separated or retired from the uniformed services with at least 10 years of ((honorable)) service and at least 90 days of active duty service, with a qualifying discharge as defined in section 4 of this act, and who enters an institution of higher education in Washington within three years of the service member's date of separation or retirement;

(n) A student who has separated from the uniformed services who was discharged ((due to the student's sexual orientation or gender identity or expression))for a reason described in section 4(1)(d) of this act;

(o) A student who is defined as a covered individual in 38 U.S.C. Sec. 3679(c)(2) as it existed on January 18, 2022, or such subsequent date as the student achievement council may determine by rule;

(p) A student of an out-of-state institution of higher education who is attending a Washington state institution of higher education pursuant to a home tuition agreement as described in RCW 28B.15.725;

(q) A student who meets the requirements of RCW 28B.15.0131 or 28B.15.0139: PROVIDED, That a nonresident student enrolled for more than six hours per semester or quarter shall be considered as attending for primarily educational purposes, and for tuition and fee paying purposes only such period of enrollment shall not be counted toward the establishment of a bona fide domicile of one year in this state unless such student proves that the student has in fact established a bona fide domicile in this state primarily for purposes other than educational;

(r) A student who resides in Washington and is on active military duty stationed in the Oregon counties of Columbia, Gilliam, Hood River, Multnomah, Clatsop, Clackamas, Morrow, Sherman, Umatilla, Union, Wallowa, Wasco, or Washington; or

(s) A student who resides in Washington and is the spouse or a dependent of a person defined in (r) of this subsection. If the person defined in (r) of this subsection moves from Washington or is reassigned out of the Oregon counties of Columbia, Gilliam, Hood River, Multnomah, Clatsop, Clackamas, Morrow, Sherman, Umatilla, Union, Wallowa, Wasco, or Washington, the student maintains the status as a resident student so long as the student resides in Washington and is either:

(i) Admitted to an institution before the reassignment and enrolls in that institution for the term the student was admitted; or

(ii) Enrolled in an institution and remains continuously enrolled at the institution.

(3)(a) A student who qualifies under subsection (2)(k), (l), (m), (n), or (o) of this section and who remains continuously enrolled at an institution of higher education shall retain resident student status.

(b) Nothing in subsection (2)(k), (l), (m), (((n),)) or (o) of this section applies to students who have a bad conduct discharge, officer dismissal, or dishonorable discharge from the uniformed services, or to students who are the spouse or child of an individual who has ((had)) a bad conduct discharge, officer dismissal, or dishonorable discharge from the uniformed services, unless the student is receiving veterans administration educational assistance benefits.

(4) The term "nonresident student" shall mean any student who does not qualify as a "resident student" under the provisions of this section and RCW 28B.15.013. Except for students qualifying under subsection (2)(e) or (p) of this section, a nonresident student shall include:

(a) A student attending an institution with the aid of financial assistance provided by another state or governmental unit or agency thereof, such nonresidency continuing for one year after the completion of such semester or quarter. This condition shall not apply to students from Columbia, Multnomah, Clatsop, Clackamas, or Washington county, Oregon participating in the border county pilot project under RCW 28B.76.685, 28B.76.690, and 28B.15.0139.

(b) A person who is not a citizen of the United States of America, unless the person meets and complies with all applicable requirements in this section and RCW 28B.15.013 and is one of the following:

(i) A lawful permanent resident;

(ii) A temporary resident;

(iii) A person who holds "refugee-parolee," "conditional entrant," or U or T nonimmigrant status with the United States citizenship and immigration services;

(iv) A person who has been issued an employment authorization document by the United States citizenship and immigration services that is valid as of the date the person's residency status is determined;

(v) A person who has been granted deferred action for childhood arrival status before, on, or after June 7, 2018, regardless of whether the person is no longer or will no longer be granted deferred action for childhood arrival status due to the termination, suspension, or modification of the deferred action for childhood arrival program; or

(vi) A person who is otherwise permanently residing in the United States under color of law, including deferred action status.

(5) The term "domicile" shall denote a person's true, fixed and permanent home and place of habitation. It is the place where the student intends to remain, and to which the student expects to return when the student leaves without intending to establish a new domicile elsewhere. The burden of proof that a student, parent or guardian has established a domicile in the state of Washington primarily for purposes other than educational lies with the student.

(6) The term "dependent" shall mean a person who is not financially independent. Factors to be considered in determining whether a person is financially independent shall be set forth in rules adopted by the student achievement council and shall include, but not be limited to, the state and federal income tax returns of the person and/or the student's parents or legal guardian filed for the calendar year prior to the year in which application is made and such other evidence as the council may require.

(7) The term "active military duty" means the person is serving on active duty in:

(a) The armed forces of the United States government; or

(b) The Washington national guard; or

(c) The coast guard, merchant mariners, or other nonmilitary organization when such service is recognized by the United States government as equivalent to service in the armed forces.

(8) The term "active duty service" means full-time duty, other than active duty for training, as a member of the uniformed services of the United States. Active duty service as a national guard member under Title 32 U.S.C. for the purpose of organizing, administering, recruiting, instructing, or training and active service under Title 32 U.S.C. Sec. 502(f) for the purpose of responding to a national emergency is recognized as active duty service.

(9) The term "uniformed services" is defined by Title 10 U.S.C.; subsequently structured and organized by Titles 14, 33, and 42 U.S.C.; consisting of the United States army, United States marine corps, United States navy, United States air force, United States coast guard, United States space force, United States public health service commissioned corps, and the national oceanic and atmospheric administration commissioned officer corps.

(10) "Washington national guard" means that part of the military force of the state that is organized, equipped, and federally recognized under the provisions of the national defense act of the United States, and in the event the national guard is called into federal service or in the event the state guard or any part or individual member thereof is called into active state service by the commander-in-chief. National guard service includes being subject to call up for active duty under Title 32 U.S.C. or Title 10 U.S.C. status or when called to state active service by the governor under the provisions of RCW 38.08.040.

(11) "Child" includes, but is not limited to:

(a) A legitimate child;

(b) An adopted child;

(c) A stepchild;

(d) A foster child; and

(e) A legal dependent.

Sec. 12. RCW 28B.15.621 and 2022 c 45 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature finds that active military and naval veterans, reserve military and naval veterans, and national guard members called to active duty have served their country and have risked their lives to defend the lives of all Americans and the freedoms that define and distinguish our nation. The legislature intends to honor active military and naval veterans, reserve military and naval veterans, and national guard members who have served on active military or naval duty for the public service they have provided to this country.

(2) Subject to the limitations in RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community and technical colleges, may waive all or a portion of tuition and fees for an eligible veteran or national guard member.

(3) The governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community and technical colleges, may waive all or a portion of tuition and fees for a military or naval veteran who is a Washington domiciliary, but who did not serve on foreign soil or in international waters or in another location in support of those serving on foreign soil or in international waters and who does not qualify as an eligible veteran or national guard member under subsection (8) of this section. However, there shall be no state general fund support for waivers granted under this subsection.

(4) Subject to the conditions in subsection (5) of this section and the limitations in RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community and technical colleges, shall waive all tuition and fees for the following persons:

(a) A child and the spouse or the domestic partner or surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner of an eligible veteran or national guard member who became totally disabled as a result of serving in active federal military or naval service, or who is determined by the federal government to be a prisoner of war or missing in action; and

(b) A child and the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner of an eligible veteran or national guard member who lost his or her life as a result of serving in active federal military or naval service.

(5) The conditions in this subsection (5) apply to waivers under subsection (4) of this section.

(a) A child must be a Washington domiciliary between the age of seventeen and twenty-six to be eligible for the tuition waiver. A child's marital status does not affect eligibility.

(b)(i) A surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner must be a Washington domiciliary.

(ii)(A) A surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner of the eligible veteran or national guard member has ten years to receive benefits under the waiver from whichever date occurs last:

(I) The date of the death;

(II) The date of total disability;

(III) Federal determination of service-connected death or total disability; or

(IV) Federal determination of prisoner of war or missing in action status.

(B) Upon remarriage or registration in a subsequent domestic partnership, the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner is ineligible for the waiver of all tuition and fees.

(c) Each recipient's continued participation is subject to the school's satisfactory progress policy.

(d) Tuition waivers for graduate students are not required for those who qualify under subsection (4) of this section but are encouraged.

(e) Recipients who receive a waiver under subsection (4) of this section may attend full-time or part-time. Total credits earned using the waiver may not exceed two hundred fifty quarter credits, or the equivalent of semester credits.

(f) Subject to amounts appropriated, recipients who receive a waiver under subsection (4) of this section shall also receive a stipend for textbooks and course materials in the amount of five hundred dollars per academic year, to be divided equally among academic terms and prorated for part-time enrollment.

(6) Required waivers of all tuition and fees under subsection (4) of this section shall not affect permissive waivers of tuition and fees under subsection (3) of this section.

(7) Private vocational schools and private higher education institutions are encouraged to provide waivers consistent with the terms in subsections (2) through (5) of this section.

(8) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section.

(a) "Child" means a biological child, adopted child, or stepchild.

(b) "Eligible veteran or national guard member" means a Washington domiciliary who was an active or reserve member of the United States military or naval forces, or a national guard member called to active duty, who served in active federal service, under either Title 10 or Title 32 of the United States Code, in a war or conflict fought on foreign soil or in international waters or in support of those serving on foreign soil or in international waters, and if discharged from service, has ((received an honorable discharge or any other discharge if the sole reason for discharge is due to gender or sexuality))a qualifying discharge as defined in section 4 of this act.

(c) "Totally disabled" means a person who has been determined to be one hundred percent disabled by the federal department of veterans affairs.

(d) "Washington domiciliary" means a person whose true, fixed, and permanent house and place of habitation is the state of Washington. "Washington domiciliary" includes a person who is residing in rental housing or residing in base housing. In ascertaining whether a child or surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner is domiciled in the state of Washington, public institutions of higher education shall, to the fullest extent possible, rely upon the standards provided in RCW 28B.15.013.

(9) As used in subsection (4) of this section, "fees" includes all assessments for costs incurred as a condition to a student's full participation in coursework and related activities at an institution of higher education.

(10) The governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community and technical colleges shall report to the higher education committees of the legislature by November 15, 2010, and every two years thereafter, regarding the status of implementation of the waivers under subsection (4) of this section. The reports shall include the following data and information:

(a) Total number of waivers;

(b) Total amount of tuition waived;

(c) Total amount of fees waived;

(d) Average amount of tuition and fees waived per recipient;

(e) Recipient demographic data that is disaggregated by distinct ethnic categories within racial subgroups; and

(f) Recipient income level, to the extent possible.

Sec. 13. RCW 28B.102.020 and 2019 c 295 s 211 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Approved education program" means an education program in a common school as defined in RCW 28A.150.020.

(2) "Certificate" or "certificated" does not include a limited or conditioned certificate.

(3) "Certificated employee" has the definition in RCW 28A.150.203. "Certificated employee" does not include a paraeducator.

(4) "Conditional scholarship" means a loan that is forgiven in whole or in part in exchange for service as a certificated employee in an approved education program.

(5) "Eligible veteran or national guard member" means a Washington domiciliary who was an active or reserve member of the United States military or naval forces, or a national guard member called to active duty, who served in active federal service, under either Title 10 or Title 32 of the United States Code, in a war or conflict fought on foreign soil or in international waters or in another location in support of those serving on foreign soil or in international waters, and if discharged from service, has ((received an honorable discharge))a qualifying discharge as defined in section 4 of this act.

(6) "Forgiven" or "to forgive" or "forgiveness" means that all or part of a loan is canceled in exchange for service as a certificated employee in an approved education program.

(7) "Institution of higher education" or "institution" means a college or university in the state of Washington that is accredited by an accrediting association recognized as such by rule of the student achievement council.

(8) "Loan repayment" means a federal student loan that is repaid in whole or in part if the borrower serves as a certificated employee in an approved education program.

(9) "Office" means the office of student financial assistance.

(10) "Participant" means a person who has received a conditional scholarship or loan repayment under this chapter.

(11) "Public school" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.150.010.

(12) "Shortage area" means an endorsement or geographic area as defined by the Washington professional educator standards board, in consultation with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, with a shortage of certificated employees. "Shortage area" must be defined biennially using quantitative and qualitative measures.

Sec. 14. RCW 41.04.010 and 2017 c 97 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

In all competitive examinations, unless otherwise provided in this section, to determine the qualifications of applicants for public offices, positions, or employment, either the state, and all of its political subdivisions and all municipal corporations, or private companies or agencies contracted with by the state to give the competitive examinations shall give a scoring criteria status to all veterans as defined in RCW 41.04.007, by adding to the passing mark, grade or rating only, based upon a possible rating of one hundred points as perfect a percentage in accordance with the following:

(1) Ten percent to a veteran who served during a period of war or in an armed conflict as defined in RCW 41.04.005 and does not receive military retirement. The percentage shall be added to the passing mark, grade, or rating of competitive examinations until the veteran's first appointment. The percentage shall not be utilized in promotional examinations;

(2) Five percent to a veteran who did not serve during a period of war or in an armed conflict as defined in RCW 41.04.005 or is receiving military retirement. The percentage shall be added to the passing mark, grade, or rating of competitive examinations until the veteran's first appointment. The percentage shall not be utilized in promotional examinations;

(3) Five percent to a veteran who was called to active military service from employment with the state or any of its political subdivisions or municipal corporations. The percentage shall be added to promotional examinations until the first promotion only;

(4) All veterans' scoring criteria may be claimed:

(a) Upon release from active military service with ((an honorable discharge or a discharge for medical reasons with an honorable record, where applicable))a qualifying discharge as defined in section 4 of this act; or

(b) Upon receipt of a United States department of defense discharge document DD form 214, NGB form 22, or their equivalent or successor discharge paperwork, that characterizes his or her ((service))discharge as ((honorable))a qualifying discharge as defined in section 4 of this act.

Sec. 15. RCW 41.06.133 and 2023 c 148 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall adopt rules, consistent with the purposes and provisions of this chapter and with the best standards of personnel administration, regarding the basis and procedures to be followed for:

(a) The reduction, dismissal, suspension, or demotion of an employee;

(b) Training and career development;

(c) Probationary periods of six to twelve months and rejections of probationary employees, depending on the job requirements of the class, except as follows:

(i) Entry-level state park rangers shall serve a probationary period of twelve months; and

(ii) The probationary period of campus police officer appointees who are required to attend the Washington state criminal justice training commission basic law enforcement academy shall extend from the date of appointment until twelve months from the date of successful completion of the basic law enforcement academy, or twelve months from the date of appointment if academy training is not required. The director shall adopt rules to ensure that employees promoting to campus police officer who are required to attend the Washington state criminal justice training commission basic law enforcement academy shall have the trial service period extend from the date of appointment until twelve months from the date of successful completion of the basic law enforcement academy, or twelve months from the date of appointment if academy training is not required;

(d) Transfers;

(e) Promotional preferences;

(f) Sick leaves and vacations;

(g) Hours of work;

(h) Layoffs when necessary and subsequent reemployment, except for the financial basis for layoffs;

(i) The number of names to be certified for vacancies;

(j) Subject to RCW 41.04.820, adoption and revision of a state salary schedule to reflect the prevailing rates in Washington state private industries and other governmental units;

(k) Increment increases within the series of steps for each pay grade based on length of service for all employees whose standards of performance are such as to permit them to retain job status in the classified service;

(l) Optional lump sum relocation compensation approved by the agency director, whenever it is reasonably necessary that a person make a domiciliary move in accepting a transfer or other employment with the state. An agency must provide lump sum compensation within existing resources. If the person receiving the relocation payment terminates or causes termination with the state, for reasons other than layoff, disability separation, or other good cause as determined by an agency director, within one year of the date of the employment, the state is entitled to reimbursement of the lump sum compensation from the person;

(m) Providing for veteran's preference as required by existing statutes, with recognition of preference in regard to layoffs and subsequent reemployment for veterans and their surviving spouses by giving such eligible veterans and their surviving spouses additional credit in computing their seniority by adding to their unbroken state service, as defined by the director, the veteran's service in the military not to exceed five years. For the purposes of this section, "veteran" means any person who has one or more years of active military service in any branch of the armed forces of the United States or who has less than one year's service and is discharged with a disability incurred in the line of duty or is discharged at the convenience of the government and who, upon termination of such service, has received ((an honorable discharge, a discharge for physical reasons with an honorable record, or a release from active military service with evidence of service other than that for which an undesirable, bad conduct, or dishonorable discharge shall be given))a qualifying discharge as defined in section 4 of this act. However, the surviving spouse of a veteran is entitled to the benefits of this section regardless of the veteran's length of active military service. For the purposes of this section, "veteran" does not include any person who has voluntarily retired with twenty or more years of active military service and whose military retirement pay is in excess of five hundred dollars per month.

(2) Rules adopted under this section by the director shall provide for local administration and management by the institutions of higher education and related boards, subject to periodic audit and review by the director.

(3) Rules adopted by the director under this section may be superseded by the provisions of a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under RCW 41.80.001 and 41.80.010 through 41.80.130. The supersession of such rules shall only affect employees in the respective collective bargaining units.

Sec. 16. RCW 41.08.040 and 1993 c 47 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Immediately after appointment the commission shall organize by electing one of its members chair and hold regular meetings at least once a month, and such additional meetings as may be required for the proper discharge of their duties.

They shall appoint a secretary and chief examiner, who shall keep the records of the commission, preserve all reports made to it, superintend and keep a record of all examinations held under its direction, and perform such other duties as the commission may prescribe.

The secretary and chief examiner shall be appointed as a result of competitive examination which examination may be either original and open to all properly qualified citizens of the city, town or municipality, or promotional and limited to persons already in the service of the fire department or of the fire department and other departments of said city, town or municipality, as the commission may decide. The secretary and chief examiner may be subject to suspension, reduction or discharge in the same manner and subject to the same limitations as are provided in the case of members of the fire department. It shall be the duty of the civil service commission:

(1) To make suitable rules and regulations not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter. Such rules and regulations shall provide in detail the manner in which examinations may be held, and appointments, promotions, transfers, reinstatements, demotions, suspensions and discharges shall be made, and may also provide for any other matters connected with the general subject of personnel administration, and which may be considered desirable to further carry out the general purposes of this chapter, or which may be found to be in the interest of good personnel administration. Such rules and regulations may be changed from time to time. The rules and regulations and any amendments thereof shall be printed, mimeographed or multigraphed for free public distribution. Such rules and regulations may be changed from time to time.

(2) All tests shall be practical, and shall consist only of subjects which will fairly determine the capacity of persons examined to perform duties of the position to which appointment is to be made, and may include tests of physical fitness and/or of manual skill.

(3) The rules and regulations adopted by the commission shall provide for a credit in accordance with RCW 41.04.010 in favor of all applicants for appointment under civil service, who, in time of war, or in any expedition of the armed forces of the United States, have served in and been ((honorably)) discharged from the armed forces of the United States, including the army, navy, and marine corps and the American Red Cross, with a qualifying discharge as defined in section 4 of this act. These credits apply to entrance examinations only.

(4) The commission shall make investigations concerning and report upon all matters touching the enforcement and effect of the provisions of this chapter, and the rules and regulations prescribed hereunder; inspect all institutions, departments, offices, places, positions and employments affected by this chapter, and ascertain whether this chapter and all such rules and regulations are being obeyed. Such investigations may be made by the commission or by any commissioner designated by the commission for that purpose. Not only must these investigations be made by the commission as aforesaid, but the commission must make like investigation on petition of a citizen, duly verified, stating that irregularities or abuses exist, or setting forth in concise language, in writing, the necessity for such investigation. In the course of such investigation the commission or designated commissioner, or chief examiner, shall have the power to administer oaths, subpoena and require the attendance of witnesses and the production by them of books, papers, documents and accounts appertaining to the investigation and also to cause the deposition of witnesses residing within or without the state to be taken in the manner prescribed by law for like depositions in civil actions in the superior court; and the oaths administered hereunder and the subpoenas issued hereunder shall have the same force and effect as the oaths administered by a superior court judge in his or her judicial capacity; and the failure upon the part of any person so subpoenaed to comply with the provisions of this section shall be deemed a violation of this chapter, and punishable as such.

(5) All hearings and investigations before the commission, or designated commissioner, or chief examiner, shall be governed by this chapter and by rules of practice and procedure to be adopted by the commission, and in the conduct thereof neither the commission, nor designated commissioner shall be bound by the technical rules of evidence. No informality in any proceedings or hearing, or in the manner of taking testimony before the commission or designated commissioner, shall invalidate any order, decision, rule or regulation made, approved or confirmed by the commission: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That no order, decision, rule or regulation made by any designated commissioner conducting any hearing or investigation alone shall be of any force or effect whatsoever unless and until concurred in by at least one of the other two members.

(6) To hear and determine appeals or complaints respecting the administrative work of the personnel department; appeals upon the allocation of positions; the rejection of an examination, and such other matters as may be referred to the commission.

(7) Establish and maintain in card or other suitable form a roster of officers and employees.

(8) Provide for, formulate and hold competitive tests to determine the relative qualifications of persons who seek employment in any class or position and as a result thereof establish eligible lists for the various classes of positions, and to provide that persons laid off because of curtailment of expenditures, reduction in force, and for like causes, head the list in the order of their seniority, to the end that they shall be the first to be reemployed.

(9) When a vacant position is to be filled, to certify to the appointing authority, on written request, the name of the person highest on the eligible list for the class. If there are no such lists, to authorize provisional or temporary appointment list of such class. Such temporary or provisional appointment shall not continue for a period longer than four months; nor shall any person receive more than one provisional appointment or serve more than four months as a provisional appointee in any one fiscal year.

(10) Keep such records as may be necessary for the proper administration of this chapter.

Sec. 17. RCW 41.12.040 and 1993 c 47 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Immediately after appointment the commission shall organize by electing one of its members chair and hold regular meetings at least once a month, and such additional meetings as may be required for the proper discharge of their duties.

They shall appoint a secretary and chief examiner, who shall keep the records for the commission, preserve all reports made to it, superintend and keep a record of all examinations held under its direction, and perform such other duties as the commission may prescribe.

The secretary and chief examiner shall be appointed as a result of competitive examination which examination may be either original and open to all properly qualified citizens of the city, town, or municipality, or promotional and limited to persons already in the service of the police department or of the police department and other departments of the city, town, or municipality, as the commission may decide. The secretary and chief examiner may be subject to suspension, reduction, or discharge in the same manner and subject to the same limitations as are provided in the case of members of the police department. It shall be the duty of the civil service commission:

(1) To make suitable rules and regulations not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter. Such rules and regulations shall provide in detail the manner in which examinations may be held, and appointments, promotions, transfers, reinstatements, demotions, suspensions, and discharges shall be made, and may also provide for any other matters connected with the general subject of personnel administration, and which may be considered desirable to further carry out the general purposes of this chapter, or which may be found to be in the interest of good personnel administration. Such rules and regulations may be changed from time to time. The rules and regulations and any amendments thereof shall be printed, mimeographed, or multigraphed for free public distribution. Such rules and regulations may be changed from time to time;

(2) All tests shall be practical, and shall consist only of subjects which will fairly determine the capacity of persons examined to perform duties of the position to which appointment is to be made, and may include tests of physical fitness and/or of manual skill;

(3) The rules and regulations adopted by the commission shall provide for a credit in accordance with RCW 41.04.010 in favor of all applicants for appointment under civil service, who, in time of war, or in any expedition of the armed forces of the United States, have served in and been ((honorably)) discharged from the armed forces of the United States, including the army, navy, and marine corps and the American Red Cross, with a qualifying discharge as defined in section 4 of this act. These credits apply to entrance examinations only;

(4) The commission shall make investigations concerning and report upon all matters touching the enforcement and effect of the provisions of this chapter, and the rules and regulations prescribed hereunder; inspect all institutions, departments, offices, places, positions, and employments affected by this chapter, and ascertain whether this chapter and all such rules and regulations are being obeyed. Such investigations may be made by the commission or by any commissioner designated by the commission for that purpose. Not only must these investigations be made by the commission, but the commission must make like investigation on petition of a citizen, duly verified, stating that irregularities or abuses exist, or setting forth in concise language, in writing, the necessity for such investigation. In the course of such investigation the commission or designated commissioner, or chief examiner, shall have the power to administer oaths, subpoena and require the attendance of witnesses and the production by them of books, papers, documents, and accounts appertaining to the investigation, and also to cause the deposition of witnesses residing within or without the state to be taken in the manner prescribed by law for like depositions in civil actions in the superior court; and the oaths administered hereunder and the subpoenas issued hereunder shall have the same force and effect as the oaths administered by a superior court judge in his or her judicial capacity; and the failure upon the part of any person so subpoenaed to comply with the provisions of this section shall be deemed a violation of this chapter, and punishable as such;

(5) Hearings and Investigations: How conducted. All hearings and investigations before the commission, or designated commissioner, or chief examiner, shall be governed by this chapter and by rules of practice and procedure to be adopted by the commission, and in the conduct thereof neither the commission, nor designated commissioner shall be bound by the technical rules of evidence. No informality in any proceedings or hearing, or in the manner of taking testimony before the commission or designated commissioner, shall invalidate any order, decision, rule or regulation made, approved or confirmed by the commission: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That no order, decision, rule or regulation made by any designated commissioner conducting any hearing or investigation alone shall be of any force or effect whatsoever unless and until concurred in by at least one of the other two members;

(6) To hear and determine appeals or complaints respecting the administrative work of the personnel department; appeals upon the allocation of positions; the rejection of an examination, and such other matters as may be referred to the commission;

(7) Establish and maintain in card or other suitable form a roster of officers and employees;

(8) Provide for, formulate and hold competitive tests to determine the relative qualifications of persons who seek employment in any class or position and as a result thereof establish eligible lists for the various classes of positions, and to provide that persons laid off because of curtailment of expenditures, reduction in force, and for like causes, head the list in the order of their seniority, to the end that they shall be the first to be reemployed;

(9) When a vacant position is to be filled, to certify to the appointing authority, on written request, the name of the person highest on the eligible list for the class. If there are no such lists, to authorize provisional or temporary appointment list of such class. Such temporary or provisional appointment shall not continue for a period longer than four months; nor shall any person receive more than one provisional appointment or serve more than four months as provisional appointee in any one fiscal year;

(10) Keep such records as may be necessary for the proper administration of this chapter.

Sec. 18. RCW 41.16.220 and 2007 c 218 s 38 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person who was a member of the fire department and within the provisions of chapter 50, Laws of 1909, as amended, at the time he or she entered, and ((who is a veteran,))is an honorably discharged veteran or received a discharge for physical reasons with an honorable record from the armed forces, and whose military service was during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005, shall have added and accredited to his or her period of employment as a firefighter as computed under this chapter his or her period of war service in such armed forces upon payment by him or her of his or her contribution for the period of his or her absence, at the rate provided by chapter 50, Laws of 1909, as amended, for other members: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, Such accredited service shall not in any case exceed five years.

Sec. 19. RCW 41.20.050 and 2012 c 117 s 22 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Whenever a person has been duly appointed, and has served honorably for a period of twenty-five years, as a member, in any capacity, of the regularly constituted police department of a city subject to the provisions of this chapter, the board, after hearing, if one is requested in writing, may order and direct that such person be retired, and the board shall retire any member so entitled, upon his or her written request therefor. The member so retired hereafter shall be paid from the fund during his or her lifetime a pension equal to fifty percent of the amount of salary at any time hereafter attached to the position held by the retired member for the year preceding the date of his or her retirement: PROVIDED, That, except as to a position higher than that of captain held for at least three calendar years prior to date of retirement, no such pension shall exceed an amount equivalent to fifty percent of the salary of captain, and all existing pensions shall be increased to not less than three hundred dollars per month as of April 25, 1973: PROVIDED FURTHER, That a person hereafter retiring who has served as a member for more than twenty-five years, shall have his or her pension payable under this section increased by two percent of his or her salary per year for each full year of such additional service to a maximum of five additional years.

Any person who has served in a position higher than the rank of captain for a minimum of three years may elect to retire at such higher position and receive for his or her lifetime a pension equal to fifty percent of the amount of the salary at any time hereafter attached to the position held by such retired member for the year preceding his or her date of retirement: PROVIDED, That such person make the said election to retire at a higher position by September 1, 1969 and at the time of making the said election, pay into the relief and pension fund in addition to the contribution required by RCW 41.20.130: (1) an amount equal to six percent of that portion of all monthly salaries previously received upon which a sum equal to six percent has not been previously deducted and paid into the police relief and pension fund; (2) and such person agrees to continue paying into the police relief and pension fund until the date of retirement, in addition to the contributions required by RCW 41.20.130, an amount equal to six percent of that portion of monthly salary upon which a six percent contribution is not currently deducted pursuant to RCW 41.20.130.

Any person affected by this chapter who at the time of entering the armed services was a member of such police department and is ((a))an honorably discharged veteran or received a discharge for physical reasons with an honorable record and whose military service was during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005, shall have added to his or her period of employment as computed under this chapter, his or her period of war service in the armed forces, but such credited service shall not exceed five years and such period of service shall be automatically added to each member's service upon payment by him or her of his or her contribution for the period of his or her absence at the rate provided in RCW 41.20.130.

Sec. 20. RCW 41.40.170 and 2005 c 247 s 2 and 2005 c 64 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) A member who has served or shall serve on active federal service in the military or naval forces of the United States and who left or shall leave an employer to enter such service shall be deemed to be on military leave of absence if he or she has resumed or shall resume employment as an employee within one year from termination thereof.

(2) If he or she has applied or shall apply for reinstatement of employment, within one year from termination of the military service, and is refused employment for reasons beyond his or her control, he or she shall, upon resumption of service within ten years have such service credited to him or her.

(3) In any event, after completing twenty-five years of creditable service, any member may have service in the armed forces credited to him or her as a member whether or not he or she left the employ of an employer to enter the armed service: PROVIDED, That in no instance, described in this section, shall military service in excess of five years be credited: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That in each instance the member must restore all withdrawn accumulated contributions, which restoration must be completed within five years of membership service following the first resumption of employment or complete twenty-five years of creditable service: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That this section will not apply to any individual, not ((a))an honorably discharged veteran ((within the meaning of))or veteran who received a physical discharge from the armed forces with an honorable record. Furthermore, an individual must prove that their military service was during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005.

(4)(a) A member, after completing twenty-five years of creditable service, who would have otherwise become eligible for a retirement benefit as defined under this chapter while serving honorably in the armed forces, and with service during a period of war as referenced in RCW 41.04.005, shall, upon application to the department, be eligible to receive credit for this service without returning to covered employment.

(b) Service credit granted under (a) of this subsection applies only to honorably discharged veterans or veterans who received a physical discharge with an honorable record whose military service was during a period of war as defined in RCW ((41.40.005))41.04.005.

(5) The surviving spouse or eligible child or children of a member who left the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of the United States and died while serving in the uniformed services may, on behalf of the deceased member, apply for retirement system service credit under this subsection up to the date of the member's death in the uniformed services. The department shall establish the deceased member's service credit if the surviving spouse or eligible child or children:

(a) Provides to the director proof of the member's death while serving in the uniformed services; and

(b) Provides to the director proof of the member's honorable service in the uniformed services prior to the date of death.

(6) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of the United States and becomes totally incapacitated for continued employment by an employer while serving in the uniformed services is entitled to retirement system service credit under this subsection up to the date of discharge from the uniformed services if:

(a) The member obtains a determination from the director that he or she is totally incapacitated for continued employment due to conditions or events that occurred while serving in the uniformed services; and

(b) The member provides to the director proof of honorable discharge from the uniformed services.

Sec. 21. RCW 43.24.130 and 2012 c 45 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the license of any person licensed by the director of licensing, or the boards and commissions listed in chapter 18.235 RCW, to practice a profession or engage in an occupation, if valid and in force and effect at the time the licensee entered service in the armed forces, the United States public health service commissioned corps, or the merchant marine of the United States, shall continue in full force and effect so long as such service continues, unless sooner suspended, canceled, or revoked for cause as provided by law. The director, board, or commission shall renew the license of every such person who applies for renewal thereof within six months after being ((honorably)) discharged from service with a qualifying discharge as defined in section 4 of this act, upon payment of the renewal fee applicable to the then current year or other license period.

(2) If requested by the licensee, the license of a spouse or registered domestic partner of a service member in the United States armed forces, including the United States public health service commissioned corps, if valid and in force and effect at the time the service member is deployed or stationed in a location outside Washington state, must be placed in inactive military spouse or registered domestic partner status so long as such service continues, unless sooner suspended, canceled, or revoked for cause as provided by law. The director, board, or commission shall return to active status the license of every such person who applies for activation within six months after returning to Washington state, upon payment of the current renewal fee and meeting the current renewal conditions of the respective license.

(3) The director, board, or commission may adopt any rules necessary to implement this section.

Sec. 22. RCW 43.60A.190 and 2017 c 185 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department shall:

(a) Maintain a current list of certified veteran-owned businesses; and

(b) Make the list of certified veteran-owned businesses available on the department's public website.

(2) To qualify as a certified veteran-owned business, the business must:

(a) Be at least fifty-one percent owned and controlled by:

(i) A ((veteran as defined as every)) person who at the time he or she seeks certification ((has received a discharge with an honorable characterization or received a discharge for medical reasons with an honorable record, where applicable, and who has served in at least one of the capacities listed))is a veteran as defined in RCW 41.04.007;

(ii) A person who is in receipt of disability compensation or pension from the department of veterans affairs; or

(iii) An active or reserve member in any branch of the armed forces of the United States, including the national guard, coast guard, and armed forces reserves; and

(b) Be either an enterprise which is incorporated in the state of Washington as a Washington domestic corporation, or an enterprise whose principal place of business is located within the state of Washington for enterprises which are not incorporated.

(3) To participate in the linked deposit program under chapter 43.86A RCW, a veteran-owned business qualified under this section must be certified by the department as a business:

(a) In which the veteran owner possesses and exercises sufficient expertise specifically in the business's field of operation to make decisions governing the long-term direction and the day-to-day operations of the business;

(b) That is organized for profit and performing a commercially useful function; and

(c) That meets the criteria for a small business concern as established under chapter 39.19 RCW.

(4) The department shall create a logo for the purpose of identifying veteran-owned businesses to the public. The department shall put the logo on an adhesive sticker or decal suitable for display in a business window and distribute the stickers or decals to veteran-owned businesses listed with the department.

(5)(a) Businesses may submit an application on a form prescribed by the department to apply for certification under this section.

(b) The department must notify the state treasurer of veteran-owned businesses who have participated in the linked deposit program and are no longer certified under this section. The written notification to the state treasurer must contain information regarding the reasons for the decertification and information on financing provided to the veteran-owned business under RCW 43.86A.060.

(6) The department may adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

Sec. 23. RCW 43.70.270 and 2012 c 45 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the license of any person licensed by the secretary of health to practice a profession or engage in an occupation, if valid and in force and effect at the time the licensee entered service in the armed forces, the United States public health service commissioned corps, or the merchant marine of the United States, shall continue in full force and effect so long as such service continues, unless sooner suspended, canceled, or revoked for cause as provided by law. The secretary shall renew the license of every such person who applies for renewal thereof within six months after being ((honorably)) discharged from service with a qualifying discharge as defined in section 4 of this act, upon payment of the renewal fee applicable to the then current year or other license period.

(2) If requested by the licensee, the license of a spouse or registered domestic partner of a service member in the United States armed forces, including the United States public health service commissioned corps, if valid and in force and effect at the time the service member is deployed or stationed in a location outside Washington state, must be placed in inactive military spouse or registered domestic partner status so long as such service continues, unless sooner suspended, canceled, or revoked for cause as provided by law. The secretary shall return to active status the license of every such person who applies for renewal thereof within six months after the service member is ((honorably)) discharged from service with a qualifying discharge as defined in section 4 of this act, or sooner if requested by the licensee, upon payment of the renewal fee applicable to the then current year or other license period.

(3) The secretary may adopt any rules necessary to implement this section.

Sec. 24. RCW 46.18.210 and 2019 c 44 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A registered owner may apply to the department for special armed forces license plates for vehicles representing the following:

(a) Air force;

(b) Army;

(c) Coast guard;

(d) Marine corps;

(e) National guard; or

(f) Navy.

(2) Armed forces license plates may be purchased by:

(a) Active duty military personnel;

(b) Families of veterans and service members;

(c) Members of the national guard;

(d) Reservists; or

(e) Veterans, as defined in RCW 41.04.007.

(3) A person who applies for special armed forces license plates shall provide:

(a) DD-214 or discharge papers if the applicant is a veteran;

(b) A military identification card or retired military identification card; or

(c) A declaration of fact attesting to the applicant's eligibility as required under this section.

(4) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Child" includes stepchild, adopted child, foster child, grandchild, or son or daughter-in-law.

(b) "Family" or "families" includes an individual's spouse, child, parent, sibling, aunt, uncle, or cousin.

(c) "Parent" includes stepparent, grandparent, or in-laws.

(d) "Sibling" includes brother, half brother, stepbrother, sister, half sister, stepsister, or brother or sister-in-law.

(5) Armed forces license plates are not free of charge to disabled veterans, former prisoners of war, or spouses or domestic partners of deceased former prisoners of war under RCW 46.18.235.

(6) The department must implement the changes to veteran eligibility as established by chapter . . ., Laws of 2024 (this act) by April 1, 2025.

Sec. 25. RCW 46.18.270 and 2011 c 332 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A registered owner who has survived the attack on Pearl Harbor on December 7, 1941, may apply to the department for special license plates for use on only one motor vehicle required to display one or two license plates, excluding vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW, upon terms and conditions established by the department, and owned by the qualified applicant. The applicant must:

(a) Be a resident of this state;

(b) Have been a member of the United States armed forces on December 7, 1941;

(c) Have been on station on December 7, 1941, between the hours of 7:55 a.m. and 9:45 a.m. Hawaii time at Pearl Harbor, the island of Oahu, or offshore at a distance not to exceed three miles;

(d) Have received ((an honorable))a qualifying discharge, as defined in section 4 of this act, from the United States armed forces;

(e) Provide certification by a Washington state chapter of the Pearl Harbor survivors association showing that qualifications in (c) of this subsection have been met;

(f) Be recorded as the registered owner of the motor vehicle on which the Pearl Harbor survivor license plate or plates will be displayed; and

(g) Pay all fees and taxes required by law for registering the motor vehicle.

(2) Pearl Harbor survivor license plates must be issued without the payment of any license plate fee.

(3) Pearl Harbor survivor license plates must be replaced, free of charge, if the license plates have become lost, stolen, damaged, defaced, or destroyed.

(4) Pearl Harbor survivor license plates may be issued to the surviving spouse or domestic partner of a Pearl Harbor survivor who met the requirements in subsection (1) of this section. The surviving spouse or domestic partner must be a resident of this state. If the surviving spouse remarries or the surviving domestic partner marries or enters into a new domestic partnership, he or she must return the special license plates to the department within fifteen days and apply for regular license plates or another type of special license plate.

(5) A Pearl Harbor survivor license plate or plates may be transferred from one motor vehicle to another motor vehicle owned by the Pearl Harbor survivor or the surviving spouse or domestic partner as described in subsection (4) of this section upon application to the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director.

Sec. 26. RCW 46.18.280 and 2019 c 139 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A registered owner who has been awarded a Purple Heart medal by any branch of the United States armed forces, including the merchant marines and the women's air forces service pilots may apply to the department for special license plates for use on a motor vehicle required to display one or two license plates, excluding vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW, upon terms and conditions established by the department, and owned by the qualified applicant. The applicant must:

(a) Be a resident of this state;

(b) Have been wounded during one of this nation's wars or conflicts identified in RCW 41.04.005;

(c) Have received ((an honorable))a qualifying discharge, as defined in section 4 of this act, from the United States armed forces;

(d) Provide a copy of the armed forces document showing the recipient was awarded the Purple Heart medal; and

(e) Be recorded as the registered owner of the motor vehicle on which the Purple Heart license plate or plates will be displayed.

(2) Purple Heart license plates must be issued without the payment of any vehicle license fees, license plate fees, motor vehicle excise taxes, and special license plate fees for one motor vehicle. For other motor vehicles, qualified applicants may purchase Purple Heart license plates for the fee required under RCW 46.17.220(((17)))(18) and all other fees and taxes required by law for registering the motor vehicle.

(3) Purple Heart license plates may be issued to the surviving spouse or domestic partner of a Purple Heart recipient who met the requirements in subsection (1) of this section. The surviving spouse or domestic partner must be a resident of this state. If the surviving spouse remarries or the surviving domestic partner marries or enters into a new domestic partnership, he or she must return the special license plates to the department within fifteen days and apply for regular license plates or another type of special license plate.

(4) A Purple Heart license plate or plates may be transferred from one motor vehicle to another motor vehicle owned by the Purple Heart recipient or the surviving spouse or domestic partner as described in subsection (3) of this section upon application to the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director.

Sec. 27. RCW 46.18.295 and 2012 c 69 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Veterans ((discharged under honorable conditions (veterans))) and ((individuals serving on active duty in the United States armed forces ())active duty military personnel(())) may purchase a veterans remembrance emblem, campaign medal emblem, or military service award emblem. The emblem is to be displayed on license plates in the manner described by the department, existing vehicular registration procedures, and current laws.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Active duty military personnel" means an individual serving on active duty in the United States armed forces.

(b) "Veteran" has the meaning defined in RCW 41.04.007.

(3) Veterans and active duty military personnel who served during periods of war or armed conflict may purchase a remembrance emblem depicting campaign ribbons which they were awarded.

(((3)))(4) The following campaign ribbon remembrance emblems are available:

(a) World War I victory medal;

(b) World War II Asiatic-Pacific campaign medal;

(c) World War II European-African Middle East campaign medal;

(d) World War II American campaign medal;

(e) Korean service medal;

(f) Vietnam service medal;

(g) Armed forces expeditionary medal awarded after 1958; and

(h) Southwest Asia medal.

The director may issue additional campaign ribbon emblems by rule as authorized decorations by the United States department of defense.

(((4)))(5) The following military service award emblems are available:

(a) Distinguished Service Cross;

(b) Navy Cross;

(c) Air Force Cross;

(d) Silver Star medal; and

(e) Bronze Star medal.

(((5)))(6) Veterans or active duty military personnel requesting a veteran remembrance emblem, campaign medal emblem, or military service award emblem or emblems must:

(a) Pay a prescribed fee set by the department; and

(b) Show proof of eligibility through:

(i) Providing a DD-214 or discharge papers, as well as necessary documentation to prove eligibility as a veteran with an other than honorable characterization of service, if a veteran;

(ii) Providing a copy of orders awarding a campaign ribbon if an individual serving on military active duty;

(iii) Providing a copy of orders awarding a military service award; or

(iv) Attesting in a notarized affidavit of their eligibility as required under this section.

(((6)))(7) Veterans or active duty military personnel who purchase a veteran remembrance emblem, campaign medal emblem, or military service award emblem must be the legal or registered owner of the vehicle on which the emblem is to be displayed.

Sec. 28. RCW 46.20.027 and 2002 c 292 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

A Washington state motor vehicle driver's license issued to any service member if valid and in force and effect while such person is serving in the armed forces, shall remain in full force and effect so long as such service continues unless the same is sooner suspended, canceled, or revoked for cause as provided by law and for not to exceed ninety days following the date on which the holder of such driver's license is ((honorably)) separated from service in the armed forces of the United States. A Washington state driver's license issued to the spouse or dependent child of such service member likewise remains in full force and effect if the person is residing with the service member.

For purposes of this section, "service member" means every person serving in the armed forces whose branch of service as of the date of application for the driver's license is included in the definition of veteran pursuant to RCW 41.04.007 or the person will meet the definition of veteran at the time of discharge.

Sec. 29. RCW 46.20.161 and 2021 c 158 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department, upon receipt of a fee of seventy-two dollars, unless the driver's license is issued for a period other than eight years, in which case the fee shall be nine dollars for each year that the license is issued, which includes the fee for the required photograph, shall issue to every qualifying applicant a driver's license. A driver's license issued to a person under the age of eighteen is an intermediate license, subject to the restrictions imposed under RCW 46.20.075, until the person reaches the age of eighteen.

(2) The license must include:

(a) A distinguishing number assigned to the licensee;

(b) The name of record;

(c) Date of birth;

(d) Washington residence address;

(e) Photograph;

(f) A brief description of the licensee;

(g) Either a facsimile of the signature of the licensee or a space upon which the licensee shall write the licensees' usual signature with pen and ink immediately upon receipt of the license;

(h) If applicable, the person's status as a veteran as provided in subsection (4) of this section; and

(i) If applicable, a medical alert designation as provided in subsection (5) of this section.

(3) No license is valid until it has been signed by the licensee.

(4)(a) A veteran, as defined in RCW 41.04.007, ((or an individual who otherwise meets the criteria of RCW 41.04.007 but who has received a general discharge under honorable conditions,)) may apply to the department to obtain a veteran designation on a driver's license issued under this section by providing:

(i) A United States department of veterans affairs identification card or proof of service letter;

(ii) A United States department of defense discharge document, DD Form 214 or DD Form 215, as it exists on June 7, 2018, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section, or equivalent or successor discharge paperwork, ((that shows a discharge status of "honorable" or "general under honorable conditions")) that establishes the person's service in the armed forces of the United States and qualifying discharge as defined in section 4 of this act;

(iii) A national guard state-issued report of separation and military service, NGB Form 22, as it exists on June 7, 2018, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section, or equivalent or successor discharge paperwork, ((that shows a discharge status of "honorable" or "general under honorable conditions")) that establishes the person's active duty or reserve service in the national guard and qualifying discharge as defined in section 4 of this act; or

(iv) A United States uniformed services identification card, DD Form 2, that displays on its face that it has been issued to a retired member of any of the armed forces of the United States, including the national guard and armed forces reserves.

(b) The department may permit a veteran, as defined in RCW 41.04.007, ((or an individual who otherwise meets the criteria of RCW 41.04.007 but who has received a general discharge under honorable conditions,)) to submit ((an)) alternate forms of documentation to apply to obtain a veteran designation on a driver's license((, as specified by rule, that requires a discharge status of "honorable" or "general under honorable conditions" and that establishes the person's service as required under RCW 41.04.007)).

(5) Any person may apply to the department to obtain a medical alert designation, a developmental disability designation, or a deafness designation on a driver's license issued under this chapter by providing:

(a) Self-attestation that the individual:

(i) Has a medical condition that could affect communication or account for a driver health emergency;

(ii) Is deaf or hard of hearing; or

(iii) Has a developmental disability as defined in RCW 71A.10.020;

(b) A statement from the person that they have voluntarily provided the self-attestation and other information verifying the condition; and

(c) For persons under eighteen years of age or who have a developmental disability, the signature of a parent or legal guardian.

(6) A self-attestation or data contained in a self-attestation provided under this section:

(a) Shall not be disclosed;

(b) Is for the confidential use of the director, the chief of the Washington state patrol, and law enforcement and emergency medical service providers as designated by law; and

(c) Is subject to the privacy protections of the driver's privacy protection act, 18 U.S.C. Sec. 2725.

Sec. 30. RCW 72.36.030 and 2014 c 184 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

All of the following persons who have been actual bona fide residents of this state at the time of their application may be admitted to a state veterans' home under rules as may be adopted by the director of the department, unless sufficient facilities and resources are not available to accommodate these people:

(1)(a) All ((honorably discharged)) veterans ((of a branch)) of the ((armed forces))uniformed services of the United States or merchant marines who meet the discharge requirements under RCW 41.04.007 or are eligible for medical care provided by the United States department of veterans affairs; (b) members of the state militia disabled while in the line of duty; (c) Filipino World War II veterans who swore an oath to American authority and who participated in military engagements with American soldiers; (d) the spouses or the domestic partners of these veterans, merchant marines, and members of the state militia; and (e) parents any of whose children died while serving in the armed forces. However, it is required that the spouse was married to and living with the veteran, or that the domestic partner was in a domestic partnership and living with the veteran, three years prior to the date of application for admittance, or, if married to or in a domestic partnership with him or her since that date, was also a resident of a state veterans' home in this state or entitled to admission thereto;

(2) The spouses or domestic partners of: (a) All ((honorably discharged)) veterans of the United States ((armed forces))uniformed services with a qualifying discharge as defined in section 4 of this act; (b) merchant marines; and (c) members of the state militia who were disabled while in the line of duty and who were residents of a state veterans' home in this state or were entitled to admission to one of this state's state veteran homes at the time of death. However, the included spouse or included domestic partner shall not have been married since the death of his or her spouse or domestic partner to a person who is not a resident of one of this state's state veterans' homes or entitled to admission to one of this state's state veterans' homes; and

(3) All applicants for admission to a state veterans' home shall apply for all federal and state benefits for which they may be eligible, including medical assistance under chapter 74.09 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31. RCW 73.04.042 (Honorable discharge recorded—Veterans of Spanish-American War and World War I) and 1923 c 17 s 1 & 1919 c 86 s 1 are each repealed.

Sec. 32. RCW 73.08.005 and 2017 c 185 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Direct costs" includes those allowable costs that can be readily assigned to the statutory objectives of this chapter, consistent with the cost principles promulgated by the federal office of management and budget in circular No. A-87, dated May 10, 2004.

(2) "Family" means the spouse or domestic partner, surviving spouse, surviving domestic partner, and dependent children of a living or deceased veteran, or a service member who was killed in the line of duty regardless of the number of days served.

(3) "Indigent" means a person who is defined as such by the county legislative authority using one or more of the following definitions:

(a) Receiving one of the following types of public assistance: Temporary assistance for needy families, aged, blind, or disabled assistance benefits, pregnant women assistance benefits, poverty-related veterans' benefits, food stamps or food stamp benefits transferred electronically, refugee resettlement benefits, medicaid, medical care services, or supplemental security income;

(b) Receiving an annual income, after taxes, of up to one hundred fifty percent or less of the current federally established poverty level, or receiving an annual income not exceeding a higher qualifying income established by the county legislative authority; or

(c) Unable to pay reasonable costs for shelter, food, utilities, and transportation because his or her available funds are insufficient.

(4) "Indirect costs" includes those allowable costs that are generally associated with carrying out the statutory objectives of this chapter, but the identification and tracking of those costs cannot be readily assigned to a specific statutory objective without an accounting effort that is disproportionate to the benefit received. A county legislative authority may allocate allowable indirect costs to its veterans' assistance fund if it is accomplished in a manner consistent with the cost principles promulgated by the federal office of management and budget in circular No. A-87, dated May 10, 2004.

(5)(a) "Veteran" means:

(i) A person who served in the active military, naval, or air service; a member of the women's air forces service pilots during World War II; a United States documented merchant mariner with service aboard an oceangoing vessel operated by the war shipping administration; the office of defense transportation, or their agents, from December 7, 1941, through December 31, 1946; or a civil service crewmember with service aboard a United States army transport service or United States naval transportation service vessel in oceangoing service from December 7, 1941, through December 31, 1946, who meets one of the following criteria:

(A) Served on active duty for at least one hundred eighty days and who was released with ((an honorable discharge))a qualifying discharge as defined in section 4 of this act;

(B) Received ((an honorable or general under honorable characterization of service))a qualifying discharge as defined in section 4 of this act with a medical reason for separation for a condition listed as non-existed prior to service, regardless of number of days served; or

(C) Received ((an honorable discharge))a qualifying discharge as defined in section 4 of this act and has received a rating for a service connected disability from the United States department of veterans affairs regardless of number of days served;

(ii) A current member honorably serving in the armed forces reserve or national guard who has been activated by presidential call up for purposes other than training;

(iii) A former member of the armed forces reserve or national guard who has fulfilled his or her initial military service obligation and was released with ((an honorable discharge))a qualifying discharge as defined in section 4 of this act;

(iv) A former member of the armed forces reserve or national guard who does not have over one hundred seventy-nine days of active duty service, but meets the federal definition of a veteran having completed twenty years of service.

(b) At the discretion of the county legislative authority and in consultation with the veterans' advisory board, counties may expand eligibility for the veterans assistance fund as the county determines necessary, which may include serving veterans with additional discharge characterizations.

(6) "Veterans' advisory board" means a board established by a county legislative authority under the authority of RCW 73.08.035.

(7) "Veterans' assistance fund" means an account in the custody of the county auditor, or the chief financial officer in a county operating under a charter, that is funded by taxes levied under the authority of RCW 73.08.080.

(8) "Veterans' assistance program" means a program approved by the county legislative authority under the authority of RCW 73.08.010 that is fully or partially funded by the veterans' assistance fund authorized by RCW 73.08.080.

Sec. 33. RCW 73.16.010 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 198 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In every public department, and upon all public works of the state, and of any county thereof, ((honorably discharged)) soldiers, sailors, ((and))guardians, marines and other members of the uniformed services who are veterans of any war of the United States, or of any military campaign for which a campaign ribbon shall have been awarded with a qualifying discharge as defined in section 4 of this act, and their widows or widowers, shall be preferred for appointment and employment. Age, loss of limb, or other physical impairment, which does not in fact incapacitate, shall not be deemed to disqualify them, provided they possess the capacity necessary to discharge the duties of the position involved: PROVIDED, That spouses of ((honorably discharged)) veterans with a qualifying discharge as defined in section 4 of this act and who have a service connected permanent and total disability shall also be preferred for appointment and employment.

Sec. 34. RCW 73.16.120 and 2015 c 57 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of veterans affairs, employment security department, and department of commerce shall consult local chambers of commerce, associate development organizations, and businesses to initiate a demonstration campaign to increase veteran employment. This campaign may include partnerships with chambers of commerce that result in business owners sharing, with the local chamber of commerce, information on the number of veterans employed and the local chambers of commerce providing this information to the department of veterans affairs.

(2) Participants in the campaign are encouraged to work with the Washington state military transition council and county veterans' advisory boards as defined in RCW 73.08.035.

(3) Funding for the campaign shall be established from existing resources.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "veteran" ((means any veteran discharged under honorable conditions))has the definition given in RCW 41.04.007.

Sec. 35. RCW 77.32.480 and 2016 c 78 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon written application, a combination fishing license shall be issued at the reduced rate of five dollars and all hunting licenses shall be issued at the reduced rate of a youth hunting license fee for the following individuals:

(a) A resident sixty-five years old or older who ((is an honorably discharged veteran of))has a qualifying discharge, as defined in section 4 of this act, from the United States armed forces ((having))and has a service-connected disability;

(b) A resident who ((is an honorably discharged veteran of))has a qualifying discharge, as defined in section 4 of this act, from the United States armed forces ((with))and has a thirty percent or more service-connected disability;

(c) A resident with a disability who permanently uses a wheelchair;

(d) A resident who is blind or visually impaired; and

(e) A resident with a developmental disability as defined in RCW 71A.10.020 with documentation of the disability certified by a physician licensed to practice in this state.

(2) Upon department verification of eligibility, a nonstate resident veteran with a disability who otherwise satisfies the criteria of subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section must be issued a combination fishing license or any hunting license at the same cost charged to a nondisabled Washington resident for the same license.

(3) Upon written application and department verification, the following recreational hunting licenses must be issued at no cost to a resident member of the state guard or national guard, as defined in RCW 38.04.010, as long as the state guard or national guard member is: An active full-time state guard or national guard employee; or a state guard or national guard member whose status requires the state guard or national guard member to participate in drill training on a part-time basis:

(a) A small game hunting license under RCW 77.32.460(1);

(b) A supplemental migratory bird permit under RCW 77.32.350; and

(c) A big game hunting license under RCW 77.32.450 (1) and (2).

Sec. 36. RCW 84.39.020 and 2020 c 139 s 54 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each claimant applying for assistance under RCW 84.39.010 must file a claim with the department, on forms prescribed by the department, no later than thirty days before the tax is due. The department may waive this requirement for good cause shown. The department must supply forms to the county assessor to allow persons to apply for the program at the county assessor's office.

(2) The claim must designate the property to which the assistance applies and must include a statement setting forth (a) a list of all members of the claimant's household, (b) facts establishing the eligibility under this section, and (c) any other relevant information required by the rules of the department. The claim must be signed by the claimant subject to the penalties as provided in chapter 9A.72 RCW for false swearing. The first claim must include proof of the claimant's age acceptable to the department.

(3) The following documentation must be filed with a claim along with any other documentation required by the department:

(a) The deceased veteran's DD 214 report of separation, or its equivalent, that must ((be under honorable conditions))show qualification as a veteran under RCW 41.04.005. If the deceased veteran had an other than honorable characterization of service, the following is also required: (i) Proof that the decedent was, at any point, eligible for or received federal department of veterans affairs monetary benefits; or (ii) proof that the decedent's survivor is eligible for or has received federal department of veterans affairs monetary survivor benefits;

(b) A copy of the applicant's certificate of marriage to the deceased;

(c) A copy of the deceased veteran's death certificate; and

(d) A letter from the United States veterans' administration certifying that the death of the veteran meets the requirements of RCW 84.39.010(2).

(4) The department of veterans affairs must assist an eligible widow or widower in the preparation and submission of an application and the procurement of necessary substantiating documentation.

(5) The department must determine if each claimant is eligible each year. Any applicant aggrieved by the department's denial of assistance may petition the state board of tax appeals to review the denial and the board must consider any appeals to determine (a) if the claimant is entitled to assistance and (b) the amount or portion thereof.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 37. The provisions of RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 38. Sections 25 through 27 of this act take effect April 1, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 39. Section 24 of this act expires April 1, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 40. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2024, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.

--- END ---