BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28B.12.030 and 2019 c 406 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Eligible institution" means any postsecondary institution in this state accredited by the Northwest Association of Schools and Colleges, or a campus of a member institution of an accrediting association recognized by rule of the student achievement council for purposes of this section, that is eligible for federal student financial aid assistance and has operated as a nonprofit college or university delivering on-site classroom instruction for a minimum of twenty consecutive years within the state of Washington, or any public technical college in the state.

(2) "Financial need" has the same meaning as in RCW 28B.92.030.

(3) "Office" means the office of student financial assistance.

Sec. 2. RCW 28B.12.040 and 2012 c 229 s 520 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((student achievement council))office shall develop and administer the state work-study program. The ((council shall be authorized to))office may create and enter into agreements with employers and eligible institutions ((for the operation of the program. These agreements shall include such provisions as the council may deem necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

With the exception of off-campus community service placements, the share from moneys disbursed under the state work-study program of the compensation of students employed under such program in accordance with such agreements shall not exceed eighty percent of the total such compensation paid such students.

By rule, the council shall define community service placements and may determine any salary matching requirements for any community service employers))to implement this chapter.

Sec. 3. RCW 28B.12.050 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 144 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The office ((of student financial assistance)) shall disburse state work-study funds. In performing its duties under this section, the office shall consult eligible institutions and postsecondary education advisory and governing bodies. The office shall establish criteria designed to achieve such distribution of assistance under this chapter among students attending eligible institutions as will most effectively carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(2) Funds appropriated for compensation of students placed at state work-study employers must not exceed 80 percent of the total compensation paid to students, subject to the following exceptions:

(a) Off-campus community service placements; and

(b) Placements at public and nonprofit employers that seek to increase postsecondary enrollment for high school students.

(3) The office shall define and approve, and may determine salary matching requirements for, community service placements and placements at public and nonprofit employers that seek to increase postsecondary enrollment for high school students.

--- END ---