BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 49.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The rules adopted under this chapter must allow a sixteen- or seventeen-year old minor to work the same number and frequency of hours during the school year as would be permitted during school vacations or holidays if:

(a) The minor is enrolled in a bona fide college program; or

(b) The minor is enrolled in a career and technical education program and the work is performed for an employer approved by the program.

(2) For purposes of this section, "career and technical education program" refers to a work-based learning program approved by the office of the superintendent of public instruction or the minor's school district, including but not limited to core plus programs.

--- END ---