BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 82.38 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department of agriculture shall produce a sticker for display on each motor fuel pump from which fuel is sold at retail that displays and provides notice of the federal and state fuel tax rates. The sticker must display the rate of each tax, in cents per gallon, for each type of fuel.

(2) The department of agriculture shall provide notice of federal and state fuel tax rates, in the form of a fuel tax sticker, to be displayed on motor fuel pumps.

(3)(a) The department of agriculture shall provide notice of the cost of compliance of the climate commitment act on the price of motor vehicle fuel in the form of a sticker to be displayed on motor fuel pumps that states "Cost of compliance with the CCA as of [insert date] was [insert calculated amount of cents per gallon from (b) of this subsection]." The date is to reflect the annual average amount based on auctions held by the department of ecology.

(b) The department of agriculture must calculate the cost of compliance of the climate commitment act as follows:

(i) For gasoline, calculate the annual average by using the sum of the price of allowances sold during the year divided by the number of allowances sold to represent the price per metric ton. Multiply that amount by 0.008887. Next, multiply the resulting amount by 0.9 and it will provide the cents per gallon.

(ii) For diesel, calculate the annual average by using the sum of the price of the allowances sold during the year divided by the number of allowances sold to represent the price per metric ton. Multiply that amount by 0.010180. Next, multiply the resulting amount by 0.95 and it will provide the cents per gallon.

(c) The department of agriculture shall produce an updated climate commitment compliance cost sticker at least once every three years.

(4) The department of agriculture shall distribute fuel tax and climate commitment compliance cost stickers to all individuals who conduct fuel pump inspections, including department employees and local government employees. Government employees who conduct fuel pump inspections shall display a fuel tax sticker and climate commitment compliance cost sticker on each motor fuel pump or shall verify that such a sticker is being displayed at the time of inspection as required under this subsection. These stickers must:

(a) Be displayed on each face of the motor fuel pump on which the price of the fuel sold from the pump is displayed; and

(b) Be displayed in a clear, conspicuous, and prominent manner.

(5) The department of agriculture shall provide fuel tax stickers and climate commitment compliance cost stickers by mail to fuel pump owners who request them for the face of each motor fuel pump for which a sticker is requested.

(6) The department of agriculture shall produce updated fuel tax stickers on an annual basis when one or more fuel tax rates have changed. Fuel tax stickers must be replaced at the time of motor fuel pump inspection if the sticker has been updated with any new fuel tax rates. Climate commitment compliance cost stickers should be updated to have the most recent sticker available.

--- END ---