BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1) There is a license designated as an establishment private club license, to be issued to a person or business for a premises at which a business that is open to the general public and does not sell or advertise liquor is located. Subject to the requirements in this section, an establishment private club license authorizes the consumption of liquor by members of a private club in a restricted area of the premises that is separate from the areas to which the general public has access.

(2) The following requirements apply to licensees and to alcohol consumption authorized under this section:

(a) No liquor may be sold or provided:

(i) By the licensee to the general public or to members of the private club; or

(ii) By the private club or members of the private club to the general public;

(b) Only members of the private club may consume liquor on the premises and only when in a restricted area of the premises that is not accessible to or advertised to the general public; and

(c) Liquor consumed on the premises by a member of the private club must not be provided by the licensee.

(3) The annual fee for the establishment private club license is $125.

--- END ---