BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70.83.020 and 2014 c 18 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It shall be the duty of the department of health to require screening tests of all newborn infants born in any setting. Each hospital or health care provider attending a birth outside of a hospital shall collect and submit a sample blood specimen for all newborns no more than ((forty-eight))48 hours following birth. The department of health shall conduct screening tests of samples for the detection of phenylketonuria and other heritable or metabolic disorders leading to intellectual disabilities or physical defects as defined by the state board of health: PROVIDED, That no such tests shall be given to any newborn infant whose parents or guardian object thereto on the grounds that such tests conflict with their religious tenets and practices.

(2) The sample required in subsection (1) of this section must be received by the department (([of health]))of health within ((seventy-two))72 hours of the collection of the sample, excluding any day that the Washington state public health laboratory is closed.

(3)(a) The department of health may conduct screening tests of the sample required in subsection (1) of this section for congenital cytomegalovirus if the department has obtained informed consent from the parents or guardians of the newborn infant for this optional testing. This testing may only occur after all tests required by the department in rule are complete.

(b) The department shall design, prepare, and make available written material to inform health care providers and parents or guardians of newborn infants about the nature and consequences of congenital cytomegalovirus.

--- END ---