BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that supporting and preparing incarcerated persons to successfully reenter the community is critical to recognizing the dignity of all incarcerated persons, while also reducing recidivism and expanding the state's trained and skilled workforce. To that end, the legislature intends to improve the quality and availability of construction-related training programs in state correctional facilities in order to strengthen pathways for incarcerated persons to advance from those programs to state registered apprenticeship programs upon reentering the community. These improvements will expand access to living wage jobs for formerly incarcerated persons, increase the construction workforce, and support federal and state investments in transportation infrastructure and clean energy. Therefore, the legislature hereby directs the office of the corrections ombuds to convene an oversight committee for the purpose of facilitating critical changes to state correctional programming. The oversight committee will evaluate, strengthen, and expand construction-related training programs, with a focus on state recognized apprenticeship preparation programs, and transition planning with the goal of improving pathways to the enrollment of formerly incarcerated persons in state registered apprenticeship programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.06C RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the ombuds shall convene an oversight committee for the purposes of expanding access to construction-related training programs in state correctional facilities, with a focus on state recognized apprenticeship preparation programs, and strengthening pathways for incarcerated persons to advance from those programs to state registered apprenticeship programs upon reentering the community. The ombuds may enter into contracts for services as may be necessary to comply with the requirements of this section.

(2)(a) The ombuds shall appoint members of the oversight committee, including representatives of the following:

(i) The department, including staff involved with construction-related training programs and reentry planning, and community corrections officers;

(ii) Correctional industries;

(iii) The apprenticeship division of the department of labor and industries;

(iv) The state board for community and technical colleges, including representatives from the basic education division and student support programs;

(v) The Washington state building and construction trades council;

(vi) Registered apprenticeship programs in the construction trades, and providers of apprenticeship preparation programs;

(vii) College corrections navigators and apprenticeship navigators;

(viii) The juvenile rehabilitation division and community services office of the department of children, youth, and families;

(ix) The ombuds;

(x) The Washington statewide reentry council; and

(xi) Other agencies, boards, or entities that the ombuds has identified as having a significant interest in the work of the oversight committee.

(b) The ombuds shall also appoint two persons with lived experience to serve as members of the oversight committee.

(c) Except as provided under RCW 43.03.220, the members of the oversight committee must serve without compensation, but are entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(3) The oversight committee shall:

(a) Develop, maintain, and publish an inventory of all construction-related training programs in correctional facilities including, but not limited to, the following information for each program:

(i) Location, capacity, criteria for admission, and current enrollment;

(ii) State recognized apprenticeship preparation status or viability;

(iii) Any related partnership with a state registered apprenticeship program;

(iv) The type of trade and if it is multicraft or single craft curriculum; and

(v) The entity funding the instruction, consumables, equipment, and facilities;

(b) Collect, maintain, and publish information and data on construction-related training programs for the previous four calendar years, including the following for each program:

(i) Numbers served, number of participants completing the program, and relevant demographics of participants;

(ii) Length of time between program completion and release from incarceration; and

(iii) Postrelease outcomes, including employment status, apprenticeship status, and recidivism rate, when such outcome data is available;

(c) Assess the following:

(i) The viability or progress of transitioning current construction-related training programs to meet state recognized apprenticeship preparation requirements;

(ii) The viability or progress of transitioning the curriculum for construction-related apprenticeship preparation programs to cover multiple construction crafts;

(iii) Any unmet support needed by construction-related training programs for instruction, including consumables and equipment, among other needs;

(iv) The viability or progress of implementing new state recognized apprenticeship preparation programs in correctional facilities; and

(v) Practices for conducting transitional planning and support for participants who complete construction-related training programs, including: Preenrollment into support services prior to release; inclusion of state registered apprenticeship program staff in the incarcerated persons' community reentry planning; and access to behavioral health services prior to transition; and

(d) Identify areas of concern and also make recommendations for appropriate and necessary changes to policies and practices to the department, state board for community and technical colleges, department of labor and industries, state registered apprenticeship programs, and other appropriate entities.

(4) The oversight committee shall submit a report to the legislature by October 1, 2025, with initial findings and recommendations for expanding access to construction-related state recognized apprenticeship preparation programs in state correctional facilities, and strengthening pathways for incarcerated persons to advance from those programs to state registered apprenticeship programs upon reentering the community. By October 1, 2026, and by October 1st of each even-numbered year thereafter, the oversight committee shall submit a report to the legislature summarizing its work from the last two-year period and providing any relevant findings and recommendations. The ombuds shall publish on its website on an ongoing basis information designed to improve access to and outcomes of programs, based on input and guidance provided by the oversight committee.

(5)(a) Beginning on the effective date of this section, the department shall collect data on the employment outcomes of incarcerated persons reentering the community after having participated in a construction-related training program in a correctional facility, including whether those persons participated in and completed any state registered apprenticeship programs. The department, in consultation with the oversight committee and relevant state agencies, shall make efforts to track and collect data on employment outcomes for at least three years following a person's release from a state correctional facility. Upon request, the department shall report any data collected under this subsection to the oversight committee and the ombuds.

(b) By December 1, 2026, and by December 1st of each even-numbered year thereafter, the department of corrections shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature including the following information from the last two-year period: (i) the status of implementing any changes recommended by the oversight committee; (ii) the reasoning for not implementing any changes recommended by the oversight committee; and (iii) a summary of funding expended on construction-related training programs identified by the oversight committee, and a summary of any additional funding needed to support those programs.

(6) For the purpose of supporting the work of the oversight committee, the ombuds may consider relevant aspects of its work and communications, including any personally identifiable information of incarcerated persons, to constitute an investigation, subject to the confidentiality protections under RCW 43.06C.060. Oversight committee members shall maintain the confidentiality of any such records and information so identified by the ombuds. This subsection does not prohibit the oversight committee from publishing aggregate data or other information collected under subsection (3) of this section, provided that such data or information does not contain personally identifiable information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2024, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.

--- END ---