BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A supplemental capital budget is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the several dollar amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2025, out of the several funds specified in this act.

PART 1

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR

OCO Tenant Improvements (30000001)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$350,000

Sec. 1002. 2023 c 474 s 1013 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Broadband Infrastructure Federal Match Projects (40000290)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) (($50,000,000))$61,390,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely as match for federal authority allocated under this section and section 7017 of this act for the statewide broadband office to administer the broadband equity, access, and deployment state grants program in section 60102 of P.L. 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act). Expenditure of the amount in this subsection is contingent on the receipt of this grant funding.

(b) To the extent permitted by federal law, the office shall provide state match only for projects where the lead applicant is a public or tribal government entity. The office must allocate state match funds in a manner that prioritizes projects based on affordability, fair labor practices, speed to deployment, open access, local and tribal coordination, and the provision of digital navigation services, as outlined in the scoring criteria contained in the plan submitted by the office to the national telecommunications and information administration.

(c) The legislature intends to provide sufficient funds to match federal funds available during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.

(2) In addition to scoring and weighting criteria established pursuant to the federal broadband equity, access, and deployment program, the state broadband office must establish additional secondary selection criteria, including, but not limited to, criteria that give weight to projects that:

(a) Provide open-access wholesale last-mile broadband service for the useful life of the subsidized networks on fair, equal, and neutral terms to all potential retail providers; and

(b) Demonstrate support from the local government or any tribal government with oversight over the location or locations to be served.

(3) The statewide broadband office must include, in the five-year action plan developed using initial planning funds from the broadband equity, access, and deployment program funded under P.L. 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act):

(a) Consideration of broadband infrastructure projects that use wireless technology in order to expand access at the lowest cost to the most unserved or underserved residents; and

(b) Steps the office will take to promote: The use of existing infrastructure; dig-once policies; streamlined permitting processes; and cost-effective access to poles, conduits, easements, and rights-of-way. To the extent permitted under federal law, the office must consider creating a pool of grant funds dedicated to pole costs.

(4) $300,000 of the general fund—federal appropriation provided in this section is for a staff position dedicated to advising the statewide broadband office on the availability and feasibility of deploying new and emerging technologies in broadband internet service.
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
(($150,000,000))

$245,560,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($50,000,000))

$61,390,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($200,000,000))

$306,950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($150,000,000))

$1,227,742,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($350,000,000))

$1,534,692,000

Sec. 1003. 2023 c 474 s 1016 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Capital Pre-Development Funding (40000293)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Of the amounts provided in this section, $2,800,000 is provided solely for the LETI Incubator for Family Success project in Everett.
Appropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,000,000

Sec. 1004. 2023 c 474 s 1017 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Clean Energy Fund Program (40000294)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to convene a work group to:

(i) Analyze the financial investments required for owners of tier 1 covered buildings to comply with the state energy performance standard under RCW 19.27A.210; and

(ii) Make recommendations to the legislature to assist building owners in attaining compliance, which must include, but are not limited to:

(A) Identifying energy efficiency investments or other strategies and related timelines for increasing energy efficiency in the buildings sector;

(B) Providing a cost-benefit analysis of options, including energy efficiency, to meet the goal of reducing greenhouse gas emissions from the buildings sector; and

(C) Recommendations to balance financial investments while maximizing clean energy benefits for the state, including statutory changes that may be necessary for this purpose.

(b) The work group membership convened under this section must include, but is not limited to: One representative of the office of the superintendent of public instruction; one representative of a K-12 maintenance and operation administrators association; one representative of each of the state's public four-year institutions of higher education; one representative of the state board for community and technical colleges; one representative of the department of social and health services; one representative of the department of corrections; one representative of the department of enterprise services; one representative of a health care organization; one representative from a local government; one representative from an organization representing privately owned tier 1 covered buildings; one representative from a business specializing in performance contracting for energy services; one representative from a nonprofit specializing in clean energy; and two representatives of a national association for industrial and office parks.

(c) The department must submit to the appropriate committees of the legislature:

(i) Analysis of financial investments as required by this section by December 15, 2023; and

(ii) A final report with recommendations as required by this section by September 1, 2024.

(2) Except as provided in subsections (1) ((and)), (13), and (14) of this section, the appropriation in this section is provided solely for competitive grants to eligible entities for predevelopment, design, and construction of projects that provide a public benefit through research, development, demonstration, or deployment of clean energy technologies that save energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions, or increase energy independence for the state. Priority must be given to projects that benefit vulnerable populations and overburdened communities, including tribes.

(3) Entities eligible for grant funding under this section include local governments, federally recognized tribal governments and tribes' contracted service providers, public and private utilities that serve retail customers in the state, for-profit entities, research institutions, nonprofit organizations, and state agencies.

(4) To be eligible, a project must be consistent with the state energy strategy adopted under chapter 43.21F RCW and policies under chapter 19.405 RCW. To the extent practicable, the department must prioritize projects that build upon Washington's strengths in aerospace, maritime, information and communications technology, grid modernization, advanced materials, and decarbonizing the built environment.

(5) The department must invite stakeholders to participate in the design and implementation of grant programs funded under this section. The department must consider equity and environmental justice when developing the program structure and opportunities for applicant participation.

(6) When soliciting and evaluating proposals, awarding contracts, and monitoring projects under this section, the department must:

(a) Ensure that competitive processes, rather than sole source contracting processes, are used to select all projects, except as otherwise noted in this section;

(b) Ensure that a public benefit results from the use of public funds through due diligence and monitoring of contracted projects, including ensuring compliance with all applicable laws related to the project selection process, project monitoring, and contracting; and

(c) Prioritize projects for funding that leverage the greatest amount of matching funds, such as local levy funding.

(7)(a) The department must require project applicants to:

(i) Disclose all sources of public funding invested in a project; and

(ii) Identify by name any former or current state of Washington employees employed by the applicant or its governing body in the 24 months preceding the application submittal. The identification must include the person's separation date and job title or position held. If the department determines that a conflict of interest or other violation of chapter 42.52 RCW exists, the application must be disqualified from further consideration.

(b) If, after a grant has been awarded, the department finds that a grantee has violated chapter 42.52 RCW, either in procuring or performing under the grant, the department in its sole discretion may terminate the grant funding by written notice. If the grant is terminated, the department must reserve its right to pursue all available remedies under law to address the violation.

(8) The department must specify the requirements in subsections (6) and (7) of this section in funding contracts entered into by the department under this section.

(9) $10,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to tribes for clean energy development projects. Eligible uses of grant funding include planning, predesign, design, construction, project predevelopment, and deployment of clean energy projects that contribute to achieving the state's greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals and related policies. The department must collaborate with tribes in the design and development of this grant program.

(10) $10,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for state match for federal funding that aligns with subsection (2) of this section and accelerates meeting state clean energy and climate goals. Funding may be used to match federal grants to the state or nonstate entities for clean energy research, development, and demonstration projects.

(11) $12,000,000 of the appropriation in the section is provided solely for grants for strategic research, development, and demonstration of new and emerging clean energy generation and storage technologies and climate change mitigation technologies, including greenhouse gas removal. Grants awarded under this subsection must reduce reliance on fossil fuels, reduce risk of irregularities in power supply, offer opportunities for economic and job growth, and strengthen technology supply chains. Grant funds are intended to catalyze diverse new technologies that change production, use, storage, and transportation of energy. The department may provide funding to projects at various stages of readiness, including early-stage research, pilot and demonstration projects, and dual use projects that produce clean energy and additional benefits.

(12) $20,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants for electrical grid integration and innovation projects. To be eligible, a project must develop and demonstrate distributed energy resources, as defined in RCW 19.405.020, and nonwire alternatives that advance community resilience, support implementation of demand response and sustainable microgrids, improve integration of renewable energy and energy storage, and accelerate beneficial load integration and demand management for building electrification, equipment electrification, and electric vehicle charging.

(13) $7,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely to support regional energy analytics capability at Pacific Northwest national laboratory.

(14) $500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Nooksack Indian tribe to enter into an agreement with a third-party contractor to complete a prefeasibility study of geothermal power generation options in Whatcom county. Power generation options considered must include, at a minimum: Hydro-thermal, enhanced geothermal, and high enthalpy enhanced geothermal. The tribe must select the contractor in consultation with the public utility district No. 1. of Whatcom county. The tribe must submit the completed study to the department by June 15, 2025.

(15) The department must strive to allocate all of the amounts appropriated in this section within the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium in the manner prescribed in each subsection. However, no sooner than January 1, 2024, if upon review of applications the department determines there are not adequate suitable projects in a category, the department may reallocate funding among the purposes of subsections (9) through (12) of this section. Beginning January 1, 2024, the department must provide quarterly notice of any funding reallocations to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature.

(16)(a) This section takes effect January 1, 2025.

(b) If the climate commitment account is repealed as of December 30, 2024, then this section is null and void on December 31, 2024.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
(($60,000,000))

$60,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$240,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($300,000,000))

$300,500,000

Sec. 1005. 2023 c 474 s 1032 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Defense Community Compatibility Projects (40000572)

The appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations: ((The))

(1) $33,950,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

City of Lakewood, McChord North Clear Zone

(Lakewood). . . .$900,000

Compatible Lands Foundation, Fairchild REPI

Easement Acquisition (Spokane). . . .$2,500,000

Crescent Elementary (Oak Harbor). . . .$13,600,000

((Lakewood Water District, Water Well (K-3, G-4)

(Lakewood). . . .$1,860,000))

Oak Harbor Early Learning Center (Oak Harbor). . . .$13,900,000

Quincy Square Civic Improvements (Bremerton). . . .$1,750,000

Whidbey Camano Land Trust, Keystone Preserve

(Greenbank). . . .$1,300,000

(2) $3,720,000 of the model toxics control capital account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for Lakewood Water District, Water Well (K-3, G-4)(Lakewood). . . .$3,720,000
Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$3,720,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($35,810,000))

$33,950,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$37,670,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($48,800,000))

$56,240,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($84,610,000))

$93,910,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1006. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Crisis Stabilization Facility-Trueblood Phase 3 (40000601)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$5,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1007. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Communities of Concern (40000603)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department shall not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards under chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only and may not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department shall include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The department must comply with the requirements set forth in executive order 21-02 and must consult with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes on the potential effects of these projects on cultural resources and historic properties. Consultation with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes must be initiated before project funds are made available.

(8) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Addis Village (Seattle) . . . .$795,000

FHPM Childcare Project (Bremerton). . . .$200,000

FHPM Kitsap Way Village (Bremerton). . . .$200,000

Monterey Lofts Renovation - Phase 2 (Seattle). . . .$987,000

Nuwe Reis Village at Barker Creek (Bremerton). . . .$2,900,000

Seattle Indian Services Commission (Seattle). . . .$300,000

Seattle Tibetan Community Center (Seattle). . . .$432,000
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,814,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$23,256,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$29,070,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1008. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Green Jobs and Infrastructure Grants (40000604)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to eligible entities that help mitigate and reverse the effects of climate change, help communities meet their energy and climate change regulatory requirements, bring increased federal and private investment to the state, help develop the advanced workforce of the future, and ensure Washington state maintains or grows its position as a world leader in developing the projects and processes that are used to fight climate change globally. Eligible activities under this section include, but are not limited to, planning predevelopment, design, engineering, and construction of clean technology projects.

(2) Entities eligible for grants under this section include, but are not limited to, local governments, federally recognized tribal governments and tribes' contracted service providers, public and private utilities, ports, associate development organizations, for-profit entities, academic and research institutions, nonprofit organizations, and state agencies.

(3) Projects eligible for funding must be physically located in Washington state. Eligible projects must be consistent with the state energy strategy adopted under chapter 43.21F RCW and clean energy policies under chapter 19.405 RCW. Projects must further the goals of the climate commitment act as described in RCW 70A.65.260(1)(j).

(4) The department must consider equity and environmental justice when developing the program structures and opportunities for applicant participation and must follow principles established in its community engagement plan adopted under RCW 70A.02.050.

(5) Except for match funds allocated in subsection (7) of this section, when soliciting and evaluating grant application proposals, awarding contracts, and monitoring projects under this section, the department must:

(a) Use competitive processes to select all projects, except as otherwise noted in this section. The department must design a competitive process to allow provision of grant award to projects in a timely manner and consistent with the project timeline. Applications must be accepted on a rolling basis, and final determination must be made by the department;

(b) Ensure compliance with all applicable laws related to the project selection process, project monitoring, and contracting; and

(c) Prioritize projects that leverage the greatest amount of matching funds, such as local levy funding or private investment in advanced manufacturing capability.

(6) Project applicants must disclose all sources of public funding invested in a project. Grant contracts must provide that if, after a grant has been awarded, the department finds that a grantee has violated chapter 42.52 RCW, either in procuring or performing under the grant, the department in its sole discretion may terminate the grant funding by written notice, and that, if the grant is terminated, the department will reserve its right to pursue all available remedies under law to address the violation.

(7) $26,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to be used as state match for competitive federal funding and for formula grants that require state match. To the extent practicable, the department shall prioritize grants that provide benefit to vulnerable populations in overburdened communities, with a goal of directing at least 20 percent of funds to this purpose.

(8) $20,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to projects that demonstrate high-wage, clean job creation in Washington, provide risk reduction for investments in public and private infrastructure in order to increase a community's capacity for clean manufacturing, or provide investments in workforce development to attract and train the workforce required to grow the clean energy economy.

(9) $2,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to support access to and to flexibly administer the program. The department may use these funds to hire full-time equivalent positions within the department, as well as contract for additional capacity and subject matter expertise.

(10) The department must strive to allocate all of the amounts appropriated in subsections (7) and (8) of this section within the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium in the manner prescribed in each subsection. However, no sooner than January 1, 2025, if upon review of applications the department determines there are not adequate suitable projects in a category, the department may reallocate funding among the purposes of subsections (7) and (8) of this section. Beginning January 1, 2025, the department must provide quarterly notice of any funding reallocations to the governor and appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature.

(11) $2,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Myno carbon removal facility.

(12)(a) Subsections (1) through (10) of this section take effect January 1, 2025.

(b) If the climate commitment account is repealed as of December 30, 2024, then subsections (1) through (10) of this section are null and void on December 31, 2024, and the amounts provided for subsections (1) through (10) of this section shall lapse.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$51,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$196,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$247,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1009. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Energy Community Grants (40000606)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $42,388,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to administer noncompetitive grants to nonprofit organizations, local governments, federally recognized tribal governments and tribal entities, state agencies, housing authorities, ports, transit agencies, research organizations, and eligible third-party administrators for planning, design, and implementation of capital projects and clean energy technologies that reduce greenhouse gas emissions in vulnerable, overburdened, and tribal communities identified by the department. The department must prioritize grants providing meaningful benefit to vulnerable populations in overburdened communities as defined under RCW 70A.02.010.

(b) Eligible uses of grant funds include, but are not limited to, planning for sustainable communities and predesign work, energy efficiency improvements, renewable energy generation, increasing the supply of affordable, energy efficient housing, developing resilient and sustainable infrastructure systems, zero-emission, active mobility, and micromobility transportation infrastructure, education and engagement, and workforce development.

(2) $7,612,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for Lummi Indian business council clean energy projects.

(3) Up to three percent of the appropriation in this section is for the department to administer the grant program. Administration includes, but is not limited to, identifying eligible communities and third-party administrators, providing technical assistance, managing contracts, reporting, and providing planning and implementation assistance.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "eligible third-party administrators" means entities that have sufficient expertise and relationships within the identified community to help plan for, design, or implement capital projects that reduce greenhouse gases or develop clean energy resources for the community.

(5)(a) This section takes effect January 1, 2025.

(b) If the climate commitment account is repealed as of December 30, 2024, then this section is null and void on December 31, 2024.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$50,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$200,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$250,000,000

Sec. 1010. 2023 c 474 s 1011 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Pacific Tower Capital Improvements (40000287)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($6,464,000))

$6,587,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$6,061,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($12,525,000))

$12,648,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1011. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2025 Local and Community Project (40000614)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department shall not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards under chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only and may not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department shall include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The department must comply with the requirements set forth in executive order 21-02 and must consult with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes on the potential effects of these projects on cultural resources and historic properties. Consultation with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes must be initiated before project funds are made available.

(8) The state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

2026 FIFA World Cup. . . .$11,100,000

23rd & Cherry Fellowship Hall Renovation

Pre-development. . . .$110,000

Abu Bakr Youth Center Renovation. . . .$350,000

Alatheia Capacity Building Capital Project. . . .$150,000

APE52 Wheelchair Lift. . . .$10,000

Bainbridge Island Senior/Community Center. . . .$100,000

Battle Ground Senior Center. . . .$309,000

BIPOC Farm Fresh HUB. . . .$103,000

Buckley Foothills Trailhead Doc Tait Pavilion. . . .$52,000

California Creek Estuary Park Expansion. . . .$185,000

Charter Park Master Plan Bathroom. . . .$52,000

Chelan County Hazard Mitigation. . . .$98,000

City of Bonney Lake ADA Accessible Playground. . . .$151,000

CLC Childcare Fire Alarm System. . . .$77,000

Coastal CAP Fire Remodel. . . .$515,000

Columbia Basin Rodeo Association Bleachers. . . .$258,000

Connections Mental Health. . . .$44,000

Council for the Homeless Building Rehabilitation. . . .$200,000

Coupeville Boys and Girls Club Pathway. . . .$36,000

Crosby Community Center Restoration. . . .$412,000

District Distributed Antenna System Installation. . . .$258,000

Douglas Building HVAC Replacement. . . .$110,000

Downtown Camas Lighting Transformation Project. . . .$300,000

Emergency Communications Radio Microwave. . . .$235,000

Everett Labor Temple Roof. . . .$500,000

FACYV and APIC Building. . . .$103,000

Fire Station Restoration. . . .$314,000

Florence Robison North Park Equipment Replacement. . . .$173,000

Foss Waterway Seaport Esplanade Connector. . . .$100,000

GCA Dignity Completion. . . .$112,000

Glenwood Little League Facility Improvements. . . .$50,000

Goldsborough Switching Station. . . .$52,000

Goodwill Land Acquisition for Redevelopment. . . .$3,000,000

Granger Community Electric Sign. . . .$31,000

Granite Falls Boys & Girls Club. . . .$103,000

Idylwood Beach Park Accessibility Improvements. . . .$35,000

Inclusive Playground at Cirque Park. . . .$258,000

Kalama Community Building Architectural Survey. . . .$62,000

Kelso Rotary Park. . . .$72,000

KidsQuest Children's Museum Stories of Water. . . .$350,000

Kirkland BGC Upgrades and Expansion. . . .$128,000

KVH Surgical Services Clinic Remodel. . . .$100,000

Lakebay Marina Renovation and Historic Preservation. . . .$206,000

Latah Valley Fire Station. . . .$350,000

Latah Water System Rehabilitation Project. . . .$187,000

Lincoln Creek Grange #407. . . .$81,000

Lynnwood Convention Center Expansion. . . .$400,000

Manson Grange Hall Improvement Project. . . .$23,000

Municipal Services Campus Design & Infrastructure. . . .$103,000

Murakami Building. . . .$100,000

Nespelem Community Park. . . .$52,000

Next Chapter Maroon Village. . . .$315,000

North Mason Food Bank Relocation. . . .$47,000

NWYS PAD Shelter Whatcom County. . . .$250,000

Oak Harbor Recreation Center Feasibility Study. . . .$200,000

Ohop Grange Insulation & Electrical Upgrades. . . .$36,000

Old Swim Hole Revitalization Project. . . .$206,000

Omak Arena LED Lighting Project. . . .$185,000

Open Doors for Multicultural Families. . . .$5,000,000

Oroville Grange Drainage Remediation. . . .$62,000

Parkwood Community Club Repairs. . . .$232,000

PAWS Community Support Center. . . .$250,000

Pea Patch Community Campus. . . .$360,000

People's Community Center. . . .$400,000

Pierce Center for Arts & Technology. . . .$129,000

Port of Quincy Business & Event Center Upgrade. . . .$309,000

Port of Skagit Granary Expansion. . . .$125,000

Preserve and Maintain RTOP Theatre. . . .$77,000

Public Dock Emergency Repair. . . .$41,000

Puget Sound Estuarium Property. . . .$250,000

Redmond Academy Renovations. . . .$87,000

Rehab and Care Center Shower Renovation. . . .$206,000

Rejuvenation Community Day Center. . . .$500,000

Renovations for Children's Developmental Center. . . .$174,000

Republic Library and Community Center. . . .$315,000

Resurface and Revitalize Prescott Public Pool. . . .$98,000

School Playground Renovation. . . .$258,000

Seattle Aquarium Ocean Pavilion. . . .$400,000

Seattle Black Panther Legacy Project. . . .$200,000

Seattle Storm Center. . . .$1,000,000

Shelton Multi-Use Trail. . . .$206,000

Skamania County Public Safety Radio System. . . .$200,000

South Yakima Avenue Senior Housing. . . .$400,000

Southwest Washington Fair Equestrian Facility. . . .$206,000

Spokane Scale House Market & Kitchen. . . .$300,000

Town of Index Safety and ADA Access Improvements. . . .$25,000

Transload Area Sewer. . . .$515,000

Tristate Health Hospital. . . .$3,000,000

Uplift Northwest's Beacon of Hope. . . .$300,000

Vancouver Family Resource Center Expansion. . . .$200,000

WA Soldier's Home Cemetery Pavement & Parking

Extension. . . .$72,000

Wahkiakum PUD - Puget Island Water Source Project. . . .$309,000

Wallace Heights Septic Elimination. . . .$200,000

Water Valve-Pipeline, Intersection Replacement. . . .$103,000

Water Way 18 Dock Replacement. . . .$250,000

Western Ranchettes Water Distribution System. . . .$85,000

Wilkeson Town Hall Renovation. . . .$134,000

Wishram School District Portables. . . .$100,000

Yakima Trolley Carbarn Fire Suppression System. . . .$197,000

Yakima Valley Local Crime Lab Facility. . . .$200,000

Yelm Activated Alleyway. . . .$46,000

(9) $3,100,000 of the model toxic control capital account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Boat Haven Stormwater Improvement project.

(10) $500,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation and $100,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Langley Library Historic Preservation project.

(11) In addition to the requirements in subsection (5) of this section, the contract for the Goodwill Land Acquisition for Redevelopment (Seattle) project must require that the redevelopment of the property into affordable housing under subsection (8) of this section be completed within 10 years of the contract execution.
Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State
. . . .
$3,100,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$41,520,000

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$100,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$44,720,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$178,880,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$223,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1012. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Community Solar Resilience Hubs (40000620)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to increase solar deployment and installation of battery storage in community buildings to enhance grid resiliency and provide backup power for critical needs, such as plug load and refrigeration for medication, during outages, or to provide incentives to support electric utility demand response programs that include customer-sited solar and battery storage systems. Eligible uses of the amounts provided in this section include, but are not limited to, planning and predevelopment work with vulnerable, highly impacted, and rural communities.

(2) The department may:

(a) Provide information to applicants about available clean energy tax credits and incentives, including elective pay, that may be applicable to the project for which state funding is being sought;

(b) Inquire, as part of the application, which tax credits and incentives the applicant plans to seek for the project;

(c) Prioritize projects seeking any applicable clean energy tax credits and incentives when developing and applying competitive criteria for selecting recipients under this section; and

(d) Consider the availability of any federal tax credits or other federal or nonfederal grants or incentives that the applicant may benefit from in review of the application.

(3) Funding awards made under this section may not exceed 100 percent of the cost of the project.

(4) For the purposes of this section "community buildings" means K-12 schools, community colleges, community centers, recreation centers, libraries, tribal buildings, state and local government buildings, and other publicly owned infrastructure.

(5) Up to three percent of the appropriation in this section is for the department to administer the grant program.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$38,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$152,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$190,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1013. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Community Solar (40000621)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant program to provide solar and battery storage community solar projects for organizations serving low-income communities. Eligible uses of the amounts provided in this section include, but are not limited to, planning and predevelopment work with vulnerable, highly impacted, and rural communities.

(2) The department may:

(a) Provide information to applicants about available clean energy tax credits and incentives, including elective pay, that may be applicable to the project for which state funding is being sought;

(b) Inquire, as part of the application, which tax credits and incentives the applicant plans to seek for the project;

(c) Prioritize projects seeking any applicable clean energy tax credits and incentives when developing and applying competitive criteria for selecting recipients under this section; and

(d) Consider the availability of any federal tax credits or other federal or nonfederal grants or incentives that the applicant may benefit from in review of the application.

(3) Funding awards made under this section may not exceed 100 percent of the cost of the project.

(4) Priority must be given to projects sited on "preferred sites" such as rooftops, structures, existing impervious surfaces, landfills, brownfields, previously developed sites, irrigation canals and ponds, storm water collection ponds, industrial areas, dual-use solar projects that ensure ongoing agricultural operations, and other sites that do not displace critical habitat or productive farmland.

(5) For the purposes of this section "low-income" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 19.405.020 and "community solar project" means a solar energy system that: Has a direct current nameplate capacity that is greater than 12 kilowatts but no greater than 1,000 kilowatts; and has, at minimum, either two subscribers or one low-income service provider subscriber.

(6) Up to three percent of the appropriation in this section is for the department to administer the grant program.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$24,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1014. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Community EV Charging (40000622)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the development of community electric vehicle charging infrastructure.

(2) Funding provided in this section must be used for projects that provide a benefit to the public through development, demonstration, and deployment of clean energy technologies that save energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions, or increase energy independence for the state.

(3) Projects that receive funding under this section must be implemented by, or include partners from, one or more of the following: Local governments, federally recognized tribal governments, or public and private electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state.

(4) Grant funding must be used for level two or higher charging infrastructure and related costs including, but not limited to, construction and site improvements. Projects may include a robust public and private outreach plan that includes engaging with affected parties in conjunction with the new electric vehicle infrastructure.

(5) The department must prioritize funding for projects in the following order:

(a) Multifamily housing;

(b) Publicly available charging at any location;

(c) Schools and school districts;

(d) State and local government buildings and office buildings;

(e) All other eligible projects.

(6) The department must coordinate with other electrification programs, including projects developed by the department of transportation, to determine the most effective distribution of the systems. The department must also collaborate with the interagency electric vehicle coordinating council established in RCW 43.392.030 to implement this section and must work to meet benchmarks established in chapter 182, Laws of 2022.

(7) The department may:

(a) Provide information to applicants about available clean energy tax credits and incentives, including elective pay, that may be applicable to the project for which state funding is being sought;

(b) Inquire, as part of the application, which tax credits and incentives the applicant plans to seek for the project;

(c) Prioritize projects seeking any applicable clean energy tax credits and incentives when developing and applying competitive criteria for selecting recipients under this section; and

(d) Consider the availability of any federal tax credits or other federal or nonfederal grants or incentives that the applicant may benefit from in review of the application.

(8) Funding awards made under this section may not exceed 100 percent of the cost of the project.

(9) Up to three percent of the appropriation in this section is for the department to administer the grant program.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$105,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$420,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$525,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1015. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Nisqually Indian Tribe Microgrid System (40000627)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) This section takes effect January 1, 2025.

(2) If the climate commitment account is repealed as of December 30, 2024, then this section is null and void on December 31, 2024.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$8,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1016. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Energy Efficiency Revolving Loan Fund Capitalization Program (40000629)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely as expenditure authority for grant funding received by the department for the energy efficiency revolving loan fund capitalization program in section 40502 of P.L. 117-58 (infrastructure investment and jobs act). The department's expenditures under this section may not exceed the actual amount of grant funding awarded.
Appropriation:

Energy Efficiency Revolving Loan Capitalization

Account—State
. . . .
$1,869,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,869,000

Sec. 1017. 2023 c 474 s 1020 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Housing Trust Fund (40000295)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($163,663,000))$206,948,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the new construction, acquisition, or rehabilitation of affordable housing projects that serve and benefit low-income and special needs populations including, but not limited to, people with chronic mental illness or behavioral health conditions, farmworkers, people who are homeless, and people in need of permanent supportive housing. The department shall strive to invest at least 20 percent of the appropriation provided under this subsection with by and for organizations, as defined by the office of equity.

(2) (($25,000,000))$35,500,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation ((is))and $8,500,000 of the Washington housing trust fund account—state appropriation are provided solely for affordable housing projects that serve and benefit low-income people with developmental or intellectual disabilities. The department must use a separate application form and evaluation criteria for applications under this subsection. The department must coordinate with the department of social and health services regarding any needed supportive services and make efforts to enact the recommendations of the housing needs study for individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities, as provided in section 1068(6), chapter 332, Laws of 2021.

(3) $100,000,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the apple health and homes rapid permanent supportive housing program created in chapter 216, Laws of 2022. Of the amounts provided in this subsection((,)):

(a) $5,000,000 is provided solely for the St. Agnes Haven project in Spokane; and

(b) $7,000,000 is provided solely for the CoLead Northgate project in Seattle.

(4) (($40,000,000))$65,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for awards to organizations eligible under RCW 43.185A.040 for the development of homeownership projects affordable to first-time low-income households throughout the state. Projects serving homebuyers whose income is up to 80 percent of the area median income, adjusted for household size, for the county where the property is located are eligible to apply, except that projects located in rural areas of the state, as defined by the department, serving homebuyers whose income is up to 100 percent of the area median income, adjusted for household size, for the county where the property is located are eligible to apply. Eligible activities include, but are not limited to, down payment assistance, closing costs, acquisition, rehabilitation costs, and new construction. Eligible organizations may include those that plan to provide housing to socially disadvantaged communities as defined in 13 C.F.R. Sec. 124.103. The department shall strive to invest at least 50 percent of these funds with by and for organizations, as defined by the office of equity, and make efforts to enact the recommendations of the homeownership disparities work group created in section 128(100), chapter 297, Laws of 2022. Of the amount provided in this subsection:

(a) $1,500,000 is provided solely for the Boulevard Townhomes project; and

(b) $248,000 is provided solely for the Crail Cottages project.

(5) $25,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for affordable housing preservation projects, which may include, but are not limited to:

(a) Projects preserving and extending the affordability commitment period for projects in the housing trust fund portfolio. The funds may be provided for major building improvements, preservation, and system replacements, necessary for the existing housing trust fund portfolio to maintain long-term viability. The department must require a capital needs assessment be provided prior to contract execution. Funds may not be used to add or expand the capacity of the property. When allocating funds, the department must prioritize buildings that are older than 15 years and that serve very low-income and extremely low-income populations.

(b) Projects preserving affordable multifamily housing at risk of losing its affordability due to expiration of use restrictions that otherwise require affordability including, but not limited to, United States department of agriculture funded multifamily housing. The department must prioritize projects that satisfy the goal of long-term preservation of Washington's affordable multifamily housing stock, particularly in rural areas of the state. Funds may be used for acquisition or for acquisition and rehabilitation of properties to preserve the affordable housing units beyond their existing use restrictions and keep them in Washington's housing portfolio for a minimum of 40 years. If a capital needs assessment is required, the department must work with the applicant to ensure that this does not create an unnecessary impediment to rapidly accessing these funds.

(c) The funding provided under this subsection (5) is not subject to the 90-day application periods in RCW 43.185.070 or 43.185A.050.

(d) The amount awarded under this subsection (5) may not be calculated in award limitations for other housing trust fund awards.

(6) (($4,000,000))$14,000,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for a grant to the northwest cooperative development center to provide subgrants for the acquisition and preservation of mobile or manufactured home communities. Funding provided under this subsection may be used to acquire mobile or manufactured home communities for the purpose of avoiding household displacement due to sale or other transactions and ensuring preservation of housing affordability for low-income households for a minimum of 40 years. Of the amount provided in this subsection: $1,500,000 is provided solely for the Alpine Ridge Utility Upgrades project.

(7) (($2,000,000))$7,000,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for a grant to the northwest cooperative development center to provide subgrants to organizations that are "mobile home park cooperatives" or "manufactured housing cooperatives" under RCW 59.20.030 for completing capital improvement processes. Subgrants provided under this subsection may be used solely for critical improvements, repairs, and infrastructure upgrades to promote the preservation of mobile or manufactured home communities as affordable housing. The grantee must award subgrants based on needs relating to health, safety, and cost.

(8) (($40,337,000))$60,052,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

African Diaspora Cultural Anchor Village (SeaTac). . . .$4,000,000

Bringing It Home II 24-Hour Domestic Violence Shelter. . . .$8,720,000

Broadway Senior Housing. . . .$1,000,000

Casa MiA: Supporting Housing for Survivors. . . .$1,030,000

Cedar House. . . .$112,000

Gravelly Lake Commons at LASA (Lakewood). . . .$500,000

((Kenmore Supportive Housing (Kenmore). . . .$1,000,000))

Habitat for Humanity. . . .$2,000,000

Leavenworth Affordable Workforce Rental Housing

(Leavenworth). . . .$1,000,000

Lewis County Homeless Shelter (Chehalis). . . .$2,500,000

Lincoln District Family Housing (Tacoma). . . .$5,050,000

Mary's Place Shelter Replacement (Burien). . . .$6,000,000

Mount Zion Housing (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

Mount Baker Housing Association Trenton Apartments. . . .$500,000

Multicultural Village Design (Kent). . . .$550,000

New Hope Family Housing (Seattle). . . .$325,000

Peninsula Community Health Housing (Bremerton). . . .$412,000

Redmond Supportive Housing. . . .$3,200,000

Shiloh Baptist Church New Life Housing (Tacoma). . . .$1,000,000

Skyway Affordable Housing (Skyway). . . .$3,000,000

Sky Valley Youth Center. . . .$1,153,000

Tacoma/Pierce County Habitat Affordable Housing

(Pierce County). . . .$14,000,000

West Klickitat Assisted Living Facility. . . .$3,000,000

(9) $30,000,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for eligible organizations defined under RCW 43.185A.040 to acquire, renovate, and prepare real property for rapid conversion into enhanced emergency shelters, permanent supportive housing, transitional housing, permanent housing, youth housing, tiny homes, or shelter for extremely low-income people, as well as individuals, families, unaccompanied youth, and young people experiencing sheltered and unsheltered homelessness. Acquisitions completed with temporary financing are eligible for funding provided in this section. The department may only approve funding for projects that result in increased shelter or housing capacity.

(a) Acquisition of multifamily housing is a priority, and the department shall prioritize housing projects that rapidly move people experiencing unsheltered homelessness into housing, including, but not limited to, individuals living in unsanctioned encampments, the public rights-of-way, or other public spaces.

(b) Amounts provided in this section may not be used for operating or maintenance costs, supportive services, or debt service.

(c) Awards made to tiny homes under this subsection (9) may be made to noncode compliant structures and may be exempted from the 40-year affordability requirement under RCW 43.185A.060.

(10) In evaluating projects in this section, the department must give preference for applications based on some or all of the criteria in RCW 43.185.070(5).

(((10)))(11) The department shall strive to allocate at least 30 percent of the funds provided in this section to projects located in rural areas of the state, as defined by the department.

(((11)))(12) The department must strive to allocate all of the amounts appropriated in this section within the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium in the manner prescribed in each subsection. However, if upon review of applications the department determines there are not adequate suitable projects in a category, the department may allocate funds to other affordable housing projects serving other low-income and special needs populations, provided those projects are located in an area with an identified need for the type of housing proposed.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($65,000,000))

$90,000,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
(($335,000,000))

$453,500,000

Washington Housing Trust Account—State
. . . .
$8,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($400,000,000))

$552,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($1,600,000,000))

$2,208,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($2,000,000,000))

$2,760,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1018. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

The Arc Legacy Center (91102637)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

Sec. 1019. 2023 c 474 s 1022 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Transit Oriented Housing Development Partnership Match (40000298)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely as match to private investment for grants or loans to for-profit and nonprofit housing developers and public entities to carry out projects designed to increase the supply and affordability of transit-oriented housing development. ((Grants))Awards from this appropriation may only be used for the construction of units affordable at 80 percent of area median income or lower, if a project includes a range of affordability levels. The department shall work with the department of transportation to develop and administer a competitive grant or loan program to assist in the financing of housing projects within rapid transit corridors. The department shall implement the program pursuant to the following eligibility criteria and definitions:

(1) Entities eligible to receive ((grant)) awards are state agencies, local governments, and nonprofit or for-profit housing developers. Eligible uses of ((grant)) awards include project capital costs and infrastructure costs and addressing gaps in project financing that would prevent ongoing or complete project construction.

(2) Eligible housing projects must meet the following requirements:

(a) Be within a rapid transit corridor. For purposes of this subsection (2), "rapid transit corridor" includes either one-half mile from light rail or commuter rail, or one-quarter mile from bus rapid transit.

(b) Produce at least 100 units of housing; and

(c) Include a covenant on the property requiring at least 10 percent of total housing units in the project remain affordable for households with incomes at or below 60 percent of area median income and at least 10 percent of total housing units in the project remain affordable for households with incomes at or below 80 percent of area median income for at least 99 years.

(3) The department must prioritize eligible projects by occupancy date, with a target occupancy date of December 31, 2025, or sooner.

(4) To source project requests, the department may first review the list of housing trust fund applications from the prior two years to determine if any projects not fully funded would meet the criteria listed in subsection (2) of this section and would be able to proceed to construction. If so, the department must conduct outreach to those project owners to discuss the ((grant)) program before soliciting new projects.

(5) The department must also consider the following criteria when prioritizing all projects:

(a) Are comprised of the largest number of affordable units;

(b) Have the largest total number of units affordable to households with incomes at or below 60 percent area median income;

(c) Include land acquired at a reduced price or without cost;

(d) Abide by any applicable antidisplacement measures;

(e) Include units with additional bedrooms or intended for occupancy by families with multiple dependents; or

(f) Have acquired all necessary permits.

(6) The department may adopt any necessary guidance or rules to implement the competitive grant or loan program under this section, including any additional project eligibility criteria and prioritization criteria.

(7) The department must report a program update and any projects awarded on their website by June 30, 2024. The report must include project award data at the time of award, such as, but not limited to, the awardee, total project cost, amount of the award, number of households being served by household income, project location, and any other relevant information.

(8) The department must strive to allocate the amounts appropriated in this section by September 30, 2024, in the manner prescribed in this section. However, if upon review of applications the department determines there are not adequate suitable projects to receive awards, the department may allocate state funding to other affordable housing projects serving other low-income and special needs populations.

(9) Of the amounts appropriated in this section, $2,100,000 from the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation and $2,100,000 from the general fund—private/local appropriation are provided solely for the Redmond Supportive Housing project.
Appropriation:

General Fund—Private/Local
. . . .
$25,000,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$25,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$50,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$200,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$250,000,000

Sec. 1020. 2023 c 474 s 1023 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Behavioral Health Community Capacity Grants (40000299)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to issue grants to community hospitals or other community providers to expand and establish new capacity for behavioral health services in communities. The department must consult an advisory group consisting of representatives from the department of social and health services, the health care authority, one representative from a managed care organization, one representative from an accountable care organization, and one representative from the association of county human services. Amounts provided in this section may be used for construction and equipment costs associated with establishment or preservation of the facilities. The department may approve funding for the acquisition of a facility if the project will result in increased behavioral health capacity. Amounts provided in this section may not be used for operating costs associated with the treatment of patients using these services.

(2) In awarding funding for projects in subsection (5) of this section, the department must establish criteria for the issuance of the grants, which must include:

(a) Evidence that the application was developed in collaboration with one or more regional behavioral health entities that administer the purchasing of services;

(b) Evidence that the applicant has assessed and would meet gaps in geographical availability of behavioral health services in their region;

(c) Evidence that the applicant is able to meet applicable licensing and certification requirements in the facility that will be used to provide services;

(d) A commitment by applicants to serve persons who are publicly funded and persons detained for involuntary commitment under chapter 71.05 RCW;

(e) A commitment by the applicant to maintain and operate the beds or facility for a time period commensurate to the state investment, but for at least a 10-year period;

(f) The date upon which structural modifications or construction would begin and the anticipated date of completion of the project;

(g) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with opening the beds;

(h) A financial plan demonstrating the applicant's ability to maintain and operate the facility; and

(i) The applicant's commitment to work with local courts and prosecutors to ensure that prosecutors and courts in the area served by the hospital or facility will be available to conduct involuntary commitment hearings and proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW.

(3) In awarding funding for projects in subsection (5) of this section, the department, in consultation with the advisory group established in subsection (1) of this section, must strive for geographic distribution and to allocate funding based on population and service needs of an area. The department must consider current services available, anticipated services available based on projects underway, and the service delivery needs of an area.

(4) The department must prioritize projects that increase capacity in unserved and underserved areas of the state.

(5)(a) $28,443,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation and $11,664,000 of the capital community assistance account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for competitive community behavioral health grants to address regional needs. Applicants must provide confirmation that the health care authority, department of social and health services, or a managed care organization plans to contract with the facility sufficient to cover the facility's operating costs. The department must give priority to facilities that:

(i) Serve individuals on 90-day or 180-day civil commitments as an alternative to treatment in the state hospitals;

(ii) Serve individuals who will be transitioned from or diverted from the state hospitals;

(iii) Provide secure withdrawal management and stabilization treatment beds; or

(iv) Provide substance use disorder treatment.

(b) In awarding this funding to projects under (a)(i) of this subsection (5), the department must coordinate with the department of social and health services, the health care authority, and the department of health and must only select facilities that meet the following conditions:

(i) The funding must be used to increase capacity related to serving individuals who will be transitioned from or diverted from the state hospitals;

(ii) The facility is not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;

(iii) The provider has submitted a proposal for operating the facility to the health care authority;

(iv) The provider has demonstrated to the department of health and the health care authority that it is able to meet the applicable licensing and certification requirements for the facility that will be used to provide services; and

(v) The health care authority has confirmed that it intends to contract with the facility for operating costs within funds provided in the operating budget for these purposes.

(c) $24,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to intensive behavioral health treatment facilities for long-term placement of behavioral health patients with complex needs and that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases.

(d) $18,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to community providers to increase behavioral health services and capacity for children and minor youth including, but not limited to, services for youth crisis walk-in intervention, substance use disorder treatment, sexual assault and traumatic stress, anxiety, or depression, children with behavioral health and intellectual or developmental disability needs, and interventions for children exhibiting aggressive or depressive behaviors in facilities that are not subject to federal funding restrictions. Consideration must be given to programs that incorporate outreach and treatment for youth dealing with behavioral health or social isolation issues.

(6) The amounts provided in this subsection are subject to the criteria in subsection (1) of this section, except the projects are not required to establish new capacity:

(a) $7,500,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to community providers to prevent the closure of existing behavioral health facilities. For purposes of this subsection (6)(a), the department must implement necessary procedures to enable rapid commitment of funds on a first-come, first-served basis to qualifying project proposals that satisfy the goal of long-term preservation of behavioral health facilities.

(b) (($133,057,000))$193,055,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation and $12,038,000 of the capital community assistance account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Aristo Healthcare Services (Renton). . . .$2,000,000

Center for Alcohol & Drug Treatment New Facility

(Wenatchee). . . .$19,600,000

Chehalis Wellness Center Renovation. . . .$3,000,000

Columbia Valley Center for Recovery. . . .$1,500,000

Colville Tribes Detox Facility Feasibility Study. . . .$475,000

Compass Health Broadway Behavioral Health

Services (Everett). . . .$18,700,000

CRMHS Satellite Building Project (Vancouver). . . .$2,500,000

Evergreen Haven Behavioral Health. . . .$2,071,000

Evergreen Treatment Services (Seattle). . . .$6,000,000

Holman Recovery Center Freedom Bridge. . . .$1,900,000

Ituha Stabilization Facility Bed Increase. . . .$93,000

Jamestown S'Klallam Behavior Health Center

(Sequim). . . .(($13,000,000))$28,000,000

Kalispel Tribe Camas Health Inpatient Treatment

Center. . . .$1,200,000

Kitsap Mental Health Services Bremerton Campus

Expansion. . . .$773,000

Lummi Nation Substance Abuse Treatment

(Bellingham). . . .$8,147,000

Lynnwood Community Recovery Center (Lynnwood). . . .$2,750,000

Madrona Recovery 54 Bed Facility. . . .$16,000,000

Muckleshoot We Care Daily. . . .$4,450,000

Nisqually Tribe Healing Village (Olympia). . . .$12,000,000

Opioid Recovery and Care Access. . . .$3,500,000

Quinault Indian Nation Wellness Center Expansion. . . .$824,000

Recovery Innovations Crisis Stabilization (Federal

Way). . . .$1,900,000

SeaMar Youth Crisis Center (Seattle). . . .$480,000

Seven Nations Healing Lodge Youth Expansion. . . .$10,000,000

SHC Medical Center - Astria/Toppenish Hospital

(Toppenish). . . .$2,500,000

SIHB Thunderbird Treatment Center (Vashon). . . .$1,030,000

Skagit County Crisis Stabilization Center (((SCCSC)

(Sedro-Woolley))). . . .(($12,700,000))$17,200,000

Snoqualmie Tribe Behavioral Health. . . .$500,000

Spokane Treatment and Recovery Service (Spokane). . . .$4,000,000

Substance Use Disorder & Mental Health Inpatient

Treatment (Yakima). . . .$11,750,000

Suquamish On-Reservation Health Service Center. . . .$500,000

Three Rivers Behavioral Health Center (Kennewick). . . .$5,000,000

Triumph SUD & Mental Health Treatment. . . .$2,500,000

Whatcom 23-Hour Crisis Relief Center

(Bellingham). . . .(($9,000,000))$11,350,000

Yakama Nation Detox Center. . . .$900,000

(7) The department shall notify all applicants that they may be required to have a construction review performed by the department of health.

(8) To accommodate the emergent need for behavioral health services, the department and the department of health, in collaboration with the health care authority and the department of social and health services, must establish a concurrent and expedited process to assist grant applicants in meeting any applicable regulatory requirements necessary to operate inpatient psychiatric beds, freestanding evaluation and treatment facilities, enhanced services facilities, triage facilities, crisis stabilization facilities, or secure detoxification/secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities.

(9) The department must strive to allocate all of the amounts provided in this section in the manner prescribed in each subsection. However, if upon review of applications, the department determines, in consultation with the advisory group established in subsection (1) of this section, that there are not adequate suitable projects in a category, the department may allocate funding to other project categories listed in this section, prioritizing projects that support serving individuals who will be transitioned from or diverted from the state hospitals. Underserved areas of the state may also be considered.

(10) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that the grantee or successor hold the capital improvements for at least a 10-year period. The provisions must require the facility to be used for behavioral health services, but may allow the facility to change ownership or facility type during the commitment period. The department shall monitor the activities of recipients of grants under this program to determine compliance with the terms and conditions set forth in its contract.

(11) The department must provide a progress report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1, 2024. The report must include:

(a) The total number of applications and amount of funding requested;

(b) A list and description of the projects approved for funding including state funding, total project cost, services anticipated to be provided, bed capacity, and anticipated completion date;

(c) A statewide map of new capacity since 2018, including projected bed capacity and opening dates;

(d) A status report of projects that received funding in prior funding rounds, including details about the project completion and the date the facility began providing services; and

(e) Recommendations for statutory language that would codify the grant program on an ongoing basis including:

(i) Evaluation and prioritization criteria;

(ii) Monitoring and compliance requirements;

(iii) Preconstruction and technical assistance services; and

(iv) Data needed to determine the service needs by area of the state.

(12) The department must coordinate with the health care authority to submit capital budget requests to fund behavioral health community capacity grants for the 2025-2027 biennial budget by the due date established by the office of financial management. Associated state budget operating costs must also be identified and requested.
Appropriation:

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$23,702,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($211,000,000))

$270,998,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$294,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($844,000,000))

$1,178,800,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($1,055,000,000))

$1,473,500,000

Sec. 1021. 2023 c 474 s 6049 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2022 Local & Community Projects (40000230)

The ((reappropriation))appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7012 of this act, except that:

(a) $2,000,000 of the reappropriation is for the Tiny House Villages (Seattle) project, and not the Tiny House Villages and Cottages (Seattle) project; and

(b) $206,000 of the reappropriation is for the Renton Housing Repair Assistance Program (Renton) project, and not the 300 Rainier Ave Building (Renton) project.

(2) The department must reimburse the city of Chelan for its expenditures for the Chelan municipal airport extension project. The amount of the reimbursement to the city of Chelan under this section may not exceed the amount appropriated for the Chelan municipal airport extension project in section 1022, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.

(3) ((It is the intent of the legislature to appropriate funding))$1,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is for the remaining costs of the Chelan municipal airport extension project ((in fiscal year 2024)).
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$117,688,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$51,879,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($169,567,000))

$170,567,000

Sec. 1022. 2023 c 474 s 1024 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Early Learning Facilities Fund Grant Program (40000300)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($5,000,000))$6,000,000 of the Ruth Lecocq Kagi early learning facilities development account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for minor renovation grants.

(2) (($42,050,000))$71,212,000 of the Ruth Lecocq Kagi early learning facilities development account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the early learning facility grant and loan program, subject to the provisions of RCW 43.31.573 through 43.31.583 and 43.84.092, to provide state assistance for designing, constructing, purchasing, expanding, or modernizing public or private early learning education facilities for eligible organizations. Up to four percent of the funding in this subsection may be used by the department of children, youth, and families to provide technical assistance to early learning providers interested in applying for the early learning facility grant or loan program.

(3) The department of children, youth, and families must develop methodology to identify, at the school district boundary level, the geographic locations of where early childhood education and assistance program slots are needed to meet the entitlement specified in RCW 43.216.556. This methodology must be linked to the caseload forecast produced by the caseload forecast council and must include estimates of the number of slots needed at each school district. This methodology must inform any early learning facilities needs assessment conducted by the department and the department of children, youth, and families. This methodology must be included as part of the budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030.

(4) When prioritizing areas with the highest unmet need for early childhood education and assistance program slots, the committee of early learning experts convened by the department pursuant to RCW 43.31.581 must first consider those areas at risk of not meeting the entitlement specified in RCW 43.216.556.

(5) The department must track the number of slots being renovated separately from the number of slots being constructed and, within these categories, must track the number of slots separately by program for the working connections child care program and the early childhood education and assistance program.

(6) When prioritizing applications for projects pursuant to RCW 43.31.581, the department must award priority points to applications from a rural county or from extreme child care deserts as defined by the department of children, youth, and families.

(7) For early learning facilities collocated with affordable or supportive housing developments, the department may remit state funding on a reimbursement basis for 100 percent of eligible project costs, regardless of the project's match amount, once the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed in an amount sufficient to complete the entire project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public as an early learning facility. These projects are not subject to section 8015 of this act or RCW 43.88.150.

(8) It is the intent of the legislature to reappropriate funding in the 2023-2025 omnibus capital appropriations act for early learning facilities appropriated in this section.

(9) (($17,600,000))$37,438,000 of the Ruth Lecocq Kagi early learning facilities development account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of early learning facility projects:

Boys and Girls Club of Lewis County. . . .$1,950,000

Brightonview Childcare Expansion. . . .$2,305,000

Cora Whitley Family Center (Tacoma). . . .(($2,500,000))$3,015,000

Eastside Early Childhood Center (Bellevue). . . .$1,100,000

Lions Park Community Center. . . .$2,550,000

Montesano Child Care. . . .$515,000

New Tomorrow's Hope Child Development Center

(Everett). . . .$1,000,000

Northaven Green Space Restoration. . . .$1,300,000

Northgate Jose Marti Early Learning Center

(Seattle). . . .(($1,000,000))$2,488,000

Rainier Valley Early Learning Center (Seattle). . . .$6,000,000

ReWA MLK Early Learning Center. . . .$4,252,000

Shore Metro Park District Child Care Expansion. . . .$773,000

Skyway Affordable Housing and Early Learning

Center (Seattle). . . .$3,000,000

Step by Step's Early Learning Center. . . .$515,000

Whatcom Meridian Early Learning. . . .$3,000,000

YMCA Early Learning Center (Port Angeles). . . .(($2,000,000))$2,500,000

Young Child & Family Center, North Thurston PS

(Olympia). . . .$1,000,000

YWCA Walla Walla Childcare Center. . . .$175,000

(10) $350,000 of the Ruth Lecocq Kagi early learning facilities development account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the early learning facilities capital readiness pilot program. The department, in partnership with the department of children, youth, and families, shall administer the program as part of the early learning facilities program. The early learning facilities capital readiness pilot program must support no more than 10 licensed early learning providers that will serve children through working connections child care or through the early childhood education and assistance program to study the feasibility of expanding, remodeling, purchasing, or constructing early learning facilities and classrooms. Participants must receive small grants and project support to conduct capital feasibility studies that cover financing, architectural design, construction, business operations, and other relevant topics. Participants must also have access to professional consultation related to financing, architectural design, construction, and business operations.
Appropriation:

Ruth Lecocq Kagi Early Learning Facilities

Development Account—State
. . . .
(($65,000,000))

$115,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($260,000,000))

$460,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($325,000,000))

$575,000,000

Sec. 1023. 2023 c 474 s 1025 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2024 Local and Community Projects (40000301)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department shall not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards under chapter 39.35D RCW.

(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only and may not be advanced under any circumstances.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department shall include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.

(7) The department must comply with the requirements set forth in executive order 21-02 and must consult with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes on the potential effects of these projects on cultural resources and historic properties. Consultation with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes must be initiated before project funds are made available.

(8) The state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

57th Ave Sewer Project (University Place). . . .$200,000

ACT Historic Landmark Roof Restoration (Seattle). . . .$539,000

ADA For Northwest Center Janitorial (Spokane

Valley). . . .$20,000

Admiral Theatre Facility Improvements (Bremerton). . . .$165,000

Affordable Housing Land Acquisition (Tacoma). . . .$1,500,000

Afterschool Program Expansion (Walla Walla). . . .$45,000

Agricultural Innovation Center (Pasco). . . .$200,000

Airlift Northwest Hangar (East Wenatchee). . . .$500,000

Airway Heights Public Safety (Airway Heights). . . .$1,340,000

Algona Wetland Preserve Interpretive Trail

(Algona). . . .$600,000

American Indian Community Center (Spokane). . . .$1,000,000

American Legion Post 79 Roof Replacement

(Snoqualmie). . . .$49,000

Anderson Island Multipurpose Building (Anderson

Island). . . .$258,000

Angleside Reservoir Capacity Upgrades (Shelton). . . .$1,850,000

Arlington Commercial Kitchen (Arlington). . . .$581,000

ARTE NOIR Capital Construction Completion

(Seattle). . . .$381,000

Asbestos Abatement Old City Hall (Benton City). . . .$309,000

Ashley House (Spokane). . . .$515,000

Ashley House (Tacoma). . . .$500,000

Asia Pacific Cultural Center (Tacoma). . . .$2,000,000

ASUW Shell House (Seattle). . . .$3,000,000

Athletic Field Lights For Ridgefield Outdoor

(Ridgefield). . . .$250,000

Auburn Avenue Theater Rebuild (Auburn). . . .$1,545,000

Avista Stadium Improvements (Spokane Valley). . . .$543,000

B5 Community Learning Center (Kennewick). . . .$773,000

Ball Field at Historic Petes (Enumclaw). . . .$439,000

Ballard Boys & Girls Clubs Flooring Replacement

(Seattle). . . .$49,000

Behavioral Health Wellbeing Clinic (Spokane). . . .$1,571,000

Bonney Lake Senior Center Rehab Project (Bonney

Lake). . . .$650,000

Boys & Girls Club Parking Lot Renovation (Federal

Way). . . .$168,000

Boys & Girls Club Seismic Upgrade & Roof

Replacement (Vancouver). . . .$412,000

Brewster Boys and Girls Club Facility (Brewster). . . .$300,000

Bridge Meadows Pre-Development (Tacoma). . . .$515,000

Bringing It Home II 24-Hour Domestic Violence

Shelter (Yakima). . . .$125,000

Browse Infrastructure (Seattle). . . .$144,000

Camp Thunderbird Wastewater Treatment Facility

(Olympia). . . .$618,000

Cannery Parking Lot & Sidewalk Rehab (Anacortes). . . .$110,000

Capitol Land Trust Public Access Preconstruction

(Olympia). . . .$77,000

Cathlamet Waterfront Park (Cathlamet). . . .$86,000

Cedarwood Community Recreation Ctr Redevelopment

(Lake Stevens). . . .$1,123,000

Celebration Park Synthetic Turf Upgrade (Federal

Way). . . .$822,000

Center Senior Living Housing Development (Grand

Coulee). . . .$361,000

Central Colville Apartments (Colville). . . .$52,000

Central Whidbey Fire & Rescue Station 53

(Coupeville). . . .$2,750,000

Centralia Quad Infield Turf Project (Centralia). . . .$2,480,000

Chehalis River Raw Water (Chehalis). . . .$250,000

Chelan Butte Acquisition Feasibility Study

(Chelan). . . .$125,000

Children's Therapy Center (University Place). . . .$500,000

Chinese Reconciliation Project Design (Tacoma). . . .$1,000,000

City Hall Structural Assessment (Toledo). . . .$53,000

City of Longview Mint Valley Golf Course

Irrigation Replacement (Longview). . . .$2,000,000

City of Othello Lions Park (Othello). . . .$600,000

City of Selah Wastewater Treatment Plant

Improvements (Selah). . . .$1,442,000

City of Sequim Park Acquisition (Sequim). . . .$375,000

Clallam Joint Public Safety Facility (Port

Angeles). . . .$5,750,000

Cloney Inclusive Playground (Longview). . . .$1,000,000

Colfax Community Center (Colfax). . . .$72,000

Colfax Pool (Colfax). . . .$1,030,000

Columbia Grove Community Playground (East

Wenatchee). . . .$72,000

Columbia Play Project Children's Museum

(Vancouver). . . .$515,000

Commercial Pumpouts to Save Puget Sound

(Anacortes). . . .$800,000

Communications Devices for Officials (Olympia). . . .$15,000

Community Center at Lake Chelan (Chelan). . . .$1,723,000

Community Center Roof Replacement (Aberdeen). . . .$165,000

Community Homes Renovations 41st LD (Bellevue). . . .$106,000

Community Homes Renovations 45th LD (Woodinville). . . .$77,000

Community Homes Renovations 48th LD (Bellevue). . . .$243,000

Community Homes Upgrades 1st LD (Bothell). . . .$104,000

Conconully Service Complex/Fire Hall (Conconully). . . .$2,050,000

Coupeville Food Bank & Workforce Housing

Apartments (Coupeville). . . .$230,000

Cross Kirkland Corridor 132nd Avenue NE

Improvements (Kirkland). . . .$515,000

Day Island Bridge Design Project (University

Place). . . .$200,000

Des Moines Marina Steps (Des Moines). . . .$1,000,000

deWilde Rugby Fields (Ferndale). . . .$150,000

Diking District 7 Fish Passage and Levee

(Stanwood). . . .$1,900,000

Dishman Hills Conservancy Education Ctr Site

Planning (Spokane). . . .$46,000

Double Culvert Replacement (Castle Rock). . . .$2,000,000

Downtown Pasco North Plaza (Pasco). . . .$155,000

Eagle Track Raceway Stadium Light Project

(Republic). . . .$117,000

East Hill North Community Park Phase 1 (Kent). . . .$1,000,000

Eaton Urban Pathway Project (Battle Ground). . . .$1,000,000

Ebey Waterfront Trail Phase 4 (Marysville). . . .$1,030,000

Edmonds Boys & Girls Clubs Capital Project

(Edmonds). . . .$1,385,000

Edmonds Center for the Arts Design (Edmonds). . . .$200,000

Ejidos Community Farm (Everson). . . .$824,000

El Centro de la Raza Federal Way Campus (Federal

Way). . . .$1,545,000

Electron Way & Contra Costa Ave Intersection

Improvemt (Fircrest). . . .$153,000

Ellensburg Rodeo Grandstands (Ellensburg). . . .$1,030,000

Emergency Operation Generator (Coupeville). . . .$386,000

Emergency Shelter Capital Improvements (Shelton). . . .$103,000

Enumclaw Community Center (Enumclaw). . . .$500,000

Evans Creek Relocation Project (Redmond). . . .$1,030,000

EWAM Handicap Parking Improvement Project

(Pomeroy). . . .$98,000

Fair Building Improvements (Graham). . . .$77,000

Fall City Business District Septic Project (Fall

City). . . .$1,550,000

Family Resource Center at Cedar Crossing (Seattle). . . .$360,000

Felts Field Gateway Improvement (Spokane). . . .$515,000

Ferndale Civic and Community Organization Campus

(Ferndale). . . .$3,050,000

Ferry County Fairgrounds (Republic). . . .$50,000

Fife Aquatic & Community Center Improvements

(Fife). . . .$1,500,000

Fire Panel Replacement & Integration (Seattle). . . .$294,000

FISH Food Bank Expansion (Ellensburg). . . .$573,000

Foothills Trail Crossing at Main Street (Buckley). . . .$128,000

Forest Park Pickleball Court Installation

(Everett). . . .$345,000

Free Clinic & Central Construction Project (Walla

Walla). . . .$515,000

Frontier Park Horse Cover (Graham). . . .$1,388,000

Ft Steilacoom Park Nisqually Indian Tribe

Improvements (Lakewood). . . .$309,000

Gibson Hall Improvement Project (Issaquah). . . .$206,000

Glen Tana (Spokane). . . .$3,000,000

Golden Tiger Multi-Use Trail Phase 2 (Republic). . . .$168,000

Goldendale Municipal Airport - Land Acquisition

(Goldendale). . . .$361,000

Greater Wenatchee Irrigation Dist Infrastructure

(East Wenatchee). . . .$2,000,000

Greenwood Early Learning Playground (Seattle). . . .$69,000

Greg Cuoio Park Accessibility Improvements (Lacey). . . .$515,000

Harbour Point Boulevard Pathway (Mukilteo). . . .$258,000

Harlequin Theater Renovation (Olympia). . . .$700,000

Heritage Center at Meeker Mansion (Puyallup). . . .$496,000

Heritage Heights Remodel and Conversion to Medical

Care (Chelan). . . .$824,000

High Prairie Fire District 14 Emergency

Preparedness (Lyle). . . .$248,000

Highland Park Improvement Club Rebuild (Seattle). . . .$500,000

Historic Lamar Cabin Preservation (Prescott). . . .$267,000

HUB Sports Fields (Liberty Lake). . . .$1,030,000

ICOM 911 Microwave Radio Broadband System (Oak

Harbor). . . .$500,000

Indian American Community Services Community

Center (Kent). . . .$794,000

Interurban Trail War Memorials (Pacific). . . .$400,000

Issaquah Senior Ctr Veterans Memorial Consolidated

Prk (Issaquah). . . .$721,000

Japanese American Exclusion Memorial Vis Ctr

(Bainbridge Island). . . .$350,000

Jarstad Aquatic Center Assessment & Roof Repair

(Bremerton). . . .$309,000

Jenkins Creek Recreation Trail (Covington). . . .$250,000

Kalama Creek Hatchery Renovation (Olympia). . . .$3,350,000

KCFD #50 Generator (Baring). . . .$20,000

Kelso School District-Construction & Renovation

Projects (Kelso). . . .$165,000

Kelso Train Station Roof Replacement (Kelso). . . .$575,000

Kennewick Kiwanis Playground (Kennewick). . . .$258,000

King County Sheriff's Office Air Support Unit

(Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

King Street Station Creative Youth Empowerment Hub

(Seattle). . . .$500,000

Kirkland Boys & Girls Clubs Community Playfield

(Kirkland). . . .$150,000

Kirkland Performance Center Safety Improvements

(Kirkland). . . .$1,288,000

Kitsap Humane Society Veterinary Lifesaving Center

(Silverdale). . . .$412,000

Klineline Bridge and ADA Improvements (Vancouver). . . .$1,365,000

Kulshan View (Mount Vernon). . . .$309,000

Lacamas Lake Water Improvements (Camas). . . .$515,000

Lake Boren CrossTown Recreational Trail

(Newcastle). . . .$824,000

Lake Chelan Food Bank Building Remodel & Addition

(Chelan). . . .$2,000,000

Lake Hills Clubhouse Renovation (Bellevue). . . .$583,000

Lake Wilderness Arboretum Improvements (Maple

Valley). . . .$450,000

Lakebay Marina (Lakebay). . . .$300,000

Lambert House Flood Abatement & Foundation

Replacement (Seattle). . . .$1,030,000

Larson Playfield Irrigation Conversion (Moses

Lake). . . .$258,000

Latah Water System Rehabilitation Project (Latah). . . .$180,000

Latino Community Service Center (Lynnwood ). . . .$515,000

Lester Creek Personnel to Water Intake (Pe Ell). . . .$640,000

Lewis County Senior Centers (Chehalis). . . .$500,000

Lincoln County Fair and Livestock (Davenport). . . .$1,000,000

Local Grain Conveyance & Storage System (Tumwater). . . .$255,000

Logistics Facility (Vancouver). . . .$874,000

Lynden Senior and Community Center (Lynden). . . .$309,000

Lynnwood Neighborhood Center (Lynnwood). . . .$2,050,000

Lyon Creek Culvert at SR 104 (Lake Forest Park). . . .$1,820,000

Madison Street School Sidewalk Project (South

Bend). . . .$175,000

Manson Fire Station - Training Room and Living

Quarters (Manson). . . .$206,000

Marine Spills Operations Base (Friday Harbor). . . .$210,000

Marshall Park Inclusive Community Playground

(Vancouver). . . .$685,000

Mason County Jail Expansion (Shelton). . . .$1,030,000

Mason PUD 1 Vuecrest Water System Storage Project

(Union). . . .$618,000

Mason PUD Water Infrastructure (Matlock). . . .$1,000,000

Masonic Building Roof Renovation (Centralia). . . .$170,000

Mays Pond Playground (Bothell). . . .$650,000

Medical Lake Storm Water Mitigation (Medical Lake). . . .$1,000,000

Medically-Tailored Meals & Groceries Expansion

(Seattle). . . .$1,175,000

Memorial Stadium (Seattle). . . .$4,000,000

Menastash Grange Revitalization and Expansion

(Ellensburg). . . .$85,000

Mental Health Quiet Room (Moses Lake). . . .$31,000

Mill Creek City Hall North Renovation (Mill Creek). . . .$515,000

Mill Creek Multiuse Recreational Property (Mill

Creek). . . .$1,030,000

MLK Jr. Resource & Technology Center (Pasco). . . .$250,000

MLK Jr.Park & Swimming Pool (Yakima). . . .$1,160,000

Modernization of Pacific County Jail Facility

(South Bend). . . .$464,000

Monroe Therapeutic Facility (Monroe). . . .$1,100,000

Montesano Economic Development (Montesano). . . .$700,000

Mt. Spokane Ski & Snowboard Park (Mead). . . .$100,000

Mukilteo First Responder Wellness Center

(Mukilteo). . . .$258,000

Muslim American Youth Foundation Center (Burien). . . .$500,000

National Nordic Museum East Garden Capital Project

(Seattle). . . .$258,000

Nespelem Community Longhouse (Nespelem). . . .$1,850,000

New Beginnings Homes (Puyallup). . . .$440,000

No. County Rec. Association Youth Sports (Castle

Rock). . . .$256,000

Nooksack Community Housing (Deming). . . .$470,000

North Fork Skykomish River 911 Extension Project

(Index). . . .$420,000

North Seattle Boys & Girls Clubs Flooring

Replacement (Seattle). . . .$134,000

NW Stream Center Sustainable Infrastructure

(Everett). . . .$273,000

Oak Harbor Boys & Girls Club Sports Court (Oak

Harbor). . . .$250,000

Oak Harbor Economic Development (Oak Harbor). . . .$621,000

ODT Land Purchase (Port Townsend). . . .$750,000

Old Fort Lake Subarea Remediation & Public Access

Proj (DuPont). . . .$215,000

Othello's Regional Water Plan (Othello). . . .$412,000

Parkland School (Parkland). . . .$500,000

Pasado's Safe Haven Water and Safety Upgrades

(Monroe). . . .$485,000

Pasco Boulevard Soccer Field (Pasco). . . .$750,000

Pasco Clubhouse Safety Modernization (Pasco). . . .$840,000

Peninsula Medical Respite & Housing Center

(Bremerton). . . .$1,000,000

Peninsula Senior Activity (Ocean Park). . . .$272,000

PenMet Parks Community Recreation Center (Gig

Harbor). . . .$1,030,000

Perfect Passage (Tonasket). . . .$730,000

Pierce County Food Hub (Bonney Lake). . . .$300,000

Pike Place Market Elevator & Stair Replacement

(Seattle). . . .$515,000

Plaza Retreat Space (Vashon). . . .$544,000

Pond to Pines Infrastructure (Ellensburg). . . .$518,000

Port Gamble Shoreline Restoration (Port Gamble). . . .$2,400,000

Port of Allyn Public Pier Replacement (Allyn). . . .$515,000

Port of Anacortes T-Dock Reconfiguration

(Anacortes). . . .$1,000,000

Port of Mattawa Event Center Phase 3 Upgrade

Project (Mattawa). . . .$361,000

Port of Skamania Cascades Business Park (North

Bonneville). . . .$1,000,000

Port of Willapa Harbor (South Bend). . . .$800,000

Port Orchard Breakwater Replacement (Port Orchard). . . .$1,000,000

Port Remediation (Olympia). . . .$2,200,000

Portland Avenue Park Sprayground (Tacoma). . . .$500,000

Poulsbo Historical Society - Nilsen-Sonju House

(Poulsbo). . . .$300,000

Prosser City Entrance Sign (Prosser). . . .$110,000

Public Works Facility & Vehicle Storage (Sedro

Woolley). . . .$500,000

Puyallup Elks Roof Replacement (Puyallup). . . .$370,000

Rainier Court Phase V (Seattle). . . .$750,000

Raze Development Capital Project (Spokane). . . .$500,000

Redondo Fishing Pier Replacement Phase 1 (Des

Moines). . . .$1,000,000

Refugee Welcoming & Healing Center (SeaTac). . . .$515,000

Regional Athletic Complex Transformer Upgrade

(Olympia). . . .$103,000

Regional Water & Sewer Upgrades (((Rochester)))

Mason County. . . .$250,000

Rejuvenation Community Day Center (Bremerton). . . .$200,000

Remembrance Gallery (Puyallup). . . .$257,000

Renovation and Addition to RP Theater Building

(Richland). . . .$350,000

Renton Public Square (Renton). . . .$1,485,000

Republic Community Library (Republic). . . .$183,000

Reservoir Capacity & Seismic (Battle Ground). . . .$1,288,000

Ritzville Legion Hall Renovation (Ritzville). . . .$165,000

Ritzville Rodeo Bleachers Replacement (Ritzville). . . .$194,000

Ritzville Theater (Ritzville). . . .$75,000

Rock Creek Horse Park (Ravensdale). . . .$206,000

Roslyn Old City Hall Community Center (Roslyn). . . .$77,000

Rotary Boys & Girls Clubs HVAC Replacement

(Seattle). . . .$309,000

Rotary Morrow Community Park (Poulsbo). . . .$100,000

Roy Water Preliminary Design (Roy). . . .$250,000

Sail Sand Point (Seattle). . . .$258,000

Sam Chastain Trail (Renton). . . .$500,000

School Based Health Care Facility (Tacoma). . . .$515,000

Scott Hill Park & Sports Complex of Woodland

(Woodland). . . .$350,000

Scriber Place Housing for Homeless Students

(Lynnwood). . . .$2,050,000

Search & Rescue Headquarters Feasibility Study

(Snoqualmie). . . .$103,000

Seattle Aquarium (Seattle). . . .$3,000,000

Seattle Public Library Holds Pick-Up Locker

(Seattle). . . .$93,000

Seattle Public Theater Accessibility Upgrades

(Seattle). . . .$77,000

Security & Access Improvements (Shelton). . . .$250,000

Sentinel Gap Community Park (Mattawa). . . .$1,000,000

Sewer Pump Station 12 & Force Main (Bellevue). . . .$1,030,000

Shelton Day Care & Building Project (Shelton). . . .$215,000

Short's Farm Purchase (Chimacum). . . .$1,000,000

Skagit PUD 10th District Waterlines (Skagit). . . .$650,000

Skagit PUD 39th District Waterline Relocations

(Mt. Vernon). . . .$600,000

Skagit PUD Headquarters Public Meeting Room (Mt.

Vernon). . . .$206,000

Slavonian Hall (Tacoma). . . .$472,000

Snohomish Boys & Girls Club Teen Center

(Snohomish). . . .$412,000

Snohomish Public Safety & City Services Campus

(Snohomish). . . .$700,000

Snoqualmie Indian Tribe Consultation

(Snoqualmie). . . .$150,000

Snoqualmie Valley Youth Center Barn with Storage

(North Bend). . . .$232,000

South Seattle Community Food Hub (Seattle). . . .$499,000

South Thurston Fire & EMS New Fire Station

(Tenino). . . .$3,050,000

South UGA Water and Sewer Extensions (Kennewick). . . .$1,122,000

South Whidbey Aquatic Wellness Center (Langley). . . .$360,000

Southwest Boys & Girls Clubs Safety & Security

Improve (Seattle). . . .$3,000

SPARC Capital Campaign (Mount Vernon). . . .$750,000

Spokane Civic Theatre Facility (Spokane). . . .$1,500,000

Spokane International Airport (Spokane). . . .$1,000,000

Spokane Scale House Market (Spokane Valley). . . .$750,000

Spring Box Replacement/Water (Concrete). . . .$450,000

St. Mary Medical Center (Walla Walla). . . .$75,000

Stanwood Art Center Design (Stanwood). . . .$327,000

Stonerose Fossil Center (Republic). . . .$721,000

Storm Upgrades Downtown Phase N2 (Puyallup). . . .$696,000

Sue Bird and Lenny Wilkens Statues (Seattle). . . .$412,000

Sultan Basin Park (Sultan). . . .$500,000

Sumas Ave Water Pipe Replacement (Sumas). . . .$150,000

SW WA Agricultural Business (Tenino). . . .$1,250,000

Swede Hall Renovation Project (Rochester). . . .$198,000

Take-A-Break Park Playground (Maple Valley). . . .$412,000

Tam O'Shanter Multi-Purpose Court Fencing and

Lighting (Kelso). . . .$46,000

Taproot Theatre Jewell Mainstage Renovation

(Seattle). . . .$515,000

Tasveer Art Center (Bellevue). . . .$258,000

Tenino Stone Carvers Guild Workshop and Classroom

(Tenino). . . .$160,000

Terminal 4 Expansion & Redevelopment Project

(Aberdeen). . . .$3,500,000

Thun Field - Emergency Response and Meeting Space

(Puyallup). . . .$1,000,000

Town of Elmer City Fire Station Improvements

(Elmer City). . . .$537,000

Town of Index Water Line Repair and Replacement

(Index). . . .$628,000

Township Hall North & West (Spokane). . . .$100,000

Tribal Cultural Center & Museum Restoration

(Steilacoom). . . .$200,000

Tugboat Parthia Pavilion Construction (Olympia). . . .$148,000

Tukwila Community Center HVAC Replacement

(Tukwila). . . .$515,000

Tukwila Immigrant & Refugee Wadajir Land

Acquisition (Tukwila). . . .$2,250,000

Tulalip Creek Hatchery (Marysville). . . .$1,000,000

United Way Elevator and Disability Access (Tacoma). . . .$129,000

Van Zandt Community Hall Renovation (Deming). . . .$502,000

Veterans Memorial Balfour Park (Spokane Valley). . . .$207,000

VFW Post 2224 Critical Renovations (Puyallup). . . .$206,000

Village Theatre's Francis J Gaudette HVAC

Replacement (Issaquah). . . .$489,000

Wallace Heights Septic Elimination Program

(Vancouver). . . .$500,000

Washougal Civic Campus Project (Washougal). . . .$2,000,000

Washtucna Town Hall (Washtucna). . . .$20,000

Wastewater Lift Stations (Concrete). . . .$450,000

Wastewater Treatment Facility & Loss Project

(Carbonado). . . .$500,000

Wastewater Treatment System Upgrades (Long Beach). . . .$340,000

Waterfront Organic Soil Removal (Washougal). . . .$2,000,000

Weld Seattle Reentry Resource Center (Seattle). . . .$5,000,000

Wenatchee Valley Museum Expansion and Redesign

(Wenatchee). . . .$1,000,000

Wenatchee Valley YMCA (Wenatchee). . . .$1,030,000

West Biddle Lake Dam Restoration (Vancouver). . . .$412,000

Whatcom Ag Research Station (Lynden). . . .$764,000

What-Comm Dispatch Center (Bellingham). . . .$1,000,000

White Bluffs Rail/Rail Replacement (Richland). . . .$1,250,000

White Center Community Hub (Seattle). . . .$1,000,000

White Center Food Bank Renovation (Seattle). . . .$275,000

Wilkeson Infrastructure (Wilkeson). . . .$824,000

Windermere Park Playground (Longview). . . .$155,000

WRF Upgrades Solid Side (Yelm). . . .$442,000

Yakama Nation "Creator Law Sculpture" (Roslyn). . . .$99,000

Yakima Co Fire Emergency Responder Radio System

(Yakima). . . .$139,000

Yakima County Fire District 12 Wildfire Response

(Yakima). . . .$38,000

Yakima County Meals on Wheels (Union Gap). . . .$1,000,000

Yakima Trolley Museum (Yakima). . . .$25,000

Youth Assist Program Skills Training Center

(Tacoma). . . .$500,000

Youth Emergency Shelter (Longview). . . .$250,000

Zillah Park Renovation (Zillah). . . .$300,000

(9) The model toxics control capital account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Port of Vancouver Dock Demo and Removal of Creosote project in Vancouver.
Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$3,500,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$228,343,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$231,843,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$912,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,143,843,000

Sec. 1024. 2023 c 474 s 6076 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Broadband Office (92000953)

The ((reappropriations))appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The ((reappropriations))appropriations are subject to the provisions of section 7016 of this act, except that:

(a) The $225,000 provided for the Point Roberts rural broadband project is appropriated from the state building construction account—state, and not the coronavirus capital projects account—federal; and

(b) The amounts appropriated from the coronavirus capital projects account—federal do not need to be obligated by December 31, 2024.
Reappropriation:

Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—Federal
. . . .
$124,726,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$150,522,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$26,878,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$302,126,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$225,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,468,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($303,594,000))

$303,819,000

Sec. 1025. 2023 c 474 s 1038 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Facility Improvement Fund (92001367)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $24,000,000 of the youth athletic facility account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Bellingham: Joe Martin Stadium. . . .$700,000

City of Everett ((School District: Everett

Memorial)): New Stadium. . . .$7,400,000

Lower Columbia College: David Story Field. . . .$1,300,000

Pasco: Gesa Stadium. . . .$3,000,000

Port Angeles: Civic Field. . . .$600,000

Ridgefield: Ridgefield Outdoor Recreational Complex. . . .$450,000

Spokane County: Avista Stadium. . . .$5,800,000

Tacoma: Cheney Stadium. . . .$3,000,000

Walla Walla: Borleske Stadium. . . .$525,000

Wenatchee Valley College: Paul Thomas Sr. Field. . . .$700,000

Yakima County: Yakima County Stadium. . . .$525,000

(2) The funding appropriated under this section must be combined with local funds.

(3) The department may not expend funding for a project in this section unless and until the nonstate share of that project's costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(4) Prior to receiving funding, grant recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to grants for preconstruction activities or grants in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the department finds the grantee to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(6) $360,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for administrative costs.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$360,000

Youth Athletic Facility Account—State
. . . .
$24,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$24,360,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$24,360,000

Sec. 1026. 2023 c 474 s 1026 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Dental Capacity Grants (92001393)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Funding provided in this section must be used for the construction and equipment directly associated with dental facilities. The funding provided in this section is for projects that are maintained for at least a 10-year period and provide capacity to address unmet patient need and increase efficiency in dental access.

(2) The amount provided in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Columbia Basin Health Association. . . .$300,000

Community Health Association of Spokane. . . .$80,000

Community Health Center of Snohomish County. . . .$300,000

CVCH East Wenatchee Dental Clinic (East Wenatchee). . . .$1,850,000

HealthPoint (Seattle). . . .$490,000

Lake Roosevelt Community Health Center (Inchelium). . . .$160,000

Lake Roosevelt Community Health Center (Keller). . . .$80,000

Moses Lake Community Health Center. . . .$72,000

Neighborcare Health (Seattle). . . .$1,800,000

Peninsula Community Health Services (Bremerton). . . .$495,000

PNWU Dental School (Yakima). . . .$5,000,000

Sea Mar Community Health Center (Tacoma). . . .$3,500,000

Seattle Indian Health Board (Seattle). . . .$305,000

Yakima Dental Clinic. . . .$4,400,000

Yakima Valley Farm Workers Clinic (Kennewick). . . .$4,000,000
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($17,680,000))

$22,832,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($70,720,000))

$91,328,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($88,400,000))

$114,160,000

Sec. 1027. 2023 c 474 s 1019 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023-25 Youth Shelters and Housing (91001682)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Community Youth Services (Olympia). . . .$200,000

Housing and Services for Youth Wellness (Seattle). . . .$5,000,000

New Horizons (King County). . . .$75,000

OlyCap Pfeiffer House (Port Townsend). . . .(($70,000))$97,000

ROOTS Young Adult Shelter Phase 2 Renovations

(Seattle). . . .$1,500,000

Safe Harbor Support Center (Kennewick). . . .$300,000

Serenity House (Port Angeles). . . .$50,000

Shelton Young Adult Transitional Housing (Shelton). . . .$1,200,000

Skagit Valley Family YMCA (Mt. Vernon). . . .$2,200,000

VOA Crosswalk 2.0 (Spokane). . . .$2,500,000

YouthCare (Seattle). . . .(($1,500,000))

$2,500,000

(2) The department may not expend funding for a project in this section unless and until the nonstate share of that project's costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(3) Prior to receiving funding, grant recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to grants for preconstruction activities or grants in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(4) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the department finds the grantee to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($14,520,000))

$15,622,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($58,080,000))

$62,488,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($72,600,000))

$78,110,000

Sec. 1028. 2023 c 474 s 1035 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Local Emission Reduction Projects (91002184)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for the following list of projects:

Algae Carbon Sequestration and Regenerative Soils. . . .$2,500,000

C6 Forest to Farm Biochar Pilot Plant

(Leavenworth). . . .$1,425,000

Carbon Sequestration Prairie Restoration. . . .$2,000,000

College Place Fire Department Energy Efficiency. . . .$1,137,000

Douglas PUD Storage & Fuel Cell. . . .$1,398,000

Great Northern School District HVAC

Installation (Spokane). . . .$1,613,000

((Hydrogen Storage & Fuel Cell for Peak Shaving

(Okanogan). . . .$1,648,000))

Kenmore Public Works Geothermal System. . . .$464,000

KVH Hydrogen Storage System. . . .$250,000

Meydenbauer Center Energy Efficiency (Bellevue). . . .$6,000,000

Outdoor Fields LED Retrofit and Solar Installation

(Tukwila). . . .$500,000

Process Water Reuse Facility (Pasco). . . .$5,050,000

Silver Bay Logging Property Acquisition. . . .$1,250,000

Small Faces Preschool HVAC Upgrades (Seattle). . . .$435,000

Squaxin Island Tribe Blue Carbon Sequestration. . . .$3,050,000

Tacoma Power Grid Upgrades & Feasibility Study. . . .$2,875,000

Temple Association Energy Efficiency Improvements. . . .$40,000

Waterfront Low Carbon District Energy System

(Bellingham). . . .$100,000

(2) The department may not expend funding for a project in this section unless and until the nonstate share of that project's costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.

(3) Prior to receiving funding, grant recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to grants for preconstruction activities or grants in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.

(4) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the department finds the grantee to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(5)(a) This section takes effect January 1, 2025.

(b) If the climate commitment account or the natural climate solutions account is repealed as of December 30, 2024, then this section is null and void on December 31, 2024.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
(($15,346,000))

$19,862,000

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
(($1,425,000))

$10,225,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($16,771,000))

$30,087,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($16,771,000))

$30,087,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1029. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Affordable Housing Repair Fund (91002470)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for affordable housing urgent repair grants to be provided on an ongoing basis. Funding is not subject to the 60-day notification requirement in RCW 43.185A.150. The funding may be provided to address nonreoccurring repair projects including repair of units or buildings, abatement of potentially hazardous materials, and safety-related structural improvements of affordable housing. Each repair grant award may not exceed $200,000 per award. However, the department may not limit the number of awards or amount received per organization.

(2) For purposes of this section, "affordable housing" means:

(a) Permanent supportive housing as defined in RCW 36.70A.030; and

(b) Multifamily affordable housing projects in the housing trust fund portfolio.

(3) If the department receives application requests that exceed the appropriation level, the department must prioritize projects under subsection (2)(a) of this section.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1030. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Multifamily Bldg Efficiency Grants (91002449)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $55,000,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to issue grants to affordable multifamily projects within the housing trust fund portfolio to decarbonize and transition off the direct use of fossil fuels.

(2) Grants may include, but are not limited to: Conducting benchmarking, technical assistance, energy management, operations and maintenance planning, deep retrofits, energy efficiency upgrades and greenhouse gas emission reductions, renewable energy generation, installation of high-efficiency electric appliances and equipment, including high-efficiency heat pumps, and other decarbonization investments.

(3) Individual grant awards may not exceed $10,000,000. The department must award funding at a sufficient level to complete the financing package necessary for an applicant to accomplish the requested scope of work. The department must prioritize providing meaningful benefits to vulnerable populations in overburdened communities as defined in RCW 70A.02.010.

(4)(a) This section takes effect January 1, 2025.

(b) If the climate commitment account is repealed as of December 30, 2024, then this section is null and void on December 31, 2024.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$55,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$220,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$275,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1031. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Grants for Recovery Residences (91002477)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

The appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to recovery residences. The department must coordinate with the Washington alliance for quality recovery residences to create a competitive grant program for the following purposes:

(1) Acquisition of homes that are currently operated or will be operated by Oxford houses; and

(2) New construction, acquisition, or rehabilitation of recovery residences that are listed or plan to be listed on the recovery residences registry in RCW 41.05.760.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1032. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

HB 2131 - Thermal Energy Networks (91002447)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) This section takes effect January 1, 2025.

(2) If the climate commitment account is repealed as of December 30, 2024, then this section is null and void on December 31, 2024.

(3) If House Bill No. 2131 (thermal energy networks) is not enacted by June 30, 2024, this section is null and void.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1033. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Clean Building Performance Grants (91002451)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $25,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for clean building performance grants for tier 1 covered buildings as defined in RCW 19.27A.200.

(2) $20,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for clean building performance grants for public buildings.

(3) This section takes effect January 1, 2025.

(4) If the climate commitment account is repealed as of December 30, 2024, then this section is null and void on December 31, 2024.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$45,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$180,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$225,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1034. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Public Utility Relocation Projects (91002458)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The funding in this section is provided solely for loans to local governments for utility relocation projects associated with fish barrier removal projects.

(2) Projects may receive reduced interest rates or extended repayment periods for projects that meet financial hardship criteria as measured by the affordability index or similar standard measure of financial hardship.

(3) Interest rates established for loans issued under this section must be consistent with RCW 43.155.060(2).

(4) The repayment of any loan made from the public works assistance account under this section must be deposited into the public works assistance account for uses consistent with chapter 43.155 RCW.

(5) $7,032,000 of the public works assistance account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of utility relocation projects associated with fish barrier removal projects:

Clallam PUD Lee's Creek Culvert Replacement . . . .$950,000

Grays Harbor PUD Utility Relocation Projects. . . .$487,000

Jefferson PUD Chimacum Creek Fish Barrier Removal. . . .$825,000

Kittitas PUD Liberty Road Swauk Creek Project. . . .$26,000

Mason County North Bay/Case Inlet Project. . . .$240,000

Mason PUD No. 1 Lilliwaup Corner Project. . . .$1,250,000

Mason PUD No. 1 S.R. 106 McReavy Culvert Replacement. . . .$12,000

Mason PUD No. 3 Utility Relocation Projects. . . .$1,840,000

Skagit PUD Hansen Creek Project. . . .$450,000

Skagit PUD Olsen Creek Project. . . .$300,000

Thurston PUD Green Cove Creek Project. . . .$652,000
Appropriation:

Public Works Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$7,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$7,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1035. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Harborview (91002471)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

The appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to King county for the implementation of projects listed in the 2020 Harborview bond initiative and variations thereof, including expansion of those projects. The appropriation provided must be used for predesign, siting, and design costs related to a new behavioral health services building, and predevelopment costs for a Pioneer Square behavioral health services clinic. The county must submit any predesign to the appropriate legislative committees by February 1, 2025.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1036. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Energy Northwest (92001720)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $25,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely as nonfederal support for energy northwest's participation in the United States department of energy's loan programs office part 2 application, including due diligence review and environmental impact review. The legislature intends to leverage federal funds whenever possible and is a committed partner with the United States department of energy in funding activities that increase carbon free clean energy.

(2) Consistent with the provisions of RCW 70A.65.305, the department must consult with any affected federally recognized tribe on the potential effect of this project on tribal resources. Consultation must be initiated before project funds are made available.

(3) This section takes effect January 1, 2025.

(4) If the climate commitment account is repealed as of December 30, 2024, then this section is null and void on December 31, 2024.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1037. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Climate Resilience & Environmental Equity Campus (91002476)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department's office of economic development to contract with an economic development corporation to analyze and provide recommendations related to the creation and implementation of a climate resilience and environmental equity campus to be located in southern King county. The department's analysis must include evaluation of multiple sites in southern King county for their suitability as a campus pursuant to this section.

(2) The analysis process created in subsection (1) of this section must include iterative consultation with the following stakeholders: (a) Potential industry partners in the fields of climate resilience and environmental equity; (b) the state board of community and technical colleges, including Highline community college; (c) the public four-year institutions of higher education; (d) private institutions of higher education; (e) entities with expertise in the provision of early learning, including outdoor early learning; (f) the office of the superintendent of public instruction; (g) the department of natural resources; (h) an environmental scientist with knowledge of climate resilience; (i) entities in the fields of environmental justice, environmental equity, and community and civic engagement; (j) the city of Auburn; (k) the city of Federal Way; (l) the greater Federal Way chamber of commerce; and (m) members of the house of representatives serving southern King county. The department must also request consultation and participation from local Indian tribes in this process.

(3) The recommendations provided pursuant to subsection (1) of this section must include identification of: (a) The educational and community engagement programming to be offered on the campus, including climate resilience and environmental equity programming; (b) potential industry partners for development of the campus; and (c) potential funding options to support the creation, maintenance, and operations of the campus, including state, federal, and private sources.

(4) The recommendations provided pursuant to subsection (1) of this section must be developed with the intent to create a campus that would: (a) Create workforce training opportunities for postsecondary students pursuing careers in climate-focused science, technology, engineering, and mathematics through on-site training and internships in science, technology, engineering, mathematics, social justice, community engagement, and civic skills; (b) develop and strengthen college and university-industry relationships through promotion of faculty collaboration with the climate science and environmental resilience industry; (c) encourage a full range of projects from small research projects to large scale, multipartner projects; (d) work with industry partners to effectively market career opportunities in climate-focused science, technology, engineering, and mathematics in Washington state, diversify the workforce, and educate the public on the pathways to success in these career fields; (e) work with colleges, universities, and industry partners to develop an industry-recognized certificate to be offered to postsecondary students who complete training at the climate resilience and environmental equity campus; and (f) create educational opportunities for younger learners, including those enrolled in early learning and in kindergarten through the 12th grade, to engage with climate science and the natural world.

(5) The department must report its analysis and recommendations pursuant to this section to the governor and the legislature no later than December 31, 2024.
Appropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$250,000

Sec. 1038. 2023 c 474 s 1045 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Capitol Campus Security & Safety Enhancements (40000226)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1110, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.

(2) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Capitol Campus Access Controls - Exterior Doors. . . .$1,000,000

Executive Residence Video Surveillance and Lighting

Improvements. . . .$540,000

Wedge Barriers - Syd Snyder & Water Street. . . .$1,570,000

Executive Residence – Fencing, Gates, Bollards. . . .$1,621,000
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,135,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($3,110,000))

$4,731,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$922,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$11,682,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($20,849,000))

$22,470,000

Sec. 1039. 2023 c 474 s 1047 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Campus - Critical Fire System Upgrades (40000245)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided ((to fund the first item on the department's prioritized list of critical fire system upgrades. The legislature intends to fund further priorities in the 2024 supplemental capital budget upon completion of the department's evaluation and final prioritization of fire system upgrades.))for the following list of projects:

Dolliver Building. . . .$268,000

Executive Residence. . . .$245,000

Highway License Building. . . .$1,020,000

Old Capitol Building. . . .$1,191,000

Perry Street Child Care Center. . . .$41,000

Temple of Justice. . . .$908,000
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,020,000))

$3,673,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($8,000,000))

$14,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($9,020,000))

$17,673,000

Sec. 1040. 2023 c 474 s 1054 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Washington Building (40000331)

((The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,200,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for replacement of the roof and for asbestos abatement.

(2) $2,801,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for replacement of the HVAC system.))
Appropriation:

((Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$2,801,000))

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($2,200,000))

$1,001,000

((Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$5,001,000))

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($5,001,000))

$1,001,000

Sec. 1041. 2023 c 474 s 1055 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Old Cap - Roof Replacement (40000338)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,276,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State
. . . .
$1,474,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$6,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($5,579,000))

$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($7,053,000))

$6,750,000

Sec. 1042. 2023 c 474 s 1061 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Legislative Campus Modernization (92000020)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1059, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.

(2) The department must consult with the senate facilities and operations committee or its designees and the house of representatives' executive rules committee or its designees at least every other month.

(3) All appropriations must be coded and tracked as separate discrete subprojects in the agency financial reporting system.

(4) If the department receives information, after value engineering has been performed, that projected costs for any of the subprojects in subsections (5), (6), or (7) of this section will exceed the amount provided in the respective subsections, including projected costs in future biennia, the department must timely notify and provide that information in writing to the project executive team. Prior to proceeding with design or construction, the department must:

(a) Provide at least three options that do not include square footage reduction to reduce the subproject costs to stay within the amount provided for that subproject and the project schedule;

(b) Consult with the project executive team on the options offered, prior to proceeding with a reduced cost option; and

(c) Receive majority consensus from the project executive team to either adopt and move forward with reduced cost options that bring the subproject costs within amounts appropriated or adopt a tentative modified budget for the subproject. If a tentative modified budget is adopted, the department must seek additional funding in the next agency budget submittal.

(5) (($20,751,000))$25,651,000 of the ((amount provided))state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Irv Newhouse building replacement design and construction subproject on opportunity site six west. The department must:

(a) Start Newhouse building construction by July 1, 2023;

(b) Complete Newhouse building construction by October 31, 2024; and

(c) Consult with the leadership of the senate, or their designees, at least every month, beginning July 1, 2023.

(6) (($87,000,000))$84,593,000 of the ((amount provided))state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the rehabilitation, design, and construction of the Pritchard building and the renovation of the John L. O'Brien building subproject. The legislature intends to provide funding in the amount of (($136,504,000))$134,097,000 over the course of the 2023-2025 and the 2025-2027 fiscal biennia for design and construction of this project. Pursuant to RCW 43.88.130, the department may enter into a multibiennium contract for the construction of the subproject. Nothing in this section authorizes the agency to make an expenditure without an appropriation.

(7) (($4,865,000))$11,872,000 of the ((amount provided))state building construction account—state appropriation and $1,000,000 of the climate commitment act—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for the legislative campus modernization global subproject that includes, but is not limited to, the visitor lot (opportunity site six east), 15th avenue southwest, the John A. Cherberg parking lot on 15th avenue southwest, the John L. O'Brien parking lot on 15th avenue southwest, Columbia street site work, the legislative modular building, and Water street site work.

(8) $1,000,000 of the model toxics control capital account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for Newhouse parcel soil decontamination.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$72,346,000

Thurston County Capital Facilities Account—State
. . . .
$2,665,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$75,011,000

Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($112,616,000))

$122,116,000

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$124,116,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$14,925,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$49,504,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($252,056,000))

$263,556,000

Sec. 1043. 2023 c 474 s 1065 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Tri-Cities Readiness Center (30000808)
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,421,000

((Military Department Capital Account—

State
. . . .
$204,000))

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$265,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($1,890,000))

$1,686,000

Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$2,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$944,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,944,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$16,010,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($20,844,000))

$20,640,000

Sec. 1044. 2023 c 474 s 1070 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Camp Murray Bldg 34 Renovation (40000192)
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
(($4,915,000))

$5,410,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($3,425,000))

$4,589,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($8,340,000))

$9,999,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($8,340,000))

$9,999,000

(End of part)

PART 2

HUMAN SERVICES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2001. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Child Study & Treatment Center-Gymnasium: Floor Replacement (40000555)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,925,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,925,000

Sec. 2002. 2023 c 474 s 2026 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-Water System: Assessment and Improvements (40001089)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: As part of its assessment, the department must conduct a long-term cost-benefit analysis of transitioning the water system to the ((City of)) Lakewood Water District and any cost mitigation strategies available to the state.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,490,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,490,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2003. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Olympic Heritage Behavioral Health – Facility Modernization (40001145)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$14,555,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$10,350,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$24,905,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2004. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital-East Campus: Well Replacement (40001149)
Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$4,540,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,540,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2005. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Olympic Heritage Behavioral Health - Facility Purchase (40001153)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$30,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,000,000

Sec. 2006. 2023 c 474 s 6148 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Child Study & Treatment Center – Youth Housing (91000084)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$350,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,061,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($0))

$31,849,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($350,000))

$37,260,000

Sec. 2007. 2023 c 474 s 2031 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Maple Lane - Rapid BH Bed Capacity (92000046)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$800,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$21,070,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,200,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($41,270,000))

$42,070,000

Sec. 2008. 2023 c 474 s 2035 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking Water System Rehabilitations and Consolidations (40000065)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $2,214,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to facilitate a water supply agreement between the City of North Bend and the Sallal Water System. Of that amount, $1,507,000 must be distributed to the Sallal Water System and $707,000 to the City of North Bend, conditional on a signed water supply agreement that ensures ((a minimum of))up to 100 acre feet per year of ((permanent)) mitigation water supply ((for))to the city for a minimum of 30 years.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$12,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$17,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2009. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Emergency Generator for Environmental Laboratory Wing (40000072)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$3,219,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,219,000

Sec. 2010. 2023 c 474 s 2044 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

WSVC - Burial and Columbarium Expansion Grant (40000092)
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
(($3,000,000))

$4,868,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($300,000))

$541,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,300,000))

$5,409,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($3,300,000))

$5,409,000

Sec. 2011. 2023 c 474 s 2046 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

DVA ARPA Federal Funds & State Match (91000013)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are subject to the provisions of section 7064 of this act, except that the department may apply for federal funding other than that under section 8004 of the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117.2, and minor works projects funded under this section need not meet the requirements of section 8004 of the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117.2.
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
(($24,495,000))

$24,515,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($10,849,000))

$10,882,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($35,344,000))

$35,397,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,810,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($55,000))

$2,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$42,209,000

Sec. 2012. 2023 c 474 s 2049 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Echo Glen Secure Facility Improvements (40000546)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($8,050,000))

$13,374,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($8,050,000))

$13,374,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2013. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Green Hill School HVAC Upgrades (40000584)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Hawthorn Living Unit. . . .$1,251,000

Maple Living Unit. . . .$1,251,000

Building F . . . .$293,000
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,795,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$13,652,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$16,447,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2014. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES

Echo Glen Academic School Walkway Roofing & Lighting (40000586)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2015. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WCCW: MSC Living Unit Bathroom Renovations (40000263)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$8,290,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,540,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2016. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Westside Prison Housing Unit HVAC (40000516)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2017. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

SW: Security Electronics Renewal & Adaptation (40000523)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2018. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

SW: Fire Alarm Systems Stabilization Project (40000524)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2019. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

SW: Perimeter Fence Detection Stabilization Project (40000525)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2020. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WSP: IMU South Fire Protection & Smoke Dampers (40000526)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,622,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,622,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2021. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WCCW: Women's Elder Care Unit (40000527)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2022. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WCC: Medical Intake Modular Building (40000528)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,200,000

(End of part)

PART 3

NATURAL RESOURCES

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3001. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Cleanup Settlement Account Projects (40000613)
Appropriation:

Cleanup Settlement Account—State
. . . .
$2,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3002. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Eastside Fire and Rescue Pilot PFAS Cleanup (40000618)
Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3003. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

City of Ruston Contamination Remediation (91000390)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to provide grants to the city of Ruston for portions of environmental cleanup costs not fully reimbursed by the settlement agreement with the American smelting and refining company LLC (ASARCO) for the Tacoma smelter site for the following list of projects:

Rust Park Remediation Phase 1 Land Acquisition

and Site Preparation. . . .$705,000

Ruston Right-of-Way Contaminated Soil Testing. . . .$175,000

Winnifred Street Contaminated Soil Hauling. . . .$229,000
Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$1,109,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,109,000

Sec. 3004. 2023 c 474 s 3032 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Landfill Methane Capture (40000611)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

((The))(1) $10,100,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to administer a grant program for landfills to comply with methane emission requirements established in chapter 70A.540 RCW.

(2) $4,900,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Cowlitz County PUD Landfill Methane Capture project.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$60,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$75,000,000

Sec. 3005. 2023 c 474 s 3046 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Nisqually New Full Service Park (40000153)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,244,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($21,825,000))

$25,327,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$4,739,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($15,099,000))

$16,033,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($51,907,000))

$56,343,000

Sec. 3006. 2023 c 474 s 6352 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Flagler Historic Theater Restoration (40000188)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$67,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,367,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$129,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($196,000))

$1,563,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3007. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lake Sammamish Dock Design & Permitting (40000461)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,500,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,750,000

Sec. 3008. 2023 c 474 s 3051 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

2023-25 Capital Preservation Pool (91000443)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for minor works projects, as described in section 8017 of this act.

(2) The state parks and recreation commission may not use the appropriation in this section for planning, predesign, or design costs that will result in a request for construction funding in a subsequent biennium.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($19,932,000))

$20,382,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($79,728,000))

$81,528,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($99,660,000))

$101,910,000

Sec. 3009. 2023 c 474 s 3050 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Fort Worden ((PDA Geothermal Heating))Energy Efficiency Update (40000457)
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$7,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,000,000

Sec. 3010. 2023 c 474 s 3056 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2023-25 Salmon Recovery Funding Board Grant Programs (40000054)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,400,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely to maintain the lead entity program as described in chapter 77.85 RCW.

(2) $640,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for regional fisheries enhancement groups created in RCW 77.95.060.

(3)(a) This section takes effect January 1, 2025.

(b) If the natural climate solutions account is repealed as of December 30, 2024, then this section is null and void on December 31, 2024.
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$75,000,000

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
$25,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$20,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($95,000,000))

$120,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($380,000,000))

$480,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($475,000,000))

$600,000,000

Sec. 3011. 2023 c 474 s 3062 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2023-25 Community Forest Grant Program (40000060)

The appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. RCO-5-2023, developed April 10, 2023.

(2) The natural climate solutions account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. RCO-1-2024, developed February 1, 2024. Projects on LEAP capital document No. RCO-1-2024 funded under this subsection are not also eligible to receive funding as alternate projects on LEAP capital document No. RCO-5-2023.

(3)(a) This section takes effect January 1, 2025.

(b) If the natural climate solutions account is repealed as of December 30, 2024, then this section is null and void on December 31, 2024.
Appropriation:

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
$5,770,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$7,807,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$13,577,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($31,228,000))

$54,308,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($39,035,000))

$67,885,000

Sec. 3012. 2023 c 474 s 3065 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2023-25 Washington Coastal Restoration and Resiliency Initiative (40000063)

The appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided under subsection (2) of this section, the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. RCO-8-2023, developed April 10, 2023.

(2) The recreation and conservation funding board may retain a portion of the funds appropriated from the state building construction account—state in this section for the administration of the grants. The portion of the funding retained for administration may not exceed 4.12 percent of the appropriation.

(3)(a) Except as provided for under (b) of this subsection, the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. RCO-2-2024, developed February 1, 2024. Projects on LEAP capital document No. RCO-2-2024 funded under this subsection (3) are not also eligible to receive funding as alternate projects on LEAP capital document No. RCO-8-2023.

(b) The board may retain up to $314,000 of the amounts appropriated in this subsection (3) for administration of the grants.

(4)(a) This section takes effect January 1, 2025.

(b) If the natural climate solutions account is repealed as of December 30, 2024, then this section is null and void on December 31, 2024.
Appropriation:

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
$7,928,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,134,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$18,062,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($40,536,000))

$72,248,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($50,670,000))

$90,310,000

Sec. 3013. 2023 c 474 s 3066 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2023-25 Brian Abbott Fish Barrier Removal Board (40000064)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) ((Except as provided under subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the))(a) $21,092,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation and $27,315,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation((s)) in this section are provided solely for projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. RCO-6-2023, developed April 10, 2023.

(((2)))(b) The recreation and conservation funding board may retain a portion of the funding appropriated in ((this section))(a) of this subsection for the administration of the grants. The portion of the funding retained for administration may not exceed $1,356,000 from the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section.

(((3)))(c) The department of fish and wildlife may retain up to $1,862,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in ((this section))(a) of this subsection for the Brian Abbott fish barrier removal board for technical assistance in developing projects for consideration.

(2)(a) $22,198,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. RCO-3-2024, developed February 1, 2024. Projects on LEAP capital document No. RCO-3-2024 funded under this subsection are not also eligible to receive funding as alternate projects on LEAP capital document No. RCO-6-2023.

(b) The recreation and conservation funding board may retain a portion of the funding appropriated in (a) of this subsection for the administration of the grants. The portion of the funding retained for administration may not exceed $622,000 from the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation in this section.

(c) The department of fish and wildlife may retain up to $854,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation in (a) of this subsection for the Brian Abbott fish barrier removal board for technical assistance in developing projects for consideration.

(3)(a) This section takes effect January 1, 2025.

(b) If the natural climate solutions account is repealed as of December 30, 2024, then this section is null and void on December 31, 2024.
Appropriation:

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
(($21,092,000))

$43,290,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$27,315,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($48,407,000))

$70,605,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($193,628,000))

$282,420,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($242,035,000))

$353,025,000

Sec. 3014. 2023 c 474 s 3064 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2023-25 Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (40000062)

The appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) ((Except as provided under subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the))(a) The state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. RCO-7-2023, developed April 10, 2023.

(((2)))(b) The recreation and conservation funding board may retain a portion of the funding appropriated in ((this section))(a) of this subsection for the administration of the grants. The portion of the funding retained for administration may not exceed $545,000.

(((3)))(c) The department of fish and wildlife may retain a portion of the funding appropriated in ((this section))(a) of this subsection for costs related to technical assistance and program administration. The portion of the funding retained for costs related to technical assistance and program administration may not exceed $545,000.

(2)(a) The natural climate solutions account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. RCO-4-2024, developed February 1, 2024. Projects on LEAP capital document No. RCO-4-2024 funded under this subsection are not also eligible to receive funding as alternate projects on LEAP capital document No. RCO-7-2023.

(b) The recreation and conservation funding board may retain up to $423,000 of the funding appropriated in (a) of this subsection for the administration of the grants.

(c) The department of fish and wildlife may retain up to $423,000 of the funding appropriated in (a) of this subsection for costs related to technical assistance and program administration.

(3)(a) This section takes effect January 1, 2025.

(b) If the natural climate solutions account is repealed as of December 30, 2024, then this section is null and void on December 31, 2024.
Appropriation:

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
$11,110,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$14,309,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$25,419,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($57,236,000))

$101,676,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($71,545,000))

$127,095,000

Sec. 3015. 2023 c 474 s 3060 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2023-25 Youth Athletics Facilities (40000058)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. RCO-3.1-2023, developed ((April 10))February 1, ((2023))2024.
Appropriation:

Youth Athletic Facility Account—State
. . . .
$10,440,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$41,760,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$52,200,000

Sec. 3016. 2023 c 474 s 3080 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

2023-25 Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program (CREP) (40000023)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The state conservation commission may expend the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section as grants to private land owners who were enrolled in the conservation reserve enhancement program, and whose acreage meets state program goals of providing riparian habitat or hydrologically connected wetland enhancements in salmon-bearing streams as determined by the Washington state department of fish and wildlife, but are now disenrolled due to a contract termination by the United States department of agriculture (USDA) farm service agency, or who voluntary terminated their enrollment as a result of the USDA farm service agency audit.
Appropriation:

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
$11,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$60,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$75,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3017. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Anaerobic Digester Development (91001830)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $22,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to dairy farm owners for cost share agreements regarding anaerobic digester development. Grants awarded for anaerobic digester development must have at least a 50 percent nonstate match and be awarded through a competitive process that considers:

(i) The amount of greenhouse gas reduction expected to be achieved by the proposal; and

(ii) The amount of untreated effluent expected to be reduced by the proposal.

(b) Recipients of grants under this section must provide a report to the commission within one year of receipt of the grant, detailing the success of the project in meeting the stated criteria in the competitive process.

(2) $2,900,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the commission to provide financial and technical assistance for project predevelopment.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$24,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$99,600,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$124,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3018. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Ringold Hatchery Replace Ponds (40000101)
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$10,834,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,834,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3019. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Sekiu Boat Ramp Acquisition (40000255)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,703,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,312,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,015,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3020. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Washougal Intake Replacement (92001252)
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$14,274,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,274,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3021. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Mitchell Act BiOp Implementation (92001251)
Appropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$536,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$536,000

Sec. 3022. 2023 c 474 s 3115 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2023-25 State Trust Land Replacement (40000145)
Appropriation:

Community and Technical College Forest Reserve

Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Natural Resources Real Property Replacement

Account—State
. . . .
$49,571,000

Resource Management Cost Account—State
. . . .
(($30,000,000))

$5,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($80,571,000))

$55,571,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($322,284,000))

$202,284,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($402,855,000))

$257,855,000

Sec. 3023. 2023 c 474 s 3120 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Revitalizing Trust Land Transfers (40000152)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

((The))(1) $9,325,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation and $8,000,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation((s)) in this section are provided solely for projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. DNR-1-2023, developed April 10, 2023.

(2) $8,304,000 of the natural climate solutions account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. DNR-1-2024, developed February 1, 2024.

(3)(a) This section takes effect January 1, 2025.

(b) If the natural climate solutions account is repealed as of December 30, 2024, then this section is null and void on December 31, 2024.
Appropriation:

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
(($8,000,000))

$16,304,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,325,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($17,325,000))

$25,629,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($69,300,000))

$102,516,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($86,625,000))

$128,145,000

Sec. 3024. 2023 c 474 s 3122 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

2023-25 Minor Works Preservation (40000154)
Appropriation:

Model Toxics Control Capital Account—State
. . . .
$824,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($4,484,000))

$5,219,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,308,000))

$6,043,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($21,232,000))

$24,828,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($26,540,000))

$30,871,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3025. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Port Angeles Fire and Seasonal Employee Housing (40000409)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$488,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$3,332,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,820,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3026. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Land Bank Spending Authority (40000410)
Appropriation:

Land Bank Account—State
. . . .
$20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$80,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$100,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3027. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Drought Resilience Infrastructure Investments (40000411)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section from the natural climate solutions account—state takes effect January 1, 2025.

(2) If the natural climate solutions account is repealed as of December 30, 2024, then the amount appropriated in this section from the natural climate solutions account—state shall lapse on December 31, 2024.
Appropriation:

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
$500,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$250,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3028. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Recreational Target Shooting Pilot Sites (40000413)
Appropriation:

Firearms Range Account—State
. . . .
$900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3029. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

YMCA Camp Colman (40000424)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to contract with the YMCA of greater Seattle to design the relocation or replacement of existing cabins and infrastructure that will be directly affected by the removal of a tidal gate and restoration of fish passage at Whiteman Cove.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$532,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$3,138,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,670,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3030. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Encumbered Lands - Acquisition (91000323)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) This section takes effect January 1, 2025.

(2) If the natural climate solutions account is repealed as of December 30, 2024, then this section is null and void on December 31, 2024.
Appropriation:

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
$25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3031. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Wildfire Reforestation on DNR-Managed Lands (92000062)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) This section takes effect January 1, 2025.

(2) If the natural climate solutions account is repealed as of December 30, 2024, then this section is null and void on December 31, 2024.
Appropriation:

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$40,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3032. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Fallen Firefighter Memorial (SHB 2091) (91000328)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for preconstruction and administrative implementation pursuant to Substitute House Bill No. 2091.

(2) If Substitute House Bill No. 2091 (fallen firefighter memorial) is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$371,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$490,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$861,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3033. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

Agricultural Carbon Storage and Sequestration (40000001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to improve carbon storage and sequestration on agricultural lands.

(2) Only agricultural producers with revenue that is less than $3,500,000 annually that the department in its discretion considers small farms are eligible to receive grants. The department must prioritize funds for historically underserved producers including farmers and ranchers who are beginning, socially disadvantaged, veterans, and have limited resources.

(3) Eligible activities include:

(a) Agricultural management practices focused on soil health that will result in improved carbon outcomes, including carbon storage, sequestration, or reducing greenhouse gas emissions;

(b) Research that creates tools intended to support farms in reducing greenhouse gas emissions or improving carbon storage and sequestration; and

(c) Activities pursuant to (a) and (b) by applying live, native algae produced and delivered on farms.

(4)(a) This section takes effect January 1, 2025.

(b) If the natural climate solutions account is repealed as of December 30, 2024, then this section is null and void on December 31, 2024.
Appropriation:

Natural Climate Solutions Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3034. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

State Lands Assessment (91000011)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $200,000 of the state taxable building construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department, in consultation with the department of natural resources, to perform an assessment of unused and underutilized state-owned, unimproved lands to determine the suitability of such lands for agricultural purposes, including grazing. For the purposes of this section, "underutilized state-owned lands" means lands that do not assist in meeting the goals of the state agency that owns or manages the land and that are already being considered for sale or surplus. "Underutilized state-owned lands" does not include state-owned lands held under lease, held in trust, or that are otherwise intended for specific purposes.

(2) $100,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to incorporate into the assessment an examination of the use of such lands for agrivoltaics. For the purposes of this section, "agrivoltaics" means the use of land that intentionally integrates agriculture and solar photovoltaic energy generation.

(3) The department must complete the assessment by June 1, 2025, and must submit it to the governor, the commissioner of public lands, the director of the Washington State University energy program, the director of the department of commerce, and the committees of the legislature with jurisdiction over agricultural matters.

(4)(a) Subsection (2) of this section takes effect January 1, 2025.

(b) If the climate commitment account is repealed as of December 30, 2024, then subsection (2) of this section is null and void on December 31, 2024, and the amount appropriated in this section from the climate commitment account—state shall lapse.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$100,000

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$200,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$300,000

(End of part)

PART 4

TRANSPORTATION

Reserved.

PART 5

EDUCATION

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5001. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

School Construction Assistance Program Revision (SCAPR) Planning (91000535)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction for the following purposes: (a) To develop a proposal to replace the school construction assistance program with a new, competitive model for awarding state grants for the construction and modernization of common school facilities; (b) to contract with a consultant to develop the proposal pursuant to (a) of this subsection; and (c) to facilitate the stakeholder process in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) The proposal development process identified in subsection (1) of this section must include iterative consultation and meetings with the following entities: (a) School districts, including educational service districts; (b) the governor or the governor's designee; (c) the chairs and ranking members of the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature or their designees; (d) the office of the superintendent of public instruction's technical advisory committee; and (e) other stakeholders deemed appropriate by the stakeholder group in this subsection. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must convene a meeting with the chairs and ranking members of the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature or their designees to discuss a work plan, a draft request for proposals to hire a consultant pursuant to this section, a facilitation plan that may include professional facilitation, and a schedule pursuant to this subsection no later than April 15, 2024.

(3) The proposal developed under subsection (1) of this section must include: (a) A process that recognizes the substantial variation between district sizes and financial capacities that categorizes reasonably comparable applicants into distinct school district groupings in order to foster a fair and equitable prioritization of projects; (b) a process for prioritizing requests for state funding for school construction that results in ranked project lists, using the groupings developed under (a) of this subsection for the governor and legislature's consideration during the biennial budget development process; (c) a formula or formulas for determining the state and school district shares of project cost, which may vary across the groupings established under (a) of this subsection; (d) policies regarding allowable space types and quantities to meet current and future instructional requirements and initiatives; (e) a recommendation regarding the appropriate entity, such as an advisory committee, to evaluate and prioritize project applications; (f) recommendations related to the development of prototypical school designs intended to enhance the student learning environment and the useful life of facilities, while also reducing design and construction costs; and (g) recommendations for timelines and processes by which the state and school districts can effectively transition from the existing school construction assistance program to the proposed program developed pursuant to this section.

(4) The project prioritization process developed under subsection (3) of this section must include consideration of: (a) District incorporation of prototypical designs; (b) projected enrollment; (c) facility condition and age; (d) factors related to school district financial capacity, such as remaining debt capacity and any special circumstances that may impact districts' ability to fund capital projects; (e) natural hazard conditions, including seismic and tsunami risk; and (f) any other factors deemed appropriate by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(5) The formula for determining the state and school district shares of project cost developed under subsection (3) of this section must include consideration of: (a) District incorporation of prototypical designs; (b) factors related to school district financial capacity, including remaining debt capacity, property tax rates, and median household income; (c) the market price of construction per square foot, with consideration of regional cost differences; and (d) any other factors deemed appropriate by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(6) It is the intent of the legislature to continue to fund the school construction assistance program through a transitional period and until such time as an alternative program has been developed and adopted by the legislature.

(7) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must submit an interim progress report pursuant to this section to the governor and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature, no later than December 1, 2024. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must submit a final report containing the proposal developed pursuant to this section, including draft legislation of the proposal, to the governor and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature, no later than June 30, 2025.
Appropriation:

Common School Construction Fund—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,000,000

Sec. 5002. 2023 c 474 s 5001 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

West Sound Technical Skills Center Modernization (40000015)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5003, chapter 269, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,990,000

Appropriation:

School Construction and Skill Centers Building

Account—State
. . . .
$755,000

((State Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$40,606,000))

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$40,606,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$41,361,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$410,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$44,343,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$97,104,000

Sec. 5003. 2023 c 474 s 5002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2023-25 School Construction Assistance Program (40000063)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($412,044,000))$86,223,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation ((and $171,097,000)), $201,170,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation, and $1,500,000 of the common school construction account—federal appropriation in this section are provided solely for school construction assistance grants for qualifying public school construction projects.

(2) (($5,031,000))$4,757,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for study and survey grants and for completing inventory and building condition assessments for public school districts every six years, and for the acquisition of art pursuant to RCW 28A.335.210.

(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must consult with the department of enterprise services and the department of commerce to identify cost-effective steps to achieve net-zero-readiness for new buildings and building modernization projects to comply with the clean buildings act.
Appropriation:

Common School Construction Fund—State
. . . .
(($176,128,000))

$205,927,000

Common School Construction Fund—Federal
. . . .
$1,500,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($412,044,000))

$86,223,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($588,172,000))

$293,650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($5,136,683,000))

$2,050,097,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($5,724,855,000))

$2,343,747,000

Sec. 5004. 2023 c 474 s 5003 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2023-25 Small District & Tribal Compact Schools Modernization (40000065)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($78,390,000))$240,646,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation ((and $3,000,000 of the common school construction fund—federal appropriation)) in this section ((are))is provided solely for modernization grants for small school districts authorized under RCW 28A.525.159. Of this amount, $135,000,000 is provided solely for small district modernization grants, not to exceed $6,000,000 per grant, to school districts that were awarded a planning grant during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium pursuant to LEAP capital document No. OSPI-1-2023, developed April 10, 2023. Small districts awarded a planning grant pursuant to this list that do not receive a modernization grant in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium are eligible for the maximum state funding level of $12,000,000 established under subsection (5)(a) of this section. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report the status and award amounts of all grants awarded pursuant to this section to the governor and appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature no later than October 15, 2024.

(2) (($1,496,000))$2,307,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for planning grants for small school districts authorized under RCW 28A.525.159. Planning grants may not exceed $50,000 per district. Planning grants may only be awarded to school districts with ((an)) estimated total project costs of $6,000,000 or less or $12,000,000 or less, as applicable under this section.

(3) $12,145,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for planning grants and modernization grants to state-tribal compact schools. The superintendent of public instruction may prioritize planning grants for state-tribal compact schools with the most serious building deficiencies and the most limited financial capacity.

(4) $5,000,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation and $1,800,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation in this section ((is))are provided solely for energy assessment grants for small school districts eligible under RCW 28A.525.159. Grant funding awarded may be used to perform facility energy assessments of instructional buildings.

(5)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall submit a list of small school district modernization projects, as prioritized by the advisory committee under RCW 28A.525.159, to the legislature and the governor by ((September))October 15, 2024. The list must include: (((a)))(i) A description of the project; (((b)))(ii) the proposed state funding level, not to exceed (($6,000,000))$12,000,000 per project; (((c)))(iii) estimated total project costs; and (((d)))(iv) local funding resources.

(b) In addition to the standard list required in (a) of this subsection, the superintendent of public instruction shall also submit an alternative list with the agency's request for capital appropriations for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium that includes small school districts with 3,000 students or less, with a state funding level not to exceed $12,000,000 per project. This list must include the following information: (i) A description of the project; (ii) the proposed state funding level; (iii) estimated total project costs; and (iv) local funding resources.

(6) ((The))(a) Subject to (b) of this subsection (6), the appropriations in this section may be awarded only to projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP capital document No. OSPI-1-2023, developed April 10, 2023, and in LEAP capital document No. OSPI-1-2024, developed February 1, 2024.

(b) To the extent that the amounts appropriated for small districts and state-tribal compact schools specified in the LEAP capital documents in (a) of this subsection exceed the actual costs of funding these projects, the department may reallocate excess funding to eligible projects pursuant to RCW 28A.525.159. However, the total funding appropriated to eligible small district projects must remain allocated to eligible small district projects, and the total funding appropriated to eligible state-tribal compact school projects must remain allocated to eligible state-tribal compact school projects.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($79,886,000))

$244,753,000

((Common School Construction Fund—Federal
. . . .
$3,000,000))

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$12,145,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($100,031,000))

$261,898,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($400,124,000))

$1,047,592,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($500,155,000))

$1,309,490,000

Sec. 5005. 2023 c 474 s 5005 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2023-25 School District Health and Safety (40000067)

The appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $5,000,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation and $6,000,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation in this section ((is))are provided solely for emergency repair grants to address unexpected and imminent health and safety hazards at K-12 public schools, including skill centers, that will impact the day-to-day operations of the school facility, and this is the maximum amount that may be spent for this purpose. For emergency repair grants only, an emergency declaration must be signed by the school district board of directors and submitted to the superintendent of public instruction for consideration. The emergency declaration must include a description of the imminent health and safety hazard, the possible cause, the proposed scope of emergency repair work and related cost estimate, and identification of local funding to be applied to the project. Grants of emergency repair moneys must be conditioned upon the written commitment and plan of the school district board of directors to repay the grant with any insurance payments or other judgments that may be awarded, if applicable.

(2) $11,600,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation and $10,000,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation in this section ((is))are provided solely for urgent repair grants to address nonreccurring urgent small repair projects at K-12 public schools, excluding skill centers, that could impact the health and safety of students and staff if not completed, and this is the maximum amount that may be spent for this purpose. The office of the superintendent of public instruction, after consulting with maintenance and operations administrators of school districts, shall develop criteria and assurances for providing funding for specific projects through a competitive grant program. The criteria and assurances must include, but are not limited to, the following: (a) Limiting school districts to one grant, not to exceed $500,000, per three-year period; (b) prioritizing applications based on limited school district financial resources for the project; and (c) requiring any district receiving funding provided in this section to demonstrate a consistent commitment to addressing school facility needs. The grant applications must include a comprehensive description of the health and safety issues to be addressed, a detailed description of the remedy, including a detailed cost estimate of the repair or replacement work to be performed, and identification of local funding, if any, which will be applied to the project. Grants may be used for, but are not limited to: Repair or replacement of failing building systems, abatement of potentially hazardous materials, and safety-related structural improvements.

(3) $3,600,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation and $2,500,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation in this section ((is))are provided solely for equal access grants for facility repairs and alterations at K-12 public schools, including skills centers, to improve compliance with the Americans with disabilities act and individuals with disabilities education act, and this is the maximum amount that may be spent for this purpose. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop criteria and assurances for providing funding for specific projects through a competitive grant program. The criteria and assurances must include, but are not limited to, the following: (a) Limiting districts to one grant, not to exceed $100,000, per three-year period; (b) prioritizing applications based on limited school district financial resources for the project; and (c) requiring recipient districts to demonstrate a consistent commitment to addressing school facility needs. The grant applications must include a description of the Americans with disabilities act or individuals with disabilities education act compliance deficiency, a comprehensive description of the facility accessibility issues to be addressed, a detailed description of the remedy including a detailed cost estimate of the repair or replacement work to be performed, and identification of local funding, if any, which will be applied to the project. Priority for grant funding must be given to school districts that demonstrate a lack of capital resources to address the compliance deficiencies outlined in the grant application.

(4) The superintendent of public instruction must notify the office of financial management, the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the house capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee as projects described in subsection (1) of this section are approved for funding.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$20,200,000

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$18,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$38,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($80,800,000))

$154,800,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($101,000,000))

$193,500,000

Sec. 5006. 2023 c 474 s 5006 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2023-25 Healthy Kids-Healthy Schools (40000068)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) (($10,000,000))$11,500,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for healthy kids and healthy schools grants for projects that are consistent with the healthiest next generation priorities.

(b) The appropriation in this subsection (1) is provided solely for grant funding to school districts for the purchase of equipment or to make repairs to existing equipment that is related to improving: (i) Children's physical health, and may include, but is not limited to, fitness playground equipment, covered play areas, and physical education equipment or related structures or renovation; and (ii) children's nutrition, and may include, but is not limited to, garden related structures and greenhouses to provide students access to fresh produce, and kitchen equipment or upgrades.

(c) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop criteria for grant funding under this subsection (1) that include, but are not limited to, the following requirements: (i) Districts may apply for grants, but no single district may receive more than $200,000 of the appropriation for grants awarded under this section; (ii) any district receiving funding provided in this section must demonstrate a consistent commitment to addressing school facilities' needs; and (iii) applicants with a high percentage of students who are eligible and enrolled in the free and reduced-price meals program may be prioritized.

(2) $1,500,000 of the state building construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to school districts, charter schools, and state-tribal education compact schools for the replacement of lead-contaminated pipes, drinking water fixtures, and the purchase of water filters, including the labor costs of remediation design, installation, and construction.
Appropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($10,000,000))

$11,500,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
(($11,500,000))

$13,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($46,000,000))

$52,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($57,500,000))

$65,000,000

Sec. 5007. 2023 c 474 s 5008 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2023-25 Skills Centers Minor Works (40000070)
Appropriation:

((State Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$5,135,000))

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,135,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$20,540,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$25,675,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5008. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

School District Indoor Air Quality & Energy Efficiency (40000104)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $6,250,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation and $7,500,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation in this section are provided solely for grants to school districts with enrollments exceeding 3,000 students for indoor air quality assessment grants.

(b) Grantees under this subsection may: (i) Seek technical assistance from state funded entities, such as the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the department of commerce, and the department of health; (ii) seek technical assistance from other entities, such as local health jurisdiction school safety programs and the smart buildings center's K-12 ventilation and indoor air quality resource team; and (iii) use funding awarded to seek guidance and technical assistance from commercial entities that have specialized knowledge of troubleshooting modern HVAC or smart building systems.

(c) Subject to subsection (3) of this section and if applications for assessment grants under this subsection exceed available funding, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must first prioritize grants for school districts: (i) Without existing heating, ventilation, and air-conditioning (HVAC) systems; (ii) that have documented proof of indoor air quality performance that does not meet current state energy code; (iii) with outdated or underperforming HVAC systems; and (iv) that have the most limited financial capacity. Assessments funded under this subsection (1)(c) must include professional cost estimates for mitigating the indoor air quality deficiencies identified. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must collect the cost estimate data from school districts receiving a grant under this subsection and report a summary of the collected cost data, as well as a list of specific capital projects for school districts developed from this data, to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by January 6, 2025.

(2)(a) $18,725,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation and $22,500,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation in this section are provided solely for grants to school districts with enrollments that are less than or equal to 3,000 students for assessment, installation, repair, or replacement of HVAC, air filtration enhancements, and general air quality improvements that improve student health and safety.

(b) Grantees under this subsection may: (i) Seek technical assistance from state funded entities, such as the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the department of commerce, and the department of health; (ii) seek technical assistance from other entities, such as local health jurisdiction school safety programs and the smart buildings center's K-12 ventilation and indoor air quality resource team; and (iii) use funding awarded to seek guidance and technical assistance from commercial entities that have specialized knowledge of troubleshooting modern HVAC or smart building systems.

(c) Subject to subsection (3) of this section and if applications grants under this subsection exceed available funding, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must first prioritize grants for school districts: (i) Without existing HVAC systems; (ii) that have documented proof of indoor air quality performance that does not meet current state energy code; (iii) with outdated or underperforming HVAC systems; and (iv) that have the most limited financial capacity.

(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must first allocate, to the maximum extent feasible, the funding appropriated under this section to grants prioritized under subsections (1) and (2) of this section. However, as necessary to award grants using the climate commitment account—state appropriation in this section, the superintendent of public instruction may also prioritize grants under this section that will improve compliance with the state's energy-related building standards in chapter 19.27A RCW by reducing energy use intensity.

(4) $25,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to make modifications to its information and condition of schools system related to implementing this section.

(5)(a) The appropriation in this section from the climate commitment account—state takes effect January 1, 2025.

(b) If the climate commitment account is repealed as of December 30, 2024, the amounts appropriated in this section from the climate commitment account—state shall lapse on December 31, 2024.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$30,000,000

Common School Construction Fund—State
. . . .
$25,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$55,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$220,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$275,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5009. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Capital Assistance to Small School Districts (92001074)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for preconstruction grants and administrative implementation pursuant to Substitute House Bill No. 1044.

(2) If Substitute House Bill No. 1044 (capital assistance/schools) is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.
Appropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,790,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$1,867,700,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,872,490,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5010. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Energy Assessment Grants to School Districts (91000509)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $4,900,000 of the climate commitment account—state appropriation in this section is provided solely for energy assessment grants to school districts for buildings that exceed 220,000 gross square feet pursuant to compliance with the state's energy-related building standards in chapter 19.27A RCW. Assessments funded under this subsection must include professional cost estimates for mitigating the energy use intensity deficiencies identified. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must collect the cost estimate data from school districts receiving a grant under this subsection and report a summary of the collected cost data, as well as a list of specific capital projects for school districts developed from this data, to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by January 6, 2025.

(2) $50,000 of the common school construction account—state appropriation in this section is provided for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to make modifications to its information and condition of schools system related to implementing this section.

(3) If applications for energy assessment grants under this section exceed funds available, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must prioritize grants for school buildings that are likely to require the most substantial improvements related to compliance with chapter 19.27A RCW and for school districts that have the most limited financial capacity. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall make such prioritizations using facilities data from the information and condition of schools database and through information provided by the school district at the time of application.

(4)(a) This section takes effect January 1, 2025.

(b) If the climate commitment account is repealed as of December 30, 2024, then this section is null and void on December 31, 2024.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$4,900,000

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$50,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$4,950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$19,600,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$24,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5011. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

School-based Health and Behavioral Health Clinics (91000519)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Bellingham Public Schools (Options High School). . . .$300,000

CHC of Snohomish County (Cascade High School). . . .$244,000

CHC of Snohomish County (Everett High School). . . .$244,000

Country Doctor CHC (Meany Middle School). . . .$80,000

Country Doctor CHC (Nova High School). . . .$80,000

HealthPoint (Evergreen High School). . . .$490,000

HealthPoint (Tyee High School). . . .$490,000

Jefferson County Public Health (Blue Heron Middle

School). . . .$136,000
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,064,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,064,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5012. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Career and Technical Education Projects (91000534)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Cascadia Tech: Natural Resource Outdoor Learning

Collaboration. . . .$1,154,000

Sequim School District CTE Center of Excellence

Phase 1. . . .$4,990,000

Whatcom County Skills Center Preconstruction. . . .$2,100,000

Wenatchee Valley Tech: Phases 1 & 2. . . .$5,263,000
Appropriation:

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$13,507,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$13,507,000

Sec. 5013. 2023 c 474 s 5013 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

2023-25 Distressed Schools (92000928)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of projects:

Cascadia Technical Academy (Vancouver). . . .$250,000

Ingraham High School Construction Trades Skills

Center (Seattle). . . .$527,000

Maritime 253: South Puget Sound Maritime Skills

Center (Tacoma). . . .$8,000,000

Rainier Beach High School Campus Skills Center. . . .$9,915,000

Seattle Skills Center (Seattle). . . .$2,200,000

Stevenson-Carson High School (Stevenson). . . .$750,000

Washington Middle School (Seattle). . . .$98,000

Marysville School District. . . .$3,600,000

Whittier Elementary School. . . .$5,625,000
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$21,740,000

Common School Construction Account—State
. . . .
$9,225,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$30,965,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($86,960,000))

$123,860,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($108,700,000))

$154,825,000

Sec. 5014. 2023 c 474 s 5015 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

2023-25 Campus Preservation (Minor Works) (40000021)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($2,100,000))

$2,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($8,400,000))

$10,400,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($10,500,000))

$13,000,000

Sec. 5015. 2023 c 474 s 5031 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Seattle - Asset Preservation (Minor Works) 23-25 (40000103)
Appropriation:

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
(($33,691,000))

$37,396,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($134,764,000))

$149,584,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($168,455,000))

$186,980,000

Sec. 5016. 2023 c 474 s 5032 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Bothell - Asset Preservation (Minor Works) 23-25 (40000129)
Appropriation:

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
(($5,919,000))

$3,895,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($23,676,000))

$15,580,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($29,595,000))

$19,475,000

Sec. 5017. 2023 c 474 s 5033 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW Tacoma - Asset Preservation (Minor Works) 23-25 (40000131)
Appropriation:

University of Washington Building Account—State
. . . .
(($4,915,000))

$3,234,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($19,660,000))

$12,936,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($24,575,000))

$16,170,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5018. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Chemical Sciences & Bagley Hall (40000146)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$125,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$130,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5019. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Energy Renewal Program (40000147)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) This section takes effect January 1, 2025.

(2) If the climate commitment account is repealed as of December 30, 2024, then this section is null and void on December 31, 2024.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$38,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$38,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5020. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Decarbonization Planning (91000043)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) This section takes effect January 1, 2025.

(2) If the climate commitment account is repealed as of December 30, 2024, then this section is null and void on December 31, 2024.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5021. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Knott Dairy Center Digester (92001132)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) This section takes effect January 1, 2025.

(2) If the climate commitment account is repealed as of December 30, 2024, then this section is null and void on December 31, 2024.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5022. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

CBPS: Sports and Recreation Center Energy Improvements (40000112)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) This section takes effect January 1, 2025.

(2) If the climate commitment account is repealed as of December 30, 2024, then this section is null and void on December 31, 2024.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$9,998,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$9,998,000

Sec. 5023. 2023 c 474 s 5056 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Humanities & Social Science Complex (40000081)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

The legislature intends to provide funds in the amount of $103,758,000 over the course of the 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia for construction of the humanities and social science complex at Central Washington University. Pursuant to RCW 43.88.130, the university may enter into a multibiennium contract for the construction of the complex. Nothing in this section authorizes the university to make an expenditure without an appropriation.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$2,844,000

Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$7,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$85,600,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$92,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$2,361,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$11,158,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$108,963,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5024. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Secondary Geothermal Module (40000161)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) This section takes effect January 1, 2025.

(2) If the climate commitment account is repealed as of December 30, 2024, then this section is null and void on December 31, 2024.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$12,464,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$4,000,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$16,464,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5025. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Science Building Carbon Reduction (40000162)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) This section takes effect January 1, 2025.

(2) If the climate commitment account is repealed as of December 30, 2024, then this section is null and void on December 31, 2024.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$4,509,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,509,000

Sec. 5026. 2023 c 474 s 5072 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor Works - Preservation 2023-25 (40000006)
Appropriation:

Western Washington University Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
(($4,888,000))

$5,388,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
(($19,552,000))

$21,552,000

TOTAL
. . . .
(($24,440,000))

$26,940,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5027. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION

Preserving State-owned Public Art (30000004)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$984,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$3,936,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$4,920,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5028. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Julia Butler Hansen Property Analysis (91000012)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Washington state historical society to evaluate the potential for the Julia Butler Hansen home in Cathlamet to be operated as a historic house museum as well as analysis regarding alternative potential uses that would be compatible with preservation of the historic home.

(2) The analysis and evaluation process in subsection (1) of this section must consider how the property can be preserved in a manner that honors and maintains its historic character, artifacts, and personal history, while also providing a sustainable financial future for maintenance and management. The process must include appropriate outreach to the Julia Butler Hansen family, the city of Cathlamet, Wahkiakum county, and any other person or entity deemed appropriate by the Washington state historical society.

(3) The Washington state historical society must report the findings of the analysis and evaluation process required under this section to the governor and the legislature no later than November 1, 2025.
Appropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
$30,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,000

Sec. 5029. 2023 c 474 s 6236 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Garage & Emergency Exit Concrete Remediation (40000053)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$838,000

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,477,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$63,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($901,000))

$2,378,000

Sec. 5030. 2023 c 474 s 5082 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Facility Repairs (23-25) (40000595)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The minor works project list for this section may include multiple projects related to necessary emergency repairs at Bellingham technical college. The projects must each be for distinct purposes and shall not be considered phases of a larger project for purposes of section 8017, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.
Appropriation:

Community and Technical College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$2,537,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$36,909,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$39,446,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$157,784,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$197,230,000

Sec. 5031. 2023 c 474 s 5085 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Site Repairs (23-25) (40000698)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The minor works project list for this section may include multiple projects related to necessary emergency repairs at Bellingham technical college. The projects must each be for distinct purposes and shall not be considered phases of a larger project for purposes of section 8017, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.
Appropriation:

Community and Technical College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$1,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,171,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$6,171,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$24,684,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$30,855,000

Sec. 5032. 2023 c 474 s 5086 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Infrastructure Replacement (23-25) (40000721)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The minor works project list for this section may include multiple projects related to necessary emergency repairs at Bellingham technical college. The projects must each be for distinct purposes and shall not be considered phases of a larger project for purposes of section 8017, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.
Appropriation:

Community and Technical College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$3,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$37,300,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$40,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$161,200,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$201,500,000

Sec. 5033. 2023 c 474 s 5087 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor Works - Program Improvements (23-25) (40000754)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The minor works project list for this section may include multiple projects related to necessary emergency repairs at Bellingham technical college. The projects must each be for distinct purposes and shall not be considered phases of a larger project for purposes of section 8017, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.
Appropriation:

Community and Technical College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$48,200,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$53,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$212,800,000

TOTAL
. . . .
$266,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5034. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

CBPS SBCTC Statewide: Utility Submeters for Clean Buildings Act (40000878)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation in this section from the climate commitment account—state takes effect January 1, 2025.

(2) If the climate commitment account is repealed as of December 30, 2024, the amounts appropriated in this section from the climate commitment account—state shall lapse on December 31, 2024.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
$8,374,000

Community and Technical College Capital Projects

Account—State
. . . .
$170,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$8,544,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$8,544,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5035. A new section is added to 2023 c 474 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bellingham Technical College: Campus Center Building (40000916)
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$19,384,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$19,384,000

Sec. 5036. 2023 c 474 s 5089 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

HB 1390 - District Energy Systems (91000443)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) This section takes effect January 1, 2025.

(2) If the climate commitment account is repealed as of December 30, 2024, then this section is null and void on December 31, 2024.
Appropriation:

Climate Commitment Account—State
. . . .
(($429,000))

$907,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($429,000))

$907,000

(End of part)

PART 6

REAPPROPRIATIONS

Sec. 6001. 2023 c 474 s 6002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Economic Revitalization Board (30000097)
Reappropriation:

Public ((Facility))Facilities Construction

Loan Revolving Account—State
. . . .
$7,774,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$10,246,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$18,020,000

Sec. 6002. 2023 c 474 s 6029 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Washington Broadband Program (40000117)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1012, chapter 356, Laws of 2020, except that all funds may be used as loans or grants to finance eligible broadband infrastructure projects.
Reappropriation:

Statewide Broadband Account—State
. . . .
$16,079,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,471,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$21,550,000

Sec. 6003. 2023 c 474 s 6043 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 PWB Broadband Infrastructure (40000152)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1067, chapter 332, Laws of 2021, except that all funds may be used as loans or grants to finance eligible broadband infrastructure projects.
Reappropriation:

Coronavirus Capital Projects Account—Federal
. . . .
(($45,040,000))

$46,000,000

Statewide Broadband Account—State
. . . .
$14,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($59,040,000))

$60,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($59,040,000))

$60,000,000

Sec. 6004. 2023 c 474 s 6047 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021-23 Rapid Capital Housing Acquisition (40000222)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 7003 of this act, except that $438,000 of the reappropriation is for the NWYS Young Adult Shelter Services (Mt. Vernon) project, and not the NWYS Young Adult Shelter Services (Bellingham) project.
Reappropriation:

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$16,532,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$41,036,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$57,568,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$62,567,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$120,135,000

Sec. 6005. 2023 c 474 s 6053 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Ports Infrastructure (40000278)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1027, chapter 296, Laws of 2022, except that $1,550,000 of the reappropriation is for the In-Water Asset Improvements (Port of Clarkston) project, and not the Dredge River Access (Port of Clarkston) project.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$14,328,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$1,718,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$16,046,000

Sec. 6006. 2023 c 474 s 6066 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Infrastructure Projects (91001687)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1033, chapter 296, Laws of 2022, except that:

(1) $618,000 of the reappropriation is for the Port of Mattawa Water Infrastructure (Mattawa) project, and not the Port of Mattawa Wastewater Infrastructure (Mattawa) project;

(2) No funding may be directed to the Dryden Wastewater Improvement project;

(3) No funding may be directed to the New Well for the Community of Peshastin project;

(4) The Fall City Waste Management System total appropriation is adjusted from $6,500,000 to $7,536,000; and

(5) $1,030,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery account—federal appropriation is provided solely for the Skamania PUD Water Tank Replacement project.
Reappropriation:

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$25,714,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
$94,106,000

Public Works Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$485,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$10,087,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$130,392,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$6,908,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$137,300,000

Sec. 6007. 2023 c 474 s 6055 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2019 Local and Community Projects (91001157)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1017, chapter 356, Laws of 2020, except that $200,000 of the reappropriation is for the Mercer Island Boys & Girls Club Play Structure (Mercer Island) project, and not the TXL Lake Hills Clubhouse Acquisition Boys & Girls Club (Bellevue) project.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$4,781,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$35,749,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$40,530,000

Sec. 6008. 2023 c 474 s 6052 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2023 Local and Community Projects (40000266)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 7007 of this act, except that:

(1) $273,000 of the reappropriation is for the City of Arlington Jensen Park Improvements (Arlington) project, and not the Senior Resources Svc HUB Feasibility Study (Freeland) project; and

(2) No funding may be directed to the Allyn Community Center.
Reappropriation:

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$309,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($48,301,000))

$48,001,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($48,610,000))

$48,310,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,017,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($53,627,000))

$53,327,000

Sec. 6009. 2023 c 474 s 6028 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2020 Local and Community Projects (40000116)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6007, chapter 332, Laws of 2021, except that ((funding)):

(1) Funding may not be directed to the Arivva Community Center;

(2) The Main Street Redevelopment Project appropriation level is reduced from $985,000 to $865,000;

(3) $120,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for the Steilacoom Cultural Center; and

(4) $200,000 of the $2,000,000 reappropriation for the Lake City Community Center Replacement (Seattle) project must be used to facilitate community engagement and a community needs assessment to inform design of the redevelopment of the Lake City Community Center.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$50,532,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$115,775,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$166,307,000

Sec. 6010. 2023 c 474 s 6031 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2021 Local and Community Projects (40000130)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6008, chapter 332, Laws of 2021, except that $275,000 of the reappropriation is for the Yakima County Justice Center project, and not the Yakima County Care Campus project.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$11,416,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$21,256,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$32,672,000

Sec. 6011. 2023 c 474 s 6061 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Substance Use Disorder Recovery Housing (91001675)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1031, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

State Taxable Building Construction Account—

State
. . . .
(($48,000))

$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($102,000))

$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$150,000

Sec. 6012. 2023 c 474 s 6068 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Food Banks (91001690)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1034, chapter 296, Laws of 2022, except that the $1,030,000 appropriation is for the Chelan Douglas Food Distribution Center (Wenatchee), and not the Chelan Douglas Distribution Center (Malaga).
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$6,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,686,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$12,586,000

Sec. 6013. 2023 c 474 s 6084 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

2022 Crisis Stabilization Facilities (92001286)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1025, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.
Reappropriation:

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
(($71,995,000))

$48,293,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$5,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($72,000,000))

$48,298,000

Sec. 6014. 2023 c 474 s 6073 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Projects that Strengthen Communities & Quality of Life (92000230)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6006, chapter 3, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess.

(2) The reappropriation for any project for which the department has not executed a contract by December 31, 2023, shall lapse. The department shall provide a list of lapsed projects to the legislative fiscal committees no later than January 15, 2024.

(3) Pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, funding for the Seabrook Trail project has lapsed.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($982,000))

$559,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$31,102,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($32,084,000))

$31,661,000

Sec. 6015. 2023 c 474 s 6097 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Thurston County Readiness Center (30000594)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1027, chapter 35, Laws of 2016 sp. sess.
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$3,301,000

Military Department Capital Account—State
. . . .
(($553,000))

$10,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($3,854,000))

$3,311,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$44,098,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($47,952,000))

$47,409,000

Sec. 6016. 2023 c 474 s 6104 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Camp Murray Bldg. 20 Roof Top Unit Upgrade (40000189)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($307,000))

$2,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($6,000))

$8,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($313,000))

$10,000

Sec. 6017. 2023 c 474 s 6105 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western State Hospital New Kitchen and Commissary Building (20081319)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 2003, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,263,000))

$477,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($28,927,000))

$29,113,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($30,190,000))

$29,590,000

Sec. 6018. 2023 c 474 s 6135 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Transitional Care Center-Main Building: Patient Rooms Cooling (40000574)
Reappropriation:

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal
. . . .
(($2,315,000))

$2,335,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($20,000))

$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$2,335,000

Sec. 6019. 2023 c 474 s 6164 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

WVH HVAC Retrofit (40000006)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($395,000))

$424,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($355,000))

$326,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$750,000

Sec. 6020. 2023 c 474 s 6165 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

WSH - Life Safety Grant (40000013)
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
(($315,000))

$325,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($164,000))

$174,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($479,000))

$499,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($21,000))

$1,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$500,000

Sec. 6021. 2023 c 474 s 6179 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

WCC: Interim Mental Health Building (40000260)
Reappropriation:

Capital Community Assistance Account—State
. . . .
$672,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,237,000))

$1,522,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($1,909,000))

$2,194,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($38,000))

$53,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($1,947,000))

$2,247,000

Sec. 6022. 2023 c 474 s 6228 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Heritage Capital Grants Projects (30000297)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5054, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($1,003,000))

$750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($7,376,000))

$7,552,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($8,379,000))

$8,302,000

Sec. 6023. 2023 c 474 s 6328 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Water Banking (91000373)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section ((7052))7001 of this act.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

State Drought Preparedness Account—

State
. . . .
$9,000,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
$14,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,000,000

Sec. 6024. 2023 c 474 s 6336 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

2021-23 Underground Storage Tank Capital Financial Assistance Pgm (30000705)
Reappropriation:

Pollution Liability Insurance Agency Underground

Storage Tank Revolving Account—State
. . . .
(($11,733,000))

$10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$267,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($12,000,000))

$10,267,000

Sec. 6025. 2023 c 474 s 6337 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM

2021-23 Heating Oil Capital Financing Assistance Program (30000706)
Reappropriation:

Pollution Liability Insurance Agency Underground

Storage Tank Revolving Account—State
. . . .
(($7,815,000))

$150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$185,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($8,000,000))

$335,000

Sec. 6026. 2023 c 474 s 6366 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

Boating Facilities Program (30000410)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3072, chapter 2, Laws of 2018.
Reappropriation:

Recreation Resources Account—State
. . . .
(($5,473,000))

$3,323,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$11,702,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($17,175,000))

$15,025,000

Sec. 6027. 2023 c 474 s 6376 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2019-21 - Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (40000004)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3201, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.
Reappropriation:

General Fund—Federal
. . . .
$17,126,000

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($2,174,000))

$5,840,000

Subtotal Reappropriation
. . . .
(($19,300,000))

$22,966,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($55,700,000))

$52,034,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$75,000,000

Sec. 6028. 2023 c 474 s 6392 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD

2021-23 - Boating Facilities Program (40000023)
Reappropriation:

Recreation Resources Account—State
. . . .
(($12,283,000))

$12,950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($2,667,000))

$2,000,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,950,000

Sec. 6029. 2023 c 474 s 6460 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Omak Consolidation, Expansion and Relocation (40000033)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($93,000))

$5,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($15,000))

$20,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
(($108,000))

$25,000

Sec. 6030. 2023 c 474 s 6528 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Healthy Kids/Healthy Schools - T-12 Lighting (91000483)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5009, chapter 296, Laws of 2022, as amended by section 7002 of this act.
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,500,000

Sec. 6031. 2023 c 474 s 6496 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bates: Medical Mile Health Science Center (30000989)
Reappropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
(($7,000))

$108,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
(($44,059,000))

$43,958,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$44,066,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6032. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) 2023 c 474 s 6083 (uncodified);

(2) 2023 c 474 s 6343 (uncodified);

(3) 2023 c 474 s 6489 (uncodified); and

(4) 2023 c 474 s 6490 (uncodified).

(End of part)

PART 7

Sec. 7001. 2023 c 474 s 7052 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

2021-23 Water Banking (91000373)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for the department to administer a pilot grant program for water banking strategies to meet local water needs.

(b) (($2,000,000))$4,000,000 is provided solely for qualified applicants located within the Methow River Basin.

(2)(((a))) Grant awards may only be used for:

(((i)))(a) Development of water banks in rural counties as defined in RCW 82.14.370(5);

(((ii)))(b) Acquisition of water rights appropriate for use in a water bank including all costs necessary to evaluate the water right for eligibility for its intended use; and

(((iii)))(c) Activities necessary to facilitate the creation of a water bank.

(((b) For applicants located outside of the Methow River Basin, grant awards may only be used for the development of water banks in rural counties that have the headwaters of a major watershed within their borders and only for water banking strategies within the county of origin. For purposes of this section, "major watershed" has the same meaning as shoreline of statewide significance in RCW 90.58.030(2)(f)(v) (A) and (B).))

(3) Grant awards may not exceed (($2,000,000))$4,000,000 per applicant.

(4) For the purposes of a grant pursuant to this section, a water bank must meet water needs, which include, but are not limited to, agricultural use and instream flow for fish and wildlife. The water bank must preserve water rights for use in the county of origin and for permanent instream flows for fish and wildlife through the primary and secondary reaches of the water right.

(5) To be eligible to receive a grant under this section, an applicant must:

(a) Be a public entity or a participant in a public-private partnership with a public entity;

(b) Exhibit sufficient expertise and capacity to develop and maintain a water bank consistent with the purposes of this appropriation;

(c) Secure a valid interest to purchase a water right;

(d) Show that the water rights appear to be adequate for the intended use; and

(e) Agree to have one-third of any water right purchased with the funds appropriated under this section to have its purpose of use changed permanently to instream flow benefiting fish and wildlife.

(6) In determining whether a grant request is eligible for funding under this section, the department may not disqualify proposals that purchase water rights from an existing water bank.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$5,000,000

State Drought Preparedness Account—State
. . . .
$9,000,000

Subtotal Appropriation
. . . .
$14,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$14,000,000

Sec. 7002. 2022 c 296 s 5009 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Healthy Kids / Healthy Schools - T-12 Lighting (91000483)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided for under section (3) of this section, $1,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to public schools, including charter schools and state-tribal education compact schools, for the removal, disposal, and replacement of T-12 lighting fixtures and ballasts manufactured in or before 1979 with energy-efficient LED lighting. State grant funding provided under this section may be used for all school district, state-tribal education compact, and charter school buildings, but must be prioritized for buildings that are not under contract to be replaced or modernized. State grant funding provided under this section may only be expended after all applicable funding from utility company rebate programs available to schools in the state has been exhausted.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must provide information to state grant applicants under this section related to identifying the year of T-12 lighting fixture and ballast manufacture, which may include pertinent information developed by the United States environmental protection agency. In order to receive a state grant under this section, grant applicants must provide, as determined by the office of the superintendent of public instruction, supporting documentation that includes: (a) The number of T-12 lighting fixtures and ballasts manufactured before 1979 and after 1979 in their facilities; and (b) the age and primary use of each facility where the T-12 lighting fixtures and ballasts under (a) of this subsection are located. The office of the superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules to administer this section.

(3) In the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the office of the superintendent of public instruction may contract with an organization of educational facilities and maintenance professionals located in the state for the purpose of assisting school districts with identifying T-12 lighting fixtures and ballasts manufactured in or before 1979. The organization contracted pursuant to this subsection must provide information to school districts, as determined by the office of the superintendent of public instruction, regarding the availability of state grant funding and utility company rebate programs for the replacement of T-12 lighting with energy-efficient LED lighting. The contract awarded under this subsection may not exceed $100,000.
Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account—State
. . . .
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures)
. . . .
$0

Future Biennia (Projected Costs)
. . . .
$0

TOTAL
. . . .
$1,500,000

(End of part)

PART 8

MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

Sec. 8001. 2023 c 474 s 8001 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

RCW 43.88.031 requires the disclosure of the estimated debt service costs associated with new capital bond appropriations. The estimated debt service costs for the appropriations contained in this act are (($59,934,000))$35,897,928 for the 2023-2025 biennium, (($371,683,000))$342,236,404 for the 2025-2027 biennium, and (($519,454,000))$491,366,915 for the 2027-2029 biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8002. (1) If the following accounts are repealed, agencies may not expend or obligate funds appropriated from the repealed account on or after the effective date of the repeal: (a) The climate commitment account; (b) the natural climate solutions account; and (c) the air quality and health disparities improvement account.

(2) If the following accounts are repealed, appropriations in chapter 474, Laws of 2023 (2023-2025 biennial capital budget) and this act that are appropriated from the (a) the climate commitment account; (b) the natural climate solutions account; and (c) the air quality and health disparities improvement account shall be paid from the consolidated climate account, created in chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 2104), Laws of 2024 (supplemental operating appropriations act), as if they were appropriated from the consolidated climate account beginning on the date of the repeal of the accounts unless specified otherwise.

Sec. 8003. 2023 c 474 s 8002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS.
(1) The following agencies may enter into financial contracts, paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or nonappropriated, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section, agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements, lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance committee.

(2) Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible for state funded maintenance and operations.

(3) Secretary of state: Enter into a financing contract for up to $119,000,000 plus financing expenses, required reserves, and capitalized interest pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a new library-archives building.

(4) Department of social and health services: Enter into a financing contract for up to $175,888,000 plus costs and financing expenses, required reserves, and capitalized interest pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a nursing facility on the Fircrest residential habilitation center campus. The department may contract to lease develop or lease purchase the facility. Before entering into a contract, the department must consult with the office of financial management and the office of the state treasurer. Should the department of social and health services choose to use a financing contract that does not provide for the issuance of certificates of participation, the financing contract shall be subject to approval by the state finance committee as required by RCW 39.94.010. In approving a financing contract not providing for the use of certificates of participation, the state finance committee should be reasonably certain that the contract is excluded from the computation of indebtedness, particularly that the contract is not backed by the full faith and credit of the state and the legislature is expressly not obligated to appropriate funds to make payments. For purposes of this subsection, "financing contract" includes but is not limited to a certificate of participation and tax exempt financing similar to that authorized in RCW 47.79.140.

(5) Western Washington University: Enter into a financing contract for up to $4,900,000 plus costs and financing expenses, required reserves, and capitalized interest pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an electrical engineering and computer science building.

(6) The state board for community and technical colleges: Enter into a financing contract for up to $2,000,000 plus costs and financing expenses, required reserves, and capitalized interest pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate building J at the Renton technical college.

(7) The Evergreen State College: Enter into a financing contract for up to $4,400,000 plus costs and financing expenses, required reserves, and capitalized interest pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to reopen unused residence halls.

Sec. 8004. RCW 43.155.050 and 2023 c 475 s 932 and 2023 c 474 s 8037 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The public works assistance account is hereby established in the state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance account shall be used to make loans and grants and to give financial guarantees to local governments for public works projects. Moneys in the account may also be appropriated or transferred to the water pollution control revolving fund and the drinking water assistance account to provide for state match requirements under federal law. Moneys in the account may be transferred to the move ahead WA account to provide support of public works projects funded in the move ahead WA program. Not more than 20 percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the public works board from this account may be expended or obligated for preconstruction loans and grants, emergency loans and grants, or loans and grants for capital facility planning under this chapter. Not more than 10 percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the public works board from this account may be expended or obligated as grants for preconstruction, emergency, capital facility planning, and construction projects. During the 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for activities related to rural economic development, the growth management act, the aviation revitalization loan program, the community economic revitalization board broadband program, and the voluntary stewardship program. During the 2021-2023 and 2023-2025 fiscal biennia, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for activities related to the community aviation revitalization board. During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the public works assistance account to the education legacy trust account. During the 2019-2021 and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the public works assistance account to the statewide broadband account. The legislature may appropriate moneys from the public works assistance account for activities related to the voluntary stewardship program, rural economic development, and the growth management act. During the 2021-2023 biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for projects identified in section 1033, chapter 296, Laws of 2022. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the public works assistance account for ((an evaluation of the costs of))projects related to relocating public utilities related to fish barrier removal projects and for an evaluation of the costs. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for activities related to developing a data dashboard to map investments made by the public works board, the department of commerce, the department of health, the department of ecology, the department of transportation, the transportation improvement board, and by board partners to the system improvement team created in RCW 43.155.150.

(2) For fiscal year 2024 through fiscal year 2038, the state treasurer must transfer from the public works assistance account to the move ahead WA account created in RCW 46.68.510 $57,000,000 each fiscal year in four equal quarterly transfers.

Sec. 8005. RCW 70A.65.305 and 2022 c 253 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Agencies that allocate funding or administer grant programs appropriated from the climate investment account created in RCW 70A.65.250, the climate commitment account created in RCW 70A.65.260, and the natural climate solutions account created in RCW 70A.65.270 must offer early, meaningful, and individual consultation with any affected federally recognized tribe on all funding decisions and funding programs that may impact tribal resources, including tribal cultural resources, archaeological sites, sacred sites, fisheries, or other rights and interests in tribal lands and lands within which a tribe or tribes possess rights reserved or protected by federal treaty, statute, or executive order. The consultation is independent of, and in addition to, any public participation process required by federal or state law, or by a federal or state agency, including the requirements of Executive Order 21-02 related to archaeological and cultural resources, and regardless of whether the agency receives a request for consultation from a federally recognized tribe. The goal of the consultation process is to identify tribal resources or rights potentially affected by the funding decisions and funding programs, assess their effects, and seek ways to avoid, minimize, or mitigate any adverse effects on tribal resources or rights.

(2) At the earliest possible date prior to submittal of an application, applicants for funding from the accounts created in RCW 70A.65.250, 70A.65.260, and 70A.65.270 shall engage in a preapplication process with all affected federally recognized tribes within the project area. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, salmon habitat and climate resilience projects funded from the natural climate solutions account created in RCW 70A.65.270 that went through the application and prioritization process before July 1, 2023, are exempt from the preapplication requirements under this subsection.

(a) The preapplication process must include the applicant notifying the department of archaeology and historic preservation, the department of fish and wildlife, and all affected federally recognized tribes within the project area. The notification must include geographical location, detailed scope of the proposed project, preliminary application details available to federal, state, or local governmental jurisdictions, and all publicly available materials, including public funding sources.

(b) The applicant must also offer to discuss the project with the department of archaeology and historic preservation, the department of fish and wildlife, and all affected federally recognized tribes within the project area. Discussions may include the project's impact to tribal resources, including tribal cultural resources, archaeological sites, sacred sites, fisheries, or other rights and interests in tribal lands and lands within which a tribe or tribes possess rights reserved or protected by federal treaty, statute, or executive order.

(c) All affected federally recognized tribes may submit to the appropriate agency or agencies a summary of tribal issues, questions, concerns, or other statements regarding the project, which must become part of the official application file. The summary does not limit what issues affected federally recognized tribes may raise in the consultation process identified in subsections (1), (3) through (7), and (9) of this section.

(d) The notification and offer to initiate discussion must be documented with the application when it is filed, and a copy of the application must be delivered to the department of archaeology and historic preservation, the department of fish and wildlife, and to the affected federally recognized tribe or tribes. If the discussions pursuant to (b) of this subsection do not occur, the applicant must document the reason why the discussion or discussions did not occur.

(e) Nothing in this section may be interpreted to require the disclosure of information that is exempt from disclosure pursuant to RCW 42.56.300 or federal law, including section 304 of the national historic preservation act of 1966. Any information that is exempt from disclosure pursuant to RCW 42.56.300 or federal law, including section 304 of the national historic preservation act of 1966, shall not become part of the official application file.

(3) If any funding decision, program, project, or activity that may impact tribal resources, including tribal cultural resources, archaeological sites, sacred sites, fisheries, or other rights and interests in tribal lands and lands within which a tribe or tribes possess rights reserved by federal treaty, statute, or executive order is funded from the accounts created in RCW 70A.65.250, 70A.65.260, and 70A.65.270 without such a consultation with an affected federally recognized tribe, the affected federally recognized tribe may request that all further action on the decision, program, project, or activity cease until meaningful consultation is completed. Upon receipt of such a request by an agency or agencies with the authority to allocate funding or administer grant programs from the accounts listed in subsection (1) of this section in support of the proposed project, further action by the agency or agencies on any decision, program, project, or activity that would result in significant physical disturbance of the tribal resource or resources described in this subsection must cease until the consultation has been completed.

(4) Upon completion of agency and tribal consultation, an affected federally recognized tribe may request a formal review of the consultation by submitting a request to the governor's office of Indian affairs and notifying the appropriate agencies and the department of archaeology and historic preservation. The state agencies and tribe must meet to initiate discussion within no more than 20 days of the request. This consultation must be offered and conducted separately with each affected federally recognized tribe, unless the tribes agree to conduct a joint consultation with the state.

(5) After the state agencies and tribe or tribes have conducted a formal review under subsection (4) of this section, an affected federally recognized tribe or state agency may request that the governor and an elected tribal leader or leaders of a federally recognized tribal government meet to formally consider the recommendations from the parties. If requested, this meeting must occur within 30 days of the request, except that a federally recognized tribe may choose to opt out of the meeting. This timeline may be extended by mutual agreement between the governor and the tribal leaders.

(6) After the meeting identified in subsection (5) of this section has occurred, the governor or an elected tribal leader of a federally recognized tribe may call for the state and tribe or tribes to enter into formal mediation, except that a federally recognized tribe may choose to opt out of the mediation. If entered into, the mediation must be conducted as a government-to-government proceeding, with each sovereign government retaining their right to a final decision that meets their separate obligations and interests. Mediators must be jointly selected by the parties to the mediation. An agreement between the governor and a tribal leader or leaders resulting from the mediation is formally recognized and binding on the signatory parties. Absent an agreement, participation in mediation does not preclude any additional steps that any party can initiate, including legal review, to resolve a continuing disagreement.

(7) During the proceedings outlined in subsections (4) through (6) of this section, the agency or agencies with the authority to allocate funding or administer grant programs from the accounts listed in subsection (1) of this section in support of the proposed project may not approve or release funding, or make other formal decisions, including permitting, that advance the proposed project except where required by law.

(8) By June 30, 2023, the governor's office of Indian affairs, in coordination with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and federally recognized tribes, shall develop a state agency tribal consultation process, including best practices for early, meaningful, and effective consultation, early notification and engagement by applicants with federally recognized tribes as a part of the preapplication process in subsection (2) of this section, and protocols for communication and collaboration with federally recognized tribes. The consultation process developed under this section must be periodically reviewed and updated in coordination with federally recognized tribes. The governor's office of Indian affairs must provide training and other technical assistance to state agencies, as they implement the required consultation. Notwithstanding the governor's office of Indian affairs' ongoing work pursuant to this subsection, the provisions of subsections (1) through (7) and (9) of this section become effective as of June 9, 2022.

(9) The requirements of this section apply to local governments that receive funding from the accounts created in RCW 70A.65.250, 70A.65.260, and 70A.65.270, where that funding is disbursed to project and program applicants. Where requested, the governor's office of Indian affairs must provide training and other technical assistance to local government agencies as they implement the consultation requirements of this section.

(10) Any agency subject to or implementing this section may adopt rules in furtherance of its duties under this section.

(11) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department must establish a tribal capacity grant program to provide funding to federally recognized tribes for the costs of implementing this section.

Sec. 8006. RCW 79.64.020 and 2014 c 32 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

A resource management cost account in the state treasury is created to be used solely for the purpose of defraying the costs and expenses necessarily incurred by the department in managing and administering state lands((,))and aquatic lands((,)) and the making and administering of leases, sales, contracts, licenses, permits, easements, and rights-of-way as authorized under the provisions of this title. Appropriations from the resource management cost account to the department shall be expended for no other purposes. Funds in the resource management cost account may be appropriated or transferred by the legislature for the benefit of all of the trusts from which the funds were derived. During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the aquatics revenues in the resources management cost account to the marine resources stewardship trust account for the purposes of chapter 43.372 RCW. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer no more than $5,000,000 from the resource management cost account to the land bank account created in RCW 79.19.120.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8007. On June 30, 2024, the state treasurer shall transfer $5,000,000, or as much thereof as is necessary, from the resource management cost account created in RCW 79.64.020 to the land bank account created in RCW 79.19.120. Before June 30, 2024, the office of financial management, in consultation with the department of natural resources, shall provide the state treasurer with the amount necessary to transfer.

Sec. 8008. RCW 79A.25.210 and 2023 c 475 s 945 are each amended to read as follows:

The firearms range account is hereby created in the state general fund. Moneys in the account shall be subject to legislative appropriation and shall be used for purchase and development of land, construction or improvement of range facilities, including fixed structure construction or remodeling, equipment purchase, safety or environmental improvements, noise abatement, and liability protection for public and nonprofit firearm range training and practice facilities.

Grant funds shall not be used for expendable shooting supplies, or normal operating expenses. In making grants, the board shall give priority to projects for noise abatement or safety improvement. Grant funds shall not supplant funds for other organization programs.

The funds will be available to nonprofit shooting organizations, school districts, and state, county, or local governments on a match basis. All entities receiving matching funds must be open on a regular basis and usable by law enforcement personnel or the general public who possess Washington concealed pistol licenses or Washington hunting licenses or who are enrolled in a firearm safety class.

Applicants for a grant from the firearms range account shall provide matching funds in either cash or in-kind contributions. The match must represent one dollar in value for each one dollar of the grant except that in the case of a grant for noise abatement or safety improvements the match must represent one dollar in value for each two dollars of the grant. In-kind contributions include but are not limited to labor, materials, and new property. Existing assets and existing development may not apply to the match.

Applicants other than school districts or local or state government must be registered as a nonprofit or not-for-profit organization with the Washington secretary of state. The organization's articles of incorporation must contain provisions for the organization's structure, officers, legal address, and registered agent.

Organizations requesting grants must provide the hours of range availability for public and law enforcement use. The fee structure will be submitted with the grant application.

Any nonprofit organization or agency accepting a grant under this program will be required to pay back the entire grant amount to the firearms range account if the use of the range facility is discontinued less than ten years after the grant is accepted.

Entities receiving grants must make the facilities for which grant funding is received open for hunter safety education classes and firearm safety classes on a regular basis for no fee.

Government units or school districts applying for grants must open their range facility on a regular basis for hunter safety education classes and firearm safety classes.

The board shall adopt rules to implement chapter 195, Laws of 1990, pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. During the 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, expenditures from the firearms range account may be used to implement chapter 74, Laws of 2017 (SHB 1100) (concealed pistol licenses) and chapter 282, Laws of 2017 (SB 5268) (concealed pistol license notices). During the 2021-2023 and 2023-2025 fiscal biennia, expenditures from the firearms range account may be used to implement chapter 74, Laws of 2017 (SHB 1100) (concealed pistol licenses).

During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the legislature may also appropriate moneys in the firearms range account to the department of natural resources for recreational target shooting pilot sites as provided in section 3028 of this act.

During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the application and matching funds requirements of this section do not apply to the recreational target shooting pilot sites in section 3028 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8009. (1)(a) The director of the office of financial management, or the director's designee, shall collect a list of clean energy projects from state agencies that may qualify for elective payment under P.L. 117-169 (inflation reduction act of 2022), such as the purchase of electric vehicle fleets; alternative fuel vehicle refueling and charging; and renewable energy projects including wind, solar, geothermal, electrolytic hydrogen, and energy storage.

(b) For tax years 2023 and 2024, the director or director's designee shall work with agencies, including institutions of higher education, to complete all steps necessary to file an annual tax return with the United States internal revenue service on behalf of the state in order to claim elective payments available for state agency clean energy projects that have been placed into service.

(2) The office of financial management shall provide a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by July 1, 2024, and June 30, 2025, that summarizes the state's tax return submitted that year, including the total dollar value of projects included in the tax return and the total dollar amount of direct pay tax credits sought. The report must also include an itemized list of the projects that displays the dollar amounts and types of tax credits sought.

(3) Funds received by the state pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the inflation reduction elective pay account created in chapter . . . (Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6098), Laws of 2024 (concerning accounts).

(4) It is the intent of the legislature that funds received under this section will be allocated to capital projects through omnibus capital appropriations acts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8010. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8011. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

(End of part)

--- END ---