BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature intends to establish a fallen firefighter memorial on the capitol campus grounds to recognize the sacrifice of firefighters who have died in the line of duty giving unselfish service to their communities and the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.34 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A memorial is established on the capitol campus to honor firefighters who have died in the line of duty. The design and construction of such a memorial must follow the major works requirements administered by the department of enterprise services.

(2) The state capitol committee, or any subcommittee thereof, must work with the department of natural resources and statewide organizations representing firefighters in its role reviewing the building of the fallen firefighter memorial.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 43.34 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a) The fallen firefighter memorial account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts directed to the account from federal funds, gifts, or grants from private or public sectors, foundations, or other sources must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the design, siting, permitting, construction, maintenance, dedication, continuation, or creation of educational materials related to the placement of this memorial on the capitol campus. Only the department of natural resources, with the recommendation from the Washington state firefighter memorial foundation, may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(b) The purpose of the account is to support the establishment and maintenance of the fallen firefighter memorial. The commissioner of public lands and department of natural resources may solicit and accept moneys from gifts, grants, or endowments for this purpose.

(2) The department of natural resources is authorized to partner with the department of enterprise services, under RCW 43.19.125, for the design, establishment, and maintenance of this new memorial consistent with the major works requirements for projects on capitol campus. The partnership must work with nonprofit groups or foundations, or another state agency, if needed, to ensure the memorial is utilized by the public and the firefighter community to recognize, remember, and honor the sacrifice of firefighters who have died in the line of duty.

(a) The department of enterprise services must provide and fund routine maintenance of the fallen firefighter memorial once the memorial is completed. Routine maintenance includes basic cleaning of the memorial, ensuring the lights are functional, detailing the landscape surrounding the memorial, picking up trash around the memorial, and removing graffiti that does not require specialized techniques.

(b) The department of natural resources, and any foundation or nonprofit it contracts with, must provide any nonroutine maintenance of the memorial, including engraving of new names on the memorial, and must follow any guidance and process for any nonroutine maintenance as established by the department of enterprise services.

(3) The department of natural resources may adopt rules governing the receipt and use of funds in the account.

--- END ---