BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 71.09.020 and 2021 c 236 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Department" means the department of social and health services.

(2) "Fair share principles" and "fair share principles of release" means that each county has adequate options for conditional release housing placements in a number generally equivalent to the number of residents from that county who are subject to total confinement pursuant to this chapter.

(3) "Health care facility" means any hospital, hospice care center, licensed or certified health care facility, health maintenance organization regulated under chapter 48.46 RCW, federally qualified health maintenance organization, federally approved renal dialysis center or facility, or federally approved blood bank.

(4) "Health care practitioner" means an individual or firm licensed or certified to engage actively in a regulated health profession.

(5) "Health care services" means those services provided by health professionals licensed pursuant to RCW 18.120.020(4).

(6) "Health profession" means those licensed or regulated professions set forth in RCW 18.120.020(4).

(7) "Less restrictive alternative" means court-ordered treatment in a setting less restrictive than total confinement which satisfies the conditions set forth in RCW 71.09.092. A less restrictive alternative may not include placement in the community protection program as pursuant to RCW 71A.12.230.

(8) "Likely to engage in predatory acts of sexual violence if not confined in a secure facility" means that the person more probably than not will engage in such acts if released unconditionally from detention on the sexually violent predator petition. Such likelihood must be evidenced by a recent overt act if the person is not totally confined at the time the petition is filed under RCW 71.09.030.

(9) "Mental abnormality" means a congenital or acquired condition affecting the emotional or volitional capacity which predisposes the person to the commission of criminal sexual acts in a degree constituting such person a menace to the health and safety of others.

(10) "Personality disorder" means an enduring pattern of inner experience and behavior that deviates markedly from the expectations of the individual's culture, is pervasive and inflexible, has onset in adolescence or early adulthood, is stable over time and leads to distress or impairment. Purported evidence of a personality disorder must be supported by testimony of a licensed forensic psychologist or psychiatrist.

(11) "Predatory" means acts directed towards: (a) Strangers; (b) individuals with whom a relationship has been established or promoted for the primary purpose of victimization; or (c) persons of casual acquaintance with whom no substantial personal relationship exists.

(12) "Prosecuting agency" means the prosecuting attorney of the county where the person was convicted or charged or the attorney general if requested by the prosecuting attorney, as provided in RCW 71.09.030.

(13) "Recent overt act" means any act, threat, or combination thereof that has either caused harm of a sexually violent nature or creates a reasonable apprehension of such harm in the mind of an objective person who knows of the history and mental condition of the person engaging in the act or behaviors.

(14) "Risk potential activity" or "risk potential facility" means an activity or facility that provides a higher incidence of risk to the public from persons conditionally released from the special commitment center. Risk potential activities and facilities include: Public and private schools, school bus stops, licensed day care and licensed preschool facilities, public parks, publicly dedicated trails, sports fields, playgrounds, recreational and community centers, churches, synagogues, temples, mosques, public libraries, public and private youth camps, and other((s))locations where the public is known to congregate identified by the department following the hearings on a potential site required in RCW 71.09.315. For purposes of this chapter, "school bus stops" does not include bus stops established primarily for public transit.

(15) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services or the secretary's designee.

(16) "Secure community transition facility" means a residential facility for persons civilly committed and conditionally released to a less restrictive alternative under this chapter. A secure community transition facility has supervision and security, and either provides or ensures the provision of sex offender treatment services. Secure community transition facilities include but are not limited to the facility established pursuant to RCW 71.09.250(1)(a)(i) and any community-based facilities established under this chapter and operated by the secretary or under contract with the secretary.

(17) "Secure facility" means a residential facility for persons civilly confined under the provisions of this chapter that includes security measures sufficient to protect the community. Such facilities include total confinement facilities, secure community transition facilities, and any residence used as a court-ordered placement under RCW 71.09.096.

(18) "Sexually violent offense" means an act committed on, before, or after July 1, 1990, that is: (a) An act defined in Title 9A RCW as rape in the first degree, rape in the second degree by forcible compulsion, rape of a child in the first or second degree, statutory rape in the first or second degree, indecent liberties by forcible compulsion, indecent liberties against a child under age fourteen, incest against a child under age fourteen, or child molestation in the first or second degree; (b) a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1, 1990, that is comparable to a sexually violent offense as defined in (a) of this subsection, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for a felony offense that under the laws of this state would be a sexually violent offense as defined in this subsection; (c) an act of murder in the first or second degree, assault in the first or second degree, assault of a child in the first or second degree, kidnapping in the first or second degree, burglary in the first degree, residential burglary, or unlawful imprisonment, which act, either at the time of sentencing for the offense or subsequently during civil commitment proceedings pursuant to this chapter, has been determined beyond a reasonable doubt to have been sexually motivated, as that term is defined in RCW 9.94A.030; or (d) an act as described in chapter 9A.28 RCW, that is an attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit one of the felonies designated in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection.

(19) "Sexually violent predator" means any person who has been convicted of or charged with a crime of sexual violence and who suffers from a mental abnormality or personality disorder which makes the person likely to engage in predatory acts of sexual violence if not confined in a secure facility.

(20) "Total confinement facility" means a secure facility that provides supervision and sex offender treatment services in a total confinement setting. Total confinement facilities include the special commitment center and any similar facility designated as a total confinement facility by the secretary.

(21) "Treatment" means the sex offender specific treatment program at the special commitment center or a specific course of sex offender treatment pursuant to RCW 71.09.092 (1) and (2).

Sec. 2. RCW 71.09.020 and 2021 c 236 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Department" means the department of social and health services.

(2) "Fair share principles" and "fair share principles of release" means that each ((county))region within the state has adequate options for conditional release housing placements in a number generally equivalent to the number of residents from that ((county))region who are subject to total confinement pursuant to this chapter.

(3) "Health care facility" means any hospital, hospice care center, licensed or certified health care facility, health maintenance organization regulated under chapter 48.46 RCW, federally qualified health maintenance organization, federally approved renal dialysis center or facility, or federally approved blood bank.

(4) "Health care practitioner" means an individual or firm licensed or certified to engage actively in a regulated health profession.

(5) "Health care services" means those services provided by health professionals licensed pursuant to RCW 18.120.020(4).

(6) "Health profession" means those licensed or regulated professions set forth in RCW 18.120.020(4).

(7) "Less restrictive alternative" means court-ordered treatment in a setting less restrictive than total confinement which satisfies the conditions set forth in RCW 71.09.092. A less restrictive alternative may not include placement in the community protection program as pursuant to RCW 71A.12.230. A less restrictive alternative may only include a housing placement that is owned by the department, operated by the department, or operated under contract with the department.

(8) "Likely to engage in predatory acts of sexual violence if not confined in a secure facility" means that the person more probably than not will engage in such acts if released unconditionally from detention on the sexually violent predator petition. Such likelihood must be evidenced by a recent overt act if the person is not totally confined at the time the petition is filed under RCW 71.09.030.

(9) "Mental abnormality" means a congenital or acquired condition affecting the emotional or volitional capacity which predisposes the person to the commission of criminal sexual acts in a degree constituting such person a menace to the health and safety of others.

(10) "Personality disorder" means an enduring pattern of inner experience and behavior that deviates markedly from the expectations of the individual's culture, is pervasive and inflexible, has onset in adolescence or early adulthood, is stable over time and leads to distress or impairment. Purported evidence of a personality disorder must be supported by testimony of a licensed forensic psychologist or psychiatrist.

(11) "Predatory" means acts directed towards: (a) Strangers; (b) individuals with whom a relationship has been established or promoted for the primary purpose of victimization; or (c) persons of casual acquaintance with whom no substantial personal relationship exists.

(12) "Prosecuting agency" means the prosecuting attorney of the county where the person was convicted or charged or the attorney general if requested by the prosecuting attorney, as provided in RCW 71.09.030.

(13) "Recent overt act" means any act, threat, or combination thereof that has either caused harm of a sexually violent nature or creates a reasonable apprehension of such harm in the mind of an objective person who knows of the history and mental condition of the person engaging in the act or behaviors.

(14) "Risk potential activity" or "risk potential facility" means an activity or facility that provides a higher incidence of risk to the public from persons conditionally released from the special commitment center. Risk potential activities and facilities include: Public and private schools, school bus stops, licensed day care and licensed preschool facilities, public parks, publicly dedicated trails, sports fields, playgrounds, recreational and community centers, churches, synagogues, temples, mosques, public libraries, public and private youth camps, and other((s))locations where the public is known to congregate identified by the department following the hearings on a potential site required in RCW 71.09.315. For purposes of this chapter, "school bus stops" does not include bus stops established primarily for public transit.

(15) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services or the secretary's designee.

(16) "Secure community transition facility" means a residential facility for persons civilly committed and conditionally released to a less restrictive alternative under this chapter. A secure community transition facility has supervision and security, and either provides or ensures the provision of sex offender treatment services. Secure community transition facilities include but are not limited to the facility established pursuant to RCW 71.09.250(1)(a)(i) and any community-based facilities established under this chapter and operated by the secretary or under contract with the secretary.

(17) "Secure facility" means a residential facility for persons civilly confined under the provisions of this chapter that includes security measures sufficient to protect the community. Such facilities include total confinement facilities, secure community transition facilities, and any residence used as a court-ordered placement under RCW 71.09.096.

(18) "Sexually violent offense" means an act committed on, before, or after July 1, 1990, that is: (a) An act defined in Title 9A RCW as rape in the first degree, rape in the second degree by forcible compulsion, rape of a child in the first or second degree, statutory rape in the first or second degree, indecent liberties by forcible compulsion, indecent liberties against a child under age fourteen, incest against a child under age fourteen, or child molestation in the first or second degree; (b) a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1, 1990, that is comparable to a sexually violent offense as defined in (a) of this subsection, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for a felony offense that under the laws of this state would be a sexually violent offense as defined in this subsection; (c) an act of murder in the first or second degree, assault in the first or second degree, assault of a child in the first or second degree, kidnapping in the first or second degree, burglary in the first degree, residential burglary, or unlawful imprisonment, which act, either at the time of sentencing for the offense or subsequently during civil commitment proceedings pursuant to this chapter, has been determined beyond a reasonable doubt to have been sexually motivated, as that term is defined in RCW 9.94A.030; or (d) an act as described in chapter 9A.28 RCW, that is an attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit one of the felonies designated in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection.

(19) "Sexually violent predator" means any person who has been convicted of or charged with a crime of sexual violence and who suffers from a mental abnormality or personality disorder which makes the person likely to engage in predatory acts of sexual violence if not confined in a secure facility.

(20) "Total confinement facility" means a secure facility that provides supervision and sex offender treatment services in a total confinement setting. Total confinement facilities include the special commitment center and any similar facility designated as a total confinement facility by the secretary.

(21) "Treatment" means the sex offender specific treatment program at the special commitment center or a specific course of sex offender treatment pursuant to RCW 71.09.092 (1) and (2).

Sec. 3. RCW 71.09.090 and 2021 c 236 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) If the secretary determines that the person's condition has so changed that the person no longer meets the definition of a sexually violent predator, the secretary shall authorize the person to petition the court for unconditional discharge. The petition shall be filed with the court and served upon the prosecuting agency responsible for the initial commitment. The court, upon receipt of the petition for unconditional discharge, shall within 45 days order a hearing.

(b) If the secretary determines that the person's condition has so changed that conditional release to a less restrictive alternative is in the best interest of the person and conditions can be imposed that adequately protect the community, then the secretary shall authorize the person to petition the court for conditional release to a less restrictive alternative. Upon receipt of the petition, the court shall order the department to identify a less restrictive alternative placement that satisfies RCW 71.09.092 (1) through (4). Once identified, notice of the placement shall be filed with the court and served upon: The prosecuting agency responsible for the initial commitment; the prosecuting agency of the county where the person will be conditionally released to; any person or persons identified in RCW 71.09.140(2)(a) who have opted to receive notifications under this chapter; and the person and his or her counsel. If the department cannot identify a placement available to the person that satisfies RCW 71.09.092 (1) through (4) within 90 days, the department shall provide a written certification to the court, the prosecuting agency responsible for the initial commitment, the prosecuting agency of the county where the person will be conditionally released to, and the person and his or her counsel, detailing the efforts of the department to identify a qualifying placement. Upon the department's certification, the person may propose a placement that satisfies RCW 71.09.092 (1) through (3). After a less restrictive placement has been proposed by either the department or the person, the court shall within 45 days order a hearing.

(2)(a) Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit the person from otherwise petitioning the court for conditional release to a less restrictive alternative or unconditional discharge without the secretary's approval. The secretary shall provide the committed person with an annual written notice of the person's right to petition the court for conditional release to a less restrictive alternative or unconditional discharge over the secretary's objection. The notice shall contain a waiver of rights. The secretary shall file the notice and waiver form and the annual report with the court. If the person does not affirmatively waive the right to petition, the court shall set a show cause hearing to determine whether probable cause exists to warrant a hearing on whether the person's condition has so changed that: (i) He or she no longer meets the definition of a sexually violent predator; or (ii) conditional release to a proposed less restrictive alternative would be in the best interest of the person and conditions can be imposed that would adequately protect the community.

(b)(i) The committed person shall have a right to have an attorney represent him or her at the show cause hearing, which may be conducted solely on the basis of affidavits or declarations, but the person is not entitled to be present at the show cause hearing. At the show cause hearing, the prosecuting agency shall present prima facie evidence establishing: (A) That the committed person continues to meet the definition of a sexually violent predator; and (B) that a less restrictive alternative is not in the best interest of the person and conditions cannot be imposed that adequately protect the community.

(ii)(A) If the state produces prima facie evidence that the committed person continues to be a sexually violent predator, then the state's burden under (b)(i)(A) of this subsection is met and an unconditional release trial may not be ordered unless the committed person produces evidence satisfying: Subsection (4)(a) of this section; and subsection (4)(b) (i) or (ii) of this section.

(B) If the state produces prima facie evidence that a less restrictive alternative is not appropriate for the committed person, then the state's burden under (b)(i)(B) of this subsection is met, and a conditional release trial may not be ordered unless the committed person:

(I) Produces evidence satisfying: Subsection (4)(a) of this section; and subsection (4)(b) (i) or (ii) of this section; and

(II) Presents the court with a specific placement satisfying the requirements of RCW 71.09.092.

(iii) In making the showing required under (b)(i) of this subsection, the state may rely exclusively upon the annual report prepared pursuant to RCW 71.09.070. The committed person may present responsive affidavits or declarations to which the state may reply.

(c)(i) If the court at the show cause hearing determines that either: (A) The state has failed to present prima facie evidence that the committed person continues to meet the definition of a sexually violent predator; or (B) probable cause exists to believe that the person's condition has so changed that the person no longer meets the definition of a sexually violent predator, then the court shall set a hearing on the issue of unconditional discharge.

(ii) If the court at the show cause hearing determines that the state has failed to present prima facie evidence that no proposed less restrictive alternative is in the best interest of the person and conditions cannot be imposed that would adequately protect the community, the court shall enter an order directing the department to propose a less restrictive alternative that satisfies RCW 71.09.092 (1) through (4). If the department cannot identify a placement available to the person that satisfies RCW 71.09.092 (1) through (4) within 90 days, the department shall provide a written certification to the court, the prosecuting agency responsible for the initial commitment, and the person and his or her counsel, detailing the efforts of the department to identify a qualifying placement. Upon the department's certification, the person may propose a placement that satisfies RCW 71.09.092 (1) through (3). After a less restrictive placement has been proposed by either the department or the person, the court shall set a hearing on the issue of conditional release.

(iii) If the court at the show cause hearing determines, based on the evidence submitted by the person, that probable cause exists to believe that release to a less restrictive alternative would be in the best interest of the person and conditions can be imposed that would adequately protect the community, the court shall set a hearing on the issue of conditional release if the person presents the court with a specific placement that satisfies the requirements of RCW 71.09.092.

(d) If the court has not previously considered the issue of release to a less restrictive alternative, either through a trial on the merits or through the procedures set forth in RCW 71.09.094(1), or if an immediately preceding less restrictive alternative was revoked due to the loss of adequate housing or treatment for reasons other than noncompliance with housing requirements, treatment, or other conditions of the less restrictive alternative, the court shall consider whether release to a less restrictive alternative would be in the best interests of the person and conditions can be imposed that would adequately protect the community, without considering whether the person's condition has changed.

(3)(a) At the hearing resulting from subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the committed person shall be entitled to be present and to the benefit of all constitutional protections that were afforded to the person at the initial commitment proceeding. The prosecuting agency shall represent the state and shall have a right to a jury trial and to have the committed person evaluated by experts chosen by the state. The prosecuting agency shall have a right to a current evaluation of the person by experts chosen by the state. The judge may require the person to complete any or all of the following procedures or tests if requested by the evaluator: (i) A clinical interview; (ii) psychological testing; (iii) plethysmograph testing; and (iv) polygraph testing. The judge may order the person to complete any other procedures and tests relevant to the evaluation. The state is responsible for the costs of the evaluation. The committed person shall also have the right to a jury trial and the right to have experts evaluate him or her on his or her behalf and the court shall appoint an expert if the person is indigent and requests an appointment.

(b) Whenever any indigent person is subjected to an evaluation under (a) of this subsection, the office of public defense is responsible for the cost of one expert or professional person conducting an evaluation on the person's behalf. When the person wishes to be evaluated by a qualified expert or professional person of his or her own choice, such expert or professional person must be permitted to have reasonable access to the person for the purpose of such evaluation, as well as to all relevant medical and psychological records and reports. In the case of a person who is indigent, the court shall, upon the person's request, assist the person in obtaining an expert or professional person to perform an evaluation or participate in the hearing on the person's behalf. Nothing in this chapter precludes the person from paying for additional expert services at his or her own expense.

(c) If the issue at the hearing is whether the person should be unconditionally discharged, the burden of proof shall be upon the state to prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the committed person's condition remains such that the person continues to meet the definition of a sexually violent predator. Evidence of the prior commitment trial and disposition is admissible. The recommitment proceeding shall otherwise proceed as set forth in RCW 71.09.050 and 71.09.060.

(d) If the issue at the hearing is whether the person should be conditionally released to a less restrictive alternative, the burden of proof at the hearing shall be upon the state to prove beyond a reasonable doubt that conditional release to any proposed less restrictive alternative either: (i) Is not in the best interest of the committed person; or (ii) does not include conditions that would adequately protect the community. Evidence of the prior commitment trial and disposition is admissible.

(4)(a) Probable cause exists to believe that a person's condition has "so changed," under subsection (2) of this section, only when evidence exists, since the person's last commitment trial, or less restrictive alternative revocation proceeding, of a substantial change in the person's physical or mental condition such that the person either no longer meets the definition of a sexually violent predator or that a conditional release to a less restrictive alternative is in the person's best interest and conditions can be imposed to adequately protect the community.

(b) A new trial proceeding under subsection (3) of this section may be ordered, or a trial proceeding may be held, only when there is current evidence from a licensed professional of one of the following and the evidence presents a change in condition since the person's last commitment trial proceeding:

(i) An identified physiological change to the person, such as paralysis, stroke, or dementia, that renders the committed person unable to commit a sexually violent act and this change is permanent; or

(ii) A change in the person's mental condition brought about through positive response to continuing participation in treatment which indicates that the person meets the standard for conditional release to a less restrictive alternative or that the person would be safe to be at large if unconditionally released from commitment.

(c) For purposes of this section, a change in a single demographic factor, without more, does not establish probable cause for a new trial proceeding under subsection (3) of this section. As used in this section, a single demographic factor includes, but is not limited to, a change in the chronological age, marital status, or gender of the committed person.

(5) Whenever the person petitions the court for conditional release to a less restrictive alternative, regardless of whether the petition is authorized by the secretary, the person may not propose a specific less restrictive alternative placement unless:

(a) The court orders the department to identify a less restrictive alternative placement available to the person pursuant to subsection (1)(b) or (2)(c)(ii) of this section; the department does not identify a qualifying placement within 90 days; and the department provides a written certification to the court, the prosecuting agency responsible for the initial commitment, and the person and his or her counsel, detailing the efforts of the department to identify a qualifying placement; or

(b) The person provides notice to the court and the prosecuting agency responsible for the initial commitment of his or her intent to propose a specific less restrictive alternative placement; the court provides the department a specified time frame to identify a less restrictive alternative placement available to the person that satisfies RCW 71.09.092 (1) through (4); and the department either:

(i) Identifies a qualifying placement within the specified time frame; or

(ii) Does not identify a qualifying placement, and instead provides a written certification to the court, the prosecuting agency responsible for the initial commitment, and the person and his or her counsel, detailing the efforts of the department to identify a qualifying placement.

(6) When the court enters an order for unconditional discharge of a person from an immediately preceding less restrictive placement, the court must direct the clerk to transmit a copy of the order to the department of corrections for discharge process and termination of cause.

(((6)))(7) The jurisdiction of the court over a person civilly committed pursuant to this chapter continues until such time as the person is unconditionally discharged.

(((7)))(8) During any period of confinement pursuant to a criminal conviction, or for any period of detention awaiting trial on criminal charges, this section is suspended.

Sec. 4. RCW 71.09.092 and 2021 c 236 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Before the court may enter an order directing conditional release to a less restrictive alternative, it must find the following: (1) The person will be treated by a treatment provider who is qualified to provide such treatment in the state of Washington under chapter 18.155 RCW; (2) the treatment provider has presented a specific course of treatment and has agreed to assume responsibility for such treatment and will report progress to the court on a regular basis, and will report violations immediately to the court, the prosecutor, the supervising community corrections officer, and the superintendent of the special commitment center; (3) housing exists in Washington that complies with distance restrictions pursuant to RCW 71.09.096(4)(a), is sufficiently secure to protect the community, and the person or agency providing housing to the conditionally released person has agreed in writing to accept the person, to provide the level of security required by the court, and immediately to report to the court, the prosecutor, the supervising community corrections officer, and the superintendent of the special commitment center if the person leaves the housing to which he or she has been assigned without authorization; (4) if the department has proposed housing that is outside of the county of commitment, a documented effort was made by the department to ensure that placement is consistent with fair share principles of release; (5) the person is willing to comply with the treatment provider and all requirements imposed by the treatment provider and by the court; and (6) the person will be under the supervision of the department of corrections and is willing to comply with supervision requirements imposed by the department of corrections.

Sec. 5. RCW 71.09.092 and 2021 c 236 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Before the court may enter an order directing conditional release to a less restrictive alternative, it must find the following: (1) The person will be treated by a treatment provider who is qualified to provide such treatment in the state of Washington under chapter 18.155 RCW; (2) the treatment provider has presented a specific course of treatment and has agreed to assume responsibility for such treatment and will report progress to the court on a regular basis, and will report violations immediately to the court, the prosecutor, the supervising community corrections officer, and the superintendent of the special commitment center; (3) housing exists in Washington that complies with distance restrictions pursuant to RCW 71.09.096(4)(a), is sufficiently secure to protect the community, is owned by the department, operated by the department, or operated under contract with the department, and the person or agency providing housing to the conditionally released person has agreed in writing to accept the person, to provide the level of security required by the court, and immediately to report to the court, the prosecutor, the supervising community corrections officer, and the superintendent of the special commitment center if the person leaves the housing to which he or she has been assigned without authorization; (4) if the department has proposed housing that is outside of the county of commitment, a documented effort was made by the department to ensure that placement is consistent with fair share principles of release; (5) the person is willing to comply with the treatment provider and all requirements imposed by the treatment provider and by the court; and (6) the person will be under the supervision of the department of corrections and is willing to comply with supervision requirements imposed by the department of corrections.

Sec. 6. RCW 71.09.096 and 2021 c 236 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the court or jury determines that conditional release to a less restrictive alternative is in the best interest of the person and includes conditions that would adequately protect the community, and the court determines that the minimum conditions set forth in RCW 71.09.092 and in this section are met, the court shall enter judgment and direct a conditional release.

(2) The court shall impose any additional conditions necessary to ensure compliance with treatment and to protect the community. If the court finds that conditions do not exist that will both ensure the person's compliance with treatment and protect the community, then the person shall be remanded to the custody of the department of social and health services for control, care, and treatment in a secure facility as designated in RCW 71.09.060(1).

(3) If the service provider designated by the court to provide inpatient or outpatient treatment or to monitor or supervise any other terms and conditions of a person's placement in a less restrictive alternative is other than the department of social and health services or the department of corrections, then the service provider so designated must agree in writing to provide such treatment, monitoring, or supervision in accord with this section. Any person providing or agreeing to provide treatment, monitoring, or supervision services pursuant to this chapter may be compelled to testify and any privilege with regard to such person's testimony is deemed waived.

(4)(a) Prior to authorizing any release to a less restrictive alternative, the court shall impose such conditions upon the person as are necessary to ensure the safety of the community. In imposing conditions, the court must impose a restriction on the proximity of the person's residence to public or private schools providing instruction to kindergarten or any grades one through 12 in accordance with RCW 72.09.340. In no case shall the person's residence be located adjacent to, immediately across a street or parking lot from, or within the line of sight of a risk potential activity or facility. Courts shall require a minimum distance restriction of 500 feet on the proximity of the person's residence to child care facilities ((and)), bus stops, academic or educational programs, public or private schools providing instruction to kindergarten or any grades one through 12, and other locations that may trigger risk behavior. The court shall order the department of corrections to investigate the less restrictive alternative and, within 60 days of the order to investigate, recommend any additional conditions to the court. These conditions shall be individualized to address the person's specific risk factors and criminogenic needs and may include, but are not limited to(([,])), the following: Specification of residence or restrictions on residence including distance restrictions, specification of contact with a reasonable number of individuals upon the person's request who are verified by the department of corrections to be appropriate social contacts, prohibition of contact with potential or past victims, prohibition of alcohol and other drug use, participation in a specific course of inpatient or outpatient treatment that may include monitoring by the use of polygraph and plethysmograph, monitoring through the use of global positioning system technology, supervision by a department of corrections community corrections officer, a requirement that the person remain within the state unless the person receives prior authorization by the court, and any other conditions that the court determines are in the best interest of the person or others. A copy of the conditions of release shall be given to the person and to any designated service providers.

(b) To the greatest extent possible, the person, person's counsel, prosecuting agency responsible for the initial commitment, the prosecuting agency of the county where the person will be conditionally released to, treatment provider, supervising community corrections officer, and appropriate clinical staff of the special commitment center shall meet and collaborate to craft individualized, narrowly tailored, and empirically based conditions to present to the court to help facilitate the person's successful transition to the community.

(5)(a) Prior to authorizing release to a less restrictive alternative proposed by the department, the court shall consider whether the person's less restrictive alternative placement is in accordance with fair share principles. To ensure equitable distribution of releases, and prevent the disproportionate grouping of persons subject to less restrictive orders in any one county, or in any one jurisdiction or community within a county, the legislature finds it is appropriate for releases to a less restrictive alternative to occur in a manner that adheres to fair share principles. The legislature recognizes that there may be reasons why the department may not recommend that a person be released to his or her county of commitment, including availability of individualized resources, the person's support needs, or when the court determines that the person's return to his or her county of commitment would be inappropriate considering any court-issued protection orders, victim safety concerns that cannot be addressed through use of global positioning system technology, the unavailability of appropriate treatment or facilities that would adequately protect the community, negative influences on the person, and the location of family or other persons or organizations offering support to the person. If the court authorizes conditional release based on the department's proposal to a county other than the county of commitment, the court shall enter specific findings regarding its decision and identify whether the release remains in line with fair share principles.

(b)(i) When the department develops a less restrictive alternative placement under this section, it shall attempt to identify a placement satisfying the requirements of RCW 71.09.092 that is aligned with fair share principles. The department shall document its rationale for the recommended placement.

(ii) If the department does not support or recommend conditional release to a less restrictive alternative due to a clinical determination, the department shall document its objection and certify that the department is developing the less restrictive alternative pursuant to a court order and not because of a clinical determination.

(iii) When the department develops or proposes a less restrictive alternative placement under this chapter, it shall be considered a predisposition recommendation.

(iv) In developing, modifying, and enforcing less restrictive alternatives, the department shall be deemed to be performing a quasi-judicial function.

(c) If the committed person is not conditionally released to his or her county of commitment, the department shall provide the law and justice council of the county in which the person is conditionally released with notice and a written explanation, including whether the department remains in compliance with fair share principles regarding releases under this chapter.

(d) For purposes of this section, the person's county of commitment means the county of the court which ordered the person's commitment.

(e) This subsection (5) does not apply to releases to a secure community transition facility under RCW 71.09.250.

(6)(a) When ordered by the court, the department must provide less restrictive alternative treatment that includes, at a minimum:

(i) The services identified in the person's discharge plan as outlined in RCW 71.09.080(4);

(ii) The assignment of a community care coordinator;

(iii) Regular contacts with providers of court-ordered treatment services;

(iv) Community escorts, if needed;

(v) A transition plan that addresses the person's access to continued services upon unconditional discharge;

(vi) Financial support for necessary housing;

(vii) Life skills training and disability accommodations, if needed; and

(viii) Assistance in pursuing benefits, education, and employment.

(b) At the time the department of corrections is ordered to investigate a proposed less restrictive alternative placement, subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall assign a social worker to assist the person with discharge planning, pursuing benefits, and coordination of care prior to release.

(i) The social worker shall assist the person with completing applications for benefits prior to the person's release from total confinement.

(ii) To promote continuity of care and the individual's success in the community, the department social worker shall be responsible for initiating a clinical transition of care between the last treating clinician at the special commitment center and the person's designated community treatment provider. This transition between one clinical setting to another shall occur no later than 15 days before an individual's release from the special commitment center.

(iii) If applicable, the social worker shall assist the person with locating any needed disability accommodations in the community and with obtaining resources to help address the person's identified life skills needs prior to release from total confinement.

(7) Any service provider designated to provide inpatient or outpatient treatment shall monthly, or as otherwise directed by the court, submit to the court, to the department of social and health services facility from which the person was released, to the prosecuting agency, and to the supervising community corrections officer, a report stating whether the person is complying with the terms and conditions of the conditional release to a less restrictive alternative.

(8) Each person released to a less restrictive alternative shall have his or her case reviewed by the court that released him or her no later than one year after such release and annually thereafter until the person is unconditionally discharged. Review may occur in a shorter time or more frequently, if the court, in its discretion on its own motion, or on motion of the person, the secretary, or the prosecuting ((agency))agencies so ((determines))determine. The questions to be determined by the court are whether the person shall continue to be conditionally released to a less restrictive alternative, and if so, whether a modification to the person's less restrictive alternative order is appropriate to ensure the conditional release remains in the best interest of the person and adequate to protect the victim and the community. The court in making its determination shall be aided by the periodic reports filed pursuant to subsection (7) of this section and the opinions of the secretary and other experts or professional persons.

Sec. 7. RCW 71.09.096 and 2021 c 236 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the court or jury determines that conditional release to a less restrictive alternative is in the best interest of the person and includes conditions that would adequately protect the community, and the court determines that the minimum conditions set forth in RCW 71.09.092 and in this section are met, the court shall enter judgment and direct a conditional release.

(2) The court shall impose any additional conditions necessary to ensure compliance with treatment and to protect the community. If the court finds that conditions do not exist that will both ensure the person's compliance with treatment and protect the community, then the person shall be remanded to the custody of the department of social and health services for control, care, and treatment in a secure facility as designated in RCW 71.09.060(1).

(3) If the service provider designated by the court to provide inpatient or outpatient treatment or to monitor or supervise any other terms and conditions of a person's placement in a less restrictive alternative is other than the department of social and health services or the department of corrections, then the service provider so designated must agree in writing to provide such treatment, monitoring, or supervision in accord with this section. Any person providing or agreeing to provide treatment, monitoring, or supervision services pursuant to this chapter may be compelled to testify and any privilege with regard to such person's testimony is deemed waived.

(4)(a) Prior to authorizing any release to a less restrictive alternative, the court shall impose such conditions upon the person as are necessary to ensure the safety of the community. In imposing conditions, the court must impose a restriction on the proximity of the person's residence to public or private schools providing instruction to kindergarten or any grades one through 12 in accordance with RCW 72.09.340. In no case shall the person's residence be located adjacent to, immediately across a street or parking lot from, or within the line of sight of a risk potential activity or facility. Courts shall require a minimum distance restriction of 500 feet on the proximity of the person's residence to child care facilities ((and)), bus stops, academic or educational programs, public or private schools providing instruction to kindergarten or any grades one through 12, and other locations that may trigger risk behavior. The court shall order the department of corrections to investigate the less restrictive alternative and, within 60 days of the order to investigate, recommend any additional conditions to the court. These conditions shall be individualized to address the person's specific risk factors and criminogenic needs and may include, but are not limited to(([,])), the following: Specification of residence or restrictions on residence including distance restrictions, specification of contact with a reasonable number of individuals upon the person's request who are verified by the department of corrections to be appropriate social contacts, prohibition of contact with potential or past victims, prohibition of alcohol and other drug use, participation in a specific course of inpatient or outpatient treatment that may include monitoring by the use of polygraph and plethysmograph, monitoring through the use of global positioning system technology, supervision by a department of corrections community corrections officer, a requirement that the person remain within the state unless the person receives prior authorization by the court, and any other conditions that the court determines are in the best interest of the person or others. A copy of the conditions of release shall be given to the person and to any designated service providers.

(b) To the greatest extent possible, the person, person's counsel, prosecuting agency responsible for the initial commitment, the prosecuting agency of the county where the person will be conditionally released to, treatment provider, supervising community corrections officer, and appropriate clinical staff of the special commitment center shall meet and collaborate to craft individualized, narrowly tailored, and empirically based conditions to present to the court to help facilitate the person's successful transition to the community.

(5)(a) Prior to authorizing release to a less restrictive alternative proposed by the department, the court shall consider whether the person's less restrictive alternative placement is in accordance with fair share principles. To ensure equitable distribution of releases, and prevent the disproportionate grouping of persons subject to less restrictive orders in any one ((county))region within the state, or in any one jurisdiction or community within a ((county))region, the legislature finds it is appropriate for releases to a less restrictive alternative to occur in a manner that adheres to fair share principles. The legislature recognizes that there may be reasons why the department may not recommend that a person be released to his or her county of commitment, including availability of individualized resources, the person's support needs, or when the court determines that the person's return to his or her county of commitment would be inappropriate considering any court-issued protection orders, victim safety concerns that cannot be addressed through use of global positioning system technology, the unavailability of appropriate treatment or facilities that would adequately protect the community, negative influences on the person, and the location of family or other persons or organizations offering support to the person. If the court authorizes conditional release based on the department's proposal to a county in a region within the state other than the region that includes the person's county of commitment, the court shall enter specific findings regarding its decision and identify whether the release remains in line with fair share principles.

(b)(i) When the department develops a less restrictive alternative placement under this section, it shall attempt to identify a placement satisfying the requirements of RCW 71.09.092 that is aligned with fair share principles. The department shall document its rationale for the recommended placement.

(ii) If the department does not support or recommend conditional release to a less restrictive alternative due to a clinical determination, the department shall document its objection and certify that the department is developing the less restrictive alternative pursuant to a court order and not because of a clinical determination.

(iii) When the department develops or proposes a less restrictive alternative placement under this chapter, it shall be considered a predisposition recommendation.

(iv) In developing, modifying, and enforcing less restrictive alternatives, the department shall be deemed to be performing a quasi-judicial function.

(c) If the committed person is not conditionally released to the region within the state that includes his or her county of commitment, the department shall provide the law and justice council of the county in which the person is conditionally released with notice and a written explanation, including whether the department remains in compliance with fair share principles regarding releases under this chapter.

(d) For purposes of this section, the person's county of commitment means the county of the court which ordered the person's commitment.

(e) This subsection (5) does not apply to releases to a secure community transition facility under RCW 71.09.250.

(6)(a) When ordered by the court, the department must provide less restrictive alternative treatment that includes, at a minimum:

(i) The services identified in the person's discharge plan as outlined in RCW 71.09.080(4);

(ii) The assignment of a community care coordinator;

(iii) Regular contacts with providers of court-ordered treatment services;

(iv) Community escorts, if needed;

(v) A transition plan that addresses the person's access to continued services upon unconditional discharge;

(vi) Financial support for necessary housing;

(vii) Life skills training and disability accommodations, if needed; and

(viii) Assistance in pursuing benefits, education, and employment.

(b) At the time the department of corrections is ordered to investigate a proposed less restrictive alternative placement, subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall assign a social worker to assist the person with discharge planning, pursuing benefits, and coordination of care prior to release.

(i) The social worker shall assist the person with completing applications for benefits prior to the person's release from total confinement.

(ii) To promote continuity of care and the individual's success in the community, the department social worker shall be responsible for initiating a clinical transition of care between the last treating clinician at the special commitment center and the person's designated community treatment provider. This transition between one clinical setting to another shall occur no later than 15 days before an individual's release from the special commitment center.

(iii) If applicable, the social worker shall assist the person with locating any needed disability accommodations in the community and with obtaining resources to help address the person's identified life skills needs prior to release from total confinement.

(7) Any service provider designated to provide inpatient or outpatient treatment shall monthly, or as otherwise directed by the court, submit to the court, to the department of social and health services facility from which the person was released, to the prosecuting agency, and to the supervising community corrections officer, a report stating whether the person is complying with the terms and conditions of the conditional release to a less restrictive alternative.

(8) Each person released to a less restrictive alternative shall have his or her case reviewed by the court that released him or her no later than one year after such release and annually thereafter until the person is unconditionally discharged. Review may occur in a shorter time or more frequently, if the court, in its discretion on its own motion, or on motion of the person, the secretary, or the prosecuting ((agency))agencies so ((determines))determine. The questions to be determined by the court are whether the person shall continue to be conditionally released to a less restrictive alternative, and if so, whether a modification to the person's less restrictive alternative order is appropriate to ensure the conditional release remains in the best interest of the person and adequate to protect the victim and the community. The court in making its determination shall be aided by the periodic reports filed pursuant to subsection (7) of this section and the opinions of the secretary and other experts or professional persons.

Sec. 8. RCW 71.09.097 and 2021 c 236 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) In accordance with RCW 71.09.090 and 71.09.096, the department shall have the primary responsibility for developing a less restrictive alternative placement. To ensure the department has sufficient less restrictive alternative placements to choose from that satisfy the requirements of RCW 71.09.092, subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall use a request for proposal process to solicit and contract with housing and treatment providers from across the state and facilitate fair share principles among the counties. In order to increase the number of housing options for individuals qualifying for a less restrictive alternative, the department shall have oversight of the vendors and providers who contract with the state, including the authority to inspect and ensure compliance, negotiate the rates charged for services, ensure adequate living conditions of housing locations, and terminate contracts. The department shall maintain a statewide accounting of the contracted community housing and treatment providers in each county and provide a biannual report to the legislature and governor by December 1st on the availability and adequacy of less restrictive alternative placements and the department's compliance with fair share principles.

(b) The department may not enter into a contract with a housing provider until the following conditions have been met:

(i) Upon identifying a county for possible housing, the department and housing provider must contact the county legislative authority and inform them of the intent to create a facility in their jurisdiction;

(ii) The department must contact the local government planning agencies and consult with any federally recognized tribes and academic or educational programs in the local communities affected, and coordinate with local government agencies to ensure opportunities are provided for effective citizen input and to reduce duplication of notice and meetings;

(iii) The department must create strategies to effectively engage the public, including a way to allow community members to easily submit written and oral comments;

(iv) The department must specifically solicit feedback from any federally recognized tribes and privately licensed educational organizations in the local communities located within 500 feet of the proposed location of the less restrictive alternative housing; and

(v) The department, in partnership with the potential housing provider, the department of corrections, county leadership, and the county sheriff's office, must plan and host a minimum of one public meeting in the local communities affected.

(c) The department shall also consider whether the proposed housing would be adjacent to, or immediately across the street or parking lot from, a risk potential activity or facility in existence at the time the site is listed for consideration.

(2) To facilitate its duties required under this section, the department shall use the following housing matrix and considerations as a guide to planning and developing less restrictive alternative placements. The following considerations may not be used as a reason to deny a less restrictive alternative placement.

(a) Considerations for evaluating a proposed vendor's application for less restrictive alternative housing services shall include applicable state and local zoning, health, and building codes, general housing requirements, availability of public services, and other considerations identified in accordance with RCW 71.09.315. The department shall require the housing provider to provide proof that the facility is in compliance with all local zoning, health, and building codes.

(i) General housing requirements include running water, electricity, bedroom and living space of adequate size, and no mold or infestations.

(ii) Availability of public services include availability of chaperones and whether the placement is within a reasonable distance to a grocery store, bank, public transportation options, and offices for public services and benefits.

(iii) Other considerations include whether the placement is consistent with fair share principles across the counties, whether the placement is within reasonable distance to other current or planned components of the less restrictive alternative, whether the placement is within reasonable distance to employment opportunities, and the reliability of global positioning system technology.

(b) Factors for evaluating less restrictive alternative options for a specific individual include sex offender treatment considerations, criminogenic needs and risk factors, protective factors, and the specific needs of the client.

(i) Sex offender treatment considerations include whether the housing is within a reasonable distance from the treatment provider, whether the treatment provider is a good therapeutic match with the client, and whether the treatment provider has relevant experience and background to treat the client if the client has special needs.

(ii) Criminogenic needs and risk factors include consideration of the person's specific needs and risk factors in evaluating less restrictive alternative options.

(iii) Protective factors include whether housing is within a reasonable distance of family, friends, potential hobbies, potential employment, and educational opportunities.

(iv) Consideration of the client's specific needs includes assessing the availability of personal care assistance and in-home care assistance, and whether housing is within a reasonable distance of mental health, medical treatment options, and substance use disorder treatment options.

Sec. 9. RCW 71.09.097 and 2021 c 236 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) In accordance with RCW 71.09.090, 71.09.092, and 71.09.096, the department shall have the primary responsibility for developing a less restrictive alternative placement, and the exclusive authority to operate or contract with providers to operate housing options for individuals qualifying for a less restrictive alternative. To ensure the department has sufficient less restrictive alternative placements to choose from that satisfy the requirements of RCW 71.09.092, subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall use a request for proposal process to solicit and contract with housing and treatment providers from across the state and facilitate fair share principles among the ((counties))regions within the state. In order to increase the number of housing options for individuals qualifying for a less restrictive alternative and ensure the quality and compliance of such housing, the department shall have oversight of the vendors and providers who contract with the state, including the authority to inspect and ensure compliance, ((negotiate))adopt rules to establish and periodically adjust a fee schedule for the rates charged for services, ensure adequate living conditions of housing locations, and terminate contracts. The department shall maintain a statewide accounting of the contracted community housing and treatment providers in each region within the state and in each county and provide a biannual report to the legislature and governor by December 1st on the availability and adequacy of less restrictive alternative placements and the department's compliance with fair share principles.

(b) The department may not enter into a contract with a housing provider until the following conditions have been met:

(i) Upon identifying a county for possible housing, the department and housing provider must contact the county legislative authority and inform them of the intent to create a facility in their jurisdiction;

(ii) The department must contact the local government planning agencies in the local communities affected and coordinate with local government agencies and consult with any federally recognized tribes and academic or educational programs to ensure opportunities are provided for effective citizen input and to reduce duplication of notice and meetings;

(iii) The department must create strategies to effectively engage the public, including a way to allow community members to easily submit written and oral comments;

(iv) The department must specifically solicit feedback from any federally recognized tribes and privately licensed educational organizations in the local communities located within 500 feet of the proposed location of the less restrictive alternative housing; and

(v) The department, in partnership with the potential housing provider, the department of corrections, county leadership, and the county sheriff's office, must plan and host a minimum of one public meeting in the local communities affected.

(c) The department shall also consider whether the proposed housing would be adjacent to, or immediately across the street or parking lot from, a risk potential activity or facility in existence at the time the site is listed for consideration.

(2) To facilitate its duties required under this section, the department shall use the following housing matrix and considerations as a guide to planning and developing less restrictive alternative placements. The following considerations may not be used as a reason to deny a less restrictive alternative placement.

(a) Considerations for evaluating a proposed vendor's application for less restrictive alternative housing services shall include applicable state and local zoning, health, and building codes, general housing requirements, availability of public services, and other considerations identified in accordance with RCW 71.09.315. The department shall require the housing provider to provide proof that the facility is in compliance with all local zoning, health, and building codes.

(i) General housing requirements include running water, electricity, bedroom and living space of adequate size, and no mold or infestations.

(ii) Availability of public services include availability of chaperones and whether the placement is within a reasonable distance to a grocery store, bank, public transportation options, and offices for public services and benefits.

(iii) Other considerations include whether the placement is consistent with fair share principles across the ((counties))regions within the state, whether the placement is within reasonable distance to other current or planned components of the less restrictive alternative, whether the placement is within reasonable distance to employment opportunities, and the reliability of global positioning system technology.

(b) Factors for evaluating less restrictive alternative options for a specific individual include sex offender treatment considerations, criminogenic needs and risk factors, protective factors, and the specific needs of the client.

(i) Sex offender treatment considerations include whether the housing is within a reasonable distance from the treatment provider, whether the treatment provider is a good therapeutic match with the client, and whether the treatment provider has relevant experience and background to treat the client if the client has special needs.

(ii) Criminogenic needs and risk factors include consideration of the person's specific needs and risk factors in evaluating less restrictive alternative options.

(iii) Protective factors include whether housing is within a reasonable distance of family, friends, potential hobbies, potential employment, and educational opportunities.

(iv) Consideration of the client's specific needs includes assessing the availability of personal care assistance and in-home care assistance, and whether housing is within a reasonable distance of mental health, medical treatment options, and substance use disorder treatment options.

Sec. 10. RCW 9.94A.717 and 2020 c 275 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If an offender sentenced under this chapter or chapter 9.94B RCW is supervised by the department, the offender may earn supervision compliance credit in accordance with procedures that are developed and adopted by the department.

(a) The supervision compliance credit shall be awarded to offenders who are in compliance with supervision terms and are making progress towards the goals of their individualized supervision case plan, including: Participation in specific targeted interventions, risk-related programming, or treatment; or completing steps towards specific targeted goals that enhance protective factors and stability, as determined by the department.

(b) For each month in compliance with community custody conditions in accordance with (a) of this subsection, an offender may earn supervision compliance credit of ten days.

(c) Supervision compliance credit is accrued monthly and time shall not be applied to an offender's term of supervision prior to the earning of the time.

(2) An offender is not eligible to earn supervision compliance credit if he or she:

(a) Was sentenced under RCW 9.94A.507 or 10.95.030;

(b) Was sentenced under RCW 9.94A.650, 9.94A.655, 9.94A.660, or 9.94A.670;

(c) Is subject to supervision pursuant to RCW 9.94A.745;

(d) Has an indeterminate sentence and is subject to parole pursuant to RCW 9.95.017; or

(e) Is serving community custody pursuant to early release under RCW 9.94A.730; or

(f) Is subject to supervision pursuant to RCW 71.09.092.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. A new section is added to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The department of social and health services shall review its statewide accounting of the contracted community housing and treatment providers in each county and develop:

(a) Recommendations for revising fair share principles to target an adequate regional distribution of options for conditional release housing placements, rather than a county-by-county distribution of such options; and

(b) A proposed regional map of the state to reflect the revised fair share principles.

(2) In developing its recommendations for revising fair share principles and its proposed regional map, the department of social and health services shall consider:

(a) Existing and future availability of public services in each region, including availability of chaperones in each region and whether each region is able to provide an adequate number of placement options within a reasonable distance from grocery stores, banks, public transportation options, and offices for public services and benefits;

(b) Existing and future availability of sex offender treatment options in each region, including whether each region is able to provide an adequate number of placement options within a reasonable distance from treatment providers that have relevant experience and background to treat clients with acute needs;

(c) Existing and future availability of personal care assistance and in-home care assistance in each region, including whether each region is able to provide an adequate number of placement options within a reasonable distance from mental health, medical treatment, and substance use disorder treatment options;

(d) Community safety factors, including whether each region is able to provide an adequate number of placement options away from risk potential activities or risk potential facilities, such as schools, playgrounds, and youth camps; and

(e) Protective factors, including whether each region is able to provide an adequate number of placement options a reasonable distance from potential hobbies, employment, and educational opportunities.

(3) By December 1, 2024, the department shall submit a report with its recommendations and proposed regional map to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(4) This section expires August 1, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. A new section is added to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this purpose, the department shall establish one position for a special commitment center communications manager. The special commitment center communications manager shall be responsible for:

(a) Receiving and answering questions from the public about persons who are civilly committed pursuant to this chapter;

(b) Communicating with and offering support to the counties and local communities affected when a person is being transitioned or released from total confinement;

(c) Facilitating timely notification of public meetings, including but not limited to those required pursuant to RCW 71.09.097 and 71.09.315; and

(d) Any other duties as determined by the department.

(2) The department shall fix the salary for the special commitment center communications manager.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. Sections 1, 4, 6, and 8 of this act expire August 1, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. Sections 2, 5, 7, and 9 of this act take effect August 1, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---