BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 27.12.320 and 1982 c 123 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

A library established or maintained under this chapter (except a regional or a rural county library district library, an intercounty rural library district library, or an island library district library) may be abolished only in pursuance of a vote of the electors of the governmental unit in which the library is located, taken in the manner prescribed in RCW 27.12.030 for a vote upon the establishment of a library. If a library of a city or town be abolished, the books and other printed or written matter belonging to it shall go to the library of the county whereof the municipality is a part, if there be a county library, but if not, then to the state library. If a library of a county or region be abolished, the books and other printed matter belonging to it shall go to the state library. All other library property shall be disposed of as the legislative body of the governmental unit shall direct.

After a rural county library district, an island library district, or an intercounty rural library district has been in operation for three or more years, it may be dissolved pursuant to a majority vote of all of the qualified electors residing outside of incorporated cities and towns and in any area annexed into the library district voting upon a proposition for its dissolution, at a general election, which proposition may be placed upon the ballot at any such election whenever a petition by ten percent or more qualified voters residing ((outside of incorporated cities or towns)) within a rural county library district, an island library district, or an intercounty rural library district requesting such dissolution shall be filed with the board of trustees of such district not less than ninety days prior to the holding of any such election. An island library district may also be dissolved pursuant to RCW 27.12.450.

If a rural county library district is dissolved, the books and other printed matter belonging to it shall go to the state library. All other library property shall be disposed of as the legislative body of the governmental unit shall direct. When an intercounty rural library district is dissolved, the books, funds and other property thereof shall be divided among the participating counties in the most equitable manner possible as determined by the state librarian, who shall give consideration to such items as the original source of property, the amount of funds raised from each county by the district, and the ability of the counties to make further use of such property or equipment for library purposes. Printed material which the state librarian finds will not be used by any of the participating counties for further library purposes shall be turned over to the state library.

When an island library district is dissolved pursuant to this section, the books and other printed matter belonging to it shall go to the state library. All other library property shall be disposed of as the legislative body of the governmental unit shall direct. When an island library district is dissolved due to the establishment of a county library district, pursuant to RCW 27.12.450, all property, assets, and liabilities of the preexisting island library district within the area included in the county rural library district shall pass to and be assumed by the county rural library district: PROVIDED, That where within any county rural library district heretofore or hereafter organized under the provisions of this chapter a preexisting island library district has incurred a bonded indebtedness which was outstanding at the time of the formation of the county rural library district, the preexisting island library district shall retain its corporate existence insofar as is necessary for the purpose until the bonded indebtedness outstanding against it on and after the effective date of the formation has been paid in full: PROVIDED FURTHER, That a special election may be called by the board of trustees of the county rural library district, to be held at the next general or special election held in the respective counties, for the purpose of affording the voters residing within the area outside of the preexisting island library district an opportunity to assume the obligation of the bonded indebtedness of the preexisting island library district or the question may be submitted to the voters as a separate proposition at the election on the proposal for the formation of the county rural library district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 27.12 RCW to read as follows:

If a city or town is annexed into a rural county library district, island library district, or intercounty library district, the library's board of trustees must be modified so that people within the city or town have representation on the board of trustees.

--- END ---