BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that hunting has been an integral aspect of tribal life for generations, serving as a cornerstone of cultural identity, spiritual connection, and survival. Native communities in Washington have passed down the art of hunting from elders to youth, instilling essential skills, knowledge, and values associated with sustainable living and the responsible stewardship of the land. The process of teaching hunting skills to native children has been a time-honored tradition, fostering a deep respect for nature and instilling a sense of responsibility for the well-being of the community. This intergenerational transfer of knowledge is not merely a survival skill but an essential component of tribal heritage, preserving a way of life that has sustained communities in harmony with the natural world for centuries. In the Pacific Northwest, hunting has played a pivotal role in shaping the history of tribal nations. The expertise of native hunters in navigating the diverse ecosystems of the region has contributed significantly to the sustenance and resilience of their communities. Traditional hunting practices have not only provided a vital food source but also served as a means of trade, fostering cultural exchange and strengthening social bonds among tribes.

(2) Therefore, the legislature intends to provide free hunting licenses to tribal members. In doing so, the legislature not only honors the legacy of native hunters, but also contributes to the continuity of traditional practices, ensuring that future generations can inherit and carry forward the wisdom that hunting provides.

Sec. 2. RCW 77.32.480 and 2016 c 78 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon written application, a combination fishing license shall be issued at the reduced rate of ((five dollars))$5 and all hunting licenses shall be issued at the reduced rate of a youth hunting license fee for the following individuals:

(a) A resident ((sixty-five))65 years old or older who is an honorably discharged veteran of the United States armed forces having a service-connected disability;

(b) A resident who is an honorably discharged veteran of the United States armed forces with a ((thirty))30 percent or more service-connected disability;

(c) A resident with a disability who permanently uses a wheelchair;

(d) A resident who is blind or visually impaired; and

(e) A resident with a developmental disability as defined in RCW 71A.10.020 with documentation of the disability certified by a physician licensed to practice in this state.

(2) Upon department verification of eligibility, a nonstate resident veteran with a disability who otherwise satisfies the criteria of subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section must be issued a combination fishing license or any hunting license at the same cost charged to a nondisabled Washington resident for the same license.

(3) Upon written application and department verification, ((the following recreational hunting licenses must be issued at no cost to)) a small game hunting license under RCW 77.32.460(1), a supplemental migratory bird permit under RCW 77.32.350, and a big game hunting license under RCW 77.32.450 (1) and (2) must be issued at no cost to the following individuals:

(a) An enrolled member of a federally recognized Indian tribe with off-reservation hunting rights in Washington; and

(b) A resident member of the state guard or national guard, as defined in RCW 38.04.010, as long as the state guard or national guard member is: An active full-time state guard or national guard employee; or a state guard or national guard member whose status requires the state guard or national guard member to participate in drill training on a part-time basis((:

(a) A small game hunting license under RCW 77.32.460(1);

(b) A supplemental migratory bird permit under RCW 77.32.350; and

(c) A big game hunting license under RCW 77.32.450 (1) and (2))).

--- END ---