BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 18.16.010 and 2015 c 62 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The legislature recognizes that the practices of cosmetology, hair design, barbering, manicuring, ((and)) esthetics, and master esthetics involve the use of tools and chemicals which may be dangerous when mixed or applied improperly, and therefore finds it necessary in the interest of the public health, safety, and welfare to regulate those practices in this state.

(2) The legislature further recognizes that the practice of permanent cosmetics, enhanced permanent cosmetics, and corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics involves invasive procedures using needles, sharps, and instruments. This practice may be dangerous when improper sterilization techniques are used, presenting a risk of infecting clients with blood-borne pathogens including, but not limited to, HIV, hepatitis B, and hepatitis C. It is in the interest of the state's public health, safety, and welfare to establish requirements in the commercial practice of this activity.

Sec. 2. RCW 18.16.020 and 2015 c 62 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(1) "Apprentice" means a person who is engaged in a state-approved apprenticeship program and who must receive a wage or compensation while engaged in the program.

(2) "Apprentice monthly report" means the apprentice record of daily activities and the number of hours completed in each course of a curriculum that is prepared monthly by the approved apprenticeship program and provided to the apprentice, audited annually by the department, and kept on file by the approved apprenticeship program for three years.

(3) "Apprentice trainer" means a person who gives training to an apprentice in an approved apprenticeship program and who is approved under RCW 18.16.280.

(4) "Apprenticeship program" means a state-approved apprenticeship program pursuant to chapter 49.04 RCW and approved under RCW 18.16.280 for the training of cosmetology, hair design, barbering, esthetics, master esthetics, and manicuring.

(5) "Apprenticeship training committee" means a committee approved by the Washington apprenticeship and training council established in chapter 49.04 RCW.

(6) "Approved apprenticeship shop" means a salon/shop that has been approved under RCW 18.16.280 and chapter 49.04 RCW to participate in an apprenticeship program.

(7) "Approved security" means surety bond.

(8) "Barber" means a person licensed under this chapter to engage in the practice of barbering.

(9) "Board" means the cosmetology, hair design, barbering, esthetics, ((and))master esthetics, manicuring, permanent cosmetics, enhanced permanent cosmetics, and corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics advisory board.

(10) "Cosmetologist" means a person licensed under this chapter to engage in the practice of cosmetology.

(11) "Crossover training" means training approved by the director as training hours that may be credited to current licensees for similar training received in another profession licensed under this chapter.

(12) "Curriculum" means the courses of study taught at a school, online training by a school, in an approved apprenticeship program established by the Washington state apprenticeship and training council and conducted in an approved salon/shop, or online training by an approved apprenticeship program, set by rule under this chapter, and approved by the department. After consulting with the board, the director may set by rule a percentage of hours in a curriculum, up to a maximum of ten percent, that could include hours a student receives while training in a salon/shop or permanent cosmetics shop under a contract approved by the department. Each curriculum must include at least the following required hours:

(a) School curriculum:

(i) Cosmetologist, ((one thousand six hundred))1,600 hours;

(ii) Hair design, ((one thousand four hundred))1,400 hours;

(iii) Barber, ((one thousand))1,000 hours;

(iv) Manicurist, ((six hundred))600 hours;

(v) Esthetician, ((seven hundred fifty))750 hours;

(vi) Master esthetician either:

(A) ((One thousand two hundred))1,200 hours; or

(B) Esthetician licensure plus ((four hundred fifty))450 hours of training;

(((vi) [(vii)]))(vii) Permanent cosmetics artist, 100 hours;

(viii) Enhanced permanent cosmetics artist, 200 hours;

(ix) Corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics artist, 300 hours; and

(x) Instructor-trainee, ((five hundred))500 hours, except that an instructor-trainee may submit documentation that provides evidence of experience as a licensed cosmetologist, hair designer, barber, manicurist, esthetician, ((or)) master esthetician, permanent cosmetics artist, enhanced permanent cosmetics artist, or corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics artist for competency evaluation toward credit of not more than ((three hundred))300 hours of instructor-training.

(b) Apprentice training curriculum:

(i) Cosmetologist, two thousand hours;

(ii) Hair design, one thousand seven hundred fifty hours;

(iii) Barber, one thousand two hundred hours;

(iv) Manicurist, eight hundred hours;

(v) Esthetician, eight hundred hours;

(vi) Master esthetician, one thousand four hundred hours.

(c) An individual enrolled in a curriculum under (a)(vii) through (ix) of this subsection may submit documentation that provides evidence of experience as a licensed cosmetologist, hair designer, barber, manicurist, esthetician, or master esthetician for competency evaluation toward credit of not more than 50 hours.

(13) "Department" means the department of licensing.

(14) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing or the director's designee.

(15) "Esthetician" means a person licensed under this chapter to engage in the practice of esthetics.

(16) "Hair design" means the practice of arranging, dressing, cutting, trimming, styling, shampooing, permanent waving, chemical relaxing, straightening, curling, bleaching, lightening, coloring, mustache and beard design, and superficial skin stimulation of the scalp.

(17) "Hair designer" means a person licensed under this chapter to engage in the practice of hair design.

(18) "Individual license" means a cosmetology, hair design, barber, manicurist, esthetician, master esthetician, permanent cosmetics artist, enhanced permanent cosmetics artist, corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics artist, or instructor license issued under this chapter.

(19) "Instructor" means a person who ((gives)):

(a) Gives instruction in cosmetology, hair design, barbering, manicuring, esthetics, and master esthetics in a school, or who provides classroom theory training to apprentices in locations other than in a school, in a curriculum in which he or she holds a license under this chapter, has completed at least five hundred hours of instruction in teaching techniques and lesson planning in a school, or who has documented experience as an instructor for more than five hundred hours in another state in the curriculum of study, and has passed a licensing examination approved or administered by the director. An applicant who holds a degree in education from an accredited postsecondary institution shall upon application be licensed as an instructor to give instruction in a school, or to provide classroom theory training to apprentices in locations other than in a school, in a curriculum in which he or she holds a license under this chapter. An applicant who holds an instructional credential from an accredited community or technical college and who has passed a licensing examination approved or administered by the director shall upon application be licensed as an instructor to give instruction in a school, or to provide classroom theory training to apprentices in locations other than in a school, in a curriculum in which he or she holds a license under this chapter. To be approved as an "instructor" in an approved apprenticeship program, the instructor must be a competent instructor as defined in rules adopted under chapter 49.04 RCW; or

(b)(i) Provides classroom theory training on permanent cosmetics, enhanced permanent cosmetics, corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics, or any combination of the foregoing, to an individual in a curriculum approved by the director;

(ii)(A) Holds a current license as a permanent cosmetics artist, enhanced permanent cosmetics artist, or corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics artist; or (B) has held a license issued by the department under chapter 18.300 RCW for the five years prior to the effective date of this section; and

(iii)(A) Is able to demonstrate five consecutive years of performing permanent cosmetics, enhanced permanent cosmetics, or corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics; or (B) holds an instructor license under (a) of this subsection.

(20) "Instructor-trainee" means a person who is currently licensed in this state as a cosmetologist, hair designer, barber, manicurist, esthetician, ((or)) master esthetician, permanent cosmetics artist, enhanced permanent cosmetics artist, or corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics artist and is enrolled in an instructor-trainee curriculum in a school licensed under this chapter.

(21) "Location license" means a license issued under this chapter for a salon/shop, school, personal services, permanent cosmetics shop, or mobile unit.

(22) "Manicurist" means a person licensed under this chapter to engage in the practice of manicuring.

(23) "Master esthetician" means a person licensed under this chapter to engage in the practice of master esthetics.

(24) "Mobile unit" is a location license under this chapter where the practice of cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, master esthetics, or manicuring is conducted in a mobile structure. Mobile units must conform to the health and safety standards set by rule under this chapter.

(25) "Online training" means theory training provided online, by a school licensed under this chapter or an approved apprenticeship program established by the Washington state apprenticeship and training council, in the areas of cosmetology, hair design, master esthetics, manicuring, barbering, esthetics, permanent cosmetics, enhanced permanent cosmetics, corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics, and instructor-training.

(26) "Person" means any individual, partnership, professional service corporation, joint stock association, joint venture, or any other entity authorized to do business in this state.

(27) "Personal services" means a location licensed under this chapter where the practice of cosmetology, hair design, barbering, manicuring, esthetics, or master esthetics is performed for clients in the client's home, office, or other location that is convenient for the client.

(28) "Practice of barbering" means the cutting, trimming, arranging, dressing, curling, shampooing, shaving, and mustache and beard design of the hair of the face, neck, and scalp.

(29) "Practice of cosmetology" means arranging, dressing, cutting, trimming, styling, shampooing, permanent waving, chemical relaxing, straightening, curling, bleaching, lightening, coloring, waxing, tweezing, shaving, and mustache and beard design of the hair of the face, neck, and scalp; temporary removal of superfluous hair by use of depilatories, waxing, or tweezing; manicuring and pedicuring, limited to cleaning, shaping, polishing, decorating, and caring for and treatment of the cuticles and nails of the hands and feet, excluding the application and removal of sculptured or otherwise artificial nails; esthetics limited to toning the skin of the scalp, stimulating the skin of the body by the use of preparations, tonics, lotions, or creams; and tinting eyelashes and eyebrows.

(30) "Practice of esthetics" means the care of the skin for compensation by application, use of preparations, antiseptics, tonics, essential oils, exfoliants, superficial and light peels, or by any device, except laser, or equipment, electrical or otherwise, or by wraps, compresses, cleansing, conditioning, stimulation, superficial skin stimulation, pore extraction, or product application and removal; temporary removal of superfluous hair by means of lotions, creams, appliance, waxing, threading, tweezing, or depilatories, including chemical means; and application of product to the eyelashes and eyebrows, including extensions, design and treatment, tinting and lightening of the hair, excluding the scalp. Under no circumstances does the practice of esthetics include the administration of injections.

(31) "Practice of manicuring" means the cleaning, shaping, polishing, decorating, and caring for and treatment of the cuticles and the nails of the hands or feet, and the application and removal of sculptured or otherwise artificial nails by hand or with mechanical or electrical apparatus or appliances.

(32) "Practice of master esthetics" means the care of the skin for compensation including all of the methods allowed in the definition of the practice of esthetics. It also includes the performance of medium depth peels and the use of medical devices for care of the skin and permanent hair reduction. The medical devices include, but are not limited to, lasers, light, radio frequency, plasma, intense pulsed light, and ultrasound. The use of a medical device must comply with state law and rules, including any laws or rules that require delegation or supervision by a licensed health professional acting within the scope of practice of that health profession.

(33) "Salon/shop" means any building, structure, or any part thereof, other than a school, where the commercial practice of cosmetology, barbering, hair design, esthetics, master esthetics, or manicuring is conducted; provided that any person, except employees of a salon/shop, who operates from a salon/shop is required to meet all salon/shop licensing requirements and may participate in the apprenticeship program when certified as established by the Washington state apprenticeship and training council established in chapter 49.04 RCW.

(34) "School" means any establishment that offers curriculum of instruction in the practice of cosmetology, hair design, barbering, esthetics, master esthetics, manicuring, permanent cosmetics, enhanced permanent cosmetics, corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics, or instructor-trainee to students, including permanent cosmetics programs, and is licensed under this chapter.

(35) "Student" means ((a)): (a) A person ((sixteen))16 years of age or older who is enrolled in a school licensed under this chapter and receives instruction in any of the curricula of cosmetology, barbering, hair design, esthetics, master esthetics, manicuring, or instructor-training with or without tuition, fee, or cost, and who does not receive any wage or commission; and (b) for permanent cosmetics, enhanced permanent cosmetics, and corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics, a person (i)(A) 18 years of age or older who is enrolled in a school licensed under this chapter, including a permanent cosmetics program, or (B) 16 years of age or older who is enrolled in a school licensed under this chapter which is recognized as an approved vocational education program by the department of labor and industries, and (ii) who receives instruction in the curricula of permanent cosmetics, enhanced permanent cosmetics, or corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics with or without tuition, fee, or cost, and who does not receive any wage or commission.

(36) "Student monthly report" means the student record of daily activities and the number of hours completed in each course of a curriculum that is prepared monthly by the school and provided to the student, audited annually by the department, and kept on file by the school for three years.

(37) "Corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics" means a person licensed under this chapter to engage in the practice of corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics.

(38) "Enhanced permanent cosmetics artist" means a person licensed under this chapter to engage in the practice of enhanced permanent cosmetics.

(39) "Permanent cosmetics artist" means a person licensed under this chapter to engage in the practice of permanent cosmetics.

(40) "Permanent cosmetics program" means any program that offers curriculum of instruction exclusively in the practice of permanent cosmetics, the practice of enhanced permanent cosmetics, the practice of corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics, or any combination of the foregoing to students and is licensed under this chapter.

(41) "Permanent cosmetics shop" means any building, structure, or any part thereof, other than a school, where the commercial practice of permanent cosmetics, the commercial practice of enhanced permanent cosmetics, and/or the commercial practice of corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics is conducted.

(42) "Practice of corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics" means the piercing or puncturing of human skin with a needle or other instrument for all purposes allowed in the definition of the practice of permanent cosmetics and the definition of the practice of enhanced permanent cosmetics. It also includes performing corrective procedures to modify previously performed enhanced or permanent cosmetics procedures. The practice of corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics is prohibited on any individual under the age of 18.

(43) "Practice of enhanced permanent cosmetics" means the piercing or puncturing of the human skin with a needle or other instrument for all purposes allowed in the definition of the practice of permanent cosmetics. It also includes the piercing or puncturing of human skin including mucous membranes and areas adjacent to mucous membranes for purposes including the application of eyeliner, lip liner, and lip color. The practice of enhanced permanent cosmetics is prohibited on any individual under the age of 18.

(44) "Practice of permanent cosmetics" means the piercing or puncturing of the human skin with a needle or other instrument for the purpose of applying permanent eyebrows, hair follicles, or scar camouflage, to improve or restore a person's appearance. The practice of permanent cosmetics is prohibited on any individual under the age of 18.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.16.030 and 2019 c 442 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to any other duties imposed by law, including RCW 18.235.030 and 18.235.040, the director shall have the following powers and duties:

(1) To set all license, examination, and renewal fees in accordance with RCW 43.24.086;

(2) To adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter;

(3) To prepare and administer or approve the preparation and administration of licensing examinations;

(4) To establish minimum safety and sanitation standards for schools, including permanent cosmetics programs, instructors, cosmetologists, barbers, hair designers, manicurists, estheticians, master estheticians, permanent cosmetic artists, enhanced permanent cosmetic artists, corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics artists, salons/shops, permanent cosmetics shops, personal services, and mobile units;

(5) To establish curricula for the training of students and apprentices under this chapter;

(6) To maintain the official department record of applicants and licensees;

(7) To establish by rule the procedures for an appeal of an examination failure;

(8) To set license expiration dates and renewal periods for all licenses consistent with this chapter; and

(9) To make information available to the department of revenue to assist in collecting taxes from persons required to be licensed under this chapter.

Sec. 4. RCW 18.16.050 and 2015 c 62 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is created a state cosmetology, hair design, barbering, esthetics, ((and))master esthetics, manicuring, permanent cosmetics, enhanced permanent cosmetics, and corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics advisory board consisting of a maximum of ((ten))11 members appointed by the director. These members of the board shall include: A representative of private schools licensed under this chapter; a representative from an approved apprenticeship program conducted in an approved salon/shop or permanent cosmetics shop; a representative of public vocational technical schools licensed under this chapter; a consumer who is unaffiliated with the cosmetology, hair design, barbering, esthetics, master esthetics, ((or)) manicuring, permanent cosmetics, enhanced permanent cosmetics, or corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics industry; and ((six))seven members who are currently practicing licensees who have been engaged in the practice of manicuring, esthetics, master esthetics, barbering, hair design, permanent cosmetics, enhanced permanent cosmetics, corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics, or cosmetology, provided that one of the seven members must be a currently practicing licensee engaged in the practice of permanent cosmetics, enhanced permanent cosmetics, or corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics, for at least three years. Members shall serve a term of three years. Any board member may be removed for just cause. The director may appoint a new member to fill any vacancy on the board for the remainder of the unexpired term.

(2) Board members shall be entitled to compensation pursuant to RCW 43.03.240 for each day spent conducting official business and to reimbursement for travel expenses as provided by RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(3) The board may seek the advice and input of officials from the following state agencies: (a) The workforce training and education coordinating board; (b) the employment security department; (c) the department of labor and industries; (d) the department of health; (e) the department of licensing; and (f) the department of revenue.

Sec. 5. RCW 18.16.060 and 2015 c 62 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for any person to engage in a practice listed in subsection (2) of this section unless the person has a license in good standing as required by this chapter. A license issued under this chapter shall be considered to be "in good standing" except when:

(a) The license has expired or has been canceled and has not been renewed in accordance with RCW 18.16.110;

(b) The license has been denied, revoked, or suspended under RCW 18.16.210((, 18.16.230,)) or 18.16.240, and has not been reinstated;

(c) The license is held by a person who has not fully complied with an order of the director issued under RCW 18.16.210 requiring the licensee to pay restitution or a fine, or to acquire additional training; or

(d) The license has been placed on inactive status at the request of the licensee, and has not been reinstated in accordance with RCW 18.16.110(3).

(2) The director may take action under RCW 18.235.150 and 18.235.160 against any person who does any of the following without first obtaining, and maintaining in good standing, the license required by this chapter:

(a) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, engages in the commercial practice of cosmetology, hair design, barbering, esthetics, master esthetics, ((or)) manicuring, permanent cosmetics, enhanced permanent cosmetics, or corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics;

(b) Instructs in a school;

(c) Operates a school; or

(d) Operates a salon/shop, permanent cosmetics shop, personal services, or mobile unit.

(3) A person who receives a license as an instructor may engage in the commercial practice for which he or she held a license when applying for the instructor license without also renewing the previously held license. However, a person licensed as an instructor whose license to engage in a commercial practice is not or at any time was not renewed may not engage in the commercial practice previously permitted under that license unless that person renews the previously held license.

(4) An apprentice actively enrolled in an apprenticeship program for cosmetology, barbering, hair design, esthetics, master esthetics, or manicuring may engage in the commercial practice as required for the apprenticeship program.

Sec. 6. RCW 18.16.090 and 2023 c 55 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Examinations for licensure under this chapter shall be conducted at such times and places as the director determines appropriate. Examinations shall consist of tests designed to reasonably measure the applicant's knowledge of safe and sanitary practices and may also include the applicant's knowledge of this chapter and rules adopted pursuant to this chapter. The director may establish by rule a performance examination in addition to any other examination. The director shall establish by rule the minimum passing score for all examinations and the requirements for reexamination of applicants who fail the examination or examinations. The director may allow an independent person to conduct the examinations at the expense of the applicants.

(2)(a) The director shall take steps to ensure that after completion of the required course or apprenticeship program, applicants may promptly take the examination and receive the results of the examination. ((The))Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the director may allow an applicant to register for or take an examination before the applicant has completed the required hours of course instruction, if the applicant is within 100 hours of completion, but the applicant must complete the required hours of course instruction before licensure.

(b) The director may allow an applicant for a permanent cosmetics artist license, enhanced permanent cosmetics artist license, or corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics artist license to register for or take the applicable exam before the applicant has completed the required hours of course instruction, if the applicant is within 50 hours of completion, but the applicant must complete the required hours or course instruction before licensure.

Sec. 7. RCW 18.16.100 and 2008 c 20 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Upon completion of an application approved by the department and payment of the proper fee, the director shall issue the appropriate license, except a permanent cosmetics artist license, enhanced permanent cosmetics artist license, or corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics artist license, to any person who:

(a) Is at least ((seventeen))17 years of age or older;

(b)(i) Has completed and graduated from a school licensed under this chapter in a curriculum approved by the director consisting of the hours of training required under this chapter for a school curriculum, or has met the requirements in RCW 18.16.020 or 18.16.130; or

(ii) Has successfully completed a state-approved apprenticeship program consisting of the hours of training required under this chapter for the apprentice training curriculum; and

(c) Has received a passing grade on the appropriate licensing examination approved or administered by the director.

(2) A person currently licensed under this chapter may qualify for examination and licensure, after the required examination is passed, in another category if he or she has completed the crossover training course.

(3) Beginning November 1, 2027, upon completion of an application and payment of the proper fee, the director shall issue a permanent cosmetics artist license, enhanced permanent cosmetics artist license, or corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics artist license to any person who:

(a) Is at least 18 years old or older;

(b) Has completed and graduated from a school, including a permanent cosmetics program, licensed under this chapter in a curriculum approved by the director consisting of the hours of training required under this chapter;

(c) Provides proof of blood-borne pathogen certification; and

(d) Has received a passing grade on the appropriate licensing examination approved or administered by the department.

(4) Upon completion of an application approved by the department, certification of insurance, and payment of the proper fee, the director shall issue a location license to the applicant.

(((4)))(5) The director may consult with the state board of health and the department of labor and industries in establishing training, apprenticeship, and examination requirements.

Sec. 8. RCW 18.16.130 and 2015 c 62 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person who is properly licensed in any state, territory, or possession of the United States, or foreign country shall be eligible for examination if the applicant submits the approved application and fee and provides proof to the director that he or she is currently licensed in good standing as a cosmetologist, hair designer, barber, manicurist, esthetician, master esthetician, permanent cosmetics artist, enhanced permanent cosmetics artist, corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics artist, instructor, or the equivalent in that jurisdiction. Upon passage of the required examinations the appropriate license will be issued.

(2)(a) The director shall, upon passage of the required examinations, issue a license as master esthetician to an applicant who submits the approved application and fee and provides proof to the director that the applicant is currently licensed in good standing in esthetics in any state, territory, or possession of the United States, or foreign country and holds a diplomate of the comite international d'esthetique et de cosmetologie diploma, or an international therapy examination council diploma, or a certified credential awarded by the national coalition of estheticians, manufacturers/distributors & associations.

(b) The director may upon passage of the required examinations, issue a master esthetician license to an applicant that is currently licensed in esthetics in any other state, territory, or possession of the United States, or foreign country and submits an approved application and fee and provides proof to the director that he or she is licensed in good standing and:

(i) The licensing state, territory, or possession of the United States, or foreign country has licensure requirements that the director determines are substantially equivalent to a master esthetician license in this state; or

(ii) The applicant has certification or a diploma or other credentials that the director determines has licensure requirements that are substantially equivalent to the degree listed in (a) of this subsection.

Sec. 9. RCW 18.16.170 and 2015 c 62 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, licenses issued under this chapter expire as follows:

(a) A salon/shop, permanent cosmetics shop, personal services, or mobile unit license expires one year from issuance or when the insurance required by RCW 18.16.175(1)(g) expires, whichever occurs first;

(b) A school license expires one year from issuance; and

(c) Cosmetologist, hair designer, barber, manicurist, esthetician, master esthetician, permanent cosmetics artist, enhanced permanent cosmetics artist, corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics artist, and instructor licenses expire two years from issuance.

(2) The director may provide for expiration dates other than those set forth in subsection (1) of this section for the purpose of establishing staggered renewal periods.

Sec. 10. RCW 18.16.190 and 2015 c 62 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is a violation of this chapter for any person to engage in the commercial practice of cosmetology, hair design, barbering, esthetics, master esthetics, or manicuring, except in a licensed salon/shop or the home, office, or other location selected by the client for obtaining the services of a personal service operator, or with the appropriate individual license when delivering services to placebound clients. Placebound clients are defined as persons who are ill, disabled, or otherwise unable to travel to a salon/shop.

(2) It is a violation of this chapter for any person to engage in the commercial practice of permanent cosmetics, enhanced permanent cosmetics, or corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics (a) except in a licensed permanent cosmetics shop, (b) in violation of RCW 26.28.085, or (c) in violation of RCW 70.54.350.

Sec. 11. RCW 18.16.200 and 2015 c 62 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the unprofessional conduct described in RCW 18.235.130, the director may take disciplinary action against any applicant or licensee under this chapter if the licensee or applicant:

(1) Has been found to have violated any provisions of chapter 19.86 RCW;

(2) Has engaged in a practice prohibited under RCW 18.16.060 without first obtaining, and maintaining in good standing, the license required by this chapter;

(3) Has engaged in the commercial practice of cosmetology, hair design, barbering, manicuring, esthetics, ((or)) master esthetics, permanent cosmetics, enhanced permanent cosmetics, or corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics in a school;

(4) Has not provided a safe, sanitary, and good moral environment for students in a school or the public;

(5) Has failed to display licenses required in this chapter; ((or))

(6) Has performed the practice of permanent cosmetics, the practice of enhanced permanent cosmetics, or the practice of corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics on an individual under the age of 18; or

(7) Has violated any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted under it.

Sec. 12. RCW 18.16.260 and 2013 c 187 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Prior to July 1, 2005, (i) a cosmetology licensee who held a license in good standing between June 30, 1999, and June 30, 2003, may request a renewal of the license or an additional license in barbering, manicuring, and/or esthetics; and (ii) a licensee who held a barber, manicurist, or esthetics license between June 30, 1999, and June 30, 2003, may request a renewal of such licenses held during that period.

(b) A license renewal fee, including, if applicable, a renewal fee, at the current rate, for each year the licensee did not hold a license in good standing between July 1, 2001, and the date of the renewal request, must be paid prior to issuance of each type of license requested. After June 30, 2005, any cosmetology licensee wishing to renew an expired license or obtain additional licenses must meet the applicable renewal, training, and examination requirements of this chapter.

(2)(a) Any person holding an active license in good standing as an esthetician prior to January 1, 2015, may be licensed as an esthetician licensee after paying the appropriate license fee.

(b) Prior to January 1, 2015, an applicant for a master esthetician license must have an active license in good standing as an esthetician, pay the appropriate license fee, and provide the department with proof of having satisfied one or more of the following requirements:

(i)(A)(I) A minimum of thirty-five hours employment as a provider of medium depth peels under the delegation or supervision of a licensed physician, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or physician assistant, or other licensed professional whose licensure permits such delegation or supervision; or

(II) Seven hours of training in theory and application of medium depth peels; and

(B)(I) A minimum of one hundred fifty hours employment as a laser operator under the delegation or supervision of a licensed physician, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or physician assistant, or other licensed professional whose licensure permits such delegation or supervision; or

(II) Seventy-five hours of laser training;

(ii) A national or international diploma or certification in esthetics that is recognized by the department by rule;

(iii) An instructor in esthetics who has been licensed as an instructor in esthetics by the department for a minimum of three years; or

(iv) Completion of one thousand two hundred hours of an esthetic curriculum approved by the department.

(3)(a) Beginning November 1, 2027, any person holding an active license in good standing issued under chapter 18.300 RCW may be licensed as a permanent cosmetics artist, enhanced permanent cosmetics artist, or corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics artist under this chapter after paying the appropriate license fee and demonstrating the applicant has held the license in good standing for the prior three consecutive years.

(b) Any permanent cosmetics, enhanced permanent cosmetics, or corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics licensee wishing to renew a license granted under this subsection (3) must provide proof acceptable to the department of the individual's certifications to perform the procedures the licensee performs either as a permanent cosmetics artist, enhanced permanent cosmetics artist, or corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics artist, recognized by the department by rule.

(4) The director may, as provided in RCW 43.24.140, modify the duration of any additional license granted under this section to make all licenses issued to a person expire on the same date.

Sec. 13. RCW 18.16.290 and 2015 c 62 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the holder of an individual license in good standing submits a written and notarized request that the licensee's cosmetology, hair design, barber, manicurist, esthetician and master esthetician, permanent cosmetics artist, enhanced permanent cosmetics artist, corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics artist, or instructor license be placed on inactive status, together with a fee equivalent to that established by rule for a duplicate license, the department shall place the license on inactive status until the expiration date of the license. If the date of the request is no more than six months before the expiration date of the license, a request for a two-year extension of the inactive status, as provided under subsection (2) of this section, may be submitted at the same time as the request under this subsection.

(2) If the holder of a license placed on inactive status under this section submits, by the expiration date of the license, a written and notarized request to extend that status for an additional two years, the department shall, without additional fee, extend the expiration date of: (a) The licensee's individual license; and (b) the inactive status for two years from the expiration date of the license.

(3) A license placed on inactive status under this section may not be extended more frequently than once in any twenty-four month period or for more than six consecutive years.

(4) If, by the expiration date of a license placed on inactive status under this section, a licensee is unable, or fails, to request that the status be extended and the license is not renewed, the license shall be canceled.

Sec. 14. RCW 18.16.900 and 2015 c 62 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Washington cosmetologists, hair designers, barbers, manicurists, ((and)) estheticians, and permanent cosmetics act."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15. A new section is added to chapter 18.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A permanent cosmetics shop shall, at a minimum:

(a) Maintain an outside entrance separate from any rooms used for sleeping or residential purposes;

(b) Provide and maintain for the use of its customers adequate toilet facilities located within or adjacent to the permanent cosmetics shop;

(c) Ensure any room used wholly or in part as a permanent cosmetics shop is not used for residential purposes, except that toilet facilities may be used for both residential and business purposes;

(d) Meet the zoning requirements of the county, city, or town, as appropriate;

(e) Provide for safe storage and labeling of equipment and substances used in the practice of permanent cosmetics and enhanced permanent cosmetics, as applicable;

(f) Meet all applicable local and state fire codes; and

(g) Certify that the permanent cosmetics shop is covered by a public liability insurance policy in an amount not less than $100,000 for combined bodily injury and property damage liability.

(2) The director may by rule determine other requirements that are necessary for safety and sanitation of permanent cosmetics shops. The director may consult with the state board of health and the department of labor and industries in establishing minimum permanent cosmetics shop safety requirements.

(3) Upon receipt of a written complaint that a permanent cosmetics shop has violated any provisions of this chapter, chapter 18.235 RCW, or the rules adopted under either chapter, or at least once every two years for an existing permanent cosmetics shop, the director or the director's designee shall inspect each permanent cosmetics shop. If the director determines that any permanent cosmetics shop is not in compliance with this chapter, the director shall send written notice to the permanent cosmetics shop. A permanent cosmetics shop which fails to correct the conditions to the satisfaction of the director within a reasonable time shall, upon due notice, be subject to the penalties imposed by the director under RCW 18.235.110. The director may enter any permanent cosmetics shop during business hours for the purpose of inspection. The director may contract with health authorities of local governments to conduct the inspections under this subsection.

(4) A permanent cosmetics shop shall obtain a certificate of registration from the department of revenue.

(5) Permanent cosmetics shop location licenses issued by the department must be stored in the permanent cosmetics shop reception area.

(6) Permanent cosmetics licenses or enhanced permanent cosmetics licenses issued by the department must be posted at the permanent cosmetics artist's work station.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16. A new section is added to chapter 18.16 RCW to read as follows:

The director shall prepare and provide to all licensed permanent cosmetics shops a notice to consumers. At a minimum, the notice must state that permanent cosmetics shops are required to be licensed, that permanent cosmetics shops are required to maintain minimum safety and sanitation standards, that customer complaints regarding permanent cosmetics shops may be reported to the department, and a telephone number and address where complaints may be made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17. A new section is added to chapter 18.16 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall immediately suspend any license under this chapter if the department receives information that the license holder has not complied with RCW 74.08.580(2). If the license holder has remained otherwise eligible to be licensed, the department may reinstate the suspended license when the holder has complied with RCW 74.08.580(2).

Sec. 18. RCW 18.300.010 and 2009 c 412 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter and RCW 5.40.050 and 70.54.340 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Body art" means the practice of invasive cosmetic adornment including the use of branding and scarification. "Body art" also includes the intentional production of scars upon the body. "Body art" does not include any health-related procedures performed by licensed health care practitioners under their scope of practice.

(2) "Body piercing" means the process of penetrating the skin or mucous membrane to insert an object, including jewelry, for cosmetic purposes. "Body piercing" also includes any scar tissue resulting from or relating to the piercing. "Body piercing" does not include the use of stud and clasp piercing systems to pierce the earlobe in accordance with the manufacturer's directions and applicable United States food and drug administration requirements. "Body piercing" does not include any health-related procedures performed by licensed health care practitioners under their scope of practice, nor does anything in chapter 412, Laws of 2009 authorize a person registered to engage in the business of body piercing to implant or embed foreign objects into the human body or otherwise engage in the practice of medicine.

(3) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing.

(4) "Individual license" means a body art, body piercing, or tattoo practitioner license issued under this chapter.

(5) "Location license" means a license issued under this chapter for a shop or business.

(6) "Shop or business" means a body art, body piercing, or tattooing shop or business.

(7) "Tattoo artist" means a person who pierces or punctures the human skin with a needle or other instrument for the purpose of implanting an indelible mark, or pigment, into the skin for a fee.

(8) "Tattooing" means to pierce or puncture the human skin with a needle or other instrument for the purpose of implanting an indelible mark, or pigment, into the skin, but excludes the practice of permanent cosmetics, the practice of enhanced permanent cosmetics, and the practice of corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics as defined in RCW 18.16.020.

Sec. 19. RCW 5.40.050 and 2009 c 412 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

A breach of a duty imposed by statute, ordinance, or administrative rule shall not be considered negligence per se, but may be considered by the trier of fact as evidence of negligence; however, any breach of duty as provided by statute, ordinance, or administrative rule relating to: (1) Electrical fire safety, (2) the use of smoke alarms, (3) sterilization of needles and instruments used by persons engaged in the practice of body art, body piercing, tattooing, permanent cosmetics, enhanced permanent cosmetics, corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics, or electrology, or other precaution against the spread of disease, as required under RCW 70.54.350, or (4) driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, shall be considered negligence per se.

Sec. 20. RCW 18.235.020 and 2017 c 281 s 37 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This chapter applies only to the director and the boards and commissions having jurisdiction in relation to the businesses and professions licensed under the chapters specified in this section. This chapter does not apply to any business or profession not licensed under the chapters specified in this section.

(2)(a) The director has authority under this chapter in relation to the following businesses and professions:

(i) Auctioneers under chapter 18.11 RCW;

(ii) Bail bond agents and bail bond recovery agents under chapter 18.185 RCW;

(iii) Camping resorts' operators and salespersons under chapter 19.105 RCW;

(iv) Commercial telephone solicitors under chapter 19.158 RCW;

(v) Cosmetologists, barbers, manicurists, ((and)) estheticians, master estheticians, permanent cosmetics artists, enhanced permanent cosmetics artists, and corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics artists under chapter 18.16 RCW;

(vi) Court reporters under chapter 18.145 RCW;

(vii) Driver training schools and instructors under chapter 46.82 RCW;

(viii) Employment agencies under chapter 19.31 RCW;

(ix) For hire vehicle operators under chapter 46.72 RCW;

(x) Limousines under chapter 46.72A RCW;

(xi) Notaries public under chapter 42.45 RCW;

(xii) Private investigators under chapter 18.165 RCW;

(xiii) Professional boxing, martial arts, and wrestling under chapter 67.08 RCW;

(xiv) Real estate appraisers under chapter 18.140 RCW;

(xv) Real estate brokers and salespersons under chapters 18.85 and 18.86 RCW;

(xvi) Scrap metal processors, scrap metal recyclers, and scrap metal suppliers under chapter 19.290 RCW;

(xvii) Security guards under chapter 18.170 RCW;

(xviii) Sellers of travel under chapter 19.138 RCW;

(xix) Timeshares and timeshare salespersons under chapter 64.36 RCW;

(xx) Whitewater river outfitters under chapter 79A.60 RCW;

(xxi) Home inspectors under chapter 18.280 RCW;

(xxii) Body artists, body piercers, and tattoo artists, and body art, body piercing, and tattooing shops and businesses, under chapter 18.300 RCW; and

(xxiii) Appraisal management companies under chapter 18.310 RCW.

(b) The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter are as follows:

(i) The state board for architects established in chapter 18.08 RCW;

(ii) The Washington state collection agency board established in chapter 19.16 RCW;

(iii) The state board of registration for professional engineers and land surveyors established in chapter 18.43 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.43 and 18.210 RCW;

(iv) The funeral and cemetery board established in chapter 18.39 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.39 and 68.05 RCW;

(v) The state board of licensure for landscape architects established in chapter 18.96 RCW; and

(vi) The state geologist licensing board established in chapter 18.220 RCW.

(3) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the disciplinary authority may grant or deny licenses based on the conditions and criteria established in this chapter and the chapters specified in subsection (2) of this section. This chapter also governs any investigation, hearing, or proceeding relating to denial of licensure or issuance of a license conditioned on the applicant's compliance with an order entered under RCW 18.235.110 by the disciplinary authority.

Sec. 21. RCW 26.28.085 and 1995 c 373 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Every person who applies a tattoo to or performs the practice of permanent cosmetics, the practice of enhanced permanent cosmetics, or the practice of corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics as prescribed in chapter 18.16 RCW on, any minor under the age of eighteen is guilty of a misdemeanor. It is not a defense to a violation of this section that the person applying the tattoo or practicing permanent cosmetics, enhanced permanent cosmetics, or corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics did not know the minor's age unless the person applying the tattoo or practicing permanent cosmetics, enhanced permanent cosmetics, or corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics establishes by a preponderance of the evidence that he or she made a reasonable, bona fide attempt to ascertain the true age of the minor by requiring production of a driver's license or other picture identification card or paper and did not rely solely on the oral allegations or apparent age of the minor.

For the purposes of this section, "tattoo" includes any permanent marking or coloring of the skin with any pigment, ink, or dye, or any procedure that leaves a visible scar on the skin. Medical procedures performed by a licensed physician are exempted from this section.

Sec. 22. RCW 70.54.320 and 2001 c 194 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds and declares that the practices of electrology ((and)), tattooing, permanent cosmetics, enhanced permanent cosmetics, and corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics involve an invasive procedure with the use of needles and instruments which may be dangerous when improperly sterilized presenting a risk of infecting the client with blood-borne pathogens such as HIV and Hepatitis B. It is in the interests of the public health, safety, and welfare to establish requirements for the sterilization procedures in the commercial practices of electrology ((and)), tattooing, permanent cosmetics, enhanced permanent cosmetics, and corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics in this state.

Sec. 23. RCW 70.54.330 and 2001 c 194 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 70.54.320, 70.54.340, and 70.54.350 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Electrologist" means a person who practices the business of electrology for a fee.

(2) "Electrology" means the process by which hair is permanently removed through the utilization of solid needle/probe electrode epilation, including thermolysis, being of shortwave, high frequency type, and including electrolysis, being of galvanic type, or a combination of both which is accomplished by a superimposed or sequential blend.

(3) "Practice of permanent cosmetics," "practice of enhanced permanent cosmetics," and "practice of corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics" have the same meanings as in RCW 18.16.020.

(4) "Tattoo artist" means a person who practices the business of tattooing for a fee.

(((4)))(5) "Tattooing" means the indelible mark, figure, or decorative design introduced by insertion of nontoxic dyes or pigments into or under the subcutaneous portion of the skin upon the body of a live human being for cosmetic or figurative purposes.

Sec. 24. RCW 70.54.340 and 2009 c 412 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary of health shall adopt by rule requirements, in accordance with nationally recognized professional standards, for precautions against the spread of disease, including the sterilization of needles and other instruments, including sharps and jewelry, employed by electrologists, persons engaged in the practice of body art, body piercing, permanent cosmetics, enhanced permanent cosmetics, or corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics, and tattoo artists. The secretary shall consider the standard precautions for infection control, as recommended by the United States centers for disease control, and guidelines for infection control, as recommended by national industry standards in the adoption of these sterilization requirements.

Sec. 25. RCW 70.54.350 and 2001 c 194 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person who practices electrology ((or)), body art, body piercing, tattooing, permanent cosmetics, enhanced permanent cosmetics, and corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics shall comply with the rules adopted by the department of health under RCW 70.54.340.

(2) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

Sec. 26. RCW 43.24.150 and 2017 c 281 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The business and professions account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from business or professional licenses, registrations, certifications, renewals, examinations, or civil penalties assessed and collected by the department from the following chapters must be deposited into the account:

(a) Chapter 18.11 RCW, auctioneers;

(b) Chapter 18.16 RCW, cosmetologists, barbers, ((and)) manicurists, hair designers, estheticians, master estheticians, permanent cosmetics artists, enhanced permanent cosmetics artists, and corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics artists;

(c) Chapter 18.145 RCW, court reporters;

(d) Chapter 18.165 RCW, private investigators;

(e) Chapter 18.170 RCW, security guards;

(f) Chapter 18.185 RCW, bail bond agents;

(g) Chapter 18.280 RCW, home inspectors;

(h) Chapter 19.16 RCW, collection agencies;

(i) Chapter 19.31 RCW, employment agencies;

(j) Chapter 19.105 RCW, camping resorts;

(k) Chapter 19.138 RCW, sellers of travel;

(l) Chapter 42.45 RCW, notaries public;

(m) Chapter 64.36 RCW, timeshares;

(n) Chapter 67.08 RCW, boxing, martial arts, and wrestling;

(o) Chapter 18.300 RCW, body art, body piercing, and tattooing;

(p) Chapter 79A.60 RCW, whitewater river outfitters;

(q) Chapter 19.158 RCW, commercial telephone solicitation; and

(r) Chapter 19.290 RCW, scrap metal businesses.

Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for expenses incurred in carrying out these business and professions licensing activities of the department. Any residue in the account must be accumulated and may not revert to the general fund at the end of the biennium. However, during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium the legislature may transfer to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the account.

(2) The director must biennially prepare a budget request based on the anticipated costs of administering the business and professions licensing activities listed in subsection (1) of this section, which must include the estimated income from these business and professions fees.

Sec. 27. RCW 74.08.580 and 2020 c 64 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any person receiving public assistance is prohibited from using electronic benefit cards or cash obtained with electronic benefit cards:

(a) For the purpose of participating in any of the activities authorized under chapter 9.46 RCW;

(b) For the purpose of parimutuel wagering authorized under chapter 67.16 RCW;

(c) To purchase lottery tickets or shares authorized under chapter 67.70 RCW;

(d) For the purpose of participating in or purchasing any activities located in a tattoo, body piercing, or body art shop licensed under chapter 18.300 RCW;

(e) To purchase cigarettes as defined in RCW 82.24.010 or tobacco products as defined in RCW 82.26.010;

(f) To purchase any items regulated under Title 66 RCW; or

(g) For the purpose of purchasing or participating in any activities in any location listed in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) The following businesses must disable the ability of ATM and point-of-sale machines located on their business premises to accept the electronic benefit card:

(a) Taverns licensed under RCW 66.24.330;

(b) Beer/wine specialty stores licensed under RCW 66.24.371 except if the licensee is an authorized supplemental nutrition assistance program or women, infants, and children retailer;

(c) Nightclubs licensed under RCW 66.24.600;

(d) Bail bond agencies regulated under chapter 18.185 RCW;

(e) Gambling establishments licensed under chapter 9.46 RCW;

(f) Tattoo, body piercing, or body art shops regulated under chapter 18.300 RCW and permanent cosmetics shops regulated under chapter 18.16 RCW;

(g) Adult entertainment venues with performances that contain erotic material where minors under the age of eighteen are prohibited under RCW 9.68A.150; and

(h) Any establishments where persons under the age of eighteen are not permitted.

(3) The department must notify the licensing authority of any business listed in subsection (2) of this section that such business has continued to allow the use of the electronic benefit card in violation of subsection (2) of this section.

(4) Only the recipient, an eligible member of the household, or the recipient's authorized representative may use an electronic benefit card or the benefit and such use shall only be for the respective benefit program purposes. Unless a recipient's family member is an eligible member of the household, the recipient's authorized representative, an alternative cardholder, or has been assigned as a protective payee, no family member may use the benefit card. The recipient shall not sell, or attempt to sell, exchange, or donate an electronic benefit card or any benefits to any other person or entity.

(5) The first violation of subsection (1) of this section by a recipient constitutes a class 4 civil infraction under RCW 7.80.120. Second and subsequent violations of subsection (1) of this section constitute a class 3 civil infraction under RCW 7.80.120.

(a) The department shall notify, in writing, all recipients of electronic benefit cards that any violation of subsection (1) of this section could result in legal proceedings and forfeiture of all cash public assistance.

(b) Whenever the department receives notice that a person has violated subsection (1) of this section, the department shall notify the person in writing that the violation could result in legal proceedings and forfeiture of all cash public assistance.

(c) The department shall assign a protective payee to the person receiving public assistance who violates subsection (1) of this section two or more times.

(6) In assigning a personal identification number to an electronic benefit card, the department shall not routinely use any sequence of numbers that appear on the card except in circumstances resulting from in-state or national disasters. Personal identification numbers assigned to electronic benefit cards issued to support the distribution of benefits when there is a disaster may include a sequence of numbers that appears on the card.

Sec. 28. RCW 82.04.050 and 2021 c 296 s 8, 2021 c 143 s 2, and 2021 c 4 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) "Sale at retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of tangible personal property (including articles produced, fabricated, or imprinted) to all persons irrespective of the nature of their business and including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons who install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real or personal property of or for consumers other than a sale to a person who:

(i) Purchases for the purpose of resale as tangible personal property in the regular course of business without intervening use by such person, but a purchase for the purpose of resale by a regional transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a sale for resale; or

(ii) Installs, repairs, cleans, alters, imprints, improves, constructs, or decorates real or personal property of or for consumers, if such tangible personal property becomes an ingredient or component of such real or personal property without intervening use by such person; or

(iii) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing for sale as a new article of tangible personal property or substance, of which such property becomes an ingredient or component or is a chemical used in processing, when the primary purpose of such chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale; or

(iv) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of ferrosilicon; or

(v) Purchases for the purpose of providing the property to consumers as part of competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065; or

(vi) Purchases for the purpose of satisfying the person's obligations under an extended warranty as defined in subsection (7) of this section, if such tangible personal property replaces or becomes an ingredient or component of property covered by the extended warranty without intervening use by such person.

(b) The term includes every sale of tangible personal property that is used or consumed or to be used or consumed in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though such property is resold or used as provided in (a)(i) through (vi) of this subsection following such use.

(c) The term also means every sale of tangible personal property to persons engaged in any business that is taxable under RCW 82.04.280(1) (a), (b), and (g), 82.04.290, and 82.04.2908.

(2) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the sale of or charge made for tangible personal property consumed and/or for labor and services rendered in respect to the following:

(a) The installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or improving of tangible personal property of or for consumers, including charges made for the mere use of facilities in respect thereto, but excluding charges made for the use of self-service laundry facilities, and also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit health care facilities, and excluding services rendered in respect to live animals, birds and insects;

(b) The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for consumers, including the installing or attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of installation, and also includes the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth excepting the mere leveling of land used in commercial farming or agriculture;

(c) The constructing, repairing, or improving of any structure upon, above, or under any real property owned by an owner who conveys the property by title, possession, or any other means to the person performing such construction, repair, or improvement for the purpose of performing such construction, repair, or improvement and the property is then reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the original owner;

(d) The cleaning, fumigating, razing, or moving of existing buildings or structures, but does not include the charge made for janitorial services; and for purposes of this section the term "janitorial services" means those cleaning and caretaking services ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service businesses including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor cleaning and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery. The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering, repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or sandblasting;

(e) Automobile towing and similar automotive transportation services, but not in respect to those required to report and pay taxes under chapter 82.16 RCW;

(f) The furnishing of lodging and all other services by a hotel, rooming house, tourist court, motel, trailer camp, and the granting of any similar license to use real property, as distinguished from the renting or leasing of real property, and it is presumed that the occupancy of real property for a continuous period of one month or more constitutes a rental or lease of real property and not a mere license to use or enjoy the same. For the purposes of this subsection, it is presumed that the sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging for a continuous period of one month or more to a person is a rental or lease of real property and not a mere license to enjoy the same. For the purposes of this section, it is presumed that the sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging offered regularly for public occupancy for periods of less than a month constitutes a license to use or enjoy the property subject to sales and use tax and not a rental or lease of property;

(g) The installing, repairing, altering, or improving of digital goods for consumers;

(h) Persons taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), and (g) of this subsection when such sales or charges are for property, labor and services which are used or consumed in whole or in part by such persons in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though such property, labor and services may be resold after such use or consumption. Nothing contained in this subsection may be construed to modify subsection (1) of this section and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section may be construed to modify this subsection.

(3) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the sale of or charge made for personal, business, or professional services including amounts designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and other service emoluments however designated, received by persons engaging in the following business activities:

(a) Abstract, title insurance, and escrow services;

(b) Credit bureau services;

(c) Automobile parking and storage garage services;

(d) Landscape maintenance and horticultural services but excluding (i) horticultural services provided to farmers and (ii) pruning, trimming, repairing, removing, and clearing of trees and brush near electric transmission or distribution lines or equipment, if performed by or at the direction of an electric utility;

(e) Service charges associated with tickets to professional sporting events;

(f) The following personal services: Tanning salon services, tattoo parlor services, steam bath services, turkish bath services, escort services, permanent cosmetics, enhanced permanent cosmetics, and corrective enhanced permanent cosmetics services, and dating services; and

(g)(i) Operating an athletic or fitness facility, including all charges for the use of such a facility or for any associated services and amenities, except as provided in (g)(ii) of this subsection.

(ii) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in (g)(i) of this subsection (3), the term "sale at retail" and "retail sale" under this subsection does not include:

(A) Separately stated charges for the use of an athletic or fitness facility where such use is primarily for a purpose other than engaging in or receiving instruction in a physical fitness activity;

(B) Separately stated charges for the use of a discrete portion of an athletic or fitness facility, other than a pool, where such discrete portion of the facility does not by itself meet the definition of "athletic or fitness facility" in this subsection;

(C) Separately stated charges for services, such as advertising, massage, nutritional consulting, and body composition testing, that do not require the customer to engage in physical fitness activities to receive the service. The exclusion in this subsection (3)(g)(ii)(C) does not apply to personal training services and instruction in a physical fitness activity;

(D) Separately stated charges for physical therapy provided by a physical therapist, as those terms are defined in RCW 18.74.010, or occupational therapy provided by an occupational therapy practitioner, as those terms are defined in RCW 18.59.020, when performed pursuant to a referral from an authorized health care practitioner or in consultation with an authorized health care practitioner. For the purposes of this subsection (3)(g)(ii)(D), an authorized health care practitioner means a health care practitioner licensed under chapter 18.83, 18.25, 18.36A, 18.57, 18.71, or 18.71A RCW, or, until July 1, 2022, chapter 18.57A RCW;

(E) Rent or association fees charged by a landlord or residential association to a tenant or residential owner with access to an athletic or fitness facility maintained by the landlord or residential association, unless the rent or fee varies depending on whether the tenant or owner has access to the facility;

(F) Services provided in the regular course of employment by an employee with access to an athletic or fitness facility maintained by the employer for use without charge by its employees or their family members;

(G) The provision of access to an athletic or fitness facility by an educational institution to its students and staff. However, charges made by an educational institution to its alumni or other members of the public for the use of any of the educational institution's athletic or fitness facilities are a retail sale under this subsection (3)(g). For purposes of this subsection (3)(g)(ii)(G), "educational institution" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.170;

(H) Yoga, chi gong, or martial arts classes, training, or events held at a community center, park, school gymnasium, college or university, hospital or other medical facility, private residence, or any other facility that is not operated within and as part of an athletic or fitness facility.

(iii) Nothing in (g)(ii) of this subsection (3) may be construed to affect the taxation of sales made by the operator of an athletic or fitness facility, where such sales are defined as a retail sale under any provision of this section other than this subsection (3).

(iv) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(g), the following definitions apply:

(A) "Athletic or fitness facility" means an indoor or outdoor facility or portion of a facility that is primarily used for: Exercise classes; strength and conditioning programs; personal training services; tennis, racquetball, handball, squash, or pickleball; or other activities requiring the use of exercise or strength training equipment, such as treadmills, elliptical machines, stair climbers, stationary cycles, rowing machines, pilates equipment, balls, climbing ropes, jump ropes, and weightlifting equipment.

(B) "Martial arts" means any of the various systems of training for physical combat or self-defense. "Martial arts" includes, but is not limited to, karate, kung fu, tae kwon do, Krav Maga, boxing, kickboxing, jujitsu, shootfighting, wrestling, aikido, judo, hapkido, Kendo, tai chi, and mixed martial arts.

(C) "Physical fitness activities" means activities that involve physical exertion for the purpose of improving or maintaining the general fitness, strength, flexibility, conditioning, or health of the participant. "Physical fitness activities" includes participating in yoga, chi gong, or martial arts.

(4)(a) The term also includes the renting or leasing of tangible personal property to consumers.

(b) The term does not include the renting or leasing of tangible personal property where the lease or rental is for the purpose of sublease or subrent.

(5) The term also includes the providing of "competitive telephone service," "telecommunications service," or "ancillary services," as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.

(6)(a) The term also includes the sale of prewritten computer software to a consumer, regardless of the method of delivery to the end user. For purposes of (a) and (b) of this subsection, the sale of prewritten computer software includes the sale of or charge made for a key or an enabling or activation code, where the key or code is required to activate prewritten computer software and put the software into use. There is no separate sale of the key or code from the prewritten computer software, regardless of how the sale may be characterized by the vendor or by the purchaser.

(b) The term "retail sale" does not include the sale of or charge made for:

(i) Custom software; or

(ii) The customization of prewritten computer software.

(c)(i) The term also includes the charge made to consumers for the right to access and use prewritten computer software, where possession of the software is maintained by the seller or a third party, regardless of whether the charge for the service is on a per use, per user, per license, subscription, or some other basis.

(ii)(A) The service described in (c)(i) of this subsection (6) includes the right to access and use prewritten computer software to perform data processing.

(B) For purposes of this subsection (6)(c)(ii), "data processing" means the systematic performance of operations on data to extract the required information in an appropriate form or to convert the data to usable information. Data processing includes check processing, image processing, form processing, survey processing, payroll processing, claim processing, and similar activities.

(7) The term also includes the sale of or charge made for an extended warranty to a consumer. For purposes of this subsection, "extended warranty" means an agreement for a specified duration to perform the replacement or repair of tangible personal property at no additional charge or a reduced charge for tangible personal property, labor, or both, or to provide indemnification for the replacement or repair of tangible personal property, based on the occurrence of specified events. The term "extended warranty" does not include an agreement, otherwise meeting the definition of extended warranty in this subsection, if no separate charge is made for the agreement and the value of the agreement is included in the sales price of the tangible personal property covered by the agreement. For purposes of this subsection, "sales price" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.010.

(8)(a) The term also includes the following sales to consumers of digital goods, digital codes, and digital automated services:

(i) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser the right of permanent use;

(ii) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser a right of use that is less than permanent;

(iii) Sales in which the purchaser is not obligated to make continued payment as a condition of the sale; and

(iv) Sales in which the purchaser is obligated to make continued payment as a condition of the sale.

(b) A retail sale of digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated services under this subsection (8) includes any services provided by the seller exclusively in connection with the digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated services, whether or not a separate charge is made for such services.

(c) For purposes of this subsection, "permanent" means perpetual or for an indefinite or unspecified length of time. A right of permanent use is presumed to have been granted unless the agreement between the seller and the purchaser specifies or the circumstances surrounding the transaction suggest or indicate that the right to use terminates on the occurrence of a condition subsequent.

(9) The term also includes the charge made for providing tangible personal property along with an operator for a fixed or indeterminate period of time. A consideration of this is that the operator is necessary for the tangible personal property to perform as designed. For the purpose of this subsection (9), an operator must do more than maintain, inspect, or set up the tangible personal property.

(10) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to the building, repairing, or improving of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind.

(11) The term also does not include sales of chemical sprays or washes to persons for the purpose of postharvest treatment of fruit for the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or decay, nor does it include sales of feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents for enhanced pollination including insects such as bees, and spray materials to: (a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation reserve program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands reserve program, and the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their successors administered by the United States department of agriculture; (b) farmers for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural product; (c) farmers for the purpose of providing bee pollination services; and (d) farmers acting under cooperative habitat development or access contracts with an organization exempt from federal income tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code or the Washington state department of fish and wildlife to produce or improve wildlife habitat on land that the farmer owns or leases.

(12) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to the constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing, or attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of installation. Nor does the term include the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority. Nor does the term include the sale of services or charges made for cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste and other by-products of weapons production and nuclear research and development.

(13) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor, services, or tangible personal property pursuant to agreements providing maintenance services for bus, rail, or rail fixed guideway equipment when a regional transit authority is the recipient of the labor, services, or tangible personal property, and a transit agency, as defined in RCW 81.104.015, performs the labor or services.

(14) The term does not include the sale for resale of any service described in this section if the sale would otherwise constitute a "sale at retail" and "retail sale" under this section.

(15)(a) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes amounts charged, however labeled, to consumers to engage in any of the activities listed in this subsection (15)(a), including the furnishing of any associated equipment or, except as otherwise provided in this subsection, providing instruction in such activities, where such charges are not otherwise defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" in this section:

(i)(A) Golf, including any variant in which either golf balls or golf clubs are used, such as miniature golf, hitting golf balls at a driving range, and golf simulators, and including fees charged by a golf course to a player for using his or her own cart. However, charges for golf instruction are not a retail sale, provided that if the instruction involves the use of a golfing facility that would otherwise require the payment of a fee, such as green fees or driving range fees, such fees, including the applicable retail sales tax, must be separately identified and charged by the golfing facility operator to the instructor or the person receiving the instruction.

(B) Notwithstanding (a)(i)(A) of this subsection (15) and except as otherwise provided in this subsection (15)(a)(i)(B), the term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" does not include amounts charged to participate in, or conduct, a golf tournament or other competitive event. However, amounts paid by event participants to the golf facility operator are retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(i). Likewise, amounts paid by the event organizer to the golf facility are retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(i), if such amounts vary based on the number of event participants;

(ii) Ballooning, hang gliding, indoor or outdoor sky diving, paragliding, parasailing, and similar activities;

(iii) Air hockey, billiards, pool, foosball, darts, shuffleboard, ping pong, and similar games;

(iv) Access to amusement park, theme park, and water park facilities, including but not limited to charges for admission and locker or cabana rentals. Discrete charges for rides or other attractions or entertainment that are in addition to the charge for admission are not a retail sale under this subsection (15)(a)(iv). For the purposes of this subsection, an amusement park or theme park is a location that provides permanently affixed amusement rides, games, and other entertainment, but does not include parks or zoos for which the primary purpose is the exhibition of wildlife, or fairs, carnivals, and festivals as defined in (b)(i) of this subsection;

(v) Batting cage activities;

(vi) Bowling, but not including competitive events, except that amounts paid by the event participants to the bowling alley operator are retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(vi). Likewise, amounts paid by the event organizer to the operator of the bowling alley are retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(vi), if such amounts vary based on the number of event participants;

(vii) Climbing on artificial climbing structures, whether indoors or outdoors;

(viii) Day trips for sightseeing purposes;

(ix) Bungee jumping, zip lining, and riding inside a ball, whether inflatable or otherwise;

(x) Horseback riding offered to the public, where the seller furnishes the horse to the buyer and providing instruction is not the primary focus of the activity, including guided rides, but not including therapeutic horseback riding provided by an instructor certified by a nonprofit organization that offers national or international certification for therapeutic riding instructors;

(xi) Fishing, including providing access to private fishing areas and charter or guided fishing, except that fishing contests and license fees imposed by a government entity are not a retail sale under this subsection;

(xii) Guided hunting and hunting at game farms and shooting preserves, except that hunting contests and license fees imposed by a government entity are not a retail sale under this subsection;

(xiii) Swimming, but only in respect to (A) recreational or fitness swimming that is open to the public, such as open swim, lap swimming, and special events like kids night out and pool parties during open swim time, and (B) pool parties for private events, such as birthdays, family gatherings, and employee outings. Fees for swimming lessons, to participate in swim meets and other competitions, or to join a swim team, club, or aquatic facility are not retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(xiii);

(xiv) Go-karting, bumper cars, and other motorized activities where the seller provides the vehicle and the premises where the buyer will operate the vehicle;

(xv) Indoor or outdoor playground activities, such as inflatable bounce structures and other inflatables; mazes; trampolines; slides; ball pits; games of tag, including laser tag and soft-dart tag; and human gyroscope rides, regardless of whether such activities occur at the seller's place of business, but not including playground activities provided for children by a licensed child day care center or licensed family day care provider as those terms are defined in RCW 43.216.010;

(xvi) Shooting sports and activities, such as target shooting, skeet, trap, sporting clays, "5" stand, and archery, but only in respect to discrete charges to members of the public to engage in these activities, but not including fees to enter a competitive event, instruction that is entirely or predominately classroom based, or to join or renew a membership at a club, range, or other facility;

(xvii) Paintball and airsoft activities;

(xviii) Skating, including ice skating, roller skating, and inline skating, but only in respect to discrete charges to members of the public to engage in skating activities, but not including skating lessons, competitive events, team activities, or fees to join or renew a membership at a skating facility, club, or other organization;

(xix) Nonmotorized snow sports and activities, such as downhill and cross-country skiing, snowboarding, ski jumping, sledding, snow tubing, snowshoeing, and similar snow sports and activities, whether engaged in outdoors or in an indoor facility with or without snow, but only in respect to discrete charges to the public for the use of land or facilities to engage in nonmotorized snow sports and activities, such as fees, however labeled, for the use of ski lifts and tows and daily or season passes for access to trails or other areas where nonmotorized snow sports and activities are conducted. However, fees for the following are not retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(xix): (A) Instructional lessons; (B) permits issued by a governmental entity to park a vehicle on or access public lands; and (C) permits or leases granted by an owner of private timberland for recreational access to areas used primarily for growing and harvesting timber; and

(xx) Scuba diving; snorkeling; river rafting; surfing; kiteboarding; flyboarding; water slides; inflatables, such as water pillows, water trampolines, and water rollers; and similar water sports and activities.

(b) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this subsection (15), the term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" does not include charges:

(i) Made for admission to, and rides or attractions at, fairs, carnivals, and festivals. For the purposes of this subsection, fairs, carnivals, and festivals are events that do not exceed 21 days and a majority of the amusement rides, if any, are not affixed to real property;

(ii) Made by an educational institution to its students and staff for activities defined as retail sales by (a)(i) through (xx) of this subsection. However, charges made by an educational institution to its alumni or other members of the general public for these activities are a retail sale under this subsection (15). For purposes of this subsection (15)(b)(ii), "educational institution" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.170;

(iii) Made by a vocational school for commercial diver training that is licensed by the workforce training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW; or

(iv) Made for day camps offered by a nonprofit organization or state or local governmental entity that provide youth not older than age 18, or that are focused on providing individuals with disabilities or mental illness, the opportunity to participate in a variety of supervised activities.

(16)(a) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the purchase or acquisition of tangible personal property and specified services by a person who receives either a qualifying grant exempt from tax under RCW 82.04.767 or 82.16.320 or a grant deductible under RCW 82.04.4339, except for transactions excluded from the definition of "sale at retail" or "retail sale" by any other provision of this section. Nothing in this subsection (16) may be construed to limit the application of any other provision of this section to purchases by a recipient of either a qualifying grant exempt from tax under RCW 82.04.767 or a grant deductible under RCW 82.04.4339, or by any other person.

(b) For purposes of this subsection (16), "specified services" means:

(i) The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property, including the installing or attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of installation;

(ii) The clearing of land or the moving of earth, whether or not associated with activities described in (b)(i) of this subsection (16);

(iii) The razing or moving of existing buildings or structures; and

(iv) Landscape maintenance and horticultural services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29. Sections 5 through 13, 15 through 19, 21 through 23, and 25 through 28 of this act take effect November 1, 2027.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30. Rule making required by this act must be completed no later than June 30, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2024, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.

--- END ---