BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.230 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The purpose of a high school diploma is to declare that a student is ready for success in postsecondary education, gainful employment, and citizenship, and is equipped with the skills to be a lifelong learner.

(2) Except as provided in RCW 28A.230.320, graduation from a public high school and the earning of a high school diploma must include the following:

(a) Satisfying the graduation requirements established by the state board of education under RCW 28A.230.090 and any graduation requirements established by the applicable public high school or school district;

(b) Satisfying credit and subject area requirements for graduation;

(c) Demonstrating career and college readiness through completion of the high school and beyond plan required by RCW 28A.230.212; and

(d) Meeting the requirements of at least one graduation pathway option required by RCW 28A.655.250 (as recodified by this act).

(3) Successful completion of the requirements in subsection (2) of this section signals a student's readiness to graduate with a meaningful high school diploma that fulfills the purpose of a diploma as established by this section.

Sec. 2. RCW 28A.230.090 and 2023 c 271 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((The))In accordance with statutory authority of the state board of education provided in RCW 28A.305.130(4), the state board of education shall establish high school graduation requirements or equivalencies for students, except as provided in RCW 28A.230.122 and 28A.655.250 (as recodified by this act) and except those equivalencies established by local high schools or school districts under RCW 28A.230.097. ((The purpose of a high school diploma is to declare that a student is ready for success in postsecondary education, gainful employment, and citizenship, and is equipped with the skills to be a lifelong learner.

(a) Any course in Washington state history and government used to fulfill high school graduation requirements shall consider including information on the culture, history, and government of the American Indian peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state.

(b) Except as provided otherwise in this subsection, the certificate of academic achievement requirements under RCW 28A.655.061 or the certificate of individual achievement requirements under RCW 28A.155.045 are required for graduation from a public high school but are not the only requirements for graduation. The requirement to earn a certificate of academic achievement to qualify for graduation from a public high school concludes with the graduating class of 2019. The obligation of qualifying students to earn a certificate of individual achievement as a prerequisite for graduation from a public high school concludes with the graduating class of 2021.

(c) Each student must have a high school and beyond plan to guide the student's high school experience and inform course taking that is aligned with the student's goals for education or training and career after high school as provided for under RCW 28A.230.212 and 28A.230.215. Any decision on whether a student has met the state board's high school graduation requirements for a high school and beyond plan shall remain at the local level. Effective with the graduating class of 2015, the state board of education may not establish a requirement for students to complete a culminating project for graduation. A district may establish additional, local requirements for a high school and beyond plan to serve the needs and interests of its students and the purposes of this section.

(d)(i)))(2)(a) The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement the career and college ready graduation requirement proposal adopted under board resolution on November 10, 2010, and revised on January 9, 2014, to take effect beginning with the graduating class of 2019 or as otherwise provided in this subsection (((1)(d)))(2). The rules must include authorization for a school district to waive up to two credits for individual students based on a student's circumstances, provided that none of the waived credits are identified as mandatory core credits by the state board of education. School districts must adhere to written policies authorizing the waivers that must be adopted by each board of directors of a school district that grants diplomas. The rules must also provide that the content of the third credit of mathematics and the content of the third credit of science may be chosen by the student based on the student's interests and high school and beyond plan with agreement of the student's parent or guardian or agreement of the school counselor or principal, or as provided in RCW 28A.230.300(4).

(((ii)))(b) School districts may apply to the state board of education for a waiver to implement the career and college ready graduation requirement proposal beginning with the graduating class of 2020 or 2021 instead of the graduating class of 2019. In the application, a school district must describe why the waiver is being requested, the specific impediments preventing timely implementation, and efforts that will be taken to achieve implementation with the graduating class proposed under the waiver. The state board of education shall grant a waiver under this subsection (((1)(d)))(2)(b) to an applying school district at the next subsequent meeting of the board after receiving an application.

(((2)(a) In recognition of the statutory authority of the state board of education to establish and enforce minimum high school graduation requirements, the state board shall periodically reevaluate the graduation requirements and shall report such findings to the legislature in a timely manner as determined by the state board.

(b) The state board shall reevaluate the graduation requirements for students enrolled in vocationally intensive and rigorous career and technical education programs, particularly those programs that lead to a certificate or credential that is state or nationally recognized. The purpose of the evaluation is to ensure that students enrolled in these programs have sufficient opportunity to complete the program and earn the program's certificate or credential, and complete other state and local graduation requirements.

(c) The state board shall forward any proposed changes to the high school graduation requirements to the education committees of the legislature for review. The legislature shall have the opportunity to act during a regular legislative session before the changes are adopted through administrative rule by the state board. Changes that have a fiscal impact on school districts, as identified by a fiscal analysis prepared by the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall take effect only if formally authorized and funded by the legislature through the omnibus appropriations act or other enacted legislation.

(3) Pursuant to any requirement for instruction in languages other than English established by the state board of education or a local school district, or both, for purposes of high school graduation, students who receive instruction in American sign language or one or more American Indian languages shall be considered to have satisfied the state or local school district graduation requirement for instruction in one or more languages other than English.

(4) Unless requested otherwise by the student and the student's family, a student who has completed high school courses before attending high school shall be given high school credit which shall be applied to fulfilling high school graduation requirements if:

(a) The course was taken with high school students, if the academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth grade classes, and the student has successfully passed by completing the same course requirements and examinations as the high school students enrolled in the class; or

(b) The academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth grade classes and the course would qualify for high school credit, because the course is similar or equivalent to a course offered at a high school in the district as determined by the school district board of directors.

(5) Students who have taken and successfully completed high school courses under the circumstances in subsection (4) of this section shall not be required to take an additional competency examination or perform any other additional assignment to receive credit.

(6) At the college or university level, five quarter or three semester hours equals one high school credit.))

Graduation requirements established by the state board of education may not obligate students to complete a culminating project as a graduation prerequisite.

(3) In accordance with the duties required by subsection (1) of this section, the state board of education shall also:

(a) Periodically reevaluate the graduation requirements and shall report such findings to the legislature in a timely manner as determined by the state board of education;

(b) Reevaluate the graduation requirements for students enrolled in vocationally intensive and rigorous career and technical education programs, particularly those programs that lead to a certificate or credential that is state or nationally recognized. The purpose of the evaluation is to ensure that students enrolled in these programs have sufficient opportunity to complete the program and earn the program's certificate or credential, and complete other state and local graduation requirements; and

(c) Forward any proposed changes to graduation requirements to the education committees of the legislature for review. The legislature shall have the opportunity to act during a regular legislative session before proposed changes may be adopted by rule of the state board of education. Changes that have a fiscal impact on school districts, as identified by a fiscal analysis prepared by the office of the superintendent of public instruction, may take effect only if authorized and funded through the omnibus appropriations act or other enacted legislation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 28A.230 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any course in Washington state history and government used to fulfill high school graduation requirements established by the state board of education shall consider including information on the culture, history, and government of the American Indian peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state.

(2) Pursuant to any requirement for instruction in languages other than English established by the state board of education or a local school district, or both, for purposes of high school graduation, students who receive instruction in American sign language or one or more American Indian languages shall be considered to have satisfied the state or local school district graduation requirement for instruction in one or more languages other than English.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 28A.230 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Unless requested otherwise by the student and the student's family, a student who has completed high school courses before attending high school must be given high school credit that is applied to fulfilling high school graduation requirements if:

(a) The course was taken with high school students, if the academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth grade classes, and the student has successfully passed by completing the same course requirements and examinations as the high school students enrolled in the class; or

(b) The academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth grade classes and the course would qualify for high school credit, because the course is similar or equivalent to a course offered at a high school in the district as determined by the school district board of directors.

(2) Students who have taken and successfully completed high school courses under the circumstances in subsection (1) of this section may not be required to take an additional competency examination or perform any other additional assignment to receive credit.

(3) At the college or university level, five quarter or three semester hours equals one high school credit.

Sec. 5. RCW 28A.655.250 and 2023 c 349 s 2 and 2023 c 271 s 10 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)(((a) Beginning with the class of 2020, except as provided in RCW 28A.230.320, graduation from a public high school and the earning of a high school diploma must include the following:

(i) Satisfying the graduation requirements established by the state board of education under RCW 28A.230.090 and any graduation requirements established by the applicable public high school or school district;

(ii) Satisfying credit requirements for graduation;

(iii) Demonstrating career and college readiness through completion of the high school and beyond plan as required by RCW 28A.230.090 and in accordance with RCW 28A.230.212 and 28A.230.215; and

(iv) Meeting the requirements of at least one graduation pathway option established in this section.

(b) Successful completion of the components in (a) of this subsection together signals a student's readiness to graduate with a meaningful high school diploma that fulfills the diploma purpose established in RCW 28A.230.090.

(2)))Each student graduating from a public high school and earning a high school diploma must meet the requirements of at least one graduation pathway option established in this section. The graduation pathway options ((established in this section)) are intended to provide a student with multiple ways, including test-based, course-based, and performance-based options, to demonstrate readiness in furtherance of the student's individual goals for high school and beyond. For the purposes of this section, "demonstrate readiness" means the student meets or exceeds state learning standards addressed in the graduation pathway option. A student may choose to pursue one or more of the graduation pathway options under subsection (((3)))(2) of this section, but any graduation pathway option used by a student to demonstrate career and college readiness must be in alignment with the student's high school and beyond plan.

(((3)))(2) The following graduation pathway options may be used to demonstrate career and college readiness ((in accordance with subsection (1)(a)(iv) of this section)):

(a) Meet or exceed the graduation standard established by the state board of education under RCW 28A.305.130 on the statewide high school assessments in English language arts and mathematics as provided for under RCW 28A.655.070;

(b) Complete and qualify for college credit in dual credit courses in English language arts and mathematics. For the purposes of this subsection, "dual credit course" means a course in which a student qualifies for college and high school credit in English language arts or mathematics upon successfully completing the course;

(c) Earn high school credit in a high school transition course in English language arts and mathematics, an example of which includes a bridge to college course. For the purposes of this subsection (((3)))(2)(c), "high school transition course" means an English language arts or mathematics course offered in high school where successful completion by a high school student ensures the student college-level placement at participating institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016. High school transition courses must satisfy core or elective credit graduation requirements established by the state board of education. A student's successful completion of a high school transition course does not entitle the student to be admitted to an institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016;

(d) Earn high school credit, with a C+ grade or higher in AP, international baccalaureate, or Cambridge international courses in English language arts and mathematics; or earn at least the minimum scores outlined in RCW 28B.10.054(1) on the corresponding exams. The state board of education shall establish by rule the list of AP, international baccalaureate, and Cambridge international courses of which successful completion meets the standard in this subsection for English language arts and for mathematics;

(e) Meet or exceed the scores established by the state board of education for the mathematics portion and the reading, English, or writing portion of the SAT or ACT;

(f)(i) Complete a performance-based learning experience through which the student demonstrates knowledge and skills in a real-world context, providing evidence that the student meets or exceeds state learning standards in English language arts and mathematics. The performance-based learning experience may take a variety of forms, such as a project, practicum, work-related experience, community service, or cultural activity, and may result in a variety of products that can be evaluated, such as a performance, presentation, portfolio, report, film, or exhibit.

(ii) The performance-based learning experience must conform to state requirements established in rule by the state board of education addressing the safety and quality of the performance-based learning experience and the authentic performance-based assessment criteria for determining the student has demonstrated the applicable learning standards. The rules adopted by the state board of education to implement the graduation pathway option established in this subsection (2)(f) may allow external parties, including community leaders and professionals, to participate in the evaluation of the student's performance and must include at least one certificated teacher with an endorsement in each relevant subject area or with other applicable qualifications as permitted by the professional educator standards board.

(iii) To support implementation of the performance-based learning experience graduation pathway option, the state board of education, in collaboration with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall establish graduation proficiency targets and associated rubrics aligned with state learning standards in English language arts and mathematics.

(iv) Prior to offering the performance-based learning experience graduation pathway option in this subsection (((3)))(2)(f) to students, the school district board of directors shall adopt a written policy in conformity with applicable state requirements;

(g) Meet any combination of at least one English language arts option and at least one mathematics option established in (a) through (f) of this subsection;

(h) Meet standard in the armed services vocational aptitude battery; and

(i) Complete a sequence of career and technical education courses that are relevant to a student's postsecondary pathway, including those leading to workforce entry, state or nationally approved apprenticeships, or postsecondary education, and that meet either: The curriculum requirements of core plus programs for aerospace, maritime, health care, information technology, or construction and manufacturing; or the minimum criteria identified in RCW 28A.700.030. Nothing in this subsection (((3)))(2)(i) requires a student to enroll in a preparatory course that is approved under RCW 28A.700.030 for the purposes of demonstrating career and college readiness under this section.

(((4)))(3) While the legislature encourages school districts to make all graduation pathway options established in this section available to their high school students, and to expand their graduation pathway options until that goal is met, school districts have discretion in determining which ((pathway)) options under this section they will offer to students.

(4) School districts((, however,)) must annually provide students in grades eight through 12 and their parents or legal guardians with comprehensive information about the graduation pathway options offered by the school district and are strongly encouraged to begin providing this information ((beginning in sixth grade))to students in grade six. School districts must provide this information in a manner that conforms with the school district's language access policy and procedures as required under RCW 28A.183.040.

(5) The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement the graduation pathway options established in this section.

Sec. 6. RCW 28A.655.260 and 2023 c 349 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall collect the following information from school districts: Which ((of the)) graduation ((pathways under RCW 28A.655.250))pathway options established in RCW 28A.655.250 are available to students at each ((of the)) school district((s)); and the number of students using each graduation pathway option for graduation purposes. This information shall be reported annually to the education committees of the legislature beginning January 10, 2021. To the extent feasible, data on student participation in each ((of the)) graduation pathway((s))option shall be disaggregated by race, ethnicity, gender, and receipt of free or reduced-price lunch.

(2) The state board of education shall review and monitor the implementation of the graduation pathway options to ensure school district compliance with requirements established under RCW 28A.655.250 (as recodified by this act) and subsection (3) of this section. The reviews and monitoring required by this subsection may be conducted concurrently with other oversight and monitoring conducted by the state board of education. The information shall be collected annually and reported to the education committees of the legislature by January 10, 2025, and biennially thereafter.

(3)(a) At least annually, school districts shall examine data on student groups participating in and completing each graduation pathway option offered by the school district. At a minimum, the data on graduation pathway participation and completion must be disaggregated by the student groups described in RCW 28A.300.042 (1) and (3), and by:

(i) Gender;

(ii) Students who are the subject of a dependency proceeding pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW;

(iii) Students who are experiencing homelessness as defined in RCW 28A.300.542(((4))); and

(iv) Multilingual/English learners.

(b) If the results of the analysis required under (a) of this subsection show disproportionate participation and completion rates by student groups, ((then)) the school district shall identify reasons for the observed disproportionality and implement strategies as appropriate to ensure the graduation pathway options are equitably available to all students in the school district.

Sec. 7. RCW 28A.230.212 and 2023 c 271 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((This section establishes the school district, content, and other substantive requirements for the high school and beyond plan required by RCW 28A.230.090))Each student must have a high school and beyond plan to guide the student's high school experience and inform course taking that is aligned with the student's goals for education or training and career after high school.

(2)(a) ((Beginning by the seventh))By grade seven, each student must be administered a career interest and skills inventory which is intended to be used to inform ((eighth)) grade eight course taking and development of an initial high school and beyond plan. No later than ((eighth)) grade eight, each student must have begun development of a high school and beyond plan that includes a proposed plan for first-year high school courses aligned with graduation requirements and secondary and postsecondary goals.

(b) For each student who has not earned a score of level 3 or 4 on the middle school mathematics assessment identified in RCW 28A.655.070 by ((ninth)) grade nine, the high school and beyond plan must be updated to ensure that the student takes a mathematics course in both ((ninth and 10th)) grades nine and 10. These courses may include career and technical education equivalencies in mathematics adopted pursuant to RCW 28A.230.097.

(3) With staff support, students must update their high school and beyond plan annually, at a minimum, to review academic progress and inform future course taking.

(a) The high school and beyond plan must be updated in ((10th)) grade 10 to reflect high school assessment results in RCW 28A.655.061, ensure student access to advanced course options per the district's academic acceleration policy in RCW 28A.320.195, assess progress toward identified goals, and revised as necessary for changing interests, goals, and needs.

(b) Each school district shall provide students who have not met the standard on state assessments or who are behind in completion of credits or graduation pathway options with the opportunity to access interventions and academic supports, courses, or both, designed to enable students to meet all high school graduation requirements. The parents or legal guardians shall be notified about these opportunities as included in the student's high school and beyond plan, preferably through a student-led conference, including the parents or legal guardians, and at least annually until the student is on track to graduate.

(c) For students with an individualized education program, the high school and beyond plan must be developed and updated in alignment with their school to postschool transition plan. The high school and beyond plan must be developed and updated in a similar manner and with similar school personnel as for all other students.

(4) School districts shall involve parents and legal guardians to the greatest extent feasible in the process of developing and updating the high school and beyond plan.

(a) ((The plan))High school and beyond plans must be provided to ((the)) students and ((the students'))their parents or legal guardians in a language the students and parents or legal guardians understand and in accordance with the school district's language access policy and procedures as required under chapter 28A.183 RCW, which may require language assistance for students and parents or legal guardians with limited English proficiency.

(b) School districts must annually provide students in grades eight through 12, and their parents or legal guardians, with comprehensive information about the graduation pathway options offered by the district and are strongly encouraged to begin providing this information ((beginning in sixth))to students in grade six. School districts must provide this information in a manner that conforms with the school district's language access policy and procedures as required under chapter 28A.183 RCW.

(5) School districts are strongly encouraged to partner with student serving, community-based organizations that support career and college exploration and preparation for postsecondary and career pathways. Partnerships may include high school and beyond plan coordination and planning, data-sharing agreements, and safe and secure access to individual student's high school and beyond plans.

(6) All high school and beyond plans must, at a minimum, include the following elements:

(a) Identification of career goals and interests, aided by a skills and interest assessment;

(b) Identification of secondary and postsecondary education and training goals;

(c) An academic plan for course taking that:

(i) Informs students about course options for satisfying state and local graduation requirements;

(ii) Satisfies state and local graduation requirements;

(iii) Aligns with the student's secondary and postsecondary goals, which can include education, training, and career preparation;

(iv) Identifies available advanced course sequences per the school district's academic acceleration policy, as described in RCW 28A.320.195, that include dual credit courses or other programs and are aligned with the student's postsecondary goals;

(v) Informs students about the potential impacts of their course selections on postsecondary opportunities;

(vi) Identifies available career and technical education equivalency courses that can satisfy core subject area graduation requirements under RCW 28A.230.097;

(vii) If applicable, identifies career and technical education and work-based learning opportunities that can lead to technical college certifications and apprenticeships; and

(viii) If applicable, identifies opportunities for credit recovery and acceleration, including partial and mastery-based credit accrual to eliminate barriers for on-time grade level progression and graduation per RCW 28A.320.192;

(d) Evidence that the student has received the following information on federal and state financial aid programs that help pay for the costs of a postsecondary program:

(i) The college bound scholarship program established in chapter 28B.118 RCW, the Washington college grant created in RCW 28B.92.200, and other scholarship opportunities;

(ii) The documentation necessary for completing state and federal financial aid applications; application timeliness and submission deadlines; and the importance of submitting applications early;

(iii) Information specific to students who are or have been the subject of a dependency proceeding pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW, who are or are at risk of being homeless, and whose family member or legal guardian will be required to provide financial and tax information necessary to complete applications;

(iv) Opportunities to participate in advising days and seminars that assist students and, when necessary, their parents or legal guardians, with filling out financial aid applications in accordance with RCW 28A.300.815; and

(v) A sample financial aid letter and a link to the financial aid calculator created in RCW 28B.77.280; and

(e) By the end of ((the 12th)) grade 12, a current resume or activity log that provides a written compilation of the student's education, any work experience, extracurricular activities, and any community service including how the school district has recognized the community service pursuant to RCW 28A.320.193.

(7) ((In accordance with RCW 28A.230.090(1)(c) any))Any decision on whether a student has met the state ((board's high school graduation))board of education's requirements for a high school and beyond plan shall remain at the local level, and a school district may establish additional, local requirements for a high school and beyond plan to serve the needs and interests of its students and the purposes of this section.

(8) The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 8. RCW 28A.230.300 and 2021 c 307 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning no later than the 2022-23 school year, each school district that operates a high school must, at a minimum, provide an opportunity to access an elective computer science course that is available to all high school students. School districts are encouraged to consider community-based or public-private partnerships in establishing and administering a course, but any course offered in accordance with this section must be aligned to the state learning standards for computer science or mathematics.

(2) In accordance with the requirements of this section, beginning in the 2019-20 school year, school districts may award academic credit for computer science to students based on student completion of a competency examination that is aligned with the state learning standards for computer science or mathematics and course equivalency requirements adopted by the office of the superintendent of public instruction to implement this section. Each school district board of directors in districts that award credit under this subsection shall develop a written policy for awarding such credit that includes:

(a) A course equivalency approval procedure;

(b) Procedures for awarding competency-based credit for skills learned partially or wholly outside of a course; and

(c) An approval process for computer science courses taken before attending high school under ((RCW 28A.230.090 (4) and (5)))section 4 of this act.

(3) Prior to the use of any competency examination under this section that may be used to award academic credit to students, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must review the examination to ensure its alignment with:

(a) The state learning standards for computer science or mathematics; and

(b) Course equivalency requirements adopted by the office of the superintendent of public instruction to implement this section.

(4)(a) For purposes of meeting graduation requirements under RCW 28A.230.090, a student may substitute a computer science course aligned to state computer science learning standards as an alternative to a third year mathematics or third year science course if:

(i) Prior to the substitution, the school counselor provides the student and the student's parent or guardian with written notification of the consequences of the substitution on postsecondary opportunities;

(ii) The student, the student's parent or guardian, and the student's school counselor or principal agree to the substitution; and

(iii) The substitution is aligned with the student's high school and beyond plan.

(b) A substitution permitted under this subsection (4) may only be used once per student.

Sec. 9. RCW 28A.230.320 and 2023 c 271 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Beginning with the class of 2020, the state board of education may authorize school districts to grant individual student emergency waivers from credit and subject area graduation requirements established in accordance with RCW 28A.230.090, the graduation pathway requirement established in RCW 28A.655.250 (as recodified by this act), or both if:

(a) The student's ability to complete the requirement was impeded due to a significant disruption resulting from a local, state, or national emergency;

(b) The school district demonstrates a good faith effort to support the individual student in meeting the requirement before considering an emergency waiver;

(c) The student was reasonably expected to graduate in the school year when the emergency waiver is granted; and

(d) The student has demonstrated skills and knowledge indicating preparation for the next steps identified in their high school and beyond plan ((under RCW 28A.230.212 and 28A.230.215))required by RCW 28A.230.212 and for success in postsecondary education, gainful employment, and civic engagement.

(2) A school district that is granted emergency waiver authority under this section shall:

(a) Maintain a record of courses and requirements waived as part of the individual student record;

(b) Include a notation of waived credits on the student's high school transcript;

(c) Maintain records as necessary and as required by rule of the state board of education to document compliance with subsection (1)(b) of this section;

(d) Report student level emergency waiver data to the office of the superintendent of public instruction in a manner determined by the superintendent of public instruction in consultation with the state board of education;

(e) Determine if there is disproportionality among student subgroups receiving emergency waivers and, if so, take appropriate corrective actions to ensure equitable administration. At a minimum, the subgroups to be examined must include those referenced in RCW 28A.300.042(3). If further disaggregation of subgroups is available, the school district shall also examine those subgroups; and

(f) Adopt by resolution a written plan that describes the school district's process for students to request or decline an emergency waiver, and a process for students to appeal within the school district a decision to not grant an emergency waiver.

(3)(((a))) By November 1, 2021, and annually thereafter, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide the data reported under subsection (2) of this section to the state board of education.

(((b) The state board of education, by December 15, 2021, and within existing resources, shall provide the education committees of the legislature with a summary of the emergency waiver data provided by the office of the superintendent of public instruction under this subsection (3) for students in the graduating classes of 2020 and 2021. The summary must include the following information:

(i) The total number of emergency waivers requested and issued, by school district, including an indication of what requirement or requirements were waived. Information provided in accordance with this subsection (3)(b)(i) must also indicate the number of students in the school district grade cohort of each student receiving a waiver; and

(ii) An analysis of any concerns regarding school district implementation, including any concerns related to school district demonstrations of good faith efforts as required by subsection (1)(b) of this section, identified by the state board of education during its review of the data.))

(4) The state board of education shall adopt and may periodically revise rules for eligibility and administration of emergency waivers under this section. The rules may include:

(a) An application and approval process that allows school districts to apply to the state board of education to receive authority to grant emergency waivers in response to an emergency;

(b) Eligibility criteria for meeting the requirements established in subsection (1) of this section;

(c) Limitations on the number and type of credits that can be waived; and

(d) Expectations of the school district regarding communication with students and their parents or guardians.

(5) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Emergency" has the same meaning as "emergency or disaster" in RCW 38.52.010. "Emergency" may also include a national declaration of emergency by an authorized federal official.

(b) "School district" means any school district, charter school established under chapter 28A.710 RCW, ((tribal compact school operated according to the terms of state-tribal education compacts authorized under))state-tribal education compact school subject to chapter 28A.715 RCW, private school, state school established under chapter 72.40 RCW, and community and technical college granting high school diplomas.

Sec. 10. RCW 28A.150.220 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 506 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order for students to have the opportunity to develop the basic education knowledge and skills under RCW 28A.150.210, school districts must provide instruction of sufficient quantity and quality and give students the opportunity to complete graduation requirements that are intended to prepare them for postsecondary education, gainful employment, and citizenship. The program established under this section shall be the minimum instructional program of basic education offered by school districts.

(2) Each school district shall make available to students the following minimum instructional offering each school year:

(a) For students enrolled in grades one through ((twelve))12, at least a district-wide annual average of ((one thousand))1,000 hours, which shall be increased beginning in the 2015-16 school year to at least ((one thousand eighty))1,080 instructional hours for students enrolled in grades nine through ((twelve))12 and at least ((one thousand))1,000 instructional hours for students in grades one through eight, all of which may be calculated by a school district using a district-wide annual average of instructional hours over grades one through ((twelve))12; and

(b) For students enrolled in kindergarten, at least ((four hundred fifty))450 instructional hours, which shall be increased to at least ((one thousand))1,000 instructional hours according to the implementation schedule under RCW 28A.150.315.

(3) The instructional program of basic education provided by each school district shall include:

(a) Instruction in the ((essential academic learning requirements))state learning standards under RCW 28A.655.070;

(b) Instruction that provides students the opportunity to complete ((twenty-four))24 credits for high school graduation((, beginning with the graduating class of 2019 or as otherwise provided in RCW 28A.230.090)). Course distribution requirements may be established by the state board of education under RCW 28A.230.090;

(c) If the ((essential academic learning requirements))state learning standards include a requirement of languages other than English, the requirement may be met by students receiving instruction in one or more American Indian languages;

(d) Supplemental instruction and services for students who are not meeting academic standards through the learning assistance program under RCW 28A.165.005 through 28A.165.065;

(e) Supplemental instruction and services for eligible and enrolled students and exited students whose primary language is other than English through the transitional bilingual instruction program under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080;

(f) The opportunity for an appropriate education at public expense as defined by RCW 28A.155.020 for all eligible students with disabilities as defined in RCW 28A.155.020; and

(g) Programs for highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010 through 28A.185.030.

(4) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to require individual students to attend school for any particular number of hours per day or to take any particular courses.

(5)(a) Each school district's kindergarten through ((twelfth))12th grade basic educational program shall be accessible to all students who are five years of age, as provided by RCW 28A.225.160, and less than ((twenty-one))21 years of age and shall consist of a minimum of ((one hundred eighty))180 school days per school year in such grades as are conducted by a school district, and ((one hundred eighty))180 half-days of instruction, or equivalent, in kindergarten, to be increased to a minimum of ((one hundred eighty))180 school days per school year according to the implementation schedule under RCW 28A.150.315.

(b) Schools administering the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills may use up to three school days at the beginning of the school year to meet with parents and families as required in the parent involvement component of the inventory.

(c) In the case of students who are graduating from high school, a school district may schedule the last five school days of the ((one hundred eighty))180-day school year for noninstructional purposes including, but not limited to, the observance of graduation and early release from school upon the request of a student. All such students may be claimed as a full-time equivalent student to the extent they could otherwise have been so claimed for the purposes of RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260. Any hours scheduled by a school district for noninstructional purposes during the last five school days for such students shall count toward the instructional hours requirement in subsection (2)(a) of this section.

(6) Subject to RCW 28A.150.276, nothing in this section precludes a school district from enriching the instructional program of basic education, such as offering additional instruction or providing additional services, programs, or activities that the school district determines to be appropriate for the education of the school district's students.

(7) The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement and ensure compliance with the program requirements imposed by this section, RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260, and such related supplemental program approval requirements as the state board may establish.

Sec. 11. RCW 28A.300.900 and 2023 c 271 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the state board for community and technical colleges and the Washington state apprenticeship and training council, shall examine opportunities for promoting recognized preapprenticeship and registered youth apprenticeship opportunities for high school students.

(2) In accordance with this section, by November 1, 2018, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall solicit input from persons and organizations with an interest or relevant expertise in registered preapprenticeship programs, registered youth apprenticeship programs, or both, and employer-based preapprenticeship and youth apprenticeship programs, and provide a report to the governor and the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate that includes recommendations for:

(a) Improving alignment between college-level vocational courses at institutions of higher education and high school curriculum and graduation requirements, including high school and beyond plans required by ((RCW 28A.230.090 and in accordance with)) RCW 28A.230.212 ((and 28A.230.215)). Recommendations provided under this subsection may include recommendations for the development or revision of career and technical education course equivalencies established in accordance with RCW 28A.700.080(1)(b) for college-level vocational courses successfully completed by a student while in high school and taken for dual credit;

(b) Identifying and removing barriers that prevent the wider exploration and use of registered preapprenticeship and registered youth apprenticeship opportunities by high school students and opportunities for registered apprenticeships by graduating secondary students; and

(c) Increasing awareness among teachers, counselors, students, parents, principals, school administrators, and the public about the opportunities offered by registered preapprenticeship and registered youth apprenticeship programs.

(3) As used in this section, "institution of higher education" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 28A.600.300.

Sec. 12. RCW 28A.300.750 and 2018 c 177 s 502 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) In accordance with the criteria adopted by the state board of education under subsection (2) of this section, the superintendent of public instruction may grant waivers to school districts from the provisions of RCW 28A.150.200 through 28A.150.220, except as provided in (b) of this subsection, on the basis that such waiver or waivers are necessary to implement successfully a local plan to provide for all students in the district an effective education system that is designed to enhance the educational program for each student. The local plan may include alternative ways to provide effective educational programs for students who experience difficulty with the regular education program.

(b) The state board of education shall have authority to grant waivers from the provisions of RCW 28A.150.220(3)(b) and to grant the waivers set forth in RCW 28A.230.090(((1)(e)(ii)))(2) and 28A.655.180.

(2) The state board of education shall adopt rules establishing the criteria to evaluate the need for a waiver or waivers under this section.

Sec. 13. RCW 28A.305.130 and 2021 c 111 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The purpose of the state board of education is to provide advocacy and strategic oversight of public education; implement a standards-based accountability framework that creates a unified system of increasing levels of support for schools in order to improve student academic achievement; provide leadership in the creation of a system that personalizes education for each student and respects diverse cultures, abilities, and learning styles; and promote achievement of the goals of RCW 28A.150.210. In addition to any other powers and duties as provided by law, the state board of education shall:

(1) Hold regularly scheduled meetings at such time and place within the state as the board shall determine and may hold such special meetings as may be deemed necessary for the transaction of public business;

(2) Form committees as necessary to effectively and efficiently conduct the work of the board;

(3) Seek advice from the public and interested parties regarding the work of the board;

(4) Establish and enforce minimum high school graduation requirements;

(5) For purposes of statewide accountability:

(a) Adopt and revise performance improvement goals in reading, writing, science, and mathematics, by subject and grade level, once assessments in these subjects are required statewide; academic and technical skills, as appropriate, in secondary career and technical education programs; and student attendance, as the board deems appropriate to improve student learning. The goals shall be consistent with student privacy protection provisions of RCW 28A.655.090(7) and shall not conflict with requirements contained in Title I of the federal elementary and secondary education act of 1965, or the requirements of the Carl D. Perkins vocational education act of 1998, each as amended. The goals may be established for all students, economically disadvantaged students, limited English proficient students, students with disabilities, and students who are not meeting academic standards as defined in RCW 28A.165.015, disaggregated as described in RCW 28A.300.042(1) for student-level data. The board may establish school and school district goals addressing high school graduation rates and dropout reduction goals for students in grades seven through ((twelve))12. The board shall adopt the goals by rule. However, before each goal is implemented, the board shall present the goal to the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate for the committees' review and comment in a time frame that will permit the legislature to take statutory action on the goal if such action is deemed warranted by the legislature;

(b)(i)(A) Identify the scores students must achieve in order to meet the standard on the statewide student assessment, and the SAT or the ACT if used to demonstrate career and college readiness under RCW 28A.655.250 (as recodified by this act). The board shall also determine student scores that identify levels of student performance below and beyond the standard. The board shall set such performance standards and levels in consultation with the superintendent of public instruction and after consideration of any recommendations that may be developed by any advisory committees that may be established for this purpose;

(B) To permit the legislature to take any statutory action it deems warranted before modified or newly established scores are implemented, the board shall notify the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate of any scores that are modified or established under (b)(i)(A) of this subsection on or after July 28, 2019. The notifications required by this subsection (((4)))(5)(b)(i)(B) must be provided by November 30th of the year proceeding the beginning of the school year in which the modified or established scores will take effect;

(ii) The legislature intends to continue the implementation of chapter 22, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. when the legislature expressed the intent for the state board of education to identify the student performance standard that demonstrates a student's career and college readiness for the ((eleventh))11th grade consortium-developed assessments. Therefore, by December 1, 2018, the state board of education, in consultation with the superintendent of public instruction, must identify and report to the governor and the education policy and fiscal committees of the legislature on the equivalent student performance standard that a ((tenth))10th grade student would need to achieve on the state assessments to be on track to be career and college ready at the end of the student's high school experience;

(iii) The legislature shall be advised of the initial performance standards and any changes made to the elementary, middle, and high school level performance standards. The board must provide an explanation of and rationale for all initial performance standards and any changes, for all grade levels of the statewide student assessment. If the board changes the performance standards for any grade level or subject, the superintendent of public instruction must recalculate the results from the previous ((ten))10 years of administering that assessment regarding students below, meeting, and beyond the state standard, to the extent that this data is available, and post a comparison of the original and recalculated results on the superintendent's website;

(c) Annually review the assessment reporting system to ensure fairness, accuracy, timeliness, and equity of opportunity, especially with regard to schools with special circumstances and unique populations of students, and a recommendation to the superintendent of public instruction of any improvements needed to the system; and

(d) Include in the biennial report required under RCW 28A.305.035, information on the progress that has been made in achieving goals adopted by the board;

(((5)))(6) Accredit, subject to such accreditation standards and procedures as may be established by the state board of education, all private schools that apply for accreditation, and approve, subject to the provisions of RCW 28A.195.010, private schools carrying out a program for any or all of the grades kindergarten through ((twelve))12. However, no private school may be approved that operates a kindergarten program only and no private school shall be placed upon the list of accredited schools so long as secret societies are knowingly allowed to exist among its students by school officials;

(((6)))(7) Articulate with the institutions of higher education, workforce representatives, and early learning policymakers and providers to coordinate and unify the work of the public school system;

(((7)))(8) Hire an executive director and an administrative assistant to reside in the office of the superintendent of public instruction for administrative purposes. Any other personnel of the board shall be appointed as provided by RCW 28A.300.020. The board may delegate to the executive director by resolution such duties as deemed necessary to efficiently carry on the business of the board including, but not limited to, the authority to employ necessary personnel and the authority to enter into, amend, and terminate contracts on behalf of the board. The executive director, administrative assistant, and all but one of the other personnel of the board are exempt from civil service, together with other staff as now or hereafter designated as exempt in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW; and

(((8)))(9) Adopt a seal that shall be kept in the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. RCW 28A.320.208, 28A.655.250, and 28A.655.260 are each recodified as sections in chapter 28A.230 RCW.

--- END ---