BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 69.41.050 and 2003 c 53 s 325 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) To every box, bottle, jar, tube, or other container of a legend drug, which is dispensed by a practitioner authorized to prescribe legend drugs, there shall be affixed a label bearing the name of the prescriber, complete directions for use, the name of the drug either by the brand or generic name and strength per unit dose, name of patient and date: PROVIDED, That the practitioner may omit the name and dosage of the drug if he or she determines that his or her patient should not have this information and that, if the drug dispensed is a trial sample in its original package and which is labeled in accordance with federal law or regulation, there need be set forth additionally only the name of the issuing practitioner and the name of the patient.

(2)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, at the request of a practitioner employed by the prescribing and dispensing health care facility, the prescription label for abortion medications may include the prescribing and dispensing health care facility name instead of the name of the practitioner.

(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "abortion medications" means substances used in the course of medical treatment intended to induce the termination of a pregnancy including, but not limited to, mifepristone.

(3) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

--- END ---