BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.630 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must establish a summer running start for the trades grant program. The purpose of the grant program is to offer state-recognized apprenticeship preparation program opportunities during the summer months for students to learn skills and gain experience using hand tools and power tools.

(2) In implementing the grant program, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must contract with an organization that will offer state-recognized apprenticeship preparation program opportunities to at least two cohorts of students each year during the summer months. The state-recognized apprenticeship preparation programs must consist of 280 hours of training during the summer including, but not limited to:

(a) Participation in jobsite tours;

(b) Meeting with industry professionals who specialize in state-registered apprenticeship opportunities and professional development opportunities;

(c) Earning industry certifications;

(d) Learning trades math;

(e) Using power and hand tools; and

(f) Completing small build projects.

(3) The organization must provide direct or preferred entry into state-registered apprenticeship programs in the construction industries for students who complete the program requirements.

(4) The organization must provide stipends to students participating in a state-recognized apprenticeship preparation program during the summer months.

(5) Grants awarded under this section must be for an organization with demonstrated experience offering state-recognized apprenticeship preparation program opportunities to cohorts of students in south King county during the summer months. The organization must have experience partnering with local school districts, higher education institutions, labor and union partners, and local contractor partners while providing the state-recognized apprenticeship preparation program opportunities.

(6) By December 1, 2028, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must report findings and recommendations for the grant program, including an assessment of whether the grant program increased entries into state-registered apprenticeship programs in the construction industries and should be expanded. The report required by this subsection must be submitted to the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate in accordance with RCW 43.01.036.

(7) This section expires June 30, 2029.

--- END ---