BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

2023-2025 FISCAL BIENNIUM

GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES—OPERATING

Sec. 101. 2023 c 472 s 104 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Carbon Emissions Reduction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,000,000))

$2,640,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,186,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($3,187,000))

$3,827,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the appropriations in this section are provided solely for road maintenance purposes.

(2) $1,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 54, Laws of 2023 (bridge jumping signs).

(3) $2,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the replacement of agency vehicles and equipment with electric alternatives. In carrying out this subsection, the commission shall cooperate and provide assistance, as requested, in the joint transportation committee's development of program delivery evaluation tools and methodologies provided under section 204 ((of this act)), chapter 472, Laws of 2023 for programs that receive funding from the carbon emissions reduction account. The commission, with the assistance of designated staff in the Washington state department of transportation, must register for the clean fuels credit program and start tracking revenue generation pursuant to chapter 70A.535 RCW for investments funded in an omnibus transportation appropriations act.

(4) $140,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation is provided solely for replacement electric vehicles. The amount provided in this subsection must initially be placed in unallotted status and may not be spent prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, this amount shall lapse.

(5) $500,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation is provided solely for a comprehensive strategy for publicly accessible electric vehicle charging, which access infrastructure capacity at state parks. The amount provided in this subsection must initially be placed in unallotted status and may not be spent prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, this amount shall lapse.

Sec. 102. 2023 c 472 s 105 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,462,000))

$1,474,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103. A new section is added to 2023 c 472 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$125,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to conduct: (1) An independent, nonpartisan assessment of the passenger and air cargo forecasts cited in the Puget Sound regional council regional aviation baseline study, including an evaluation of the underlying data, assumptions, methodologies, and the calculation of the level of uncertainty around the forecast; and (2) a comprehensive literature review of national and international strategies to reduce demand for air travel, including diverting it to other modes and whether such diversion avoids net environmental impacts to overburdened communities and vulnerable populations. The legislature intends that the Washington state institute for public policy will submit a report with findings to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 31, 2025.

Sec. 104. 2023 c 472 s 108 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Carbon Emissions Reduction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$5,000,000

Electric Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$220,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$5,220,000

The ((appropriation))appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $220,000 of the electric vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely to the department to commission an independent study, based on the findings of the transportation electrification strategy authorized under RCW 43.392.040, of costs of installation, maintenance, and operation of electrical distribution infrastructure on the utility's side of the meter to commercial customers installing electric vehicle supply equipment. The department shall gather data from at least five electric utilities serving retail customers in the state for purposes of completing the study. The department shall submit a report of study findings and an explanation of how those findings will support implementation of the transportation electrification strategy authorized under RCW 43.392.040 to the governor and appropriate legislative committees by November 1, 2024.

(2) $5,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation is provided solely for a tribal electric boat grant program. Federally recognized tribes, tribal enterprises, and tribal members are eligible to apply for grant funds for the purchase or conversion of electric motors and engines. The amount provided in this subsection must initially be placed in unallotted status and may not be spent prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, this amount shall lapse.

(3) $5,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation is provided solely for a nontribal electric boat grant program. Residents of counties that border the Pacific Ocean or the Columbia River are eligible to apply for grant funds for the purchase or conversion of electric motors and engines. The amount provided in this subsection must initially be placed in unallotted status and may not be spent prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, this amount shall lapse.

Sec. 105. 2023 c 472 s 109 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE BOARD OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERS

Pilotage Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,574,000))

$3,578,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The board of pilotage commissioners shall file the annual report to the governor and chairs of the transportation committees required under RCW 88.16.035(1)(f) by September 1, 2023, and annually thereafter. The report must include the continuation of policies and procedures necessary to increase the diversity of pilots, trainees, and applicants, including a diversity action plan. The diversity action plan must articulate a comprehensive vision of the board's diversity goals and the steps it will take to reach those goals.

(2) $232,000 of the pilotage account—state appropriation is for a temporary environmental planner position to support rule making to fulfill the requirements of chapter 289, Laws of 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106. A new section is added to 2023 c 472 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Carbon Emissions Reduction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$15,715,000

Model Toxics Control Operating Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$15,715,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
$31,430,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $15,715,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation and $15,715,000 of the model toxics control operating account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to provide grants to transition from diesel school buses and other student transport vehicles to zero emission vehicles, and for the necessary fueling infrastructure needed for zero emission student transportation. The department must prioritize school districts serving tribes and vulnerable populations in overburdened communities as defined under RCW 70A.02.010. Up to $1,430,000 of the appropriation in this section is for technical assistance and grant administration. The amounts provided in this subsection from the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation must initially be placed in unallotted status and may not be spent prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, these amounts shall lapse.

(2) In carrying out this section, the department shall cooperate and provide assistance, as requested, in the joint transportation committee's development of program delivery evaluation tools and methodologies provided under section 204, chapter 472, Laws of 2023 for programs that receive funding from the carbon emissions reduction account.

Sec. 107. 2023 c 472 s 114 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Carbon Emissions Reduction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($6,000,000))

$34,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($6,000,000))(a) $20,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation is provided solely for zero emission electric vehicle supply equipment infrastructure at facilities to accommodate charging station installations. The electric vehicle charging equipment ((must allow for the collection of usage data and)) must be coordinated with the state efficiency and environmental performance program. The department must prioritize locations based on state efficiency and environmental performance location priorities and where zero emission fleet vehicles are located or are scheduled to be purchased. $14,000,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection from the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation must initially be placed in unallotted status and may not be spent prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, these amounts shall lapse.

(((2)))(b) The department must report when and where the equipment was installed((, usage data at each charging station,)) and the state agencies and facilities that benefit from the installation of the charging station to the fiscal committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025, with an interim report due January 2, 2024. The department shall collaborate with the interagency electric vehicle coordinating council to implement this section and must work to meet benchmarks established in chapter 182, Laws of 2022 (transportation resources).

(2) $14,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to acquire battery electric utility vehicles. The department may also provide funding for this purpose through interagency agreements with state agencies that have independently managed fleets. The department and agencies that receive funding must pursue federal tax credits for every battery electric vehicle procured. Funds from resulting tax credits must be returned to the department of enterprise services and be deposited into the enterprise services account. The amount provided in this subsection must initially be placed in unallotted status and may not be spent prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, this amount shall lapse.

(3) In carrying out this section, the department shall cooperate and provide assistance, as requested, in the joint transportation committee's development of program delivery evaluation tools and methodologies provided under section 204 ((of this act)), chapter 472, Laws of 2023 for programs that receive funding from the carbon emissions reduction account.

(4) The department, with the assistance of designated staff in the Washington state department of transportation, must register for the clean fuels credit program and start tracking revenue generation pursuant to chapter 70A.535 RCW for investments funded in an omnibus transportation appropriations act.

(5) The department is required to provide a report to the transportation committees of the legislature that estimates current biennial and future carbon reduction impacts resulting from zero-emission electric vehicles and supply equipment infrastructure funded in this section by June 30, 2025.

(End of part)

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES—OPERATING

Sec. 201. 2023 c 472 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,252,000))

$5,795,000

Highway Safety Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($27,735,000))

$35,750,000

Highway Safety Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$60,000

Cooper Jones Active Transportation Safety Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$636,000

School Zone Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$850,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($34,533,000))

$43,091,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Within existing resources, the commission must examine national safety reports and recommendations on alcohol and drug impaired driving and report to the transportation committees of the legislature, by December 15, 2023, any recommendations for legislative or policy changes to improve traffic safety in Washington state.

(2)(a) $235,500 of the Cooper Jones active transportation safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the commission to conduct research pertaining to the issue of street lighting and safety, including a public input component and learning from counties, cities, the state, and other impacted entities. Research may include the following:

(i) Interviewing additional local and regional roads departments, water-sewer districts, and other utility services to gather a holistic data set or further input on which authority assumes primary responsibility for street illumination in various underserved areas throughout the state;

(ii) Systematically soliciting information from communities with poor street illumination and lighting to gather input as to whether this is an issue the community would like to see improved;

(iii) Conferring with regional and state-level police, fire, and emergency medical services to assess and document potential delays in emergency response times due to poor street illumination;

(iv) Further assessing the impact of using LED lights in roadway and pedestrian scale lighting in reducing carbon emissions and light pollution throughout the United States; and

(v) Subject to more in-depth findings, convening a meeting with appropriate state, regional, and local stakeholders and community partners.

(b) The commission must report research results and provide any recommendations for legislative or policy action to the transportation committees of the legislature by January 1, 2025.

(3) Within existing resources, the commission, through the Cooper Jones active transportation safety council, must prioritize the review of pedestrian, bicyclist, or nonmotorist fatality and serious injury review when the victim is a member of a federally recognized tribe. Consistent with RCW 43.59.156(5), the commission may recommend any policy or legislative changes to improve traffic safety for tribes through such review.

(4) Within existing resources, the commission must review and report to the transportation committees of the legislature, by December 15, 2023, on strategies and technologies used in other states to prevent and respond to wrong-way driving crashes.

(5) The Washington traffic safety commission shall coordinate with each city that implements a pilot program as authorized in RCW 46.63.170(6) to provide the transportation committees of the legislature with the following information by June 30, 2025:

(a) The number of warnings and infractions issued to first-time violators under the pilot program;

(b) The number of warnings and infractions issued to the registered owners of vehicles that are not registered with an address located in the city conducting the pilot program; and

(c) The frequency with which warnings and infractions are issued on weekdays versus weekend days.

(6) $50,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 471, Laws of 2023 (negligent driving). If chapter 471, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(7) The Washington traffic safety commission may oversee a pilot program in up to three cities implementing the use of automated vehicle noise enforcement cameras in zones that have been designated by ordinance as "Stay Out of Areas of Racing."

(a) Any programs authorized by the commission must be authorized by December 31, 2024.

(b) If a city has established an authorized automated vehicle noise enforcement camera pilot program under this section, the compensation paid to the manufacturer or vendor of the equipment used must be based upon the value of the equipment and services provided or rendered in support of the system.

(c) Any city administering a pilot program overseen by the traffic safety commission shall use the following guidelines to administer the program:

(i) Automated vehicle noise enforcement camera may record photographs or audio of the vehicle and vehicle license plate only while a violation is occurring. The picture must not reveal the face of the driver or of passengers in the vehicle;

(ii) The law enforcement agency of the city or county government shall install two signs facing opposite directions within 200 feet, or otherwise consistent with the uniform manual on traffic control devices, where the automated vehicle noise enforcement camera is used that state "Street Racing Noise Pilot Program in Progress";

(iii) Cities testing the use of automated vehicle noise enforcement cameras must post information on the city website and notify local media outlets indicating the zones in which the automated vehicle noise enforcement cameras will be used;

(iv) A city may only issue a warning notice with no penalty for a violation detected by automated vehicle noise enforcement cameras in a Stay Out of Areas of Racing zone. Warning notices must be mailed to the registered owner of a vehicle within 14 days of the detected violation;

(v) A violation detected through the use of automated vehicle noise enforcement cameras is not part of the registered owner's driving record under RCW 46.52.101 and 46.52.120;

(vi) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all photographs, videos, microphotographs, audio recordings, or electronic images prepared under this subsection (7) are for the exclusive use of law enforcement in the discharge of duties under this section and are not open to the public and may not be used in a court in a pending action or proceeding. No photograph, microphotograph, audio recording, or electronic image may be used for any purpose other than the issuance of warnings for violations under this section or retained longer than necessary to issue a warning notice as required under this subsection (7); and

(vii) By June 30, 2025, the participating cities shall provide a report to the commission and appropriate committees of the legislature regarding the use, public acceptance, outcomes, warnings issued, data retention and use, and other relevant issues regarding automated vehicle noise enforcement cameras demonstrated by the pilot projects.

Sec. 202. 2023 c 472 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD

Rural Arterial Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,405,000))

$1,616,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,005,000))

$3,527,000

County Arterial Preservation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,808,000))

$1,841,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($7,218,000))

$6,984,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Within appropriated funds, the county road administration board may opt in as provided under RCW 70A.02.030 to assume all of the substantive and procedural requirements of covered agencies under chapter 70A.02 RCW. The board shall include in its 2023 and 2024 annual reports to the legislature a progress report on opting into the healthy environment for all act and a status report on diversity, equity, and inclusion within the board's jurisdiction.

Sec. 203. 2023 c 472 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD

Transportation Improvement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,798,000))

$4,823,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: Within appropriated funds, the transportation improvement board may opt in as provided under RCW 70A.02.030 to assume all of the substantive and procedural requirements of covered agencies under chapter 70A.02 RCW. The board shall include in its 2023 and 2024 annual reports to the legislature a progress report on opting into the healthy environment for all act and a status report on diversity, equity, and inclusion within the board's jurisdiction.

Sec. 204. 2023 c 472 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE JOINT TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE

Carbon Emissions Reduction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,000,000))

$3,477,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($125,000))

$302,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,270,000))

$4,276,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$500,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($7,395,000))

$8,555,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $300,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is for the joint transportation committee, from amounts set aside out of statewide fuel taxes distributed to cities according to RCW 46.68.110(2), to convene a study of a statewide retail delivery fee on orders of taxable retail items delivered by motor vehicles within the state. The study must:

(i) Determine the annual revenue generation potential of a range of fee amounts;

(ii) Examine options for revenue distributions to state and local governments based upon total deliveries, lane miles, or other factors;

(iii) Estimate total implementation costs, including start-up and ongoing administrative costs; and

(iv) Evaluate the potential impacts to consumers, including consideration of low-income households and vulnerable populations and potential impacts to businesses.

(b) The study should document and evaluate similar programs adopted in other states. The joint transportation committee must submit a report on the study to the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2024.

(2)(a) $400,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is for the joint transportation committee, in collaboration with the department of transportation, to convene a work group to study and recommend a new statutory framework for the department's public-private partnership program. The committee may contract with a third-party consultant for work group support and drafting the new statutory framework.

(b)(i) The work group must consist of, but is not limited to, the following members:

(A) The secretary of transportation or their designee;

(B) Joint transportation committee executive committee members or their designees;

(C) The state treasurer or the state treasurer's designee;

(D) A representative of a national nonprofit organization specializing in public-private partnership program development;

(E) A representative of the construction trades; and

(F) A representative from an organization representing general contractors.

(ii) The work group must also consult with the Washington state transportation commission and the department of commerce.

(c)(i) The work group must review the 2012 joint transportation committee's "Evaluation of Public-Private Partnerships" study, consisting of an evaluation of the recommendations for replacing chapter 47.29 RCW and development of a process for implementing public-private partnerships that serve the defined public interest, including, but not limited to:

(A) Protecting the state's ability to retain public ownership of assets constructed or managed under a public-private partnership contract;

(B) Allowing for the most transparency during the negotiation of terms of a public-private partnership agreement; and

(C) Addressing the state's ability to oversee the private entity's management of the asset.

(ii)(A) The work group must identify any barriers to the implementation of funding models that best protect the public interest, including statutory and constitutional barriers.

(B) The work group may also evaluate public-private partnership opportunities for required fish passage and culvert work on state highways, for the construction of, replacement of, or commercial retail options within Washington state ferries' terminals, and for other projects as determined by the work group.

(iii) The work group must update the 2012 recommendations and devise an implementation plan for the state.

(d) The work group must submit a preliminary report, including any recommendations or draft legislation, to the office of the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 15, 2023. The work group must submit a final report with draft legislation to the office of the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by July 1, 2024.

(((4)))(3) $300,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is for the joint transportation committee, from amounts set aside out of statewide fuel taxes distributed to cities according to RCW 46.68.110(2), to contract with the municipal research and services center to convene a department of transportation-local government partnership work group to create a procedure in which the department of transportation can partner with a local jurisdiction to perform preservation and maintenance and construct projects on state highways.

(a) The work group must consist of, but is not limited to, the following members:

(i) One representative from a city with a population of more than 5,000 and fewer than 50,000;

(ii) One representative from a city with a population of more than 50,000;

(iii) One representative from a county with a population of more than 100,000 and fewer than 400,000;

(iv) One representative from a county with a population of more than 400,000;

(v) At least one representative of a public port;

(vi) A representative from the county road administration board;

(vii) A representative of the transportation improvement board;

(viii) At least one representative from the department of transportation's local programs division;

(ix) At least two representatives from the department of transportation with expertise in procurement and legal services; and

(x) At least one member from the house of representatives transportation committee and at least one member from the senate transportation committee.

(b) Of the members described in (a) of this subsection, at least one of the city representatives and one of the county representatives must have public works contracting experience, and at least one of the city representatives and one of the county representatives must have public works project management experience.

(c) The work group must make recommendations of how the department of transportation could better work in partnership with local jurisdictions to ensure that roadway construction projects can be performed when funds are made available in the omnibus transportation appropriations act even if the department of transportation does not have the capacity to be the project manager on a project and a local jurisdiction is ready, willing, and able to implement the project within the time frames envisioned in the omnibus transportation appropriations act. In developing its recommendations, the work group must consider, at a minimum:

(i) Differing roadway and construction standards between state and local agencies;

(ii) Revenue, reimbursement, and financial agreements between state and local agencies;

(iii) Differing procurement processes between state and local agencies;

(iv) Liability; and

(v) Other issues as determined by the work group.

(d) The work group must submit a preliminary report, including any recommendations, to the office of the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 15, 2023. The work group must submit a final report to the office of the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by July 1, 2024.

(((5)))(4)(a) $2,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to oversee:

(i) The design of an infrastructure and incentive strategy to drive the purchase and use of zero emission medium and heavy duty vehicles, as well as cargo handling and off-road equipment, in the state including, but not limited to, programs for tractor trucks, box trucks, drayage trucks, refuse trucks, step and panel vans, heavy and medium-duty buses, school buses, on and off-road terminal tractors, transport refrigeration units, forklifts, container handling equipment, airport cargo loaders, and railcar movers; and

(ii) A review of the passenger vehicle tax incentive in current law and evaluation of its utility, to include possible modification of the criteria for eligibility and tax incentive amount maximums, as applicable.

(b) Design development must include recommendations for encouraging vehicle conversions for smaller commercial vehicle fleets and owner-operators of commercial vehicles, as well as tools for facilitating carbon emission reductions to benefit vulnerable populations and overburdened communities. Infrastructure and incentive programs recommended may include, but are not limited to, grant, rebate, tax incentive, and financing assistance programs.

(c) Consultation with legislative members identified by the chair and ranking members of the transportation committees of the legislature throughout design of the infrastructure and incentive strategy is required. A report is due to the transportation committees of the legislature by January 2, 2024.

(((6)))(5) $125,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and $125,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are for the joint transportation committee to evaluate potential options and make recommendations for a statewide household travel survey and additional analytical capacity regarding transportation research.

(a) The recommendation on the statewide household travel survey must be based on how well a statewide survey investment would: Address policy questions related to household travel; address gaps between separate regional and local transportation models; and create a dataset to allow both for analysis and response to policymakers' questions relating to household travel and for transportation modeling and development. In evaluating potential survey options, the committee shall consider opportunities for the state to partner and expand on developed established household travel surveys, including surveys conducted at both the Puget Sound regional council and the federal highway administration. In its recommendation, the committee shall outline the process required for a statewide survey, including the costs and timing of each option.

(b) The committee shall recommend an agency or agencies to perform ongoing analysis of a statewide household travel survey and other transportation research. The committee shall consider the ability of an agency or agencies to meet shorter timeline policy needs, as well as longer timeline research projects. The recommendation must include the timing and costs associated with the development of such analytical capacity.

(((7)))(6) $1,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to oversee the development of tools and methodologies to assist in program delivery evaluation for programs that receive appropriations from the carbon emissions reduction account. Program delivery evaluation must include carbon emissions reduction estimates by program and by unit of time, program cost per unit of emission reduction, quantified benefits to vulnerable populations and overburdened communities by program cost, any additional appropriate qualitative and quantitative metrics, and actionable recommendations for improvements in program delivery. A report is due to the transportation committees of the legislature by October 1, 2024.

(((8)))(7) $500,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to engage an independent review team to work in coordination with the Washington state department of transportation's analysis, funded in section 217(((11) of this act))(10), chapter 472, Laws of 2023, of highway, road, and freight rail transportation needs, options, and impacts from shifting the movement of freight and goods that currently move by barge through the lower Snake river dams to highways, other roads, and rail.

(a) The department shall include the independent review team in all phases of the analysis to enable the team to develop an independent assessment of the analysis, assumptions, stakeholder engagement, and cost and impact estimates. Summary findings from the independent assessment must be provided to the department, the governor's office, and the transportation committees of the legislature on a quarterly basis, with ((a final))an end of biennium report due to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025.

(b) The independent review team must conduct an independent stakeholder engagement effort. The river transportation work group must be formed to provide data and guidance to the independent review team for the independent stakeholder engagement effort. The river transportation work group must be made up of stakeholders, including representatives of farming and agricultural production, ((federally recognized tribes and))the fishing industry, tug and barge operators, shippers and receivers, public ports, railroad operators, cruise lines, the federal highway administration, and the army corps of engineers. Consultations with federally recognized tribes should also be carried out in coordination with the Washington state department of transportation.

(c) The independent review team shall make regular presentations to the joint transportation committee and, by request, to the transportation committees of the legislature.

(((9)))(8) The joint transportation committee shall also convene a work group that includes, but is not limited to, the executive committee of the joint transportation committee, the office of financial management, the Washington state department of transportation, and the Washington state treasurer's office to develop recommendations, by October 15, 2023, to meet the challenge of identifying an achievable delivery schedule for completing transportation projects across the state.

(9) $477,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to conduct a study of the impacts of implementing California's emissions standards for ocean-going vessels at berth in Titles 13 and 17 of the California Code of Regulations in Washington. The study must include estimates of greenhouse gas emissions reductions, criteria air pollutant reductions, potential labor impacts, potential impacts on shipping costs and port competitiveness, and shore power infrastructure needs and costs. The joint transportation committee must, at a minimum, coordinate with the department of ecology, department of transportation, representatives from Washington ports, impacted labor unions, and environmental organizations. The joint transportation committee must report to the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025. The amount provided in this subsection must initially be placed in unallotted status and may not be spent prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, this amount shall lapse.

(10)(a) $300,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is for the joint transportation committee to convene a work group in advance of the 75th anniversary of the Washington state ferries on June 1, 2026, to review Washington state ferry funding requirements, options to increase dedicated funding sources for the ferry system and gather feedback about the impacts of the ferry system on the communities it serves.

(b) The work group must consist of, but is not limited to, joint transportation committee executive committee members or their designees, a representative of the office of financial management, representatives of labor, and representatives of ferry-served communities. The executive committee of the joint transportation committee must appoint the members representing the house of representatives and senate, labor unions, and ferry dependent communities. The work group must also consult with the Washington state ferries.

(c) The work group must provide a status report and preliminary findings to the office of the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by January 13, 2025. The legislature intends that a final report will be submitted by June 1, 2026.

(11) $200,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is for an economic impact study of ferry service on the communities served. The study must examine the impacts on a statewide and systemwide basis, on all 10 routes of service provided by the Washington state ferries. The study must include a review of key factors that impact the overall economy of both ferry-served communities and the state economy, which may include impacts on employment, housing, health care costs and access, emergency response, climate resilience, tourism, and small business. Preliminary results must be made available to the work group created in subsection (10) of this section. A final report must be submitted to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 1, 2025.

Sec. 205. 2023 c 472 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,029,000))

$3,543,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$150,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$200,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$288,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$179,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$167,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($4,013,000))

$4,527,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $125,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation and $125,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation are provided solely for the commission to update the statewide transportation plan required under RCW 47.01.071(4). The update process must be informed by guidance from a steering committee comprised of the commission, the joint transportation committee's executive committee, the governor's office, the secretary of the department of transportation, and representatives of metropolitan and regional transportation planning organizations. As part of the update process, the commission shall undertake specific actions in the following order:

(a) Conduct stakeholder outreach, gathering input, and framing the outreach around the current plan's policy construct and high level priorities, the 2022 transportation revenue package, and recently enacted significant policy legislation;

(b) Report outreach findings and results to the joint transportation committee for review and input;

(c) Restructure the plan to (i) primarily focus on high level policy priorities within the six transportation policy goals under RCW 47.04.280 and (ii) align policies, strategies, and objectives with the interests of stakeholders and legislators;

(d) Gather further input from stakeholders and the joint transportation committee on the restructured plan's format and content; and

(e) Finalize the updated plan, based upon input from stakeholders and the joint transportation committee.

(2) The legislature finds that the current balance of and projected revenues into the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account are sufficient to meet financial obligations during fiscal years 2024 and 2025.

(3) Within the parameters established under RCW 47.56.880, the commission shall review toll revenue performance on the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 corridor and adjust Interstate 405 tolls as appropriate to increase toll revenue to provide sufficient funds for payments of future debt pursuant to RCW 47.10.896 and to support improvements to the corridor. The commission shall consider adjusting maximum toll rates, minimum toll rates, and time-of-day rates, and restricting direct access ramps to transit and HOV vehicles only, or any combination thereof, in setting tolls to increase toll revenue. The commission is encouraged to make any adjustments to toll rates in coordination with the planned expansion of express toll lanes between the cities of Renton and Bellevue.

(4) $500,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the commission to conduct a route jurisdiction study aimed at assessing the current state highway inventory and local roadway designations to determine if changes are needed in jurisdictional assignment between the state, county, and city road systems. The study must also review current criteria used to define the state highway system to determine if such criteria continue to be applicable. The commission shall submit a report of study findings and recommendations to the transportation committees of the legislature by July 1, 2025.

(5) The commission may coordinate with the department of transportation to jointly seek federal funds available through the federal strategic innovations in revenue collection grant program, applying toll credits for meeting match requirements. The commission must provide draft applications for federal grant opportunities to the chairs and ranking members of the transportation committees of the legislature for review and comment prior to submission.

(6) The transportation commission shall conduct an assessment aimed at identifying approaches to streamlining the current rule-making process for setting toll rates and policies for eligible toll facilities, while maintaining public access and providing opportunities to provide input on proposals. The intent of the assessment is to identify rule-making approaches that support the state's ability to set toll rates and policies in a timely and efficient manner, so that the state can meet anticipated funding obligations. This assessment should include a review of rate-setting processes used by toll authorities in other states. The transportation commission shall provide recommendations to the transportation committees of the legislature by July 31, 2024.

(7) The commission shall provide regular updates on the status of ongoing coordination with the state of Oregon on any bistate agreements regarding the mutual or joint setting, adjustment, and review of toll rates and exemptions. Prior to finalizing any such agreement, the commission shall provide a draft of the agreement to the transportation committees of the legislature for review and input. Additionally, the commission shall advise on the status of any bistate agreements to the joint transportation committee beginning in September 2023 and quarterly thereafter until any agreements are finalized.

(8) $200,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the commission to carry out a study assessing approaches to increasing safety and compliance of high occupancy vehicle lanes, express toll lanes, tolled facilities, and construction zones, facilitated by advanced technologies.

(a) The approaches assessed must, at a minimum, focus on advanced roadside technologies that: Are able to operate independently without connection to the department of transportation's existing communication systems and utilities; have a limited physical footprint that does not use over-roadway infrastructure; and have a 95 percent or greater license plate reading accuracy.

(b) The study must review current laws, including assessing underlying policies related to prohibitions on program cost coverage coming from infraction or other revenues generated by advanced technology systems, and identify provisions needed to enable a future technology-based safety and compliance program.

(c) The commission shall submit an interim report to the transportation committees of the legislature by January 10, 2024, that, at a minimum, provides an initial assessment of the viability of deploying a system into operation. A final report of findings and recommendations must be submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2024.

(9) $75,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the commission to carry out an initial assessment and scoping effort to determine the feasibility of creating a future west coast transportation network plan. This plan would serve to proactively identify and coordinate improvements and investments across the west coast states to freight rail, passenger rail, highways, and air transportation. The intent for the plan is to leverage and align west coast efforts to reduce our collective carbon footprint, improve freight and passenger mobility, and strengthen west coast resiliency. This effort must be carried out in partnership with the Oregon and California transportation commissions and the state department of transportations from each state, and must consider, but not be limited to:

(a) Current state activities, investments, and plans that support the establishment of clean transportation in the air, on the highways, and on rail lines moving freight and passengers;

(b) Currently identified resiliency risks along the west coast and existing strategic plans and investments that could inform a future west coast unified plan; and

(c) Incorporation of work from the statewide transportation policy plan.

(10)(a) $250,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the commission to:

(i) Carry out engagement with Washington stakeholders on the results of the recently completed Forward Drive research program to inform next steps on road usage charging;

(ii) Develop updated revenue forecasts for motor fuel taxes and road usage charging; and

(iii) Consult with other states to develop concepts for future testing of multistate road usage charging.

(b) The commission is required to submit a report of findings and recommendations to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.

(11)(a) $250,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the commission to oversee a study evaluating possible approaches for addressing the impacts of licensed noncommercial vehicles that are of heavier weight and greater size than a standard vehicle and that therefore represent a likely increased risk of injury from collisions to pedestrians and other vulnerable roadway users. The evaluation shall include an assessment of:

(i) Methodologies for defining particular categories of vehicles and for the identification of specific vehicles to which policy interventions could apply, possible policy interventions steps necessary for implementation of such policies, and consideration of whether after-market vehicle modifications could be included;

(ii) Options for addressing the impacts of such vehicles including, but not limited to, applying differentiated fees based upon size and weight of a vehicle, such as a road usage charge at a higher per mile charge as part of a potential future road usage charge system, or a graduated vehicle weight fee;

(iii) For revenue focused policies, methods to calculate the additional amounts to assess based upon identified vehicle characteristics that include, but are not limited to, vehicle weight and size;

(iv) Options at the point of sale for communicating the additional charges to be paid or policies to be implemented on the identified vehicles and the reasons for the additional charges; and

(v) Possible uses for the additional revenue raised, including options to address any differential adverse impacts resulting from the identified vehicles use of the transportation system.

(b) The commission shall provide a status report that includes preliminary recommendations for collecting additional revenue or applying other policies for licensed noncommercial vehicles that are of heavier weight and greater size than a standard vehicle to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024, and shall provide a final report to the transportation committees of the legislature by May 1, 2025.

Sec. 206. 2023 c 472 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$400,000

Freight Mobility Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,591,000))

$1,596,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,991,000))

$1,996,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Within appropriated funds, the freight mobility strategic investment board may opt in as provided under RCW 70A.02.030 to assume all of the substantive and procedural requirements of covered agencies under chapter 70A.02 RCW. The board shall include in its 2023 and 2024 annual reports to the legislature a progress report on opting into the healthy environment for all act and a status report on diversity, equity, and inclusion within the board's jurisdiction.

(2) The board shall on an annual basis provide a status update on project delivery, including information on project timeline, cost, and budgeted cash flow over time to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature on the delivery of the freight mobility strategic investment projects on LEAP Transportation Document ((2023-2))2024-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 21, 2023))February 18, 2024.

(3) $731,000 of the freight mobility investment account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 167, Laws of 2023 (freight mobility priorities). If chapter 167, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(4) $400,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the board, in consultation with the department of transportation, to develop an implementation plan for specific truck parking solutions. It is the intent of the legislature for the board to identify specific sites to increase truck parking capacity in the near term, as well as to recommend other steps that can be taken in the 2024 and 2025 legislative sessions to increase truck parking capacity. The board must provide a status report that includes funding recommendations for the 2024 legislative session to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023, and a final report that includes detailed findings on additional specific sites and specific actions recommended to expand truck parking capacity in the near term to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.

Sec. 207. 2023 c 472 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$43,000

State Patrol Highway Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($610,711,000))

$633,854,000

State Patrol Highway Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($20,340,000))

$19,368,000

State Patrol Highway Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,594,000))

$4,595,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,447,000))

$1,737,000

Ignition Interlock Device Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,959,000))

$1,963,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$316,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$89,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$275,000

I-405 and SR 167 Express Toll Lanes Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,895,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($642,669,000))

$665,135,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $580,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the operation of and administrative support to the license investigation unit to enforce vehicle registration laws in southwestern Washington. The Washington state patrol, in consultation with the department of revenue, shall maintain a running estimate of the additional vehicle registration fees, sales and use taxes, and local vehicle fees remitted to the state pursuant to activity conducted by the license investigation unit. Beginning October 1, 2023, and semiannually thereafter, the Washington state patrol shall submit a report detailing the additional revenue amounts generated since July 1, 2023, to the director of the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. At the end of the fiscal quarter in which it is estimated that more than $625,000 in state sales and use taxes have been remitted to the state since July 1, 2023, the Washington state patrol shall notify the state treasurer and the state treasurer shall transfer funds pursuant to section 406 ((of this act)), chapter 472, Laws of 2023.

(2) Washington state patrol officers engaged in off-duty uniformed employment providing traffic control services to the department of transportation or other state agencies may use state patrol vehicles for the purpose of that employment, subject to guidelines adopted by the chief of the Washington state patrol. The Washington state patrol must be reimbursed for the use of the vehicle at the prevailing state employee rate for mileage and hours of usage, subject to guidelines developed by the chief of the Washington state patrol.

(3)(a) By December 1st of each year during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the Washington state patrol must report to the transportation committees of the legislature on the status of recruitment and retention activities as follows:

(i) A summary of recruitment and retention strategies;

(ii) The number of transportation funded staff vacancies by major category;

(iii) The number of applicants for each of the positions by these categories;

(iv) The composition of workforce;

(v) Other relevant outcome measures with comparative information with recent comparable months in prior years; and

(vi) Activities related to the implementation of the agency's workforce diversity plan, including short-term and long-term, specific comprehensive outreach, and recruitment strategies to increase populations underrepresented within both commissioned and noncommissioned employee groups.

(b) During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the office of financial management, with assistance of the Washington state patrol, must conduct two surveys regarding the competitiveness with law enforcement agencies within the boundaries of the state of Washington pursuant to RCW 43.43.380, with the first survey being informational regarding the change since the last survey was conducted and the second survey used as part of the collective bargaining process. Prior to the 2024 legislative session, the office of financial management, with assistance of the Washington state patrol, must also provide comparison information regarding recruitment bonus amounts currently being offered by local law enforcement agencies in the state.

(4)(a) $6,575,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the land mobile radio system replacement, upgrade, and other related activities.

(b) Beginning January 1, 2024, the Washington state patrol must report semiannually to the office of the chief information officer on the progress related to the projects and activities associated with the land mobile radio system, including the governance structure, outcomes achieved in the prior six-month time period, and how the activities are being managed holistically as recommended by the office of the chief information officer. At the time of submittal to the office of the chief information officer, the report must be transmitted to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature.

(((6)))(5) $2,688,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for enhancing the state patrol's diversity, equity, and inclusion program, a community engagement program to improve relationships with historically underrepresented communities and to recruit and retain a diverse workforce, and contracting with an external psychologist to perform exams. The state patrol will work with the governor's office of equity and meet all reporting requirements and responsibilities pursuant to RCW 43.06D.060. Funds provided for the community engagement program must ensure engagement with communities throughout the state.

(((7)))(6)(a) $10,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Washington state patrol to administer a pilot program that implements a yellow alert system notifying the public when a hit-and-run accident resulting in a fatality or substantial bodily harm has occurred and been reported to the state patrol or other local law enforcement entity. The Washington state patrol must post on traffic message boards or share on public communication systems any identifying information acquired including, but not limited to, a complete or partial license plate number or a description of the vehicle. Each alert must be posted or shared as such for at least 24 hours.

(b) The Washington state patrol must report the following to the transportation committees of the legislature annually until June 30, 2025:

(i) The number of yellow alerts received;

(ii) The number of arrests made from accidents reported on the yellow alert system;

(iii) The number of hit-and-run accidents resulting in a fatality or substantial bodily harm statewide;

(iv) The number of arrests made from accidents described under (b)(iii) of this subsection; and

(v) The number of hit-and-run accidents reported statewide.

(c) The Washington state patrol must also report on the efficacy of the program and recommend in its final report if the pilot program should continue or be enacted on a permanent basis and implemented statewide, based on the results of the report.

(((8)))(7)(a) (($2,608,000))$2,414,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for administrative costs, advertising, outreach, and bonus payments associated with developing and implementing a state trooper expedited recruitment incentive program for the purpose of recruiting and filling vacant trooper positions in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium. The legislature is committed to continuing the state trooper expedited recruitment incentive program until the vacancy levels are significantly reduced from current levels. The recruitment, advertising, and outreach associated with this program must continue efforts to create a more diverse workforce and must also provide an accelerated pathway for joining the state patrol for high quality individuals who have previously been employed as a general authority peace officer.

(b) The state trooper expedited recruitment incentive program established by the Washington state patrol must include:

(i) Thorough hiring procedures to ensure that only the highest quality candidates are selected as cadets and as lateral hires, including extensive review of past law enforcement employment history through extensive reference checks, Brady list identification, and any other issues that may impact the performance, credibility, and integrity of the individual.

(ii) An accelerated training program for lateral hires from other agencies that recognizes the knowledge and experience of candidates previously employed in law enforcement; and

(iii) A sign-on bonus for each trooper hired through the expedited recruitment incentive program as follows:

(A) $5,000 for each cadet after completion of the Washington state patrol academy;

(B) $5,000 for each successful graduating cadet after completion of a one-year probation period;

(C) $8,000 for each lateral hire after completion of the accelerated training program for lateral hires;

(D) $6,000 for each lateral hire after completion of a one-year probation period; and

(E) $6,000 for each lateral hire after completion of two years of service.

(c) The expenditure on the state trooper expedited recruitment incentive program is contingent upon execution of an appropriate memorandum of understanding between the governor or the governor's designee and the exclusive bargaining representative, consistent with the terms of this section. Expenditures and eligibility for the state trooper expedited recruitment incentive program established in this section are subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose.

(d) For the purposes of this subsection:

(i) "Cadet" means a person employed for the express purpose of receiving the on-the-job training required for attendance at the Washington state patrol academy and for becoming a commissioned trooper.

(ii) "Lateral hire" means an eligible employee previously employed as a general authority peace officer.

(((9)))(8) $3,896,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 17, Laws of 2023 (speed safety cameras). If chapter 17, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((10)))(9) $500,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for bonuses and other recruitment and retention-related compensation adjustments for communication officers and other noncommissioned staff of the Washington state patrol who are covered by a collective bargaining agreement. Funding in this subsection must first be used for targeted adjustments for communication officers. Remaining amounts may be used for compensation adjustments for other noncommissioned staff. Funding provided in this subsection is contingent upon the governor or the governor's designee reaching an appropriate memorandum of understanding with the exclusive bargaining representative. Agreements reached for compensation adjustments under this section may not exceed the amounts provided. If any agreement or combination of agreements exceed the amount provided in this subsection, all the agreements are subject to the requirements of RCW 41.80.010(3).

(((11) $4,732,000))(10) $3,224,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for two accelerated training programs for lateral hires.

(((12)))(11) $98,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 26, Laws of 2023 (nonconviction data). If chapter 26, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((13)))(12) $76,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 471, Laws of 2023 (negligent driving). If chapter 471, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((14)))(13) $107,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 462, Laws of 2023 (domestic violence). If chapter 462, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((15)))(14) By December 1, 2024, the Washington state patrol must provide a report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature on the status of McClain v. Washington State Patrol and an update on legal expenses associated with the case.

(((16)))(15) $32,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 283, Laws of 2023 (illegal racing). If chapter 283, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(16) $5,905,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for a third arming and third trooper basic training class. The cadet class is expected to graduate in June of 2025.

(17) $2,857,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Washington state patrol to implement the provisions of the settlement agreement under Washington State Patrol Troopers Association v. Washington State Patrol, Public Employment Relations Commission Case No. 134557-U-21.

(18) $2,178,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for a second Cessna aircraft to be ordered for delivery in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.

(19) $691,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 2357), Laws of 2024 (state patrol longevity bonus). If chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 2357), Laws of 2024 is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(20) $65,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Third Substitute House Bill No. 1579), Laws of 2024 (independent prosecutions). If chapter . . . (Third Substitute House Bill No. 1579), Laws of 2024 is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(21) $46,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2153), Laws of 2024 (catalytic converters). If chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2153), Laws of 2024 is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

Sec. 208. 2023 c 472 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING

Driver Licensing Technology Support Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,743,000

Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$34,000

Motorcycle Safety Education Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,299,000))

$5,321,000

Limited Fish and Wildlife Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($765,000))

$769,000

Highway Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($277,256,000))

$284,873,000

Highway Safety Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,371,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($98,824,000))

$101,807,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$1,336,000

Ignition Interlock Device Revolving Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($6,401,000))

$6,416,000

Department of Licensing Services Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($8,972,000))

$9,187,000

License Plate Technology Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,204,000))

$4,411,000

Abandoned Recreational Vehicle Disposal Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,091,000

Limousine Carriers Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$126,000

Electric Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$443,000

DOL Technology Improvement & Data Management

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$944,000

Agency Financial Transaction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$16,998,000

Move Ahead WA Flexible Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,096,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($430,903,000))

$441,966,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,100,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation and $1,100,000 of the move ahead WA flexible account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to provide an interagency transfer to the department of children, youth, and families for the purpose of providing driver's license support. In addition to support services required under RCW 74.13.338(2), support services may include reimbursement of:

(a) The cost for a youth in foster care of any eligible age to complete a driver training education course, as outlined in chapter 46.82 or 28A.220 RCW;

(b) The costs incurred by foster youth in foster care for a motor vehicle insurance policy;

(c) The costs of roadside assistance, motor vehicle insurance deductibles, motor vehicle registration fees, towing services, car maintenance, comprehensive car insurance, and gas cards; and

(d) Any other costs related to obtaining a driver's license and driving legally and safely.

(2) $150,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to conduct a study on the feasibility of implementing a mobile application for driver licensing. The department must submit a report of the study findings and any recommendations to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024. The study must:

(a) Review the adoption actions in other states, including successes and lessons learned;

(b) Examine existing technical infrastructure and potential changes needed to maximize interoperability, utility, and privacy protection;

(c) Identify the technical investments and other costs associated with issuing digital drivers' licenses through a mobile application;

(d) Identify how the technology may impact and can be used by external stakeholders, such as law enforcement;

(e) Recommend any process changes required to implement the program successfully and ensure customer satisfaction; and

(f) Recommend any statutory changes required to allow for the usage of digital drivers' licenses, including recognition of interstate travelers.

(3)(a) $350,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department, in consultation with the Washington traffic safety commission, the department of health, the elder law section of the Washington state bar association, organizations representing older drivers, and driver rehabilitation specialists, to develop a comprehensive plan aimed at improving older driver safety. The department must submit a report on the comprehensive plan to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024. The plan must include, but is not limited to:

(i) A comprehensive review of department policies surrounding older drivers and medically at-risk drivers, including:

(A) The medical assessment review process; and

(B) The counter assessment process in licensing service offices;

(ii) A feasibility analysis of the department establishing a medical advisory board to advise on general policy for at-risk drivers, driving privileges for individual medically at-risk drivers, and an appeals process for drivers whose privileges are revoked or restricted due to medical conditions;

(iii) A recommended assessment tool to determine a driver's potential risk to themselves or others when operating a motor vehicle so the department may make informed decisions on appropriate courses of action within the older driver program; and

(iv) Detailed information on how each component of the plan improves the safety associated with older drivers, while preserving the maximum level of older driver independence and privacy;

(b) The department may also use funds provided in this subsection to implement improvements to older driver traffic safety within existing authority.

(4) $5,499,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to upgrade and improve its prorate and fuel tax system, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 ((of this act)), chapter 472, Laws of 2023. In each phase of the project, the department must ensure and document the increase in business capabilities and customer service outcomes, the improvements in fuel tax collection related information designed to resolve historical discrepancies in reporting information, and how the implementation plan mitigates risks associated with the proposed timeline and results in the sustainability of systems and platforms for the future. Before initiating the implementation phase of the project, the department must report to the office of the chief information officer on how the project meets its FAST act modernization roadmap, and vendor management and resource plans.

(5) $16,000 of the motorcycle safety education account—state appropriation, $2,000 of the limited fish and wildlife account—state appropriation, $947,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation, $308,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation, $14,000 of the ignition interlock device revolving account—state appropriation, and $14,000 of the department of licensing services account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to redesign and improve its online services and website, and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements in section 701 ((of this act)), chapter 472, Laws of 2023.

(6) The department shall report on a quarterly basis on licensing service office operations, associated workload, and information with comparative information with recent comparable months in prior years. The report must include detailed statewide and by licensing service office information on staffing levels, average monthly wait times, the number of enhanced drivers' licenses and enhanced identicards issued and renewed, and the number of primary drivers' licenses and identicards issued and renewed. By November 1, 2024, the department must prepare a report with recommendations on the future of licensing service office operations based on the recent implementation of efficiency measures designed to reduce the time for licensing transactions and wait times, and the implementation of statutory and policy changes made during the pandemic.

(7) For the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the department shall charge $1,336,000 for the administration and collection of a motor vehicle excise tax on behalf of a regional transit authority, as authorized under RCW 82.44.135. The amount in this subsection must be deducted before distributing any revenues to a regional transit authority.

(8) $742,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the increased costs associated with improvements desired to resolve delays in the production of license plates, including converting all subagents to the standard ordering process as recommended in the December 2022 plate inventory report, and to provide updated annual reports detailing changes in license plate production, inventory, and other practices taken to guard against plate production delays. The reports must be submitted to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023, and December 1, 2024.

(9) $243,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to continue to provide written materials on, place signage in licensing service offices regarding, and include into new driver training curricula, the requirements of RCW 46.61.212, the slow down and move over law.

(((11)))(10) $3,082,000 of the abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account—state appropriation is provided solely for providing reimbursements in accordance with the department's abandoned recreational vehicle disposal reimbursement program. It is the intent of the legislature that the department prioritize this funding for allowable and approved reimbursements and not to build a reserve of funds within the account. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the department must report any amounts recovered to the office of financial management and appropriate committees of the legislature on a quarterly basis.

(((12)))(11) $1,077,000 of the highway safety account—federal appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 35, Laws of 2023 (CDL drug and alcohol clearinghouse) ((or chapter . . . (House Bill No. 1448), Laws of 2023 (CDL drug and alcohol clearinghouse))). If ((neither)) chapter 35, Laws of 2023 ((or chapter . . . (House Bill No. 1448), Laws of 2023 are))is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((13)))(12) $116,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of ((chapter . . . (Senate Bill No. 5251), Laws of 2023 (streamlining CDL issuance) or)) chapter 57, Laws of 2023 (streamlining CDL issuance). If ((neither chapter . . . (Senate Bill No. 5251), Laws of 2023 or)) chapter 57, Laws of 2023 ((are))is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((14)))(13) $845,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 445, Laws of 2023 (improving young driver safety). If chapter 445, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((15)))(14) $150,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the addition to the department's implementation plan for the expansion of the current driver training education requirement to include the department's assessment of opportunities to close availability and accessibility gaps in rural and underserved areas, as specified in the language of chapter 445, Laws of 2023 (improving young driver safety) as amended in this act.

(15) $180,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 440, Laws of 2023 (open motor vehicle safety recalls). If chapter 440, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(16) $497,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 466, Laws of 2023 (updating processes related to voter registration). If chapter 466, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((20)))(17) $29,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 118, Laws of 2023 (driver's abstract changes). If chapter 118, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((21)))(18) $47,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 453, Laws of 2023 (competency evaluations). If chapter 453, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((22)))(19) $23,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 283, Laws of 2023 (illegal racing). If chapter 283, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((23)))(20) $155,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 316, Laws of 2023 (jury diversity). If chapter 316, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((24)))(21)(a) $36,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the issuance of nonemergency medical transportation vehicle decals to implement the high occupancy vehicle lane access pilot program established in section 217(2) ((of this act)), chapter 472, Laws of 2023. A for hire nonemergency medical transportation vehicle is a vehicle that is a "for hire vehicle" under RCW 46.04.190 that provides nonemergency medical transportation, including for life-sustaining transportation purposes, to meet the medical transportation needs of individuals traveling to medical practices and clinics, cancer centers, dialysis facilities, hospitals, and other care providers.

(b) As part of this pilot program, the owner of a for hire nonemergency medical transportation vehicle may apply to the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director, for a high occupancy vehicle exempt decal for a for hire nonemergency medical transportation vehicle. The high occupancy vehicle exempt decal allows the for hire nonemergency medical transportation vehicle to use a high occupancy vehicle lane as specified in RCW 46.61.165 and 47.52.025 during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium.

(c) For the exemption in this subsection to apply to a for hire nonemergency medical transportation vehicle, the decal:

(i) Must be displayed on the vehicle so that it is clearly visible from outside the vehicle;

(ii) Must identify that the vehicle is exempt from the high occupancy vehicle requirements; and

(iii) Must be visible from the rear of the vehicle.

(d) The owner of a for hire nonemergency medical transportation vehicle or the owner's representative must apply for a high occupancy vehicle exempt decal on a form provided or approved by the department. The application must include:

(i) The name and address of the person who is the owner of the vehicle;

(ii) A full description of the vehicle, including its make, model, year, and the vehicle identification number;

(iii) The purpose for which the vehicle is principally used;

(iv) An attestation signed by the vehicle's owner or the owner's representative that the vehicle's owner has a minimum of one contract or service agreement to provide for hire transportation services for medical purposes with one or more of the following entities: A health insurance company; a hospital, clinic, dialysis center, or other medical institution; a day care center, retirement home, or group home; a federal, state, or local agency or jurisdiction; or a broker who negotiates these services on behalf of one or more of these entities; and

(v) Other information as required by the department upon application.

(e) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall collect the fee required under (f) of this subsection when issuing or renewing a high occupancy vehicle exempt decal.

(f) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent must collect a $5 fee when issuing or renewing a decal under this subsection, in addition to any other fees and taxes required by law.

(g) A high occupancy vehicle exempt decal expires June 30, 2025, and must be marked to indicate its expiration date. The decal may be renewed if the pilot program is continued past the date of a decal's expiration. The status as an exempt vehicle continues until the high occupancy vehicle exempt decal is suspended or revoked for misuse, the vehicle is no longer used as a for hire nonemergency medical transportation vehicle, or the pilot program established in section 217(2) ((of this act)), chapter 472, Laws of 2023 is terminated.

(h) The department may adopt rules to implement this subsection.

(((25)))(22)(a) $265,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide an interagency transfer to the Washington center for deaf and hard of hearing youth, in consultation with the department and the office of the superintendent of public instruction, to fund the cost of interpreters for driver training education for deaf and hard of hearing youth to enable them to access driver training education at the same cost as their peers, and to pilot a sustainable driver training education program to determine how best to meet the driver training education needs of deaf and hard of hearing youth in the state in the future. The pilot must include:

(i) Determination of an appropriate number of instructors and an appropriate method of certification for instructors who are fluent in American Sign Language (ASL);

(ii) Determination of how best to provide driver training education statewide to deaf and hard of hearing novice drivers;

(iii) Development of a program to offer the required curriculum under RCW 28A.220.035 to deaf and hard of hearing novice drivers; and

(iv) Capped course instruction costs for deaf and hard of hearing students at the average rate of their hearing peers.

(b) The department shall submit a report to the transportation committees of the legislature developed by the Washington center for deaf and hard of hearing youth by March 1, 2024, that provides recommendations for a permanent program to make driver education equitably accessible for deaf and hard of hearing students.

(((26)))(23) $350,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to improve the process for commercial driver's license (CDL) holders to submit medical certification documents and update self-certification status to the department. The department shall:

(a) Update license express to improve the process and make it more user friendly;

(b) Add options for the driver to renew or replace the driver's CDL credentials as part of the medical or self-certification process;

(c) Add a customer verification step confirming the requested changes and clearly stating how this change will impact the driver's CDL; and

(d) Add improved messaging throughout the process.

In addition, the department shall make available on the driving record abstract a complete medical certificate downgrade history, and provide a one-time mailing to all current CDL holders explaining the process to update their medical certificate documents and self-certification.

(((27)))(24) $1,962,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the establishment of a pilot mobile licensing unit to provide licensing and identicard services. By December 1, 2024, the department must submit a report to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature detailing the locations served, the number and type of documents issued, and other outcome measures associated with the mobile licensing unit. The report must include consideration of the facility needs of licensing service offices in the context of flexible mobile licensing services.

(((28)))(25) $2,000,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for driver's license assistance and support services in King county with an existing provider that is already providing these services to low-income immigrant and refugee women. By December 1st of each year, the department must submit information on the contracted provider, including: The annual budget of the contracted provider in the preceding year; information regarding private and other governmental support for the activities of the provider; and a description of the number of people served, services delivered, and outcome measures.

(((30)))(26) $8,000 of the motorcycle safety education account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 137, Laws of 2023 (motorcycle safety board). If chapter 137, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((32)))(27) $29,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 431, Laws of 2023 (transportation resources). If chapter 431, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((34)))(28) $282,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 471, Laws of 2023 (negligent driving). If chapter 471, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(29) $6,000 of the motorcycle safety education account—state appropriation, $1,000 of the limited fish and wildlife account—state appropriation, $406,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation, $137,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation, $5,000 of the ignition interlock device revolving account—state appropriation, and $6,000 of the department of licensing services account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department of licensing for additional finance and budget staff. By December 1, 2024, the department shall submit a report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature on the specific steps the department has taken to address the findings of the State Auditor's Office FY2022 Accountability Audit Report No. 1032793.

(30) $2,100,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to increase public awareness of REAL ID. Of the amounts appropriated in this section, $900,000 is for the department to directly contract with a communications group with experience spreading awareness about REAL ID to community-based organizations and ethnic media outlets.

(31) $1,224,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Engrossed House Bill No. 1964), Laws of 2024 (enhancing prorate and fuel tax collections). If chapter . . . (Engrossed House Bill No. 1964), Laws of 2024 is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(32) $34,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Second Substitute House Bill No. 2014), Laws of 2024 (definition of veteran). If chapter . . . (Second Substitute House Bill No. 2014), Laws of 2024 is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(33) $262,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1104), Laws of 2024 (deferred prosecutions). If chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1104), Laws of 2024 is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(34) $49,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1493), Laws of 2024 (impaired driving). If chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1493), Laws of 2024 is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(35) $300,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter . . . (Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2099), Laws of 2024 (state custody/ID cards). If chapter . . . (Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2099), Laws of 2024 is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(36) $50,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to conduct a study on the feasibility of implementing and administering a per mile fee program. The study must identify the staffing and resources needed to implement and administer the program, including possible technical investments, leveraging existing technology platforms. A preliminary report of the study findings relating to internal costs to administer the program is due to the governor and transportation committees of the legislature by December 31, 2024. The legislature intends to require a final report that includes potential third-party costs and options to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 31, 2025.

Sec. 209. 2023 c 472 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TOLL OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE—PROGRAM B

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($58,854,000))

$66,702,000

State Route Number 520 Civil Penalties Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,178,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($30,729,000))

$34,401,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($20,701,000))

$22,545,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($23,756,000))

$25,526,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($138,218,000))

$153,352,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $1,300,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation and $12,484,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation are provided solely for the purposes of addressing unforeseen operations and maintenance costs on the Tacoma Narrows bridge and the state route number 520 bridge, respectively. The office of financial management shall place the amounts provided in this subsection, which represent a portion of the required minimum fund balance under the policy of the state treasurer, in unallotted status. The office may release the funds only when it determines that all other funds designated for operations and maintenance purposes have been exhausted.

(2) As long as the facility is tolled, the department must provide annual reports to the transportation committees of the legislature on the Interstate 405 express toll lane project performance measures listed in RCW 47.56.880(4). These reports must include:

(a) Information on the travel times and travel time reliability (at a minimum, average and 90th percentile travel times) maintained during peak and nonpeak periods in the express toll lanes and general purpose lanes for both the entire corridor and commonly made trips in the corridor including, but not limited to, northbound from Bellevue to Rose Hill, state route number 520 at NE 148th to Interstate 405 at state route number 522, Bellevue to Bothell (both NE 8th to state route number 522 and NE 8th to state route number 527), and a trip internal to the corridor (such as NE 85th to NE 160th) and similar southbound trips; and

(b) Underlying congestion measurements, that is, speeds, that are being used to generate the summary graphs provided, to be made available in a digital file format.

(3) (($314,000))$221,000 of the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account—state appropriation, (($734,000))$511,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation, (($315,000))$220,000 of the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account—state appropriation, and (($413,000))$289,000 of the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account—state appropriation are provided solely for the reappropriation of unspent funds on the new tolling back office system from the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.

(4) The department shall make detailed annual reports to the transportation committees of the legislature and the public on the department's website in a manner consistent with past practices as specified in section 209(5), chapter 186, Laws of 2022.

(5) As part of the department's 2025-2027 biennial budget request, the department shall update the cost allocation recommendations that assign appropriate costs to each of the toll funds for services provided by relevant Washington state department of transportation programs, the Washington state patrol, and the transportation commission. The recommendations shall be based on updated traffic and toll transaction patterns and other relevant factors.

(6) Up to $16,460,000 of the amounts provided for operations and maintenance expenses on the state route number 520 facility from the state route number 520 corridor account during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium in this act are derived from the receipt of federal American rescue plan act of 2021 funds and not toll revenues.

(7)(a) $19,248,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation is provided solely for the costs of insurance for the state route number 520 floating bridge.

(b) $75,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to conduct an actuarial analysis of the short and long-term costs and benefits, including risk mitigation of self-insurance as compared to the commercial insurance option for the state route number 520 floating bridge, as allowed under the terms of the state route number 520 master bond resolution. By December 15, 2024, the department shall report to the transportation committees of the legislature on the results of the actuarial analysis.

Sec. 210. 2023 c 472 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY—PROGRAM C

Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,494,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($122,240,000))

$122,775,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$307,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,986,000))

$2,988,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,488,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($128,515,000))

$129,052,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(((1))) $2,006,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for hardware cost increases. Before any hardware replacement, the department, in consultation with WaTech, must further review leasing options.

(((2) The appropriations in this section provide sufficient funding for the department assuming vacancy savings that may change over time. Funding for staffing will be monitored and adjusted in the 2024 supplemental transportation appropriations act to restore funding as authorized staffing levels are achieved.))

Sec. 211. 2023 c 472 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS, AND CONSTRUCTION—PROGRAM D—OPERATING

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($39,987,000))

$40,382,000

Move Ahead WA Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,532,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$34,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($42,553,000))

$42,948,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(((2)(a)(i)))(1) $500,000 of the move ahead WA account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to conduct a detailed space study and develop an implementation plan that builds off the findings and recommendations of the department's "Telework Impact Study" completed in September 2022. Such efforts must also incorporate office space use reduction requirements for the department in this act as well as current and planned telework levels. The detailed space study and development of the implementation plan must be conducted in consultation with the office of financial management and the department of enterprise services, and must focus on office and administrative space efficiency, providing specific recommendations, cost estimates, and cost savings. While focused on office and administrative space, the department is encouraged to review other types of facilities where efficiencies can be achieved. The final study report must include:

(((A)))(a) The development of low, medium, and high scenarios based on reducing space use, with the high space reduction scenario being based on a minimum of a 30 percent reduction by 2030;

(((B)))(b) Detailed information on any increased capital and other implementation costs under each scenario;

(((C)))(c) Detailed information on reduced costs, such as leases, facility maintenance, and utilities, under each scenario;

(((D)))(d) An analysis of opportunities to collocate with other state, local, and other public agencies to reduce costs and improve cost-efficiency while meeting utilization standards; and

(((E)))(e) An assessment of the commercial value and return to the state transportation funds associated with the sale of the property from consolidation and other space efficiency measures.

(((ii)))(2)(a) The department must submit the implementation plan and final report from the detailed space study to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature by October 1, 2024.

(b)(((i))) Conducting the detailed space study under (((a)))subsection (1) of this ((subsection))section must not prevent or delay the department from meeting other space use and related requirements, or where warranted by current information or opportunities.

(((ii)))(c) In addition to the reporting requirement under (((a)))subsection (1) of this ((subsection))section, the department must provide information to the office of financial management in its comparative analysis of office space, leases, and relocation costs required by the omnibus operating appropriations act.

Sec. 212. 2023 c 472 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRANSPORTATION EQUIPMENT FUND—PROGRAM E

Motor Vehicle Fund—State Appropriation
. . . .
$700,000

Move Ahead WA Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$20,000,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$433,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($20,433,000))

$21,133,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The entire move ahead WA account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department's costs related to replacing obsolete transportation equipment and replacing fuel sites. Beginning December 1, 2024, and annually thereafter, the department must provide a report to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature detailing the current progress on replacing obsolete equipment, progress towards reaching a level purchasing state, and the status of a fuel site replacement prioritization plan. The report must also include:

(a) A list of department owned and managed fuel sites prioritized by urgency of replacement;

(b) A discussion of department practices that would create a sustained revenue source for capital repair and replacement of fuel sites; and

(c) A discussion of to what extent the fuel site infrastructure can support zero emissions vehicles.

(2)(a) $100,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to administer a pilot program to install and test intelligent speed monitoring technology in a portion of the department's fleet of vehicles while using global positioning system technology and other mapping tools to monitor vehicle location and corresponding speed limits on traveled roadways.

(b) The pilot program must begin by January 1, 2024, for a 12-month period. By June 30, 2025, the department must report to the transportation committees of the legislature the results of the pilot program and provide any legislative or policy recommendations.

Sec. 213. 2023 c 472 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—AVIATION—PROGRAM F

Aeronautics Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($13,979,000))

$17,451,000

Aeronautics Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,650,000))

$5,579,000

Aeronautics Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$60,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($17,689,000))

$23,090,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $2,000,000 of the aeronautics account—state appropriation is provided solely for the move ahead WA aviation grants. The department shall prioritize projects eligible for federal funding.

(2) $1,476,000 of the aeronautics account—state appropriation is provided solely for sustainable aviation grants recommended by the department under the sustainable aviation grants program. The department shall submit a report to the transportation committees of the legislature by October 1, 2024, identifying a selection of sustainable aviation projects for funding by the legislature. In considering projects to recommend to fund, the department shall only consider projects that advance the state of sustainable aviation technology and lead to future innovation. Innovative sustainable aviation projects may include, but are not limited to, pilot projects demonstrating the use of:

(a) Mobile battery charging technology;

(b) Hydrogen electrolyzers and storage;

(c) Electric ground equipment; and

(d) Hanger charging technology.

(3) $300,000 of the aeronautics account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop a statewide advanced air mobility aircraft plan to develop and integrate advanced air mobility aircraft into current modal systems. The department shall submit a report by June 1, 2025, to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature including, but not limited to:

(a) Near, medium, and long-term recommendations for land use planning for advanced and urban air mobility vertiports and vertistops;

(b) An inventory of infrastructure needs to support a statewide vertiport network and a recommended program to deploy funds to local governments to share costs;

(c) Proposed state governance structures and regulatory mechanisms to adequately complement federal aviation administration oversight;

(d) Recommended policies to foster vertiport and vertistop infrastructure development that ensure open public access, efficiency in land use siting, and equitable distribution across the state; and

(e) In consultation with local jurisdictions, planning organizations, and other modal managers, recommendations on advanced air mobility aircraft integration into statewide transportation plans.

(4) $1,931,000 of the aeronautics account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 463, Laws of 2023 (commercial aviation services). ((If chapter 463, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount in this subsection lapses.))Funding is provided for the activities of the work group and for support of the work group by the department. The activities of the work group include the issuance of the initial progress report, required in section 4, chapter 463, Laws of 2023, which requires the listing of areas that will not have further review as the areas are in conflict with the operations of a military installation. The report must also identify unsuitable geographies due either to environmental impacts or impacts to overburdened communities. Additionally, within the funding provided the work group must:

(a) Work to understand what studies currently exist on state transportation needs and capacities and identify any gaps of information; and

(b) Conduct meaningful community engagement with overburdened and vulnerable populations with a focus on the environmental justice impact of aviation on communities.

(5) $300,000 of the aeronautics account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Port of Bremerton to conduct a study on the feasibility of offering commercial service at the Port of Bremerton airport. Pursuant to RCW 47.68.090(2)(c), the department may not require a match for this project.

(6) $2,575,000 of the aeronautics account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Pullman-Moscow regional airport. Pursuant to RCW 47.68.090(2)(c), the department may not require a match for this project.

Sec. 214. 2023 c 472 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT—PROGRAM H

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($64,470,000))

$65,210,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$500,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($851,000))

$1,351,000

Move Ahead WA Flexible Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$572,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($66,393,000))

$67,633,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, if the department takes possession of the property situated in the city of Edmonds for which a purchase agreement was executed between Unocal and the department in 2005 (Tax Parcel Number 262703-2-003-0009), and if the department confirms that the property is still no longer needed for transportation purposes, the department shall provide the city of Edmonds with the first right of purchase at fair market value in accordance with RCW 47.12.063(3) for the city's intended use of the property to rehabilitate near-shore habitat for salmon and related species.

(2) $469,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for the implementation of chapter 217, Laws of 2021 (noxious weeds).

(3) The department shall determine the fair market value of the northern parcel of site 14 on the Puget Sound Gateway Program SR 509 Completion Project Surplus Property list, located immediately south of S. 216th Street and adjacent to the Barnes Creek Nature Trail in Des Moines, to be submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 15, 2023, for an evaluation of possible next steps for use of the property that is in the public interest.

(4) ((The appropriations in this section provide sufficient funding for the department assuming vacancy savings that may change over time. Funding for staffing will be monitored and adjusted in the 2024 supplemental transportation appropriations act to restore funding as authorized staffing levels are achieved.

(5)))(a) $572,000 of the move ahead WA flexible account—state appropriation is provided solely to track and maximize clean fuels credits and revenue generated by state agencies pursuant to chapter 70A.535 RCW.

(b) The LEAP Transportation Document ((2023-2))2024-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 21, 2023))February 18, 2024, anticipates fulfillment of the requirements under chapter 70A.535 RCW of generating credits and revenue for transportation investments funded in an omnibus transportation appropriations act, including the move ahead WA transportation package. The omnibus transportation appropriations act anticipates credits for ferry electrification for new hybrid electric vessels, active transportation, transit programs and projects, alternative fuel infrastructure, connecting communities, and multimodal investments.

(c) Pursuant to the reporting requirements of RCW 70A.535.050(5), the department must present a detailed projection of the credit revenues generated and achieved directly as a result of the funding and activities in this subsection.

(((6)))(5) $93,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 169, Laws of 2023 (climate resilience strategy). ((If chapter 169, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.))

(6) To assist the department as it continues to make progress on meeting the requirements of the federal U.S. v. Washington court injunction and to address estimated programmatic cost increases, within the funding provided in this section, the department shall analyze contracting methods, alternative bundling concepts, and other options to manage costs. The department shall provide a report outlining recommendations to the governor and transportation committees of the legislature by December 15, 2024.

(7)(a) $500,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to explore alternative uses of the state's highway rights-of-way to address pressing public needs relating to climate change, equitable communications, renewable energy generation, electrical transmission and distribution projects, broadband projects, vegetation management, inductive charging in travel lanes, alternative fueling facilities, and other appropriate uses. In exploring alternative uses of the state's highway rights-of-way, the department shall:

(i) Review the utility accommodation policy and make recommendations to update the policy to include clean energy and connectivity projects under 23 C.F.R. Part 645. At a minimum, the recommendations for updated clean energy and connectivity projects must include renewable energy and electrical transmission and distribution;

(ii) Review and update the department's integrated roadside vegetation management plans to maximize carbon sequestration and develop habitat and forage for native pollinators, Monarch butterflies, and honeybees through plantings of native noninvasive flowering plants and grasses on the state highways rights-of-way and at safety rest areas;

(iii) Assess state highways rights-of-way land areas most suitable for solar development by considering slope, elevation, vegetative cover, and solar radiation; and

(iv) Identify existing highway rights-of-way suitable as designated energy corridors for electric transmission and distribution and other energy infrastructure.

(b) In carrying out the requirements in (a) of this subsection, the department may consult with an organization that uses an advanced rights-of-way solar mapping tool that uses ArcGIS Pro software for faster and more precise analysis of rights-of-way solar using the state's full spatial rights-of-way data sets.

(c) The department must report its findings, recommendations, and status of its updates to the transportation committees of the legislature by January 15, 2025.

Sec. 215. 2023 c 472 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—PUBLIC-PRIVATE PARTNERSHIPS—PROGRAM K

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($694,000))

$704,000

Electric Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,746,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,400,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$25,000,000

Carbon Emissions Reduction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($164,600,000))

$201,985,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($199,440,000))

$236,835,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $3,746,000 of the electric vehicle account—state appropriation and (($30,000,000))$50,000,000 of the carbon ((reduction)) emissions reduction account—state appropriation are provided solely for the clean alternative fuel vehicle charging and refueling infrastructure program in chapter 287, Laws of 2019 (advancing green transportation adoption). $20,000,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection from the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation must initially be placed in unallotted status and may not be spent prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, these amounts shall lapse.

(2) $10,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation is also provided solely for the clean alternative fuel vehicle charging and refueling infrastructure program in chapter 287, Laws of 2019 (advancing green transportation adoption). The amount provided in this subsection must initially be placed in unallotted status and may not be spent prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, this amount shall lapse.

(3) $1,000,000 of the electric vehicle account—state appropriation and $500,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely for a colocated DC fast charging and hydrogen fueling station near the Wenatchee or East Wenatchee area near a state route or near or on a publicly owned facility to service passenger, light-duty and heavy-duty vehicles. The hydrogen fueling station must include a DC fast charging station colocated at the hydrogen fueling station site. Funds may be used for one or more fuel cell electric vehicles that would utilize the fueling stations. The department must contract with a public utility district that produces hydrogen in the area to own and/or manage and provide technical assistance for the design, planning, permitting, construction, maintenance and operation of the hydrogen fueling station. The department and public utility district are encouraged to collaborate with and seek contributions from additional public and private partners for the fueling station.

(((5)))(4) The public-private partnerships program must continue to explore retail partnerships at state-owned park and ride facilities, as authorized in RCW 47.04.295.

(((6)))(5) $1,200,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation and (($2,000,000))$7,000,000 of the carbon ((reduction)) emissions reduction account—state appropriation are provided solely for the pilot program established under chapter 287, Laws of 2019 (advancing green transportation adoption) to provide clean alternative fuel vehicle use opportunities to underserved communities and low to moderate income members of the workforce not readily served by transit or located in transportation corridors with emissions that exceed federal or state emissions standards. Consistent with the geographical diversity element described in RCW 47.04.355(4), the legislature strongly encourages the department to consider implementing the pilot in both urban and rural communities if possible, to obtain valuable information on the needs of underserved communities located in different geographical locations in Washington. $5,000,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection from the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation must initially be placed in unallotted status and may not be spent prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, these amounts shall lapse.

(((7) $120,000,000))(6) $130,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of zero-emission ((commercial vehicle))medium and heavy-duty vehicle and equipment infrastructure and incentive programs and for the replacement of school buses powered by fossil fuels with zero-emission school buses, including the purchase and installation of zero-emission school bus refueling infrastructure.

(a) Of this amount, $20,000,000 is for the department to administer an early action grant program to provide expedited funding ((to zero-emission commercial vehicle infrastructure demonstration projects))for the purchase of zero-emission school buses to replace diesel school buses. The department must contract with ((a third-party administrator))the department of ecology to implement the early action grant program.

(b) ((The office of financial management shall place the remaining $100,000,000 in unallotted status until the joint transportation committee completes the medium and heavy duty vehicle infrastructure and incentive strategy required under section 204 of this act. The director of the office of financial management or the director's designee shall consult with the chairs and ranking members of the transportation committees of the legislature prior to making a decision to allot these funds.))(i) The remaining $110,000,000, inclusive of costs for program administration and staffing, is for a point of sale voucher incentive program to encourage the faster adoption of zero emission medium and heavy-duty vehicles to further state climate goals under RCW 70A.45.020 and state equity goals under chapter 70A.02 RCW. The voucher incentive program must be administered by a third-party administrator that has experience administering voucher incentive programs, with oversight conducted by the department.

(ii) The voucher program is required to be designed based on the recommendations of the Joint Transportation Committee report Washington State Infrastructure and Incentive Program Design for MHD ZEVs, and to include:

(A) Simplified zero emission vehicle eligibility requirements;

(B) Vehicle and infrastructure incentives aligned with programs in other jurisdictions, where appropriate, to streamline user planning;

(C) Financial enhancements for select populations based on equity considerations, including for vehicles in disadvantaged communities and vehicles to be purchased by small, minority-owned businesses, with consideration for support of the secondary vehicle market;

(D) A centralized user and manufacturer portal for information, application, and assistance;

(E) A fleet assistance and qualification program to assist in zero-emission vehicle and infrastructure planning, to be administered by the Washington state university extension energy program in coordination with the department and the voucher program's third-party administrator; and

(F) A voucher preapproval process to evaluate participant eligibility, readiness for fleet deployment, and infrastructure preparedness.

(iii) The following battery electric and hydrogen fuel cell electric vehicle categories and associated charging, as well as refueling infrastructure for these categories, are eligible for the voucher program, subject to additional qualification criteria to be determined by the department and the voucher program third-party administrator:

(A) On-road vehicles from class 2b, heavy work pickups and vans, through class 8, heavy tractor-trailer units and refuse trucks; and

(B) Cargo handling and off-road equipment.

(iv) School buses and transit vehicles eligible for state grant programs for the purchase of zero emission vehicles are not eligible for vouchers under this program, but are eligible for fleet assistance provided in association with the voucher program, which must include assistance in determining state and federal grant eligibility for these vehicles.

(v) The voucher amounts selected by the department and voucher program third-party administrator must further the policy goals of the program cited in (b)(i) of this subsection by offsetting investments required for medium and heavy-duty vehicle and equipment owners to transition to zero-emission vehicles and equipment. The department and voucher program third-party administrator must condition vehicle and infrastructure voucher funding to ensure these program policy goals are furthered through the voucher funding provided.

(vi) Consistent with voucher program design, the department is required to distribute funds to the voucher program third-party administrator sufficiently in advance of final requirements for voucher distribution being met to facilitate the voucher's timely distribution by the third-party administrator to sellers of zero-emission vehicles and infrastructure.

(vii) $10,000,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection from the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation for a point of sale voucher incentive program must initially be placed in unallotted status and may not be spent prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, these amounts shall lapse.

(((8) $3,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation is provided solely for hydrogen refueling infrastructure investments. The office of financial management shall place the amounts provided in this subsection in unallotted status until the joint transportation committee completes the medium and heavy duty vehicle infrastructure and incentive strategy required under section 204 of this act. The director of the office of financial management or the director's designee shall consult with the chairs and ranking members of the transportation committees of the legislature prior to making a decision to allot these funds.

(9)))(7) $2,100,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation is provided solely to fund electric vehicle charging infrastructure for the electric charging megasite project at Mount Vernon library commons.

(((10) $2,500,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation is provided solely for zero emission cargo handling equipment incentives. The office of financial management shall place the amounts provided in this subsection in unallotted status until the joint transportation committee completes the medium and heavy duty vehicle and cargo handling and off-road equipment infrastructure and incentive strategy required under section 204 of this act. The director of the office of financial management or the director's designee shall consult with the chairs and ranking members of the transportation committees of the legislature prior to making a decision to allot these funds.

(11) $5,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation is provided solely for clean off-road equipment incentives. The office of financial management shall place the amounts provided in this subsection in unallotted status until the joint transportation committee completes the medium and heavy duty vehicle and cargo handling and off-road equipment infrastructure and incentive strategy required under section 204 of this act. The director of the office of financial management or the director's designee shall consult with the chairs and ranking members of the transportation committees of the legislature prior to making a decision to allot these funds.

(12)))(8) $2,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to coordinate with cities, counties, ports, and private entities to develop actionable recommendations for state assistance in the development of specific candidate truck parking sites to be developed with amenities, identified by location. The department shall identify private land parcels for potential development of sites, which may include, but should not be limited to, a feasibility analysis of sites adjacent to Interstate 90 near North Bend for a 400 to 600 space truck parking site. The public benefit of each potential truck parking site must be included in this assessment. The department shall consider opportunities for the state to provide assistance in the development of truck parking sites, including possible opportunities to provide assistance in land acquisition and evaluating land use requirements. The department must update the transportation committees of the legislature on agency activities and their status by December 1, 2023, and to provide a final report to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.

(9) $360,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation is provided solely for Seattle city light to install solar electric vehicle chargers in its service territory. The chargers must: (a) Not require meters or permitting; (b) be able to be rapidly deployed; (c) be available for use in emergencies; (d) operate in the event of an outage; (e) be able to be installed and relocated without site construction; and (f) be installed in overburdened communities. The amount provided in this subsection must initially be placed in unallotted status and may not be spent prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, this amount shall lapse.

(10) $800,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the cities of Bellevue and Redmond to each purchase an electric fire engine. The amount provided in this subsection must initially be placed in unallotted status and may not be spent prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, this amount shall lapse.

(11) $1,725,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation is provided solely for a Tacoma Public Utilities medium-duty zero-emission utility service vehicle pilot project that includes charging infrastructure and mobile battery units. The amount provided in this subsection must initially be placed in unallotted status and may not be spent prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, this amount shall lapse.

Sec. 216. 2023 c 472 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE—PROGRAM M

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($535,033,000))

$570,358,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$7,000,000

Move Ahead WA Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$50,000,000

RV Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,100,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($4,838,000))

$4,841,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,585,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$8,752,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,624,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($609,832,000))

$646,260,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $5,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for a contingency pool for snow and ice removal. The department must notify the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature when they have spent the base budget for snow and ice removal and will begin using the contingency pool funding.

(2)(a) $115,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to enter into a dispute resolution process with local jurisdictions to produce interagency agreements to address the ongoing facility and landscape maintenance of the three state route number 520 eastside lids and surrounding areas at the Evergreen Point Road, 84th Avenue NE, and 92nd Avenue NE.

(b) The agreements pursuant to (a) of this subsection must be executed by June 30, 2024.

(3) ((The appropriations in this section provide sufficient funding for the department assuming vacancy savings that may change over time. Funding for staffing will be monitored and adjusted in the 2024 supplemental transportation appropriations act to restore funding as authorized staffing levels are achieved.

(4)))(a) (($7,000,000))$9,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to address the risks to safety and public health associated with homeless encampments on department owned rights-of-way. The department must coordinate and work with local government officials and social service organizations who provide services and direct people to housing alternatives that are not in highway rights-of-way to help prevent future encampments from forming on highway rights-of-way and may reimburse the organizations doing this outreach assistance who transition people into treatment or housing or for debris clean up on highway rights-of-way. A minimum of $2,000,000 of this appropriation must be used to deliver more frequent removal of litter on the highway rights-of-way that is generated by unsheltered people and may be used to hire crews specializing in collecting and disposing of garbage, clearing debris or hazardous material, and implementing safety improvements where hazards exist to the traveling public and department employees. The department may use these funds to either reimburse local law enforcement costs or the Washington state patrol if they are providing enhanced safety to department staff during debris cleanup or during efforts to prevent future encampments from forming on highway rights-of-way.

(b) Beginning November 1, 2023, and semiannually thereafter, the Washington state patrol and the department of transportation must jointly submit a report to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature on the status of these efforts, including:

(i) A summary of the activities related to addressing encampments, including information on arrangements with local governments or other entities related to these activities;

(ii) A description of the planned activities in the ensuing two quarters to further address the emergency hazards and risks along state highway rights-of-way; and

(iii) Recommendations for executive branch or legislative action to achieve the desired outcome of reduced emergency hazards and risks along state highway rights-of-way.

(((5)))(4) $1,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for a partnership program between the department and the city of Spokane, to be administered in conjunction with subsection (((4)))(3) of this section. The program must address the safety and public health problems created by homeless encampments on the department's property along state highways within the city limits. $555,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is for dedicated department maintenance staff and associated clean-up costs. The department and the city of Spokane shall enter into a reimbursable agreement to cover up to $445,000 of the city's expenses for clean-up crews and landfill costs.

(((6)))(5) $1,025,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to implement safety improvements and debris clean up on department-owned rights-of-way in the city of Seattle at levels above that being implemented as of January 1, 2019, to be administered in conjunction with subsection (((4)))(3) of this section. The department must maintain a crew dedicated solely to collecting and disposing of garbage, clearing debris or hazardous material, and implementing safety improvements where hazards exist to the traveling public, department employees, or people encamped upon department-owned rights-of-way. The department may request assistance from the Washington state patrol as necessary in order for both agencies to provide enhanced safety-related activities regarding the emergency hazards along state highway rights-of-way in the Seattle area.

(((7)))(6) $1,015,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for a partnership program between the department and the city of Tacoma, to be administered in conjunction with subsection (((4)))(3) of this section. The program must address the safety and public health problems created by homeless encampments on the department's property along state highways within the city limits. $570,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is for dedicated department maintenance staff and associated clean-up costs. The department and the city of Tacoma shall enter into a reimbursable agreement to cover up to $445,000 of the city's expenses for clean-up crews and landfill costs.

(((8)))(7) $1,500,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with the city of Fife to address the risks to safety and public health associated with homeless encampments on department-owned rights-of-way along the SR 167/SR 509 Puget Sound Gateway project corridor in and adjacent to the city limits pursuant to section 216(10), chapter 186, Laws of 2022. However, the amount provided in this subsection must be placed in unallotted status and may not be spent prior to November 1, 2023. If, after November 1, 2023, the department, in consultation with the office of financial management, determines that the department fully spent the $2,000,000 appropriated in section 216(10), chapter 186, Laws of 2022, within the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium for this purpose, the amount provided in this subsection must remain in unallotted status and unspent. If the department did not fully spend the $2,000,000 within the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the department may only spend from the appropriation in this subsection an amount not in excess of the amount unspent from the $2,000,000 within the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, with any remaining amount to remain in unallotted status and unspent. In no event may the department spend more than $2,000,000 within the 2021-2023 and 2023-2025 fiscal biennia for this purpose.

(8) $5,400,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for replacement of traffic signs and increased visibility of road pavement markings. The department shall prioritize traffic sign replacements and road pavement markings on high-collision corridors in rural areas. Investments must replace traffic signs that do not meet the department's standards or that are faded, lacking in reflectivity, cracked, illegible, or damaged. Investments must also increase the visibility of road pavement markings during periods of low light conditions and during precipitation with pavement marking products that contain all-weather optical reflectivity capability. To the extent practicable, the department shall install lane striping products with the necessary equipment to minimize damage from snowplow blades. The request for proposals and subsequent competitive procurement for the signs shall be performed following state specifications and standards.

(9) $1,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1989), Laws of 2024 (graffiti abatement and reduction pilot). If chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1989), Laws of 2024 is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

Sec. 217. 2023 c 472 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRANSPORTATION OPERATIONS—PROGRAM Q—OPERATING

Highway Safety Fund—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,529,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($85,466,000))

$87,623,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,050,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$294,000

Move Ahead WA Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,090,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$5,000,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$247,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$44,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,122,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$37,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($100,879,000))

$103,036,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $6,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for low-cost enhancements. The department shall give priority to low-cost enhancement projects that improve safety or provide congestion relief. By December 15th of each odd-numbered year, the department shall provide a report to the legislature listing all low-cost enhancement projects completed in the prior fiscal biennium.

(2)(a) During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the department shall continue a pilot program that expands private transportation providers' access to high occupancy vehicle lanes. Under the pilot program, when the department reserves a portion of a highway based on the number of passengers in a vehicle, the following vehicles must be authorized to use the reserved portion of the highway if the vehicle has the capacity to carry eight or more passengers, regardless of the number of passengers in the vehicle: (i) Auto transportation company vehicles regulated under chapter 81.68 RCW; (ii) passenger charter carrier vehicles regulated under chapter 81.70 RCW, except marked or unmarked stretch limousines and stretch sport utility vehicles as defined under department of licensing rules; (iii) private nonprofit transportation provider vehicles regulated under chapter 81.66 RCW; and (iv) private employer transportation service vehicles. For purposes of this subsection, "private employer transportation service" means regularly scheduled, fixed-route transportation service that is offered by an employer for the benefit of its employees. Nothing in this subsection is intended to authorize the conversion of public infrastructure to private, for-profit purposes or to otherwise create an entitlement or other claim by private users to public infrastructure.

(b) The department shall expand the high occupancy vehicle lane access pilot program to vehicles that deliver or collect blood, tissue, or blood components for a blood-collecting or distributing establishment regulated under chapter 70.335 RCW. Under the pilot program, when the department reserves a portion of a highway based on the number of passengers in a vehicle, blood-collecting or distributing establishment vehicles that are clearly and identifiably marked as such on all sides of the vehicle are considered emergency vehicles and must be authorized to use the reserved portion of the highway.

(c) The department shall expand the high occupancy vehicle lane access pilot program to for hire nonemergency medical transportation vehicles, when in use for medical purposes, as described in section 208(((24) of this act))(20), chapter 472, Laws of 2023. Under the pilot program, when the department reserves a portion of a highway based on the number of passengers in a vehicle, nonemergency medical transportation vehicles that meet the requirements identified in section 208(((24) of this act))(20), chapter 472, Laws of 2023 must be authorized to use the reserved portion of the highway.

(d) Nothing in this subsection is intended to exempt these vehicles from paying tolls when they do not meet the occupancy requirements established by the department for express toll lanes.

(3) The appropriations in this section assume implementation of additional cost recovery mechanisms to recoup at least $100,000 in credit card and other financial transaction costs related to the collection of fees imposed under RCW 46.17.400, 46.44.090, and 46.44.0941 for driver and vehicle fee transactions beginning January 1, 2023. The department may recover transaction fees incurred through credit card transactions.

(4) The department shall promote safety messages encouraging drivers to slow down and move over and pay attention when emergency lights are flashing on the side of the road and other suitable safety messages on electronic message boards the department operates across the state. The messages must be promoted through June 30, 2025. The department may coordinate such messaging with any statewide public awareness campaigns being developed by the department of licensing or the Washington state traffic safety commission, or both.

(5) $5,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to address emergent issues related to safety for pedestrians and bicyclists. Funds may only be spent after approval from the office of financial management. By December 15th of each odd-numbered year, the department shall provide a report to the legislature listing all emergent issues addressed in the prior fiscal biennium.

(((7)))(6) $3,529,000 of the highway safety account—state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 17, Laws of 2023 (speed safety cameras). ((If chapter 17, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(8)))(7) $1,279,000 of the move ahead WA account—state appropriation is provided solely for maintenance and operations of the virtual coordination center. The department is encouraged to apply for federal grant funds for the virtual coordination center and may use state funds as a match. By December 1, 2023, the department shall report to the transportation committees of the legislature: (a) Recommendations to expand the center's operations, including specific additional jurisdictions and corridors across the state; and (b) amounts received and dates of receipt of any new cash and in-kind matches from virtual coordination center partners including, but not limited to, the city of Seattle, King county, other state and local jurisdictions, and private sector partners.

(((9)))(8) $100,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to prepare and submit a report to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024, with a prioritized list of recommendations for improving safety and mobility on Interstate 90 between North Bend and Cle Elum during winter weather events, including estimated costs. The recommendations must include, but are not limited to, options to improve compliance with traction tire and chain requirements and reduce snow-related closures.

(((11)))(9)(a) $5,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department, in coordination with the independent review team of the joint transportation committee, to conduct an analysis of highway, road, and freight rail transportation needs, options, and impacts from shifting the movement of freight and goods that currently move by barge through the lower Snake river dams to highways, other roads, and rail. The study should generate volume estimates and evaluate scenarios for changes in infrastructure and operations that would be necessary to address those additional volumes. The assessment must include quantitative analysis based on available data in terms of both financial and carbon emission costs; and qualitative input gathered from tribal governments, local governments, freight interests, and other key stakeholders, including impacts on disadvantaged/underserved communities. The analysis must include a robust public engagement process to solicit feedback from interested stakeholders including but not limited to: Residents and officials in affected cities and counties; stakeholders involved in railroad, agriculture, fishing, trucking, shipping and other related industries; appropriate Native American tribes; representatives of advocacy and community organizations; and transportation, public works, and economic development organizations in the affected areas, federal highway administration and army corps of engineers. The analysis must be informed by the work of the joint transportation committee's independent review team, and must include the following:

(i) Existing volumes and traffic patterns;

(ii) Potential changes in volumes and traffic patterns immediately following the loss of freight movement by barge and over the following 20 years, including the carbon emissions impact of this mode shift;

(iii) Identification of whether regional geography, land availability, and state and federal regulatory processes would allow for rail and road expansions and increased capacity;

(iv) Identification of potential infrastructure and operational improvements to existing highways, other roads, and rail, including additional access to facilities, needed to accommodate the higher freight volumes and impacts and potential opportunities to mitigate impacts on shipping rates;

(v) Identification of rail line development options, including impacts and potential opportunities to mitigate impacts on grain storage and handling facilities at regional unit train yards and port export facilities;

(vi) An assessment of costs associated with mitigating potential slope failure and stabilization necessitated by the drawdown of the river. An assessment of impacts and potential opportunities to mitigate impacts on adjacent roads, bridges, railroads, and utility corridors shall be included;

(vii) Both financial and carbon cost estimates for development and implementation of identified needs and options, including planning, design, and construction;

(viii) Analysis of the impacts and potential opportunities to mitigate impacts of these infrastructure changes on environmental justice and disadvantaged/underserved communities during construction, as well as from future operations;

(ix) Analysis of safety impacts and potential opportunities to mitigate impacts for a shift from barge transportation to rail or truck, including increases in rural community traffic and consistency with the Washington State Strategic Highway Safety Plan: Target Zero;

(x) Impacts and potential opportunities to mitigate impacts on highly affected commodities, including agriculture, petroleum, project cargo, and wind energy components;

(xi) Analysis of the impacts and potential opportunities to mitigate impacts that reduced competition resulting from removing barging of agricultural products on the Snake river would have on Washington's agricultural industry along with impacts modal shifts would have on the entire supply chain, including export facilities and ports on the Lower Columbia River; and

(xii) Determination of the feasibility that additional east-west freight rail capacity can be achieved, particularly through Columbia River Gorge, and the alternative routes that exist in the event that adding more infrastructure on these routes is not feasible.

(b) The department shall provide status updates on a quarterly basis in coordination with the joint transportation committee. The legislature intends to require a final report to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 31, 2026.

(10) $1,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop an automated highway speed safety camera pilot program to test two to three automated traffic safety cameras on state highways. The goals of the automated highway speed safety camera pilot program are to test speed camera technology, determine the impact on speeding behavior in areas of testing, and compile public response to the use of traffic safety cameras on highways.

(a) The department must work with the Washington state patrol and the traffic safety commission to develop the pilot program to include, but not be limited to, the following program elements:

(i) Selection of technology;

(ii) Placement of cameras in high speed, collision, or fatality locations;

(iii) Establishment of public notification and warning signs prior to entering into an area with a speed safety camera;

(iv) Outreach and public engagement about the program and site selection process; and

(v) Development and implementation of a process to collect and report relevant pilot program data, including rates of speed prior to, during, and after the use of pilot program cameras, and public response to pilot program cameras.

(b) Automated traffic safety cameras may only take pictures of the vehicle and the vehicle license plates.

(c) Ticketing of violators using vehicle speed information captured by automated traffic safety cameras authorized under the pilot program is prohibited during the pilot program.

(d) As part of the pilot program, the department may inform registered vehicle owners of a vehicle's rate of speed exceeding the posted speed limit and the amount of the fine the law would have allowed to be imposed by providing notification by mail.

(e) The department is required to provide a program progress report to the governor and transportation committees of the legislature by September 30, 2024, to include a summary of public input on the use of safety cameras, including objections, evaluation of technologies used, and changes in speeding behavior.

(f) Photographs, microphotographs, electronic images, and other personally identifying data captured and collected for the purposes of the pilot program are for the exclusive use of the Washington state patrol and department of transportation in carrying out the pilot program, are not open to the public, and may not be used in court in a pending action or proceeding.

Sec. 218. 2023 c 472 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT—PROGRAM S

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($62,639,000))

$63,537,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$780,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$500,000

Move Ahead WA Flexible Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$5,400,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$510,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($22,323,000))

$22,723,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$220,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$136,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$127,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$114,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($92,749,000))

$94,047,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)(a) $2,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and $5,400,000 of the move ahead WA flexible account—state appropriation are provided solely for efforts to increase diversity in the transportation construction workforce through:

(i) The preapprenticeship support services (PASS) and career opportunity maritime preapprenticeship support services (COMPASS) programs, which aim to increase diversity in the highway construction and maritime workforces and prepare individuals interested in entering the highway construction and maritime workforces. In addition to the services allowed under RCW 47.01.435, the PASS and COMPASS programs may provide housing assistance for youth aging out of the foster care and juvenile rehabilitation systems to support their participation in a transportation-related preapprenticeship program and support services to obtain necessary maritime documents and coast guard certification; and

(ii) Assisting minority and women-owned businesses to perform work in the highway construction industry.

(b) The department shall report annually to the transportation committees of the legislature on efforts to increase diversity in the transportation construction workforce.

(2) $1,512,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and $488,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to develop, track, and monitor the progress of community workforce agreements, and to assist with the development and implementation of internal diversity, equity, and inclusion efforts and serve as subject matter experts on federal and state civil rights provisions. The department shall engage with relevant stakeholders, and provide a progress report on the implementation of efforts under this subsection to the transportation committees of the legislature and the governor by December 1, 2024.

(3) For Washington state department of transportation small works roster projects under RCW 39.04.155, the department may only allow firms certified as small business enterprises, under 49 C.F.R. 26.39, to bid on the contract, unless the department determines there would be insufficient bidders for a particular project. The department shall report on the effectiveness of this policy to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.

(4) $21,195,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and $21,194,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely for the department to upgrade the transportation reporting and accounting information system to the current cloud version of the software, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 ((of this act)), chapter 472, Laws of 2023.

(((6)))(5) $56,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 230, Laws of 2023 (clean energy siting). ((If chapter 230, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.))

Sec. 219. 2023 c 472 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH—PROGRAM T

Carbon Emissions Reduction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($3,000,000))

$4,000,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($32,089,000))

$31,877,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($31,412,000))

$31,527,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$400,000

Move Ahead WA Flexible Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$11,922,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,414,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,809,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$100,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($84,146,000))

$85,049,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $750,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to partner with the department of commerce and regional transportation planning organizations in implementing vehicle miles traveled targets and supporting actions. As part of target setting, important factors that must be considered include land use patterns, safety, and vulnerable populations. The department shall provide an interim report by June 30, 2024, and a final report by June 30, 2025.

(((3)))(2) $150,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to continue implementation of a performance-based project evaluation model. The department must issue a report by September 1, 2024.

(((4)))(3)(a) $180,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for Thurston regional planning council (TRPC) to conduct a study examining options for multimodal high capacity transportation (HCT) to serve travelers on the Interstate 5 corridor between central Thurston county (Olympia area) and Pierce county.

(b) The study will include an assessment of travelsheds and ridership potential and identify and provide an evaluation of options to enhance connectivity and accessibility for the greater south Puget Sound region with an emphasis on linking to planned or existing commuter or regional light rail. The study must account for previous and ongoing efforts by transit agencies and the department. The study will emphasize collaboration with a diverse community of interests, including but not limited to transit, business, public agencies, tribes, and providers and users of transportation who because of age, income, or ability may face barriers and challenges.

(c) The study is due to the governor and transportation committees of the legislature by September 1, 2024.

(((5)))(4) $400,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the city of Seattle's office of planning and community development to support an equitable development initiative to reconnect the South Park neighborhood, currently divided by state route number 99.

(a) The support work must include:

(i) A public engagement and visioning process led by a neighborhood-based, community organization; and

(ii) A feasibility study of decommissioning state route number 99 in the South Park neighborhood to include, but not be limited to, traffic studies, environmental impact analysis, and development of alternatives, including the transfer of the land to a neighborhood-led community land trust.

(b) The support work must be conducted in coordination and partnership with neighborhood residents, neighborhood industrial and commercial representatives, the state department of transportation, and other entities and neighborhoods potentially impacted by changes to the operation of state route number 99.

(c) The city must provide a report on the plan that includes recommendations to the Seattle city council, state department of transportation, and the transportation committees of the legislature by ((December 1, 2024))June 30, 2025.

(((6)))(5) $2,557,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to upgrade the department's linear referencing system (LRS) and highway performance monitoring system (HPMS), and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements in section 701 ((of this act)), chapter 472, Laws of 2023.

(((7)))(6) $306,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to appoint or designate a liaison to serve as a point of contact and resource for the department, local governments, and project proponents regarding land use decisions and processing development permit applications. The liaison must, as a priority, facilitate and expedite any department decisions required for project approval.

(((8) $627,000))(7) $742,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation is provided solely for remaining work on the "Forward Drive" road usage charge research project overseen by the transportation commission using the remaining amounts of the federal grant award. The remaining work of this project includes:

(a) Analysis of road usage charge simulation and participant surveys;

(b) Follow up on road usage charge experiences related to payment installments, mileage exemptions, and vehicle-based mileage reporting;

(c) Completion of technology research; and

(d) Development of the final "Forward Drive" research program report.

(((9)))(8)(a) $11,922,000 of the move ahead WA flexible account—((federal))state appropriation is provided solely for an Interstate 5 planning and environmental linkage study and a statewide Interstate 5 master plan, building upon existing work under way in the corridor. It is the intent of the legislature to provide a total of $40,000,000 for this work by 2029.

(b) The work under (a) of this subsection must include, but is not limited to, the following:

(i) Seismic resiliency planning to refine the level of effort and develop informed cost estimates for the seismic vulnerability analysis;

(ii) HOV lane system-wide performance planning and initial steps to launch a pilot project that progresses innovative and emerging technologies;

(iii) Interstate 5 corridor planning work, including development of a framework, coordination of corridor needs, development of core evaluation criteria and a prioritization process, and identification of early action priority projects that address safety or resiliency, or both, along the corridor; and

(iv) A report to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024, with recommendations for future phases and a detailed funding request for work planned through 2029.

(c) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $300,000 is provided solely for the department to conduct a Seattle Interstate 5 ramp reconfiguration study. The study must be conducted in coordination and partnership with the city of Seattle's department of transportation, informed by the input of Interstate 5 lid stakeholders, and coordinated with work under (a) and (b) of this subsection. The department must provide a study report, including recommendations, to the city of Seattle's department of transportation and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024. The study must include an analysis of:

(i) Options and opportunities to reconfigure, relocate, or remove Interstate 5 ramps within and between Chinatown-International District and the University District for the purpose of improving through-traffic operations, enhancing multimodal transportation safety, and enabling more efficient air rights development;

(ii) Potential mitigation needs and cost estimates of ramp changes and demolitions;

(iii) Benefits of ramp changes and demolitions to pedestrian and bicycle travel, transit operations, and future lid design;

(iv) Ramps for the mainline, collector-distributor lanes and express lanes including, at a minimum, ramps connecting to and from James Street, Cherry Street, 6th Avenue, Madison Street, Seneca Street, Spring Street, University Street, Union Street, Olive Way, Yale Avenue, NE 45th Street, and NE 50th Street;

(v) Removal of the existing ramps at Seneca Street, Spring Street, and University Street; and

(vi) Removal and consolidation options of the existing NE 45th Street and NE 50th Street ramps.

(d) The department shall work with the emergency management division of the military department to identify strategic transportation corridors, opportunities to improve resilience and reinforce the corridors against natural disasters, and opportunities to secure federal funding for investments in the resilience of the transportation network. The department shall provide a report to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023, on:

(i) Strategic transportation corridors and opportunities to improve their resilience;

(ii) Federal funding opportunities the state should pursue; and

(iii) Recommendations for actions to maximize federal funding for the state of Washington.

(((10)))(9) The department shall continue to coordinate planning work focused on the transportation system in western Washington across modes with the goal of maximizing system performance toward the policy goals in RCW 47.04.280 in the most cost-effective manner. This coordination must include, but is not limited to: The Interstate 5 highway corridor, existing rail infrastructure and future high-speed rail alignment, and commercial aviation capacity. The department must report to the joint transportation committee through existing reporting mechanisms on the status of these planning efforts including, but not limited to, a long-term strategy for addressing resilience of the transportation system in western Washington through consideration of changing demand, modal integration, and preservation needs. The coordinated work must include an analysis of different alternatives to promote system resilience, including performance and cost of each scenario.

(((13)))(10) $3,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department, in coordination with the department's HEAL act team and environmental services office, to develop and implement a community outreach, education, and technical assistance program for overburdened communities and their community partners in order to develop community-centered carbon reduction strategies to make meaningful impacts in a community, and to provide assistance in gaining access to available funding to implement these strategies, where applicable. The department may provide appropriate compensation to members of overburdened communities who provide solicited community participation and input needed by the department to implement and administer the program established in this subsection. By June 1, 2024, and by June 1, 2025, the department must submit a report to the transportation committees of the legislature and to the governor that provides an update on the department's community outreach, education, and technical assistance program development and implementation efforts.

(11) $1,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with a world cup organizing committee based in Seattle to undertake low carbon transportation planning efforts that will help prepare for the increase in visitors due to the 2026 FIFA world cup soccer matches in Seattle and other venues in the state. The planning, to be developed in coordination with the department and local mobility agencies, must identify critical infrastructure and operational improvements that will support active transportation and reliability of transit, making it easier for the public to choose options other than single-occupancy vehicles. A progress report, including best practices for future events, must be delivered to the department, governor, and transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025. The amount provided in this subsection must initially be placed in unallotted status and may not be spent prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, this amount shall lapse.

Sec. 220. 2023 c 472 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES—PROGRAM U

Aeronautics Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,000

Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($29,000))

$56,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($105,197,000))

$114,566,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$244,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$69,000

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($233,000))

$452,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,585,000))

$6,385,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$43,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$38,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($40,000))

$43,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($111,479,000))

$121,897,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Consistent with existing protocol and practices, for any negotiated settlement of a claim against the state for the department that exceeds $5,000,000, the department, in conjunction with the attorney general and the department of enterprise services, shall notify the director of the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature.

(2) On August 1, 2023, and semiannually thereafter, the department, in conjunction with the attorney general and the department of enterprise services, shall provide a report with judgments and settlements dealing with the Washington state ferry system to the director of the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. The report must include information on: (a) The number of claims and settlements by type; (b) the average claim and settlement by type; (c) defense costs associated with those claims and settlements; and (d) information on the impacts of moving legal costs associated with the Washington state ferry system into the statewide self-insurance pool.

(3) On August 1, 2023, and semiannually thereafter, the department, in conjunction with the attorney general and the department of enterprise services, shall provide a report with judgments and settlements dealing with the nonferry operations of the department to the director of the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. The report must include information on: (a) The number of claims and settlements by type; (b) the average claim and settlement by type; and (c) defense costs associated with those claims and settlements.

(4) When the department identifies significant legal issues that have potential transportation budget implications, the department must initiate a briefing for appropriate legislative members or staff through the office of the attorney general and its legislative briefing protocol.

Sec. 221. 2023 c 472 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION—PROGRAM V

Carbon Emissions Reduction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$500,000

Climate Transit Programs Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($406,287,000))

$451,545,000

State Vehicle Parking Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$784,000

Regional Mobility Grant Program Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($115,060,000))

$120,177,000

Rural Mobility Grant Program Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($32,774,000))

$33,077,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($118,255,000))

$125,827,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,374,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$100,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($678,134,000))

$736,384,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($64,354,000))$64,906,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation and (($78,100,000))$79,155,000 of the climate transit programs account—state appropriation are provided solely for a grant program for special needs transportation provided by transit agencies and nonprofit providers of transportation. Of this amount:

(a) $14,420,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation and $17,963,000 of the climate transit programs account—state appropriation are provided solely for grants to nonprofit providers of special needs transportation. Grants for nonprofit providers must be based on need, including the availability of other providers of service in the area, efforts to coordinate trips among providers and riders, and the cost effectiveness of trips provided.

(b) $48,278,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation and $60,137,000 of the climate transit programs account—state appropriation are provided solely for grants to transit agencies to transport persons with special transportation needs. To receive a grant, the transit agency must, to the greatest extent practicable, have a maintenance of effort for special needs transportation that is no less than the previous year's maintenance of effort for special needs transportation. Grants for transit agencies must be prorated based on the amount expended for demand response service and route deviated service in calendar year 2021 as reported in the "2021 Summary of Public Transportation" published by the department of transportation. No transit agency may receive more than 30 percent of these distributions. Fuel type may not be a factor in the grant selection process.

(c) (($1,656,000))$2,208,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation ((is))and $1,055,000 of the climate transit programs account—state appropriation are provided solely for the reappropriation of amounts provided for this purpose in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.

(2) (($32,774,000))$33,077,000 of the rural mobility grant program account—state appropriation is provided solely for grants to aid small cities in rural areas as prescribed in RCW 47.66.100. Fuel type may not be a factor in the grant selection process.

(3) (($11,382,000))$11,598,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for a public transit rideshare grant program for: (a) Public transit agencies to add or replace rideshare vehicles; and (b) incentives and outreach to increase rideshare use. The grant program for public transit agencies may cover capital costs only, and costs for operating vanpools at public transit agencies are not eligible for funding under this grant program. Awards from the grant program must not be used to supplant transit funds currently funding ride share programs, or to hire additional employees. Fuel type may not be a factor in the grant selection process. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, (($1,092,000))$1,308,000 is for the reappropriation of amounts provided for this purpose in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.

(4) (($37,382,000))$48,597,000 of the regional mobility grant program account—state appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for the regional mobility grant projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document ((2023-2))2024-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 21, 2023))February 18, 2024, Program - Public Transportation Program (V).

(5)(a) (($77,679,000))$71,581,000 of the regional mobility grant program account—state appropriation is provided solely for the regional mobility grant projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document ((2023-2))2024-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 21, 2023))February 18, 2024, Program - Public Transportation Program (V). The department shall review all projects receiving grant awards under this program at least semiannually to determine whether the projects are making satisfactory progress. Any project that has been awarded funds, but does not report activity on the project within one year of the grant award, must be reviewed by the department to determine whether the grant should be terminated. The department shall promptly close out grants when projects have been completed, and any remaining funds must be used only to fund projects identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced in this subsection. The department shall provide annual status reports on December 15, 2023, and December 15, 2024, to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature regarding the projects receiving the grants. It is the intent of the legislature to appropriate funds through the regional mobility grant program only for projects that will be completed on schedule. A grantee may not receive more than 25 percent of the amount appropriated in this subsection unless all other funding is awarded. Additionally, when allocating funding for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, no more than 30 percent of the total grant program may directly benefit or support one grantee unless all other funding is awarded. Fuel type may not be a factor in the grant selection process.

(b) In order to be eligible to receive a grant under (a) of this subsection during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, a transit agency must establish a process for private transportation providers to apply for the use of park and ride facilities. For purposes of this subsection, (i) "private transportation provider" means: An auto transportation company regulated under chapter 81.68 RCW; a passenger charter carrier regulated under chapter 81.70 RCW, except marked or unmarked stretch limousines and stretch sport utility vehicles as defined under department of licensing rules; a private nonprofit transportation provider regulated under chapter 81.66 RCW; or a private employer transportation service provider; and (ii) "private employer transportation service" means regularly scheduled, fixed-route transportation service that is offered by an employer for the benefit of its employees.

(c) $1,500,000 of the amount appropriated in this subsection is provided solely for a contingency fund to assist current regional mobility grantees with cost escalations and overages. The department shall create a system for grantees to request funds, and set a cap of contingency funds per grantee to ensure an equitable distribution among requesters.

(d) During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the department shall consider applications submitted by regional transportation planning organizations and metropolitan planning organizations for the regional mobility grant program funding in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.

(6) $6,195,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation, $3,300,000 of the climate transit programs account—state appropriation, and $784,000 of the state vehicle parking account—state appropriation are provided solely for CTR grants and activities. Fuel type may not be a factor in the grant selection process. Of this amount, $495,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for continuation of previously approved projects under the first mile/last mile connections grant program.

(7) (($11,914,000))$16,319,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for connecting Washington transit projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document ((2023-2))2024-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 21, 2023))February 18, 2024. It is the intent of the legislature that entities identified to receive funding in the LEAP transportation document referenced in this subsection receive the amounts specified in the time frame specified in that LEAP document. If an entity has already completed a project in the LEAP transportation document referenced in this subsection before the time frame identified, the entity may substitute another transit project or projects that cost a similar or lesser amount.

(8) The department shall not require more than a 10 percent match from nonprofit transportation providers for state grants.

(9) $12,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation and $39,400,000 of the climate transit programs account—state appropriation are provided solely for the green transportation capital projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document ((2023-2))2024-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 21, 2023))February 18, 2024, Program - Public Transportation Program (V). Of the amount of climate transit program account funds appropriated in this subsection, up to one percent may be used for program administration and staffing.

(10) $7,442,000 of the climate transit programs account—state appropriation are provided solely for additional green transportation capital projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document 2024-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed February 18, 2024, Program - Public Transportation Program (V). Of the amounts provided, $1,000,000 is for the Jefferson Transit - Electric Bus Replacement Project (GT23250A), $1,023,000 is for the Pacific Transit - Electrification of the Paratransit fleet Project (GT23250C), $3,795,000 is for the C-TRAN - Hydrogen Fueling Station Infrastructure Project (GT23250D), and $1,623,000 is for the Island Transit - Fleet Expansion Project (GT23250E). The amounts provided in this subsection must initially be placed in unallotted status and may not be spent prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, these amounts shall lapse.

(11)(($4,407,000))$5,950,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation ((is))and $2,951,000 of the climate transit programs account—state appropriation are reappropriated and provided solely for the green transportation capital grant projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document ((2023-2))2024-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 21, 2023))February 18, 2024, Program - Public Transportation Program (V).

(((11) $10,000,000))(12) $18,300,000 of the climate transit programs account—state appropriation is provided solely for newly selected green transportation grants. Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, up to one percent may be used for program administration and staffing. The amount provided in this subsection must initially be placed in unallotted status and may not be spent prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, this amount shall lapse.

(13) $10,267,000 of the climate transit programs account—state appropriation is provided solely for tribal transit grants. Up to one percent of the amount provided in this subsection may be used for program administration and staffing.

(a) The department must establish a tribal transit competitive grant program to be administered as part of the department's consolidated grant program. Grants to federally recognized tribes may be for any transit purpose, including planning, operating costs, maintenance, and capital costs. The department shall report to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management with a list of projects recommended for funding by September 1, 2023, along with recommendations on how to remove barriers for tribes to access grant funds, including removal of grant match requirements, and recommendations for how the department can provide technical assistance.

(b) Within the amount provided in this subsection, $5,038,000 is provided solely for move ahead Washington tribal transit grant projects as listed in LEAP Transportation Document ((2023-2))2024-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 21, 2023))February 18, 2024. Of this amount, $529,000 is for the Sauk-Suiattle Commuter project (L1000318).

(((12) $188,900,000))(14)(a) $188,941,000 of the climate transit programs account—state appropriation is provided solely for transit support grants for public transit agencies that have adopted a zero-fare policy for youth 18 years of age and under by October 1, 2022. The department must confirm zero-fare policies are in effect at transit agencies to be eligible for biennial distributions.

(b) $41,000 of the climate transit programs account—state appropriation is provided solely for the reappropriation of amounts provided for this purpose in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.

(((13)))(15) $38,000,000 of the climate transit programs account—state appropriation is provided solely for the bus and bus facility grant program for replacement, rehabilitation, and purchase of transit rolling stock, or construction, modification, or rehabilitation of transit facilities.

(((14)))(16) $7,758,000 of the climate transit programs account—state appropriation is provided solely for additional bus and bus facility projects. Of the amounts provided, $1,467,000 is for Kitsap Transit for inductive charging units for transit centers, $1,891,000 is for Twin Transit for zero-emission vehicle acquisition, $4,400,000 is for C-TRAN for highway 99 BRT hydrogen fuel cell buses. The amounts provided in this subsection must initially be placed in unallotted status and may not be spent prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, these amounts shall lapse.

(17) $2,000,000 of the climate transit programs account—state appropriation is provided solely for newly selected transit coordination grants. The department shall prioritize grant proposals that promote the formation of joint partnerships between transit agencies or merge service delivery across entities.

(((15) $46,587,000))(18) $44,000 of the climate transit programs account—state appropriation is provided solely for the reappropriation of amounts originally provided for transit coordination grants in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.

(19) $53,087,000 of the climate transit programs account—state appropriation is provided solely for move ahead Washington transit projects as listed in LEAP Transportation Document ((2023-2))2024-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 21, 2023))February 18, 2024, Move Ahead WA - Transit Projects.

(a) For projects funded as part of this subsection, if the department expects to have substantial reappropriations for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the department may, on a pilot basis, apply funding from a project with an appropriation that is unable to be used within the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium to advance one or more of the projects listed, prioritizing projects first by tier then by project readiness.

(b) In instances when projects listed in the LEAP transportation document referenced in this subsection (((15)))(19) are no longer viable or have been completed, the department may recommend in its next budget submittal alternative project proposals from the local jurisdictions if the project is similar in type and scope and consistent with limitations on certain funds provided. In the event that the listed project has been completed, the local jurisdictions may, rather than submitting an alternative project, be reimbursed in the year in which it was scheduled for documented costs incurred implementing the listed project, not in excess of the amount awarded from the funding program.

(c) At least 10 business days before advancing or swapping a project pursuant to this subsection, the department must notify the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. The advancement of a project may not hinder the delivery of the projects for which the reappropriations are necessary for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium.

(((16)))(20) $580,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide a statewide vanpool benefit for all state employees. For department employees working in remote job sites, such as mountain passes, the department must ensure employees are able to access job sites via a subsidized vanpool or provide a modal alternative for the "last mile" to ensure employees can access the job site without additional charge.

(((17)))(21) $200,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to update the 2019 feasibility study to add a fifth travel Washington intercity bus line in the Yakima Valley. The department must provide a summary report of the updated feasibility and cost estimates to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.

(((19)))(22) $555,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation and $500,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation are provided solely for an interagency transfer to the Washington State University extension energy program to administer a technical assistance and education program for public agencies on the use of alternative fuel vehicles. The Washington State University extension energy program shall prepare a report regarding the utilization of the program and submit this report to the transportation committees of the legislature by November 15, 2023.

(((20)))(23)(a) (($400,000))$500,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for King county metro to develop a pilot program to place teams, including human services personnel, along routes that are enduring significant public safety issues and various disruptive behavior in south King county. The team would be available to deescalate disruptions, provide immediate access to transit resources, and refer customers to community resources to break cycles of inappropriate behavior. The teams must consist of individuals trained in deescalation and outreach. Team functions and duties should be cocreated with community stakeholders.

(b) King county metro must provide a report to the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2024, regarding the effectiveness of the program, any suggestions for improving its efficacy, and any modifications that might be necessary for other transit providers to institute similar programs.

(c) King county metro must provide at least a 50 percent match to develop the pilot program funded by this subsection.

(((21)))(24) $500,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for planning to move Grays Harbor transit operation and administration facilities from the current location.

(25) $900,000 of the climate transit programs account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to implement certain recommendations from the 2023 frequent transit service study. The department shall define levels and types of demand-response service and measure access to these services within Washington for the purpose of gaining a fuller picture of transit access. The department must collect ongoing transportation data and develop systems to allow for analysis of disparities in access to existing fixed route transit. The data collection should prioritize collecting information on accessibility and inclusion of people with disabilities, vulnerable populations in overburdened communities, and other underserved communities. The department shall submit the report to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management by June 30, 2025, on data collection efforts. The amount provided in this subsection must initially be placed in unallotted status and may not be spent prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, this amount shall lapse.

(26) $100,000 of the multimodal account—state appropriation is provided solely for a pilot program to provide funds to nonprofit organizations to offer rideshare vouchers to people with low-income and people with disabilities who rely on paratransit to get to and from work or medical appointments. The department must work with a group who provides dialysis services in King county and with a group who provides employment services and supports to adults with disabilities in the four most populous counties in Washington. The department must submit a report to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature by June 1, 2025. The report must incorporate feedback from participants to the extent possible and evaluate the effectiveness of the program as an alternative to current public transportation programs.

Sec. 222. 2023 c 472 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—MARINE—PROGRAM X

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($575,986,000))

$571,589,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
(($163,791,000))

$198,650,000

Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$121,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($739,898,000))

$770,360,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The office of financial management budget instructions require agencies to recast enacted budgets into activities. The Washington state ferries shall include a greater level of detail in its 2023-2025 supplemental and 2025-2027 omnibus transportation appropriations act requests, as determined jointly by the office of financial management, the Washington state ferries, and the transportation committees of the legislature. This level of detail must include the administrative functions in the operating as well as capital programs. The data in the tables in the report must be supplied in a digital file format.

(2) (($90,014,000))$97,060,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—federal appropriation and (($50,067,000))$51,450,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation are provided solely for auto ferry vessel operating fuel in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, which reflect cost savings from a reduced biodiesel fuel requirement and, therefore, is contingent upon the enactment of section 703 ((of this act)), chapter 472, Laws of 2023. The amount provided in this subsection represents the fuel budget for the purposes of calculating any ferry fare fuel surcharge. The department shall review future use of alternative fuels and dual fuel configurations, including hydrogen.

(3) $500,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for operating costs related to moving vessels for emergency capital repairs. Funds may only be spent after approval by the office of financial management.

(4) The department must work to increase its outreach and recruitment of populations underrepresented in maritime careers and continue working to expand apprenticeship and internship programs, with an emphasis on programs that are shown to improve recruitment for positions with the state ferry system.

(5) $175,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to continue a study of passenger demographics. The study may be included as part of a larger origin and destination study. The department shall report study results to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023.

(6) The department shall continue to oversee a consultant study to identify and recommend cost-effective strategies to maximize walk-on passenger ridership of the Anacortes – San Juan ferry routes. The study is due to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023.

(7) (($11,842,000))$26,887,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for Washington state ferries to:

(a) Provide scholarships, coursework fees, and stipends for candidates to become licensed deck officers (mates);

(b) Improve the process for unlicensed candidates who have achieved able-bodied sailor (AB) status to earn their mate's license;

(c) Annually hire, orient, train, and develop entry level engine room staff at the wiper classification with the intention of successfully promoting to oiler classification;

(d) Create an operations project management office; ((and))

(e) Increase human resources capacity to expand recruitment efforts, including to communities currently underrepresented within Washington state ferries, and add a workforce ombuds;

(f) Hire additional deck and engine crew for each vessel; and

(g) Hire additional dispatch staff.

(8)(a) During negotiations of the 2025-2027 collective bargaining agreements, the department must conduct a review and analysis of the collective bargaining agreements governing state ferry employees, to identify provisions that create barriers for, or contribute to creating a disparate impact on, newly hired ferry employees, including those who are women, people of color, veterans, and other employees belonging to communities that have historically been underrepresented in the workforce. The review and analysis must incorporate, to the extent practicable, the findings and recommendations from the December 2022 joint transportation committee study on Washington state ferries' workforce, and must also include, but not be limited to, provisions regarding seniority, work assignments, and work shifts. The review and analysis must also include consultation with the governor's office of labor relations, the governor's office of equity, and the attorney general's office.

(b) For future negotiations or modifications of the collective bargaining agreements, it is the intent of the legislature that the collective bargaining representatives for the state and ferry employee organizations may consider the findings of the review and analysis required in (a) of this subsection and negotiate in a manner to remove identified barriers and address identified impacts so as not to perpetuate negative impacts.

(9) (($1,500,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for the restoration of service to Sidney, British Columbia. Funds must be held in unallotted status pending completion of the assessment referenced in subsection (12) of this section.

(10))) $1,504,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 188, Laws of 2023 (state ferry workforce development issues). If chapter 188, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(((11) $1,000,000))(10) $5,000,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for support of the Kitsap transit passenger ferry to supplement service on the Seattle-Bremerton route.

(((12)))(11) $100,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely to assess temporary service restoration options for the Sidney, British Columbia route until Washington state ferries can resume its service. Washington state ferries must provide service options and recommendations to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 15, 2023.

(((13) $2,100,000))(12) $2,549,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for security services at Colman Dock.

(((14) $9,000,000))(13) $13,856,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for overtime and familiarization expenses incurred by engine, deck, and terminal staff. The department must provide updated staffing cost estimates for fiscal years 2024 and 2025 with its annual budget submittal and updated estimates by January 1, 2024.

(((15)))(14) $1,064,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for traffic control at ferry terminals at Seattle, Fauntleroy, Kingston, Edmonds, Mukilteo, and Bainbridge Island, during peak ferry travel times, with a particular focus on Sundays and holiday weekends.

(((16)))(15) $93,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Washington state ferries to secure housing for workforce training sessions and to pay in advance for the costs of transportation worker identification credentials, merchant mariner credentials, and medical examinations for incoming ferry system employees and trainees.

(((17)))(16) $10,417,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for vessel maintenance initiatives to:

(a) Add a second shift at the Eagle Harbor maintenance facility;

(b) Establish maintenance management project controls to maximize vessel maintenance work at the Eagle Harbor facility;

(c) Expand the existing Washington state ferries Eagle Harbor apprenticeship program from two to eight apprentices; and

(d) Maintain assets in a state of good repair by investing in enterprise asset management operating capacity.

(((18)))(17)(a) $855,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for Washington state ferries to provide to Seattle Central Community College for a pilot with the Seattle Maritime Academy for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium. Funding may not be expended until Washington state ferries certifies to the office of financial management that a memorandum of agreement with Seattle Central Community College has been executed, and the office of financial management determines that funds provided in this subsection are utilized for programs that are a benefit to the Washington state ferries or the prospective workforce pipeline of the Washington state ferries. The memorandum of agreement with Seattle Central Community College must address:

(i) Prioritized use of training and other facilities and implementation of joint training opportunities for Washington state ferries' employees and trainees;

(ii) Development of a joint recruitment plan with Seattle Central Community College aimed at increasing enrollment of women and people of color, with specific strategies to recruit existing community and technical college students, maritime skills center students, high school students from maritime programs, including maritime skills center students, foster care graduates, and former juvenile rehabilitation and adult incarcerated individuals; and

(iii) Consultation between the parties on the development of the training program, recruitment plan and operational plan, with an emphasis on increasing enrollment of women and people of color.

(b) The joint training and recruitment plan must be submitted to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023. The Washington state ferries must submit findings of program effectiveness and recommendations for continuation of the pilot, to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.

(((19)))(18) $420,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account appropriation—state is provided solely for a contract with an organization with experience evaluating and developing recommendations for the Washington state ferries' workforce to provide expertise on short-term strategies including, but not limited to, addressing recruitment, retention, diversity, training needs, leadership development, and succession planning. The consultant shall provide additional assistance as deemed necessary by the Washington state ferries to implement recommendations from the joint transportation committee 2022 workforce study. Periodic updates must be given to the joint transportation committee and the governor.

(((20)))(19) By December 31st of each year, as part of the annual ferries division performance report, the department must report on the status of efforts to increase the staff available for maintaining the customary level of ferry service, including staff for deck, engine, and terminals. The report must include data for a 12-month period up to the most recent data available, by staff group, showing the number of employees at the beginning of the 12-month period, the number of new employees hired, the number of employees separating from service, and the number of employees at the end of the 12-month period. The department report on additional performance measures must include:

(a) Numbers of trip cancellations due to crew availability or vessel mechanical issues; and

(b) Current level of service compared to the full-service schedules in effect in 2019.

(20) $3,170,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for the King county marine division to increase weekday, midday water taxis trip frequency on the Seattle to Vashon passenger-only ferry route.

(21) $500,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to evaluate options for the state to return to providing state passenger-only ferry service to support existing ferry service routes.

(a) The study must focus on the routes recommended for further study by the 2020 study of passenger-only ferry service by the Puget Sound regional council as well as San Juan county interisland passenger-only ferry service. The department must contract with a third-party entity with experience in passenger-only ferry service.

(b) The evaluation must study options for the state to return to providing state passenger-only ferry service to support existing ferry service routes. The study must include estimated ridership, operating costs including labor, vessel procurement options with prioritization given to clean fueled ferries such as electric ferries, funding options including state subsidies of passenger-only ferry districts, and schedule and timing to implement passenger-only ferry options in evaluated routes.

(c) A progress report is due to the governor and transportation committees of the legislature by October 30, 2024. A final report is due to the governor and transportation committees of the legislature by June 1, 2025.

Sec. 223. 2023 c 472 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—RAIL—PROGRAM Y—OPERATING

Carbon Emissions Reduction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,250,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($90,565,000))

$85,798,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,335,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$46,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($92,861,000))

$89,429,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) The department shall continue to pursue restoring Amtrak Cascades service to pre-COVID service levels, and to the service levels committed to through the department's obligation of funding from the federal American recovery and reinvestment act. A status report must be provided to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management by September 1, 2023.

(2)(a) $2,250,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the continued coordination, engagement, and planning for a new ultra high-speed ground transportation corridor with participation from Washington state, Oregon state, and British Columbia, and is a reappropriation of funds appropriated in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium. For purposes of this subsection, "ultra high-speed" means a maximum testing speed of at least 250 miles per hour. These efforts are to support and advance activities and must abide by the memorandum of understanding signed by the governors of Washington and Oregon states, and the premier of the province of British Columbia in November 2021. The department shall establish a policy committee with participation from Washington state, Oregon state, and British Columbia, including representation from the two largest caucuses of each chamber of the Washington state legislature, and coordinate the activities of the policy committee to include:

(i) Developing an organizational framework that facilitates input in decision-making from all parties;

(ii) Developing a public engagement approach with a focus on equity, inclusion, and meaningful engagement with communities, businesses, federal, state, provincial, and local governments including indigenous communities;

(iii) Developing and leading a collaborative approach to prepare and apply for potential future federal, state, and provincial funding opportunities, including development of strategies for incorporating private sector participation and private sector contributions to funding, including through the possible use of public-private partnerships;

(iv) Beginning work on scenario analysis addressing advanced transportation technologies, land use and growth assumptions, and an agreed to and defined corridor vision statement; and

(v) Developing a recommendation on the structure and membership of a formal coordinating entity that will be responsible for advancing the project through the project initiation stage to project development and recommended next steps for establishment of the coordinating entity. Project development processes must include consideration of negative and positive impacts on communities of color, low-income households, indigenous peoples, and other disadvantaged communities.

(b) By June 30, 2024, the department shall provide to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature a high-level status update that includes, but is not limited to, the status of the items included in (a)(i) through (v) of this subsection.

(c) By June 30, 2025, the department shall provide to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature a report detailing the work conducted by the policy committee and recommendations for establishing a coordinating entity. The report must also include an assessment of current activities and results relating to stakeholder engagement, planning, and any federal funding application. As applicable, the assessment should also be sent to the executive and legislative branches of government in Oregon state and appropriate government bodies in the province of British Columbia.

(((4)))(3) $1,800,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to pursue federal grant opportunities to develop and implement a technology-based truck parking availability system along the Interstate 5 Corridor in partnership with Oregon state and California state to maximize utilization of existing truck parking capacity and deliver real-time parking availability information to truck drivers. The department may use a portion of the appropriation in this subsection for grant proposal development and as state match funding for technology-based truck parking availability system federal grant applications. The department must update the transportation committees of the legislature on agency activities and their status by December 1, 2023, and to provide a final report to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.

(((5) $5,950,000))(4)(a) $1,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for ((implementation of truck parking improvements recommended by the freight mobility strategic investment board in consultation with the department under section 206(4) of this act. The office of financial management must place this amount in unallotted status))design work on the I-5 Fort Lewis weigh station and SR 906 phase 3 truck parking improvements.

(b) The legislature intends to provide $4,950,000 in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium for additional truck parking improvements. As part of the department's 2025-2027 budget submittal, the department and the freight mobility strategic investment board, after consulting with appropriate entities, must provide a list of specific truck parking solutions within the $4,950,000 amount. The list may also include additional funding recommendations beyond this amount for more immediate expansion of truck parking capacity, as well as for long-term expansion of truck parking capacity.

Sec. 224. 2023 c 472 s 224 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—LOCAL PROGRAMS—PROGRAM Z—OPERATING

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($13,569,000))

$14,286,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$2,567,000

Multiuse Roadway Safety Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,230,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,450,000))

$1,950,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($18,816,000))

$20,033,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $500,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for development, administration, program management, and evaluation of the federal fund exchange pilot program.

(2) $1,063,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department, from amounts set aside out of statewide fuel taxes distributed to counties according to RCW 46.68.120(3), to contract with the Washington state association of counties to:

(a) Contract with the department of fish and wildlife to identify, inventory, and prioritize county-owned fish passage barriers;

(b) Continue streamlining and updating the county road administration board's data dashboard, to provide a more detailed, more transparent, and user-friendly platform for data management, reporting, and research by the public and other interested parties;

(c) Commission a study to develop guidance for county public works departments conducting environmental justice assessments in their communities and recommend best practices for community engagement plans to address environmental health disparities for identified overburdened communities;

(d) Contract for a study to identify best practices within public works for the recruitment and retention of employees, including: Recommendations for improving outreach and recruitment to underrepresented populations, methods to partner with local community colleges and universities, methods to expand apprenticeship and internship programs, strategies to increase training and development opportunities, and recommendations for career advancement programs and better work-life balance outcomes;

(e) Update the 2020 county transportation revenue study; and

(f) By December 15, 2024, report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature the deliverables from and the amounts expended on the purposes enumerated in this subsection.

(((5)))(4)(a) $200,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop the preliminary phase of an action plan for the establishment of cycle highways in locations that connect population centers and support mode shift.

(b) The action plan may complement and incorporate existing resources, including the state trails database maintained by the recreation and conservation office, local and regional plans, and the state active transportation plan.

(c) The action plan may also include, but is not limited to:

(i) Recommended design; geometric and operational criteria and typologies appropriate to urban, suburban, and rural settings; settings that include shared use; and incremental approaches to achieve desired facility types;

(ii) A model or methodology to project potential demand and carrying capacity based on facility quality, level of traffic stress, location, directness, land use, and other key attributes;

(iii) Examination of the feasibility of developing high-capacity infrastructure for bicycle and micromobility device use within a variety of contexts and recommendations for pilot projects;

(iv) Identification of key gaps in regional networks, including planned and aspirational routes and locations within three miles of high-capacity transit or existing shared-use paths and trails suitable for transportation;

(v) Identification of legal, regulatory, financial, collaboration, and practical barriers to development and community acceptance and support of such facilities; and

(vi) Recommended strategies to consider and address issues to avoid unintended consequences such as displacement, and to ensure equity in long-term development of such facilities.

(d) The department must provide a report with its initial findings, and recommendations for next steps, to the transportation committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025.

(((6)))(5) $140,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Pierce county ferry to eliminate fares for passengers 18 years of age and younger.

(((7)))(6) $750,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for a grant program to support local initiatives that expand or establish civilian intervention programs for nonmoving violations, focusing on nonpunitive interventions such as helmet voucher programs, fee offset programs, fix-it tickets, and repair vouchers that provide solutions for vehicle equipment failures for low-income road users.

(a) Grants must be awarded to local jurisdictions based on locally developed proposals to establish or expand existing programs, including programs with community led organizations. Eligible jurisdictions under the grant program include cities, counties, tribal government entities, tribal organizations, law enforcement agencies, or nonprofit organizations.

(b) The department shall report on its website by December 1st of each year on the recipients, locations, and types of projects funded under this subsection.

(((8)))(7) $146,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 428, Laws of 2023 (Wahkiakum ferry). If chapter 428, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.

(8) $500,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the city of Seattle's department of transportation to create a digital conflict area awareness management program to provide machine-readable information for transportation operators, such as operators of autonomous vehicle fleets, to be aware of conflict areas, such as emergency response zones, work zones, schools, pick-up/drop-off locations, and other areas where vulnerable road users may be present. 

(a) Program  work must include: 

(i) The city of Seattle engaging with first responders and transportation management officials and other relevant stakeholders to determine  program implementation needs and processes; 

(ii)  A feasibility study on implementation of the program's mobility and curb data specifications to include, but not be limited to, information on necessary partners and data platforms, and the ability to integrate real-time 911 dispatch, emergency vehicles, and work zones and other areas to reduce conflicts for transportation operators  operating autonomous vehicle fleets on public roads and in the right -of-way. 

(b) Support work for the program must be conducted in coordination and partnership with city of Seattle departments, the nonprofit steward of the program's mobility and curb data specifications, the Washington state  department of transportation, and other entities potentially impacted by the implementation of the program. To the extent feasible, the city of Seattle is required to prepare an implementation pilot of the digital conflict area awareness management program to make a standardized data feed available publicly for transportation operator use.

(c) The department must require a report from the city of Seattle with any  findings and recommendations of the digital conflict area awareness management program and any implementation needs and process mapping for use by other jurisdictions, which must be provided to the transportation committees of the legislature by  June 30, 2025.

(End of part)

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES—CAPITAL

Sec. 301. 2023 c 472 s 301 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

State Patrol Highway Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,700,000))

$7,888,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($7,700,000))$7,888,000 of the state patrol highway account—state appropriation is provided solely for the following projects:

(a) $250,000 is for emergency repairs;

(b) $2,000,000 is for roof replacements;

(c) $350,000 is for fuel tank decommissioning;

(d) $500,000 is for generator and electrical replacement;

(e) $500,000 is for the exterior envelope of the Yakima office;

(f) $2,000,000 is for energy efficiency projects;

(g) $1,000,000 is for pavement surface improvements;

(h) $300,000 is for fire alarm panel replacement;

(i) $188,000 is for repairs at the Bellevue district office;

(j) $200,000 is for an academy master plan. As part of the academy master plan, the Washington state patrol must review and provide an analysis on the potential to colocate some training programs with other state agencies, including the department of corrections, the department fish and wildlife, the liquor and cannabis board, and the criminal justice training commission. The Washington state patrol must consult with the other state agencies to determine where cost efficiencies and mutually beneficial shared arrangements for training delivery could occur. The funding for this academy master plan is not a commitment to fund any components related to the expansion of the academy in the future;

(((j)))(k) $500,000 reappropriation is for the Tacoma district office generator replacement project; and

(((k)))(l) $100,000 reappropriation is for the energy improvement project at the SeaTac northbound facility.

(2) The Washington state patrol may transfer funds between projects specified in subsection (1) of this section to address cash flow requirements.

(3) If a project specified in subsection (1) of this section is completed for less than the amount provided, the remainder may be transferred to another project specified in subsection (1) of this section not to exceed the total appropriation provided in subsection (1) of this section after notifying the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature 20 days before any transfer.

(4) By December 1, 2023, the Washington state patrol shall provide a report to the transportation committees of the legislature detailing utility incentives that will reduce the cost of heating, ventilating, and air conditioning systems funded in this section.

(5) By December 1, 2023, the Washington state patrol shall provide its capital improvement and preservation plan for agency facilities to the appropriate committees of the legislature.

Sec. 302. 2023 c 472 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD

Move Ahead WA Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$9,333,000

Rural Arterial Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($58,000,000))

$62,487,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$2,456,000

County Arterial Preservation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$35,500,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($105,289,000))

$109,776,000

Sec. 303. 2023 c 472 s 304 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—FACILITIES—PROGRAM D—(DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS)—CAPITAL

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($29,173,000))

$33,910,000

Move Ahead WA Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$12,011,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,200,000

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$3,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($42,384,000))

$47,124,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $4,025,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for payments of a financing contract issued pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the department facility located at 15700 Dayton Ave N in Shoreline. All payments from the department of ecology pursuant to the agreement with the department to pay a share of the financing contract for this facility must be deposited into the motor vehicle account.

(2)(a) $10,011,000 of the move ahead WA account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to improve its ability to keep facility assets in a state of good repair. In using the funds appropriated in this subsection, the department, with periodic reporting to the joint transportation committee, must develop and implement a prioritization of facility capital preservation needs and repair projects. The legislature intends these to be reasonable, forward-thinking investments that consider potential future space efficiency measures and consolidations, including those assessed as having high commercial value and potential returns to state transportation funds associated with the sale of the property. Prioritization must be based on, but not limited to, the following criteria: (i) Employee safety and facility security; (ii) state and federal regulatory and statutory requirements and compliance issues, including clean buildings requirements; (iii) quality of work issues; (iv) facility condition assessment evaluations and scoring; (v) asset preservation; and (vi) amount of operational support provided by the facility to the achievement of the department's performance measures and outcomes, including facility utilization based on field operations work supported at the location. "Field operations" include maintenance, transportation operations, materials testing, and construction.

(b) By October 15, 2024, covering the first 15 months of the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the department must provide a report based on the prioritization of facility preservation needs and repair projects developed pursuant to (a) of this subsection to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. The report must include: (i) A by facility ranking based on the criteria implemented; (ii) detailed information on the actions taken in the previous period to address the identified issues and deficiencies; and (iii) the plan, by facility, to address issues and deficiencies for the remainder of the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium and the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.

(c) The by facility ranking developed under (b) of this subsection must be the basis of an agency budget submittal for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.

(3)(a) $1,200,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to evaluate safety rest areas along Interstate 5 and Interstate 90 for potential truck parking expansion opportunities. The department shall also evaluate commercial vehicle inspection locations, in coordination with the Washington state patrol, for potential truck parking expansion opportunities.

(b) These evaluations must include assessments of opportunities to provide additional truck parking through rest stop and inspection location reconfiguration, expansion, and conversion, as well as evaluation of potential improvements to restroom facilities at weigh stations with truck parking. The department shall consider opportunities to expand rest stop footprints onto additional department-owned property, as well as opportunities to acquire property for rest stop expansion. Opportunities to convert a rest stop to a commercial vehicle-only rest stop must be considered if property is available to develop a new light-duty vehicle rest stop within a reasonable distance. The department shall include an evaluation of a potential truck parking site at John Hill Rest Area along the Interstate 90 corridor identified in the joint transportation committee's "Truck Parking Action Plan." Evaluations must include cost estimates for reconfiguration, expansion, and conversion, as well as other recommendations for the development of these sites.

(c) The department should consult with the federal highway administration, the Washington state patrol, the Washington trucking association, the freight mobility strategic investment board, and local communities.

(d) The department must update the transportation committees of the legislature on agency activities and their status by December 1, 2023, and to provide a final report to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.

(4) $15,457,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for making improvements to the department facility located at 11018 NE 51st Cir in Vancouver to meet the Washington state clean buildings performance standard.

(5) $4,100,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for preliminary engineering and design associated with the demolition and replacement of the department's vehicle repair and parts building at 6431 Corson Avenue South in Seattle. The information developed must include square footage, components of the facility, and cost comparisons with similar maintenance facilities. Should the department request construction costs for this facility in its agency budget submittal for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, these costs must be explained in detail using the form C-100 required for state agency capital building projects in the capital budget.

Sec. 304. 2023 c 472 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—IMPROVEMENTS—PROGRAM I

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
$23,794,000

Climate Active Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$2,000,000

Model Toxics Control Stormwater Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$15,000,000

Move Ahead WA Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$137,500,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($317,000))

$634,000

Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($32,643,000))

$46,899,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($80,524,000))

$98,984,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($445,933,000))

$479,598,000

Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
(($300,000,000))

$337,144,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($52,530,000))

$74,115,000

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,143,116,000))

$1,945,763,000

Special Category C Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($133,749,000))

$143,917,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,915,000))

$11,511,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($400,000))

$1,250,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($304,480,000))

$319,464,000

Move Ahead WA Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($590,313,000))

$704,331,000

Move Ahead WA Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($340,300,000))

$363,155,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($4,593,514,000))

$4,705,059,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire connecting Washington account—state appropriation, the entire move ahead WA account—federal appropriation, the entire move ahead WA account—state appropriation, and the entire transportation partnership account—state appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by fund, project, and amount in LEAP Transportation Document ((2023-1))2024-1 as developed ((April 21, 2023))February 18, 2024, Program - Highway Improvements Program (I)((. However,))with the following conditions and limitations:

(a) Limited transfers of specific line-item project appropriations may occur between projects for those amounts listed subject to the conditions and limitations in section 601 ((of this act)), chapter 472, Laws of 2023.

(b) The department must structure requests for qualifications and requests for proposals in a manner that provides a high degree of certainty that bids come in as expected according to engineer estimates made through the cost estimate valuation process. The department may request bid offers with alternates for components of a larger project so that the department may present to the legislature modified options for projects to minimize project delays and stay within appropriated funding resources.

(c) If bid proposals exceed engineer estimates by more than five percent, the department shall report this information to the transportation committees of the legislature within two weeks of receiving the bid proposals.

(d) It is the intent of the legislature to provide $32,500,000 in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium and $21,507,000 in the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium for the I-5 Nisqually delta project (L4000008).

(2) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire motor vehicle account—state appropriation and motor vehicle account—federal appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities listed in LEAP Transportation Document ((2023-2))2024-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 21, 2023))February 18, 2024, Program - Highway Improvements Program (I). Any federal funds gained through efficiencies, adjustments to the federal funds forecast, or the federal funds redistribution process must then be applied to highway and bridge preservation activities.

(3) Within the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, the department may transfer appropriation authority between programs I and P, except for appropriation authority that is otherwise restricted in this act, as follows:

(a) Ten days prior to any transfer, the department must submit its request to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature and consider any concerns raised.

(b) The director of the office of financial management must first provide written authorization for such transfer to the department and the transportation committees of the legislature.

(c) The department shall submit a report on appropriation authority transferred in the prior fiscal year using this subsection as part of the department's annual budget submittal.

(4) The connecting Washington account—state appropriation includes up to (($1,737,009,000))$1,392,823,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.889.

(5) The special category C account—state appropriation includes up to $118,773,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.812.

(6) The transportation partnership account—state appropriation includes up to (($32,643,000))$46,899,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.873.

(7) The appropriations in this section include savings due to anticipated project underruns; however, it is unknown which projects will provide savings. The legislature intends to provide sufficient flexibility for the department to manage to this savings target. To provide this flexibility, the office of financial management may authorize, through an allotment modification, reductions in the amounts that are provided solely for a particular purpose within this section subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department must confirm that any modification requested under this subsection of amounts provided solely for a specific purpose are not expected to be used for that purpose in this fiscal biennium;

(b) Allotment modifications authorized under this subsection may not result in increased funding for any project beyond the amount provided for that project in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium in LEAP Transportation Document ((2023-2))2024-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 21, 2023))February 18, 2024;

(c) Allotment modifications authorized under this subsection apply only to amounts appropriated in this section from the following accounts: Connecting Washington account—state, and move ahead WA account—state; and

(d) The office of financial management must provide notice of allotment modifications authorized under this subsection within 10 working days to the transportation committees of the legislature. By December 1, 2023, and December 1, 2024, the department must submit a report to the transportation committees of the legislature regarding the actions taken to date under this subsection.

(8) The department shall itemize all future requests for the construction of buildings on a project list and submit them through the transportation executive information system as part of the department's annual budget submittal. It is the intent of the legislature that new facility construction must be transparent and not appropriated within larger highway construction projects.

(9) The legislature continues to prioritize the replacement of the state's aging infrastructure and recognizes the importance of reusing and recycling construction aggregate and recycled concrete materials in our transportation system. To accomplish Washington state's sustainability goals in transportation and in accordance with RCW 70A.205.700, the legislature reaffirms its determination that recycled concrete aggregate and other transportation building materials are natural resource construction materials that are too valuable to be wasted and landfilled, and are a commodity as defined in WAC 173-350-100.

(10) By June 30, 2025, to the extent practicable, the department shall decommission the facilities for the Lacey project engineering office and the Tumwater project engineering office at the end of their lease terms and consolidate the Lacey project engineering office and the Tumwater project engineering office into the department's Olympic regional headquarters.

(11) The legislature intends that any savings realized on the following projects will not be attributable to the application of practical design, retired risk, or unused contingency funding for the purposes of RCW 47.01.480:

(a) I-5/Marvin Road/SR 510 Interchange (L1100110); and

(b) I-82/EB WB On and Off Ramps (L2000123).

(12)(a) (($300,000,000))$337,144,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund—federal appropriation, (($312,653,000))$110,439,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, (($427,459,000))$45,112,000 of the move ahead WA account—federal appropriation, $576,827,000 of the move ahead WA account—state appropriation, $187,790,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation, $2,960,000 of the motor vehicle account—local/private appropriation, and (($1,293,000))$8,329,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation are provided solely for the Fish Passage Barrier Removal project (0BI4001) with the intent of fully complying with the federal U.S. v. Washington court injunction by 2030.

(b) The fish passage barrier removal program, in consultation with the office of innovative partnerships, shall explore opportunities to employ innovative delivery methods to ensure compliance with the court injunction including, but not limited to, public-private partnerships and batched contracts. It is the intent of the legislature that appropriations for this purpose may be used to jointly leverage state and local funds for match requirements in applying for competitive federal aid grants provided in the infrastructure investment and jobs act for removals of fish passage barriers under the national culvert removal, replacement, and restoration program. State funds used for the purpose described in this subsection must not compromise full compliance with the court injunction by 2030.

(c) The department shall coordinate with the Brian Abbott fish passage barrier removal board to use a watershed approach by replacing both state and local culverts guided by the principle of providing the greatest fish habitat gain at the earliest time. The department shall deliver high habitat value fish passage barrier corrections that it has identified, guided by the following factors: Opportunity to bundle projects, tribal priorities, ability to leverage investments by others, presence of other barriers, project readiness, culvert conditions, other transportation projects in the area, and transportation impacts. The department and Brian Abbott fish barrier removal board must provide updates on the implementation of the statewide culvert remediation plan to the legislature by November 1, 2023, and June 1, 2024.

(d) The department must keep track of, for each barrier removed: (i) The location; (ii) the amount of fish habitat gain; and (iii) the amount spent to comply with the injunction.

(e) During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the department shall provide reports of the amounts of federal funding received for this project to the governor and transportation committees of the legislature by November 1, 2023, and semiannually thereafter.

(13)(a) (($6,000,000))$5,944,000 of the move ahead WA account—state appropriation ((is))and $15,000,000 of the model toxics stormwater account—state appropriation are provided solely for the Stormwater Retrofits and Improvements project (L4000040). It is the intent of the legislature, over the 16-year move ahead WA investment program, to provide $500,000,000 for this program.

(b) ((The appropriation in this subsection))Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $5,944,000 is provided solely for the Urban Stormwater Partnership - I-5 Ship-Canal Bridge Pilot (Seattle) project.

(c) The funding provided for stormwater retrofits and improvements must enhance stormwater runoff treatment from existing roads and infrastructure with an emphasis on green infrastructure retrofits. Projects must be prioritized based on benefits to salmon recovery and ecosystem health, reducing toxic pollution, addressing health disparities, and cost-effectiveness. The department of transportation must submit progress reports on its efforts to reduce the toxicity of stormwater runoff from existing infrastructure, recommendations for addressing barriers to innovative solutions, and anticipated demand for funding each fiscal biennium.

(14)(a) (($35,465,000))$25,067,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation is provided solely for the SR 3 Freight Corridor (T30400R) project. The legislature intends to provide a total of $78,910,000 for this project, including an increase of $12,000,000 in future biennia to safeguard against inflation and supply/labor interruptions and ensure that:

(i) The northern terminus remains at Lake Flora Road and the southern terminus at the intersection of SR 3/SR 302; and

(ii) Multimodal safety improvements at the southern terminus remain in the project to provide connections to North Mason school district and provide safe routes to schools((; and

(iii) Intersections on the freight corridor are constructed at Romance Hill and Log Yard road)).

(b) With respect to right-of-way acquisition and the construction of the SR 3 Freight Corridor project (T30400R), tribal consultation with the Suquamish tribe shall begin at the earliest stage of planning, including without limitation on all funding decisions and funding programs, to provide a government-to-government mechanism for the tribe to evaluate, identify, and expressly notify governmental entities of any potential impacts to tribal cultural resources, archaeological sites, sacred sites, fisheries, or other rights and interests in tribal lands and lands within which the tribe possesses rights reserved or protected by federal treaty, statute, or executive order. The consultation is independent of, and in addition to, any public participation process required under state law, or by a state agency, including the requirements of Executive Order 21-02 related to archaeological and cultural resources, and regardless of whether the agency receives a request for consultation from the Suquamish tribe. Regularly scheduled tribal consultation meetings with the Suquamish tribe shall continue throughout the duration of any funding or program decisions and proposed project approval.

(15) $6,000,000 of the move ahead WA account—state appropriation and $10,000,000 of the move ahead WA account—federal appropriation are provided solely for the SR 3/Gorst Area - Widening project (L4000017). Tribal consultation with the Suquamish tribe must begin at the earliest stage of planning, including, without limitation, all funding decisions and funding programs, to provide a government-to-government mechanism for the tribe to evaluate, identify, and expressly notify governmental entities of any potential impacts to tribal cultural resources, archaeological sites, sacred sites, fisheries, or other rights and interests in tribal lands and lands within which the tribe possesses rights reserved or protected by federal treaty, statute, or executive order. The consultation is independent of, and in addition to, any public participation process required under state law, or by a state agency, including the requirements of Executive Order 21-02 related to archaeological and cultural resources, and regardless of whether the agency receives a request for consultation from the Suquamish tribe. Regularly scheduled tribal consultation meetings with the Suquamish tribe must continue throughout the duration of any funding program and proposed project approval.

(16)(a) $84,500,000 of the move ahead WA account—federal appropriation, $137,500,000 of the move ahead WA account—private/local appropriation, and $53,000,000 of the move ahead WA account—state appropriation are provided solely for the I-5 Columbia river bridge project (L4000054). The legislature finds that the replacement of the I-5 Columbia river bridge is a project of national significance and is critical for the movement of freight. One span is now 105 years old, at risk for collapse in the event of a major earthquake, and no longer satisfies the needs of commerce and travel. Replacing the aging interstate bridge with a modern, seismically resilient, multimodal structure that provides improved mobility for people, goods, and services is a high priority. Therefore, the legislature intends to support the replacement of the I-5 Columbia river bridge with an investment of $1,000,000,000 over the 16-year move ahead WA investment program.

(b) The legislature recognizes the importance of the I-5/Mill Plain Boulevard project (L2000099) and intends to provide funding for reconstruction of the existing interchange in coordination with construction of the Interstate 5 bridge over the Columbia river.

(c) The department shall provide regular updates on the status of ongoing coordination with the state of Oregon on any bistate agreements regarding sharing of revenues, use of revenues, and fiscal responsibilities of each state. Prior to finalizing any such agreement, the department shall provide a draft of the agreement to the transportation committees of the legislature for review and input. Additionally, the department shall advise on the status of any bistate agreements to the joint transportation committee beginning in September 2023 and quarterly thereafter until any agreements are finalized.

(17) The legislature recognizes the importance of the US-12/Walla Walla Corridor Improvements project (T20900R) and intends to advance funding to provide matching funds if competitive federal funding is awarded for the final remaining four-lane section between Wallula and Nine Mile Hill. The department, in consultation with local governments in the vicinity, must pursue any federal funding available.

(18) $2,642,000 of the move ahead WA account—state appropriation is provided solely for the US 101/Simdars Bypass project (L4000013).

(19) (($570,842,000))$338,512,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation, (($155,000))$3,109,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation, (($26,537,000))$27,201,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation, (($200,800,000))$178,543,000 of the move ahead WA account—federal appropriation, (($68,191,000))$36,370,000 of the move ahead WA account—state appropriation, and (($6,980,000))$211,131,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation are provided solely for the SR 167/SR 509 Puget Sound Gateway project (M00600R).

(a) Any savings on the project must stay on the Puget Sound Gateway corridor until the project is complete.

(b) In making budget allocations to the Puget Sound Gateway project, the department shall implement the project's construction as a single corridor investment. The department shall continue to collaborate with the affected stakeholders as it implements the corridor construction and implementation plan for state route number 167 and state route number 509. Specific funding allocations must be based on where and when specific project segments are ready for construction to move forward and investments can be best optimized for timely project completion. Emphasis must be placed on avoiding gaps in fund expenditures for either project.

(c) The entire multimodal transportation account—state appropriation in this subsection is for:

(i) The design phase of the Puyallup to Tacoma multiuse trail along the state route number 167 right-of-way acquired for the project to connect a network of new and existing trails from Mount Rainier to Point Defiance Park; and

(ii) Segment 2 of the state route number 167 completion project shared-use path to provide connections to the interchange of state route number 167 at 54th to the intersection of state route number 509 and Taylor Way in Tacoma.

(20)(((a) $394,963,000))$260,138,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation, (($400,000))$1,250,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation, and (($4,496,000))$5,592,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation are provided solely for the SR 520 Seattle Corridor Improvements - West End project (M00400R) and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department shall reject any bid offers on the Portage Bay Bridge and Roanoke lid project that exceed engineer estimates by more than 10 percent. If all bid offers are rejected, the department shall repackage the request for qualifications and the request for proposals for the north bridge portion of this project only. The legislature recommends that the north bridge project be delivered using the progressive design-build delivery method. It is the intent of the legislature to complete the southern bridge and Roanoke lid portion of the project at a future time.

(b) Upon completion of the Montlake Phase of the West End project (current anticipated contract completion of ((2023))2024), the department shall sell or transfer that portion of the property not ((used for permanent))needed for transportation ((improvements))purposes and shall initiate a process to convey ((that))or transfer such portion of the surplus property to a subsequent owner.

(c) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, (($400,000))$500,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation is provided solely for noise mitigation activities. It is the intent of the legislature to provide an additional $600,000 for noise mitigation activities.

(d) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $750,000 of the state route number 520 corridor account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to implement the following as a result of a public process related to signage:

(i) Remove and replace an existing sign bridge on Montlake boulevard;

(ii) Repaint an existing sign bridge on the newly constructed Montlake lid; and

(iii) Install appropriate signage on southbound Montlake boulevard north of the westbound SR 520 on-ramp.

(21) $450,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the SR 900 Safety Improvements project (L2021118). The department must: (a) Work in collaboration with King county and the Skyway coalition to align community assets, transportation infrastructure needs, and initial design for safety improvements along state route number 900; and (b) work with the Skyway coalition to lead community planning engagement and active transportation activities.

(22) (($25,000,000))$7,500,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation is provided solely for a federal fund exchange pilot program. The pilot program must allow exchanges of federal surface transportation block grant population funding and state funds at an exchange rate of 95 cents in state funds per $1.00 in federal funds. The projects receiving the exchanged federal funds must adhere to all federal requirements, including the applicable disadvantaged business enterprise goals. The entirety of the appropriation in this subsection must be held in unallotted status until surface transportation block grant population funding has been offered to the state, and the department determines that a federalized project or projects funded in this section is eligible to spend the surface transportation block grant population funding. $22,500,000 from existing state appropriations identified elsewhere within this section are available to be used as part of the exchange. Upon determination that a project or projects funded in this section is eligible to spend the offered surface transportation block grant population funding, state funds appropriated in this section for the eligible state project or projects in an amount equal to 100 percent of the offered surface transportation block grant population funding must be placed in unallotted status.

(23) (($5,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation, $5,000,000))$552,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation((,)) and (($5,000,000))$9,802,000 of the move ahead WA account—state appropriation are provided solely for the SR 522/Paradise Lk Rd Interchange & Widening on SR 522 (Design/Engineering) project (NPARADI), specifically for design of, preliminary engineering, and right-of-way acquisition for the interchange and widening as a single project. The department must consider reserving portions of state route number 522, including designated lanes or ramps, for the exclusive or preferential use of public transportation vehicles, privately owned buses, motorcycles, private motor vehicles carrying not less than a specified number of passengers, or private transportation provider vehicles pursuant to RCW 47.52.025.

(24) $2,356,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation is for the SR 164 east Auburn access project (L1000120). The department must work with the Muckleshoot tribe to deliver the project.

(25) $14,012,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation and $2,213,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation are provided solely for the SR 224/Red Mountain Vicinity Improvement Project (L1000291). The department shall provide funding to the city of West Richland to complete the project within the project scope identified by the legislature and within the total amount of funding provided by the legislature. The department shall not amend the project scope of work to add pavement preservation on state route number 224 from West Richland city limits to Antinori road.

(26) For the I-5/156th NE Interchange in Marysville (L2000139), it is the expectation of the legislature that the department shall delegate work to the city of Marysville to prepare the access revision report for the project.

(27) $250,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for preliminary engineering of the SR 14/Camas Slough Bridge (L1000352) project. Funds may be used for predesign environmental assessment work, community engagement, design, and project cost estimation.

(28) $45,000,000 of the move ahead WA account—federal appropriation, $10,000,000 of the move ahead WA account—state appropriation, and $6,650,000 of the special category C account—state appropriation are provided solely for the SR 18 Widening - Issaquah/Hobart Rd to Raging River - Phase I project (L1000371) for improvements from the Tiger Mountain summit to the east down to Deep Creek, from milepost 23 to milepost 25, and roundabouts at the Issaquah Hobart Road interchange ramp intersections.

(29) $1,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for matching funds for the department to apply to the federal highway administration's wildlife crossings pilot program, in the 2024 grant application cycle, for wildlife crossing underpasses on U.S. 97 between Tonasket and Riverside.

Sec. 305. 2023 c 472 s 306 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—PRESERVATION—PROGRAM P

Move Ahead WA Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($13,291,000))

$45,064,000

Recreational Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($793,000))

$769,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($48,759,000))

$70,411,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($135,073,000))

$97,993,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($534,350,000))

$560,102,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($12,000,000))

$17,010,000

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($37,078,000))

$107,825,000

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,481,000))

$7,434,000

Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($10,892,000))

$12,202,000

Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($12,000))

$1,662,000

Interstate 405 and State Route Number 167 Express

Toll Lanes Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($27,026,000))

$15,183,000

Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($10,000,000))

$12,036,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($834,755,000))

$947,691,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire connecting Washington account—state appropriation, the entire move ahead WA account—federal appropriation, the entire move ahead WA account—state appropriation, and the entire transportation partnership account—state appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by fund, project, and amount in LEAP Transportation Document ((2023-1))2024-1 as developed ((April 21, 2023))February 18, 2024, Program - Highway Preservation Program (P). However, limited transfers of specific line-item project appropriations may occur between projects for those amounts listed subject to the conditions and limitations in section 601 ((of this act)), chapter 472, Laws of 2023.

(2) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire motor vehicle account—state appropriation and motor vehicle account—federal appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities listed in LEAP Transportation Document ((2023-2))2024-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 21, 2023))February 18, 2024, Program - Highway Preservation Program (P). Any federal funds gained through efficiencies, adjustments to the federal funds forecast, or the federal funds redistribution process must then be applied to highway and bridge preservation activities.

(3) Within the motor vehicle account—state appropriation and motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, the department may transfer appropriation authority between programs I and P, except for appropriation authority that is otherwise restricted in this act, as follows:

(a) Ten days prior to any transfer, the department must submit its request to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature and consider any concerns raised.

(b) The director of the office of financial management must first provide written authorization for such transfer to the department and the transportation committees of the legislature.

(c) The department shall submit a report on appropriation authority transferred in the prior fiscal year using this subsection as part of the department's annual budget submittal.

(4) The transportation partnership account—state appropriation includes up to $10,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.873.

(5) $22,000,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for extraordinary costs incurred from litigation awards, settlements, or dispute mitigation activities not eligible for funding from the self-insurance fund (L2000290). The amount provided in this subsection must be held in unallotted status until the department submits a request to the office of financial management that includes documentation detailing litigation-related expenses. The office of financial management may release the funds only when it determines that all other funds designated for litigation awards, settlements, and dispute mitigation activities have been exhausted.

(6) Within the connecting Washington account—state appropriation, the department may transfer funds from Highway System Preservation (L1100071) to other preservation projects listed in the LEAP transportation document identified in subsection (1) of this section, if it is determined necessary for completion of these high priority preservation projects. The department's next budget submittal after using this subsection must appropriately reflect the transfer.

(7) By June 30, 2025, to the extent practicable, the department shall decommission the facilities for the Lacey project engineering office and the Tumwater project engineering office at the end of their lease terms and consolidate the Lacey project engineering office and the Tumwater project engineering office into the department's Olympic regional headquarters.

(8) The appropriations in this section include funding for starting planning, engineering, and construction of the Elwha River bridge replacement. To the greatest extent practicable, the department shall maintain public access on the existing route.

(9) (($25,000,000))$7,500,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation is provided solely for a federal fund exchange pilot program. The pilot program must allow exchanges of federal surface transportation block grant population funding and state funds at an exchange rate of 95 cents in state funds per $1.00 in federal funds. The projects receiving the exchanged federal funds must adhere to all federal requirements, including the applicable disadvantaged business enterprise goals. The entirety of the appropriation in this subsection must be held in unallotted status until surface transportation block grant population funding has been offered to the state and the department determines that a federalized project or projects funded in this section is eligible to spend the surface transportation block grant population funding. $22,500,000 from existing state appropriations identified elsewhere within this section are available to be used as part of the exchange. Upon determination that a project or projects funded in this section is eligible to spend the offered surface transportation block grant population funding, state funds appropriated in this section for the eligible state project or projects in an amount equal to 100 percent of the offered surface transportation block grant population funding must be placed in unallotted status.

(10) $21,000 of motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 54, Laws of 2023 (bridge jumping signs). ((If chapter 54, Laws of 2023 is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the amount provided in this subsection lapses.))

Sec. 306. 2023 c 472 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—TRANSPORTATION OPERATIONS—PROGRAM Q—CAPITAL

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($9,738,000))

$10,606,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($5,100,000))

$12,226,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$500,000

Move Ahead WA Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$611,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($15,338,000))

$23,943,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (($4,918,000))$8,830,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, $5,547,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation ((is)), and $500,000 of the motor vehicle account—private/local appropriation are provided solely for Programmatic Investment for Traffic Operations Capital projects (000005Q). By December 15th of each odd-numbered year, the department shall provide a report to the legislature listing all traffic operations capital project investments completed in the prior fiscal biennium.

(2) $3,080,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely to construct pedestrian signals at nine locations on state route number 7 from 124th Street South to 189th Street South (0000YYY).

(3) $1,463,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the replacement of 22 existing traffic cameras and installation of 10 new traffic cameras, including five pole installation sites, on the Interstate 90 corridor between mileposts 34 and 82 (L2021144). The department shall consult with news media organizations to explore options to allow such organizations access to traffic camera feeds.

Sec. 307. 2023 c 472 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION—PROGRAM W

Carbon Emissions Reduction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($74,027,000))

$101,921,000

Move Ahead WA Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($17,114,000))

$49,828,000

Puget Sound Capital Construction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($341,969,000))

$389,305,000

Puget Sound Capital Construction Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
(($33,698,000))

$87,049,000

Puget Sound Capital Construction Account—

Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,081,000))

$2,150,000

Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$472,000

Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($7,442,000))

$9,705,000

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($10,809,000))

$21,883,000

Capital Vessel Replacement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($46,818,000))

$21,688,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($532,958,000))

$684,001,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed in LEAP Transportation Document ((2023-2))2024-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 21, 2023))February 18, 2024, Program - Washington State Ferries Capital Program (W).

(2) (($5,000,000))$24,260,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for emergency capital repair costs (999910K). Funds may only be spent after approval by the office of financial management.

(3) (($46,818,000))$21,688,000 of the capital vessel replacement account—state appropriation ((is))and $11,554,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation are provided solely for the acquisition of a 144-car hybrid-electric vessel (L2000329). The amounts provided in this subsection are contingent upon the enactment of chapter 429, Laws of 2023. $11,554,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection from the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation must initially be placed in unallotted status and may not be spent prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, these amounts shall lapse.

(4) ((The legislature intends that funding will be provided in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium for the Future Hybrid Electric Ferry Class Pre-Design study (L2021131) to advance procurement of a new class of vessel that will account for changes in technology, staffing, and system needs. The legislature intends that part of the predesign study include a review of the benefits and costs of constructing all future new vessels based on the same design. The review may also compare and contrast the benefits and costs of a 144-vehicle capacity vessel with a 124-vehicle capacity vessel.

(5))) $8,032,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for modernization of the ticketing and reservation system (990052C). Of this amount, $3,032,000 must be held in unallotted status until Washington state ferries has consulted with the office of the chief information officer on the project scope and integration capabilities of the reservation system with existing Good to Go! and ORCA next generation products, and reported results to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature.

(((6)))(5) $125,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation and $125,000 of the Puget sound capital construction account—federal appropriation are provided solely for development of a terminal wait times information system (998609A). Washington state ferries must consult with the office of the chief information officer on a technology solution for automated vehicle detection, and report the project scope, along with office of the chief information officer recommendations, to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.

(((7)))(6) The transportation partnership account—state appropriation includes up to $7,195,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.873.

(((8)))(7) For the purposes of ferry and terminal electrification, the department must apply to the department of ecology for additional competitive grant funds available from Volkswagen settlement funds, and report on the status of the grant application by December 1, 2023.

(((9)))(8) For the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the marine division shall provide to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature a report for ferry capital projects in a manner consistent with past practices as specified in section 308, chapter 186, Laws of 2022.

(9) $1,500,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the future hybrid electric ferry predesign study (L2021131) to explore whether a new vessel class is needed to replace the aging Issaquah class ferries for operation on the Vashon-Southworth-Fauntleroy route. The predesign study shall account for changes in technology, staffing, and technology needs, and include a review of the benefits and cost of construction of all future new vessels based on the same design.

(10) $7,184,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account—state appropriation and $17,100,000 of the Move Ahead WA account appropriation are provided solely for vessel preservation projects (L2021072). It is the intent of the legislature to fully fund vessel preservation at the levels appropriated in the 2023-2025 biennial transportation appropriations act. The department is directed to plan vessel preservation work according to the original schedule and request additional funds in the 2025 supplemental transportation appropriations act to achieve original 2023-2025 expectations, to the extent practicable.

(11) $18,526,000 of the move ahead Washington account—state appropriation and $6,175,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation are provided solely for the construction of four new hybrid-electric Olympic class vessels (L2021073). $6,175,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection from the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation must initially be placed in unallotted status and may not be spent prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, these amounts shall lapse.

(12) $84,192,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the vessel and terminal electrification project (L4000072). The amount provided in this subsection must initially be placed in unallotted status and may not be spent prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, this amount shall lapse.

Sec. 308. 2023 c 472 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—RAIL—PROGRAM Y—CAPITAL

Carbon Emissions Reduction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($104,300,000))

$79,800,000

Essential Rail Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($676,000))

$1,412,000

Motor Vehicle Fund—State Appropriation
. . . .
$697,000

Move Ahead WA Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$1,500,000

Move Ahead WA Flexible Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($35,000,000))

$33,500,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Private/Local

Appropriation
. . . .
$12,000

Transportation Infrastructure Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($10,369,000))

$9,539,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($63,334,000))

$103,403,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
(($18,882,000))

$25,903,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($232,561,000))

$255,766,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by project and amount in LEAP Transportation Document ((2023-2))2024-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 21, 2023))February 18, 2024, Program - Rail Program (Y).

(2)(a) (($2,030,000))$2,680,000 of the transportation infrastructure account—state appropriation is provided solely for new low-interest loans approved by the department through the freight rail investment bank (FRIB) program. The department shall issue FRIB program loans with a repayment period of no more than 15 years, and charge only so much interest as is necessary to recoup the department's costs to administer the loans. The department shall report annually to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management on all FRIB loans issued.

(b) (($7,970,000 of the transportation infrastructure account—state appropriation is provided solely for new FRIB program loans recommended by the department for 2024 supplemental transportation appropriations. The department shall submit a prioritized list for any loans recommended to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature by November 15, 2023.

(c))) The department may change the terms of existing loans in the essential rail assistance account for repayment of loans, including the repayment schedule and rate of interest, for a period of up to 15 years for any recipient with a total loan value in the program of over 10 percent as of June 30, 2023.

(3) $5,000,000 of the transportation infrastructure account—state appropriation is provided solely for a low-interest loan for the Port of Longview Rail Corridor Expansion project (L1000347) to accommodate current and future port cargo-handling needs. The low-interest loan must comply with the requirements of RCW 47.76.460(2).

(4)(($7,566,836))$7,567,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for new statewide emergent freight rail assistance projects identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced in subsection (1) of this section.

(((4)))(5) $369,000 of the transportation infrastructure account—state appropriation and $1,100,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely for final reimbursement to Highline Grain, LLC for approved work completed on Palouse River and Coulee City (PCC) railroad track in Spokane county between the BNSF Railway Interchange at Cheney and Geiger Junction and must be administered in a manner consistent with freight rail assistance program projects.

(((5)))(6) The department shall issue a call for projects for the freight rail assistance program, and shall evaluate the applications in a manner consistent with past practices as specified in section 309, chapter 367, Laws of 2011. By November 15, 2024, the department shall submit a prioritized list of recommended projects to the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature.

(((6) $50,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation is provided solely for state match contributions to support the department's application for federal grant opportunities for a new ultra high-speed ground transportation corridor. These funds are to remain in unallotted status and are available only upon award of federal funds. The department must provide periodic grant application updates to the transportation committees of the legislature, as well as anticipated state match estimates for successful grants.))

(7) $33,500,000 of the move ahead WA flexible account—state appropriation is provided solely for rehabilitation of the Palouse River and Coulee City Railroad (L4000079). Up to $433,000 of the amount in this subsection may be used for management and oversight of operation and maintenance activities.

(8) (($15,000,000))$19,990,000 of the multimodal transportation account—federal appropriation is provided solely for the rehabilitation of the Salmon Bay drawbridge (752010A) to ensure the efficient movement of freight and passenger trains.

(9) $6,300,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation is provided solely to fund a zero emission drayage truck demonstration project (L1000324) at Northwest Seaport Alliance facilities.

(10) (($14,000,000))$28,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation is provided solely to fund a zero emission shore power infrastructure demonstration project at Northwest Seaport Alliance facilities (L1000325). Local funds sufficient to fully fund this project must be contributed to the project, and any agreements required for the project must be secured. $14,000,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection from the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation must initially be placed in unallotted status and may not be spent prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, these amounts shall lapse.

(11) $5,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation is provided solely to fund the replacement of two Tacoma rail diesel-electric switcher locomotives with zero emission battery-electric switcher locomotives and to install on-site charging equipment at a Tacoma rail facility (L1000327). Local funds sufficient to fully fund this project must be contributed to the project, and any agreements required for the project must be secured.

(12) $150,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the application of durable markings along state route number 906 to create up to 20 parking spaces for larger vehicles, including trucks.

(13) $26,500,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation is provided solely for port electrification competitive grants (L2021182). ((To be eligible to receive state funds under this section, a port must first))All public ports are eligible to receive funds under this subsection. A port seeking to use funds under this subsection to install shore power must adopt a policy that requires vessels that dock at the port facility to use shore power if such vessel is capable of using such power and when such power is available at the port facility.

(14) $2,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation is provided solely for port electrification at the port of Bremerton (L1000337), which may include the purchase and installation of zero emission port shore power systems and other zero emission infrastructure, equipment, and technology.

(15) (($500,000))$2,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation is provided solely for port electrification at the port of Anacortes (L1000338), which may include the purchase and installation of zero emission port shore power systems and other zero emission infrastructure, equipment, and technology. $1,500,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection from the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation must initially be placed in unallotted status and may not be spent prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, these amounts shall lapse.

(16) $2,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Port of Quincy Rail Infrastructure Expansion project (L1000348), an expansion of rail infrastructure within the Port of Quincy's current rail terminal and to nearby industrial zoned properties in the port district.

(17) $10,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Puyallup Tribe Port Shore Power and Crane Electrification Project (L1000346). The amount provided in this subsection must initially be placed in unallotted status and may not be spent prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, this amount shall lapse.

Sec. 309. 2023 c 472 s 310 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION—LOCAL PROGRAMS—PROGRAM Z—CAPITAL

Carbon Emissions Reduction Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($21,000,000))

$37,982,000

Climate Active Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($157,463,000))

$192,904,000

Freight Mobility Investment Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($21,098,000))

$21,847,000

Freight Mobility Multimodal Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($22,728,000))

$27,216,000

Highway Infrastructure Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($793,000))

$1,060,000

Highway Infrastructure Account—Federal Appropriation

. . . .
(($1,600,000))

$1,500,000

Move Ahead WA Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($106,707,000))

$115,200,000

((Move Ahead WA Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$10,000,000))

Move Ahead WA Flexible Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($29,000,000))

$34,500,000

((Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$500,000))

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($36,785,000))

$29,105,000

Motor Vehicle Account—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
(($103,553,000))

$164,698,000

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($99,032,000))

$128,441,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($73,818,000))

$132,141,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($684,077,000))

$886,594,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by project and amount in LEAP Transportation Document ((2023-2))2024-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 21, 2023))February 18, 2024, Program - Local Programs Program (Z).

(2) The amounts identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced under subsection (1) of this section for pedestrian safety/safe routes to school are as follows:

(a) (($34,673,000))$47,707,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation and (($37,563,000))$43,058,000 of the climate active transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely for pedestrian and bicycle safety program projects (L2000188 and L1000335). Of the amount of climate active transportation account funds appropriated in this subsection, up to one percent may be used for program administration and staffing.

(b) (($19,137,000))$31,553,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation, (($38,915,000))$45,399,000 of the climate active transportation account—state appropriation, and (($12,844,000))$21,157,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation are provided solely for safe routes to school projects (L2000189 and L1000334). Of the amount of climate active transportation account funds appropriated in this subsection, up to one percent may be used for program administration and staffing.

(c) For future rounds of grant selection, the department must reevaluate the criteria to increase geographic diversity of jurisdictions consistent with the requirements of the healthy environment for all (HEAL) act.

(3) The department shall submit a report to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023, and December 1, 2024, on the status of projects funded as part of the pedestrian safety/safe routes to school grant program and the Sandy Williams connecting communities grant program.

(4) (($6,875,000))$11,992,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for connecting Washington bicycle and pedestrian projects listed in the LEAP transportation document referenced in subsection (1) of this section.

(5) (($36,640,000))$46,580,000 of the motor vehicle account—federal appropriation is provided solely for acceleration of local preservation projects that ensure the reliable movement of freight on the national highway freight system (G2000100). The department will select projects as part of its update of the state freight plan, in consultation with the freight mobility strategic investment board and other stakeholders.

(6) (($23,750,000))$7,125,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for a federal fund exchange pilot program. The pilot program will allow exchanges of federal surface transportation block grant population funding and state funds at an exchange rate of 95 cents in state funds per $1.00 in federal funds. The entirety of the appropriation in this subsection must be held in unallotted status until: Surface transportation block grant population funding has been offered to the state, the department determines that a federalized project or projects funded in section 305 or 306 ((of this act)), chapter 472, Laws of 2023 is eligible to spend the surface transportation block grant population funding, and state funds appropriated in section 305 or 306, chapter 472, Laws of 2023 for the eligible state project or projects in an amount equal to 100 percent of the offered surface transportation block grant population funding have been placed in unallotted status. ((A))An annual report on the effectiveness of the exchange program, the total estimated cost of program administration, and recommendations for continuing the pilot program is due to the governor and transportation committees of the legislature by December ((1, 2024))1st of each year.

(7) (($128,400,000))$126,893,000 of the move ahead WA account—state appropriation and (($19,500,000))$25,000,000 of the move ahead WA flexible account—state appropriation are provided solely for new move ahead WA road and highway projects listed in LEAP Transportation Document ((2023-2))2024-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 21, 2023))February 18, 2024, Program - Local Programs Program (Z).

(a) For projects funded in this subsection, the department expects to have substantial reappropriations for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the department may, on a pilot basis, apply funding from a project with an appropriation that is unable to be used in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium to advance one or more of the projects listed in LEAP Transportation Document ((2023-2))2024-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 21, 2023))February 18, 2024, Program - Local Programs Program (Z), prioritizing projects first by project readiness.

(i) In instances when projects listed in the LEAP transportation documents referenced in (a) of this subsection are no longer viable or have been completed, the department may recommend in its next budget submittal alternative project proposals from the local jurisdictions if the project is similar in type and scope and consistent with limitations of certain funds provided. In the event that the listed project has been completed the local jurisdictions may, rather than submitting an alternative project, instead be reimbursed in the year in which it was scheduled for documented costs incurred implementing the listed project, not in excess of the amount awarded from the funding program.

(ii) At least 10 business days before advancing or swapping a project pursuant to this subsection, the department must notify the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. The advancement of a project may not hinder the delivery of the projects for which the reappropriations are necessary for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium.

(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, (($21,000,000))$25,493,000 of the move ahead WA account—state appropriation is provided solely for three roundabouts to be constructed on state route number 507 in partnership with local authorities (L1000330). The roundabout at Vail is with Thurston county, the roundabout at Bald Hills is with the city of Yelm, and the roundabout at state route number 702 is with Pierce county. The department is to work cooperatively with each local jurisdiction to construct these facilities within department rights-of-way. The department must provide all project predesign and design information developed to date to the local jurisdictions and have a project implementation agreement in place with each local jurisdiction within 180 calendar days of the effective date of this act. The implementation agreement may provide full control for the local authority to construct the project. Once the roundabouts are completed, the operations and maintenance of the roundabouts are the responsibility of the department. Of the amounts provided in this section, $7,000,000 is provided for the roundabout at Vail road and state route number 507.

(8) (($39,185,000))$48,135,000 of the climate active transportation account—state appropriation, $6,900,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation, and $3,000,000 of the move ahead WA flexible account—state appropriation are provided solely for move ahead WA pedestrian and bike projects listed in LEAP Transportation Document ((2023-2))2024-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 21, 2023))February 18, 2024, Program - Local Programs Program (Z). For projects funded in this subsection, if the department expects to have substantial reappropriations for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the department may, on a pilot basis, apply funding from a project with an appropriation that is unable to be used in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium to advance one or more of the projects listed in LEAP Transportation Document ((2023-2))2024-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 21, 2023))February 18, 2024, Program - Local Programs Program (Z), prioritizing projects first by tier then by project readiness. $8,950,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection from the climate active transportation account—state appropriation must initially be placed in unallotted status and may not be spent prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, these amounts shall lapse.

(a) In instances when projects listed in the LEAP transportation document referenced in this subsection (8) of this section are no longer viable or have been completed, the department may recommend in its next budget submittal alternative project proposals from the local jurisdictions if the project is similar in type and scope and consistent with limitations of certain funds provided. In the event that the listed project has been completed the local jurisdictions may, rather than submitting an alternative project, instead be reimbursed in the year in which it was scheduled for documented costs incurred implementing the listed project, not in excess of the amount awarded from the funding program.

(b) At least 10 business days before advancing or swapping a project pursuant to this subsection, the department must notify the office of financial management and the transportation committees of the legislature. The advancement of a project may not hinder the delivery of the projects for which the reappropriations are necessary for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium.

(9) $16,800,000 of the climate active transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the statewide school-based bicycle education grant program (L1000309). The department may partner with a statewide nonprofit to deliver programs.

(10) (($25,000,000))$30,000,000 of the climate active transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Sandy Williams connecting communities pilot program (L1000308) to deliver projects to reconnect communities that have been bifurcated by state highways. Priority must be given to historically marginalized or overburdened communities. The department may consult with the Cooper Jones active transportation safety council to identify geographic locations where there are high incidences of serious injuries and fatalities of active transportation users among vulnerable populations. $5,000,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection from the climate active transportation account—state appropriation must initially be placed in unallotted status and may not be spent prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, these amounts shall lapse.

(11) (($14,000,000))$26,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Guemes Ferry Boat Replacement project (L4000124). $12,000,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection from the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation must initially be placed in unallotted status and may not be spent prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, these amounts shall lapse.

(12) $6,500,000 of the move ahead WA flexible account—state appropriation is provided solely for development of an applied sustainable aviation evaluation center (L2021135). Snohomish county, in partnership with Washington State University, shall plan and establish facilities to evaluate, qualify or certify, and research technologies that can minimize the impact of aviation on human health and the environment. Funds may be used for, but are not limited to, planning, construction, and land acquisition for sustainable aviation fuel (SAF) qualification testing (ASTM D4054), research on the impact of SAF on the environment and human health, and SAF storage for the purpose of advancing sustainable aviation. At a minimum, three sustainable aviation platforms must be considered:

(a) Sustainable aviation fuel (SAF);

(b) Hydrogen; and

(c) Battery electric energy storage mechanisms.

(13) The legislature intends to fund the Ballard and Magnolia Bridge project (L4000123) and the Aurora Avenue North Safety Improvements project (L4000154), as described in section 911(18) and (19) ((of this act)), chapter 472, Laws of 2023.

(14) $200,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Seattle office of planning and community development to update and add to the 2020 I-5 Lid Feasibility Study with additional test cases with ramp changes and removals in downtown Seattle and alternative assumptions with regards to parking, expansion of Freeway Park, affordable housing, and commercial real estate (L2021140). The Seattle office of planning and community development shall conduct ongoing community engagement with underrepresented constituencies to support the technical work of this study and raise public awareness of opportunities of I-5 lids. Focus should be given to low-income households living and working in the I-5 lid study areas in central Seattle.

(15) $1,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to award grants to local jurisdictions to implement network-wide traffic conflict screening programs using video analytics in controlled intersections with a disproportionate number of traffic violations and injuries to active transportation users (L2021149). Grants must be awarded proportionally across the state and include controlled intersections in both urban and rural environments and along state highways and county roads. Grant recipients must report back to the department all traffic violation and active transportation facility data acquired during the grant period and provide the department with appropriate next steps for the state and the local jurisdiction to improve traffic safety for active transportation users in such intersections. The department must report such findings and recommendations to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.

(16)(a)(i) $5,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to establish a program for providing rebates to qualifying persons who purchase e-bikes and qualifying equipment and services from a qualifying retailer. Of this amount, $3,000,000 is for rebate amounts as described under (a)(iii)(A) of this subsection, and $2,000,000 is for rebate amounts as described under (a)(iii)(B) of this subsection.

(ii) To qualify for and use the rebate under this subsection, a person must be a resident of Washington state and purchase an e-bike and qualifying equipment and services, if any, from a qualifying retailer in this state. Qualifying equipment and services must be purchased as part of the same transaction as the e-bike.

(iii)(A) For persons who are at least 16 years of age and reside in households with incomes at or below 80 percent of the county area median income, the amount of the rebate is up to $1,200 on the sale of an e-bike and any qualifying equipment and services.

(B) For all other persons who are at least 16 years of age, the amount of the rebate is up to $300 on the sale of an e-bike and any qualifying equipment and services.

(C) No more than one rebate may be awarded per household.

(iv)(A) The department must establish application procedures for e-bike retailers to participate in the rebate program, and application and award procedures for applicants to participate in the program. If an applicant qualifies for a rebate amount and there is sufficient funds to award the applicant with the appropriate rebate amount, the department must provide the qualifying individual the rebate amount in a format that can be redeemed at the time of purchase at a qualifying retailer.

(B) An applicant must provide contact information, including a physical address, email address, and phone number, and demographic information, including the applicant's age, gender, race, and ethnicity, to the department on a form provided by the department at the time of applying for the rebate. The department may share or provide access to such information with the University of Washington to provide the University of Washington an opportunity to ask program applicants and recipients to fill out a survey collecting information only to the extent to inform its report described under (d) of this subsection.

(v) A qualifying retailer must register with the department before participating in the rebate program. A qualifying retailer must:

(A) Verify the identity of the qualifying individual at the time of purchase; and

(B) Calculate and apply the rebate at the time of purchase.

(vi) The department must reimburse a qualifying retailer that accepts a rebate from a qualifying individual no later than 30 days after the rebate is redeemed.

(vii) For purposes of this subsection (16)(a):

(A) "E-bike" means an electric assisted bicycle as defined in RCW 46.04.169, but does not include mountain bikes.

(B) "Qualifying equipment and services" means a bicycle helmet, safety vest, bicycle light, or bicycle lock, and any maintenance or other services agreed upon by the qualifying retailer and qualifying individual at the time of purchase.

(C) "Qualifying retailer" means a retail business establishment with one or more physical retail locations in this state that provides on-site e-bike sales, service, and repair and has registered with the department to participate in the rebate program established under this subsection.

(b) For fiscal year 2025, $2,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the department to establish an e-bike lending library and ownership grant program. The department may accept grant applications from other state entities, local governments, and tribes that administer or plan to administer an e-bike lending library or ownership program for their employees for commute trip reduction purposes. The department may also accept grant applications from nonprofit organizations or tribal governments that serve persons who are low-income or reside in overburdened communities and that administer or plan to administer an e-bike lending library or ownership program for qualifying persons. Grant recipients must report program information and participation data to the University of Washington to inform its report described under (d) of this subsection.

(c) It is the intent of the legislature that funding provided in (a) and (b) of this subsection continue to be appropriated in the 2025-2027 and 2027-2029 fiscal biennia.

(d) Of the amounts provided in this subsection (16), $90,000 is for the department to contract with the University of Washington's sustainable transportation lab to publish a general policy brief that provides innovative e-bike rebate and lending library or ownership grant program models and recommendations, a report on survey results based on data and demographic information collected under the e-bike rebate program established in (a) of this subsection, and a report on program information and data collected under the e-bike lending library and ownership grant program established in (b) of this subsection. An initial brief and report must be submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature by July 1, 2024, with the final policy brief and report due to the transportation committees of the legislature by July 1, 2025.

(e) The department may not collect more than five percent of appropriated amounts to administer the programs under (a) and (b) of this subsection.

(17) (($21,098,000))$21,847,000 of the freight mobility investment account—state appropriation and (($22,728,000))$27,216,000 of the freight mobility multimodal account—state appropriation are provided solely for freight mobility strategic investment board projects listed in the LEAP transportation document referenced in subsection (1) of this section.

(18) $4,150,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for matching funds for federal funds to reconstruct Grant county and Adams county bridges as part of the Odessa groundwater replacement program (L1000322).

(19) $9,240,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Aberdeen US 12 Highway-Rail Separation project (L1000331).

(20) (($750,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Grady Way overpass at Rainier Avenue South I-405 BRT Access study (L1000333).))$4,000,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation is provided solely for Kitsap transit design work and shore power infrastructure to gain coast guard approval to begin construction of electric hydrofoil passenger-only ferry (G2000115). The amount provided in this subsection must initially be placed in unallotted status and may not be spent prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, this amount shall lapse.

(21) The appropriations in this section include savings due to anticipated project underruns; however, it is unknown which projects will provide savings. The legislature intends to provide sufficient flexibility for the department to manage to this savings target. To provide this flexibility, the office of financial management may authorize, through an allotment modification, reductions in the amounts that are provided solely for a particular purpose within this section subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a) The department must confirm that any modification requested under this subsection of amounts provided solely for a specific purpose are not expected to be used for that purpose in this fiscal biennium;

(b) Allotment modifications authorized under this subsection may not result in increased funding for any project beyond the amount provided for that project in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium in LEAP Transportation Document ((2023-2))2024-2 ALL PROJECTS as developed ((April 21, 2023))February 18, 2024;

(c) Allotment modifications authorized under this subsection apply only to amounts appropriated in this section from the following accounts: Connecting Washington account—state, and move ahead WA account—state; and

(d) The office of financial management must provide notice of allotment modifications authorized under this subsection within 10 working days to the transportation committees of the legislature. By December 1, 2023, and December 1, 2024, the department must submit a report to the transportation committees of the legislature regarding the actions taken to date under this subsection.

(22) $5,199,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation is for the SR 285/North Wenatchee Area - Intersection Improvements project (228531B). The city of Wenatchee shall deliver the state route number 285/northwest access intersection improvements.

(23) $5,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for emergent issues related to safety for pedestrians and bicyclists.

(24) $1,086,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Kirkland 132nd Ave NE and Slater Avenue Crossing (G2000048).

(25) $8,813,000 of the connecting Washington account—state appropriation is provided solely for the SR 516/Jenkins Creek to 185th Avenue widening project (L2220059).

(26) $5,912,000 of the climate active transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the view ridge safe routes to schools project (L1000342). The amount provided in this subsection must initially be placed in unallotted status and may not be spent prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, this amount shall lapse.

(27) $500,000 of the climate active transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for preliminary engineering of pedestrian and other improvements to the Warren Avenue bridge (L2000339). The amount provided in this subsection must initially be placed in unallotted status and may not be spent prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, this amount shall lapse.

(28) $3,100,000 of the climate active transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the 84th Ave NE pedestrian and bicycle project in Kenmore (L1000366). The amount provided in this subsection must initially be placed in unallotted status and may not be spent prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, this amount shall lapse.

(29) $3,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Orting pedestrian bridge (L1000294).

(30) $5,472,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the B street sidewalk project in Spanaway (L1000367).

(31) $4,800,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for Bethel school district sidewalk projects (L1000370).

(32) $2,151,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the island view to vista field pedestrian-bicycle bridge project in Kennewick (L1000357).

(33) $1,800,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the sunset highway bike path project in Spokane (L1000353).

(34) $1,400,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the crosswalk and pedestrian crossing lights project at North Tapps middle school (L1000364).

(35) $1,000,000 of the climate active transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the SR 547 pedestrian and bicycle safety trail project in Kendall (L4000144). The amount provided in this subsection must initially be placed in unallotted status and may not be spent prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, this amount shall lapse.

(36) $982,000 of the carbon emissions reduction account—state appropriation is provided solely for the city of Tacoma to provide equipment, including an electric patrol boat, to support the communities for a healthy bay to continue to actively engage in ground and on-water research to identify solutions for addressing environmental challenges (L1000368). The amount provided in this subsection must initially be placed in unallotted status and may not be spent prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, this amount shall lapse.

(37) $800,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Lasher Street improvement project in Stevenson.

(38) $691,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the 88th avenue sidewalk project (L1000359).

(39) $515,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the rivergrove pedestrian bridge over SR 410 in Sumner (L1000363).

(40) $500,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the 23rd avenue sidewalk project in Puyallup (L1000362).

(41) $500,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for Sultan community transportation feasibility study (L1000365).

(42) $419,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Snowdon elementary safe routes to school project (L1000354).

(43) $260,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Republic pedestrian pathway project (L1000355).

(44) $175,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Madison street safe routes to school project in South Bend (L1000361).

(45) $163,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the golden tiger multi-use trail in Ferry county (L1000356).

(46) $40,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for the Tolt middle school access project in Carnation (L1000358).

(47) $1,680,000 of the motor vehicle account—state appropriation is provided solely for the SR-16/Wollochet Dr Safety Improvements project (L2021145).

(48) $250,000 of the multimodal transportation account—state appropriation is provided solely for a corridor study for state route 410 in Buckley.

(End of part)

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS

Sec. 401. 2023 c 472 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE ACCOUNT AND TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUE

Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,101,000))

$222,000

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($11,951,000))

$4,830,000

Special Category C Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$922,000

Highway Bond Retirement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($1,470,291,000))

$1,416,550,000

Ferry Bond Retirement Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$4,616,000

Transportation Improvement Board Bond Retirement

Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($10,895,000))

$10,305,000

Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account—

State Appropriation
. . . .
(($28,606,000))

$28,262,000

Toll Facility Bond Retirement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$76,372,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($1,604,754,000))

$1,542,079,000

Sec. 402. 2023 c 472 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL AGENT CHARGES

Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($220,000))

$47,000

((Transportation Improvement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$20,000))

Connecting Washington Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
(($2,391,000))

$1,077,000

Special Category C Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$183,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($2,814,000))

$1,307,000

Sec. 403. 2023 c 472 s 403 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation: For motor

vehicle fuel tax statutory distributions to

cities and counties
. . . .
(($465,354,000))

$461,954,000

Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For distribution to cities and

counties
. . . .
$26,786,000

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation: For

distribution to cities and counties
. . . .
$23,438,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($515,578,000))

$512,178,000

Sec. 404. 2023 c 472 s 404 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—TRANSFERS

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation: For motor

vehicle fuel tax refunds and statutory

transfers
. . . .
(($1,969,182,000))

$1,955,782,000

Sec. 405. 2023 c 472 s 405 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING—TRANSFERS

Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation: For motor

vehicle fuel tax refunds and transfers
. . . .
(($246,480,000))

$253,180,000

Sec. 406. 2023 c 472 s 406 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—ADMINISTRATIVE TRANSFERS

(1)(((a) Pilotage Account—State Appropriation: For

transfer to the Multimodal Transportation Account—State. . . .$200,000

(b) The amount transferred in this subsection represents partial repayment of prior biennium transfers to cover self-insurance liability premiums.

(2))) Transportation Partnership Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor Vehicle

Account—State. . . .$175,000,000

(((3)))(2) Connecting Washington Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Move Ahead WA

Account—State. . . .$200,000,000

(((4)))(3) Electric Vehicle Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Move Ahead WA

Flexible Account—State. . . .$29,200,000

(((5)))(4) Electric Vehicle Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Multimodal

Transportation Account—State. . . .$23,330,000

(((6)))(5) Washington State Aviation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Aeronautics

Account—State. . . .$150,000

(((7)))(6)(a) Carbon Emissions Reduction Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Climate Active

Transportation Account—State. . . .$178,885,000

(b)(i) Carbon Emissions Reduction Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Climate Active

Transportation Account—State. . . .$49,048,000

(ii) If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is not approved at the 2024 general election, this subsection (6)(b) has no force and effect.

(((8)))(7)(a) Carbon Emissions Reduction Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Climate Transit

Programs Account—State. . . .$408,000,000

(b)(i) Carbon Emissions Reduction Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Climate Transit

Programs Account—State. . . .$41,167,000

(ii) If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is not approved at the 2024 general election, this subsection (7)(b) has no force and effect.

(((9)))(8) Carbon Emissions Reduction Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound Ferry

Operations Account—State. . . .$4,200,000

(((10)))(9) Move Ahead WA Flexible Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Move Ahead WA

Account—State. . . .$100,000,000

(((11)))(10) Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project

Account—State Appropriation: For transfer to the

Motor Vehicle Account—State. . . .$25,000,000

(((12)))(11) Highway Safety Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the State Patrol Highway

Account—State. . . .(($77,000,000))

$87,000,000

(((13)))(12)(a) Transportation Partnership

Account—State Appropriation: For transfer to the Tacoma

Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State. . . .$6,611,000

(b) It is the intent of the legislature that this transfer is temporary, for the purpose of minimizing the impact of toll increases. An equivalent reimbursing transfer is to occur after the debt service and deferred sales tax on the Tacoma Narrows bridge construction costs are fully repaid in accordance with chapter 195, Laws of 2018.

(((14)))(13) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the State Patrol Highway

Account—State. . . .$1,500,000

(((15)))(14) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the County Arterial Preservation

Account—State. . . .$4,844,000

(((16)))(15) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Freight Mobility Investment

Account—State. . . .$8,511,000

(((17)))(16) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Rural Arterial Trust Account—State. . . .$4,844,000

(((18)))(17) Motor Vehicle Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Transportation Improvement

Account—State. . . .$9,688,000

(((19)))(18)(a) State Route Number 520 Civil Penalties

Account—State Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor

Vehicle Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

(b) The transfer in this subsection is to repay moneys loaned to the state route number 520 civil penalties account in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.

(((20)))(19) State Route Number 520 Civil Penalties

Account—State Appropriation: For transfer to the

State Route Number 520 Corridor Account—State. . . .$560,000

(((21)))(20)(a) Capital Vessel Replacement Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Connecting Washington

Account—State. . . .$29,000,000

(b) It is the intent of the legislature that this transfer is temporary, for the purpose of minimizing the use of bonding in the connecting Washington account.

(((22)))(21) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Complete Streets

Grant Program Account—State. . . .$14,670,000

(((23)))(22) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Highway Safety

Account—State. . . .$3,000,000

(((24)))(23) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor Vehicle

Account—State. . . .$15,000,000

(((25)))(24) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Freight Mobility

Multimodal Account—State. . . .$8,511,000

(((26)))(25) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Move Ahead WA Flexible

Account—State. . . .$11,790,000

(26) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Pilotage

Account—State. . . .$232,000

(27) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound Capital

Construction Account—State. . . .$175,000,000

(28) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound

Ferry Operations Account—State. . . .(($38,500,000))

$90,500,000

(29) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Regional Mobility

Grant Program Account—State. . . .$27,679,000

(30) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Rural Mobility

Grant Program Account—State. . . .$12,223,000

(31) Multimodal Transportation Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the State Patrol Highway

Account—State. . . .$59,000,000

(32)(a) Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement Project

Account—State Appropriation: For transfer to the

Transportation Partnership Account—State. . . .$47,899,000

(b) $22,899,000 of the amount transferred in this subsection represents repayment of debt service incurred for the construction of the SR 99/Alaskan Way Viaduct Replacement project (809936Z).

(33) Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor Vehicle

Account—State. . . .$543,000

(34)(a) General Fund Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the State Patrol Highway

Account—State. . . .$625,000

(b) The state treasurer shall transfer the funds only after receiving notification from the Washington state patrol under section 207 ((of this act)), chapter 472, Laws of 2023.

(35) Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound Capital

Construction Account—State. . . .$121,828,000

(36) Move Ahead WA Account—State Appropriation:

For transfer to the Puget Sound Ferry Operations

Account—State. . . .$120,000,000

(37)(a) Regional Mobility Grant Program

Account—State Appropriation: For transfer to the

Multimodal Transportation Account—State. . . .$6,098,000

(b) The amount transferred in this subsection represents the excess fund balance of the regional mobility grant program account pursuant to RCW 46.68.320(4).

(38) Transportation Infrastructure Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Multimodal

Transportation Account—State. . . .$2,000,000

(39) Transportation Infrastructure Account—State

Appropriation: For transfer to the Essential

Rail Assistance Account—State. . . .$1,000,000

Sec. 407. 2023 c 472 s 407 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE TREASURER—BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT TO BE PAID BY STATUTORILY PRESCRIBED REVENUE

Toll Facility Bond Retirement Account—Federal

Appropriation
. . . .
(($194,241,000))

$157,240,000

Toll Facility Bond Retirement Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
(($25,372,000))

$26,562,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($219,613,000))

$183,802,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $35,250,000 of the toll facility bond retirement account—federal appropriation may be used to prepay certain outstanding bonds if sufficient debt service savings can be obtained.

(End of part)

IMPLEMENTING PROVISIONS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 501. A new section is added to 2023 c 472 (uncodified) to read as follows:

WSDOT BUDGET SUBMITTAL

(1) By September 1, 2024, the office of financial management, in consultation with the department of transportation, must develop criteria for preservation and improvement minor works lists for the department of transportation's facilities program. The criteria should incorporate, adjusted where appropriate, provisions already in use in the omnibus capital appropriations act for minor works including: (a) The dollar limitation for each project to be included in the list; (b) the types of projects appropriate to be included in the list; (c) the project length limitation appropriate to be included in the list; and (d) a recommended initial allotment, revision request approval, and revision notification process associated with the list. The criteria must be the basis of the preservation and improvement minor works list included in the agency budget submittal beginning with the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.

(2) By September 1, 2024, the office of financial management, in consultation with the department of transportation, must develop criteria for providing building-related capital requests in a comparable format, adjusted where appropriate, to provisions already in use in the omnibus capital appropriations act for building projects, including the C-100 capital request form and other detail requirements for capital budget building submissions.

(End of part)

MISCELLANEOUS 2023-2025 FISCAL BIENNIUM

NEW SECTION. Sec. 601. A new section is added to 2023 c 472 (uncodified) to read as follows:

Appropriations in this act from the natural climate solutions account, carbon emissions reduction account, climate transit programs account, and climate active transportation account are subject to the requirements of RCW 70A.65.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602. A new section is added to 2023 c 472 (uncodified) to read as follows:

(1) The transportation carbon emissions reduction account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account are intended to affect reductions in transportation sector carbon emissions through a variety of carbon reducing investments. Such investments may include, but are not limited to: Transportation alternatives to single occupancy passenger vehicles; reductions in single occupancy passenger vehicle miles traveled; reductions in per mile emissions in vehicles, including through the funding of alternative fuel infrastructure and incentive programs; and emission reduction programs for freight transportation, including motor vehicles and rail, as well as for ferries and other maritime and port activities. Expenditures from the account may be made only for transportation carbon emission reducing purposes and may not be made for highway purposes authorized under the 18th Amendment of the Washington state Constitution, other than as specified in this section, and must be made in accordance with subsection (2) of this section. It is the legislature's intent that expenditures from the account used to reduce carbon emissions be made with the goal of achieving equity for communities that historically have been omitted or adversely impacted by past transportation policies and practices.

(2) Appropriations in an omnibus transportation appropriations act from the transportation carbon emissions reduction account must be made exclusively to fund the following activities:

(i) Active transportation;

(ii) Transit programs and projects;

(iii) Alternative fuel and electrification;

(iv) Ferries; and

(v) Rail.

(3) If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, unless otherwise specified, appropriations in chapter 472, Laws of 2023 (2023-2025 biennial transportation appropriations act), and chapter . . ., Laws of 2024 (this act), amounts which are appropriated from the carbon emissions reduction account shall be paid from the transportation carbon emissions reduction account as if they were appropriated from that account beginning on the effective date of Initiative Measure No. 2117.

(4) If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, on the effective date of Initiative Measure No. 2117 and prior to the repeal of the carbon emissions reduction account by Initiative Measure No. 2117, the balance of the carbon emissions reduction account must be transferred by the state treasurer to the transportation carbon emissions reduction account created in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603. Section 602 of this act takes effect on the effective date of Initiative Measure No. 2117 if the initiative is approved in the 2024 general election.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is not approved at the 2024 general election, section 602 of this act does not take effect.

Sec. 605. 2023 c 472 s 701 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY OVERSIGHT

The following transportation projects are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701(2) through (12), chapter 475, Laws of 2023 (omnibus operating appropriations act):

(((2)))(1) For the department of licensing: Website accessibility and usability, and to upgrade and improve prorate and fuel tax system; and

(((3)))(2) For the department of transportation: Linear referencing system (LRS) and highway performance monitoring system (HPMS) replacement, transportation reporting and accounting information system (TRAINS) upgrade and PROPEL – WSDOT support of one Washington, and capital systems replacement.

Sec. 606. RCW 14.40.020 and 2023 c 463 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The state commercial aviation work group shall submit a progress report to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by ((July))December 1, 2024, and annually every July 1st thereafter. The first report of the work group shall include a list of areas that will not have further review as the areas are in conflict with the operations of a military installation.

Sec. 607. RCW 46.68.300 and 2023 c 472 s 708 and 2023 c 167 s 8 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The freight mobility investment account is hereby created in the state treasury. Money in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account ((may))shall be used only for freight mobility projects that have been ((approved))recommended by the freight mobility strategic investment board in RCW 47.06A.020 and may include any principal and interest on bonds authorized for the projects or improvements. During the ((2019-2021 and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia))2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the expenditures from the account may also be used for the administrative expenses of the freight mobility strategic investment board.

Sec. 608. RCW 46.68.320 and 2010 c 247 s 702 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The regional mobility grant program account is hereby created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the grants provided under RCW 47.66.030.

(2) Beginning with September 2007, by the last day of September, December, March, and June of each year, the state treasurer shall transfer from the multimodal transportation account to the regional mobility grant program account ((five million dollars))$5,000,000.

(3) Beginning with September 2015, by the last day of September, December, March, and June of each year, the state treasurer shall transfer from the multimodal transportation account to the regional mobility grant program account ((six million two hundred fifty thousand dollars))$6,250,000.

(4) During the ((2009-2011))2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the regional mobility grant program account to the multimodal transportation account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the regional mobility grant program account.

Sec. 609. RCW 47.68.090 and 2017 c 48 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department of transportation may make available its engineering and other technical services, with or without charge, to any municipality or person desiring them in connection with the planning, acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, or operation of airports or air navigation facilities.

(2)(a) The department may render financial assistance by grant or loan, or both, to the following entities out of appropriations made by the legislature for the following purposes:

(i) Any municipality or municipalities acting jointly in the planning, acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, or operation of an airport owned or controlled, or to be owned or controlled by such municipality or municipalities;

(ii) Any Indian tribe recognized as such by the federal government or such tribes acting jointly in the planning, acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, or operation of an airport, owned or controlled, or to be owned or controlled by such tribe or tribes, and to be held available for the general use of the public; or

(iii) Any person or persons acting jointly in the planning, acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, or operation of an airport, owned or controlled, or to be owned or controlled by such person or persons, and to be held available for the general use of the public.

(b) Such financial assistance may be furnished in connection with federal or other financial aid for the same purposes: PROVIDED, That no grant or loan, or both, shall be in excess of ((seven hundred fifty thousand dollars))$750,000 for any one project: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no grant or loan, or both, shall be granted unless the municipality or municipalities acting jointly, the tribe or tribes acting jointly, or the person or persons acting jointly shall from their own funds match any funds made available by the department upon such ratio as the department may prescribe.

(c) The requirements of (b) of this subsection do not apply for projects when directed to do so by the legislature during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium in an omnibus transportation appropriations act.

(d) The department must establish, by rule, criteria for administering financial assistance to any entity.

(3) The department is authorized to act as agent of any municipality or municipalities acting jointly, any tribe or tribes acting jointly, or any person or persons acting jointly upon the request of such municipality or municipalities, tribe or tribes, or person or persons in accepting, receiving, receipting for, and disbursing federal moneys, and other moneys public or private, made available to finance, in whole or in part, the planning, acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, or operation of an airport or air navigation facility; and if requested by such municipality or municipalities, tribe or tribes, or person or persons, may act as its or their agent in contracting for and supervising such planning, acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, or operation; and all municipalities, tribes, and persons are authorized to designate the department as their agent for the foregoing purposes. The department, as principal on behalf of the state, and any municipality on its own behalf, may enter into any contracts, with each other or with the United States or with any person, which may be required in connection with a grant or loan of federal moneys for airport or air navigation facility purposes. All federal moneys accepted under this section shall be accepted and transferred or expended by the department upon such terms and conditions as are prescribed by the United States. All moneys received by the department pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the state treasury, and, unless otherwise prescribed by the authority from which such moneys were received, shall be kept in separate funds designated according to the purposes for which the moneys were made available, and held by the state in trust for such purposes. All such moneys are hereby appropriated for the purposes for which the same were made available, to be disbursed or expended in accordance with the terms and conditions upon which they were made available: PROVIDED, That any landing fee or charge imposed by any Indian tribe or tribes for the privilege of use of an airport facility planned, acquired, constructed, improved, maintained, or operated with financial assistance from the department pursuant to this section must apply equally to tribal and nontribal members: PROVIDED FURTHER, That in the event any municipality or municipalities, Indian tribe or tribes, or person or persons, or any distributor of aircraft fuel as defined by RCW 82.42.010 which operates in any airport facility which has received financial assistance pursuant to this section, fails to collect the aircraft fuel excise tax as specified in chapter 82.42 RCW, all funds or value of technical assistance given or paid to such municipality or municipalities, Indian tribe or tribes, or person or persons under the provisions of this section shall revert to the department, and shall be due and payable to the department immediately.

Sec. 610. 2023 c 445 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The department of licensing shall develop a comprehensive implementation plan for the expansion of the current driver training education requirement to obtain a driver's license to persons between the ages of 18 and 24. The target date for implementation of the new driver training education expansion is July 1, 2026. The driver training education expansion plan must be provided to the transportation committees of the legislature by ((October))December 1, 2024, and must include, but need not be limited to, the following:

(1) Consideration of courses that could satisfy the new driver training education requirement, including a condensed course option and a self-paced, online course option, with attention to the educational value, monetary and time costs required, and possible accessibility constraints for each course option considered;

(2) An assessment of public and private resources necessary to support the new driver training education requirement to ensure sufficient course availability and accessibility, including opportunities for the department of licensing to provide driver training education directly or to facilitate partnerships with schools, community organizations, or driver training providers, to close availability and accessibility gaps in rural and underserved areas. The assessment must include, but need not be limited to, an inventory of the current number, and an estimate of the increased number required to meet the anticipated need, of the following:

(a) Licensed driver training schools and traffic safety education programs in the state, by geographical region;

(b) Licensed driver training school and traffic safety education instructors;

(c) Licensed driver trainer instructors; and

(d) Driver training education course spaces available per year, by course option and for both classroom and behind-the-wheel instruction;

(3) In consultation with the office of equity, evaluation of access to driver training education courses and consideration of opportunities to improve access to driver training education for young drivers. The assessment must address, but should not be limited to, potential obstacles for young drivers for whom the cost of driver training education may pose a hardship, obstacles related to accessibility for young drivers who reside in rural areas, and obstacles for young drivers whose primary language is not English. The assessment must also include strategies that can be used to mitigate these potential obstacles, including possible exceptions to, or substitutions for, a driver training education requirement in cases where access-related obstacles cannot be overcome, such as when a behind-the-wheel driver training program may not be available within a reasonable distance of a person's residence;

(4) A plan for broad and accessible public outreach and education to communicate to Washington state residents new driver training education requirements, including a plan for the development of tools to assist residents in accessing driver training education courses that meet the new requirements;

(5) Collaboration with educational service districts to determine the extent to which educational service districts can facilitate the coordination between school districts or secondary schools of a school district and driver training schools to increase access to driver training education courses by students who reside within the boundaries of an applicable school district;

(6) An examination of opportunities to address the financial need of persons for whom the cost of driver training education courses licensed by the department of licensing may pose a hardship, through a voucher or other financial assistance program. The examination must include quantified estimates of the extent to which the cost of driver training education could pose a significant obstacle, as well as possible approaches to help reduce or eliminate this obstacle;

(7) An examination, in consultation with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, of opportunities to address the financial need of students for whom the cost of driver training education offered as part of a traffic safety education program may pose a hardship, through a grant or other financial assistance program. The examination must include quantified estimates of the extent to which the cost of driver training education could pose a significant obstacle, as well as possible approaches to help reduce or eliminate this obstacle; and

(8) An assessment of approaches used by other states that require driver training by persons age 18 and older, including examination of how this has impacted traffic safety in the state and the extent to which the requirement may have decreased access to driver's licenses, including through examination of the rate of driver's license holders by age and other demographic characteristics compared to that of neighboring, or otherwise similarly situated, states.

(End of part)

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 701. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702. Except for section 602 of this act, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

(End of part)

--- END ---