BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 19.150 RCW to read as follows:

An occupant may not use a self-service storage facility for residential purposes, and a self-service storage facility is not subject to the provisions of the residential landlord-tenant act under chapter 59.18 RCW.

--- END ---