BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 84.14.040 and 2021 c 187 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The following criteria must be met before an area may be designated as a residential targeted area:

(a) The area must be within an urban center, as determined by the governing authority;

(b) The area must lack, as determined by the governing authority, sufficient available, desirable, and convenient residential housing, including affordable housing, to meet the needs of the public who would be likely to live in the urban center, if the affordable, desirable, attractive, and livable places to live were available;

(c) The providing of additional housing opportunity, including affordable housing, in the area, as determined by the governing authority, will assist in achieving one or more of the stated purposes of this chapter;

(d) If the residential targeted area is designated by a county, the area must be located in an unincorporated area of the county that is within an urban growth area under RCW 36.70A.110 and the area must be: (i) In a rural county, served by a sewer system and designated by a county prior to January 1, 2013; or (ii)(A) in a county ((that includes a campus of an institution of higher education, as defined in RCW 28B.92.030, where at least one thousand two hundred students live on campus during the academic year))with a population greater than 275,000; and (((iii)))(B) until July 15, 2024, in a county seeking to promote transit supportive densities and efficient land use in an area that is located within a designated urban growth area and within 0.25 miles of a corridor where bus service is scheduled at least every ((thirty))30 minutes for no less than 10 hours per weekday and is in service or is planned for service to begin within five years of designation; and

(e) For a residential targeted area designated by a county after July 25, 2021, the county governing authority must conduct an evaluation of the risk of potential displacement of residents currently living in the area if the tax incentives authorized in this chapter were to be used in the area. The county may use an existing analysis if one exists. An area may not be designated as a residential targeted area unless: (i) The evaluation finds that the risk of displacement is minimal; or (ii) the governing authority mitigates the risk of displacement with locally adopted mitigation measures such as, but not limited to, ensuring that those directly or indirectly displaced have a first right of refusal to occupy the newly created dwelling units receiving an exemption under this chapter, including the affordable units if they otherwise meet the qualifications.

(2) For the purpose of designating a residential targeted area or areas, the governing authority may adopt a resolution of intention to so designate an area as generally described in the resolution. The resolution must state the time and place of a hearing to be held by the governing authority to consider the designation of the area and may include such other information pertaining to the designation of the area as the governing authority determines to be appropriate to apprise the public of the action intended.

(3) The governing authority must give notice of a hearing held under this chapter by publication of the notice once each week for two consecutive weeks, not less than seven days, nor more than ((thirty))30 days before the date of the hearing in a paper having a general circulation in the city or county where the proposed residential targeted area is located. The notice must state the time, date, place, and purpose of the hearing and generally identify the area proposed to be designated as a residential targeted area.

(4) Following the hearing, or a continuance of the hearing, the governing authority may designate all or a portion of the area described in the resolution of intent as a residential targeted area if it finds, in its sole discretion, that the criteria in subsections (1) through (3) of this section have been met.

(5) After designation of a residential targeted area, the governing authority must adopt and implement standards and guidelines to be utilized in considering applications and making the determinations required under RCW 84.14.060. The standards and guidelines must establish basic requirements for both new construction and rehabilitation, which must include:

(a) Application process and procedures;

(b) Income and rent standards for affordable units;

(c) Requirements that address demolition of existing structures and site utilization; and

(d) Building requirements that may include elements addressing parking, height, density, environmental impact, and compatibility with the existing surrounding property and such other amenities as will attract and keep permanent residents and that will properly enhance the livability of the residential targeted area in which they are to be located.

(6)(a) The governing authority may adopt and implement, either as conditions to eight-year exemptions or as conditions to an extended exemption period under RCW 84.14.020(1)(a)(ii) (B) or (C), or as conditions to any combination of exemptions authorized under this chapter, more stringent income eligibility, rent, or sale price limits, including limits that apply to a higher percentage of units, than the minimum conditions for an extended exemption period under RCW 84.14.020(1)(a)(ii) (B) or (C).

(b) Additionally, a governing authority may adopt and implement as a contractual prerequisite to any exemption granted pursuant to RCW 84.14.020:

(i) A requirement that applicants pay at least the prevailing rate of hourly wage established under chapter 39.12 RCW for journey level and apprentice workers on residential and commercial construction;

(ii) Payroll record requirements consistent with RCW 39.12.120(1);

(iii) Apprenticeship utilization requirements consistent with RCW 39.04.310; and

(iv) A contracting inclusion plan developed in consultation with the office of minority and women's business enterprises.

(7) For any multiunit housing located in an unincorporated area of a county, a property owner seeking tax incentives under this chapter must commit to renting or selling at least ((twenty))20 percent of the multifamily housing units as affordable housing units to low and moderate-income households. In the case of multiunit housing intended exclusively for owner occupancy, the minimum requirement of this subsection (7) may be satisfied solely through housing affordable to moderate-income households.

(8) Nothing in this section prevents a governing authority from adopting and implementing additional requirements to any exemption granted under RCW 84.14.020.

Sec. 2. RCW 84.14.060 and 2014 c 96 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The duly authorized administrative official or committee of the city or county may approve the application if it finds that:

(a) A minimum of four new units are being constructed or in the case of occupied rehabilitation or conversion a minimum of four additional multifamily units are being developed;

(b) If applicable, the proposed multiunit housing project meets the affordable housing requirements as described in RCW 84.14.020;

(c) The proposed project is or will be, at the time of completion, in conformance with all local plans and regulations that apply at the time the application is approved;

(d) The owner has complied with all standards and guidelines adopted by the city or county under this chapter; and

(e) The site is located in a residential targeted area of an urban center or urban growth area that has been designated by the governing authority in accordance with procedures and guidelines indicated in RCW 84.14.040.

(2) An application may not be approved after July 1, 2007, if any part of the proposed project site is within a campus facilities master plan((, except as provided in RCW 84.14.040(1)(d))).

(3) An application may not be approved for a residential targeted area in a rural county on or after January 1, 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to this act.

--- END ---