BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that rates of catalytic converter theft have rapidly increased statewide and nationwide, due in part to existing challenges with accurately identifying stolen catalytic converters and tracking them through the stream of commerce after they have been removed from their originating vehicles. The legislature also finds that recent evidence suggests most purchases of stolen catalytic converters are conducted by unlicensed, unregulated purchasers.

Therefore, the legislature intends to require all purchasers to be licensed and subject to regulation and inspection. To facilitate the ability to track catalytic converters, the legislature further intends to require permanent marking of catalytic converters for the purpose of identifying the originating vehicle. The legislature also intends to create a related structure for enforcing these provisions and imposing penalties commensurate with the enforcement and penalty structures found in comparable areas of law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 19.290 RCW to read as follows:

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize licensed scrap metal businesses to purchase or sell junk vehicles or major component parts as defined in RCW 46.79.010.

Sec. 3. RCW 19.290.010 and 2023 c 125 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Commercial account" means a relationship between a scrap metal business and a commercial enterprise that is ongoing and properly documented under RCW 19.290.030.

(2) "Commercial enterprise" means a corporation, partnership, limited liability company, association, state agency, political subdivision of the state, public corporation, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(3) "Commercial metal property" means: Utility access covers; street light poles and fixtures; road and bridge guardrails; highway or street signs; water meter covers; traffic directional and control signs; traffic light signals; any metal property marked with the name of a commercial enterprise, including but not limited to a telephone, commercial mobile radio services, cable, electric, water, natural gas, or other utility, or railroad; unused or undamaged building construction materials consisting of copper pipe, tubing, or wiring, or aluminum wire, siding, downspouts, or gutters; aluminum or stainless steel fence panels made from one inch tubing, 42 inches high with four-inch gaps; aluminum decking, bleachers, or risers; historical markers; statue plaques; grave markers and funeral vases; components of electric vehicle supply equipment made available for commercial or public use; or agricultural irrigation wheels, sprinkler heads, and pipes.

(4) "Engage in business" means conducting more than 12 transactions in a 12-month period.

(5) "Nonferrous metal property" means metal property for which the value of the metal property is derived from the property's content of copper, brass, aluminum, bronze, lead, zinc, nickel, and their alloys. "Nonferrous metal property" does not include precious metals.

(6) "Person" means an individual, domestic or foreign corporation, limited liability corporation, partnership, trust, unincorporated association, or other entity; an affiliate or associate of any such person; or any two or more persons acting as a partnership, syndicate, or other group for the purpose of acquiring, holding, or dispersing of securities of a domestic or foreign corporation.

(7) "Precious metals" means gold, silver, and platinum.

(8) (("Private metal property" means catalytic converters, either singly or in bundles, bales, or bulk, that have been removed from vehicles for sale as a specific commodity.

(9))) "Record" means a paper, electronic, or other method of storing information.

(((10)))(9) "Scrap metal business" means a scrap metal supplier, scrap metal recycler, and scrap metal processor.

(((11)))(10) "Scrap metal processor" means a person with a current business license that conducts business from a permanent location, that is engaged in the business of purchasing or receiving ((private metal property,)) nonferrous metal property((,)) and commercial metal property for the purpose of altering the metal in preparation for its use as feedstock in the manufacture of new products, and that maintains a hydraulic bailer, shearing device, or shredding device for recycling.

(((12)))(11) "Scrap metal recycler" means a person with a current business license that is engaged in the business of purchasing or receiving ((private metal property,)) nonferrous metal property((,)) and commercial metal property for the purpose of aggregation and sale to another scrap metal business and that maintains a fixed place of business within the state.

(((13)))(12) "Scrap metal supplier" means a person with a current business license that is engaged in the business of purchasing or receiving ((private metal property or)) nonferrous metal property for the purpose of aggregation and sale to a scrap metal recycler or scrap metal processor and that does not maintain a fixed business location in the state.

(((14)))(13) "Transaction" means a pledge, or the purchase of, or the trade of any item of ((private metal property or)) nonferrous metal property by a scrap metal business from a member of the general public. "Transaction" does not include donations or the purchase or receipt of ((private metal property or)) nonferrous metal property by a scrap metal business from a commercial enterprise, from another scrap metal business, or from a duly authorized employee or agent of the commercial enterprise or scrap metal business.

Sec. 4. RCW 19.290.020 and 2022 c 221 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) At the time of a transaction, every scrap metal business doing business in this state shall produce wherever that business is conducted an accurate and legible record of each transaction involving ((private metal property or)) nonferrous metal property. This record must be written in the English language, documented on a standardized form or in electronic form, and contain the following information:

(a) The signature of the person with whom the transaction is made;

(b) The time, date, location, and value of the transaction;

(c) The name of the employee representing the scrap metal business in the transaction;

(d) The name, street address, and telephone number of the person with whom the transaction is made;

(e) The license plate number and state of issuance of the license plate on the motor vehicle used to deliver the ((private metal property or)) nonferrous metal property subject to the transaction;

(f) A description of the motor vehicle used to deliver the ((private metal property or)) nonferrous metal property subject to the transaction;

(g) The current driver's license number or other government-issued picture identification card number of the seller or a copy of the seller's government-issued picture identification card; and

(h) A description of the predominant types of ((private metal property or)) nonferrous metal property subject to the transaction, utilizing the institute of scrap recycling industries' generally accepted terminology, and including weight, quantity, or volume((; and

(i) For every transaction specifically involving a catalytic converter that has been removed from a vehicle, documentation indicating that the private metal property in the seller's possession is the result of the seller replacing private metal property from a vehicle registered in the seller's name)).

(2) For every transaction that involves ((private metal property or)) nonferrous metal property, every scrap metal business doing business in the state shall require the person with whom a transaction is being made to sign a declaration. The declaration may be included as part of the transactional record required under subsection (1) of this section, or on a receipt for the transaction. The declaration must state substantially the following:

"I, the undersigned, affirm under penalty of law that the property that is subject to this transaction is not to the best of my knowledge stolen property."

The declaration must be signed and dated by the person with whom the transaction is being made. An employee of the scrap metal business must witness the signing and dating of the declaration and sign the declaration accordingly before any transaction may be consummated.

(3) The record and declaration required under this section must be open to the inspection of any commissioned law enforcement officer of the state or any of its political subdivisions at all times during the ordinary hours of business, or at reasonable times if ordinary hours of business are not kept, and must be maintained wherever that business is conducted for five years following the date of the transaction.

Sec. 5. RCW 19.290.030 and 2022 c 221 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No scrap metal business may enter into a transaction to purchase or receive ((private metal property or)) nonferrous metal property from any person who cannot produce at least one piece of current government-issued picture identification, including a valid driver's license or identification card issued by any state.

(2) No scrap metal business may purchase or receive ((private metal property or)) commercial metal property unless the seller: (a) Has a commercial account with the scrap metal business; (b) can prove ownership of the property by producing written documentation that the seller is the owner of the property; or (c) can produce written documentation that the seller is an employee or agent authorized to sell the property on behalf of a commercial enterprise.

(3) No scrap metal business may enter into a transaction to purchase or receive metallic wire that was burned in whole or in part to remove insulation unless the seller can produce written proof to the scrap metal business that the wire was lawfully burned.

(4)(a) No transaction involving ((private metal property or)) nonferrous metal property may be made in cash or with any person who does not provide a street address and photographic identification and sign a declaration under the requirements of RCW 19.290.020(((1) (d) and (g))) except as described in (b) ((and (c))) of this subsection. The person with whom the transaction is being made may only be paid by a nontransferable check, mailed by the scrap metal business to a street address provided under RCW 19.290.020, no earlier than three days after the transaction was made. A transaction occurs on the date provided in the record required under RCW 19.290.020.

(b) A scrap metal business that is in compliance with this chapter may pay up to a maximum of $30 in cash, stored value device, or electronic funds transfer for nonferrous metal property. The balance of the value of the transaction may be made by nontransferable check, stored value device, or electronic funds transfer at the time the transaction is made if the scrap metal business digitally captures:

(i) A copy of one piece of current government-issued picture identification, including a current driver's license or identification card issued by any state; and

(ii) Either a picture or video of either the material subject to the transaction in the form received or the material subject to the transaction within the vehicle which the material was transported to the scrap metal business.

(((c) Payment to individual sellers of private metal property as defined in this chapter may not be made at the time of the transaction and shall not be paid earlier than three business days after the transaction was made. Records of payment for private metal property as defined in this chapter must be kept in the same file or record as all records collected under this subsection and retained and be available for review for two years from the date of the transaction.))

(5)(a) A scrap metal business's usage of video surveillance shall be sufficient to comply with subsection (4)(b)(ii) of this section so long as the video captures the material subject to the transaction.

(b) A digital image or picture taken under this section must be available for two years from the date of transaction, while a video recording must be available for 30 days.

(6) No scrap metal business may purchase or receive beer kegs from anyone except a manufacturer of beer kegs or licensed brewery.

Sec. 6. RCW 19.290.040 and 2013 c 322 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every scrap metal business must create and maintain a permanent record with a commercial enterprise, including another scrap metal business, in order to establish a commercial account. That record, at a minimum, must include the following information:

(a) The full name of the commercial enterprise or commercial account;

(b) The business address and telephone number of the commercial enterprise or commercial account; and

(c) The full name of the person employed by the commercial enterprise who is authorized to deliver ((private metal property,)) nonferrous metal property((,)) and commercial metal property to the scrap metal business.

(2) The record maintained by a scrap metal business for a commercial account must document every purchase or receipt of ((private metal property,)) nonferrous metal property((,)) and commercial metal property from the commercial enterprise. The record must be maintained for three years following the date of the transfer or receipt. The documentation must include, at a minimum, the following information:

(a) The time, date, and value of the property being purchased or received;

(b) A description of the predominant types of property being purchased or received; and

(c) The signature of the person delivering the property to the scrap metal business.

Sec. 7. RCW 19.290.050 and 2013 c 322 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) ((Upon))In addition to all other requirements of this chapter, upon request by any commissioned law enforcement officer of the state or any of its political subdivisions, every scrap metal business shall furnish a full, true, and correct transcript of the records from the purchase or receipt of ((private metal property,)) nonferrous metal property((,)) and commercial metal property involving only a specified individual, vehicle, or item of ((private metal property,)) nonferrous metal property((,)) or commercial metal property. This information may be transmitted within a specified time of not less than two business days to the applicable law enforcement agency electronically, by facsimile transmission, or by modem or similar device, or by delivery of computer disk subject to the requirements of, and approval by, the chief of police or the county's chief law enforcement officer.

(2) Any records created or produced under this section are exempt from disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.

(3) If the scrap metal business has good cause to believe that any ((private metal property,)) nonferrous metal property((,)) or commercial metal property in ((his or her))their possession has been previously lost or stolen, the scrap metal business shall promptly report that fact to the applicable commissioned law enforcement officer of the state, the chief of police, or the county's chief law enforcement officer, together with the name of the owner, if known, and the date when and the name of the person from whom it was received.

(4) Compliance with this section shall not give rise to or form the basis of private civil liability on the part of a scrap metal business or scrap metal recycler.

Sec. 8. RCW 19.290.060 and 2013 c 322 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Following notification in writing from a commissioned law enforcement officer of the state or any of its political subdivisions that an item of ((private metal property,)) nonferrous metal property((,)) or commercial metal property has been reported as stolen, a scrap metal business shall hold that property intact and safe from alteration, damage, or commingling, and shall place an identifying tag or other suitable identification upon the property. The scrap metal business shall hold the property for a period of time as directed by the applicable law enforcement agency up to a maximum of ten business days.

(2) A commissioned law enforcement officer of the state or any of its political subdivisions shall not place on hold any item of ((private metal property,)) nonferrous metal property((,)) or commercial metal property unless that law enforcement agency reasonably suspects that the property is a lost or stolen item. Any hold that is placed on the property must be removed within ten business days after the property on hold is determined not to be stolen or lost and the property must be returned to the owner or released.

Sec. 9. RCW 19.290.080 and 2007 c 377 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each violation of the requirements of this chapter that are not subject to the criminal penalties under RCW ((19.290.070))9A.56.410 shall be punishable((, upon conviction,)) by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars.

(2) Within two years ((of being convicted)) of a violation of any of the requirements of this chapter that ((are not subject to the criminal penalties under RCW 19.290.070))results in a civil penalty under this section, each subsequent violation shall be punishable((, upon conviction,)) by a fine of not more than two thousand dollars.

Sec. 10. RCW 19.290.220 and 2013 c 322 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Law enforcement agencies may register with the scrap theft alert system that is maintained and provided at no charge to users by the institute of scrap recycling industries, incorporated, or its successor organization, to receive alerts regarding thefts of ((private,)) nonferrous((,)) or commercial metal property in the relevant geographic area.

(2) Any business licensed under this chapter shall:

(a) Sign up with the scrap theft alert system that is maintained and provided at no charge to users by the institute of scrap recycling industries, incorporated, or its successor organization, to receive alerts regarding thefts of ((private,)) nonferrous((,)) or commercial metal property in the relevant geographic area;

(b) Download the scrap metal theft alerts generated by the scrap theft alert system on a daily basis;

(c) Use the alerts to identify potentially stolen commercial metal property((,))and nonferrous metal property((, and private metal property)); and

(d) Maintain for ((ninety))90 days copies of any theft alerts received and downloaded pursuant to this section.

Sec. 11. RCW 19.290.240 and 2013 c 322 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

The provisions of this chapter shall be liberally construed to the end that traffic in stolen ((private))commercial metal property ((or))and nonferrous metal property may be prevented, and irresponsible, unreliable, or dishonest persons may be prevented from engaging in the business of processing, recycling, or supplying scrap metal in this state and reliable persons may be encouraged to engage in businesses of processing, recycling, or supplying scrap metal in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. A new section is added to chapter 46.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A vehicle dealer shall, prior to the sale and transfer of a vehicle, offer the purchaser the option to have the dealer clearly and permanently mark the last eight digits of the originating vehicle's vehicle identification number on the vehicle's catalytic converter unless such marking already exists on the catalytic converter, the catalytic converter is not in a location where it is clearly visible and readily accessible to mark without the need to remove parts from the vehicle, or the vehicle is sold at wholesale. A clear and permanent mark applied by permanent marker is sufficient. The vehicle dealer may add a fee to the sale price for the marking if separately delineated and clearly marked.

(2) If a consumer elects not to have the vehicle dealer mark the vehicle's catalytic converter as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the vehicle dealer must provide the consumer a disclosure written in a typeface that is at least as large as the typeface used in the standard text of the document that contains the disclosure and that is boldfaced, capitalized, underlined, or otherwise set out from the surrounding material so as to be conspicuous that (a) the purchaser is knowingly purchasing the vehicle without clearly and permanently marking the catalytic converter prior to the sale and transfer of the vehicle; and (b) the purchaser acknowledges and understands that catalytic converters must be marked as provided in section 23 of this act.

Sec. 13. RCW 46.79.010 and 2001 c 64 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context indicates otherwise.

(1) "Junk vehicle" means a motor vehicle certified under RCW 46.55.230 as meeting all the following requirements:

(a) Is three years old or older;

(b) Is extensively damaged, such damage including but not limited to any of the following: A broken window or windshield or missing wheels, tires, motor, or transmission;

(c) Is apparently inoperable;

(d) Is without a valid, current registration plate;

(e) Has a fair market value equal only to the value of the scrap in it.

(2) "Scrap processor" means a licensed establishment that maintains a hydraulic baler and shears, or a shredder for recycling salvage.

(3) "Demolish" means to destroy completely by use of a hydraulic baler and shears, or a shredder.

(4) "Hulk hauler" means any person who deals in vehicles for the sole purpose of transporting and/or selling them to a licensed vehicle wrecker or scrap processor in substantially the same form in which they are obtained. A hulk hauler may not sell secondhand motor vehicle parts to anyone other than a licensed vehicle wrecker or scrap processor, except for those parts specifically enumerated in RCW 46.79.020(2), as now or hereafter amended, which may be sold to a licensed vehicle wrecker or disposed of at a public facility for waste disposal.

(5) "Director" means the director of licensing.

(6) "Major component parts" include engines and short blocks, frames, transmissions or transfer cases, cabs, doors, front or rear differentials, front or rear clips, quarter panels or fenders, bumpers, truck beds or boxes, seats, ((and)) hoods, and catalytic converters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. A new section is added to chapter 46.79 RCW to read as follows:

(1) No person may engage in the business of disassembling or de-canning a catalytic converter for removal or processing of the internal core to extract platinum, palladium, rhodium, or other metals, unless the person is a licensed scrap processor under this chapter.

(2) Any licensed scrap processor engaged in disassembling or de-canning catalytic converters as described in this section shall maintain the records of every catalytic converter the scrap processor disassembles or de-cans in accordance with the recordkeeping requirements of this chapter and other provisions of the law.

(3) Any licensed scrap processor engaged in disassembling or de-canning catalytic converters as described in this section shall implement a 30-day waiting period between the purchase and disassembly or de-canning of a catalytic converter, unless the scrap processor is also the registered owner of the originating vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15. A new section is added to chapter 46.79 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Payment to individual sellers of catalytic converters that have been removed from a vehicle may not be made at the time of the transaction and shall not be paid earlier than three business days after the transaction was made.

(2) No transaction involving catalytic converters that have been removed from a vehicle may be made in cash or with any person who does not provide a street address and photographic identification. The person with whom the transaction is being made may only be paid by a nontransferable check, mailed by the licensed scrap processor to the street address recorded according to this section, no earlier than three days after the transaction was made. A transaction occurs on the date provided in the record required under this section.

(3) A record of each purchase of catalytic converters that have been removed from a vehicle must be kept for three years following the date of the transaction and be open to inspection by any commissioned law enforcement officer of the state or any of its political subdivisions at all times during the ordinary hours of business, or at reasonable times if ordinary hours of business are not kept. The record shall include, at a minimum, the following elements:

(a) The time, date, location, and value of the transaction;

(b) The name of the employee representing the scrap processor in the transaction;

(c) The name, street address, and telephone number of the person with whom the transaction is made;

(d) The license plate number and state of issuance of the license plate on the motor vehicle used to deliver the catalytic converter or converters subject to the transaction;

(e) A description of the motor vehicle used to deliver the catalytic converter or converters subject to the transaction;

(f) A copy of the seller's current driver's license or other government-issued picture identification card;

(g) The vehicle identification number of the vehicle from which the catalytic converter was removed;

(h) A declaration signed by the seller that states substantially the following:

"I, the undersigned, affirm under penalty of law that the property that is subject to this transaction is not to the best of my knowledge stolen property and the information provided by me is accurate."; and

(i) A photo of the catalytic converter that includes the vehicle identification number marking required under section 23 of this act.

(4) This section does not apply to the purchase of material from a licensed business that manufactures catalytic converters in the ordinary course of its legal business.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16. A new section is added to chapter 46.79 RCW to read as follows:

The license fees required under RCW 46.79.040 and 46.79.050 for a scrap processor's license must also include a $500 catalytic converter inspection fee, to be deposited in the state patrol highway account, in order to support the activities of the Washington state patrol under section 21 of this act.

Sec. 17. RCW 46.80.010 and 2010 c 161 s 1138 and 2010 c 8 s 9097 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Core" means a major component part received by a vehicle wrecker in exchange for a like part sold by the vehicle wrecker, is not resold as a major component part except for scrap metal value or for remanufacture, and the vehicle wrecker maintains records for three years from the date of acquisition to identify the name of the person from whom the core was received.

(2) "Established place of business" means a building or enclosure which the vehicle wrecker occupies either continuously or at regular periods and where his or her books and records are kept and business is transacted and which must conform with zoning regulations.

(3) "Interim owner" means the owner of a vehicle who has the original certificate of title for the vehicle, which certificate has been released by the person named on the certificate and assigned to the person offering to sell the vehicle to the wrecker.

(4) "Major component part" includes at least each of the following vehicle parts: (a) Engines and short blocks; (b) frame; (c) transmission and/or transfer case; (d) cab; (e) door; (f) front or rear differential; (g) front or rear clip; (h) quarter panel; (i) truck bed or box; (j) seat; (k) hood; (l) bumper; (m) fender; ((and)) (n) airbag; and (o) catalytic converter. The director may supplement this list by rule.

(5) "Vehicle wrecker" means every person, firm, partnership, association, or corporation engaged in the business of buying, selling, or dealing in vehicles of a type required to be registered under the laws of this state, for the purpose of wrecking, dismantling, disassembling, or substantially changing the form of a vehicle, or who buys or sells integral secondhand parts of component material thereof, in whole or in part, or who deals in secondhand vehicle parts.

(6) "Wrecked vehicle" means a vehicle which is disassembled or dismantled or a vehicle which is acquired with the intent to dismantle or disassemble and never again to operate as a vehicle, or a vehicle which has sustained such damage that its cost to repair exceeds the fair market value of a like vehicle which has not sustained such damage, or a damaged vehicle whose salvage value plus cost to repair equals or exceeds its fair market value, if repaired, or a vehicle which has sustained such damage or deterioration that it may not lawfully operate upon the highways of this state for which the salvage value plus cost to repair exceeds its fair market value, if repaired; further, it is presumed that a vehicle is a wreck if it has sustained such damage or deterioration that it may not lawfully operate upon the highways of this state.

Sec. 18. RCW 46.80.080 and 2022 c 221 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every vehicle wrecker shall maintain books or files in which the wrecker shall keep a record and a description of:

(a) Every vehicle wrecked, dismantled, disassembled, or substantially altered by the wrecker; and

(b) Every major component part, including catalytic converters, acquired by the wrecker; together with a bill of sale signed by a seller whose identity has been verified and the name and address of the person, firm, or corporation from whom the wrecker purchased the vehicle or part. Major component parts other than cores shall be further identified by the vehicle identification number of the vehicle from which the part came.

(2) The record shall also contain the following data regarding the wrecked or acquired vehicle or vehicle that is the source of a major component part, including catalytic converters, other than a core:

(a) The certificate of title number (if previously titled in this or any other state);

(b) Name of state where last registered;

(c) Number of the last license number plate issued;

(d) Name of vehicle;

(e) Motor or identification number and serial number of the vehicle;

(f) Date purchased;

(g) Disposition of the motor and chassis;

(h) Yard number assigned by the licensee to the vehicle or major component part, which shall also appear on the identified vehicle or part; and

(i) Such other information as the department may require.

(3) The records shall also contain a bill of sale signed by the seller for other minor component parts, including catalytic converters, acquired by the licensee, identifying the seller by name, address, and date of sale.

(4) In addition to all other requirements of this chapter, the records of each transaction involving the purchase of catalytic converters that have been removed from a vehicle shall also include, at a minimum, the following elements:

(a) The time, date, location, and value of the transaction;

(b) The name of the employee representing the vehicle wrecker in the transaction;

(c) The name, street address, and telephone number of the person with whom the transaction is made;

(d) The license plate number and state of issuance of the license plate on the motor vehicle used to deliver the catalytic converter or converters subject to the transaction;

(e) A description of the motor vehicle used to deliver the catalytic converter or converters subject to the transaction;

(f) A copy of the seller's current driver's license or other government-issued picture identification card;

(g) The vehicle identification number of the vehicle from which the catalytic converter was removed;

(h) A declaration signed by the seller that states substantially the following:

"I, the undersigned, affirm under penalty of law that the property that is subject to this transaction is not to the best of my knowledge stolen property and the information provided by me is accurate."; and

(i) A photo of the catalytic converter that includes the vehicle identification number marking required under section 23 of this act.

(5) The records shall be maintained by the licensee at his or her established place of business for a period of three years from the date of acquisition.

(((5)))(6) The record is subject to inspection at all times during regular business hours by members of the police department, sheriff's office, members of the Washington state patrol, or officers or employees of the department.

(((6)))(7) A vehicle wrecker shall also maintain a similar record of all disabled vehicles that have been towed or transported to the vehicle wrecker's place of business or to other places designated by the owner of the vehicle or his or her representative. This record shall specify the name and description of the vehicle, name of owner, number of license plate, condition of the vehicle and place to which it was towed or transported.

(((7)))(8) Failure to comply with this section is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 19. RCW 46.80.210 and 2022 c 221 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Payment to individual sellers of ((private metal property as defined in RCW 19.290.010))catalytic converters that have been removed from a vehicle may not be made at the time of the transaction and shall not be paid earlier than three business days after the transaction was made.

(2) No transaction involving catalytic converters that have been removed from a vehicle may be made in cash or with any person who does not provide a street address and photographic identification. The person with whom the transaction is being made may only be paid by a nontransferable check, mailed by the licensed auto wrecker to a street address recorded according to RCW 46.80.080, no earlier than three days after the transaction was made. A transaction occurs on the date provided in the record required under RCW 46.80.080.

(3) This section does not apply to the purchase of material from a licensed business that manufactures catalytic converters in the ordinary course of its legal business.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20. A new section is added to chapter 46.80 RCW to read as follows:

The license fees required under RCW 46.80.040 and 46.80.050 must also include a $500 catalytic converter inspection fee, to be deposited in the state patrol highway account, in order to support the activities of the Washington state patrol under section 21 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21. A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW to read as follows:

Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the Washington state patrol shall:

(1) Conduct periodic inspections at least once a year of all licensed purchasers of catalytic converters that have been removed from vehicles that are licensed under chapter 46.79 or 46.80 RCW;

(2) Develop a standardized inspection form and train local law enforcement agencies, civilian employees, and limited authority law enforcement personnel on inspection procedures of licensed purchasers;

(3) Specify which specific law enforcement agencies have a duty to inspect the different business types that are licensed to purchase catalytic converters; and

(4) Authorize inspections to be conducted by civilian employees or limited authority law enforcement agencies if necessary to increase the availability of potential inspectors, provided that the Washington state patrol shall retain oversight of such inspections.

Sec. 22. RCW 46.12.560 and 2011 c 114 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Before accepting an application for a certificate of title, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall require an applicant to provide a certificate of vehicle inspection completed by the Washington state patrol or other authorized inspector if the vehicle:

(i) Was declared a total loss or salvage vehicle under the laws of this state;

(ii) Has been rebuilt after the certificate of title was returned to the department under RCW 46.12.600 and the vehicle was not kept by the registered owner at the time of the vehicle's destruction or declaration as a total loss; or

(iii) Is presented with documents from another state showing that the vehicle was a total loss or salvage vehicle and has not been reissued a valid registration certificate from that state after the declaration of total loss or salvage.

(b) A vehicle presented for inspection must have all damaged major component parts replaced or repaired to meet all requirements in law and rule before the Washington state patrol will inspect the vehicle. The inspection must verify that the vehicle identification number is genuine and agrees with the number shown on the certificate of title and registration certificate.

(c) A Washington state patrol vehicle identification number specialist must ensure that all major component parts used for the reconstruction of a salvage or rebuilt vehicle were obtained legally, and must securely attach a marking at the driver's door latch pillar indicating the vehicle was previously destroyed or declared a total loss. It is a class C felony for a person to remove the marking indicating that the vehicle was previously destroyed or declared a total loss.

(2) A person presenting a vehicle for inspection under subsection (1) of this section must provide original invoices for new and used parts from:

(a) A vendor that is registered with the department of revenue or a comparable agency in the jurisdiction where the major component parts were purchased for the collection of retail sales or use taxes. The invoices must include:

(i) The name and address of the business;

(ii) A description of the part or parts sold;

(iii) The date of sale; and

(iv) The amount of sale to include all taxes paid unless exempted by the department of revenue or a comparable agency in the jurisdiction where the major component parts were purchased;

(b) A vehicle wrecker licensed under chapter 46.80 RCW or a comparable business in the jurisdiction outside Washington state where the major component part was purchased; and

(c) Private individuals. The private individual must have the certificate of title to the vehicle where the parts were taken from unless the parts were obtained from a parts car owned by a collector. Bills of sale for parts must be notarized and include:

(i) The names and addresses of the sellers and purchasers;

(ii) A description of the vehicle and the part or parts being sold, including the make, model, year, and identification or serial number;

(iii) The date of sale; and

(iv) The purchase price of the vehicle part or parts.

(3) A person presenting a vehicle for inspection under this section who is unable to provide an acceptable release of interest or proof of ownership for a vehicle or major component part as described in this section shall apply for an ownership in doubt application described in RCW 46.12.680.

(4)(a) Before accepting an application for a certificate of title, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall require an applicant to provide a certificate of vehicle inspection completed by the Washington state patrol or other authorized inspector when the application is for a vehicle being titled for the first time as:

(i) Assembled;

(ii) Glider kit;

(iii) Homemade;

(iv) Kit vehicle;

(v) Street rod vehicle;

(vi) Custom vehicle; or

(vii) Subject to ownership in doubt under RCW 46.12.680.

(b) The inspection must verify that the vehicle identification number is genuine and agrees with the number shown on the certificate of title and registration certificate.

(5)(a) Before accepting an application for a certificate of title, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall require an applicant to provide a certificate of vehicle inspection completed by the Washington state patrol when the application is for a vehicle with a vehicle identification number that has been:

(i) Altered;

(ii) Defaced;

(iii) Obliterated;

(iv) Omitted;

(v) Removed; or

(vi) Otherwise absent.

(b) The application must include payment of the fee required in RCW 46.17.135.

(c) The Washington state patrol shall assign a new vehicle identification number to the vehicle and place or stamp the new number in a conspicuous position on the vehicle.

(d) The department shall use the new vehicle identification number assigned by the Washington state patrol as the official vehicle identification number assigned to the vehicle.

(6) The department may adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.

(7) Nothing in this section creates a requirement for the Washington state patrol to inspect attached catalytic converters as major component parts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23. A new section is added to chapter 9A.82 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Any person who removes a catalytic converter from a vehicle for a purpose other than maintenance, repair, or demolition, or who knowingly possesses an unmarked detached catalytic converter, must permanently mark the detached catalytic converter with the last eight digits of the originating vehicle's vehicle identification number such that at least a portion of the marking is visible from any side. The marking must be completed in a reasonable time after removal, but no later than 24 hours after removal, and before off-site transport of the detached catalytic converter.

(2) Detached catalytic converters that are not marked as required by this section are subject to immediate seizure and forfeiture by law enforcement.

(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, it is a gross misdemeanor for any person to intentionally remove, alter or obliterate from a detached catalytic converter the last eight digits of the originating vehicle identification number, as required by subsection (1) of this section.

(b) A person who intentionally removes, alters, or obliterates from a detached catalytic converter the last eight digits of the original vehicle identification number is guilty of a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW if the person has previously been convicted under this subsection.

(4) It is a gross misdemeanor for any person who is not a scrap processor licensed under chapter 46.79 RCW or vehicle wrecker licensed under chapter 46.80 RCW to knowingly possess, sell, or offer for sale six or fewer detached catalytic converters that do not comply with the marking requirements under subsection (1) of this section.

(5) It is a class C felony for any person who is not a scrap processor licensed under chapter 46.79 RCW or vehicle wrecker licensed under chapter 46.80 RCW to knowingly possess, sell, or offer for sale seven or more detached catalytic converters that do not comply with the marking requirements under subsection (1) of this section.

(6) Where a case is legally sufficient to charge an alleged juvenile offender with a violation under this section, and that violation would be the alleged offender's first violation involving detached catalytic converters, the prosecutor is encouraged to divert the case pursuant to RCW 13.40.070.

(7) It is an affirmative defense to this section that the possessor removed the detached catalytic converter with the permission of the registered owner of the vehicle or vehicles.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24. A new section is added to chapter 9A.82 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty of trafficking in catalytic converters in the first degree if the person knowingly:

(a) Traffics seven or more catalytic converters that have been removed from a motor vehicle, without fulfilling the requirements under chapter 46.79 or 46.80 RCW for lawful transfer; or

(b) Purchases a catalytic converter that has been removed from a motor vehicle, without possessing a valid scrap processor license under chapter 46.79 RCW or vehicle wrecker license under chapter 46.80 RCW.

(2) Trafficking in catalytic converters in the first degree is a class C felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25. A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW to read as follows:

The court shall make a finding of fact of the special allegation or, if a jury is had, the jury shall, if it finds the defendant guilty, also find a special verdict as to the special allegation, in a criminal case where:

(1) The defendant has been convicted of trafficking in catalytic converters in the first degree; and

(2) There has been a special allegation pleaded and proven beyond a reasonable doubt that the defendant knowingly (a) trafficked seven or more catalytic converters that were removed from a motor vehicle without fulfilling the requirements under chapter 46.79 or 46.80 RCW for lawful transfer; or (b) purchased a catalytic converter that has been removed from a motor vehicle without possessing a valid scrap processor license under chapter 46.79 RCW or vehicle wrecker license under chapter 46.80 RCW, for the purpose of selling, transferring, or exchanging them online.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26. A new section is added to chapter 9A.82 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person is guilty of trafficking in catalytic converters in the second degree if the person knowingly traffics six or fewer catalytic converters that have been removed from a motor vehicle, without fulfilling the requirements under chapter 46.79 or 46.80 RCW for lawful transfer.

(2) Trafficking in catalytic converters in the second degree is a class C felony.

Sec. 27. RCW 9A.82.010 and 2013 c 302 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context requires the contrary, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1)(a) "Beneficial interest" means:

(i) The interest of a person as a beneficiary under a trust established under Title 11 RCW in which the trustee for the trust holds legal or record title to real property;

(ii) The interest of a person as a beneficiary under any other trust arrangement under which a trustee holds legal or record title to real property for the benefit of the beneficiary; or

(iii) The interest of a person under any other form of express fiduciary arrangement under which one person holds legal or record title to real property for the benefit of the other person.

(b) "Beneficial interest" does not include the interest of a stockholder in a corporation or the interest of a partner in a general partnership or limited partnership.

(c) A beneficial interest is considered to be located where the real property owned by the trustee is located.

(2) "Control" means the possession of a sufficient interest to permit substantial direction over the affairs of an enterprise.

(3) "Creditor" means a person making an extension of credit or a person claiming by, under, or through a person making an extension of credit.

(4) "Criminal profiteering" means any act, including any anticipatory or completed offense, committed for financial gain, that is chargeable or indictable under the laws of the state in which the act occurred and, if the act occurred in a state other than this state, would be chargeable or indictable under the laws of this state had the act occurred in this state and punishable as a felony and by imprisonment for more than one year, regardless of whether the act is charged or indicted, as any of the following:

(a) Murder, as defined in RCW 9A.32.030 and 9A.32.050;

(b) Robbery, as defined in RCW 9A.56.200 and 9A.56.210;

(c) Kidnapping, as defined in RCW 9A.40.020 and 9A.40.030;

(d) Forgery, as defined in RCW 9A.60.020 and 9A.60.030;

(e) Theft, as defined in RCW 9A.56.030, 9A.56.040, 9A.56.060, 9A.56.080, and 9A.56.083;

(f) Unlawful sale of subscription television services, as defined in RCW 9A.56.230;

(g) Theft of telecommunication services or unlawful manufacture of a telecommunication device, as defined in RCW 9A.56.262 and 9A.56.264;

(h) Child selling or child buying, as defined in RCW 9A.64.030;

(i) Bribery, as defined in RCW 9A.68.010, 9A.68.020, 9A.68.040, and 9A.68.050;

(j) Gambling, as defined in RCW 9.46.220 and 9.46.215 and 9.46.217;

(k) Extortion, as defined in RCW 9A.56.120 and 9A.56.130;

(l) Unlawful production of payment instruments, unlawful possession of payment instruments, unlawful possession of a personal identification device, unlawful possession of fictitious identification, or unlawful possession of instruments of financial fraud, as defined in RCW 9A.56.320;

(m) Extortionate extension of credit, as defined in RCW 9A.82.020;

(n) Advancing money for use in an extortionate extension of credit, as defined in RCW 9A.82.030;

(o) Collection of an extortionate extension of credit, as defined in RCW 9A.82.040;

(p) Collection of an unlawful debt, as defined in RCW 9A.82.045;

(q) Delivery or manufacture of controlled substances or possession with intent to deliver or manufacture controlled substances under chapter 69.50 RCW;

(r) Trafficking in stolen property, as defined in RCW 9A.82.050;

(s) Leading organized crime, as defined in RCW 9A.82.060;

(t) Money laundering, as defined in RCW 9A.83.020;

(u) Obstructing criminal investigations or prosecutions in violation of RCW 9A.72.090, 9A.72.100, 9A.72.110, 9A.72.120, 9A.72.130, 9A.76.070, or 9A.76.180;

(v) Fraud in the purchase or sale of securities, as defined in RCW 21.20.010;

(w) Promoting pornography, as defined in RCW 9.68.140;

(x) Sexual exploitation of children, as defined in RCW 9.68A.040, 9.68A.050, and 9.68A.060;

(y) Promoting prostitution, as defined in RCW 9A.88.070 and 9A.88.080;

(z) Arson, as defined in RCW 9A.48.020 and 9A.48.030;

(aa) Assault, as defined in RCW 9A.36.011 and 9A.36.021;

(bb) Assault of a child, as defined in RCW 9A.36.120 and 9A.36.130;

(cc) A pattern of equity skimming, as defined in RCW 61.34.020;

(dd) Commercial telephone solicitation in violation of RCW 19.158.040(1);

(ee) Trafficking in insurance claims, as defined in RCW 48.30A.015;

(ff) Unlawful practice of law, as defined in RCW 2.48.180;

(gg) Commercial bribery, as defined in RCW 9A.68.060;

(hh) Health care false claims, as defined in RCW 48.80.030;

(ii) Unlicensed practice of a profession or business, as defined in RCW 18.130.190(7);

(jj) Improperly obtaining financial information, as defined in RCW 9.35.010;

(kk) Identity theft, as defined in RCW 9.35.020;

(ll) Unlawful shipment of cigarettes in violation of RCW 70.155.105(6) (a) or (b);

(mm) Unlawful shipment of cigarettes in violation of RCW 82.24.110(2);

(nn) Unauthorized sale or procurement of telephone records in violation of RCW 9.26A.140;

(oo) Theft with the intent to resell, as defined in RCW 9A.56.340;

(pp) Organized retail theft, as defined in RCW 9A.56.350;

(qq) Mortgage fraud, as defined in RCW 19.144.080;

(rr) Commercial sexual abuse of a minor, as defined in RCW 9.68A.100;

(ss) Promoting commercial sexual abuse of a minor, as defined in RCW 9.68A.101; ((or))

(tt) Trafficking, as defined in RCW 9A.40.100, promoting travel for commercial sexual abuse of a minor, as defined in RCW 9.68A.102, and permitting commercial sexual abuse of a minor, as defined in RCW 9.68A.103; or

(uu) Trafficking in catalytic converters, as defined in sections 24 and 26 of this act.

(5) "Dealer in property" means a person who buys and sells property as a business.

(6) "Debtor" means a person to whom an extension of credit is made or a person who guarantees the repayment of an extension of credit or in any manner undertakes to indemnify the creditor against loss resulting from the failure of a person to whom an extension is made to repay the same.

(7) "Documentary material" means any book, paper, document, writing, drawing, graph, chart, photograph, phonograph record, magnetic tape, computer printout, other data compilation from which information can be obtained or from which information can be translated into usable form, or other tangible item.

(8) "Enterprise" includes any individual, sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, business trust, or other profit or nonprofit legal entity, and includes any union, association, or group of individuals associated in fact although not a legal entity, and both illicit and licit enterprises and governmental and nongovernmental entities.

(9) "Extortionate extension of credit" means an extension of credit with respect to which it is the understanding of the creditor and the debtor at the time the extension is made that delay in making repayment or failure to make repayment could result in the use of violence or other criminal means to cause harm to the person, reputation, or property of any person.

(10) "Extortionate means" means the use, or an express or implicit threat of use, of violence or other criminal means to cause harm to the person, reputation, or property of any person.

(11) "Financial institution" means any bank, trust company, savings and loan association, savings bank, mutual savings bank, credit union, or loan company under the jurisdiction of the state or an agency of the United States.

(12) "Pattern of criminal profiteering activity" means engaging in at least three acts of criminal profiteering, one of which occurred after July 1, 1985, and the last of which occurred within five years, excluding any period of imprisonment, after the commission of the earliest act of criminal profiteering. In order to constitute a pattern, the three acts must have the same or similar intent, results, accomplices, principals, victims, or methods of commission, or be otherwise interrelated by distinguishing characteristics including a nexus to the same enterprise, and must not be isolated events. However, in any civil proceedings brought pursuant to RCW 9A.82.100 by any person other than the attorney general or county prosecuting attorney in which one or more acts of fraud in the purchase or sale of securities are asserted as acts of criminal profiteering activity, it is a condition to civil liability under RCW 9A.82.100 that the defendant has been convicted in a criminal proceeding of fraud in the purchase or sale of securities under RCW 21.20.400 or under the laws of another state or of the United States requiring the same elements of proof, but such conviction need not relate to any act or acts asserted as acts of criminal profiteering activity in such civil action under RCW 9A.82.100.

(13) "Real property" means any real property or interest in real property, including but not limited to a land sale contract, lease, or mortgage of real property.

(14) "Records" means any book, paper, writing, record, computer program, or other material.

(15) "Repayment of an extension of credit" means the repayment, satisfaction, or discharge in whole or in part of a debt or claim, acknowledged or disputed, valid or invalid, resulting from or in connection with that extension of credit.

(16) "Stolen property" means property that has been obtained by theft, robbery, or extortion.

(17) "To collect an extension of credit" means to induce in any way a person to make repayment thereof.

(18) "To extend credit" means to make or renew a loan or to enter into an agreement, tacit or express, whereby the repayment or satisfaction of a debt or claim, whether acknowledged or disputed, valid or invalid, and however arising, may or shall be deferred.

(19) "Traffic" means to sell, transfer, distribute, dispense, or otherwise dispose of stolen property to another person, or to buy, receive, possess, or obtain control of stolen property, with intent to sell, transfer, distribute, dispense, or otherwise dispose of the property to another person.

(20)(a) "Trustee" means:

(i) A person acting as a trustee under a trust established under Title 11 RCW in which the trustee holds legal or record title to real property;

(ii) A person who holds legal or record title to real property in which another person has a beneficial interest; or

(iii) A successor trustee to a person who is a trustee under (a)(i) or (ii) of this subsection.

(b) "Trustee" does not mean a person appointed or acting as:

(i) A personal representative under Title 11 RCW;

(ii) A trustee of any testamentary trust;

(iii) A trustee of any indenture of trust under which a bond is issued; or

(iv) A trustee under a deed of trust.

(21) "Unlawful debt" means any money or other thing of value constituting principal or interest of a debt that is legally unenforceable in the state in full or in part because the debt was incurred or contracted:

(a) In violation of any one of the following:

(i) Chapter 67.16 RCW relating to horse racing;

(ii) Chapter 9.46 RCW relating to gambling;

(b) In a gambling activity in violation of federal law; or

(c) In connection with the business of lending money or a thing of value at a rate that is at least twice the permitted rate under the applicable state or federal law relating to usury.

Sec. 28. RCW 9.94A.533 and 2020 c 330 s 1 and 2020 c 141 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The provisions of this section apply to the standard sentence ranges determined by RCW 9.94A.510 or 9.94A.517.

(2) For persons convicted of the anticipatory offenses of criminal attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the standard sentence range is determined by locating the sentencing grid sentence range defined by the appropriate offender score and the seriousness level of the completed crime, and multiplying the range by seventy-five percent.

(3) The following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the offender or an accomplice was armed with a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any firearm enhancements based on the classification of the completed felony crime. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the firearm enhancement or enhancements must be added to the total period of confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject to a firearm enhancement. If the offender or an accomplice was armed with a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any firearm enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW 9A.28.020:

(a) Five years for any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;

(b) Three years for any felony defined under any law as a class B felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;

(c) Eighteen months for any felony defined under any law as a class C felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;

(d) If the offender is being sentenced for any firearm enhancements under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection and the offender has previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or subsection (4)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all firearm enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of the enhancement listed;

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all firearm enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence under this subsection may be:

(i) Granted an extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(1)(c); or

(ii) Released under the provisions of RCW 9.94A.730;

(f) The firearm enhancements in this section shall apply to all felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun or bump-fire stock, possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and use of a machine gun or bump-fire stock in a felony;

(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a persistent offender. If the addition of a firearm enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the enhancement may not be reduced.

(4) The following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any deadly weapon enhancements based on the classification of the completed felony crime. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the deadly weapon enhancement or enhancements must be added to the total period of confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject to a deadly weapon enhancement. If the offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any deadly weapon enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW 9A.28.020:

(a) Two years for any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;

(b) One year for any felony defined under any law as a class B felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;

(c) Six months for any felony defined under any law as a class C felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;

(d) If the offender is being sentenced under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection for any deadly weapon enhancements and the offender has previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or subsection (3)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all deadly weapon enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of the enhancement listed;

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all deadly weapon enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence under this subsection may be:

(i) Granted an extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(1)(c); or

(ii) Released under the provisions of RCW 9.94A.730;

(f) The deadly weapon enhancements in this section shall apply to all felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun or bump-fire stock, possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and use of a machine gun or bump-fire stock in a felony;

(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a persistent offender. If the addition of a deadly weapon enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the enhancement may not be reduced.

(5) The following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range if the offender or an accomplice committed the offense while in a county jail or state correctional facility and the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection. If the offender or an accomplice committed one of the crimes listed in this subsection while in a county jail or state correctional facility, and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection, the following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section:

(a) Eighteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(2) (a) or (b) or 69.50.410;

(b) Fifteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(2) (c), (d), or (e);

(c) Twelve months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.4013.

For the purposes of this subsection, all of the real property of a state correctional facility or county jail shall be deemed to be part of that facility or county jail.

(6) An additional twenty-four months shall be added to the standard sentence range for any ranked offense involving a violation of chapter 69.50 RCW if the offense was also a violation of RCW 69.50.435 or 9.94A.827. All enhancements under this subsection shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter.

(7) An additional two years shall be added to the standard sentence range for vehicular homicide committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502 for each prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all impaired driving enhancements under this subsection are mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including other impaired driving enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter.

An offender serving a sentence under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(1)(c).

(8)(a) The following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range for felony crimes committed on or after July 1, 2006, if the offense was committed with sexual motivation, as that term is defined in RCW 9.94A.030. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the sexual motivation enhancement must be added to the total period of total confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject to a sexual motivation enhancement. If the offender committed the offense with sexual motivation and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW 9A.28.020:

(i) Two years for any felony defined under the law as a class A felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years, or both;

(ii) Eighteen months for any felony defined under any law as a class B felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both;

(iii) One year for any felony defined under any law as a class C felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both;

(iv) If the offender is being sentenced for any sexual motivation enhancements under (a)(i), (ii), and/or (iii) of this subsection and the offender has previously been sentenced for any sexual motivation enhancements on or after July 1, 2006, under (a)(i), (ii), and/or (iii) of this subsection, all sexual motivation enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of the enhancement listed;

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all sexual motivation enhancements under this subsection are mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including other sexual motivation enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence under this subsection may be:

(i) Granted an extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(1)(c); or

(ii) Released under the provisions of RCW 9.94A.730;

(c) The sexual motivation enhancements in this subsection apply to all felony crimes;

(d) If the standard sentence range under this subsection exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a persistent offender. If the addition of a sexual motivation enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the enhancement may not be reduced;

(e) The portion of the total confinement sentence which the offender must serve under this subsection shall be calculated before any earned early release time is credited to the offender;

(f) Nothing in this subsection prevents a sentencing court from imposing a sentence outside the standard sentence range pursuant to RCW 9.94A.535.

(9) An additional one-year enhancement shall be added to the standard sentence range for the felony crimes of RCW 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.079, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, or 9A.44.089 committed on or after July 22, 2007, if the offender engaged, agreed, or offered to engage the victim in the sexual conduct in return for a fee. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the one-year enhancement must be added to the total period of total confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject to the enhancement. If the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense for the felony crimes of RCW 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.079, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, or 9A.44.089, and the offender attempted, solicited another, or conspired to engage, agree, or offer to engage the victim in the sexual conduct in return for a fee, an additional one-year enhancement shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section. For purposes of this subsection, "sexual conduct" means sexual intercourse or sexual contact, both as defined in chapter 9A.44 RCW.

(10)(a) For a person age eighteen or older convicted of any criminal street gang-related felony offense for which the person compensated, threatened, or solicited a minor in order to involve the minor in the commission of the felony offense, the standard sentence range is determined by locating the sentencing grid sentence range defined by the appropriate offender score and the seriousness level of the completed crime, and multiplying the range by one hundred twenty-five percent. If the standard sentence range under this subsection exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum sentence is the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a persistent offender.

(b) This subsection does not apply to any criminal street gang-related felony offense for which involving a minor in the commission of the felony offense is an element of the offense.

(c) The increased penalty specified in (a) of this subsection is unavailable in the event that the prosecution gives notice that it will seek an exceptional sentence based on an aggravating factor under RCW 9.94A.535.

(11) An additional twelve months and one day shall be added to the standard sentence range for a conviction of attempting to elude a police vehicle as defined by RCW 46.61.024, if the conviction included a finding by special allegation of endangering one or more persons under RCW 9.94A.834.

(12) An additional twelve months shall be added to the standard sentence range for an offense that is also a violation of RCW 9.94A.831.

(13) An additional twelve months shall be added to the standard sentence range for vehicular homicide committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.520 or for vehicular assault committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.522, or for any felony driving under the influence (RCW 46.61.502(6)) or felony physical control under the influence (RCW 46.61.504(6)) for each child passenger under the age of sixteen who is an occupant in the defendant's vehicle. These enhancements shall be mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including other minor child enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. If the addition of a minor child enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the enhancement shall be mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions.

(14) An additional twelve months shall be added to the standard sentence range for an offense that is also a violation of RCW 9.94A.832.

(15) An additional 12 months may, at the discretion of the court, be added to the standard sentence range for an offense that is also a violation of section 25 of this act.

(16) Regardless of any provisions in this section, if a person is being sentenced in adult court for a crime committed under age eighteen, the court has full discretion to depart from mandatory sentencing enhancements and to take the particular circumstances surrounding the defendant's youth into account.

Sec. 29. RCW 9.94A.515 and 2023 c 196 s 3 and 2023 c 7 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVI

Aggravated Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XV

Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIV

Murder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

Trafficking 1 (RCW 9A.40.100(1))

XIII

Malicious explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1 (RCW 70.74.270(1))

XII

Assault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Promoting Commercial Sexual Abuse of a Minor (RCW 9.68A.101)

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

Trafficking 2 (RCW 9A.40.100(3))

XI

Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

X

Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW 9A.42.020)

Indecent Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Sexually Violent Predator Escape (RCW 9A.76.115)

IX

Abandonment of Dependent Person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Hit and Run—Death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide by Watercraft, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2 (RCW 70.74.270(2))

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

VIII

Arson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Commercial Sexual Abuse of a Minor (RCW 9.68A.100)

Homicide by Watercraft, by the operation of any vessel in a reckless manner (RCW 79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)

Theft of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

VII

Air bag diagnostic systems (causing bodily injury or death) (RCW 46.37.660(2)(b))

Air bag replacement requirements (causing bodily injury or death) (RCW 46.37.660(1)(b))

Burglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Civil Disorder Training (RCW 9A.48.120)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW 9A.44.160)

Dealing in depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.050(1))

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

False Reporting 1 (RCW 9A.84.040(2)(a))

Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Malicious placement of an explosive 3 (RCW 70.74.270(3))

Manufacture or import counterfeit, nonfunctional, damaged, or previously deployed air bag (causing bodily injury or death) (RCW 46.37.650(1)(b))

Negligently Causing Death By Use of a Signal Preemption Device (RCW 46.37.675)

Sell, install, or reinstall counterfeit, nonfunctional, damaged, or previously deployed airbag (RCW 46.37.650(2)(b))

Sending, bringing into state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.060(1))

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1))

Use of a Machine Gun or Bump-fire Stock in Commission of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)

VI

Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Possession of Depictions of a Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.070(1))

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Theft from a Vulnerable Adult 1 (RCW 9A.56.400(1))

Unlawful Storage of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.020)

V

Abandonment of Dependent Person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Advancing money or property for extortionate extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Air bag diagnostic systems (RCW 46.37.660(2)(c))

Air bag replacement requirements (RCW 46.37.660(1)(c))

Bail Jumping with class A Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 2 (RCW 9A.44.170)

Dealing in Depictions of Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 2 (RCW 9.68A.050(2))

Domestic Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 7.105.450, 10.99.040, 10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.26B.050, or 26.52.070)

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect Extensions of Credit (RCW 9A.82.040)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Manufacture or import counterfeit, nonfunctional, damaged, or previously deployed air bag (RCW 46.37.650(1)(c))

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Sell, install, or reinstall counterfeit, nonfunctional, damaged, or previously deployed airbag (RCW 46.37.650(2)(c))

Sending, Bringing into State Depictions of Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 2 (RCW 9.68A.060(2))

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070)

IV

Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault 3 (of a Peace Officer with a Projectile Stun Gun) (RCW 9A.36.031(1)(h))

Assault 4 (third domestic violence offense) (RCW 9A.36.041(3))

Assault by Watercraft (RCW 79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW 9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Cheating 1 (RCW 9.46.1961)

Commercial Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Driving While Under the Influence (RCW 46.61.502(6))

Endangerment with a Controlled Substance (RCW 9A.42.100)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hate Crime (RCW 9A.36.080)

Hit and Run—Injury (RCW 46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit and Run with Vessel—Injury Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under Age 14 (subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Physical Control of a Vehicle While Under the Influence (RCW 46.61.504(6))

Possession of Depictions of a Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 2 (RCW 9.68A.070(2))

Residential Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Trafficking in Catalytic Converters 1 (section 24 of this act)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.82.050)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or payment card transaction (RCW 9A.56.290(4)(b))

Unlawful transaction of health coverage as a health care service contractor (RCW 48.44.016(3))

Unlawful transaction of health coverage as a health maintenance organization (RCW 48.46.033(3))

Unlawful transaction of insurance business (RCW 48.15.023(3))

Unlicensed practice as an insurance professional (RCW 48.17.063(2))

Use of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Vehicle Prowling 2 (third or subsequent offense) (RCW 9A.52.100(3))

Vehicular Assault, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Viewing of Depictions of a Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.075(1))

III

Animal Cruelty 1 (Sexual Conduct or Contact) (RCW 16.52.205(3))

Assault 3 (Except Assault 3 of a Peace Officer With a Projectile Stun Gun) (RCW 9A.36.031 except subsection (1)(h))

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW 9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Cyber Harassment (RCW 9A.90.120(2)(b))

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

False Reporting 2 (RCW 9A.84.040(2)(b))

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Hazing (RCW 28B.10.901(2)(b))

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)

Manufacture of Untraceable Firearm with Intent to Sell (RCW 9.41.190)

Manufacture or Assembly of an Undetectable Firearm or Untraceable Firearm (RCW 9.41.325)

Mortgage Fraud (RCW 19.144.080)

Negligently Causing Substantial Bodily Harm By Use of a Signal Preemption Device (RCW 46.37.674)

Organized Retail Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.350(2))

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun, Bump-Fire Stock, Undetectable Firearm, or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Retail Theft with Special Circumstances 1 (RCW 9A.56.360(2))

Securities Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent conviction or threat of death) (RCW 9.61.230(2))

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.083)

Theft with the Intent to Resell 1 (RCW 9A.56.340(2))

Trafficking in Catalytic Converters 2 (section 26 of this act)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.82.055)

Unlawful Hunting of Big Game 1 (RCW 77.15.410(3)(b))

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Unlawful Misbranding of Fish or Shellfish 1 (RCW 77.140.060(3))

Unlawful possession of firearm in the second degree (RCW 9.41.040(2))

Unlawful Taking of Endangered Fish or Wildlife 1 (RCW 77.15.120(3)(b))

Unlawful Trafficking in Fish, Shellfish, or Wildlife 1 (RCW 77.15.260(3)(b))

Unlawful Use of a Nondesignated Vessel (RCW 77.15.530(4))

Vehicular Assault, by the operation or driving of a vehicle with disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.522)

II

Commercial Fishing Without a License 1 (RCW 77.15.500(3)(b))

Computer Trespass 1 (RCW 9A.90.040)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))

Electronic Data Service Interference (RCW 9A.90.060)

Electronic Data Tampering 1 (RCW 9A.90.080)

Electronic Data Theft (RCW 9A.90.100)

Engaging in Fish Dealing Activity Unlicensed 1 (RCW 77.15.620(3))

Escape from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

Failure to Register as a Sex Offender (second or subsequent offense) (RCW 9A.44.130 prior to June 10, 2010, and RCW 9A.44.132)

Health Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Identity Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(3))

Improperly Obtaining Financial Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Organized Retail Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.350(3))

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Possession of a Stolen Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.068)

Possession, sale, or offering for sale of seven or more unmarked catalytic converters (section 23(5) of this act)

Retail Theft with Special Circumstances 2 (RCW 9A.56.360(3))

Scrap Processing, Recycling, or Supplying Without a License (second or subsequent offense) (RCW 19.290.100)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of a Motor Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.065)

Theft of Rental, Leased, Lease-purchased, or Loaned Property (valued at $5,000 or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(a))

Theft with the Intent to Resell 2 (RCW 9A.56.340(3))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or payment card transaction (RCW 9A.56.290(4)(a))

Unlawful Participation of Non-Indians in Indian Fishery (RCW 77.15.570(2))

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Unlawful Purchase or Use of a License (RCW 77.15.650(3)(b))

Unlawful Trafficking in Fish, Shellfish, or Wildlife 2 (RCW 77.15.260(3)(a))

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

Voyeurism 1 (RCW 9A.44.115)

I

Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Fraudulent Creation or Revocation of a Mental Health Advance Directive (RCW 9A.60.060)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Mineral Trespass (RCW 78.44.330)

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Spotlighting Big Game 1 (RCW 77.15.450(3)(b))

Suspension of Department Privileges 1 (RCW 77.15.670(3)(b))

Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2 (RCW 9A.56.075)

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft from a Vulnerable Adult 2 (RCW 9A.56.400(2))

Theft of Rental, Leased, Lease-purchased, or Loaned Property (valued at $750 or more but less than $5,000) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(b))

Transaction of insurance business beyond the scope of licensure (RCW 48.17.063)

Unlawful Fish and Shellfish Catch Accounting (RCW 77.15.630(3)(b))

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful Possession of Fictitious Identification (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Instruments of Financial Fraud (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Payment Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of a Personal Identification Device (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Production of Payment Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Releasing, Planting, Possessing, or Placing Deleterious Exotic Wildlife (RCW 77.15.250(2)(b))

Unlawful Trafficking in Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.142)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.144)

Unlawful Use of Net to Take Fish 1 (RCW 77.15.580(3)(b))

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Violating Commercial Fishing Area or Time 1 (RCW 77.15.550(3)(b))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30. This act takes effect April 1, 2025.

--- END ---