BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 18.260 RCW to read as follows:

The commission shall issue a license to practice as a preventive dental assistant to any applicant who:

(1) Pays any applicable fees as established by the secretary in accordance with RCW 43.70.110 and 43.70.250;

(2) Submits, on forms provided by the secretary, the applicant's name, address, and other applicable information as determined by the secretary; and

(3) Demonstrates competency as a preventive dental assistant as determined by the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 18.260 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The commission shall adopt rules relating to the scope of preventive dental assistant services that may be performed by preventive dental assistants under the supervision of a licensed dentist.

(2) The scope of preventive dental assistant services that the commission identifies in subsection (1) of this section must include:

(a) Dental assisting services that a dental assistant may perform under the supervision of a licensed dentist;

(b) Dental prophylaxis for patients in a healthy oral state as defined by the commission; and

(c) Periodontal probing after initial probing by a dentist or dental hygienist and diagnosis by a dentist.

(3) A dentist may not assign a preventive dental assistant to perform services until the preventive dental assistant has demonstrated skills necessary to competently perform all assigned duties and responsibilities.

Sec. 3. RCW 18.260.090 and 2007 c 269 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission shall issue an initial credential or renewal credential to an applicant who has met the requirements for a credential or deny an initial credential or renewal credential based upon failure to meet the requirements for a credential or unprofessional conduct or impairment governed by chapter 18.130 RCW.

(2) The commission may adopt rules for renewal requirements for a credential, including continuing education requirements, for preventive dental assistants and expanded function dental auxiliary licenses.

--- END ---