BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 9.94A.8673 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 40 s 37 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Within funds appropriated for this purpose, the sentencing guidelines commission shall establish and maintain a sex ((offender))offense policy board.

(2) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the board shall facilitate training and team building, and reinstate conferences relevant to sex offense policy development.

(3)(a) The board shall serve to advise the governor and the legislature as necessary on issues relating to sex ((offender))offense management.

(b) At such times as the governor or a legislative committee of jurisdiction may request, the ((sex offender policy)) board may be convened to:

(i) Undertake projects to assist policymakers in making informed judgments about issues relating to sex ((offender))offense policy; and

(ii) Conduct case reviews of sex offense incidents to understand performance of Washington's sex ((offender))offense prevention and response systems.

(((3)))(4) The ((sex offender policy)) board shall consist of ((thirteen))17 voting members((. Unless the member is))as follows:

(a) The four persons specifically named in this ((section, the following organizations shall designate a person to sit on the board. The voting membership shall consist of the following:

(a) A representative of the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs;

(b) A representative of the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys;

(c) A representative of the Washington association of criminal defense lawyers;

(d)))subsection:

(i) The chair of the indeterminate sentence review board or his or her designee;

(((e) A representative of the Washington association for the treatment of sex abusers;

(f)))(ii) The secretary of the department of corrections or his or her designee;

(((g) A representative of the Washington state superior court judges' association;

(h)))(iii) The assistant secretary of the juvenile rehabilitation administration or his or her designee; and

(((i) The office of crime victims advocacy in the department of commerce;

(j) A representative of the Washington state association of counties;

(k) A representative of the association of Washington cities;

(l) A representative of the Washington association of sexual assault programs; and

(m)))(iv) The director of the special commitment center or his or her designee;

(b) One representative from each of the following organizations, appointed by the organization being represented:

(i) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs;

(ii) The Washington association of prosecuting attorneys;

(iii) The Washington association of criminal defense lawyers;

(iv) The Washington association for the treatment and prevention of sexual abuse;

(v) The Washington state superior court judges' association;

(vi) The office of crime victims advocacy in the department of commerce;

(vii) The Washington state association of counties;

(viii) The association of Washington cities; and

(ix) The Washington coalition of sexual assault programs;

(c) One representative from a community-based organization advocating for persons convicted of sex offenses, appointed by the chair of the sex offense policy board and approved by a majority vote of the board's voting membership;

(d) One representative from a federally recognized Indian tribe in Washington state, appointed by the governor's office of Indian affairs;

(e) One representative with lived experience with incarceration for a sex offense, appointed by the chair of the sex offense policy board and approved by a majority vote of the board's voting membership; and

(f) One representative with lived experience as the victim of a sex offense, appointed by the chair of the sex offense policy board and approved by a majority vote of the board's voting membership.

(((4)))(5) The board shall choose its chair by majority vote from among its voting membership. The chair's term shall be two years.

(((5)))(6) As appropriate, the board shall consult with the criminal justice division in the attorney general's office and the Washington institute for public policy.

(((6)))(7) The board shall consult with the office of crime victims advocacy for recommended trauma-informed practices in the selection and participation of any victims appointed to the board.

(8) Members of the board shall receive no compensation but may be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

--- END ---