BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 2.28 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The name of an elected official, in his or her official capacity, may not appear on a check or other remittance that resulted from a lawsuit.

(2) For purposes of this section, "elected official" means any person elected at a general or special election to any public office, and any person appointed to fill a vacancy in any such office.

--- END ---