BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.17.324 and 2019 c 287 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

To realize the environmental benefits of electrification of the transportation system it is necessary to support the adoption of electric vehicles and other electric technology in the state by incentivizing the purchase of these vehicles, building out the charging infrastructure, developing greener transit options, and supporting clean alternative fuel infrastructure. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to support these activities through the imposition of new transportation electrification fees in this section.

(1) A vehicle that both (a) uses at least one method of propulsion that is capable of being reenergized by an external source of electricity and (b) is capable of traveling at least ((thirty))30 miles using only battery power, is subject to an annual ((seventy-five dollar))$75 transportation electrification fee to be collected by the department, county auditor, or other agent or subagent appointed by the director, in addition to any other fees and taxes required by law. For administrative efficiencies, the transportation electrification fee must be collected at the same time as vehicle registration renewals and may only be collected for vehicles that are renewing an annual vehicle registration.

(2) ((Beginning October 1, 2019))(a) Except for vehicles identified in (b) of this subsection, in lieu of the fee in subsection (1) of this section for a hybrid or alternative fuel vehicle that is not required to pay the fees established in RCW 46.17.323 (1) and (4), the department, county auditor, or other agent or subagent appointed by the director must require that the applicant for the annual vehicle registration renewal of such hybrid or alternative fuel vehicle pay a ((seventy-five dollar))$75 hybrid vehicle transportation electrification fee, in addition to any other fees and taxes required by law.

(b) Hybrid electric vehicles that are not capable of being recharged through an external electric power source are exempt from the hybrid vehicle transportation electrification fee authorized in (a) of this subsection.

(3) The fees required under this section must be deposited in the electric vehicle account created in RCW 82.44.200, until July 1, 2025, when the fee must be deposited in the motor vehicle account.

(4) This section only applies to a vehicle that is designed to have the capability to drive at a speed of more than ((thirty-five))35 miles per hour.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act applies to vehicle registrations that become due on or after May 1, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act takes effect May 1, 2025.

--- END ---