BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) By July 1, 2025, the authority shall seek approval from the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services to secure federal financial participation in the costs of providing hospital-based community violence prevention services through timely interventions to any person enrolled in a medical assistance program pursuant to this chapter. The prevention services must be evidence-informed, trauma-informed, supportive, and nonpsychotherapeutic services for the purpose of promoting improved health outcomes, trauma recovery, and positive behavioral change.

(2) The authority shall adopt criteria for reimbursement of hospital-based community violence prevention services under subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall establish training program standards for educational programs that train and certify individuals to provide hospital-based community violence prevention services identified under section 1 of this act. The department shall approve training programs that meet the standards which must, at a minimum, include instruction in basic trauma-informed care, community-based prevention strategies, case management, referral practices, advocacy practices, and state and federal privacy requirements. Training programs may be private or public entities that operate on a local, state, or national basis. The department may adopt rules to establish the training program standards.

--- END ---