BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1) This chapter does not apply to amounts received by a covered entity, opt-in entity, or entity that receives no-cost allowances, as defined in chapter 70A.65 RCW, from the receipt, generation, purchase, sale, transfer, or retirement of allowances, offset credits, or price ceiling units under chapter 70A.65 RCW.

(2) The provisions of RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1) This chapter does not apply to amounts received by a covered entity, opt-in entity, or entity that receives no-cost allowances, as defined in chapter 70A.65 RCW, from the receipt, generation, purchase, sale, transfer, or retirement of allowances, offset credits, or price ceiling units under chapter 70A.65 RCW.

(2) The provisions of RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act applies both retrospectively and prospectively.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect April 1, 2024.

--- END ---