BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.60A RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall initiate the reintegration support for incarcerated veterans pilot project. The purpose of the project is to assist incarcerated veterans with reintegration into civilian life through education and employment, decreasing homelessness following release from incarceration.

(2) Subject to available appropriations, the state board for community and technical colleges will select a pilot project site located west of the Cascade mountains, with consideration given to Edmonds College. If a second pilot project site is selected, it must be located east of the Cascade mountains.

(3) The department of veterans affairs shall coordinate with the department of corrections at least annually to identify all veterans incarcerated within the last 12 months. The department of corrections shall coordinate with the department of veterans affairs to assist veterans who are in receipt of federal department of veterans affairs disability compensation or pension benefits with notification to the federal department of veterans affairs of their incarceration for more than 60 days in an attempt to prevent overpayment of veterans benefits.

(4) The pilot project must support veterans through:

(a) Appointment of a reentry navigator.

(i) The reentry navigator shall coordinate with the department of corrections at least annually to identify all incarcerated veterans with release dates within 24 months.

(ii) The reentry navigator shall contact each incarcerated veteran at least 12 months prior to the veteran's release date and provide the veteran with information on educational opportunities, including state registered apprenticeship programs, services, and resources available to the veteran following release from incarceration.

(iii) For each incarcerated veteran with a release date within three months who requests to participate in the pilot project, the reentry navigator shall develop a reentry plan. The reentry plan must include an assessment of anticipated living expenses; educational opportunities to train for employment, including state registered apprenticeship programs; eligibility for programs such as basic food employment and training, educational benefits through the federal department of veterans affairs, or the incarcerated veterans transition program; and contact information for veterans services, social security, and the department of social and health services in the veteran's county of residence following release.

(b) Provision of a housing subsidy.

(i) The reentry navigator shall coordinate with the department to develop criteria to determine eligibility for housing assistance.

(ii) Each eligible veteran must receive a housing subsidy not to exceed $200 per month for up to a 12-month period after release from incarceration.

(iii) Priority shall be given to veterans who apply for enrollment or enroll in an educational institution or a state registered apprenticeship program within three months of release from incarceration.

(c) Provision of a reentry subsidy.

(i) Each veteran shall receive a reentry subsidy not to exceed $2,000 during the 12-month period after release from incarceration.

(ii) The reentry navigator shall coordinate with the department to identify appropriate expenses, including clothing, car insurance, cellular phone, home furnishings, or food.

(iii) The department shall develop a system to timely pay an eligible expense.

(d) The reentry navigator shall monitor the status of each veteran participating in the pilot project. If a veteran is incarcerated while participating in the pilot project, the reentry navigator shall promptly notify the department and immediately terminate the housing subsidy and reentry subsidy effective on the date of incarceration.

(5) The pilot project may provide additional support to veterans through:

(a) Identification of housing opportunities in the veteran's county of residence following release from incarceration;

(b) Identification of training that may assist a veteran in effectively transitioning to the community following release from incarceration; or

(c) Provision of support and mentoring, life skills training, and assistance with access to local veterans' services.

(6) The department shall coordinate this pilot project with the services offered to veterans by the department of social and health services, local mental health organizations, veteran-focused nonprofit organizations, and the federal department of veterans affairs to minimize duplication and assist those veterans most in need of support to avoid homelessness.

(7) The department shall report to the legislature by November 1, 2025, and every year thereafter until the expiration of the pilot project, on:

(a) The number of veterans assisted by the project;

(b) The number of veterans eligible for the project but unable to participate;

(c) The number of housing subsidies and reentry subsidies provided;

(d) The employment status of each participating veteran at the conclusion of the 12-month period after release from incarceration, including part-time employment, full-time employment, temporary employment, or unemployed;

(e) The housing status of each participating veteran at the conclusion of the 12-month period after release from incarceration, including temporary or permanent housing; and

(f) A comparative analysis of the housing and employment status between participating veterans and veterans released from incarceration who did not participate in the pilot project.

(8) For the purposes of this section, "veteran" has the same meaning as in RCW 41.04.007 regardless of discharge status.

(9) This section expires June 30, 2030.

--- END ---