BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 29A.84 RCW to read as follows:

(1) No person may engage in the following activities within 25 feet of a person collecting signatures for or signing or attempting to sign an initiative or referendum petition, unless each person consents to the other person's engagement in such activities:

(a) Suggest or persuade or attempt to suggest or persuade any person to sign or decline to sign an initiative or referendum petition;

(b) Engage in any practice which interferes with the freedom of a person to collect signatures or sign an initiative or referendum petition; or

(c) Engage in any activities restricted under (a) and (b) of this subsection through electronic amplification located more than 100 feet from a person collecting signatures for or signing or attempting to sign an initiative or referendum petition, if the person is capable of being understood at that distance.

(2) A violation of subsection (1) of this section is a violation of RCW 29A.84.250(4).

--- END ---