BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that, despite a modern waste disposal infrastructure, the occurrences of unlawful solid waste dumping are an increasing problem on open spaces such as privately and publicly owned forestlands. This irresponsible waste dumping, which often includes hazardous materials, asbestos, derelict boats, junk vehicles, appliances, furniture, and household garbage not only creates significant costs for the landowner, but also creates immediate, and sometimes lasting, environmental and habitat damage and degradation of recreational and aesthetic opportunities.

(2) The legislature further finds that the current enforcement system, which relies on the criminalization of illegal dumping, may not be the most effective, efficient, or just penalty system. Converting all but the most egregious illegal dumping from a criminal act to a civil infraction creates a system of deterrence and penalties that better reflects the magnitude of the act, avoids criminal records for individuals who may be unable to afford appropriate waste management options, and reduces the burden on local criminal justice systems and infrastructures.

(3) The legislature further finds that appropriate waste disposal can create a financial barrier for some individuals. In an effort to divert illegal dumping, a portion of the existing litter cleanup restitution payment should be diverted from direct payments to landowners to funding efforts to mitigate the costs of proper disposal, restitution, or environmental damages.

Sec. 2. RCW 70A.200.060 and 2003 c 337 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) It is a violation of this section to ((abandon)):

(a) Abandon a junk vehicle upon any property((. In addition, no person shall throw));

(b) Throw, drop, deposit, discard, or otherwise dispose of litter upon any public property in the state or upon private property in this state not owned by him or her or in the waters of this state whether from a vehicle or otherwise including but not limited to any public highway, public park, beach, campground, forestland, recreational area, trailer park, highway, road, street, or alley except:

(((a)))(i) When the property is designated by the state or its agencies or political subdivisions for the disposal of garbage and refuse, and the person is authorized to use such property for that purpose;

(((b)))(ii) Into a litter receptacle in a manner that will prevent litter from being carried away or deposited by the elements upon any part of the private or public property or waters.

(2)(((a))) Except as provided in subsection (((4)))(7) of this section, it is a class 3 civil infraction as provided in RCW 7.80.120 for a person to litter in an amount less than or equal to one cubic foot.

(((b)))(3) It is a ((misdemeanor for a person to litter in an amount greater than one cubic foot but less than one cubic yard.

The person shall also pay a litter cleanup restitution payment equal to twice the actual cost of cleanup, or fifty dollars per cubic foot of litter, whichever is greater. The court shall distribute one-half of the restitution payment to the landowner))natural resource infraction under chapter 7.84 RCW for a person to litter in an amount greater than one cubic foot but less than 10 cubic yards and a gross misdemeanor for a person to litter more than 10 cubic yards.

(4)(a) A person found liable under this section shall, in addition to the penalties provided for gross misdemeanors, or for natural resource infractions as provided in RCW 7.84.100, also pay a litter cleanup restitution payment equal to four times the actual cost of cleanup. The court shall distribute one-half of the restitution payment to the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account created in RCW 70A.200.140 and one-half of the restitution payment to the law enforcement agency investigating the incident.

(b) The court may, in addition to or in lieu of part or all of the cleanup restitution payment, order the person to pick up and remove litter from the property, with prior permission of the legal owner or, in the case of public property, of the agency managing the property.

(c) The court may suspend or modify the litter cleanup restitution payment for a first-time offender under this section, if the person cleans up and properly disposes of the litter.

(((c) It is a gross misdemeanor for a person to litter in an amount of one cubic yard or more. The person shall also pay a litter cleanup restitution payment equal to twice the actual cost of cleanup, or one hundred dollars per cubic foot of litter, whichever is greater. The court shall distribute one-half of the restitution payment to the landowner and one-half of the restitution payment to the law enforcement agency investigating the incident. The court may, in addition to or in lieu of part or all of the cleanup restitution payment, order the person to pick up and remove litter from the property, with prior permission of the legal owner or, in the case of public property, of the agency managing the property. The court may suspend or modify the litter cleanup restitution payment for a first-time offender under this section, if the person cleans up and properly disposes of the litter.

(d)))(5) If a junk vehicle is abandoned in violation of this section, RCW 46.55.230 governs the vehicle's removal, disposal, and sale, and the penalties that may be imposed against the person who abandoned the vehicle.

(((3)))(6) If the violation occurs in a state park, the court shall, in addition to any other penalties assessed, order the person to perform ((twenty-four))24 hours of community restitution in the state park where the violation occurred if the state park has stated an intent to participate as provided in RCW 79A.05.050.

(((4)))(7) It is a class 1 civil infraction as provided in RCW 7.80.120 for a person to discard, in violation of this section, potentially dangerous litter in any amount.

Sec. 3. RCW 7.84.100 and 2020 c 268 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person found to have committed an infraction shall be assessed a monetary penalty. No penalty may exceed ((five hundred dollars))$500 for each offense unless specifically authorized by statute.

(2) The supreme court may prescribe by rule a schedule of monetary penalties for designated infractions. The legislature requests the supreme court to adjust this schedule every two years for inflation. ((The))Except as otherwise provided, the maximum penalty imposed by the schedule shall be ((five hundred dollars))$500 per infraction and the minimum penalty imposed by the schedule shall be ((ten dollars))$10 per infraction. This schedule may be periodically reviewed by the legislature and is subject to its revision.

(3) Penalties for violations of RCW 70A.200.060 that are natural resource infractions are as follows:

(a) Up to $250 for a person found liable of littering between one cubic foot and one cubic yard of material;

(b) Up to $750 for a person found liable of littering more than one cubic yard and less than seven cubic yards of material;

(c) Up to $1,000 for a person found liable of littering between seven and 10 cubic yards of material.

(4) Whenever a monetary penalty is imposed by a court under this chapter, it is immediately payable. If the person is unable to pay at that time, the court may, in its discretion, grant an extension of the period in which the penalty may be paid.

(((4)))(5)(a) The county treasurer shall remit ((seventy-five))75 percent of the money received under RCW 79A.80.080(5) to the state treasurer.

(b) Money remitted under this subsection to the state treasurer must be deposited in the recreation access pass account established under RCW 79A.80.090. The balance of the noninterest money received by the county treasurer must be deposited in the county current expense fund.

Sec. 4. RCW 70A.200.140 and 2022 c 297 s 963 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) There is hereby created an account within the state treasury to be known as the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account shall be used as follows:

(a) ((Forty))40 percent of receipts from taxes imposed in RCW 82.19.010 to the department of ecology, primarily for use by the departments of ecology, natural resources, revenue, transportation, and corrections, and the parks and recreation commission, for litter collection programs under RCW 70A.200.170. The amount to the department of ecology shall also be used for a central coordination function for litter control efforts statewide; to support employment of youth in litter cleanup as intended in RCW 70A.200.020, and for litter pick up using other authorized agencies; and for statewide public awareness programs under RCW 70A.200.150(7). The amount to the department shall also be used to defray the costs of administering the funding, coordination, and oversight of local government programs for waste reduction, litter control, recycling, and composting so that local governments can apply one hundred percent of their funding to achieving program goals. The amount to the department of revenue shall be used to enforce compliance with the litter tax imposed in chapter 82.19 RCW;

(b)(i) ((Twenty))20 percent of receipts from taxes imposed in RCW 82.19.010 to the department for local government funding programs for waste reduction, litter control, recycling activities, and composting activities by cities and counties under RCW 70A.200.190, to be administered by the department of ecology; (ii) any unspent funds under (b)(i) of this subsection may be used to create and pay for a matching fund competitive grant program to be used by local governments for the development and implementation of contamination reduction and outreach plans for inclusion in comprehensive solid waste management plans or by local governments and nonprofit organizations for local or statewide education programs designed to help the public with litter control, waste reduction, recycling, and composting of primarily the products taxed under chapter 82.19 RCW. Recipients under this subsection include programs to reduce wasted food and food waste that are designed to achieve the goals established in RCW 70A.205.715(1) and that are consistent with the plan developed in RCW 70A.205.715(3). Grants must adhere to the following requirements: (A) No grant may exceed ((sixty thousand dollars))$60,000; (B) grant recipients shall match the grant funding allocated by the department by an amount equal to ((twenty-five))25 percent of eligible expenses. A local government's share of these costs may be met by cash or contributed services; (C) the obligation of the department to make grant payments is contingent upon the availability of the amount of money appropriated for this subsection (1)(b); and (D) grants are managed under the guidelines for existing grant programs; ((and))

(c) ((Forty))40 percent of receipts from taxes imposed in RCW 82.19.010 to the department of ecology to: (i) Implement activities under RCW 70A.200.150 for waste reduction, recycling, and composting efforts; (ii) provide technical assistance to local governments and commercial businesses to increase recycling markets and recycling and composting programs primarily for the products taxed under chapter 82.19 RCW designed to educate citizens about waste reduction, litter control, and recyclable and compostable products and programs; (iii) increase access to waste reduction, composting, and recycling programs, particularly for food packaging and plastic bags and appropriate composting techniques; and (iv) for programs to reduce wasted food and food waste that are designed to achieve the goals established in RCW 70A.205.715(1) and that are consistent with the plan developed in RCW 70A.205.715(3); and

(d) 100 percent of receipts from litter cleanup restitution payments as provided in RCW 70A.200.060(4) and of fines and bail forfeitures received under this chapter, in addition to any legislative appropriations made to the account for these specific purposes, to the department to award grants to local governments or nonprofit organizations designed to reduce illegal dumping on public or private forestlands or other open spaces. The grants must be awarded for project descriptions aimed at reducing outdoor dumping or reducing the cost of legal waste disposal, such as education campaigns, free or reduced-cost collection days, income-based waste disposal coupons or vouchers, communication and funding partnerships with other entities such as landowners or collection companies, funding emphasis enforcement, funding information rewards, mitigation money to assist landowners with removing large items or a substantial quantity of illegally dumped material, and other measures reasonably targeted at reducing illegal dumping. The department may implement this subsection (1)(d) by including any funding and activities in existing or related programs managed by the department and may use a portion of receipts from the litter cleanup restitution payments for administration of the grants required by this section.

(2) All taxes imposed in RCW 82.19.010 ((and fines and bail forfeitures)) collected or received pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account and used for the programs under subsection (1)(a) through (c) of this section. Except as provided in this chapter and chapters 7.80 and 7.84 RCW, all fines and bail forfeitures collected or received pursuant to this chapter must be deposited in the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account and used for the programs under subsection (1)(d) of this section.

(3) Not less than five percent and no more than ((ten))10 percent of the amount appropriated into the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account every biennium shall be reserved for capital needs, including the purchase of vehicles for transporting crews and for collecting litter and solid waste. Capital funds shall be distributed among state agencies and local governments according to the same criteria provided in RCW 70A.200.170 for the remainder of the funds, so that the most effective waste reduction, litter control, recycling, and composting programs receive the most funding. The intent of this subsection is to provide funds for the purchase of equipment that will enable the department to account for the greatest return on investment in terms of reaching a zero litter goal.

(4) Funds in the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account, collected under chapter 82.19 RCW, must be prioritized for the products identified under RCW 82.19.020 solely for the purposes of recycling, composting, and litter collection, reduction, and control programs.

(((5) During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, Washington State University may use funds in the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account, collected under chapter 82.19 RCW, to conduct an organic waste study.

(6) During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, and as an exception to the distribution of expenditures otherwise required in this section, the department of ecology may use funds in the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account to continue a series of food waste reduction campaigns, to continue to invest in litter prevention campaigns, to conduct a recycling study, and to increase litter control on state highways.))

Sec. 5. RCW 70A.305.180 and 2023 c 475 s 940 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The model toxics control operating account is hereby created in the state treasury.

(2) Moneys in the model toxics control operating account must be used only to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to the following:

(a) The state's responsibility for hazardous waste planning, management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public education required under chapter 70A.300 RCW;

(b) The state's responsibility for solid waste planning, management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public education required under chapter 70A.205 RCW;

(c) The hazardous waste clean-up program required under this chapter;

(d) State matching funds required under federal cleanup law;

(e) Financial assistance for local programs and plans, including local solid waste financial assistance, in accordance with chapters 70A.405, 70A.205, 70A.214, 70A.224, and 70A.300 RCW;

(f) State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling, or disposal of paint and hazardous wastes from households, small businesses, and agriculture;

(g) Oil and hazardous materials spill prevention, preparedness, training, and response activities;

(h) Water and environmental health protection and monitoring programs;

(i) Programs authorized under chapter 70A.135 RCW;

(j) A public participation program;

(k) Development and demonstration of alternative management technologies designed to carry out the hazardous waste management priorities of RCW 70A.300.260;

(l) State agriculture and health programs for the safe use, reduction, recycling, or disposal of pesticides;

(m) Funding requirements to maintain receipt of federal funds under the federal solid waste disposal act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 6901 et seq.);

(n) Air quality programs and actions for reducing public exposure to toxic air pollution;

(o) Petroleum-based plastic or expanded polystyrene foam debris clean-up activities in fresh or marine waters; and

(p) For the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, and solely to continue the policy of previous biennia, forest practices at the department of natural resources.

(3) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, moneys in model toxics control operating account may be spent only after appropriation by statute.

(4) One percent of the moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030, plus any additional amounts appropriated by the legislature, must be allocated only for public participation grants to persons who may be adversely affected by a release or threatened release of a hazardous substance and to not-for-profit public interest organizations. The primary purpose of these grants is to facilitate the participation by persons and organizations in the investigation and remedying of releases or threatened releases of hazardous substances and to implement the state's solid and hazardous waste management priorities. Eligible grants may include efforts to reduce illegal dumping of hazardous materials or petroleum-containing products on public and private land. No grant may exceed ((sixty thousand dollars))$60,000. Grants may be renewed annually. Moneys appropriated for public participation that are not expended at the close of any biennium revert to the model toxics control operating account.

(5) The department must adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and performance.

(6) During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the model toxics control operating account to the state general fund.

Sec. 6. RCW 7.84.140 and 2011 c 320 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director chosen by the state parks and recreation commission, the commissioner of public lands, and the director of the department of fish and wildlife are each authorized to delegate and accept enforcement authority over natural resource infractions to or from the other agencies through an agreement entered into under the interlocal cooperation act, chapter 39.34 RCW.

(2) Any person specified in RCW 70A.200.050 may initiate enforcement of RCW 70A.200.060 for those infractions that are natural resource infractions under this chapter, with or without an interlocal agreement under this section.

Sec. 7. RCW 7.84.020 and 2012 c 176 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The definition in this section applies throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

"Infraction" means an offense which, by the terms of Title 76, 77, 79, or 79A RCW or RCW 7.84.030(2)(b) or 70A.200.060, and rules adopted under these titles and sections, is declared not to be a criminal offense or a civil infraction and is subject to the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 8. RCW 70A.200.070 and 1996 c 263 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The director may prescribe the procedures for the collection of penalties, costs, and other charges allowed by chapters 7.80 and 7.84 RCW for violations of this chapter. Any person specified in RCW 70A.200.050 that is also a general peace officer authorized to take actions specified in RCW 7.84.030, including detentions for a reasonable period and investigations, may take those actions with respect to littering infractions under this chapter.

--- END ---