BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 13.40.192 and 2023 c 449 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If a juvenile is ordered to pay restitution, the money judgment remains enforceable for a period of 10 years. When the juvenile reaches the age of 18 years or at the conclusion of juvenile court jurisdiction, whichever occurs later, the superior court clerk must docket the remaining balance of the juvenile's restitution in the same manner as other judgments for the payment of money. The judgment remains valid and enforceable until 10 years from the date of its imposition. The clerk of the superior court may seek extension of the judgment for restitution in the same manner as RCW 6.17.020 for purposes of collection as allowed under RCW 36.18.190.

(2) A judgment against a juvenile for any legal financial obligation other than restitution including, but not limited to, fines, penalty assessments, attorneys' fees, court costs, and other administrative fees, is not enforceable after July 1, 2023. The superior court clerk shall not accept payments from a respondent who was ordered to pay legal financial obligations, including fines, penalty assessments, attorneys' fees, and court costs after July 1, 2023. Any such debts shall be rendered null and void, and considered satisfied and paid in full by July 1, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The administrative office of the courts may take the necessary steps to ensure that this act is implemented by July 1, 2025.

--- END ---