BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A city or town must allow neighborhood cafés to be permitted in any zone allowing residential uses provided that the following conditions are met:

(a) The total gross floor area of the café must be at least 500 square feet;

(b) There are no drive-through facilities at the café;

(c) The café must offer food if alcoholic drinks are offered; and

(d) The café is located in an area where there is more than one means of egress for vehicle traffic.

(2) Cities and towns may not require more than two off-street parking spots per café.

(3) Hours of operation may be limited by the city or town.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "neighborhood café" means an establishment that serves a limited menu of food items and has at least 500 square feet of gross floor area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A code city must allow neighborhood cafés to be permitted in any zone allowing residential uses provided that the following conditions are met:

(a) The total gross floor area of the café must be at least 500 square feet;

(b) There are no drive-through facilities at the café;

(c) The café must offer food if alcoholic drinks are offered; and

(d) The café is located in an area where there is more than one means of egress for vehicle traffic.

(2) Code cities may not require more than two off-street parking spots per café.

(3) Hours of operation may be limited by the code city.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "neighborhood café" means an establishment that serves a limited menu of food items and has at least 500 square feet of gross floor area.

--- END ---