BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 26.19.065 and 2018 c 150 s 401 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Limit at ((forty-five))45 percent of a parent's net income. Neither parent's child support obligation owed for all his or her biological or legal children may exceed ((forty-five))45 percent of net income except for good cause shown.

(a) Each child is entitled to a pro rata share of the income available for support, but the court only applies the pro rata share to the children in the case before the court.

(b) Before determining whether to apply the ((forty-five))45 percent limitation, the court must consider whether it would be unjust to apply the limitation after considering the best interests of the child and the circumstances of each parent. Such circumstances include, but are not limited to, leaving insufficient funds in the custodial parent's household to meet the basic needs of the child, comparative hardship to the affected households, assets or liabilities, and any involuntary limits on either parent's earning capacity including incarceration, disabilities, or incapacity.

(c) Good cause includes, but is not limited to, possession of substantial wealth, children with day care expenses, special medical need, educational need, psychological need, and larger families.

(2) Presumptive minimum support obligation. (a) When a parent's monthly net income is below ((one hundred twenty-five))180 percent of the federal poverty guideline for a one-person family, a support order of not less than ((fifty dollars))$50 per child per month shall be entered unless the obligor parent establishes that it would be unjust to do so in that particular case. The decision whether there is a sufficient basis to deviate below the presumptive minimum payment must take into consideration the best interests of the child and the circumstances of each parent. Such circumstances can include leaving insufficient funds in the custodial parent's household to meet the basic needs of the child, comparative hardship to the affected households, assets or liabilities, and earning capacity.

(b) The basic support obligation of the parent making the transfer payment, excluding health care, day care, and special child-rearing expenses, shall not reduce his or her net income below the self-support reserve of ((one hundred twenty-five))180 percent of the federal poverty level for a one-person family, except for the presumptive minimum payment of ((fifty dollars))$50 per child per month or when it would be unjust to apply the self-support reserve limitation after considering the best interests of the child and the circumstances of each parent. Such circumstances include, but are not limited to, leaving insufficient funds in the custodial parent's household to meet the basic needs of the child, comparative hardship to the affected households, assets or liabilities, and earning capacity. This section shall not be construed to require monthly substantiation of income.

(c)(i) When a parent's income is greater than the self-support reserve of 180 percent of the federal poverty level for a one-person household, neither parent's basic child support obligation owed for all of the parent's biological or legal children may reduce that parent's income below the self-support reserve of 180 percent of the federal poverty guideline for a one-person household except for the presumptive minimum of $50 per child per month.

(ii) Each child is entitled to a pro rata share of the income available for support but the court only applies the pro rata share to the children in the case before the court. Before determining whether to apply this limitation, the court should consider whether it would be unjust to apply the limitation after considering the best interests of the child and the circumstances of each parent. Such circumstances may include leaving insufficient funds in the custodial parent's household to meet the basic needs of the child, comparative hardship to the affected households, assets or liabilities, and earning capacity.

(3) Income above ((twelve thousand dollars))$50,000. The economic table is presumptive for combined monthly net incomes up to and including ((twelve thousand dollars))$50,000. When combined monthly net income exceeds ((twelve thousand dollars))$50,000, the court may exceed the presumptive amount of support set for combined monthly net incomes of ((twelve thousand dollars))$50,000 upon written findings of fact.

Sec. 2. RCW 26.19.071 and 2020 c 227 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Consideration of all income. All income and resources of each parent's household shall be disclosed and considered by the court when the court determines the child support obligation of each parent. Only the income of the parents of the children whose support is at issue shall be calculated for purposes of calculating the basic support obligation. Income and resources of any other person shall not be included in calculating the basic support obligation.

(2) Verification of income. Tax returns for the preceding two years and current paystubs shall be provided to verify income and deductions. Other sufficient verification shall be required for income and deductions which do not appear on tax returns or paystubs.

(3) Income sources included in gross monthly income. Except as specifically excluded in subsection (4) of this section, monthly gross income shall include income from any source, including:

(a) Salaries;

(b) Wages;

(c) Commissions;

(d) Deferred compensation;

(e) Overtime, except as excluded for income in subsection (4)(i) of this section;

(f) Contract-related benefits;

(g) Income from second jobs, except as excluded for income in subsection (4)(i) of this section;

(h) Dividends;

(i) Interest;

(j) Trust income;

(k) Severance pay;

(l) Annuities;

(m) Capital gains;

(n) Pension retirement benefits;

(o) Workers' compensation;

(p) Unemployment benefits;

(q) Maintenance actually received;

(r) Bonuses;

(s) Social security benefits;

(t) Disability insurance benefits; and

(u) Income from self-employment, rent, royalties, contracts, proprietorship of a business, or joint ownership of a partnership or closely held corporation.

(4) Income sources excluded from gross monthly income. The following income and resources shall be disclosed but shall not be included in gross income:

(a) Income of a new spouse or new domestic partner or income of other adults in the household;

(b) Child support received from other relationships;

(c) Gifts and prizes;

(d) Temporary assistance for needy families;

(e) Supplemental security income;

(f) Aged, blind, or disabled assistance benefits;

(g) Pregnant women assistance benefits;

(h) Food stamps; and

(i) Overtime or income from second jobs beyond ((forty))40 hours per week averaged over a ((twelve))12-month period worked to provide for a current family's needs, to retire past relationship debts, or to retire child support debt, when the court finds the income will cease when the party has paid off his or her debts.

Receipt of income and resources from temporary assistance for needy families, supplemental security income, aged, blind, or disabled assistance benefits, and food stamps shall not be a reason to deviate from the standard calculation.

(5) Determination of net income. The following expenses shall be disclosed and deducted from gross monthly income to calculate net monthly income:

(a) Federal and state income taxes;

(b) Federal insurance contributions act deductions;

(c) Mandatory pension plan payments;

(d) Mandatory union or professional dues;

(e) Other mandatory state deductions, such as mandatory state insurance premiums actually paid, including for the paid family and medical leave program and long-term services and supports trust program;

(f) State industrial insurance premiums;

(((f)))(g) Court-ordered maintenance to the extent actually paid;

(((g)))(h) Up to ((five thousand dollars))$5,000 per year in voluntary retirement contributions actually made if the contributions show a pattern of contributions during the one-year period preceding the action establishing the child support order unless there is a determination that the contributions were made for the purpose of reducing child support; and

(((h)))(i) Normal business expenses and self-employment taxes for self-employed persons. Justification shall be required for any business expense deduction about which there is disagreement.

Items deducted from gross income under this subsection shall not be a reason to deviate from the standard calculation.

(6) Imputation of income. The court shall impute income to a parent when the parent is voluntarily unemployed or voluntarily underemployed. The court shall determine whether the parent is voluntarily underemployed or voluntarily unemployed based upon that parent's assets, residence, employment and earnings history, job skills, educational attainment, literacy, health, age, criminal record, dependency court obligations, and other employment barriers, record of seeking work, the local job market, the availability of employers willing to hire the parent, the prevailing earnings level in the local community, or any other relevant factors. A court shall not impute income to a parent who is gainfully employed on a full-time basis, unless the court finds that the parent is voluntarily underemployed and finds that the parent is purposely underemployed to reduce the parent's child support obligation. Income shall not be imputed for an unemployable parent. Income shall not be imputed to a parent to the extent the parent is unemployed or significantly underemployed due to the parent's efforts to comply with court-ordered reunification efforts under chapter 13.34 RCW or under a voluntary placement agreement with an agency supervising the child.

(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, in the absence of records of a parent's actual earnings, the court shall impute a parent's income in the following order of priority:

(i) Full-time earnings at the current rate of pay;

(ii) Full-time earnings at the historical rate of pay based on reliable information, such as employment security department data;

(iii) Full-time earnings at a past rate of pay where information is incomplete or sporadic;

(iv) Earnings of ((thirty-two))32 hours per week at minimum wage in the jurisdiction where the parent resides if the parent is on or recently coming off temporary assistance for needy families or recently coming off aged, blind, or disabled assistance benefits, pregnant women assistance benefits, essential needs and housing support, supplemental security income, or disability, has recently been released from incarceration, or is a recent high school graduate. Imputation of earnings at ((thirty-two))32 hours per week under this subsection is a rebuttable presumption;

(v) Full-time earnings at minimum wage in the jurisdiction where the parent resides if the parent has a recent history of minimum wage earnings, has never been employed and has no earnings history, or has no significant earnings history;

(vi) Median net monthly income of year-round full-time workers as derived from the United States bureau of census, current population reports, or such replacement report as published by the bureau of census.

(b) When a parent is currently enrolled in high school full-time, the court shall consider the totality of the circumstances of both parents when determining whether each parent is voluntarily unemployed or voluntarily underemployed. If a parent who is currently enrolled in high school is determined to be voluntarily unemployed or voluntarily underemployed, the court shall impute income at earnings of ((twenty))20 hours per week at minimum wage in the jurisdiction where that parent resides. Imputation of earnings at ((twenty))20 hours per week under this subsection is a rebuttable presumption.

Sec. 3. RCW 26.19.080 and 2009 c 84 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The basic child support obligation derived from the economic table shall be allocated between the parents based on each parent's share of the combined monthly net income.

(2) Health care costs are not included in the economic table. Monthly health care costs shall be shared by the parents in the same proportion as the basic child support obligation. Health care costs shall include, but not be limited to, medical, dental, orthodontia, vision, chiropractic, mental health treatment, prescription medications, and other similar costs for care and treatment.

(3) Day care and special child rearing expenses, such as tuition and long-distance transportation costs to and from the parents for visitation purposes, are not included in the economic table. These expenses shall be shared by the parents in the same proportion as the basic child support obligation. If an obligor pays court or administratively ordered day care or special child rearing expenses that are not actually incurred, the obligee must reimburse the obligor for the overpayment if the overpayment amounts to at least ((twenty))20 percent of the obligor's annual day care or special child rearing expenses. The obligor may institute an action in the superior court or file an application for an adjudicative hearing with the department of social and health services for reimbursement of day care and special child rearing expense overpayments that amount to ((twenty))20 percent or more of the obligor's annual day care and special child rearing expenses. Any ordered overpayment reimbursement shall be applied first as an offset to child support arrearages of the obligor. If the obligor does not have child support arrearages, the reimbursement may be in the form of a direct reimbursement by the obligee or a credit against the obligor's future support payments. If the reimbursement is in the form of a credit against the obligor's future child support payments, the credit shall be spread equally over a ((twelve))12-month period. Absent agreement of the obligee, nothing in this section entitles an obligor to pay more than his or her proportionate share of day care or other special child rearing expenses in advance and then deduct the overpayment from future support transfer payments.

(4) Mandatory educational expenses and optional educational expenses are not included in the economic table. These expenses must be shared by the parents in the same proportion as the basic child support obligation.

(5) The court may exercise its discretion to determine the necessity for and the reasonableness of all amounts ordered in excess of the basic child support obligation.

Sec. 4. RCW 26.09.004 and 2009 c 502 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Department" means the department of social and health services.

(2) "Incapacitation" or "incapacitated" means the inability to pay child support due to participation in court-ordered treatment for a behavioral health disorder issued under chapter 71.05 RCW.

(3) "Military duties potentially impacting parenting functions" means those obligations imposed, voluntarily or involuntarily, on a parent serving in the armed forces that may interfere with that parent's abilities to perform his or her parenting functions under a temporary or permanent parenting plan. Military duties potentially impacting parenting functions include, but are not limited to:

(a) "Deployment," which means the temporary transfer of a service member serving in an active-duty status to another location in support of a military operation, to include any tour of duty classified by the member's branch of the armed forces as "remote" or "unaccompanied";

(b) "Activation" or "mobilization," which means the call-up of a national guard or reserve service member to extended active-duty status. For purposes of this definition, "mobilization" does not include national guard or reserve annual training, inactive duty days, or drill weekends; or

(c) "Temporary duty," which means the transfer of a service member from one military base or the service member's home to a different location, usually another base, for a limited period of time to accomplish training or to assist in the performance of a noncombat mission.

(((2)))(4) "Parenting functions" means those aspects of the parent-child relationship in which the parent makes decisions and performs functions necessary for the care and growth of the child. Parenting functions include:

(a) Maintaining a loving, stable, consistent, and nurturing relationship with the child;

(b) Attending to the daily needs of the child, such as feeding, clothing, physical care and grooming, supervision, health care, and day care, and engaging in other activities which are appropriate to the developmental level of the child and that are within the social and economic circumstances of the particular family;

(c) Attending to adequate education for the child, including remedial or other education essential to the best interests of the child;

(d) Assisting the child in developing and maintaining appropriate interpersonal relationships;

(e) Exercising appropriate judgment regarding the child's welfare, consistent with the child's developmental level and the family's social and economic circumstances; and

(f) Providing for the financial support of the child.

(((3)))(5) "Permanent parenting plan" means a plan for parenting the child, including allocation of parenting functions, which plan is incorporated in any final decree or decree of modification in an action for dissolution of marriage or domestic partnership, declaration of invalidity, or legal separation.

(((4)))(6) "Temporary parenting plan" means a plan for parenting of the child pending final resolution of any action for dissolution of marriage or domestic partnership, declaration of invalidity, or legal separation which is incorporated in a temporary order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 26.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) When a child support order contains language providing for abatement based on incapacitation of the person required to pay child support, there is a rebuttable presumption that an incapacitated person is unable to pay the child support obligation. The presumption may be rebutted by evidence demonstrating that the person required to pay support has possession of, or access to, income or assets available to provide support while incapacitated. Unless the presumption is rebutted, the provisions of subsection (3) of this section apply.

(2)(a) If the child support order does not contain language providing for abatement based on incapacitation of the person required to pay support, the department, the person required to pay support, the payee under the order, or the person entitled to receive support may commence an action in the appropriate forum to:

(i) Modify or amend the support order to contain abatement language; and

(ii) Abate the person's child support obligation due to current incapacitation for a maximum of six months.

(b) In a proceeding brought under this subsection, there is a rebuttable presumption that an incapacitated person is unable to pay the child support obligation. The department, the payee under the order, or the person entitled to receive support, may rebut the presumption by demonstrating that the person required to pay support has possession of, or access to, income or assets available to provide support while incapacitated.

(c) Unless the presumption is rebutted, the provisions of subsection (3) of this section apply.

(3) If the court or administrative forum determines that abatement of support is appropriate:

(a) The child support obligation under the order in front of the court will be abated to $50 per month per child while the person required to pay support is undergoing court-ordered behavioral health treatment.

(b) Abatement of the support obligation to $50 per month per child will remain in place until the earlier of: The last day of the month in which the person is discharged from court-ordered behavioral health treatment; or the last day of the sixth month after the effective date of the abatement.

(c) After abatement of support is terminated, the support obligation of the person required to pay support under the order is automatically reinstated at 100 percent of the support amount provided in the underlying order.

(4) The effective date of abatement of a child support obligation based on incapacitation to $50 per month per child is the date on which the court order for treatment for a behavioral health disorder is entered. However:

(a) The person required to pay support is not entitled to a refund of any support collections or payments that were received by the department prior to the date on which the department is notified of the incapacitation; and

(b) The department, the payee under the order, or the person entitled to receive support is not required to refund any support collections or payments that were received by the department prior to the date on which the department is notified of incapacitation.

(5) Abatement of a child support obligation based on incapacitation of the person required to pay support does not constitute modification or adjustment of the order.

(6) Abatement of a child support obligation based on incapacitation of the person required to pay support shall only be approved one time in a person's lifetime, regardless of whether the abatement lasted the full six months.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 26.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1) When a child support order contains language regarding abatement to $50 per month per child based on incapacitation of the person required to pay support, and the department is notified that the person is currently undergoing court-ordered behavioral health treatment, the department must:

(a) Review the support order for abatement once the department receives notice from the person required to pay support or someone acting on the person's behalf that the person may qualify for abatement of support;

(b) Review its records and other available information to determine if the person required to pay support has possession of, or access to, income or assets available to provide support while incapacitated; and

(c) Decide whether abatement of the person's support obligation is appropriate.

(2) If the department decides that abatement of the person's support obligation is appropriate, the department must notify the person required to pay support, and the payee under the order or the person entitled to receive support, that the person's support obligation has been abated and that the abatement will continue while the person is undergoing court-ordered behavioral health treatment for a maximum of six months. The department, the person required to pay support, and the payee under the order or the person entitled to receive support, have the right to an administrative hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW regarding the determination.

(3) If the department decides that abatement of the person's support obligation is not appropriate, the department must notify the person required to pay support and the payee under the order or the person entitled to receive support, that the department does not believe that abatement of the support obligation should occur. The department, the person required to pay support, and the payee under the order or the person entitled to receive support, have the right to an administrative hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW regarding the determination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. A new section is added to chapter 26.09 RCW to read as follows:

When a court or administrative order does not contain language regarding abatement based on incapacitation of the person required to pay support and the department receives notice that the person is currently undergoing court-ordered behavioral health treatment, the department must refer the case to the appropriate forum for a determination of whether the order should be modified or amended to:

(1) Contain abatement language as provided in section 5 of this act; and

(2) Abate the person's child support obligation due to current incapacitation in accordance with section 5 of this act.

Sec. 8. RCW 26.09.170 and 2020 c 227 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in RCW 26.09.070(7), the provisions of any decree respecting maintenance or support may be modified: (a) Only as to installments accruing subsequent to the petition for modification or motion for adjustment except motions to compel court-ordered adjustments, which shall be effective as of the first date specified in the decree for implementing the adjustment; and, (b) except as otherwise provided in this section, only upon a showing of a substantial change of circumstances. The provisions as to property disposition may not be revoked or modified, unless the court finds the existence of conditions that justify the reopening of a judgment under the laws of this state.

(2) Unless otherwise agreed in writing or expressly provided in the decree the obligation to pay future maintenance is terminated upon the death of either party or the remarriage of the party receiving maintenance or registration of a new domestic partnership of the party receiving maintenance.

(3) Unless otherwise agreed in writing or expressly provided in the decree, provisions for the support of a child are terminated by emancipation of the child or by the death of the person required to pay support for the child.

(4) Unless expressly provided by an order of the superior court or a court of comparable jurisdiction, provisions for the support of a child are terminated upon the marriage or registration of a domestic partnership to each other of parties to a paternity or parentage order, or upon the remarriage or registration of a domestic partnership to each other of parties to a decree of dissolution. The remaining provisions of the order, including provisions establishing parentage, remain in effect.

(5)(a) A party to an order of child support may petition for a modification based upon a showing of substantially changed circumstances at any time.

(b) The voluntary unemployment or voluntary underemployment of the person required to pay support, by itself, is not a substantial change of circumstances.

(6) An order of child support may be modified at any time to add language regarding abatement to ((ten dollars))$10 per month per order due to the incarceration of the person required to pay support, as provided in RCW 26.09.320, or abatement to $50 per month per child due to incapacitation of the person required to pay support, as provided in section 5 of this act.

(a) The department of social and health services, the person entitled to receive support or the payee under the order, or the person required to pay support may petition for a prospective modification of a child support order if ((the)): (i) The person required to pay support is currently confined in a jail, prison, or correctional facility for at least six months or is serving a sentence greater than six months in a jail, prison, or correctional facility, and the support order does not contain language regarding abatement due to incarceration; or (ii) the person required to pay support is currently undergoing court-ordered behavioral health treatment and the support order does not contain language regarding abatement due to incapacitation.

(b) The petition may only be filed if the person required to pay support is currently incarcerated or incapacitated.

(c) As part of the petition for modification, the petitioner may also request that the support obligation be abated to ((ten dollars))$10 per month per order due to incarceration, as provided in RCW 26.09.320, or abated to $50 per month per child due to incapacitation, as provided in section 5 of this act.

(7) An order of child support may be modified without showing a substantial change of circumstances if the requested modification is to ((modify)): (a) Modify an existing order when the person required to pay support has been released from incarceration, as provided in RCW 26.09.320(3)(d); or (b) modify an existing order when the person required to pay support has been discharged from court-ordered behavioral health treatment, as provided in section 5 of this act.

(8) An order of child support may be modified one year or more after it has been entered without a showing of substantially changed circumstances:

(a) If the order in practice works a severe economic hardship on either party or the child;

(b) If a child is still in high school, upon a finding that there is a need to extend support beyond the eighteenth birthday to complete high school; or

(c) To add an automatic adjustment of support provision consistent with RCW 26.09.100.

(9)(a) If ((twenty-four))24 months have passed from the date of the entry of the order or the last adjustment or modification, whichever is later, the order may be adjusted without a showing of substantially changed circumstances based upon:

(i) Changes in the income of the person required to pay support, or of the payee under the order or the person entitled to receive support who is a parent of the child or children covered by the order; or

(ii) Changes in the economic table or standards in chapter 26.19 RCW.

(b) Either party may initiate the adjustment by filing a motion and child support worksheets.

(c) If the court adjusts or modifies a child support obligation pursuant to this subsection by more than ((thirty))30 percent and the change would cause significant hardship, the court may implement the change in two equal increments, one at the time of the entry of the order and the second six months from the entry of the order. Twenty-four months must pass following the second change before a motion for another adjustment under this subsection may be filed.

(10)(a) The department of social and health services may file an action to modify or adjust an order of child support if public assistance money is being paid to or for the benefit of the child and the department has determined that the child support order is at least ((fifteen))15 percent above or below the appropriate child support amount set forth in the standard calculation as defined in RCW 26.19.011.

(b) The department of social and health services may file an action to modify or adjust an order of child support in a nonassistance case if:

(i) The department has determined that the child support order is at least ((fifteen))15 percent above or below the appropriate child support amount set forth in the standard calculation as defined in RCW 26.19.011;

(ii) The department has determined the case meets the department's review criteria; and

(iii) A party to the order or another state or jurisdiction has requested a review.

(c) If incarceration of the person required to pay support is the basis for the difference between the existing child support order amount and the proposed amount of support determined as a result of a review, the department may file an action to modify or adjust an order of child support even if:

(i) There is no other change of circumstances; and

(ii) The change in support does not meet the ((fifteen))15 percent threshold.

(d) The determination of whether the child support order is at least ((fifteen))15 percent above or below the appropriate child support amount must be based on the current income of the parties.

(11) The department of social and health services may file an action to modify or adjust an order of child support under subsections (5) through (9) of this section if:

(a) Public assistance money is being paid to or for the benefit of the child;

(b) A party to the order in a nonassistance case has requested a review; or

(c) Another state or jurisdiction has requested a modification of the order.

(12) If testimony other than affidavit is required in any proceeding under this section, a court of this state shall permit a party or witness to be deposed or to testify under penalty of perjury by telephone, audiovisual means, or other electronic means, unless good cause is shown.

Sec. 9. RCW 26.23.050 and 2022 c 243 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If the division of child support is providing support enforcement services under RCW 26.23.045, or if a party is applying for support enforcement services by signing the application form on the bottom of the support order, the superior court shall include in all court orders that establish or modify a support obligation:

(a) A provision that orders and directs the person required to pay support to make all support payments to the Washington state support registry;

(b) A statement that withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and personal property under the child support statutes of this or any other state, without further notice to the person required to pay support at any time after entry of the court order, unless:

(i) One of the parties demonstrates, and the court finds, that there is good cause not to require immediate income withholding and that withholding should be delayed until a payment is past due; or

(ii) The parties reach a written agreement that is approved by the court that provides for an alternate arrangement;

(c) A statement that the payee under the order or the person entitled to receive support might be required to submit an accounting of how the support, including any cash medical support, is being spent to benefit the child;

(d) A statement that a party to the support order who is required to provide health care coverage for the child or children covered by the order must notify the division of child support and the other party to the support order when the coverage terminates;

(e) A statement that any privilege of the person required to pay support to obtain and maintain a license, as defined in RCW 74.20A.320, may not be renewed, or may be suspended if the person is not in compliance with a support order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320; ((and))

(f) A statement that the support obligation under the order may be abated as provided in RCW 26.09.320 if the person required to pay support is confined in a jail, prison, or correctional facility for at least six months, or is serving a sentence greater than six months in a jail, prison, or correctional facility; and

(g) A statement that the support obligation under the order may be abated as provided in section 5 of this act if the person required to pay support is undergoing court-ordered behavioral health treatment issued under chapter 71.05 RCW.

As used in this subsection and subsection (3) of this section, "good cause not to require immediate income withholding" means a written determination of why implementing immediate wage withholding would not be in the child's best interests and, in modification cases, proof of timely payment of previously ordered support.

(2) In all other cases not under subsection (1) of this section, the court may order the person required to pay support to make payments directly to the person entitled to receive the payments, to the Washington state support registry, or may order that payments be made in accordance with an alternate arrangement agreed upon by the parties.

(a) The superior court shall include in all orders under this subsection that establish or modify a support obligation:

(i) A statement that withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and personal property under the child support statutes of this or any other state, without further notice to the person required to pay support at any time after entry of the court order, unless:

(A) One of the parties demonstrates, and the court finds, that there is good cause not to require immediate income withholding and that withholding should be delayed until a payment is past due; or

(B) The parties reach a written agreement that is approved by the court that provides for an alternate arrangement;

(ii) A statement that the payee under the order or the person entitled to receive support may be required to submit an accounting of how the support is being spent to benefit the child;

(iii) A statement that any party to the order required to provide health care coverage for the child or children covered by the order must notify the division of child support and the other party to the order when the coverage terminates; and

(iv) A statement that a party to the order seeking to enforce the other party's obligation to provide health care coverage may:

(A) File a motion in the underlying superior court action; or

(B) If there is not already an underlying superior court action, initiate an action in the superior court.

As used in this subsection, "good cause not to require immediate income withholding" is any reason that the court finds appropriate.

(b) The superior court may order immediate or delayed income withholding as follows:

(i) Immediate income withholding may be ordered if the person required to pay support has earnings. If immediate income withholding is ordered under this subsection, all support payments shall be paid to the Washington state support registry. The superior court shall issue a mandatory wage assignment order as set forth in chapter 26.18 RCW when the support order is signed by the court. The payee under the order or the person entitled to receive the transfer payment is responsible for serving the employer with the order and for its enforcement as set forth in chapter 26.18 RCW.

(ii) If immediate income withholding is not ordered, the court shall require that income withholding be delayed until a payment is past due. The support order shall contain a statement that withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and personal property under the child support statutes of this or any other state, without further notice to the person required to pay support, after a payment is past due.

(c) If a mandatory income withholding order under chapter 26.18 RCW is issued under this subsection and the division of child support provides support enforcement services under RCW 26.23.045, the existing wage withholding assignment is prospectively superseded upon the division of child support's subsequent service of an income withholding order.

(3) The office of administrative hearings and the department of social and health services shall require that all support obligations established as administrative orders include a provision which orders and directs that the person required to pay support shall make all support payments to the Washington state support registry. All administrative orders shall also state that any privilege of the person required to pay support to obtain and maintain a license, as defined in RCW 74.20A.320, may not be renewed, or may be suspended if the person is not in compliance with a support order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320. All administrative orders shall also state that withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and personal property under the child support statutes of this or any other state without further notice to the person required to pay support at any time after entry of the order, unless:

(a) One of the parties demonstrates, and the presiding officer finds, that there is good cause not to require immediate income withholding; or

(b) The parties reach a written agreement that is approved by the presiding officer that provides for an alternate agreement.

(4) If the support order does not include the provision ordering and directing that all payments be made to the Washington state support registry and a statement that withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits if a support payment is past due or at any time after the entry of the order, or that licensing privileges of the person required to pay support may not be renewed, or may be suspended, the division of child support may serve a notice on the person stating such requirements and authorizations. Service may be by personal service or any form of mail requiring a return receipt.

(5) Every support order shall state:

(a) The address where the support payment is to be sent;

(b) That withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and personal property under the child support statutes of this or any other state, without further notice to the person required to pay support at any time after entry of a support order, unless:

(i) One of the parties demonstrates, and the court finds, that there is good cause not to require immediate income withholding; or

(ii) The parties reach a written agreement that is approved by the court that provides for an alternate arrangement;

(c) The income of the parties, if known, or that their income is unknown and the income upon which the support award is based;

(d) The support award as a sum certain amount;

(e) The specific day or date on which the support payment is due;

(f) The names and ages of the dependent children;

(g) A provision requiring both the person required to pay support, and the payee under the order or the person entitled to receive support who is a parent of the child or children covered by the order, to keep the Washington state support registry informed of whether he or she has access to health care coverage at reasonable cost and, if so, the health care coverage information;

(h) That either or both the person required to pay support, and the payee under the order or the person entitled to receive support who is a parent of the child or children covered by the order, shall be obligated to provide medical support for a child or children covered by the order through health care coverage if:

(i) The person obligated to provide medical support provides accessible coverage for the child or children through private or public health care coverage; or

(ii) Coverage that can be extended to cover the child or children is or becomes available to the person obligated to provide medical support through employment or is union-related; or

(iii) In the absence of such coverage, through an additional sum certain amount, as that obligated person's monthly payment toward the premium as provided under RCW 26.09.105;

(i) That a person obligated to provide medical support who is providing health care coverage must notify both the division of child support and the other party to the order when coverage terminates;

(j) That if proof of health care coverage or proof that the coverage is unavailable is not provided within ((twenty))20 days, the person seeking enforcement or the department may seek direct enforcement of the coverage through the employer or union of the person required to provide medical support without further notice to the person as provided under chapter 26.18 RCW;

(k) The reasons for not ordering health care coverage if the order fails to require such coverage;

(l) That any privilege of the person required to pay support to obtain and maintain a license, as defined in RCW 74.20A.320, may not be renewed, or may be suspended if the person is not in compliance with a support order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320;

(m) That each party to the support order must:

(i) Promptly file with the court and update as necessary the confidential information form required by subsection (7) of this section; and

(ii) Provide the state case registry and update as necessary the information required by subsection (7) of this section; and

(n) That parties to administrative support orders shall provide to the state case registry and update as necessary their residential addresses and the address of the employer of the person required to pay support. The division of child support may adopt rules that govern the collection of parties' current residence and mailing addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, social security numbers, the names of the children, social security numbers of the children, dates of birth of the children, driver's license numbers, and the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of the parties' employers to enforce an administrative support order. The division of child support shall not release this information if the division of child support determines that there is reason to believe that release of the information may result in physical or emotional harm to the party or to the child, or a restraining order or protective order is in effect to protect one party from the other party.

(6) After the person required to pay support has been ordered or notified to make payments to the Washington state support registry under this section, that person shall be fully responsible for making all payments to the Washington state support registry and shall be subject to payroll deduction or other income-withholding action. The person required to pay support shall not be entitled to credit against a support obligation for any payments made to a person or agency other than to the Washington state support registry except as provided under RCW 74.20.101. A civil action may be brought by the person required to pay support to recover payments made to persons or agencies who have received and retained support moneys paid contrary to the provisions of this section.

(7) All petitioners and parties to all court actions under chapters 26.09, 26.12, 26.18, 26.21A, 26.23, 26.26A, 26.26B, and 26.27 RCW and minor guardianships under chapter 11.130 RCW shall complete to the best of their knowledge a verified and signed confidential information form or equivalent that provides the parties' current residence and mailing addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, social security numbers, driver's license numbers, and the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of the parties' employers, to ensure that the parties' information is added to the judicial information system's person database. The clerk of the court shall not accept petitions, except in parentage actions initiated by the state, orders of child support, decrees of dissolution, or parentage orders for filing in such actions unless accompanied by the confidential information form or equivalent, or unless the confidential information form or equivalent is already on file with the court clerk. In lieu of or in addition to requiring the parties to complete a separate confidential information form, the clerk may collect the information in electronic form. The clerk of the court shall transmit the confidential information form or its data to the division of child support with a copy of the order of child support or parentage order, and may provide copies of the confidential information form or its data and any related findings, decrees, parenting plans, orders, or other documents to the state administrative agency that administers Title IV-A, IV-D, IV-E, or XIX of the federal social security act. In state initiated parentage actions, the parties adjudicated the parents of the child or children shall complete the confidential information form or equivalent or the state's attorney of record may complete that form to the best of the attorney's knowledge.

(8) The department has rule-making authority to enact rules consistent with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 652(f) and 42 U.S.C. Sec. 666(a)(19) as amended by section 7307 of the deficit reduction act of 2005. Additionally, the department has rule-making authority to implement regulations required under 45 C.F.R. Parts 302, 303, 304, 305, and 308.

Sec. 10. RCW 74.20A.055 and 2020 c 227 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary may, if there is no order that establishes a person's support obligation or specifically relieves the person required to pay support of a support obligation or pursuant to an establishment of parentage under chapter 26.26A or 26.26B RCW, serve on the person or persons required to pay support and the person entitled to receive support a notice and finding of financial responsibility requiring those persons to appear and show cause in an adjudicative proceeding why the finding of responsibility and/or the amount thereof is incorrect, should not be finally ordered, but should be rescinded or modified. This notice and finding shall relate to the support debt accrued and/or accruing under this chapter and/or RCW 26.16.205, including periodic payments to be made in the future. The hearing shall be held pursuant to this section, chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure Act, and the rules of the department. A person who has physical custody of a child has the same rights under this section as a parent with whom the child resides.

(2) The notice and finding of financial responsibility shall be served in the same manner prescribed for the service of a summons in a civil action or may be served on the person required to pay support by certified mail, return receipt requested. The receipt shall be prima facie evidence of service. The notice shall be served upon the person required to pay support within ((sixty))60 days from the date the state assumes responsibility for the support of the dependent child or children on whose behalf support is sought. If the notice is not served within ((sixty))60 days from such date, the department shall lose the right to reimbursement of payments made after the ((sixty))60-day period and before the date of notification: PROVIDED, That if the department exercises reasonable efforts to locate the person required to pay support and is unable to do so the entire ((sixty))60-day period is tolled until such time as the person can be located. The notice may be served upon the person entitled to receive support who is the nonassistance applicant or public assistance recipient by first-class mail to the last known address. If the person entitled to receive support is not the nonassistance applicant or public assistance recipient, service shall be in the same manner as for the person required to pay support.

(3) The notice and finding of financial responsibility shall set forth the amount the department has determined the person required to pay support owes, the support debt accrued and/or accruing, and periodic payments to be made in the future. The notice and finding shall also include:

(a) A statement of the name of the person entitled to receive support and the name of the child or children for whom support is sought;

(b) A statement of the amount of periodic future support payments as to which financial responsibility is alleged;

(c) A statement that the person required to pay support or the person entitled to receive support may object to all or any part of the notice and finding, and file an application for an adjudicative proceeding to show cause why the terms set forth in the notice should not be ordered;

(d) A statement that, if neither the person required to pay support nor the person entitled to receive support files in a timely fashion an application for an adjudicative proceeding, the support debt and payments stated in the notice and finding, including periodic support payments in the future, shall be assessed and determined and ordered by the department and that this debt and amounts due under the notice shall be subject to collection action;

(e) A statement that the property of the person required to pay support, without further advance notice or hearing, will be subject to lien and foreclosure, distraint, seizure and sale, order to withhold and deliver, notice of payroll deduction or other collection action to satisfy the debt and enforce the support obligation established under the notice;

(f) A statement that the person required to pay support, and the payee under the order or the person entitled to receive support who is a parent of the child or children covered by the order, are responsible for either:

(i) Providing health care coverage for the child if accessible coverage that can cover the child:

(A) Is available through health insurance or public health care coverage; or

(B) Is or becomes available to the obligated person through that person's employment or union; or

(ii) Paying a monthly payment toward the premium if no such coverage is available, as provided under RCW 26.09.105; ((and))

(g) A statement that the support obligation under the order may be abated to ten dollars per month per order as provided in RCW 26.09.320 if the person required to pay support is confined in a jail, prison, or correctional facility for at least six months, or is serving a sentence greater than six months in a jail, prison, or correctional facility; and

(h) A statement that the support obligation under the order may be abated to $50 per month per child as provided in section 5 of this act if the person required to pay support is undergoing court-ordered behavioral health treatment issued under chapter 71.05 RCW.

(4) A person required to pay support or a person entitled to receive support who objects to the notice and finding of financial responsibility may file an application for an adjudicative proceeding within ((twenty))20 days of the date of service of the notice or thereafter as provided under this subsection.

(a) If the person required to pay support or the person entitled to receive support files the application within ((twenty))20 days, the office of administrative hearings shall schedule an adjudicative proceeding to hear the party's or parties' objection and determine the support obligation for the entire period covered by the notice and finding of financial responsibility. The filing of the application stays collection action pending the entry of a final administrative order;

(b) If both the person required to pay support and the person entitled to receive support fail to file an application within ((twenty))20 days, the notice and finding shall become a final administrative order. The amounts for current and future support and the support debt stated in the notice are final and subject to collection, except as provided under (c) and (d) of this subsection;

(c) If the person required to pay support or the person entitled to receive support files the application more than ((twenty))20 days after, but within one year of the date of service, the office of administrative hearings shall schedule an adjudicative proceeding to hear the party's or parties' objection and determine the support obligation for the entire period covered by the notice and finding of financial responsibility. The filing of the application does not stay further collection action, pending the entry of a final administrative order, and does not affect any prior collection action;

(d) If the person required to pay support or the person entitled to receive support files the application more than one year after the date of service, the office of administrative hearings shall schedule an adjudicative proceeding at which the party who requested the late hearing must show good cause for failure to file a timely application. The filing of the application does not stay future collection action and does not affect prior collection action:

(i) If the presiding officer finds that good cause exists, the presiding officer shall proceed to hear the party's objection to the notice and determine the support obligation;

(ii) If the presiding officer finds that good cause does not exist, the presiding officer shall treat the application as a petition for prospective modification of the amount for current and future support established under the notice and finding. In the modification proceeding, the presiding officer shall set current and future support under chapter 26.19 RCW. The petitioning party need show neither good cause nor a substantial change of circumstances to justify modification of current and future support;

(e) If the support obligation was based upon imputed median net income, the grant standard, or the family need standard, the division of child support may file an application for adjudicative proceeding more than ((twenty))20 days after the date of service of the notice. The office of administrative hearings shall schedule an adjudicative proceeding and provide notice of the hearing to the person required to pay support and the person entitled to receive support. The presiding officer shall determine the support obligation for the entire period covered by the notice, based upon credible evidence presented by the division of child support, the person required to pay support, or the person entitled to receive support, or may determine that the support obligation set forth in the notice is correct. The division of child support demonstrates good cause by showing that the support obligation was based upon imputed median net income, the grant standard, or the family need standard. The filing of the application by the division of child support does not stay further collection action, pending the entry of a final administrative order, and does not affect any prior collection action;

(f) The department shall retain and/or shall not refund support money collected more than ((twenty))20 days after the date of service of the notice. Money withheld as the result of collection action shall be delivered to the department. The department shall distribute such money, as provided in published rules.

(5) If an application for an adjudicative proceeding is filed, the presiding or reviewing officer shall determine the past liability and responsibility, if any, of the person required to pay support and shall also determine the amount of periodic payments to be made in the future, which amount is not limited by the amount of any public assistance payment made to or for the benefit of the child. If deviating from the child support schedule in making these determinations, the presiding or reviewing officer shall apply the standards contained in the child support schedule and enter written findings of fact supporting the deviation.

(6) If either the person required to pay support or the person entitled to receive support fails to attend or participate in the hearing or other stage of an adjudicative proceeding, upon a showing of valid service, the presiding officer shall enter an order of default against each party who did not appear and may enter an administrative order declaring the support debt and payment provisions stated in the notice and finding of financial responsibility to be assessed and determined and subject to collection action. The parties who appear may enter an agreed settlement or consent order, which may be different than the terms of the department's notice. Any party who appears may choose to proceed to the hearing, after the conclusion of which the presiding officer or reviewing officer may enter an order that is different than the terms stated in the notice, if the obligation is supported by credible evidence presented by any party at the hearing.

(7) The final administrative order establishing liability and/or future periodic support payments shall be superseded upon entry of a superior court order for support to the extent the superior court order is inconsistent with the administrative order.

(8) Debts determined pursuant to this section, accrued and not paid, are subject to collection action under this chapter without further necessity of action by a presiding or reviewing officer.

(9) The department has rule-making authority to enact rules consistent with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 652(f) and 42 U.S.C. Sec. 666(a)(19) as amended by section 7307 of the deficit reduction act of 2005. Additionally, the department has rule-making authority to implement regulations required under 45 C.F.R. Parts 302, 303, 304, 305, and 308.

Sec. 11. RCW 74.20A.056 and 2020 c 227 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) If an acknowledged parent has signed an acknowledgment of parentage that has been filed with the state registrar of vital statistics:

(i) The division of child support may serve a notice and finding of financial responsibility under RCW 74.20A.055 based on the acknowledgment. The division of child support shall attach a copy of the acknowledgment or certification of the birth record information advising of the existence of a filed acknowledgment of parentage to the notice;

(ii) The notice shall include a statement that the acknowledged parent or any other signatory may commence a proceeding in court to rescind or challenge the acknowledgment or denial of parentage under RCW 26.26A.235 and 26.26A.240;

(iii) A statement that the person required to pay support, and the payee under the order or the person entitled to receive support who is a parent of the child or children covered by the order, are responsible for providing health care coverage for the child if accessible coverage that can be extended to cover the child is or becomes available to the obligated person through employment or is union-related as provided under RCW 26.09.105;

(iv) The party commencing the action to rescind or challenge the acknowledgment or denial must serve notice on the division of child support and the office of the prosecuting attorney in the county in which the proceeding is commenced. Commencement of a proceeding to rescind or challenge the acknowledgment or denial stays the establishment of the notice and finding of financial responsibility, if the notice has not yet become a final order; ((and))

(v) A statement that the support obligation under the order may be abated to ((ten dollars))$10 per month per order as provided in RCW 26.09.320 if the person required to pay support is confined in a jail, prison, or correctional facility for at least six months, or is serving a sentence greater than six months in a jail, prison, or correctional facility; and

(vi) A statement that the support obligation under the order may be abated to $50 per month per child as provided in section 5 of this act if the person required to pay support is undergoing court-ordered behavioral health treatment issued under chapter 71.05 RCW.

(b) If neither party to the notice files an application for an adjudicative proceeding or the signatories to the acknowledgment or denial do not commence a proceeding to rescind or challenge the acknowledgment of parentage, the amount of support stated in the notice and finding of financial responsibility becomes final, subject only to a subsequent determination under RCW 26.26A.400 through 26.26A.515 that the parent-child relationship does not exist. The division of child support does not refund nor return any amounts collected under a notice that becomes final under this section or RCW 74.20A.055, even if a court later determines that the acknowledgment is void.

(c) An acknowledged parent or other party to the notice who objects to the amount of support requested in the notice may file an application for an adjudicative proceeding up to ((twenty))20 days after the date the notice was served. An application for an adjudicative proceeding may be filed within one year of service of the notice and finding of parental responsibility without the necessity for a showing of good cause or upon a showing of good cause thereafter. An adjudicative proceeding under this section shall be pursuant to RCW 74.20A.055. The only issues shall be the amount of the accrued debt and the amount of the current and future support obligation.

(i) If the application for an adjudicative proceeding is filed within ((twenty))20 days of service of the notice, collection action shall be stayed pending a final decision by the department.

(ii) If the application for an adjudicative proceeding is not filed within ((twenty))20 days of the service of the notice, any amounts collected under the notice shall be neither refunded nor returned if the person required to pay support under the notice is later found not to be required to pay support.

(d) If neither the acknowledged parent nor the person entitled to receive support requests an adjudicative proceeding, or if no timely action is brought to rescind or challenge the acknowledgment or denial after service of the notice, the notice of financial responsibility becomes final for all intents and purposes and may be overturned only by a subsequent superior court order entered under RCW 26.26A.400 through 26.26A.515.

(2) Acknowledgments of parentage are subject to requirements of chapters 26.26A, 26.26B, and 70.58A RCW.

(3) The department and the department of health may adopt rules to implement the requirements under this section.

(4) The department has rule-making authority to enact rules consistent with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 652(f) and 42 U.S.C. Sec. 666(a)(19) as amended by section 7307 of the deficit reduction act of 2005. Additionally, the department has rule-making authority to implement regulations required under 45 C.F.R. Parts 302, 303, 304, 305, and 308.

Sec. 12. RCW 74.20A.059 and 2020 c 227 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The department, the payee under the order or the person entitled to receive support, or the person required to pay support may petition for a prospective modification of a final administrative order if:

(a) The administrative order has not been superseded by a superior court order; and

(b) There has been a substantial change of circumstances, except as provided under RCW 74.20A.055(4)(d) or subsection (2) of this section.

(2) The department, the person entitled to receive support, the payee under the order, or ((the)): (a) The person required to pay support may petition for a prospective modification of a final administrative order if the person required to pay support is currently confined in a jail, prison, or correctional facility for at least six months or is serving a sentence greater than six months in a jail, prison, or correctional facility, and the support order does not contain language regarding abatement due to incarceration; or (b) the person required to pay support is currently undergoing court-ordered behavioral health treatment issued under chapter 71.05 RCW and the support order does not contain language regarding abatement due to incapacitation.

(((a)))(i) The petition may be filed at any time after the administrative support order became a final order, as long as the person required to pay support is currently incarcerated or undergoing court-ordered behavioral health treatment.

(((b)))(ii) As part of the petition for modification, the petitioner may also request that the support obligation be abated to ((ten dollars))$10 per month per order due to incarceration, as provided in RCW 26.09.320, or abated to $50 per month per child due to incapacitation, as provided in section 5 of this act.

(3) An order of child support may be modified at any time without a showing of substantially changed circumstances if incarceration of the person required to pay support is the basis for the inconsistency between the existing child support order amount and the amount of support determined as a result of a review.

(4) An order of child support may be modified one year or more after it has been entered without showing a substantial change of circumstances:

(a) If the order in practice works a severe economic hardship on either party or the child; or

(b) If a child is a full-time student and reasonably expected to complete secondary school or the equivalent level of vocational or technical training before the child becomes ((nineteen))19 years of age upon a finding that there is a need to extend support beyond the eighteenth birthday.

(5) An order may be modified without showing a substantial change of circumstances if the requested modification is to:

(a) Require medical support under RCW 26.09.105 for a child covered by the order;

(b) Modify an existing order for health care coverage; or

(c) Modify an existing order when the person required to pay support has been released from incarceration, as provided in RCW 26.09.320(3)(d), or when the person has been discharged from court-ordered behavioral health treatment issued under chapter 71.05 RCW, as provided in section 5 of this act.

(6) Support orders may be adjusted once every ((twenty-four))24 months based upon changes in the income of the parties to the order without a showing of substantially changed circumstances. This provision does not mean that the income of a person entitled to receive support who is not a parent of the child or children covered by the order must be disclosed or be included in the calculations under chapter 26.19 RCW when determining the support obligation.

(7)(a) All administrative orders entered on, before, or after September 1, 1991, may be modified based upon changes in the child support schedule established in chapter 26.19 RCW without a substantial change of circumstances. The petition may be filed based on changes in the child support schedule after ((twelve))12 months has expired from the entry of the administrative order or the most recent modification order setting child support, whichever is later. However, if a party is granted relief under this provision, ((twenty-four))24 months must pass before another petition for modification may be filed pursuant to subsection (6) of this section.

(b) If, pursuant to subsection (6) of this section or (a) of this subsection, the order modifies a child support obligation by more than ((thirty))30 percent and the change would cause significant hardship, the change may be implemented in two equal increments, one at the time of the entry of the order and the second six months from the entry of the order. Twenty-four months must pass following the second change before a petition for modification under subsection (6) of this section may be filed.

(8) An increase in the wage or salary of the person entitled to receive the support transfer payments is not a substantial change in circumstances for purposes of modification under subsection (1)(b) of this section. The voluntary unemployment or voluntary underemployment of the person required to pay support, by itself, is not a substantial change of circumstances. The income of the person entitled to receive support is only disclosed or considered if that person is a parent of the child or children covered by the order.

(9) The department shall file the petition and a supporting affidavit with the office of administrative hearings when the department petitions for modification.

(10) The person required to pay support or the payee under the order or the person entitled to receive support shall follow the procedures in this chapter for filing an application for an adjudicative proceeding to petition for modification.

(11) Upon the filing of a proper petition or application, the office of administrative hearings shall issue an order directing each party to appear and show cause why the order should not be modified.

(12) If the presiding or reviewing officer finds a modification is appropriate, the officer shall modify the order and set current and future support under chapter 26.19 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. (1) By January 1, 2025, the administrative office of the courts shall revise the child support worksheets and instructions to clarify language regarding how parties should round up income amounts consistent with the recommendations of the 2023 child support schedule work group.

(2) This section expires August 1, 2025.

Sec. 14. RCW 26.19.020 and 2018 c 150 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:

ECONOMIC TABLE

MONTHLY BASIC SUPPORT OBLIGATION

PER CHILD

combined

monthly

net

income

one

child

family

two

children

family

For income less than (($1000))$2,200 the obligation is based upon the resources and living expenses of each household. Minimum support may not be less than $50 per child per month except when allowed by RCW 26.19.065(2).

((1000

216

167

1100

238

184

1200

260

200

1300

281

217

1400

303

234

1500

325

251

1600

346

267

1700

368

284

1800

390

301

1900

412

317

2000

433

334

2100

455

350))

2200

477

367

2300

499

384

2400

521

400

2500

543

417

2600

565

433

2700

587

450

2800

609

467

2900

630

483

3000

652

500

3100

674

516

3200

696

533

3300

718

550

3400

740

566

3500

762

583

3600

784

599

3700

803

614

3800

816

624

3900

830

634

4000

843

643

4100

857

653

4200

867

660

4300

877

668

4400

887

675

4500

896

682

4600

906

689

4700

916

697

4800

927

705

4900

939

714

5000

951

723

5100

963

732

5200

975

741

5300

987

750

5400

999

759

5500

1011

768

5600

1023

777

5700

1030

782

5800

1036

786

5900

1042

791

6000

1048

795

6100

1054

800

6200

1061

804

6300

1067

809

6400

1073

813

6500

1081

819

6600

1096

830

6700

1111

842

6800

1126

853

6900

1141

864

7000

1156

875

7100

1170

886

7200

1185

898

7300

1200

909

7400

1212

918

7500

1222

925

7600

1231

932

7700

1241

939

7800

1251

946

7900

1261

953

8000

1270

960

8100

1280

968

8200

1290

975

8300

1299

981

8400

1308

987

8500

1316

994

8600

1325

1000

8700

1334

1007

8800

1343

1013

8900

1352

1019

9000

1361

1026

9100

1370

1032

9200

1379

1040

9300

1387

1047

9400

1396

1055

9500

1405

1062

9600

1414

1069

9700

1423

1077

9800

1432

1084

9900

1441

1092

10000

1451

1099

10100

1462

1107

10200

1473

1114

10300

1484

1122

10400

1495

1129

10500

1507

1136

10600

1518

1144

10700

1529

1151

10800

1539

1159

10900

1542

1161

11000

1545

1164

11100

1548

1166

11200

1551

1169

11300

1554

1172

11400

1556

1174

11500

1559

1177

11600

1562

1179

11700

1565

1182

11800

1568

1184

11900

1571

1187

12000

1573

1190

12100

1584

1199

12200

1594

1207

12300

1605

1216

12400

1616

1225

12500

1626

1233

12600

1637

1242

12700

1647

1251

12800

1657

1259

12900

1668

1268

13000

1678

1276

13100

1688

1285

13200

1699

1293

13300

1709

1302

13400

1719

1310

13500

1729

1319

13600

1739

1327

13700

1749

1335

13800

1759

1344

13900

1769

1352

14000

1779

1360

14100

1789

1369

14200

1799

1377

14300

1809

1385

14400

1818

1393

14500

1828

1402

14600

1838

1410

14700

1848

1418

14800

1857

1426

14900

1867

1434

15000

1876

1443

15100

1886

1451

15200

1895

1459

15300

1905

1467

15400

1914

1475

15500

1923

1483

15600

1933

1491

15700

1942

1499

15800

1951

1507

15900

1960

1515

16000

1969

1523

16100

1978

1531

16200

1987

1538

16300

1996

1546

16400

2005

1554

16500

2014

1562

16600

2023

1570

16700

2032

1578

16800

2041

1585

16900

2050

1593

17000

2058

1601

17100

2067

1609

17200

2076

1616

17300

2084

1624

17400

2093

1632

17500

2101

1639

17600

2110

1647

17700

2118

1654

17800

2127

1662

17900

2135

1669

18000

2143

1677

18100

2152

1685

18200

2160

1692

18300

2168

1699

18400

2176

1707

18500

2185

1714

18600

2193

1722

18700

2201

1729

18800

2209

1736

18900

2217

1744

19000

2225

1751

19100

2232

1758

19200

2240

1766

19300

2248

1773

19400

2256

1780

19500

2264

1788

19600

2271

1795

19700

2279

1802

19800

2287

1809

19900

2294

1816

20000

2302

1823

20100

2310

1830

20200

2318

1838

20300

2326

1845

20400

2334

1852

20500

2342

1859

20600

2350

1866

20700

2358

1873

20800

2366

1880

20900

2374

1887

21000

2382

1893

21100

2389

1900

21200

2396

1907

21300

2403

1914

21400

2410

1921

21500

2417

1928

21600

2424

1935

21700

2431

1941

21800

2438

1948

21900

2445

1955

22000

2452

1962

22100

2459

1968

22200

2466

1975

22300

2473

1982

22400

2480

1988

22500

2487

1995

22600

2494

2002

22700

2501

2008

22800

2508

2015

22900

2515

2021

23000

2522

2028

23100

2529

2034

23200

2536

2041

23300

2543

2047

23400

2550

2054

23500

2557

2060

23600

2564

2067

23700

2571

2073

23800

2578

2079

23900

2585

2086

24000

2592

2092

24100

2599

2098

24200

2606

2105

24300

2613

2111

24400

2620

2117

24500

2627

2123

24600

2634

2130

24700

2641

2136

24800

2648

2142

24900

2655

2148

25000

2662

2154

25100

2669

2160

25200

2676

2166

25300

2683

2172

25400

2690

2178

25500

2696

2184

25600

2702

2191

25700

2708

2196

25800

2714

2202

25900

2720

2208

26000

2726

2214

26100

2732

2220

26200

2738

2226

26300

2744

2232

26400

2750

2238

26500

2756

2244

26600

2762

2249

26700

2768

2255

26800

2774

2261

26900

2780

2267

27000

2786

2272

27100

2792

2278

27200

2798

2284

27300

2804

2290

27400

2810

2295

27500

2816

2301

27600

2822

2306

27700

2828

2312

27800

2834

2318

27900

2840

2323

28000

2846

2329

28100

2852

2334

28200

2858

2340

28300

2864

2345

28400

2870

2351

28500

2876

2356

28600

2882

2361

28700

2888

2367

28800

2894

2372

28900

2900

2378

29000

2906

2383

29100

2912

2388

29200

2918

2393

29300

2924

2399

29400

2930

2404

29500

2936

2409

29600

2942

2414

29700

2948

2420

29800

2954

2425

29900

2960

2430

30000

2966

2435

30100

2972

2440

30200

2978

2445

30300

2984

2450

30400

2990

2455

30500

2996

2460

30600

3002

2465

30700

3008

2470

30800

3014

2475

30900

3020

2480

31000

3026

2485

31100

3032

2490

31200

3038

2495

31300

3044

2500

31400

3050

2505

31500

3056

2509

31600

3062

2514

31700

3068

2519

31800

3074

2524

31900

3080

2529

32000

3086

2533

32100

3092

2538

32200

3098

2543

32300

3104

2547

32400

3110

2552

32500

3116

2557

32600

3122

2561

32700

3128

2566

32800

3134

2570

32900

3140

2575

33000

3146

2579

33100

3152

2584

33200

3158

2588

33300

3164

2593

33400

3170

2597

33500

3176

2602

33600

3182

2606

33700

3188

2611

33800

3194

2615

33900

3200

2619

34000

3206

2624

34100

3212

2628

34200

3218

2632

34300

3224

2637

34400

3230

2641

34500

3236

2645

34600

3242

2649

34700

3248

2653

34800

3253

2658

34900

3258

2662

35000

3263

2666

35100

3268

2670

35200

3273

2674

35300

3278

2678

35400

3283

2682

35500

3288

2686

35600

3293

2690

35700

3298

2694

35800

3303

2698

35900

3308

2702

36000

3313

2706

36100

3318

2710

36200

3323

2714

36300

3328

2718

36400

3333

2722

36500

3338

2725

36600

3343

2729

36700

3348

2733

36800

3353

2737

36900

3358

2740

37000

3363

2744

37100

3368

2748

37200

3373

2752

37300

3378

2755

37400

3383

2759

37500

3388

2762

37600

3393

2766

37700

3398

2770

37800

3403

2773

37900

3408

2777

38000

3413

2780

38100

3418

2784

38200

3423

2787

38300

3428

2791

38400

3433

2794

38500

3438

2798

38600

3443

2801

38700

3448

2804

38800

3453

2808

38900

3458

2811

39000

3463

2814

39100

3468

2818

39200

3473

2821

39300

3478

2824

39400

3483

2828

39500

3488

2831

39600

3493

2834

39700

3498

2837

39800

3503

2840

39900

3508

2844

40000

3513

2847

40100

3518

2850

40200

3523

2853

40300

3528

2856

40400

3533

2859

40500

3538

2862

40600

3543

2865

40700

3548

2868

40800

3553

2871

40900

3558

2874

41000

3563

2877

41100

3568

2880

41200

3573

2883

41300

3578

2885

41400

3583

2888

41500

3588

2891

41600

3593

2894

41700

3598

2897

41800

3603

2900

41900

3607

2902

42000

3611

2905

42100

3615

2908

42200

3619

2910

42300

3623

2913

42400

3627

2916

42500

3631

2918

42600

3635

2921

42700

3639

2924

42800

3643

2926

42900

3647

2929

43000

3651

2931

43100

3655

2934

43200

3659

2936

43300

3663

2939

43400

3667

2941

43500

3671

2943

43600

3675

2946

43700

3679

2948

43800

3683

2951

43900

3687

2953

44000

3691

2955

44100

3695

2958

44200

3699

2960

44300

3703

2962

44400

3707

2964

44500

3711

2967

44600

3715

2969

44700

3719

2971

44800

3723

2973

44900

3727

2975

45000

3731

2977

45100

3735

2980

45200

3739

2982

45300

3743

2984

45400

3747

2986

45500

3751

2988

45600

3755

2990

45700

3759

2992

45800

3763

2994

45900

3767

2996

46000

3771

2998

46100

3775

3000

46200

3779

3001

46300

3783

3003

46400

3787

3005

46500

3791

3007

46600

3795

3009

46700

3799

3011

46800

3803

3012

46900

3807

3014

47000

3811

3016

47100

3815

3018

47200

3819

3019

47300

3823

3021

47400

3827

3023

47500

3831

3024

47600

3835

3026

47700

3839

3027

47800

3843

3029

47900

3847

3030

48000

3851

3032

48100

3855

3034

48200

3859

3035

48300

3863

3036

48400

3867

3038

48500

3871

3039

48600

3874

3041

48700

3877

3042

48800

3880

3043

48900

3883

3045

49000

3886

3046

49100

3889

3047

49200

3892

3049

49300

3895

3050

49400

3898

3051

49500

3901

3052

49600

3904

3054

49700

3907

3055

49800

3910

3056

49900

3913

3057

50000

3916

3058

combined

monthly

net

income

three

children

family

four

children

family

five

children

family

For income less than (($1000))$2,200 the obligation is based upon the resources and living expenses of each household. Minimum support may not be less than $50 per child per month except when allowed by RCW 26.19.065(2).

((1000

136

114

100

1100

150

125

110

1200

163

137

120

1300

177

148

130

1400

191

160

141

1500

204

171

151

1600

218

182

161

1700

231

194

171

1800

245

205

180

1900

258

216

190

2000

271

227

200

2100

285

239

210))

2200

298

250

220

2300

311

261

230

2400

325

272

239

2500

338

283

249

2600

351

294

259

2700

365

305

269

2800

378

317

279

2900

391

328

288

3000

405

339

298

3100

418

350

308

3200

431

361

318

3300

444

372

328

3400

458

384

337

3500

471

395

347

3600

484

406

357

3700

496

416

366

3800

503

422

371

3900

511

428

377

4000

518

434

382

4100

526

440

388

4200

531

445

392

4300

537

450

396

4400

543

455

400

4500

548

459

404

4600

554

464

408

4700

559

469

412

4800

566

474

417

4900

573

480

422

5000

580

486

428

5100

587

492

433

5200

594

498

438

5300

602

504

443

5400

609

510

449

5500

616

516

454

5600

623

522

459

5700

627

525

462

5800

630

528

465

5900

634

531

467

6000

637

534

470

6100

641

537

472

6200

644

540

475

6300

648

543

477

6400

651

545

480

6500

656

549

483

6600

665

557

490

6700

674

564

497

6800

683

572

503

6900

692

579

510

7000

701

587

516

7100

710

594

523

7200

719

602

530

7300

727

609

536

7400

734

615

541

7500

740

620

545

7600

745

624

549

7700

751

629

554

7800

756

634

558

7900

762

638

562

8000

767

643

566

8100

773

647

570

8200

778

652

574

8300

783

656

577

8400

788

660

581

8500

793

664

584

8600

797

668

588

8700

802

672

591

8800

807

676

595

8900

812

680

599

9000

817

684

602

9100

822

689

606

9200

828

694

611

9300

835

699

616

9400

841

705

620

9500

848

710

625

9600

854

716

630

9700

861

721

635

9800

867

727

639

9900

874

732

644

10000

879

737

648

10100

885

741

652

10200

890

745

656

10300

895

750

660

10400

900

754

664

10500

906

759

668

10600

911

763

672

10700

916

767

675

10800

921

772

679

10900

924

774

681

11000

926

776

683

11100

928

778

684

11200

931

780

686

11300

933

782

688

11400

936

784

690

11500

938

786

692

11600

940

788

693

11700

943

790

695

11800

945

792

697

11900

948

794

699

12000

950

796

700

12100

957

802

705

12200

964

808

711

12300

971

814

716

12400

978

820

721

12500

985

826

727

12600

992

832

732

12700

999

838

737

12800

1007

844

743

12900

1014

850

748

13000

1021

856

753

13100

1027

862

758

13200

1034

868

764

13300

1041

874

769

13400

1048

879

774

13500

1055

885

779

13600

1062

891

785

13700

1069

897

790

13800

1076

903

795

13900

1083

909

800

14000

1090

915

805

14100

1097

920

811

14200

1103

926

816

14300

1110

932

821

14400

1117

938

826

14500

1124

944

831

14600

1131

949

836

14700

1137

955

842

14800

1144

961

847

14900

1151

967

852

15000

1158

973

857

15100

1164

978

862

15200

1171

984

867

15300

1178

990

872

15400

1184

995

877

15500

1191

1001

882

15600

1198

1007

888

15700

1204

1012

893

15800

1211

1018

898

15900

1217

1024

903

16000

1224

1029

908

16100

1231

1035

913

16200

1237

1041

918

16300

1244

1046

923

16400

1250

1052

928

16500

1257

1057

933

16600

1263

1063

938

16700

1270

1069

943

16800

1276

1074

948

16900

1283

1080

953

17000

1289

1085

958

17100

1296

1091

963

17200

1302

1096

968

17300

1308

1102

972

17400

1315

1107

977

17500

1321

1113

982

17600

1328

1118

987

17700

1334

1124

992

17800

1340

1129

997

17900

1347

1135

1002

18000

1353

1140

1007

18100

1359

1145

1012

18200

1366

1151

1017

18300

1372

1156

1021

18400

1378

1162

1026

18500

1384

1167

1031

18600

1391

1172

1036

18700

1397

1178

1041

18800

1403

1183

1046

18900

1409

1188

1050

19000

1416

1194

1055

19100

1422

1199

1060

19200

1428

1204

1065

19300

1434

1210

1069

19400

1440

1215

1074

19500

1446

1220

1079

19600

1452

1226

1084

19700

1458

1231

1088

19800

1465

1236

1093

19900

1471

1241

1098

20000

1477

1247

1103

20100

1483

1252

1107

20200

1489

1257

1112

20300

1495

1262

1117

20400

1501

1268

1121

20500

1507

1273

1126

20600

1513

1278

1131

20700

1519

1283

1135

20800

1525

1288

1140

20900

1531

1293

1145

21000

1537

1299

1149

21100

1542

1304

1154

21200

1548

1309

1159

21300

1554

1314

1163

21400

1560

1319

1168

21500

1566

1324

1172

21600

1572

1329

1177

21700

1578

1334

1182

21800

1583

1339

1186

21900

1589

1344

1191

22000

1595

1349

1195

22100

1601

1354

1200

22200

1607

1359

1204

22300

1612

1364

1209

22400

1618

1369

1213

22500

1624

1374

1218

22600

1629

1379

1223

22700

1635

1384

1227

22800

1641

1389

1232

22900

1647

1394

1236

23000

1652

1399

1240

23100

1658

1404

1245

23200

1663

1409

1249

23300

1669

1414

1254

23400

1675

1419

1258

23500

1680

1424

1263

23600

1686

1429

1267

23700

1691

1433

1272

23800

1697

1438

1276

23900

1702

1443

1280

24000

1708

1448

1285

24100

1714

1453

1289

24200

1719

1458

1294

24300

1724

1462

1298

24400

1730

1467

1302

24500

1735

1472

1307

24600

1741

1477

1311

24700

1746

1482

1315

24800

1752

1486

1320

24900

1757

1491

1324

25000

1762

1496

1328

25100

1768

1501

1333

25200

1773

1505

1337

25300

1779

1510

1341

25400

1784

1515

1346

25500

1789

1519

1350

25600

1795

1524

1354

25700

1800

1529

1358

25800

1805

1533

1363

25900

1810

1538

1367

26000

1816

1543

1371

26100

1821

1547

1375

26200

1826

1552

1380

26300

1831

1557

1384

26400

1837

1561

1388

26500

1842

1566

1392

26600

1847

1570

1396

26700

1852

1575

1401

26800

1857

1579

1405

26900

1862

1584

1409

27000

1867

1589

1413

27100

1873

1593

1417

27200

1878

1598

1421

27300

1883

1602

1425

27400

1888

1607

1430

27500

1893

1611

1434

27600

1898

1616

1438

27700

1903

1620

1442

27800

1908

1624

1446

27900

1913

1629

1450

28000

1918

1633

1454

28100

1923

1638

1458

28200

1928

1642

1462

28300

1933

1647

1466

28400

1938

1651

1470

28500

1943

1655

1474

28600

1948

1660

1478

28700

1953

1664

1482

28800

1957

1668

1486

28900

1962

1673

1490

29000

1967

1677

1494

29100

1972

1681

1498

29200

1977

1686

1502

29300

1982

1690

1506

29400

1986

1694

1510

29500

1991

1699

1514

29600

1996

1703

1518

29700

2001

1707

1522

29800

2006

1712

1526

29900

2010

1716

1530

30000

2015

1720

1534

30100

2020

1724

1538

30200

2024

1728

1542

30300

2029

1733

1546

30400

2034

1737

1550

30500

2038

1741

1553

30600

2043

1745

1557

30700

2048

1749

1561

30800

2052

1754

1565

30900

2057

1758

1569

31000

2061

1762

1573

31100

2066

1766

1577

31200

2071

1770

1580

31300

2075

1774

1584

31400

2080

1778

1588

31500

2084

1782

1592

31600

2089

1786

1596

31700

2093

1791

1599

31800

2098

1795

1603

31900

2102

1799

1607

32000

2107

1803

1611

32100

2111

1807

1614

32200

2116

1811

1618

32300

2120

1815

1622

32400

2124

1819

1626

32500

2129

1823

1629

32600

2133

1827

1633

32700

2137

1831

1637

32800

2142

1835

1640

32900

2146

1839

1644

33000

2150

1843

1648

33100

2155

1846

1651

33200

2159

1850

1655

33300

2163

1854

1659

33400

2168

1858

1662

33500

2172

1862

1666

33600

2176

1866

1670

33700

2180

1870

1673

33800

2185

1874

1677

33900

2189

1877

1681

34000

2193

1881

1684

34100

2197

1885

1688

34200

2201

1889

1691

34300

2205

1893

1695

34400

2210

1897

1698

34500

2214

1900

1702

34600

2218

1904

1706

34700

2222

1908

1709

34800

2226

1912

1713

34900

2230

1915

1716

35000

2234

1919

1720

35100

2238

1923

1723

35200

2242

1927

1727

35300

2246

1930

1730

35400

2250

1934

1734

35500

2254

1938

1737

35600

2258

1941

1741

35700

2262

1945

1744

35800

2266

1949

1748

35900

2270

1952

1751

36000

2274

1956

1754

36100

2278

1960

1758

36200

2282

1963

1761

36300

2286

1967

1765

36400

2290

1970

1768

36500

2293

1974

1771

36600

2297

1978

1775

36700

2301

1981

1778

36800

2305

1985

1782

36900

2309

1988

1785

37000

2312

1992

1788

37100

2316

1995

1792

37200

2320

1999

1795

37300

2324

2002

1798

37400

2328

2006

1802

37500

2331

2009

1805

37600

2335

2013

1808

37700

2339

2016

1812

37800

2342

2020

1815

37900

2346

2023

1818

38000

2350

2027

1821

38100

2353

2030

1825

38200

2357

2034

1828

38300

2361

2037

1831

38400

2364

2040

1834

38500

2368

2044

1838

38600

2371

2047

1841

38700

2375

2050

1844

38800

2378

2054

1847

38900

2382

2057

1851

39000

2385

2061

1854

39100

2389

2064

1857

39200

2393

2067

1860

39300

2396

2070

1863

39400

2399

2074

1867

39500

2403

2077

1870

39600

2406

2080

1873

39700

2410

2084

1876

39800

2413

2087

1879

39900

2417

2090

1882

40000

2420

2093

1885

40100

2423

2097

1888

40200

2427

2100

1892

40300

2430

2103

1895

40400

2433

2106

1898

40500

2437

2109

1901

40600

2440

2113

1904

40700

2443

2116

1907

40800

2447

2119

1910

40900

2450

2122

1913

41000

2453

2125

1916

41100

2456

2128

1919

41200

2460

2131

1922

41300

2463

2135

1925

41400

2466

2138

1928

41500

2469

2141

1931

41600

2472

2144

1934

41700

2476

2147

1937

41800

2479

2150

1940

41900

2482

2153

1943

42000

2485

2156

1946

42100

2488

2159

1949

42200

2491

2162

1952

42300

2494

2165

1955

42400

2497

2168

1958

42500

2500

2171

1961

42600

2503

2174

1964

42700

2506

2177

1966

42800

2510

2180

1969

42900

2513

2183

1972

43000

2515

2186

1975

43100

2518

2189

1978

43200

2521

2192

1981

43300

2524

2195

1984

43400

2527

2197

1987

43500

2530

2200

1989

43600

2533

2203

1992

43700

2536

2206

1995

43800

2539

2209

1998

43900

2542

2212

2001

44000

2545

2215

2003

44100

2548

2217

2006

44200

2550

2220

2009

44300

2553

2223

2012

44400

2556

2226

2015

44500

2559

2229

2017

44600

2562

2231

2020

44700

2564

2234

2023

44800

2567

2237

2026

44900

2570

2240

2028

45000

2572

2243

2031

45100

2575

2245

2034

45200

2578

2248

2036

45300

2581

2251

2039

45400

2583

2253

2042

45500

2586

2256

2044

45600

2589

2259

2047

45700

2591

2261

2050

45800

2594

2264

2052

45900

2596

2267

2055

46000

2599

2269

2058

46100

2602

2272

2060

46200

2604

2275

2063

46300

2607

2277

2066

46400

2609

2280

2068

46500

2612

2282

2071

46600

2614

2285

2073

46700

2617

2288

2076

46800

2619

2290

2079

46900

2622

2293

2081

47000

2624

2295

2084

47100

2627

2298

2086

47200

2629

2300

2089

47300

2631

2303

2091

47400

2634

2305

2094

47500

2636

2308

2096

47600

2639

2310

2099

47700

2641

2313

2101

47800

2643

2315

2104

47900

2646

2318

2106

48000

2648

2320

2109

48100

2650

2322

2111

48200

2653

2325

2114

48300

2655

2327

2116

48400

2657

2330

2119

48500

2659

2332

2121

48600

2662

2334

2123

48700

2664

2337

2126

48800

2666

2339

2128

48900

2668

2341

2131

49000

2670

2344

2133

49100

2673

2346

2136

49200

2675

2348

2138

49300

2677

2351

2140

49400

2679

2353

2143

49500

2681

2355

2145

49600

2683

2358

2147

49700

2685

2360

2150

49800

2688

2362

2152

49900

2690

2364

2154

50000

2692

2367

2157

The economic table is presumptive for combined monthly net incomes up to and including ((twelve thousand dollars))$50,000. When combined monthly net income exceeds ((twelve thousand dollars))$50,000, the court may exceed the presumptive amount of support set for combined monthly net incomes of ((twelve thousand dollars))$50,000 upon written findings of fact.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15. The department of social and health services is granted rule-making authority to adopt rules necessary for the implementation of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16. Sections 1 through 3 and 14 of this act take effect January 1, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17. Sections 4 through 12 of this act take effect April 1, 2026.

--- END ---