BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 82.14B RCW to read as follows:

(1) A county located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains with a population between 530,000 and 1,500,000 receiving tax revenues under this chapter that operates a regional 911 emergency communications system that transfers emergency calls to a municipal 911 emergency communications system operator in a city with a population over 50,000 for disposition and dispatch must transfer a portion of the tax revenues received under this chapter to the corresponding local government operating the municipal 911 emergency communications system receiving the transferred calls.

(2) The amount to be transferred from the county operating the regional 911 emergency communications system to the local government operating the municipal 911 emergency communications system receiving the transferred calls pursuant to subsection (1) of this section must be calculated as follows:

(a) The amount of tax revenues received by the county for the quarter pursuant to this chapter divided by the number of total 911 emergency calls received by the regional 911 emergency communications system for the quarter;

(b) The amount calculated in (a) of this subsection multiplied by the number of 911 emergency calls transferred from the regional 911 emergency communications system to the municipal 911 emergency communications system operator for disposition and dispatch for the quarter;

(c) The amount calculated in (b) of this subsection multiplied by 80 percent.

(3) The amount calculated in subsection (2)(c) of this section must be transferred quarterly by the county operating the regional 911 emergency communications system to the local government operating the municipal 911 emergency communications system.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "regional 911 emergency communications system" means a 911 emergency communications system operated by a county that is responsible for receiving incoming 911 emergency calls for multiple local government law enforcement and fire response agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This act takes effect January 1, 2025.

--- END ---