BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature recognizes that high school graduation is a significant milestone in a young person's life representing years of academic and personal growth made possible through hard work, perseverance, and the support of family, friends, and teachers.

In acknowledgment of students' accomplishments, and the identities and traditions informing their success, the legislature intends to provide public school students with the opportunity to express their cultural heritage at high school commencements and other official graduation ceremonies and events through the wearing of an item or object of cultural significance. The legislature intends also for this policy to bring parity to all cultural groups by allowing them to express cultural pride at commencements and other official graduation ceremonies and events.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.600 RCW to read as follows:

(1) School districts shall permit students to wear one item or object of cultural significance with or attached to their gown at high school commencements and other official graduation ceremonies and events. Items or objects worn in accordance with this section must be befitting of the ceremony or event and adhere to applicable decorum requirements of the school district.

(2) This section governs school operation and management under RCW 28A.710.040 and 28A.715.020 and applies to charter schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW and state-tribal education compact schools subject to chapter 28A.715 RCW to the same extent as it applies to school districts.

(3) Nothing in this section limits the discretion and authority of a school district to prohibit an item that is likely to cause a substantial disruption of, or material interference with, a high school commencement or other official graduation ceremony or event.

(4) Nothing in this section modifies or otherwise effects RCW 28A.600.500.

--- END ---