BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the people object to retrofitting a 100 year old bridge with a completely new toll system when construction of the replacement bridge is to start in late 2025, and the new bridge will also have a modern tolling system incorporated into its design. Toll payers should only have to pay for one system, not two, in a matter of years.

Sec. 2. RCW 47.56.902 and 2023 c 377 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the purposes of this section and RCW 47.56.904 and 47.56.906 and section 8, chapter 377, Laws of 2023, "Interstate 5 bridge replacement project" means the bistate, multimodal corridor improvement program between the state route number 500 interchange in Vancouver, Washington and the Victory Boulevard interchange in Portland, Oregon.

(2) The Interstate 5 bridge replacement project is designated an eligible toll facility. Tolls are authorized to be imposed on the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project at the time the replacement bridges are open for vehicular travel. Tolls may be charged for travel only on the ((existing and)) replacement Interstate 5 Columbia river bridges. Tolls may not be charged for travel on the Washington state portion of Interstate 205. Toll revenue generated on the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project must be expended only as allowed under RCW 47.56.820.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. Sections 1 and 2 of this act take effect when the contingency in section 8, chapter 377, Laws of 2023 occurs.

--- END ---