BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 71A.10 RCW to read as follows:

When enrolling eligible clients in open home and community-based services waiver slots and for purposes of determining access to specific waiver services, to the extent consistent with federal law and federal funding requirements, the administration shall prioritize clients in the following populations in addition to any other statutorily prioritized populations:

(1) Persons with developmental disabilities who are age 45 and older;

(2) Persons with developmental disabilities who, within the previous six months, have remained in a hospital without medical necessity due to lack of availability of community-based services and supports; and

(3) Persons who are discharging from residential habilitation centers.

--- END ---