BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The department of fish and wildlife shall convene an avian salmon predation work group to: Identify all avian species that contribute to predation of juvenile salmon at a population level; determine whether such species are adversely impacting the recovery of any threatened or endangered salmon species; and identify remedies.

(2) The avian salmon predation work group consists of:

(a) Five members from federally recognized Indian tribes with treaty fishing rights in Washington waters, invited by the department of fish and wildlife as comanagers;

(b) One member each from the department of fish and wildlife; the United States fish and wildlife service; the United States army corps of engineers; the national marine fisheries service, west coast region; the Oregon state department of fish and wildlife; and the Puget Sound partnership;

(c) Two members each representing recreational fishers and commercial fishers; and

(d) One member each representing a salmon conservation organization and an avian conservation organization.

(3) If a member has not been designated for a position set forth in subsection (2) of this section, the work group must still conduct business and report as required in subsection (4) of this section.

(4) The work group must report to the department of fish and wildlife and the legislature in accordance with RCW 43.01.036 by June 30, 2025.

(5) This section expires July 1, 2026.

--- END ---