BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.230.179 and 2013 c 181 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each school district that operates a high school must offer instruction in cardiopulmonary resuscitation to students as provided in this section. ((Beginning with the 2013-14 school year, instruction))Instruction in cardiopulmonary resuscitation must be included in at least one health class necessary for graduation. School districts that have more than 200 enrolled students must meet the requirements of this section through in-person instruction.

(2) Instruction in cardiopulmonary resuscitation under this section must:

(a) Be an instructional program developed by the American heart association or the American red cross or be nationally recognized and based on the most current national evidence-based emergency cardiovascular care guidelines for cardiopulmonary resuscitation;

(b) Include appropriate use of an automated external defibrillator((, which may be taught by video)); and

(c) Incorporate hands-on practice in addition to cognitive learning.

(3) School districts may offer the instruction in cardiopulmonary resuscitation directly or arrange for the instruction to be provided by available community-based providers. The instruction is not required to be provided by a certificated teacher. Certificated teachers providing the instruction are not required to be certified trainers of cardiopulmonary resuscitation. ((A student is not required to))

(4) Beginning with the graduating class of 2028, students must earn certification in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and the use of an automated external defibrillator to successfully complete the instruction ((for the purposes of))required by this section.

--- END ---