BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The department of natural resources, in collaboration with the department of enterprise services, shall conduct an assessment of state-owned assets in both the natural and built environment with potential to generate carbon offset credits as defined in RCW 70A.65.010 for the state's carbon market. The assessment must also include an analysis of the offset credit potential under protocols that the state might adopt in the future by rule, including offset protocols in voluntary carbon markets.

(2)(a) The department of natural resources, in collaboration with the department of enterprise services, must coordinate with the following agencies to complete the assessment:

(i) The department of fish and wildlife;

(ii) The state parks and recreation commission; and

(iii) The department of transportation.

(b) The department of natural resources, in collaboration with the department of enterprise services, may coordinate with other state agencies as necessary to complete a comprehensive analysis of carbon offset potential from state-owned lands.

(3) By December 31, 2025, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the department of natural resources, in collaboration with the department of enterprise services, must provide a report to the legislature that includes the results of the assessment and any related recommendations, including recommendations for future coordination with local governments.

--- END ---