BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that the dynamic nature of the residential rental market in Washington state necessitates a thorough reevaluation of the existing residential landlord-tenant act. Recognizing the fundamental importance of stable housing for individuals and communities, it is evident that changes in societal and economic conditions may have impacted the effectiveness of the residential landlord-tenant act. Furthermore, differences in local ordinances have prevented consistent delivery and implementation of state law. The legislature acknowledges the need to adapt and enhance the current regulatory framework to address emerging challenges, ensure fair treatment for both landlords and tenants, and uphold the principles of housing stability and equity.

(2) Therefore, the legislature intends to establish a task force dedicated to a comprehensive study of the residential landlord-tenant act. This task force will undertake a meticulous review of the existing legislation, analyzing its provisions, enforcement mechanisms, and practical implications. By soliciting input from diverse stakeholders, including landlords, tenants, legal experts, housing advocates, and industry representatives, the task force aims to gain a nuanced understanding of the contemporary issues within the residential rental sector. The legislature intends for this collaborative effort to result in evidence-based recommendations for potential amendments or enhancements to the residential landlord-tenant act, fostering a balanced and fair relationship between landlords and tenants while addressing the evolving needs of Washington's housing landscape.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)(a) A task force on revising the residential landlord-tenant act is established, with members as provided in this subsection.

(i) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate.

(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives.

(iii) The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives jointly shall appoint the following members:

(A) One representative of the for-profit residential property management and operations industry specializing in management of residential properties with 20 or more rental units;

(B) Two representatives of the residential property management and operations industry specializing in management of residential properties with between one and four rental units, with one representative from east of the crest of the Cascade mountains and one representative from west of the crest of the Cascade mountains;

(C) One representative of the nonprofit residential property management and operations industry;

(D) One representative of the real estate sales profession;

(E) One representative of the for-profit housing development industry;

(F) One representative of the nonprofit housing development industry;

(G) One representative of a statewide tenant legal aid association;

(H) One representative from a tenant-based organization representing historically underserved populations;

(I) One representative of public housing authorities created under chapter 35.82 RCW;

(J) Two representatives of the association of Washington cities, with one representative from a city that is located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains and one representative from a city that is located west of the crest of the Cascade mountains; and

(K) The director of the department of commerce or the director's designee.

(b) The task force shall choose its chair or cochairs from among its membership. The legislative membership shall convene the initial meeting of the task force.

(2) The task force shall study and review the residential landlord-tenant act, chapter 59.18 RCW and any related laws. The task force shall make recommendations regarding potential updates to the law in issue areas including, but not limited to, the following:

(a) Rent increase limits and rent stabilization policies;

(b) Security deposits and fees;

(c) Court processes related to the residential landlord-tenant act, including the eviction process;

(d) Required notices;

(e) Just cause eviction;

(f) Lease compliance;

(g) A rental registry;

(h) Local control;

(i) Access to rental assistance;

(j) Liability for violations of the residential landlord-tenant act;

(k) Tenant screening and access to rental housing; and

(l) Any other issues that the task force deems relevant.

(3) Staff support for the task force must be provided by the department of commerce.

(4) The task force may contract with additional persons who have specific technical expertise if the expertise is necessary to carry out the mandates of the study. The task force may enter into such a contract only if an appropriation is specifically provided for this purpose.

(5) Legislative members of the task force are reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.

(6) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the expenses of the task force must be paid by the department of commerce.

(7) By December 1, 2025, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the task force shall report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(8) This section expires July 1, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) For a period of 24 months following the effective date of this section, a city may not enact or create a new ordinance, development regulation, zoning regulation, official control, policy, or administrative practice that regulates the residential landlord-tenant relationship under chapter 59.18 RCW.

(2) This section expires July 1, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) For a period of 24 months following the effective date of this section, a county may not enact or create a new ordinance, development regulation, zoning regulation, official control, policy, or administrative practice which regulates the residential landlord-tenant relationship under chapter 59.18 RCW.

(2) This section expires July 1, 2026.

--- END ---