BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 49.58.110 and 2022 c 242 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The employer must disclose in each posting for each job opening the wage scale or salary range, and a general description of all of the benefits and other compensation to be offered to the hired applicant. For the purposes of this section, "posting" means any solicitation intended to recruit job applicants for a specific available position, including recruitment done directly by an employer or indirectly through a third party, and includes any postings done electronically, or with a printed hard copy, that includes qualifications for desired applicants.

(2) Upon request of an employee offered an internal transfer to a new position or promotion, the employer must provide the wage scale or salary range for the employee's new position.

(3) This section only applies to employers with 15 or more employees.

(4)(a) A job applicant or an employee is entitled to the remedies in RCW 49.58.060 and 49.58.070 for violations of this section, subject to (b) of this subsection. Recovery of any wages and interest must be calculated from the first date wages were owed to the employee.

(b) The department or job applicant must provide written notice to an employer that the employer's posting does not comply with subsection (1) of this section. If the employer corrects their posting within 10 business days of the written notice, no penalties, damages, or other relief may be assessed on the employer.

(5) For the purposes of this section, a "job applicant" means a person who has made and submitted a bona fide application for employment for a position listed by an employer covered by this section.

--- END ---