BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.220 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The board of directors of a school district with fewer than 1,000 enrolled students that does not offer a traffic safety education program under this chapter may permit a driver training school licensed under chapter 46.82 RCW to use school property to provide driver training education courses to students of the school district and students enrolled in adjacent school districts with fewer than 1,000 enrolled students.

(2) Prior to permitting a driver training school to use school property under this section, the board of directors must determine the terms and conditions required for the use of the school property, including ensuring that the driver training school is licensed under chapter 46.82 RCW to teach the classroom and behind-the-wheel instruction portions of a driver training education course, and that the instructors are licensed under RCW 46.82.320. Terms and conditions required by this subsection (2) may permit the use or lease of the school property at reduced or no cost.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "driver training education course" has the same meaning as in RCW 46.82.280.

--- END ---