BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that current law allows the removal of signs that are not lawfully placed. The legislature believes that a sign is not placed "lawfully" if it remains in place after any deadline for removal provided by law. The legislature intends to add language clarifying this common sense proposition in order to remove any possible confusion about the interpretation of current law.

Sec. 2. RCW 29A.84.040 and 2003 c 111 s 2104 are each amended to read as follows:

A person who removes or defaces lawfully placed political advertising including yard signs or billboards without authorization is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable to the same extent as a misdemeanor that is punishable under RCW 9A.20.021. For purposes of this section, political advertising is not "lawfully placed" if it remains in place past any deadline for removal provided by law. The defacement or removal of each item constitutes a separate violation.

--- END ---