BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that there is a great need for comprehensive programs and services for alcohol and substance use disorder prevention, treatment, and aftercare, as well as help to address behavioral health and related issues for all Washington citizens. The legislature also finds that Washington state federally recognized tribes provide comprehensive prevention services, withdrawal management services, inpatient and outpatient health services, wellness programs, and aftercare services for those experiencing addiction and coping with behavioral health conditions and related issues in a holistic and culturally based approach. The legislature promotes the expansion of these programs and services by Washington state federally recognized tribes that benefit all Washington citizens by authorizing government-to-government transfers of public land and facilities for these purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 39.33 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The state or any municipality or any political subdivision thereof, without further consideration except for subsection (2) of this section, may transfer real property, both improved and unimproved, to a Washington state federally recognized tribe, or consortium of federally recognized tribes, for the purpose of providing prevention services, withdrawal management services, inpatient and outpatient health services, wellness programs, and aftercare services to help patients address alcohol and substance use disorders, behavioral health conditions, and related issues.

(2)(a) Any transfer of property under subsection (1) of this section must be done on such terms and conditions as are mutually agreed to by the state, municipality, or political subdivision and the Washington state federally recognized tribe or tribes. The terms and conditions must include a requirement that the property in subsection (1) of this section reverts to the state, municipality, or political subdivision if the property ceases to be used for the purposes described in subsection (1) of this section earlier than 50 years from the date of the transfer.

(b) For transfers under (a) of this subsection involving unimproved land or where major renovations to an existing facility are necessary, the Washington state federally recognized tribe or tribes must have the facility constructed or renovated and operational within six years of the transfer and must have the capacity to continue to add onto the facility or property with services that address prevention, withdrawal management, inpatient and outpatient health services, wellness programs, and aftercare services. The legislature intends that any necessary state and local permits be expedited for these projects to the extent feasible.

(3) The state, municipalities, and political subdivisions and Washington state federally recognized Indian tribes are encouraged to consult and cooperate regarding identifying public property that the state, municipality, or political subdivision could consider transferring to a Washington state federally recognized tribe or tribes to provide critical alcohol and substance use disorder services, behavioral health services, and related services.

--- END ---