BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature intends to establish the Washington promise program to help make the first two years of college affordable and accessible to all citizens of the state of Washington by offering a tuition waiver for eligible students enrolled in associate degree or certificate programs offered by Washington's community and technical colleges. The purposes of the Washington promise program are to encourage more Washington residents to enroll in and successfully complete an associate's degree, workforce training certificate, or apprenticeship program that will lead to opportunities for further education, well-paying jobs, and increased opportunity to reduce intergenerational poverty; and to increase high school graduation and equivalency program completion. By making a postsecondary education credential more affordable and accessible, Washington will make more progress towards the legislature's attainment goal of 70 percent of Washington adults having a postsecondary credential.

The legislature recognizes that increasing the number of residents with associate degrees will lead to increased attainment for higher level degrees as students are encouraged to transfer to comprehensive or research universities.

It is the intent of the legislature to implement the Washington promise program in phases. The legislature recognizes that promise programs are proven to significantly increase high school graduation rates by ensuring all high school graduates know they can attend a community or technical college regardless of their family income. Thus, investment in these programs is an evidence-based means to improve high school graduation rates and to reduce, or even eliminate, opportunity gaps in postsecondary education for students from underrepresented minority groups, low-income students, foster youth, and students with disabilities.

The legislature also recognizes that evidence shows that merely making enrollment free does not address the many obstacles for students to complete a degree or workforce training program. Therefore, the legislature intends for the Washington promise program to include evidence-based supports, including student orientation and success courses, peer mentoring programs, and assistance in meeting such basic needs as food and housing security or child care.

The Washington promise program is intended to provide tuition and other supports to students, filling the gap left from federal Pell grants and other federal financial aid that a student qualifies for upon completion of the free application for federal student aid.

The legislature also finds that increasing the rate of high school students' completion of the free application for federal student aid and Washington application for state financial aid is a necessary component to increasing postsecondary enrollment and attainment. Therefore, the legislature intends for all Washington high school students to complete the free application for federal student aid and the Washington application for state financial aid and receive information on the Washington promise program and Washington college grant prior to high school graduation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Board" means the state board for community and technical colleges.

(2) "Community or technical college" means the community or technical colleges governed under chapter 28B.50 RCW.

(3) "Eligible degree or certificate program" means:

(a) An associate degree program;

(b) Academic programs with credits that can fully transfer via an articulation agreement toward a baccalaureate degree or postbaccalaureate degree at an institution of higher education, as defined in RCW 28B.10.016;

(c) Professional and technical programs that lead to a recognized postsecondary credential; or

(d) Apprenticeship programs approved under RCW 49.04.010 and conducted in association with any community or technical college.

(4) "Gift aid" means financial aid received from the federal Pell grant, the state need grant program under chapter 28B.92 RCW, the college bound scholarship program under chapter 28B.118 RCW, the opportunity grant program under chapter 28B.50 RCW, the opportunity scholarship program under chapter 28B.145 RCW, or any other state grant or scholarship program that provides funds for educational purposes with no obligation of repayment. "Gift aid" does not include student loans and work-study programs.

(5) "Office" means the office of student financial assistance.

(6) "Program" means the Washington promise program.

(7) "Program recipient" means an eligible student who has been awarded a Washington promise program grant.

(8) "Resident student" means a student who is a resident student as defined in RCW 28B.15.012.

(9) "Wraparound services" means evidence-based programs that have been demonstrated to, or which research provides support that the program will, increase student retention and degree or certificate completion.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) Subject to availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the Washington promise program is established to provide up to 90 credits to be earned within six years from the date of enrollment or the equivalent of two years of full-time enrollment of tuition free community or technical college, whichever comes first, for eligible students enrolled in any quarter or semester beginning with the 2026-27 academic year. The office shall administer the program. To become a program recipient, an eligible student:

(a) Must have graduated from a public high school or earned a high school equivalency certificate, as described in RCW 28B.50.536, in the state within 15 calendar months prior to enrolling in a community or technical college;

(b) Must not have previously earned an associate degree;

(c) Must be enrolled at least part time in an eligible degree or certificate program at a community or technical college;

(d) Must complete the free application for federal student aid or the Washington application for state financial aid for the academic year in which they seek eligibility for the program;

(e) Must be a resident student; and

(f) Must have a family income that does not exceed 200 percent of the state median family income, adjusted for family size as established and updated annually by the student achievement council.

(2) Beginning with the 2028-29 academic year, an eligible student is expanded to include an individual who:

(a) Has graduated from a public high school or earned a high school equivalency certificate, as described in RCW 28B.50.536, in the state;

(b) Has not have previously earned an associate degree;

(c) Is enrolled at least part time in an eligible degree or certificate program at a community or technical college;

(d) Has completed the free application for federal student aid or the Washington application for state financial aid for the academic year in which they seek eligibility for the program;

(e) Is a resident student; and

(f) Has a family income that does not exceed 150 percent of the state median family income, adjusted for family size as established and updated annually by the student achievement council.

(3) The office shall award grants to program recipients for an amount up to the cost of tuition and fees as defined in RCW 28B.15.020, and services and activities fees as defined in RCW 28B.15.041, less all other gift aid.

(4) Program recipients must receive intensive advising, defined by the board in consultation with the student achievement council, for student success from the community or technical college in which they are enrolled.

(5)(a) The board shall develop a plan to provide program recipients with median family incomes at or below 100 percent of the state median family income, adjusted for family size as established and updated annually by the student achievement council, or who are eligible for the Washington college grant created in RCW 28B.92.200, with a preenrollment orientation program or a quarter or semester to year-long student success course that provides advising and peer support and teaches essential skills for college success. Essential skills may include study habits and time management, financial aid information and resources, connecting students with advisors, encouraging student mentoring, helping establish student cohorts, and providing information about services available on campus. Participation in programs or courses created under this subsection must be free of cost and may not result in a reduction of gift aid.

(b) The board shall provide the plan to the relevant committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, and begin implementation of the plan for the 2025-26 academic year.

(6) Program recipients with median family incomes at or below 150 percent of the state median family income, adjusted for family size as established and updated annually by the student achievement council, must receive an annual $500 college basic attendance grant for books and other related higher education expenses and a transit pass for public transit serving the community or technical college at which the program recipient is enrolled.

(a) The college basic attendance grant must be distributed on a quarterly or semester basis for each quarter or semester a program recipient is enrolled, with the grant prorated based on three quarters or two semesters of attendance per academic year. Program recipients who enroll in four quarters are entitled to a college basic attendance grant equivalent to one-third of the annual stipend for the fourth quarter.

(b) Program recipients enrolled less than full time must receive a prorated portion of the college basic attendance grant based on the number of credits enrolled. Receipt of the stipend may not result in a reduction of gift aid.

(c) Beginning December 31, 2026, and every two years thereafter, the student achievement council shall adopt an annual inflation increase for the college basic attendance grant based on the cost of attendance, including required textbooks and other costs for attendance. By January 31, 2027, and every two years thereafter, the student achievement council shall report the inflation adjustment for the following biennium to the governor, the caseload forecast council, and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036.

(7)(a) By June 30, 2025, the board, in consultation with the student achievement council, shall adopt a menu of evidence-based wraparound services that increase student retention and degree or certificate completion rates. The menu of wraparound services must be updated every five years.

(b) Each community or technical college district shall devise a plan for providing wraparound services based on the needs of the population the district serves and including evidence-based wraparound services identified in the menu created in (a) of this subsection. Wraparound services may include collaborations with not-for-profit and community-based organizations using evidence-based mentoring and advising. Each community or technical college district shall submit its plan to the board for approval by December 1, 2025, and every five years thereafter.

(c) Wraparound services must be provided to all program recipients from the community or technical college in which they are enrolled for the purpose of reducing, or helping to reduce, barriers that threaten completion of their degree or certificate program. Wraparound services may include, but are not limited to, navigation support for public benefits, financial coaching, and access to food, housing, and child care resources and referrals.

(d) Program recipients who are considered first generation college students or members of other groups whose retention and completion rates are lower than target rates set by the board must be offered additional evidence-based wraparound services including mentoring and peer support programs. The board is encouraged to utilize community-based nonprofit partners who may begin mentoring and supporting students in developing postsecondary success skills while in high school and continuing through the first two quarters of enrollment at a community or technical college.

(8) Program recipients with eligible dependent children are eligible for subsidized child care and early learning programs which are accredited through head start, the early childhood education and assistance program, or a public school system at the community or technical college, or in the community.

(9) By December 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, the board shall report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, on the following impacts of the program:

(a) Program recipient enrollment in eligible degree or certificate programs;

(b) Program recipient completion rates of credits, certificates, and degrees;

(c) The cost of implementation, including the cost per program recipient;

(d) Additional resources used to meet program recipient needs, such as counseling, precollege courses, child care, or transportation;

(e) The number of program recipients receiving wraparound services, the number of schools providing wraparound services, and the resources needed to provide wraparound services; and

(f) Evidence relating to changes in student retention and degree or certificate completion rates for different student populations divided, to the extent possible, by type of wraparound services students received.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:

The state universities, regional universities, and the state college shall offer students who transferred from a community or technical college at which they received wraparound services under section 3(7) of this act a quarter or semester-long student success course, intensive advising, or a peer advising or mentoring program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 28A.230 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The state board of education and office of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt learning requirements and a curriculum for every high school junior and senior to learn about the Washington promise program created in section 3 of this act, the Washington college grant created in RCW 28B.92.200, and the benefits and opportunities of postsecondary education.

(2) Beginning with the 2025-26 academic year, high school graduation requirements established by the state board of education must include participation in a program in junior or senior year assisting students and parents or legal guardians in completing the free application for federal student aid and the Washington application for state financial aid.

Sec. 6. RCW 28B.50.536 and 2013 c 39 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Subject to rules adopted by the state board of education under RCW 28A.305.190, the state board for community and technical colleges shall adopt rules governing the eligibility of persons sixteen years of age and older to take a test to earn a high school equivalency certificate, rules governing the administration of the test, and rules governing the issuance of a high school equivalency certificate to persons who successfully complete the test.

(2) A high school equivalency certificate is a certificate issued jointly by the college board and the office of the superintendent of public instruction that indicates that the holder has attained standard scores at or above the minimum proficiency level prescribed by the college board on a high school equivalency test. The college board must identify and accept a high school equivalency test that is at least as rigorous as the general educational development test. The high school equivalency test identified by the college board must cover reading, writing, mathematics, science, and social studies subject areas.

(3) High school equivalency certificates issued under this section shall be issued in such form and substance as agreed upon by the state board for community and technical colleges and superintendent of public instruction.

(4) The college board and the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall create a notice about the Washington college grant created in RCW 28B.92.200, the Washington promise program created in section 3 of this act, and the benefits and opportunities of postsecondary education. The notice must be provided to individuals upon registration for the test to earn a high school equivalency certificate and issuance of a high school equivalency certificate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. (1) The student achievement council, in collaboration with the board, shall conduct a study on the effectiveness of the program including, but not limited to: Increases in enrollment in community or technical colleges; changes in enrollments elsewhere in institutions of higher education; changes in high school graduation or equivalency program completion rates; and changes in student persistence, completion, and time to degree rates in eligible degree or certificate programs. The study must include an analysis on the demand for student services, such as advising and student success courses, recommendations to improve student services and outcomes, and the financial impact of the program on program recipients. The student achievement council shall report its findings to the relevant committees of the legislature by December 1, 2028, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036.

(2) This section expires August 1, 2029.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. The caseload forecast council shall estimate the anticipated caseload of the program and submit this forecast as required in RCW 43.88C.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. The board may adopt, and amend as necessary, rules to implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. If the legislature does not appropriate enough funding to support the statewide implementation of section 3(1) of this act in full, the board shall provide matching grants to community or technical college districts based on the appropriation received to implement a program offering tuition free community or technical college for recent graduates of high schools within the region served by the college or college district. The community or technical college districts shall partner with local governments and private entities to secure match funding. Programs may include a free "13th year," under which up to 45 credits may be obtained tuition free in the 15 months following graduation from a public high school or obtaining a high school equivalency certificate, as described in RCW 28B.50.536. The board shall adopt criteria for the grants, prioritizing aid for at-risk students and programs with funding partners.

Sec. 11. RCW 43.88C.010 and 2023 c 420 s 4, 2023 c 345 s 1, and 2023 c 244 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) The caseload forecast council is hereby created. The council shall consist of two individuals appointed by the governor and four individuals, one of whom is appointed by the chairperson of each of the two largest political caucuses in the senate and house of representatives. The chair of the council shall be selected from among the four caucus appointees. The council may select such other officers as the members deem necessary.

(2) The council shall employ a caseload forecast supervisor to supervise the preparation of all caseload forecasts. As used in this chapter, "supervisor" means the caseload forecast supervisor.

(3) Approval by an affirmative vote of at least five members of the council is required for any decisions regarding employment of the supervisor. Employment of the supervisor shall terminate after each term of three years. At the end of the first year of each three-year term the council shall consider extension of the supervisor's term by one year. The council may fix the compensation of the supervisor. The supervisor shall employ staff sufficient to accomplish the purposes of this section.

(4) The caseload forecast council shall oversee the preparation of and approve, by an affirmative vote of at least four members, the official state caseload forecasts prepared under RCW 43.88C.020. If the council is unable to approve a forecast before a date required in RCW 43.88C.020, the supervisor shall submit the forecast without approval and the forecast shall have the same effect as if approved by the council.

(5) A councilmember who does not cast an affirmative vote for approval of the official caseload forecast may request, and the supervisor shall provide, an alternative forecast based on assumptions specified by the member.

(6) Members of the caseload forecast council shall serve without additional compensation but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120 while attending sessions of the council or on official business authorized by the council. Nonlegislative members of the council shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(7) "Caseload," as used in this chapter, means:

(a) The number of persons expected to meet entitlement requirements and require the services of public assistance programs, state correctional institutions, state correctional noninstitutional supervision, state institutions for juvenile offenders, the common school system, long-term care, medical assistance, foster care, and adoption support;

(b) The number of students who are eligible for the Washington college bound scholarship program and are expected to attend an institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030;

(c) The number of students who are eligible for the Washington college grant program under RCW 28B.92.200 and 28B.92.205 and are expected to attend an institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030;

(d) The number of students who are eligible for the Washington promise program and are expected to attend a community or technical college;

(e) The number of children who are eligible, as defined in RCW 43.216.505, to participate in, and the number of children actually served by, the early childhood education and assistance program; and

(((e)))(f) Beginning with the first official forecast after July 23, 2023, the number of people eligible for the working families' tax credit under RCW 82.08.0206. The total number of people eligible for the working families' tax credit should include:

(i) The number of eligible people with no qualifying children;

(ii) The number of eligible people with one qualifying child;

(iii) The number of eligible people with two qualifying children; and

(iv) The number of eligible people with three or more qualifying children.

(8) The caseload forecast council shall forecast the temporary assistance for needy families and the working connections child care programs as a courtesy.

(9) By January 1, 2023, the caseload forecast council shall present the number of individuals who are assessed as eligible for and have requested a service through the individual and family services waiver and the basic plus waiver administered by the developmental disabilities administration as a courtesy. The caseload forecast council shall be presented with the service request list as defined in RCW 71A.10.020 to aid in development of this information.

(10) Beginning with the official forecast submitted in November 2022 and subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the caseload forecast council shall forecast the number of individuals who are assessed as eligible for and have requested supported living services, a service through the core waiver, an individual and family services waiver, and the basic plus waiver administered by the developmental disabilities administration as a courtesy. The caseload forecast council shall be presented with the service request list as defined in RCW 71A.10.020 to aid in development of this information.

(11) As a courtesy, beginning with the official forecast submitted in November 2022, the caseload forecast council shall forecast the number of individuals who are expected to reside in state-operated living alternatives administered by the developmental disabilities administration.

(12) The caseload forecast council shall forecast youth participating in the extended foster care program pursuant to RCW 74.13.031 separately from other children who are residing in foster care and who are under eighteen years of age.

(13) The caseload forecast council shall forecast the number of youth expected to receive behavioral rehabilitation services while involved in the foster care system and the number of screened in reports of child abuse or neglect.

(14) The caseload forecast council shall forecast the number of individuals who are functionally and financially eligible for medicaid waiver services administered by the developmental disabilities administration who also meet the criteria outlined in RCW 71A.12.370 and are expected to utilize a medicaid waiver service.

(15) The caseload forecast council shall forecast eligible children participating in the transition to kindergarten program under RCW 28A.300.072.

(16) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions provided in RCW 43.88.020 apply to this chapter.

(17) During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, and beginning with the November 2021 forecast, the caseload forecast council shall produce an unofficial forecast of the long-term caseload for juvenile rehabilitation as a courtesy.

Sec. 12. RCW 28A.230.310 and 2023 c 271 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Beginning with the 2020-21 school year, all school districts with a high school must provide a financial aid advising day, as defined in RCW 28A.300.815.

(b) Districts must provide both a financial aid advising day and notification of financial aid opportunities at the beginning of each school year to parents and guardians of any student entering the twelfth grade. The notification must include information regarding:

(i) The eligibility requirements of the Washington college grant and the Washington promise program established in chapter 28B.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 15 of this act);

(ii) The requirements of the financial aid advising day;

(iii) The process for opting out of the financial aid advising day; and

(iv) Any community-based resources available to assist parents and guardians in understanding the requirements of and how to complete the free application for federal student aid and the Washington application for state financial aid.

(2) Districts may administer the financial aid advising day, as defined in RCW 28A.300.815, in accordance with information-sharing requirements set in the high school and beyond plan in RCW 28A.230.212 and 28A.230.215.

(3) The Washington state school directors' association, with assistance from the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the Washington student achievement council, shall develop a model policy and procedure that school district board of directors may adopt. The model policy and procedure must describe minimum standards for a financial aid advising day as defined in RCW 28A.300.815.

(4) School districts are encouraged to engage in the Washington student achievement council's financial aid advising training.

(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules for the implementation of this section.

Sec. 13. RCW 28A.230.212 and 2023 c 271 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) This section establishes the school district, content, and other substantive requirements for the high school and beyond plan required by RCW 28A.230.090.

(2)(a) Beginning by the seventh grade, each student must be administered a career interest and skills inventory which is intended to be used to inform eighth grade course taking and development of an initial high school and beyond plan. No later than eighth grade, each student must have begun development of a high school and beyond plan that includes a proposed plan for first-year high school courses aligned with graduation requirements and secondary and postsecondary goals.

(b) For each student who has not earned a score of level 3 or 4 on the middle school mathematics assessment identified in RCW 28A.655.070 by ninth grade, the high school and beyond plan must be updated to ensure that the student takes a mathematics course in both ninth and 10th grades. These courses may include career and technical education equivalencies in mathematics adopted pursuant to RCW 28A.230.097.

(3) With staff support, students must update their high school and beyond plan annually, at a minimum, to review academic progress and inform future course taking.

(a) The high school and beyond plan must be updated in 10th grade to reflect high school assessment results in RCW 28A.655.061, ensure student access to advanced course options per the district's academic acceleration policy in RCW 28A.320.195, assess progress toward identified goals, and revised as necessary for changing interests, goals, and needs.

(b) Each school district shall provide students who have not met the standard on state assessments or who are behind in completion of credits or graduation pathway options with the opportunity to access interventions and academic supports, courses, or both, designed to enable students to meet all high school graduation requirements. The parents or legal guardians shall be notified about these opportunities as included in the student's high school and beyond plan, preferably through a student-led conference, including the parents or legal guardians, and at least annually until the student is on track to graduate.

(c) For students with an individualized education program, the high school and beyond plan must be developed and updated in alignment with their school to postschool transition plan. The high school and beyond plan must be developed and updated in a similar manner and with similar school personnel as for all other students.

(4) School districts shall involve parents and legal guardians to the greatest extent feasible in the process of developing and updating the high school and beyond plan.

(a) The plan must be provided to the student and the students' parents or legal guardians in a language the student and parents or legal guardians understand and in accordance with the school district's language access policy and procedures as required under chapter 28A.183 RCW, which may require language assistance for students and parents or legal guardians with limited English proficiency.

(b) School districts must annually provide students in grades eight through 12 and their parents or legal guardians with comprehensive information about the graduation pathway options offered by the district and are strongly encouraged to begin providing this information beginning in sixth grade. School districts must provide this information in a manner that conforms with the school district's language access policy and procedures as required under chapter 28A.183 RCW.

(5) School districts are strongly encouraged to partner with student serving, community-based organizations that support career and college exploration and preparation for postsecondary and career pathways. Partnerships may include high school and beyond plan coordination and planning, data-sharing agreements, and safe and secure access to individual student's high school and beyond plans.

(6) All high school and beyond plans must, at a minimum, include the following elements:

(a) Identification of career goals and interests, aided by a skills and interest assessment;

(b) Identification of secondary and postsecondary education and training goals;

(c) An academic plan for course taking that:

(i) Informs students about course options for satisfying state and local graduation requirements;

(ii) Satisfies state and local graduation requirements;

(iii) Aligns with the student's secondary and postsecondary goals, which can include education, training, and career preparation;

(iv) Identifies available advanced course sequences per the school district's academic acceleration policy, as described in RCW 28A.320.195, that include dual credit courses or other programs and are aligned with the student's postsecondary goals;

(v) Informs students about the potential impacts of their course selections on postsecondary opportunities;

(vi) Identifies available career and technical education equivalency courses that can satisfy core subject area graduation requirements under RCW 28A.230.097;

(vii) If applicable, identifies career and technical education and work-based learning opportunities that can lead to technical college certifications and apprenticeships; and

(viii) If applicable, identifies opportunities for credit recovery and acceleration, including partial and mastery-based credit accrual to eliminate barriers for on-time grade level progression and graduation per RCW 28A.320.192;

(d) Evidence that the student has received the following information on federal and state financial aid programs that help pay for the costs of a postsecondary program:

(i) The college bound scholarship program established in chapter 28B.118 RCW, the Washington college grant created in RCW 28B.92.200, the Washington promise program established in chapter 28B.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 15 of this act), and other scholarship opportunities;

(ii) The documentation necessary for completing state and federal financial aid applications; application timeliness and submission deadlines; and the importance of submitting applications early;

(iii) Information specific to students who are or have been the subject of a dependency proceeding pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW, who are or are at risk of being homeless, and whose family member or legal guardian will be required to provide financial and tax information necessary to complete applications;

(iv) Opportunities to participate in advising days and seminars that assist students and, when necessary, their parents or legal guardians, with filling out financial aid applications in accordance with RCW 28A.300.815; and

(v) A sample financial aid letter and a link to the financial aid calculator created in RCW 28B.77.280; and

(e) By the end of the 12th grade, a current resume or activity log that provides a written compilation of the student's education, any work experience, extracurricular activities, and any community service including how the school district has recognized the community service pursuant to RCW 28A.320.193.

(7) In accordance with RCW 28A.230.090(1)(c) any decision on whether a student has met the state board's high school graduation requirements for a high school and beyond plan shall remain at the local level, and a school district may establish additional, local requirements for a high school and beyond plan to serve the needs and interests of its students and the purposes of this section.

(8) The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 14. RCW 28B.77.300 and 2022 c 214 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject to availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the student achievement council shall conduct a statewide marketing campaign to increase awareness of the Washington college grant program established in chapter 28B.92 RCW and the Washington promise program established in chapter 28B.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 15 of this act). The student achievement council shall issue a request for proposal for hiring a marketing firm that will produce high quality advertisements to promote the state's largest financial aid program. Advertisements should be marketed towards potential postsecondary students and their parents with the goal of increasing awareness of the Washington college grant program to further the state's educational attainment goals. The advertisements may include television commercials, billboards, advertisements on public transit, paid internet search advertisements, and social media marketing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15. Sections 2, 3, and 7 through 10 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16. This act may be known and cited as the Washington promise program.

--- END ---