BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 70A.65.130 and 2021 c 316 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) For the benefit of ratepayers, allowances must be allocated at no cost to covered entities that are natural gas utilities.

(a)(i) By October 1, 2022, the department shall adopt rules, in consultation with the utilities and transportation commission, establishing the methods and procedures for allocating allowances to natural gas utilities. ((Rules))Except as provided in (a)(ii) of this subsection, rules adopted under this subsection must allow for a natural gas utility to be provided allowances at no cost to cover their emissions and decline proportionally with the cap, consistent with RCW 70A.65.070. Allowances allocated at no cost to natural gas utilities must be consigned to auction for the benefit of ratepayers consistent with subsection (2) of this section, deposited for compliance, or a combination of both. The rules adopted by the department pursuant to this section must include provisions directing revenues generated under this subsection to the applicable utilities.

(ii) For municipal gas utilities subject to the provisions of chapter 35.92 RCW, the department shall adopt rules, beginning in 2025, that include an annual decline in the provision of allowances at no cost by two percent each year relative to the utility's allocation baseline.

(b)(i) By October 1, 2022, the department shall adopt an allocation schedule by rule, in consultation with the utilities and transportation commission, for the first two compliance periods for the provision of allowances for the benefit of ratepayers at no cost to natural gas utilities.

(ii) By October 1, 2024, the department shall adopt an updated allocation schedule to implement the provisions of (a)(ii) of this subsection and subsection (2)(a)(ii) of this section.

(c) By October 1, 2028, the department shall adopt an allocation schedule by rule, in consultation with the utilities and transportation commission, for the provision of allowances for the benefit of ratepayers at no cost to natural gas utilities for the compliance periods contained within calendar years 2031 through 2040.

(2)(a) ((Beginning))(i) Except as provided in (a)(ii) of this subsection, beginning in 2023, 65 percent of the no cost allowances must be consigned to auction for the benefit of customers, including at a minimum eliminating any additional cost burden to low-income customers from the implementation of this chapter. Rules adopted under this subsection must increase the percentage of allowances consigned to auction by five percent each year until a total of 100 percent is reached.

(ii) For allowances allocated to municipal gas utilities subject to the provisions of chapter 35.92 RCW, rules adopted under this subsection must increase the percentage of allowances consigned to auction by two percent each year, beginning in 2025, until a total of 100 percent is reached.

(b) Revenues from allowances sold at auction must be returned by providing nonvolumetric credits on ratepayer utility bills, prioritizing low-income customers, or used to minimize cost impacts on low-income, residential, and small business customers through actions that include, but are not limited to, weatherization, decarbonization, conservation and efficiency services, and bill assistance. The customer benefits provided from allowances consigned to auction under this section must be in addition to existing requirements in statute, rule, or other legal requirements.

(c) Except for low-income customers, the customer bill credits under this subsection are reserved exclusively for customers at locations connected to a natural gas utility's system on July 25, 2021. Bill credits may not be provided to customers of the gas utility at a location connected to the system after July 25, 2021.

(3) In order to qualify for no cost allowances, covered entities that are natural gas utilities must provide copies of their greenhouse gas emissions reports filed with the United States environmental protection agency under 40 C.F.R. Part 98 subpart NN - suppliers of natural gas and natural gas liquids for calendar years 2015 through 2021 to the department on or before March 31, 2022. The copies of the reports must be provided in electronic form to the department, in a manner prescribed by the department. The reports must be complete and contain all information required by 40 C.F.R. Sec. 98.406 including, but not limited to, information on large end users served by the natural gas utility. For any year where a natural gas utility was not required to file this report with the United States environmental protection agency, a report may be submitted in a manner prescribed by the department containing all of the information required in the subpart NN report.

(4) To continue receiving no cost allowances, a natural gas utility must provide to the department the United States environmental protection agency subpart NN greenhouse gas emissions report for each reporting year in the manner and by the dates provided by RCW 70A.15.2200(5) as part of the greenhouse gas reporting requirements of this chapter.

Sec. 2. RCW 42.30.110 and 2022 c 153 s 13 and 2022 c 115 s 12 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Nothing contained in this chapter may be construed to prevent a governing body from holding an executive session during a regular or special meeting:

(a)(i) To consider matters affecting national security;

(ii) To consider, if in compliance with any required data security breach disclosure under RCW 19.255.010 and 42.56.590, and with legal counsel available, information regarding the infrastructure and security of computer and telecommunications networks, security and service recovery plans, security risk assessments and security test results to the extent that they identify specific system vulnerabilities, and other information that if made public may increase the risk to the confidentiality, integrity, or availability of agency security or to information technology infrastructure or assets;

(b) To consider the selection of a site or the acquisition of real estate by lease or purchase when public knowledge regarding such consideration would cause a likelihood of increased price;

(c) To consider the minimum price at which real estate will be offered for sale or lease when public knowledge regarding such consideration would cause a likelihood of decreased price. However, final action selling or leasing public property shall be taken in a meeting open to the public;

(d) To review negotiations on the performance of publicly bid contracts when public knowledge regarding such consideration would cause a likelihood of increased costs;

(e) To consider, in the case of an export trading company, financial and commercial information supplied by private persons to the export trading company;

(f) To receive and evaluate complaints or charges brought against a public officer or employee. However, upon the request of such officer or employee, a public hearing or a meeting open to the public shall be conducted upon such complaint or charge;

(g) To evaluate the qualifications of an applicant for public employment or to review the performance of a public employee. However, subject to RCW 42.30.140(4), discussion by a governing body of salaries, wages, and other conditions of employment to be generally applied within the agency shall occur in a meeting open to the public, and when a governing body elects to take final action hiring, setting the salary of an individual employee or class of employees, or discharging or disciplining an employee, that action shall be taken in a meeting open to the public;

(h) To evaluate the qualifications of a candidate for appointment to elective office. However, any interview of such candidate and final action appointing a candidate to elective office shall be in a meeting open to the public;

(i) To discuss with legal counsel representing the agency matters relating to agency enforcement actions, or to discuss with legal counsel representing the agency litigation or potential litigation to which the agency, the governing body, or a member acting in an official capacity is, or is likely to become, a party, when public knowledge regarding the discussion is likely to result in an adverse legal or financial consequence to the agency.

This subsection (1)(i) does not permit a governing body to hold an executive session solely because an attorney representing the agency is present. For purposes of this subsection (1)(i), "potential litigation" means matters protected by RPC 1.6 or RCW 5.60.060(2)(a) concerning:

(i) Litigation that has been specifically threatened to which the agency, the governing body, or a member acting in an official capacity is, or is likely to become, a party;

(ii) Litigation that the agency reasonably believes may be commenced by or against the agency, the governing body, or a member acting in an official capacity; or

(iii) Litigation or legal risks of a proposed action or current practice that the agency has identified when public discussion of the litigation or legal risks is likely to result in an adverse legal or financial consequence to the agency;

(j) To consider, in the case of the state library commission or its advisory bodies, western library network prices, products, equipment, and services, when such discussion would be likely to adversely affect the network's ability to conduct business in a competitive economic climate. However, final action on these matters shall be taken in a meeting open to the public;

(k) To consider, in the case of the state investment board, financial and commercial information when the information relates to the investment of public trust or retirement funds and when public knowledge regarding the discussion would result in loss to such funds or in private loss to the providers of this information;

(l) To consider proprietary or confidential nonpublished information related to the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased health care services as provided in RCW 41.05.026;

(m) To consider in the case of the life sciences discovery fund authority, the substance of grant applications and grant awards when public knowledge regarding the discussion would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to the providers of this information;

(n) To consider in the case of a health sciences and services authority, the substance of grant applications and grant awards when public knowledge regarding the discussion would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to the providers of this information;

(o) To consider information regarding staff privileges or quality improvement committees under RCW 70.41.205;

(p) To consider proprietary or confidential data collected or analyzed pursuant to chapter 70.405 RCW;

(q) To consider, for public entities regulated under chapter 70A.65 RCW, financial, proprietary, or other market sensitive information subject to the provisions of RCW 70A.65.100(9).

(2) Before convening in executive session, the presiding officer of a governing body shall publicly announce the purpose for excluding the public from the meeting place, and the time when the executive session will be concluded. The executive session may be extended to a stated later time by announcement of the presiding officer. The announced purpose of excluding the public must be entered into the minutes of the meeting required by RCW 42.30.035.

--- END ---