BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 46.63 RCW to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this section and sections 2 through 6 of this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Automated traffic safety camera" means a device that uses a vehicle sensor installed to work in conjunction with an intersection traffic control system, a railroad grade crossing control system, or a speed measuring device, and a camera synchronized to automatically record one or more sequenced photographs, microphotographs, or electronic images of the front or rear of a motor vehicle at the time the vehicle fails to stop when facing a steady red traffic control signal or an activated railroad grade crossing control signal, or exceeds a speed limit as detected by a speed measuring device. "Automated traffic safety camera" also includes a device used to detect stopping at intersection or crosswalk violations; stopping when traffic obstructed violations; public transportation only lane violations; and stopping or traveling in restricted lane violations.

(2) "Hospital speed zone" means the marked area within hospital property and extending 300 feet from the border of the hospital property (a) consistent with hospital use; and (b) where signs are posted to indicate the location is within a hospital speed zone, where "hospital" has the same meaning as in RCW 70.41.020.

(3) "Public park speed zone" means the marked area within public park property and extending 300 feet from the border of the public park property (a) consistent with active park use; and (b) where signs are posted to indicate the location is within a public park speed zone.

(4) "Public transportation vehicle" means any motor vehicle, streetcar, train, trolley vehicle, ferry boat, or any other device, vessel, or vehicle that is owned or operated by a transit authority or an entity providing service on behalf of a transit authority that is used for the purpose of carrying passengers and that operates on established routes. "Transit authority" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 9.91.025.

(5) "School speed zone" has the same meaning as described in RCW 46.61.440 (1) and (2).

(6) "School walk zone" means a roadway identified under RCW 28A.160.160 or roadways within a one-mile radius of a school that students use to travel to school by foot, bicycle, or other means of active transportation.

(7) "Work zone" means an area of any city or county roadway with construction, maintenance, or utility work with a duration of 30 calendar days or more. A work zone is identified by the placement of temporary traffic control devices that may include signs, channelizing devices, barriers, pavement markings, and/or work vehicles with warning lights. It extends from the first warning sign or high intensity rotating, flashing, oscillating, or strobe lights on a vehicle to the end road work sign or the last temporary traffic control device or vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 46.63 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Nothing in this section prohibits a law enforcement officer from issuing a notice of traffic infraction to a person in control of a vehicle at the time a violation occurs under RCW 46.63.030(1) (a), (b), or (c).

(2) Cities and counties may authorize the use of traffic safety cameras through an ordinance adopted by the local legislative authority.

(3) The local legislative authority must prepare an analysis of the locations within the jurisdiction where automated traffic safety cameras are proposed to be located before adding traffic safety cameras or relocating any existing camera to a new location within the jurisdiction. The analysis must include equity considerations including the impact of the camera placement on livability, accessibility, economics, education, and environmental health, and shall consider the outcome of that analysis when identifying where to locate an automated traffic safety camera. The analysis must also show a demonstrated need for traffic cameras based on rates of collision and documented traffic reports showing near collisions, and on anticipated or actual ineffectiveness or infeasibility of other mitigation measures.

(4) Automated traffic safety cameras may not be used on an on-ramp to a limited access facility as defined in RCW 47.52.010.

(5) A city may use automated traffic safety cameras to enforce traffic ordinances in this section on state highways that are also classified as city streets under chapter 47.24 RCW. A city government must notify the department of transportation when it installs an automated traffic safety camera to enforce traffic ordinances as authorized in this subsection.

(6)(a) At a minimum, a local ordinance adopted pursuant to this section must contain the restrictions described in this section and provisions for public notice and signage. Cities and counties using automated traffic safety cameras before July 24, 2005, are subject to the restrictions described in this section, but are not required to adopt an authorizing ordinance.

(b)(i) Cities and counties using automated traffic safety cameras must post an annual report on the city or county's website of the number of traffic crashes that occurred at each location where an automated traffic safety camera is located, as well as the number of notices of infraction issued for each camera. Beginning December 1, 2025, the annual report must include the percentage of revenues received from fines issued from automated traffic safety camera infractions that were used to pay for the costs of the automated traffic safety camera program and must describe the uses of revenues that exceeded the costs of operation and administration of the automated traffic safety camera program by the city or county.

(ii) The Washington traffic safety commission must provide an annual report to the transportation committees of the legislature, and post the report to its website for public access, beginning December 1, 2025, that includes aggregated information on the use of automated traffic safety cameras in the state that includes an assessment of the impact of their use, information required in city and county annual reports under (b)(i) of this subsection, and information on the number of automated traffic safety cameras in use by type and location, with an analysis of camera placement in the context of area demographics and household incomes. Cities and counties using automated traffic safety cameras must provide the commission with the data it requests for the report required under this subsection in a form and manner specified by the commission.

(7) All locations where an automated traffic safety camera is used on roadways or intersections must be clearly marked by placing signs at least 30 days prior to activation of the camera in locations that clearly indicate to a driver either that: (a) The driver is within an area where automated traffic safety cameras are authorized; or (b) the driver is entering an area where violations are enforced by an automated traffic safety camera. The signs must be readily visible to a driver approaching an automated traffic safety camera. Signs placed in automated traffic safety camera locations after June 7, 2012, must follow the specifications and guidelines under the manual of uniform traffic control devices for streets and highways as adopted by the department of transportation under chapter 47.36 RCW.

(8) Automated traffic safety cameras may only record images of the vehicle and vehicle license plate and only while an infraction is occurring. The image must not reveal the face of the driver or of passengers in the vehicle. The primary purpose of camera placement is to record images of the vehicle and vehicle license plate when an infraction is occurring. Cities and counties must consider installing automated traffic safety cameras in a manner that minimizes the impact of camera flash on drivers.

(9) A notice of infraction must be mailed to the registered owner of the vehicle within 14 days of the violation, or to the renter of a vehicle within 14 days of establishing the renter's name and address under subsection (18) of this section. The notice of infraction must include with it a certificate or facsimile thereof, based upon inspection of photographs, microphotographs, or electronic images produced by an automated traffic safety camera, stating the facts supporting the notice of infraction. This certificate or facsimile is prima facie evidence of the facts contained in it and is admissible in a proceeding charging a violation under this chapter. The photographs, microphotographs, or electronic images evidencing the violation must be available for inspection and admission into evidence in a proceeding to adjudicate the liability for the infraction. A person receiving a notice of infraction based on evidence detected by an automated traffic safety camera may respond to the notice by mail.

(10) The registered owner of a vehicle is responsible for an infraction under RCW 46.63.030(1)(d) unless the registered owner overcomes the presumption in RCW 46.63.075, or, in the case of a rental car business, satisfies the conditions under subsection (18) of this section. If appropriate under the circumstances, a renter identified under subsection (18)(a) of this section is responsible for an infraction.

(11) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all photographs, microphotographs, or electronic images, or any other personally identifying data prepared under this section are for the exclusive use of authorized city or county employees in the discharge of duties under this section and are not open to the public and may not be used in a court in a pending action or proceeding unless the action or proceeding relates to a violation under this section. No photograph, microphotograph, or electronic image, or any other personally identifying data may be used for any purpose other than enforcement of violations under this section nor retained longer than necessary to enforce this section.

(12) If a county or city has established an automated traffic safety camera program as authorized under this section, the compensation paid to the manufacturer or vendor of the equipment used must be based only upon the value of the equipment and services provided or rendered in support of the system and may not be based upon a portion of the fine or civil penalty imposed or the revenue generated by the equipment.

(13)(a) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, a county or a city may only use revenue generated by an automated traffic safety camera program as authorized under this section for traffic safety purposes including, but not limited to, projects designed to implement the complete streets approach as defined in RCW 47.04.010, changes in physical infrastructure to reduce speeds through road design, changes to improve safety for active transportation users, improve access and safety for road users with mobility, sight, or other disabilities, and for the cost to administer, install, operate, and maintain the automated traffic safety cameras, including the cost of processing infractions.

(b) The automated traffic safety camera program revenue used by a county or city for traffic safety purposes must include the use of revenue in census tracts of the city or county that have household incomes in the lowest quartile determined by the most currently available census data and areas that experience rates of injury crashes that are above average for the city or county. Funding contributed from traffic safety program revenue must be, at a minimum, proportionate to the share of the population of the county or city who are residents of these low-income communities and communities experiencing high injury crash rates. This share must be directed to investments that provide direct and meaningful traffic safety benefits to these communities. Revenue used to administer, install, operate, and maintain automated traffic safety cameras, including the cost of processing infractions, are excluded from determination of the proportionate share of revenues under this subsection (13)(b).

(c) Jurisdictions that have automated traffic safety camera programs in effect prior to the effective date of this section, for which an ordinance in effect as of January 1, 2024, directs the manner in which revenue generated from automated traffic safety cameras authorized under section 3 or 5(2)(c) of this act must be used, may continue to allocate revenue for these infractions in accordance with that ordinance, as well as for the purposes established in (a) and (b) of this subsection.

(14) A county or city may adopt the use of an online ability-to-pay calculator to process and grant requests for reduced fines or reduced civil penalties for automated traffic safety camera violations.

(15) Registered owners of vehicles who receive notices of infraction for automated traffic safety camera-enforced infractions and are recipients of public assistance under Title 74 RCW or participants in the Washington women, infants, and children program, and who request reduced penalties for infractions detected through the use of automated traffic safety camera violations, must be granted reduced penalty amounts of 25 percent of what would otherwise be assessed. Registered owners of vehicles who receive notices of infraction must be provided with information on their eligibility and the opportunity to apply for a reduction in penalty amounts through the mail or internet.

(16) Infractions detected through the use of automated traffic safety cameras are not part of the registered owner's driving record under RCW 46.52.101 and 46.52.120. Additionally, infractions generated by the use of automated traffic safety cameras under this section must be processed in the same manner as parking infractions, including for the purposes of RCW 3.50.100, 35.20.220, 46.16A.120, and 46.20.270(2). The amount of the fine issued for an infraction generated through the use of an automated traffic safety camera may not exceed the amount of a fine issued for other parking infractions within the jurisdiction. However, the amount of the fine issued for a traffic control signal violation detected through the use of an automated traffic safety camera may not exceed the monetary penalty for a violation of RCW 46.61.050 as provided under RCW 46.63.110, including all applicable statutory assessments; and the amount of fine issued for other automated traffic safety camera violations detected through the use of an automated traffic safety camera may not exceed two-thirds of the monetary penalty for a violation of an unscheduled infraction as prescribed by the supreme court in accordance with RCW 46.63.110(3), including two-thirds of all applicable statutory assessments.

(17) In addition to the penalty amounts for automated traffic safety camera infractions authorized in subsection (16) of this section, automated traffic safety camera infraction penalties must also include the fee specified in RCW 46.63.110(7)(c) to be deposited in the traumatic brain injury account created in RCW 74.31.060. This fee is waived for registered owners of vehicles granted the penalty reduction specified in subsection (15) of this section.

(18) If the registered owner of the vehicle is a rental car business, the law enforcement agency must, before a notice of infraction being issued under this section, provide a written notice to the rental car business that a notice of infraction may be issued to the rental car business if the rental car business does not, within 18 days of receiving the written notice, provide to the issuing agency by return mail:

(a) A statement under oath stating the name and known mailing address of the individual driving or renting the vehicle when the infraction occurred; or

(b) A statement under oath that the business is unable to determine who was driving or renting the vehicle at the time the infraction occurred because the vehicle was stolen at the time of the infraction. A statement provided under this subsection must be accompanied by a copy of a filed police report regarding the vehicle theft; or

(c) In lieu of identifying the vehicle operator, the rental car business may pay the applicable penalty. Timely mailing of this statement to the issuing law enforcement agency relieves a rental car business of any liability under this chapter for the notice of infraction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 46.63 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Automated traffic safety cameras may be used to detect stoplight violations, subject to section 2 of this act.

(2) Automated traffic safety cameras used to detect stoplight violations are restricted to intersections of two or more arterials with traffic control signals that have yellow change interval durations in accordance with RCW 47.36.022, which interval durations may not be reduced after placement of the camera.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 46.63 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Automated traffic safety cameras may be used to detect railroad grade crossing violations, subject to section 2 of this act.

(2) Automated traffic safety cameras at rail crossings may be used only to detect instances when a vehicle fails to stop when facing an activated railroad grade crossing control signal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 46.63 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Automated traffic safety cameras may be used to detect speed violations, subject to section 2 of this act.

(2) Automated traffic safety cameras may be used to detect speed violations within the following locations:

(a) Hospital speed zones;

(b) Public park speed zones;

(c) School speed zones;

(d) School walk zones;

(e) Work zones on city streets, including on state highways also classified as city streets under chapter 47.24 RCW, and county roads as defined in RCW 46.04.150, except that a notice of infraction may only be issued if an automated traffic safety camera captures a speed violation when workers are present; and

(f) State highways within city limits that are classified as city streets under chapter 47.24 RCW.

(3) In addition to the automated traffic safety cameras that may be authorized for specified zones or roads in subsection (2) of this section, the local legislative authority may authorize the use of one additional automated traffic safety camera per 10,000 population to detect speed violations in locations deemed by the local legislative authority to experience higher crash risks due to excessive vehicle speeds. For automated traffic safety cameras authorized to detect speed violations as part of a pilot program prior to the effective date of this section, the location must be deemed by a local legislative authority to have experienced higher crash risks due to excessive vehicle speeds prior to installation of the automated traffic safety camera.

(4) Notices of infraction for automated traffic safety camera-detected speed violations may not be issued to the registered vehicle owner of:

(a) A law enforcement or marked fire department vehicle equipped with emergency lights and siren; or

(b) An ambulance licensed by the department of health and equipped with emergency lights and siren.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 46.63 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to section 2 of this act, automated traffic safety cameras may be used in cities with populations of 10,000 residents or greater to detect one or more of the following violations:

(a) Stopping when traffic obstructed violations;

(b) Stopping at intersection or crosswalk violations;

(c) Public transportation only lane violations; or

(d) Stopping or traveling in restricted lane violations.

(2) A transit authority may not take disciplinary action regarding a warning or infraction issued pursuant to this section against an employee who was operating a public transportation vehicle at the time the violation that was the basis of the warning or infraction was detected.

Sec. 7. RCW 46.16A.120 and 2012 c 83 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Each court and government agency located in this state having jurisdiction over standing, stopping, and parking violations, the use of a photo toll system under RCW 46.63.160, the use of automated traffic safety cameras under ((RCW 46.63.170))sections 2 through 6 of this act, and the use of automated school bus safety cameras under RCW 46.63.180 may forward to the department any outstanding:

(a) Standing, stopping, and parking violations;

(b) Civil penalties for toll nonpayment detected through the use of photo toll systems issued under RCW 46.63.160;

(c) Automated traffic safety camera infractions issued under RCW 46.63.030(1)(d); and

(d) Automated school bus safety camera infractions issued under RCW 46.63.030(1)(e).

(2) Violations, civil penalties, and infractions described in subsection (1) of this section must be reported to the department in the manner described in RCW 46.20.270(3).

(3) The department shall:

(a) Record the violations, civil penalties, and infractions on the matching vehicle records; and

(b) Send notice approximately ((one hundred twenty))120 days in advance of the current vehicle registration expiration date to the registered owner listing the dates and jurisdictions in which the violations, civil penalties, and infractions occurred, the amounts of unpaid fines and penalties, and the surcharge to be collected. Only those violations, civil penalties, and infractions received by the department ((one hundred twenty))120 days or more before the current vehicle registration expiration date will be included in the notice. Violations, civil penalties, and infractions received by the department later than ((one hundred twenty))120 days before the current vehicle registration expiration date that are not satisfied will be delayed until the next vehicle registration expiration date.

(4) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall not renew a vehicle registration if there are any outstanding standing, stopping, and parking violations, and other civil penalties issued under RCW 46.63.160 for the vehicle unless:

(a) The outstanding standing, stopping, or parking violations and civil penalties were received by the department within ((one hundred twenty))120 days before the current vehicle registration expiration;

(b) There is a change in registered ownership; or

(c) The registered owner presents proof of payment of each violation, civil penalty, and infraction provided in this section and the registered owner pays the surcharge required under RCW 46.17.030.

(5) The department shall:

(a) Forward a change in registered ownership information to the court or government agency who reported the outstanding violations, civil penalties, or infractions; and

(b) Remove the outstanding violations, civil penalties, and infractions from the vehicle record.

Sec. 8. RCW 46.63.030 and 2023 c 17 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A law enforcement officer has the authority to issue a notice of traffic infraction:

(a) When the infraction is committed in the officer's presence, except as provided in RCW 46.09.485;

(b) When the officer is acting upon the request of a law enforcement officer in whose presence the traffic infraction was committed;

(c) If an officer investigating at the scene of a motor vehicle accident has reasonable cause to believe that the driver of a motor vehicle involved in the accident has committed a traffic infraction;

(d) When the infraction is detected through the use of an automated traffic safety camera under ((RCW 46.63.170))sections 2 through 6 of this act. A trained and authorized civilian employee of a general authority Washington law enforcement agency, as defined in RCW 10.93.020, or an employee of a local public works or transportation department performing under the supervision of a qualified traffic engineer and designated by a city or county, has the authority to review infractions detected through the use of an automated traffic safety camera under sections 2 through 6 of this act and to issue notices of infraction consistent with section 2(9) of this act. These employees must be sufficiently trained and certified in reviewing infractions and issuing notices of infraction by qualified peace officers or by traffic engineers employed in the jurisdiction's public works or transportation department. Nothing in this subsection impairs decision and effects collective bargaining rights under chapter 41.56 RCW;

(e) When the infraction is detected through the use of an automated school bus safety camera under RCW 46.63.180; or

(f) When the infraction is detected through the use of a speed safety camera system under RCW 46.63.200.

(2) A court may issue a notice of traffic infraction upon receipt of a written statement of the officer that there is reasonable cause to believe that an infraction was committed.

(3) If any motor vehicle without a driver is found parked, standing, or stopped in violation of this title or an equivalent administrative regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution, the officer finding the vehicle shall take its registration number and may take any other information displayed on the vehicle which may identify its user, and shall conspicuously affix to the vehicle a notice of traffic infraction.

(4) In the case of failure to redeem an abandoned vehicle under RCW 46.55.120, upon receiving a complaint by a registered tow truck operator that has incurred costs in removing, storing, and disposing of an abandoned vehicle, an officer of the law enforcement agency responsible for directing the removal of the vehicle shall send a notice of infraction by certified mail to the last known address of the person responsible under RCW 46.55.105. The notice must be entitled "Littering—Abandoned Vehicle" and give notice of the monetary penalty. The officer shall append to the notice of infraction, on a form prescribed by the department of licensing, a notice indicating the amount of costs incurred as a result of removing, storing, and disposing of the abandoned vehicle, less any amount realized at auction, and a statement that monetary penalties for the infraction will not be considered as having been paid until the monetary penalty payable under this chapter has been paid and the court is satisfied that the person has made restitution in the amount of the deficiency remaining after disposal of the vehicle.

Sec. 9. RCW 46.63.075 and 2023 c 17 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In a traffic infraction case involving an infraction detected through the use of an automated traffic safety camera under ((RCW 46.63.170))sections 2 through 6 of this act, detected through the use of a speed safety camera system under RCW 46.63.200, or detected through the use of an automated school bus safety camera under RCW 46.63.180, proof that the particular vehicle described in the notice of traffic infraction was in violation of any such provision of sections 2 through 6 of this act or RCW ((46.63.170,)) 46.63.200((,)) and 46.63.180, together with proof that the person named in the notice of traffic infraction was at the time of the violation the registered owner of the vehicle, constitutes in evidence a prima facie presumption that the registered owner of the vehicle was the person in control of the vehicle at the point where, and for the time during which, the violation occurred.

(2) This presumption may be overcome only if the registered owner states, under oath, in a written statement to the court or in testimony before the court that the vehicle involved was, at the time, stolen or in the care, custody, or control of some person other than the registered owner.

Sec. 10. RCW 46.68.480 and 2023 c 431 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The Cooper Jones active transportation safety account is created in the state treasury. All ((receipts from penalties collected under RCW 46.63.170))funds designated by the legislature shall be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only to fund grant projects or programs for bicycle, pedestrian, and nonmotorist safety improvement administered by the Washington traffic safety commission. By December 1, 2024, and every two years thereafter, the commission shall report to the transportation committees of the legislature regarding the activities funded from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

Sec. 11. RCW 46.63.110 and 2023 c 388 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) A person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be assessed a monetary penalty. No penalty may exceed $250 for each offense unless authorized by this chapter or title.

(b) The court may waive or remit any monetary penalty, fee, cost, assessment, or other monetary obligation associated with a traffic infraction unless the specific monetary obligation in question is prohibited from being waived or remitted by state law.

(2) The monetary penalty for a violation of (a) RCW 46.55.105(2) is $250 for each offense; (b) RCW 46.61.210(1) is $500 for each offense. No penalty assessed under this subsection (2) may be reduced.

(3) The supreme court shall prescribe by rule a schedule of monetary penalties for designated traffic infractions. This rule shall also specify the conditions under which local courts may exercise discretion in assessing fines and penalties for traffic infractions. The legislature respectfully requests the supreme court to adjust this schedule every two years for inflation.

(4) There shall be a penalty of $25 for failure to respond to a notice of traffic infraction except where the infraction relates to parking as defined by local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution or failure to pay a monetary penalty imposed pursuant to this chapter. A local legislative body may set a monetary penalty not to exceed $25 for failure to respond to a notice of traffic infraction relating to parking as defined by local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution. The local court, whether a municipal, police, or district court, shall impose the monetary penalty set by the local legislative body.

(5) Monetary penalties provided for in chapter 46.70 RCW which are civil in nature and penalties which may be assessed for violations of chapter 46.44 RCW relating to size, weight, and load of motor vehicles are not subject to the limitation on the amount of monetary penalties which may be imposed pursuant to this chapter.

(6) Whenever a monetary penalty, fee, cost, assessment, or other monetary obligation is imposed by a court under this chapter, it is immediately payable and is enforceable as a civil judgment under Title 6 RCW. If the court determines that a person is not able to pay a monetary obligation in full, the court shall enter into a payment plan with the person in accordance with RCW 46.63.190 and standards that may be set out in court rule.

(7) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this section and not subject to the limitation of subsection (1) of this section, a person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be assessed:

(a) A fee of $5 per infraction. Under no circumstances shall this fee be reduced or waived. Revenue from this fee shall be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the emergency medical services and trauma care system trust account under RCW 70.168.040;

(b) A fee of $10 per infraction. Under no circumstances shall this fee be reduced or waived. Revenue from this fee shall be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the general fund; and

(c) A fee of $5 per infraction. Under no circumstances shall this fee be reduced or waived, except as provided in section 2 of this act. Revenue from this fee shall be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the traumatic brain injury account established in RCW 74.31.060.

(8)(a) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this section and not subject to the limitation of subsection (1) of this section, a person found to have committed a traffic infraction other than of RCW 46.61.527 or 46.61.212 shall be assessed an additional penalty of $24. The court may not reduce, waive, or suspend the additional penalty unless the court finds the offender to be indigent. If a court authorized community restitution program for offenders is available in the jurisdiction, the court shall allow offenders to offset all or a part of the penalty due under this subsection (8) by participation in the court authorized community restitution program.

(b) $12.50 of the additional penalty under (a) of this subsection shall be remitted to the state treasurer. The remaining revenue from the additional penalty must be remitted under chapters 2.08, 3.46, 3.50, 3.62, 10.82, and 35.20 RCW. Money remitted under this subsection to the state treasurer must be deposited as follows: $8.50 in the state general fund and $4 in the driver licensing technology support account created under RCW 46.68.067. The moneys deposited into the driver licensing technology support account must be used to support information technology systems used by the department to communicate with the judicial information system, manage driving records, and implement court orders. The balance of the revenue received by the county or city treasurer under this subsection must be deposited into the county or city current expense fund. Moneys retained by the city or county under this subsection shall constitute reimbursement for any liabilities under RCW 43.135.060.

(9) If a legal proceeding, such as garnishment, has commenced to collect any delinquent amount owed by the person for any penalty imposed by the court under this section, the person may request a payment plan pursuant to RCW 46.63.190.

(10) The monetary penalty for violating RCW 46.37.395 is: (a) $250 for the first violation; (b) $500 for the second violation; and (c) $750 for each violation thereafter.

(11) The additional monetary penalty for a violation of RCW 46.20.500 is not subject to assessments or fees provided under this section.

(12) The additional monetary fine for a violation of RCW 46.61.110, 46.61.145, 46.61.180, 46.61.185, 46.61.190, and 46.61.205 is not subject to assessments or fees provided under this section.

(13) The additional monetary penalties for a violation of RCW 46.61.165 are not subject to assessments or fees provided under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. RCW 46.63.170 (Automated traffic safety cameras—Definition) and 2022 c 182 s 424, 2022 c 182 s 423, 2020 c 224 s 1, 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 406, 2015 1st sp.s. c 10 s 702, & 2013 c 306 s 711 are each repealed.

--- END ---