BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW to read as follows:

(1) Decisions pertaining to the development or extension of a trail or path are categorically exempted from compliance with this chapter if:

(a) The surface area of the proposed new trail or path or extension to an existing trail or path does not exceed 10 acres;

(b) The proposed new trail or path or extension to an existing trail or path is located in whole or in part on an inactive railroad right-of-way designated for interim trail use under 16 U.S.C. Sec. 1247; and

(c) The proposed new trail or path or extension to an existing trail or path is not located in a designated critical area under RCW 36.70A.170.

(2) Improvements covered by this exemption include utilities and support infrastructure for trails and paths, including street crossings, lighting, signage, and parking facilities otherwise exempted under this chapter, but not unrelated infrastructure improvements.

(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Critical area" has the same meaning as "critical areas" as defined in RCW 36.70A.030.

(b) "Extension to an existing trail or path" includes an addition to an existing trail or path that connects two existing segments of the trail or path.

(c) "Trail" and "path" have the same meaning as defined in RCW 47.30.005.

--- END ---