BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that:

(a) Fentanyl is a synthetic opioid that is up to 50 times stronger than morphine and is a major contributor to fatal and nonfatal overdoses in the United States;

(b) There are two types of fentanyl: Pharmaceutical fentanyl and illegally made fentanyl;

(c) Fentanyl and other synthetic opioids are causing a public health crisis in Washington;

(d) Addiction, overdoses, and deaths caused by fentanyl and other synthetic opioids are on the rise, and health care and treatment systems are becoming overextended;

(e) Effective outreach programs about the negative health effects of fentanyl misuse and abuse are necessary to help curb the public health crisis;

(f) Individuals who purchase or recover motor vehicles in which fentanyl or other synthetic opioids have been used face unique challenges in understanding how to decontaminate the vehicles; and

(g) More should be done to connect individuals who are arrested while intoxicated on fentanyl or other synthetic opioids with needed health care and treatment services.

(2) The legislature therefore intends to address this public health issue by:

(a) Providing guidance on public outreach campaigns on the dangers of misusing or abusing fentanyl and other synthetic opioids;

(b) Compiling information for individuals who wish to decontaminate a vehicle in which fentanyl or other synthetic opioids were used; and

(c) Increasing the likelihood that individuals will seek necessary substance abuse disorder treatment by offering to connect them with treatment upon release from custody in jail.

(3) This act may be known and cited as Ivan's law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Insofar as is appropriate and practicable, when conducting any public outreach campaign on the dangers of fentanyl and other synthetic opioids, the department shall ensure that campaign materials are:

(a) Culturally appropriate;

(b) Accessible in other languages, as appropriate; and

(c) Accessible to the deaf and blind communities.

(2) When designing public outreach campaigns on the dangers of fentanyl and other synthetic opioids, the department shall consider using the phrase, "Not Even Once" where appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, in consultation with the department of health and the Washington poison center, shall compile resources on how to decontaminate motor vehicles of fentanyl residue or other synthetic opioid residue in certain vehicles.

(2) Beginning January 1, 2025, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall make the materials available to law enforcement agencies throughout the state for the purpose of providing the materials to individuals who recover a stolen vehicle or purchase a vehicle seized by a law enforcement agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 70.48 RCW to read as follows:

When a jail releases any individual from custody, it must provide the individual with information regarding the availability of substance use disorder treatment programs relating to addictions to fentanyl and other synthetic opioids, including assessment and services available under RCW 10.31.110 or another program or entity responsible for receiving referrals, such as the recovery navigator program established under RCW 71.24.115.

--- END ---