BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 74.08A.210 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 36 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In order to prevent some families from developing dependency on temporary assistance for needy families, the department shall make available to qualifying applicants a diversion program designed to provide brief, emergency assistance for families in crisis whose income and assets would otherwise qualify them for temporary assistance for needy families.

(2) Diversion assistance may include cash or vouchers in payment for the following needs:

(a) Child care;

(b) Housing assistance;

(c) Transportation-related expenses;

(d) Food;

(e) Medical costs for the recipient's immediate family;

(f) Employment-related expenses which are necessary to keep or obtain paid unsubsidized employment.

(3) Diversion assistance is available once in each ((twelve-month))12-month period for each adult applicant. Recipients of diversion assistance are not included in the temporary assistance for needy families program.

(4) Diversion assistance may not exceed ((one thousand five hundred dollars))$2,000 for each instance.

(5) To be eligible for diversion assistance, a family must otherwise be eligible for temporary assistance for needy families.

(6) Families ineligible for temporary assistance for needy families ((or benefits under RCW 74.62.030)) due to sanction, noncompliance, the lump sum income rule, or any other reason are not eligible for diversion assistance.

(7) Families must provide evidence showing that a bona fide need exists according to subsection (2) of this section in order to be eligible for diversion assistance.

An adult applicant may receive diversion assistance of any type no more than once per ((twelve-month))12-month period. If the recipient of diversion assistance is placed on the temporary assistance for needy families program within ((twelve))12 months of receiving diversion assistance, the prorated dollar value of the assistance shall be treated as a loan from the state, and recovered by deduction from the recipient's cash grant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. Section 1 of this act takes effect January 1, 2025.

--- END ---