BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the student achievement council shall select a private, not-for-profit four-year institution as defined in RCW 28B.07.020(4) with a main campus located in Yakima county and who serves rural or underserved communities to participate in a pilot program to offer college in the high school courses at no cost to the students enrolling in the courses.

(2) The student achievement council shall distribute funds to the pilot institution at a rate of $300 per student, up to a maximum of $6,000 per college in the high school course administered by the pilot institution.

(3) College in the high school courses shall not include content or instruction that would subject students to religious behavior or conduct by the pilot institution or its faculty.

(4)(a) The pilot institution shall provide the following information to the student achievement council by November 1, 2025, and annually thereafter:

(i) College in the high school courses offered, including:

(A) The name of each course;

(B) The number of courses offered;

(C) The specific locations where the courses are taught; and

(D) Student enrollment information disaggregated by school districts and high schools;

(ii) Data on college in the high school student demographics;

(iii) Awards of postsecondary credit at the pilot institution; and

(iv) The academic performance of students taking the offered college in the high school courses.

(b) The student achievement council shall compile the information provided in (a) of this subsection and provide a report to the legislature by December 1, 2025, and annually thereafter, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036.

(5) As used in this section:

(a) "Course" means a class taught under a contract between an institution and a single high school teacher on an articulated subject in which the student is eligible to receive college credit.

(b) "High school" means a public school, as defined in RCW 28A.150.010, that serves students in any of grades nine through 12.

(6) This section expires December 31, 2030.

--- END ---