BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall establish and administer a grant program to provide assistance to school districts for the personnel and other costs associated with applying for grants funded by the state of Washington and grants from other public or private sources for which the school district may be eligible.

(2) In awarding grants under this section, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall prioritize school districts with smaller student enrollments, tax bases, and operating budgets, and other factors that may preclude or otherwise limit the ability of a school district to apply for grants for which it may be eligible.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "school districts" include school districts, charter schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW, and state-tribal education compact schools subject to chapter 28A.715 RCW.

(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may adopt and revise rules as necessary to implement this section.

--- END ---