BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 2.28.210 and 2021 c 215 s 88 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Before granting an order under any of the following titles of the laws of the state of Washington, the court may consult the judicial information system or any related databases, if available, to determine criminal history or the pendency of other proceedings involving the parties:

(a) Granting any temporary or final order establishing a parenting plan or residential schedule or directing residential placement of a child or restraining or limiting a party's contact with a child under Title 26 RCW;

(b) Granting any order regarding a vulnerable child or adult or alleged incapacitated person irrespective of the title or where contained in the laws of the state of Washington;

(c) Granting letters of guardianship or administration or letters testamentary under Title 11 RCW;

(d) ((Granting any relief under Title 71 RCW;

(e))) Granting any relief in a juvenile proceeding under Title 13 RCW; or

(((f)))(e) Granting any order of protection, temporary order of protection, or criminal no-contact order under chapter 7.105, 9A.46, 10.99, or 26.52 RCW.

(2) Before granting any relief under chapter 71.05 RCW, the court shall consult the judicial information system or any related databases, if available, to determine the party's criminal history, prior civil commitments under chapter 71.05 RCW, or pendency of other proceedings involving the party.

(3) In the event that the court consults such a database, the court shall disclose that fact to the parties and shall disclose any particular matters relied upon by the court in rendering the decision. Upon request of a party, a copy of the document relied upon must be filed, as a confidential document, within the court file, with any confidential contact information such as addresses, phone numbers, or other information that might disclose the location or whereabouts of any person redacted from the document or documents.

Sec. 2. RCW 71.05.150 and 2023 c 433 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a designated crisis responder receives information alleging that a person, as a result of a behavioral health disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled, the designated crisis responder may, after investigation and evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the reliability and credibility of any person providing information to initiate detention, if satisfied that the allegations are true and that the person will not voluntarily seek appropriate treatment, file a petition for initial detention under this section. Before filing the petition, the designated crisis responder must personally interview the person, unless the person refuses an interview, and determine whether the person will voluntarily receive appropriate evaluation and treatment at an evaluation and treatment facility, crisis stabilization unit, 23-hour crisis relief center, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program. If the person has a past history of not following through with voluntary evaluation and treatment plans or prematurely discontinuing voluntary treatment, there is a presumption that the patient will not in good faith voluntarily seek appropriate treatment. If a designated crisis responder makes a determination not to detain a person on the basis that the person will voluntarily seek appropriate treatment, the designated crisis responder must document the reasons the designated crisis responder determined that the person in good faith will voluntarily seek appropriate evaluation and treatment. As part of the assessment, the designated crisis responder must attempt to ascertain if the person has executed a mental health advance directive under chapter 71.32 RCW. The interview performed by the designated crisis responder may be conducted by video provided that a licensed health care professional or professional person who can adequately and accurately assist with obtaining any necessary information is present with the person at the time of the interview.

(2)(a) A superior court judge may issue a warrant to detain a person with a behavioral health disorder to a designated evaluation and treatment facility, a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or an approved substance use disorder treatment program, for a period of not more than ((one hundred twenty))120 hours for evaluation and treatment upon request of a designated crisis responder, subject to (d) of this subsection, whenever it appears to the satisfaction of the judge that:

(i) There is probable cause to support the petition; and

(ii) The person has refused or failed to accept appropriate evaluation and treatment voluntarily.

(b) The petition for initial detention, signed under penalty of perjury, or sworn telephonic testimony may be considered by the court in determining whether there are sufficient grounds for issuing the order.

(c) The order shall designate retained counsel or, if counsel is appointed from a list provided by the court, the name, business address, and telephone number of the attorney appointed to represent the person.

(d) A court may not issue an order to detain a person to a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program unless there is an available secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program that has adequate space for the person.

(e) If the court does not issue an order to detain a person pursuant to this subsection (2), the court shall issue an order to dismiss the initial petition.

(3) The designated crisis responder shall then serve or cause to be served on such person and his or her guardian, if any, a copy of the order together with a notice of rights, and a petition for initial detention. After service on such person the designated crisis responder shall file the return of service in court and provide copies of all papers in the court file to the evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, and the designated attorney. The designated crisis responder shall notify the court and the prosecuting attorney that a probable cause hearing will be held within ((one hundred twenty))120 hours of the date and time of outpatient evaluation or admission to the evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program. The person shall be permitted to be accompanied by one or more of his or her relatives, friends, an attorney, a personal physician, or other professional or religious advisor to the place of evaluation. An attorney accompanying the person to the place of evaluation shall be permitted to be present during the admission evaluation. Any other individual accompanying the person may be present during the admission evaluation. The facility may exclude the individual if his or her presence would present a safety risk, delay the proceedings, or otherwise interfere with the evaluation.

(4) The designated crisis responder may notify a peace officer to take such person or cause such person to be taken into custody and placed in an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program. At the time such person is taken into custody there shall commence to be served on such person, his or her guardian, and conservator, if any, a copy of the original order together with a notice of rights and a petition for initial detention.

(5) Tribal court orders for involuntary commitment shall be recognized and enforced in accordance with superior court civil rule 82.5.

(6) In any investigation and evaluation of an individual under this section or RCW 71.05.153 in which the designated crisis responder knows, or has reason to know, that the individual is an American Indian or Alaska Native who receives medical or behavioral health services from a tribe within this state, the designated crisis responder shall notify the tribe and Indian health care provider regarding whether or not a petition for initial detention or involuntary outpatient treatment will be filed. Notification shall be made in person or by telephonic or electronic communication to the tribal contact listed in the authority's tribal crisis coordination plan as soon as possible but no later than three hours subject to the requirements in RCW 70.02.230 (2)(ee) and (3). A designated crisis responder may restrict the release of information as necessary to comply with 42 C.F.R. Part 2.

Sec. 3. RCW 71.05.150 and 2023 c 433 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) When a designated crisis responder receives information alleging that a person, as a result of a behavioral health disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled, the designated crisis responder may, after investigation and evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the reliability and credibility of any person providing information to initiate detention, if satisfied that the allegations are true and that the person will not voluntarily seek appropriate treatment, file a petition for initial detention under this section. Before filing the petition, the designated crisis responder must personally interview the person, unless the person refuses an interview, and determine whether the person will voluntarily receive appropriate evaluation and treatment at an evaluation and treatment facility, crisis stabilization unit, 23-hour crisis relief center, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program. If the person has a past history of not following through with voluntary evaluation and treatment plans or prematurely discontinuing voluntary treatment, there is a presumption that the patient will not in good faith voluntarily seek appropriate treatment. If a designated crisis responder makes a determination not to detain a person on the basis that the person will voluntarily seek appropriate treatment, the designated crisis responder must document the reasons the designated crisis responder determined that the person in good faith will voluntarily seek appropriate evaluation and treatment. As part of the assessment, the designated crisis responder must attempt to ascertain if the person has executed a mental health advance directive under chapter 71.32 RCW. The interview performed by the designated crisis responder may be conducted by video provided that a licensed health care professional or professional person who can adequately and accurately assist with obtaining any necessary information is present with the person at the time of the interview.

(2)(a) A superior court judge may issue a warrant to detain a person with a behavioral health disorder to a designated evaluation and treatment facility, a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or an approved substance use disorder treatment program, for a period of not more than ((one hundred twenty))120 hours for evaluation and treatment upon request of a designated crisis responder whenever it appears to the satisfaction of the judge that:

(i) There is probable cause to support the petition; and

(ii) The person has refused or failed to accept appropriate evaluation and treatment voluntarily.

(b) The petition for initial detention, signed under penalty of perjury, or sworn telephonic testimony may be considered by the court in determining whether there are sufficient grounds for issuing the order.

(c) The order shall designate retained counsel or, if counsel is appointed from a list provided by the court, the name, business address, and telephone number of the attorney appointed to represent the person.

(d) If the court does not issue an order to detain a person pursuant to this subsection (2), the court shall issue an order to dismiss the initial petition.

(3) The designated crisis responder shall then serve or cause to be served on such person and his or her guardian, if any, a copy of the order together with a notice of rights, and a petition for initial detention. After service on such person the designated crisis responder shall file the return of service in court and provide copies of all papers in the court file to the evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, and the designated attorney. The designated crisis responder shall notify the court and the prosecuting attorney that a probable cause hearing will be held within ((one hundred twenty))120 hours of the date and time of outpatient evaluation or admission to the evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program. The person shall be permitted to be accompanied by one or more of his or her relatives, friends, an attorney, a personal physician, or other professional or religious advisor to the place of evaluation. An attorney accompanying the person to the place of evaluation shall be permitted to be present during the admission evaluation. Any other individual accompanying the person may be present during the admission evaluation. The facility may exclude the individual if his or her presence would present a safety risk, delay the proceedings, or otherwise interfere with the evaluation.

(4) The designated crisis responder may notify a peace officer to take such person or cause such person to be taken into custody and placed in an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program. At the time such person is taken into custody there shall commence to be served on such person, his or her guardian, and conservator, if any, a copy of the original order together with a notice of rights and a petition for initial detention.

(5) Tribal court orders for involuntary commitment shall be recognized and enforced in accordance with superior court civil rule 82.5.

(6) In any investigation and evaluation of an individual under this section or RCW 71.05.153 in which the designated crisis responder knows, or has reason to know, that the individual is an American Indian or Alaska Native who receives medical or behavioral health services from a tribe within this state, the designated crisis responder shall notify the tribe and Indian health care provider regarding whether or not a petition for initial detention or involuntary outpatient treatment will be filed. Notification shall be made in person or by telephonic or electronic communication to the tribal contact listed in the authority's tribal crisis coordination plan as soon as possible but no later than three hours subject to the requirements in RCW 70.02.230 (2)(ee) and (3). A designated crisis responder may restrict the release of information as necessary to comply with 42 C.F.R. Part 2.

Sec. 4. RCW 71.05.240 and 2022 c 210 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If a petition is filed for up to 14 days of involuntary treatment, 90 days of less restrictive alternative treatment, or 18 months of less restrictive alternative treatment under RCW 71.05.148, the court shall hold a probable cause hearing within 120 hours of the initial detention under RCW 71.05.180, or at a time scheduled under RCW 71.05.148.

(2) If the petition is for mental health treatment, the court or the prosecutor at the time of the probable cause hearing and before an order of commitment is entered shall inform the person both orally and in writing that the failure to make a good faith effort to seek voluntary treatment as provided in RCW 71.05.230 will result in the loss of his or her firearm rights if the person is subsequently detained for involuntary treatment under this section. The respondent or the respondent's counsel may waive in writing the notice required under this section if the respondent waives the respondent's presence at or before the time of the probable cause hearing.

(3) If the person or his or her attorney alleges, prior to the commencement of the hearing, that the person has in good faith volunteered for treatment, the petitioner must show, by preponderance of the evidence, that the person has not in good faith volunteered for appropriate treatment. In order to qualify as a good faith volunteer, the person must abide by procedures and a treatment plan as prescribed by a treatment facility and professional staff.

(4)(a) Subject to (b) of this subsection, at the conclusion of the probable cause hearing, if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that a person detained for behavioral health treatment, as the result of a behavioral health disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm, or is gravely disabled, and, after considering less restrictive alternatives to involuntary detention and treatment, finds that no such alternatives are in the best interests of such person or others, the court shall order that such person be detained for involuntary treatment not to exceed 14 days in a facility licensed or certified to provide treatment by the department or under RCW 71.05.745.

(b) A court may only order commitment to a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program if there is an available facility with adequate space for the person.

(c) At the conclusion of the probable cause hearing, if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that a person detained for behavioral health treatment, as the result of a behavioral health disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled, but that treatment in a less restrictive setting than detention is in the best interest of such person or others, the court shall order an appropriate less restrictive alternative course of treatment for up to ((ninety))90 days.

(d) If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that a person subject to a petition under RCW 71.05.148, as the result of a behavioral health disorder, is in need of assisted outpatient treatment, the court shall order an appropriate less restrictive alternative course of treatment for up to 18 months.

(5) An order for less restrictive alternative treatment must name the behavioral health service provider responsible for identifying the services the person will receive in accordance with RCW 71.05.585, and must include a requirement that the person cooperate with the treatment recommendations of the behavioral health service provider.

(6) The court shall notify the person orally and in writing that if involuntary treatment is sought beyond the 14-day inpatient or 90-day less restrictive treatment period, the person has the right to a full hearing or jury trial under RCW 71.05.310. If the commitment is for mental health treatment, the court shall notify the person orally and in writing that the person is barred from the possession of firearms and that the prohibition remains in effect until a court restores his or her right to possess a firearm under RCW 9.41.047.

(7) If the court does not issue an order to detain or commit a person under this section, the court shall issue an order to dismiss the petition.

(8) Nothing in this section precludes the court from subsequently modifying the terms of an order for less restrictive alternative treatment under RCW 71.05.590(3).

Sec. 5. RCW 71.05.240 and 2022 c 210 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If a petition is filed for up to 14 days of involuntary treatment, 90 days of less restrictive alternative treatment, or 18 months of less restrictive alternative treatment under RCW 71.05.148, the court shall hold a probable cause hearing within 120 hours of the initial detention under RCW 71.05.180, or at a time scheduled under RCW 71.05.148.

(2) If the petition is for mental health treatment, the court or the prosecutor at the time of the probable cause hearing and before an order of commitment is entered shall inform the person both orally and in writing that the failure to make a good faith effort to seek voluntary treatment as provided in RCW 71.05.230 will result in the loss of his or her firearm rights if the person is subsequently detained for involuntary treatment under this section. The respondent or the respondent's counsel may waive in writing the notice required under this section if the respondent waives the respondent's presence at or before the time of the probable cause hearing.

(3) If the person or his or her attorney alleges, prior to the commencement of the hearing, that the person has in good faith volunteered for treatment, the petitioner must show, by preponderance of the evidence, that the person has not in good faith volunteered for appropriate treatment. In order to qualify as a good faith volunteer, the person must abide by procedures and a treatment plan as prescribed by a treatment facility and professional staff.

(4)(a) At the conclusion of the probable cause hearing, if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that a person detained for behavioral health treatment, as the result of a behavioral health disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm, or is gravely disabled, and, after considering less restrictive alternatives to involuntary detention and treatment, finds that no such alternatives are in the best interests of such person or others, the court shall order that such person be detained for involuntary treatment not to exceed ((fourteen))14 days in a facility licensed or certified to provide treatment by the department or under RCW 71.05.745.

(b) At the conclusion of the probable cause hearing, if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that a person detained for behavioral health treatment, as the result of a behavioral health disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled, but that treatment in a less restrictive setting than detention is in the best interest of such person or others, the court shall order an appropriate less restrictive alternative course of treatment for up to ((ninety))90 days.

(c) If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that a person subject to a petition under RCW 71.05.148, as the result of a behavioral health disorder, is in need of assisted outpatient treatment, the court shall order an appropriate less restrictive alternative course of treatment for up to 18 months.

(5) An order for less restrictive alternative treatment must name the behavioral health service provider responsible for identifying the services the person will receive in accordance with RCW 71.05.585, and must include a requirement that the person cooperate with the treatment recommendations of the behavioral health service provider.

(6) The court shall notify the person orally and in writing that if involuntary treatment is sought beyond the 14-day inpatient or 90-day less restrictive treatment period, such person has the right to a full hearing or jury trial under RCW 71.05.310. If the commitment is for mental health treatment, the court shall also notify the person orally and in writing that the person is barred from the possession of firearms and that the prohibition remains in effect until a court restores his or her right to possess a firearm under RCW 9.41.047.

(7) If the court does not issue an order to detain or commit a person under this section, the court shall issue an order to dismiss the petition.

(8) Nothing in this section precludes the court from subsequently modifying the terms of an order for less restrictive alternative treatment under RCW 71.05.590(3).

Sec. 6. RCW 71.05.245 and 2022 c 210 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In making a determination of whether a person is gravely disabled, presents a likelihood of serious harm, or is in need of assisted outpatient treatment in a hearing conducted under RCW 71.05.240 or 71.05.320, the court must consider the symptoms and behavior of the respondent in light of all available evidence concerning the respondent's historical behavior.

(2) Symptoms or behavior which standing alone would not justify civil commitment may support a finding of grave disability or likelihood of serious harm, or a finding that the person is in need of assisted outpatient treatment, when: (a) Such symptoms or behavior are closely associated with symptoms or behavior which preceded and led to a past incident of involuntary hospitalization, severe deterioration, or one or more violent acts; (b) these symptoms or behavior represent a marked and concerning change in the baseline behavior of the respondent; and (c) without treatment, the continued deterioration of the respondent is probable.

(3) In making a determination of whether there is a likelihood of serious harm in a hearing conducted under RCW 71.05.240 or 71.05.320, the court shall give great weight to any evidence before the court regarding whether the person has: (a) A recent history of one or more violent acts; or (b) a recent history of one or more commitments under this chapter or its equivalent provisions under the laws of another state which were based on a likelihood of serious harm. The existence of prior violent acts or commitments under this chapter or its equivalent shall not be the sole basis for determining whether a person presents a likelihood of serious harm.

(4) Before making a determination under subsection (2) or (3) of this section, the court shall consult the judicial information system or any related databases, if available, to determine the respondent's criminal history and prior civil commitments under this chapter.

(5) For the purposes of this subsection "recent" refers to the period of time not exceeding three years prior to the current hearing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. The Washington state health care authority must contract with a peer-led organization to convene focus groups of people with lived experience of being civilly committed to make recommendations about how to make the process less traumatic and improve experiences and outcomes for patients. The focus groups should include individuals who have been civilly committed under chapter 71.05 RCW on the basis of a mental disorder and on the basis of a substance use disorder. The Washington state health care authority shall issue a report to the governor and the relevant committees of the legislature on the recommendations by December 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. The Washington state health care authority shall contract with an organization to develop a proposal for a statewide network of secure, trauma-informed transport for patients civilly committed under chapter 71.05 RCW that is provided by a nonambulance service and available in each behavioral health administrative services organization. The contracted organization must consult with people with lived experiences of receiving transport in connection with a civil commitment under chapter 71.05 RCW. The Washington state health care authority shall issue a report to the governor and the relevant committees of the legislature on the recommendations by December 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. A new section is added to chapter 71.05 RCW to read as follows:

The authority must contract with an association that represents designated crisis responders in Washington to develop and begin delivering by July 1, 2025, a training program for social workers licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who practice in an emergency department with responsibilities related to civil commitments under this chapter. The training must include instruction emphasizing standards and procedures relating to the civil commitment of persons with substance use disorders. Each hospital shall ensure that, by July 1, 2026, or within three months of hire, all social workers employed in the emergency department with responsibilities relating to civil commitments under this chapter complete the training every three years.

Sec. 10. RCW 71.05.201 and 2022 c 210 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) If a designated crisis responder decides not to detain a person for evaluation and treatment under RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153 or ((forty-eight))48 hours have elapsed since a designated crisis responder received a request for investigation and the designated crisis responder has not taken action to have the person detained, ((an immediate family member or guardian of the person, or a federally recognized Indian tribe if the person is a member of such tribe,))the following persons may petition the superior court for the person's initial detention: A family or household member of the person; a guardian or conservator of the person; a representative of a federally recognized Indian tribe if the person is a member of such a tribe; a representative of a human services provider that has provided services to the person; and any person authorized to file a petition under RCW 71.05.148.

(2) A petition under this section must be filed within ((ten))10 calendar days following the designated crisis responder investigation or the request for a designated crisis responder investigation. If more than ((ten))10 days have elapsed, ((the immediate family member, guardian, or conservator))a person authorized to file a petition under this section may request a new designated crisis responder investigation.

(3)(a) The petition must be filed in the county in which the designated crisis responder investigation occurred or was requested to occur and must be submitted on forms developed by the administrative office of the courts for this purpose. The petition must be accompanied by a sworn declaration from the petitioner, and other witnesses if desired, describing why the person should be detained for evaluation and treatment. The description of why the person should be detained may contain, but is not limited to, the information identified in RCW 71.05.212.

(b) The petition must contain:

(i) A description of the relationship between the petitioner and the person; and

(ii) The date on which an investigation was requested from the designated crisis responder.

(4) The court shall, within one judicial day, review the petition to determine whether the petition raises sufficient evidence to support the allegation. If the court so finds, it shall provide a copy of the petition to the designated crisis responder agency with an order for the agency to provide the court, within one judicial day, with a written sworn statement describing the basis for the decision not to seek initial detention and a copy of all information material to the designated crisis responder's current decision.

(5) Following the filing of the petition and before the court reaches a decision, any person, including a mental health professional, may submit a sworn declaration to the court in support of or in opposition to initial detention.

(6) The court shall dismiss the petition at any time if it finds that a designated crisis responder has filed a petition for the person's initial detention under RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153 or that the person has voluntarily accepted appropriate treatment.

(7) The court must issue a final ruling on the petition within five judicial days after it is filed. After reviewing all of the information provided to the court, the court may enter an order for initial detention if the court finds that: (a) There is probable cause to support a petition for detention; and (b) the person has refused or failed to accept appropriate evaluation and treatment voluntarily. The court shall transmit its final decision to the petitioner.

(8) If the court enters an order for initial detention, it shall provide the order to the designated crisis responder agency and issue a warrant. The designated crisis responder agency serving the jurisdiction of the court must collaborate and coordinate with law enforcement regarding apprehensions and detentions under this subsection, including sharing of information relating to risk and which would assist in locating the person. A person may not be detained to jail pursuant to a warrant issued under this subsection. An order for detention under this section should contain the advisement of rights which the person would receive if the person were detained by a designated crisis responder. An order for initial detention under this section expires ((one hundred eighty))180 days from issuance.

(9) Except as otherwise expressly stated in this chapter, all procedures must be followed as if the order had been entered under RCW 71.05.150. RCW 71.05.160 does not apply if detention was initiated under the process set forth in this section.

(10) ((For purposes of this section, "immediate family member" means a spouse, domestic partner, child, stepchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, or sibling))The definitions in the subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Family or household member" includes: Persons related by blood, marriage, domestic partnership, or adoption; persons who currently reside together or formerly resided together; and persons who have a biological or legal parent-child relationship, including stepparents and stepchildren and grandparents and grandchildren.

(b) "Human services provider" means an organization that provides behavioral health services, case management, housing and homelessness services, food or economic assistance, or other similar programs.

Sec. 11. RCW 71.05.203 and 2021 c 264 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The authority and each behavioral health administrative services organization or agency employing designated crisis responders shall publish information in an easily accessible format describing the process for ((an immediate family member, guardian, or conservator, or a federally recognized Indian tribe if the person is a member of such tribe, to))a petition for court review of a detention decision under RCW 71.05.201.

(2) A designated crisis responder or designated crisis responder agency that receives a request for investigation for possible detention under this chapter must inquire whether the request comes from ((an immediate family member, guardian, or conservator, or a federally recognized Indian tribe if the person is a member of such tribe, who would be))a person who is eligible to petition under RCW 71.05.201. If the designated crisis responder decides not to detain the person for evaluation and treatment under RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153 or ((forty-eight))48 hours have elapsed since the request for investigation was received and the designated crisis responder has not taken action to have the person detained, the designated crisis responder or designated crisis responder agency must inform the ((immediate family member, guardian, or conservator, or a federally recognized Indian tribe if the person is a member of such tribe,))eligible petitioner who made the request for investigation about the process to petition for court review under RCW 71.05.201 and, to the extent feasible, provide the ((immediate family member, guardian, or conservator, or a federally recognized Indian tribe if the person is a member of such tribe,))eligible petitioner with written or electronic information about the petition process. Information provided to a federally recognized Indian tribe shall be sent to the tribal contact listed in the authority's tribal crisis coordination plan. If provision of written or electronic information is not feasible, the designated crisis responder or designated crisis responder agency must refer the ((immediate family member, guardian, or conservator, or a federally recognized Indian tribe if the person is a member of such tribe,))eligible petitioner to a website where published information on the petition process may be accessed. The designated crisis responder or designated crisis responder agency must document the manner and date on which the information required under this subsection was provided ((to the immediate family member, guardian, or conservator, or a federally recognized Indian tribe if the person is a member of such tribe)).

(3) A designated crisis responder or designated crisis responder agency must, upon request, disclose the date of a designated crisis responder investigation under this chapter to an ((immediate family member, guardian, or conservator, or a federally recognized Indian tribe if the person is a member of such tribe, of a person))eligible petitioner to assist in the preparation of a petition under RCW 71.05.201.

Sec. 12. RCW 71.34.710 and 2021 c 264 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)(i) When a designated crisis responder receives information that an adolescent as a result of a behavioral health disorder presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled, has investigated the specific facts alleged and of the credibility of the person or persons providing the information, and has determined that voluntary admission for inpatient treatment is not possible, the designated crisis responder may take the adolescent, or cause the adolescent to be taken, into custody and transported to an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program providing inpatient treatment.

(ii) A secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program must be available and have adequate space for the adolescent.

(b)(i) If a designated crisis responder decides not to detain an adolescent for evaluation and treatment under RCW 71.34.700(2), or ((forty-eight))48 hours have elapsed since a designated crisis responder received a request for investigation and the designated crisis responder has not taken action to have the adolescent detained, ((an immediate family member or guardian or conservator of the adolescent, or a federally recognized Indian tribe if the person is a member of such tribe,))the following persons may petition the superior court for the adolescent's detention using the procedures under RCW 71.05.201 and 71.05.203((; however,)): A family or household member of the adolescent; a guardian or conservator of the adolescent; a representative of a federally recognized Indian tribe if the adolescent is a member of such a tribe; a representative of a human services provider that has provided services to the adolescent; and any person authorized to file a petition under RCW 71.05.148. However, when the court enters an order of initial detention, except as otherwise expressly stated in this chapter, all procedures must be followed as if the order has been entered under (a) of this subsection.

(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (1)(b), "family or household member" and "human services provider" have the same meanings as defined in RCW 71.05.201.

(c) The interview performed by the designated crisis responder may be conducted by video provided that a licensed health care professional or professional person who can adequately and accurately assist with obtaining any necessary information is present with the person at the time of the interview.

(2)(a) Within ((twelve))12 hours of the adolescent's arrival at the evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, the designated crisis responder shall serve or cause to be served on the adolescent a copy of the petition for initial detention, notice of initial detention, and statement of rights. The designated crisis responder shall file with the court on the next judicial day following the initial detention the original petition for initial detention, notice of initial detention, and statement of rights along with an affidavit of service. The designated crisis responder shall commence service of the petition for initial detention and notice of the initial detention on the adolescent's parent and the adolescent's attorney as soon as possible following the initial detention.

(b) The facility or program may serve the adolescent, notify the adolescent's parents and the adolescent's attorney, and file with the court on the next judicial day following the initial detention the original petition for initial detention, notice of initial detention, and statement of rights along with an affidavit of service when filing with the court at the request of the designated crisis responder.

(3)(a) At the time of initial detention, the designated crisis responder shall advise the adolescent both orally and in writing that if admitted to the evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program for inpatient treatment, a commitment hearing shall be held within ((one hundred twenty))120 hours of the adolescent's provisional acceptance to determine whether probable cause exists to commit the adolescent for further treatment.

(b) The adolescent shall be advised that he or she has a right to communicate immediately with an attorney and that he or she has a right to have an attorney appointed to represent him or her before and at the hearing if the adolescent is indigent.

(4) Subject to subsection (5) of this section, whenever the designated crisis responder petitions for detention of an adolescent under this chapter, an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program providing ((one hundred twenty))120 hour evaluation and treatment must immediately accept on a provisional basis the petition and the person. Within ((twenty-four))24 hours of the adolescent's arrival, the facility must evaluate the adolescent's condition and either admit or release the adolescent in accordance with this chapter.

(5) A designated crisis responder may not petition for detention of an adolescent to a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program unless there is a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program available and that has adequate space for the adolescent.

(6) If an adolescent is not approved for admission by the inpatient evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, the facility shall make such recommendations and referrals for further care and treatment of the adolescent as necessary.

(7) Dismissal of a commitment petition is not the appropriate remedy for a violation of the timeliness requirements of this section, based on the purpose of this chapter under RCW 71.34.010, except in the few cases where the facility staff or the designated crisis responder have totally disregarded the requirements of this section.

(8) Tribal court orders for involuntary commitment shall be recognized and enforced in accordance with superior court civil rule 82.5.

(9) In any investigation and evaluation of a juvenile under this section in which the designated crisis responder knows, or has reason to know, that the juvenile is an American Indian or Alaska Native who receives medical or behavioral health services from a tribe within this state, the designated crisis responder shall notify the tribe and the Indian health care provider regarding whether or not a petition for initial detention or involuntary outpatient treatment will be filed. Notification shall be made in person or by telephonic or electronic communication to the tribal contact listed in the authority's tribal crisis coordination plan as soon as possible but no later than three hours subject to the requirements in RCW 70.02.230 (2)(ee) and (3). A designated crisis responder may restrict the release of information as necessary to comply with 42 C.F.R. Part 2.

Sec. 13. RCW 71.34.710 and 2021 c 264 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) When a designated crisis responder receives information that an adolescent as a result of a behavioral health disorder presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled, has investigated the specific facts alleged and of the credibility of the person or persons providing the information, and has determined that voluntary admission for inpatient treatment is not possible, the designated crisis responder may take the adolescent, or cause the adolescent to be taken, into custody and transported to an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program providing inpatient treatment.

(b)(i) If a designated crisis responder decides not to detain an adolescent for evaluation and treatment under RCW 71.34.700(2), or ((forty-eight))48 hours have elapsed since a designated crisis responder received a request for investigation and the designated crisis responder has not taken action to have the adolescent detained, ((an immediate family member or guardian or conservator of the adolescent, or a federally recognized Indian tribe if the person is a member of such tribe,))the following persons may petition the superior court for the adolescent's detention using the procedures under RCW 71.05.201 and 71.05.203((; however,)): A family or household member of the adolescent; a guardian or conservator of the adolescent; a representative of a federally recognized Indian tribe if the adolescent is a member of such a tribe; a human services provider that has provided services to the adolescent; and any person authorized to file a petition under RCW 71.05.148. However, when the court enters an order of initial detention, except as otherwise expressly stated in this chapter, all procedures must be followed as if the order has been entered under (a) of this subsection.

(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (1)(b), "family or household member" and "human services provider" have the same meanings as defined in RCW 71.05.201.

(c) The interview performed by the designated crisis responder may be conducted by video provided that a licensed health care professional or professional person who can adequately and accurately assist with obtaining any necessary information is present with the person at the time of the interview.

(2)(a) Within ((twelve))12 hours of the adolescent's arrival at the evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, the designated crisis responder shall serve or cause to be served on the adolescent a copy of the petition for initial detention, notice of initial detention, and statement of rights. The designated crisis responder shall file with the court on the next judicial day following the initial detention the original petition for initial detention, notice of initial detention, and statement of rights along with an affidavit of service. The designated crisis responder shall commence service of the petition for initial detention and notice of the initial detention on the adolescent's parent and the adolescent's attorney as soon as possible following the initial detention.

(b) The facility or program may serve the adolescent, notify the adolescent's parents and the adolescent's attorney, and file with the court on the next judicial day following the initial detention the original petition for initial detention, notice of initial detention, and statement of rights along with an affidavit of service when filing with the court at the request of the designated crisis responder.

(3)(a) At the time of initial detention, the designated crisis responder shall advise the adolescent both orally and in writing that if admitted to the evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program for inpatient treatment, a commitment hearing shall be held within ((one hundred twenty))120 hours of the adolescent's provisional acceptance to determine whether probable cause exists to commit the adolescent for further treatment.

(b) The adolescent shall be advised that he or she has a right to communicate immediately with an attorney and that he or she has a right to have an attorney appointed to represent him or her before and at the hearing if the adolescent is indigent.

(4) Whenever the designated crisis responder petitions for detention of an adolescent under this chapter, an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program providing ((one hundred twenty))120 hour evaluation and treatment must immediately accept on a provisional basis the petition and the person. Within ((twenty-four))24 hours of the adolescent's arrival, the facility must evaluate the adolescent's condition and either admit or release the adolescent in accordance with this chapter.

(5) If an adolescent is not approved for admission by the inpatient evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, the facility shall make such recommendations and referrals for further care and treatment of the adolescent as necessary.

(6) Dismissal of a commitment petition is not the appropriate remedy for a violation of the timeliness requirements of this section, based on the purpose of this chapter under RCW 71.34.010, except in the few cases where the facility staff or the designated crisis responder have totally disregarded the requirements of this section.

(7) Tribal court orders for involuntary commitment shall be recognized and enforced in accordance with superior court civil rule 82.5.

(8) In any investigation and evaluation of a juvenile under this section in which the designated crisis responder knows, or has reason to know, that the juvenile is an American Indian or Alaska Native who receives medical or behavioral health services from a tribe within this state, the designated crisis responder shall notify the tribe and the Indian health care provider regarding whether or not a petition for initial detention or involuntary outpatient treatment will be filed. Notification shall be made in person or by telephonic or electronic communication to the tribal contact listed in the authority's tribal crisis coordination plan as soon as possible but no later than three hours subject to the requirements in RCW 70.02.230 (2)(ee) and (3). A designated crisis responder may restrict the release of information as necessary to comply with 42 C.F.R. Part 2.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. Sections 2, 4, and 12 of this act expire July 1, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15. Sections 3, 5, and 13 of this act take effect July 1, 2026.

--- END ---