BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 43.101.190 and 1974 ex.s. c 94 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission, or the executive director acting on its behalf, is authorized to accept, receive, disburse, and administer grants or other funds or gifts from any source, including private individuals or agencies, the federal government, and other public agencies, for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

(2) The commission may accept any money or property donated, devised, or bequeathed to it that is donated for the purpose of funding a class of the basic law enforcement academy. The commission may determine the value of any property donated, devised, or bequeathed for the purpose of recognizing basic law enforcement academy class donations in this section.

(3) To the extent feasible, the commission shall coordinate donations under subsection (2) of this section with any grant applications or any other sources of funding or gifts.

(4) The services provided by the state through the establishment and maintenance of the programs of the commission are primarily intended for the benefit of the criminal justice agencies of the counties, cities, and towns of this state. To the extent that funds available to the state under the Crime Control Act of 1973 are utilized by the commission, it is the determination of the legislature that, to the maximum extent permitted by federal law, such funds as are so utilized shall be charged against that portion of United States law enforcement assistance administration funds which the state is required to make available to units of local government pursuant to section 303(a)(2) of Part C of the Crime Control Act of 1973.

--- END ---