BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 44.90 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The following activities conducted by or on behalf of legislative employees related to collective bargaining under this chapter are exempt from the restrictions contained in RCW 42.52.020 and 42.52.160:

(a) Lobbying conducted by an employee organization, lobbyist, association, or third party on behalf of legislative employees concerning legislation that directly impacts legislative workplace conditions;

(b) Communication with a prospective employee organization during nonwork hours and without the use of public resources; or

(c) Conducting the day-to-day work of organizing and representing legislative employees in the workplace while serving in a legislative employee organization leadership position.

(2)(a) Nothing in this section affects the application of the prohibition against the use of special privileges under RCW 42.52.070, confidentiality requirements under RCW 42.52.050, or other applicable provisions of chapter 42.52 RCW to legislative employees.

(b) Nothing in this section permits any direct lobbying by a legislative employee.

(3) As used in this section, "lobby" and "lobbyist" have the meanings provided in RCW 42.17A.005.

Sec. 2. RCW 42.52.020 and 1996 c 213 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No state officer or state employee may have an interest, financial or otherwise, direct or indirect, or engage in a business or transaction or professional activity, or incur an obligation of any nature, that is in conflict with the proper discharge of the state officer's or state employee's official duties.

(2) This section does not apply to activities conducted by legislative employees authorized under section 1 of this act.

Sec. 3. RCW 42.52.160 and 2023 c 91 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No state officer or state employee may employ or use any person, money, or property under the officer's or employee's official control or direction, or in his or her official custody, for the private benefit or gain of the officer, employee, or another.

(2) This section does not prohibit the use of public resources to benefit others as part of a state officer's or state employee's official duties. It is not a violation of this section for a legislator or an appropriate legislative staff designee to engage in activities listed under RCW 42.52.070(2) or 42.52.822.

(3) This section does not prohibit de minimis use of state facilities to provide employees with information about (a) medical, surgical, and hospital care; (b) life insurance or accident and health disability insurance; or (c) individual retirement accounts, by any person, firm, or corporation administering such program as part of authorized payroll deductions pursuant to RCW 41.04.020.

(4) The appropriate ethics boards may adopt rules providing exceptions to this section for occasional use of the state officer or state employee, of de minimis cost and value, if the activity does not result in interference with the proper performance of public duties.

(5) This section does not apply to activities conducted by legislative employees authorized under section 1 of this act.

--- END ---