BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The Washington state department of transportation may develop an automated highway speed safety camera pilot program to test two to three automated traffic safety cameras on state highways. The goals of the automated highway speed safety camera pilot program are to test speed camera technology, determine the impact on speeding behavior in areas of testing, and compile public response to the use of traffic safety cameras on highways.

(2) The department of transportation must work with the Washington state patrol and the traffic safety commission to develop the pilot program including, but not limited to:

(a) Selection of technology;

(b) Placement of cameras in high speed, collision, or fatality locations;

(c) Establishment of public notification and warning signs prior to entering into an area with a speed safety camera;

(d) Outreach and public engagement about the program and site selection process; and

(e) Development and implementation of a process to collect and report relevant pilot program data, including rates of speed prior to, during, and after the use of speed safety cameras, and public response to pilot program cameras.

(3) Automated traffic safety cameras may only take pictures of the vehicle and the vehicle license plates.

(4) Ticketing of violators using vehicle speed information captured by automated traffic safety cameras authorized under the pilot program is prohibited during the pilot program.

(5) The department of transportation may inform registered vehicle owners of a vehicle's rate of speed exceeding the posted speed limit and the amount of the fine the law would have allowed to be imposed by providing notification by mail.

(6) The department of transportation shall provide a pilot program progress report to the governor and transportation committees of the legislature by September 30, 2024, to include a summary of public input on the use of safety cameras, including objections, evaluation of technologies used, and changes in speeding behavior.

(7) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all photographs, microphotographs, or electronic images, or any other personally identifying data prepared under this section, are for the exclusive use of the Washington state patrol and department of transportation in the discharge of duties under this section and are not open to the public and may not be used in court in a pending action or proceeding.

(8) This section expires July 1, 2025.

--- END ---