BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The legislature finds that on the weekend of January 26, 2024, several establishments in Seattle, including several LGBTQ bars and clubs, experienced enforcement activity in a manner causing alarm for patrons and staff. While there were no citations, violations of a lewd conduct rule were noted for levels of exposure. The legislature finds that those levels of exposure and the conduct occurring would not be considered lewd conduct in most public settings even where minors are allowed. The legislature intends to require the rules of the liquor and cannabis board regarding clothing and attire worn by licensees, employees, patrons, or other persons at liquor licensed establishments, and the sexually oriented conduct of liquor licensees, employees, patrons, or other persons at liquor licensed establishments, to be updated to not be more restrictive in liquor licensed establishments than the applicable legal standard for indecent exposure in outdoor public settings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The liquor and cannabis board shall update and replace rules in WAC 314-11-050 related to clothing and attire worn by liquor licensees, employees, patrons, and other persons at liquor licensed establishments, and the conduct and acts of licensees, employees, patrons, or other persons at liquor licensed establishments. Rules may not be more restrictive regarding clothing and attire or conduct and acts at liquor licensed establishments, relative to the legal standard in RCW 9A.88.010 for indecent exposure, as it applies in other public settings such as swimming pools and public parks.

--- END ---