BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 1.04.010 and 1951 c 5 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The ninety-one titles with chapters and sections designated as the "Revised Code of Washington" and attested by the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives of the legislature of the state of Washington, are hereby enacted and designated as the "Revised Code of Washington." Said code is intended to embrace in a revised, consolidated, and codified form and arrangement all the laws of the state of a general and permanent nature.

--- END ---