BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.58.320 and 1993 c 240 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A metropolitan municipal corporation shall have power to
acquire by purchase and condemnation all lands and property rights,
both within and without ((the metropolitan area, which are necessary
for its purposes)) its component county boundaries which are necessary
for its purposes, subject to the provisions under subsection (2) of
this section. Such right of eminent domain shall be exercised by the
metropolitan council in the same manner and by the same procedure as is
or may be provided by law for cities, except insofar as such laws may
be inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.
(2) A metropolitan municipal corporation that has not initiated
review under chapter 43.21C RCW for an essential public facility as of
December 31, 2003, shall not condemn lands for an essential public
facility, provided for in RCW 36.70A.200, at a location outside its
component county boundaries without first completing the city or county
siting process for an essential public facility where the proposed
facility is to be located, consistent with RCW 36.70A.200.

--- END ---