BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.44.115 and 1998 c 221 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Intimate areas" means any portion of a person's body or
undergarments that is covered by clothing and intended to be protected
from public view;
(b) "Photographs" or "films" means the making of a photograph,
motion picture film, digital image, videotape, or any other recording
or transmission of the image of a person;
(((b))) (c) "Place where he or she would have a reasonable
expectation of privacy" means:
(i) A place where a reasonable person would believe that he or she
could disrobe in privacy, without being concerned that his or her
undressing was being photographed or filmed by another; or
(ii) A place where one may reasonably expect to be safe from casual
or hostile intrusion or surveillance;
(((c))) (d) "Surveillance" means secret observation of the
activities of another person for the purpose of spying upon and
invading the privacy of the person;
(((d))) (e) "Views" means the intentional looking upon of another
person for more than a brief period of time, in other than a casual or
cursory manner, with the unaided eye or with a device designed or
intended to improve visual acuity.
(2)(a) A person commits the crime of voyeurism in the first degree
if, for the purpose, whether private or commercial, of arousing or
gratifying the sexual desire of any person, he or she knowingly views,
photographs, or films another person, without that person's knowledge
and consent, while the person being viewed, photographed, or filmed is
in a place where he or she would have a reasonable expectation of
privacy.
(b) A person commits the crime of voyeurism in the second degree
if, under circumstances not constituting voyeurism in the first degree,
for the purpose, whether private or commercial, of arousing or
gratifying the sexual desire of any person, he or she knowingly views,
photographs, or films the intimate areas of another person without that
person's knowledge and consent and under circumstances where the person
has a reasonable expectation of privacy, whether in a public or private
place.
(3)(a) Voyeurism in the first degree is a class C felony.
(b) Voyeurism in the second degree is a gross misdemeanor, unless
the person who commits the crime of voyeurism in the second degree has
previously been convicted under this section or of a sex offense as
defined in RCW 9.94A.030, in which case voyeurism in the second degree
is a class C felony.
(4) This section does not apply to viewing, photographing, or
filming by personnel of the department of corrections or of a local
jail or correctional facility for security purposes or during
investigation of alleged misconduct by a person in the custody of the
department of corrections or the local jail or correctional facility.
(5) If a person is convicted of a violation of this section, the
court may order the destruction of any photograph, motion picture film,
digital image, videotape, or any other recording of an image that was
made by the person in violation of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9A.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person who distributes, disseminates, or otherwise discloses
any photograph, motion picture film, digital image, videotape, or any
other recording that the person knows was made or acquired in violation
of RCW 9A.44.115(2)(a) is guilty of a class C felony.
(2) A person who distributes, disseminates, or otherwise discloses
any photograph, motion picture film, digital image, videotape, or any
other recording that the person knows was made or acquired in violation
of RCW 9A.44.115(2)(b) is guilty of a gross misdemeanor, unless the
person has previously been convicted under this section, under RCW
9A.44.115, or of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, in which
case the person is guilty of a class C felony.

Sec. 3 RCW 9A.04.080 and 1998 c 221 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Prosecutions for criminal offenses shall not be commenced after
the periods prescribed in this section.
(a) The following offenses may be prosecuted at any time after
their commission:
(i) Murder;
(ii) Homicide by abuse;
(iii) Arson if a death results;
(iv) Vehicular homicide;
(v) Vehicular assault if a death results;
(vi) Hit-and-run injury-accident if a death results (RCW
46.52.020(4)).
(b) The following offenses shall not be prosecuted more than ten
years after their commission:
(i) Any felony committed by a public officer if the commission is
in connection with the duties of his or her office or constitutes a
breach of his or her public duty or a violation of the oath of office;
(ii) Arson if no death results; or
(iii) Violations of RCW 9A.44.040 or 9A.44.050 if the rape is
reported to a law enforcement agency within one year of its commission;
except that if the victim is under fourteen years of age when the rape
is committed and the rape is reported to a law enforcement agency
within one year of its commission, the violation may be prosecuted up
to three years after the victim's eighteenth birthday or up to ten
years after the rape's commission, whichever is later. If a violation
of RCW 9A.44.040 or 9A.44.050 is not reported within one year, the rape
may not be prosecuted: (A) More than three years after its commission
if the violation was committed against a victim fourteen years of age
or older; or (B) more than three years after the victim's eighteenth
birthday or more than seven years after the rape's commission,
whichever is later, if the violation was committed against a victim
under fourteen years of age.
(c) Violations of the following statutes shall not be prosecuted
more than three years after the victim's eighteenth birthday or more
than seven years after their commission, whichever is later: RCW
9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, 9A.44.070, 9A.44.080,
9A.44.100(1)(b), or 9A.64.020.
(d) The following offenses shall not be prosecuted more than six
years after their commission: Violations of RCW 9A.82.060 or
9A.82.080.
(e) The following offenses shall not be prosecuted more than five
years after their commission: Any class C felony under chapter 74.09,
82.36, or 82.38 RCW.
(f) Bigamy shall not be prosecuted more than three years after the
time specified in RCW 9A.64.010.
(g) A violation of RCW 9A.56.030 must not be prosecuted more than
three years after the discovery of the offense when the victim is a tax
exempt corporation under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3).
(h) No other felony may be prosecuted more than three years after
its commission; except that in a prosecution under RCW 9A.44.115(2)(a),
if the person who was viewed, photographed, or filmed did not realize
at the time that he or she was being viewed, photographed, or filmed,
the prosecution must be commenced within two years of the time the
person who was viewed or in the photograph or film first learns that he
or she was viewed, photographed, or filmed, or within three years after
the commission of the offense, whichever is later.
(i) No gross misdemeanor may be prosecuted more than two years
after its commission; except that in a prosecution under RCW
9A.44.115(2)(b), if the person who was viewed, photographed, or filmed
did not realize at the time that he or she was being viewed,
photographed, or filmed, the prosecution must be commenced within one
year of the time the person who was viewed or in the photograph or film
first learns that he or she was viewed, photographed, or filmed, or
within two years after the commission of the offense, whichever is
later.
(j) No misdemeanor may be prosecuted more than one year after its
commission.
(2) The periods of limitation prescribed in subsection (1) of this
section do not run during any time when the person charged is not
usually and publicly resident within this state.
(3) If, before the end of a period of limitation prescribed in
subsection (1) of this section, an indictment has been found or a
complaint or an information has been filed, and the indictment,
complaint, or information is set aside, then the period of limitation
is extended by a period equal to the length of time from the finding or
filing to the setting aside.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.43.754 and 2002 c 289 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every adult or juvenile individual convicted of a felony,
stalking under RCW 9A.46.110, harassment under RCW 9A.46.020,
communicating with a minor for immoral purposes under RCW 9.68A.090,
voyeurism in the second degree under RCW 9A.44.115, or adjudicated
guilty of an equivalent juvenile offense must have a biological sample
collected for purposes of DNA identification analysis in the following
manner:
(a) For persons convicted of such offenses or adjudicated guilty of
an equivalent juvenile offense who do not serve a term of confinement
in a department of corrections facility, and do serve a term of
confinement in a city or county jail facility, the city or county shall
be responsible for obtaining the biological samples either as part of
the intake process into the city or county jail or detention facility
for those persons convicted on or after July 1, 2002, or within a
reasonable time after July 1, 2002, for those persons incarcerated
before July 1, 2002, who have not yet had a biological sample
collected, beginning with those persons who will be released the
soonest.
(b) For persons convicted of such offenses or adjudicated guilty of
an equivalent juvenile offense who do not serve a term of confinement
in a department of corrections facility, and do not serve a term of
confinement in a city or county jail facility, the local police
department or sheriff's office is responsible for obtaining the
biological samples after sentencing on or after July 1, 2002.
(c) For persons convicted of such offenses or adjudicated guilty of
an equivalent juvenile offense, who are serving or who are to serve a
term of confinement in a department of corrections facility or a
department of social and health services facility, the facility holding
the person shall be responsible for obtaining the biological samples
either as part of the intake process into such facility for those
persons convicted on or after July 1, 2002, or within a reasonable time
after July 1, 2002, for those persons incarcerated before July 1, 2002,
who have not yet had a biological sample collected, beginning with
those persons who will be released the soonest.
(2) Any biological sample taken pursuant to RCW 43.43.752 through
43.43.758 may be retained by the forensic laboratory services bureau,
and shall be used solely for the purpose of providing DNA or other
tests for identification analysis and prosecution of a criminal offense
or for the identification of human remains or missing persons. Nothing
in this section prohibits the submission of results derived from the
biological samples to the federal bureau of investigation combined DNA
index system.
(3) The director of the forensic laboratory services bureau of the
Washington state patrol shall perform testing on all biological samples
collected under subsection (1) of this section, to the extent allowed
by funding available for this purpose. The director shall give
priority to testing on samples collected from those adults or juveniles
convicted of a felony or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile
offense that is defined as a sex offense or a violent offense in RCW
9.94A.030.
(4) This section applies to all adults who are convicted of a sex
or violent offense after July 1, 1990; and to all adults who were
convicted of a sex or violent offense on or prior to July 1, 1990, and
who are still incarcerated on or after July 25, 1999. This section
applies to all juveniles who are adjudicated guilty of a sex or violent
offense after July 1, 1994; and to all juveniles who were adjudicated
guilty of a sex or violent offense on or prior to July 1, 1994, and who
are still incarcerated on or after July 25, 1999. This section applies
to all adults and juveniles who are convicted of a felony other than a
sex or violent offense, stalking under RCW 9A.46.110, harassment under
RCW 9A.46.020, or communicating with a minor for immoral purposes under
RCW 9.68A.090, or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile offense,
on or after July 1, 2002; and to all adults and juveniles who were
convicted or adjudicated guilty of such an offense before July 1, 2002,
and are still incarcerated on or after July 1, 2002.
(5) This section creates no rights in a third person. No cause of
action may be brought based upon the noncollection or nonanalysis or
the delayed collection or analysis of a biological sample authorized to
be taken under RCW 43.43.752 through 43.43.758.
(6) The detention, arrest, or conviction of a person based upon a
data base match or data base information is not invalidated if it is
determined that the sample was obtained or placed in the data base by
mistake, or if the conviction or juvenile adjudication that resulted in
the collection of the biological sample was subsequently vacated or
otherwise altered in any future proceeding including but not limited to
posttrial or postfact-finding motions, appeals, or collateral attacks.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---