BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Automotive mercury switch" includes a convenience switch, such
as a switch for a trunk or hood light, and a mercury switch in antilock
brake systems.
(2) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of ecology.
(4) "Health care facility" includes a hospital, nursing home,
extended care facility, long-term care facility, clinical or medical
laboratory, state or private health or mental institution, clinic, or
health maintenance organization.
(5) "Manufacturer" includes any person, firm, association,
partnership, corporation, governmental entity, organization, or joint
venture that produces a mercury-added product or an importer or
domestic
distributor of a mercury-added product produced in a foreign
country. In the case of a multicomponent product containing mercury,
the manufacturer is the last manufacturer to produce or assemble the
product. If the multicomponent product or mercury-added product is
produced in a foreign country, the manufacturer is the first importer
or domestic distributor.
(6) "Mercury-added button-cell battery" means a button-cell battery
to which the manufacturer intentionally introduces mercury for the
operation of the battery.
(7) "Mercury-added novelty" means a mercury-added product intended
mainly for personal or household enjoyment or adornment. Mercury-added
novelties include, but are not limited to, items intended for use as
practical jokes, figurines, adornments, toys, games, cards, ornaments,
yard statues and figures, candles, jewelry, holiday decorations, items
of apparel, and other similar products. Mercury-added novelty does not
include games, toys, or products that require a button-cell or lithium
battery, liquid crystal display screens, or a lamp that contains
mercury.
(8) "Mercury-added product" means a product, commodity, or
chemical, or a product with a component that contains mercury or a
mercury compound intentionally added to the product, commodity, or
chemical in order to provide a specific characteristic, appearance, or
quality, or to perform a specific function, or for any other reason.
Mercury-added products include, but are not limited to, mercury
thermometers, mercury thermostats, and mercury switches in motor
vehicles.
(9) "Mercury manometer" means a mercury-added product that is used
for measuring blood pressure.
(10) "Mercury thermometer" means a mercury-added product that is
used for measuring temperature.
(11) "Retailer" means a retailer of a mercury-added product.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Effective January 1, 2004, a
manufacturer, wholesaler, or retailer may not knowingly sell at retail
a fluorescent lamp if the fluorescent lamp contains mercury and was
manufactured after November 30, 2003, unless the fluorescent lamp is
labeled in accordance with the guidelines listed under subsection (2)
of this section. Primary responsibility for affixing labels required
under this section is on the manufacturer, and not on the wholesaler or
retailer.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a lamp is
considered labeled pursuant to subsection (1) of this section if the
lamp has all of the following:
(a) A label affixed to the lamp that displays the internationally
recognized symbol for the element mercury; and
(b) A label on the lamp's packaging that: (i) Clearly informs the
purchaser that mercury is present in the item; (ii) explains that the
fluorescent lamp should be disposed of according to applicable federal,
state, and local laws; and (iii) provides a toll-free telephone number,
and a uniform resource locator internet address to a web site, that
contains information on applicable disposal laws.
(3) The manufacturer of a mercury-added lamp is in compliance with
the requirements of this section if the manufacturer is in compliance
with the labeling requirements of another state.
(4) The provisions of this section do not apply to products
containing mercury-added lamps.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department shall develop and
implement a state plan for a permanent repository for mercury that is
certified under the federal resource conservation and recovery act.
The plan must include the identification of local jurisdictions that
are willing to host a mercury repository site.
(2) Prior to implementing the state plan for a permanent mercury
repository under subsection (1) of this section, the department shall
report to the legislature the details of the plan and the list of local
jurisdictions that are willing to host a mercury repository site.
(3) Mercury recovered after the establishment date of a permanent
repository under this section may not be sold for reuse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department of health must develop an
educational plan for schools, local governments, businesses, and the
public on the proper disposal methods for mercury and mercury-added
products.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A school may not purchase for
use in a
primary or secondary classroom bulk elemental mercury or chemical
mercury compounds. By January 1, 2004, all primary and secondary
schools in the state must remove and properly dispose of all bulk
elemental mercury, chemical mercury, and bulk mercury compounds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Effective January 1, 2004, no person may
sell, offer for sale, or distribute for sale or use in this state a
mercury-added novelty. A manufacturer of mercury-added novelties must
notify all retailers that sell the product about the provisions of this
section and how to properly dispose of any remaining mercury-added
novelty inventory.
(2)(a) Effective January 1, 2005, no person may sell, offer for
sale, or distribute for sale or use in this state a manometer used to
measure blood pressure or a thermometer that contains mercury. This
subsection (2)(a) does not apply to:
(i) An electronic thermometer with a button cell battery containing
mercury;
(ii) A thermometer that contains mercury and that is used for food
research and development or food processing, including meat, dairy
products, and pet food processing;
(iii) A thermometer that contains mercury and that is a component
of an animal agriculture climate control system or industrial
measurement system or for veterinary medicine until such a time as the
system is replaced or a nonmercury component for the system or
application is available;
(iv) A thermometer or manometer that contains mercury that is used
for calibration of other thermometers, manometers, apparatus, or
equipment, unless a nonmercury calibration standard is approved for the
application by the national institute of standards and technology;
(v) A thermometer that is provided by prescription. A manufacturer
of a mercury thermometer shall supply clear instructions on the careful
handling of the thermometer to avoid breakage and proper cleanup should
a breakage occur; or
(vi) A manometer sold or distributed to a hospital, or a health
care facility controlled by a hospital, if the hospital has adopted a
plan for mercury reduction promulgated by a state association of
hospitals that incorporates the goals of the mercury chemical action
plan developed by the department under section 302, chapter 371, Laws
of 2002.
(b) A manufacturer of thermometers that contain mercury must notify
all retailers that sell the product about the provisions of this
section and how to properly dispose of any remaining thermometer
inventory.
(3) Effective January 1, 2006, no person may sell, install, or
reinstall a commercial or residential thermostat that contains mercury
unless the manufacturer of the thermostat conducts or participates in
a thermostat recovery or recycling program designed to assist
contractors in the proper disposal of thermostats that contain mercury
in accordance with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6901, et seq., the federal resource
conservation and recovery act.
(4) No person may sell, offer for sale, or distribute for sale or
use in this state a motor vehicle manufactured after January 1, 2006,
if the motor vehicle contains an automotive mercury switch.
(5) Nothing in this section restricts the ability of a
manufacturer, importer, or domestic distributor from transporting
products through the state, or storing products in the state for later
distribution outside the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The department of general administration
must, by January 1, 2004, revise its rules, policies, and guidelines to
implement the purpose of this chapter.
(2) The department of general administration must give priority and
preference to the purchase of equipment, supplies, and other products
that contain no mercury-added compounds or components, unless: (a)
There is no economically feasible nonmercury-added alternative that
performs a similar function; or (b) the product containing mercury is
designed to reduce electricity consumption by at least forty percent
and there is no nonmercury or lower mercury alternative available that
saves the same or a greater amount of electricity as the exempted
product. In circumstances where a nonmercury-added product is not
available, preference must be given to the purchase of products that
contain the least amount of mercury added to the product necessary for
the required performance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The department
is authorized to participate
in a regional or multistate clearinghouse to assist in carrying out any
of the requirements of this chapter. A clearinghouse may also be used
for examining notification and label requirements, developing education
and outreach activities, and maintaining a list of all mercury-added
products.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A violation of this chapter is punishable by
a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars for each violation
in the case of a first violation. Repeat violators are liable for a
civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars for each repeat
violation. Penalties collected under this section must be deposited in
the state toxics control account created in RCW 70.105D.070.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Nothing in this chapter applies to
crematories as that term is defined in RCW 68.04.070.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Any fiscal impact on the department or the
department of health that results from the implementation of this
chapter must be paid for out of funds that are appropriated by the
legislature from the state toxics control account for the
implementation of the department's persistent bioaccumulative toxic
chemical strategy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Nothing in this chapter applies to
prescription drugs regulated by the food and drug administration under
the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq.),
to biological products regulated by the food and drug administration
under the public health service act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 262 et seq.), or to
any substance that may be lawfully sold over-the-counter without a
prescription under the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act (21 U.S.C.
Sec. 301 et seq.).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 12 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---