BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 81.112.100 and 1992 c 101 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An authority shall have and exercise all rights with respect to
the construction, acquisition, maintenance, operation, extension,
alteration, repair, control and management of high capacity
transportation system facilities that are identified in the system plan
developed pursuant to RCW 81.104.100 that any city, county, county
transportation authority, metropolitan municipal corporation, or public
transportation benefit area within the authority boundary has been
previously empowered to exercise and such powers shall not thereafter
be exercised by such agencies without the consent of the authority.
Nothing in this chapter shall restrict development, construction, or
operation of a personal rapid transit system by a city or county.
(2) If utility facilities must be removed or relocated as a result
of the construction, alteration, repair, or improvement of a rail fixed
guideway system as defined in RCW 81.104.015, the costs of the removal
or relocation must be included in the costs of the system and paid by
the authority. However, any additional costs associated with the
upgrade of any existing utility facility that the utility elects to
undertake must be paid by the utility. The authority and each affected
utility shall negotiate on the engineering, design, and route selection
of the system in order to minimize cost and disruption of services
related to relocation of utility facilities. For purposes of this
subsection, "utility facilities" include, but are not limited to, cable
television, gas, electric, and telecommunications facilities.
(3) If there is a dispute over costs, the costs will be submitted
to an independent auditor agreed to by the parties. That auditor will
determine if the costs were accurate and the auditor's decision will be
final. The cost of the auditor must be paid by the party requesting
the audit.
(4) An authority may adopt, in whole or in part, and may complete,
modify, or terminate any planning, environmental review, or procurement
processes related to the high capacity transportation system that had
been commenced by a joint regional policy committee or a city, county,
county transportation authority, metropolitan municipality, or public
transportation benefit area prior to the formation of the authority.

--- END ---