BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the population of
certain pods of orca whales had peaked at ninety-nine in 1995, but
since that time the number of these whales has dropped to seventy-eight
in 2001. Monitoring the status and the dynamics affecting these whales
is important because as top predators within their environment, they
act as an important indicator of the health of prey species such as
salmon. The legislature finds that the creation of an orca whale
emblem that will affix to a vehicle license plate will appeal to
citizens interested in supporting orca whale research.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any person may purchase an orca whale research emblem for
display on vehicle license plates in the manner described by the
department. The emblems shall be designed to be affixed to a vehicle
license number plate by pressure-sensitive adhesive so as not to
obscure the plate identification numbers or letters. The department,
after consulting with the Washington state patrol, shall determine
whether the emblems use fully reflectorized materials designed to
provide visibility at night.
(2) The whale museum located in Friday Harbor, Washington, shall
select the design of the orca whale research emblem.
(3) The commission shall adopt fees to be charged by the department
for emblems issued by the department under this section. The
department shall seek to establish agreements with businesses and
nonprofit organizations to conduct the sales of orca whale research
emblems. All sales by the department shall be in bulk to businesses
and nonprofit organizations for subsequent sale to the general public.
The fee for each orca whale research emblem issued under this section
shall be in an amount sufficient to offset the costs of production of
the emblems and the administration of that program by the department,
and to cover the costs incurred by the department to administer the
grant program established in section 3 of this act, not to exceed a
total fee of twenty-five dollars per emblem. The commission may adopt
rules to implement this section, including the setting of fees.
(4) The orca whale research account is created in the custody of
the state treasurer. All receipts by the department from the issuance
of orca whale research emblems under this section shall be deposited
into this account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
the costs of production of orca whale research emblems and
administration of the program by the department, with the balance used
only by the department for orca whale research in accordance with
section 3 of this act. Only the director or the director's designee
may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.300 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall administer a grant program for orca whale
research by Washington state researchers for J-K-L whalepods in the
Salish sea. Funding for the program shall come from sales of orca
whale research emblems pursuant to section 2 of this act. The
department must award research grants under this section through a
competitive request-for-proposal process. The department shall develop
and adopt policies to establish an application process for the grants,
criteria to evaluate the applications, and to monitor the activities of
grant recipients. The department may adopt rules necessary to
implement the grant program established in this section.

--- END ---