BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there has been an
increase in studies showing a correlation between exposure to violent
video and computer games and various forms of hostile and antisocial
behavior. The entertainment software industry's ratings and content
descriptors of video and computer games reflect that some video and
computer games are suitable only for adults due to graphic depictions
of sex and/or violence. Furthermore, some video and computer games
focus on violence specifically against public law enforcement officers
such as police and fire fighters. The legislature encourages retailers
and parents to utilize the rating system.
In addition, the legislature finds there is a compelling interest
to curb hostile and antisocial behavior in Washington's youth and to
foster respect for public law enforcement officers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9.91 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person who sells, rents, or permits to be sold or rented, any
video or computer game they know to be a violent video or computer game
to any minor has committed a class 1 civil infraction as provided in
RCW 7.80.120.
(2) "Minor" means a person under seventeen years of age.
(3) "Person" means a retailer engaged in the business of selling or
renting video or computer games including any individual, partnership,
corporation, or association who is subject to the tax on retailers
under RCW 82.04.250.
(4) "Violent video or computer game" means a video or computer game
that contains realistic or photographic-like depictions of aggressive
conflict in which the player kills, injures, or otherwise causes
physical harm to a human form in the game who is depicted, by dress or
other recognizable symbols, as a public law enforcement officer.

Sec. 3 RCW 7.80.120 and 1997 c 159 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person found to have committed a civil infraction shall be
assessed a monetary penalty.
(a) The maximum penalty and the default amount for a class 1 civil
infraction shall be two hundred fifty dollars, not including statutory
assessments, except for an infraction of state law involving tobacco
products as specified in RCW 70.93.060(4) and an infraction of state
law involving violent video or computer games under section 2 of this
act, in which case the maximum penalty and default amount is five
hundred dollars;
(b) The maximum penalty and the default amount for a class 2 civil
infraction shall be one hundred twenty-five dollars, not including
statutory assessments;
(c) The maximum penalty and the default amount for a class 3 civil
infraction shall be fifty dollars, not including statutory assessments;
and
(d) The maximum penalty and the default amount for a class 4 civil
infraction shall be twenty-five dollars, not including statutory
assessments.
(2) The supreme court shall prescribe by rule the conditions under
which local courts may exercise discretion in assessing fines for civil
infractions.
(3) Whenever a monetary penalty is imposed by a court under this
chapter it is immediately payable. If the person is unable to pay at
that time the court may grant an extension of the period in which the
penalty may be paid. If the penalty is not paid on or before the time
established for payment, the court may proceed to collect the penalty
in the same manner as other civil judgments and may notify the
prosecuting authority of the failure to pay.
(4) The court may also order a person found to have committed a
civil infraction to make restitution.

--- END ---