BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.34.046 and 1998 c 296 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any minor thirteen years or older voluntarily admitted to an
evaluation and treatment facility under RCW 71.34.042 may give notice
of intent to leave at any time. The notice need not follow any
specific form so long as it is written and the intent of the minor can
be discerned.
(2) The staff member receiving the notice shall date it
immediately, record its existence in the minor's clinical record, and
send copies of it to the minor's attorney, if any, the county-designated mental health professional, and the parent.
(3) The professional person shall discharge the minor, thirteen
years or older, from the facility ((upon)) by the second judicial day
following receipt of the minor's notice of intent to leave.

--- END ---