BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) It is the intent of the legislature to
encourage congruency among energy policy, technology policy, and
economic development policy in order to better serve the citizens of
Washington and to improve the economic climate and opportunities
throughout the state. This includes policies that support the
deployment of current and emerging technologies.
(2) It is further the intent of the legislature that the state
continue to support policies that produce affordable energy.
(3) It is further the intent of the legislature to work with the
utilities and transportation commission to identify performance
measures in the areas of energy and telecommunications regulation.
(4) It is further the intent of the legislature that energy and
telecommunications regulation reflect a less costly regulatory process
that can ultimately benefit the consumer, eliminate duplication of
functions, and improve government efficiency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The joint legislative audit and review
committee will conduct a performance audit of the utilities and
transportation commission focused on its responsibilities regarding
telecommunications, energy, and natural gas. The performance audit
will include, but not be limited to:
(a) An analysis of the roles and responsibilities of the commission
as outlined and prescribed in statute, regulations, and commission
rules and procedures. The joint committee may recommend changes that
should be made in the roles and responsibilities of the commission;
(b) An analysis of the commission's organizational structure and
functions and the effect of that organizational structure on the
ability of the commission to perform its duties and responsibilities.
The analysis will include information on the costs of regulatory
activities, the effects of the commission's structures and procedures
on its decision timeliness, and how the commission seeks efficiencies
in its regulatory activities. The analysis will also include a
comparison of other state commissions' organizations, structures, and
operating principles.
(2) The joint committee may contract for consulting services in
conducting this performance audit.
(3) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall modify
the scope of the audit in this section, to the extent necessary, to
limit the costs of the audit to conform to the level of funding
provided in section 3 of this act.
(4) In conducting the performance audit, the joint committee may
consult with representatives of regulated entities, with customers of
those regulated entities, and with other interested parties.
(5) A preliminary report of the performance audit must be submitted
to the appropriate legislative policy and fiscal committees by December
31, 2004, and must include the analysis of the commission's structure
and functions and a work plan for the remaining activities of the
performance audit. A final report must be submitted to the appropriate
legislative policy and fiscal committees by December 1, 2005. The
joint legislative audit and review committee may extend the report
deadlines up to one year subject to the committee's biennial work plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Beginning July 1, 2004, through December 31,
2005, every electrical, gas, and telecommunications company subject to
a fee under RCW 80.24.010 will pay to the commission a surcharge for
the purpose of conducting a performance audit of the utilities and
transportation commission by the joint legislative audit and review
committee under section 2 of this act and calculated as a percentage of
the fee paid by each company under RCW 80.24.010. The surcharge
percentage will be the same for all companies. The amount recovered by
the surcharge imposed under this section will be sufficient to cover
the cost of the performance audit conducted under section 2 of this act
but the total amount that may be recovered by the surcharge must not
exceed two hundred thousand dollars.

--- END ---