BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to any other authority to revoke driving privileges
under this chapter, the department shall revoke the driving privileges
of a juvenile in accordance with this section.
(2)(a) The department shall revoke the driving privileges of a
juvenile until the juvenile is eighteen years of age, or for one year,
whichever is longer, when the department receives notice that the
juvenile has been convicted of motor vehicle theft in the first degree
under RCW 9A.56.030 and it is the juvenile's first conviction of motor
vehicle theft under RCW 9A.56.030.
(b) The department shall revoke the driving privileges of a
juvenile until the juvenile is twenty-one years of age, or for three
years, whichever is longer, when the department receives notice that
the juvenile has been convicted of motor vehicle theft in the first
degree under RCW 9A.56.030 and it is the juvenile's second or
subsequent conviction of motor vehicle theft under RCW 9A.56.030.
(3)(a) The department shall revoke the driving privileges of a
juvenile until the juvenile is eighteen years of age, or for one year,
whichever is longer, when the department receives notice that the
juvenile has been convicted of motor vehicle theft in the second degree
under RCW 9A.56.040 and it is the juvenile's first conviction of motor
vehicle theft under RCW 9A.56.040.
(b) The department shall revoke the driving privileges of a
juvenile until the juvenile is twenty-one years of age, or for three
years, whichever is longer, when the department receives notice that
the juvenile has been convicted of motor vehicle theft in the second
degree under RCW 9A.56.040 and it is the juvenile's second or
subsequent conviction of motor vehicle theft under RCW 9A.56.040.
(4)(a) The department shall revoke the driving privileges of a
juvenile until the juvenile is eighteen years of age, or for one year,
whichever is longer, when the department receives notice that the
juvenile has been convicted of taking a motor vehicle without
permission under RCW 9A.56.070 and it is the juvenile's first
conviction under RCW 9A.56.070.
(b) The department shall revoke the driving privileges of a
juvenile until the juvenile is twenty-one years of age, or for three
years, whichever is longer, when the department receives notice that
the juvenile has been convicted of taking a motor vehicle without
permission under RCW 9A.56.070 and it is the juvenile's second or
subsequent conviction under RCW 9A.56.070.
(5) The department shall immediately reinstate driving privileges
that have been revoked under this section when the revocation period
ends.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.311 and 2001 c 325 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The department shall not suspend a driver's license or
privilege to drive a motor vehicle on the public highways for a fixed
period of more than one year, except as specifically permitted under
RCW 46.20.267, 46.20.342, section 1 of this act, or other provision of
law. Except for a suspension under RCW 46.20.267, 46.20.289,
46.20.291(5), 46.61.740, or 74.20A.320, whenever the license or driving
privilege of any person is suspended by reason of a conviction, a
finding that a traffic infraction has been committed, pursuant to
chapter 46.29 RCW, or pursuant to RCW 46.20.291 or 46.20.308, the
suspension shall remain in effect until the person gives and thereafter
maintains proof of financial responsibility for the future as provided
in chapter 46.29 RCW. If the suspension is the result of a violation
of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the department shall determine the
person's eligibility for licensing based upon the reports provided by
the alcoholism agency or probation department designated under RCW
46.61.5056 and shall deny reinstatement until enrollment and
participation in an approved program has been established and the
person is otherwise qualified. Whenever the license or driving
privilege of any person is suspended as a result of certification of
noncompliance with a child support order under chapter 74.20A RCW or a
residential or visitation order, the suspension shall remain in effect
until the person provides a release issued by the department of social
and health services stating that the person is in compliance with the
order.
(b)(i) The department shall not issue to the person a new,
duplicate, or renewal license until the person pays a reissue fee of
twenty dollars.
(ii) If the suspension is the result of a violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or is the result of administrative action under
RCW 46.20.308, the reissue fee shall be one hundred fifty dollars.
(2)(a) Any person whose license or privilege to drive a motor
vehicle on the public highways has been revoked, unless the revocation
was for a cause which has been removed, is not entitled to have the
license or privilege renewed or restored until: (i) After the
expiration of one year from the date the license or privilege to drive
was revoked; (ii) after the expiration of the applicable revocation
period provided by RCW 46.20.3101 or 46.61.5055; (iii) after the
expiration of two years for persons convicted of vehicular homicide; or
(iv) after the expiration of the applicable revocation period provided
by RCW 46.20.265 or section 1 of this act.
(b)(i) After the expiration of the appropriate period, the person
may make application for a new license as provided by law together with
a reissue fee in the amount of twenty dollars.
(ii) If the revocation is the result of a violation of RCW
46.20.308, 46.61.502, or 46.61.504, the reissue fee shall be one
hundred fifty dollars. If the revocation is the result of a violation
of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the department shall determine the
person's eligibility for licensing based upon the reports provided by
the alcoholism agency or probation department designated under RCW
46.61.5056 and shall deny reissuance of a license, permit, or privilege
to drive until enrollment and participation in an approved program has
been established and the person is otherwise qualified.
(c) Except for a revocation under RCW 46.20.265, the department
shall not then issue a new license unless it is satisfied after
investigation of the driving ability of the person that it will be safe
to grant the privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the public
highways, and until the person gives and thereafter maintains proof of
financial responsibility for the future as provided in chapter 46.29
RCW. For a revocation under RCW 46.20.265, the department shall not
issue a new license unless it is satisfied after investigation of the
driving ability of the person that it will be safe to grant that person
the privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the public highways.
(3)(a) Whenever the driver's license of any person is suspended
pursuant to Article IV of the nonresident violators compact or RCW
46.23.020 or 46.20.289 or 46.20.291(5), the department shall not issue
to the person any new or renewal license until the person pays a
reissue fee of twenty dollars.
(b) If the suspension is the result of a violation of the laws of
this or any other state, province, or other jurisdiction involving (i)
the operation or physical control of a motor vehicle upon the public
highways while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs, or
(ii) the refusal to submit to a chemical test of the driver's blood
alcohol content, the reissue fee shall be one hundred fifty dollars.

Sec. 3 RCW 9A.56.030 and 1995 c 129 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of theft in the first degree if he or she
commits theft of:
(a) Property or services which exceed(s) one thousand five hundred
dollars in value other than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010; or
(b) Property of any value other than a firearm as defined in RCW
9.41.010 taken from the person of another.
(2) Theft in the first degree is a class B felony.
(3) A juvenile convicted of motor vehicle theft in the first degree
under this section shall also have driving privileges revoked in
accordance with section 1 of this act. Upon conviction, the court
shall immediately transmit conviction data to the department of
licensing necessary for the administration of section 1 of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 9A.56.040 and 1995 c 129 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of theft in the second degree if he or she
commits theft of:
(a) Property or services which exceed(s) two hundred and fifty
dollars in value other than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010, but
does not exceed one thousand five hundred dollars in value; or
(b) A public record, writing, or instrument kept, filed, or
deposited according to law with or in the keeping of any public office
or public servant; or
(c) An access device; or
(d) A motor vehicle, of a value less than one thousand five hundred
dollars.
(2) Theft in the second degree is a class C felony.
(3) A juvenile convicted of motor vehicle theft in the second
degree under this section shall also have driving privileges revoked in
accordance with section 1 of this act. Upon conviction, the court
shall immediately transmit conviction data to the department of
licensing necessary for the administration of section 1 of this act.

Sec. 5 RCW 9A.56.070 and 2002 c 324 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A person is guilty of taking a motor vehicle without
permission in the first degree if he or she, without the permission of
the owner or person entitled to possession, intentionally takes or
drives away an automobile or motor vehicle, whether propelled by steam,
electricity, or internal combustion engine, that is the property of
another, and he or she:
(i) Alters the motor vehicle for the purpose of changing its
appearance or primary identification, including obscuring, removing, or
changing the manufacturer's serial number or the vehicle identification
number plates;
(ii) Removes, or participates in the removal of, parts from the
motor vehicle with the intent to sell the parts;
(iii) Exports, or attempts to export, the motor vehicle across
state lines or out of the United States for profit;
(iv) Intends to sell the motor vehicle; or
(v) Is engaged in a conspiracy and the central object of the
conspiratorial agreement is the theft of motor vehicles for sale to
others for profit.
(b) Taking a motor vehicle without permission in the first degree
is a class B felony.
(2)(a) A person is guilty of taking a motor vehicle without
permission in the second degree if he or she, without the permission of
the owner or person entitled to possession, intentionally takes or
drives away any automobile or motor vehicle, whether propelled by
steam, electricity, or internal combustion engine, that is the property
of another, or he or she voluntarily rides in or upon the automobile or
motor vehicle with knowledge of the fact that the automobile or motor
vehicle was unlawfully taken.
(b) Taking a motor vehicle without permission in the second degree
is a class C felony.
(3) A juvenile convicted of taking a motor vehicle without
permission in the first or second degree under this section shall also
have driving privileges revoked in accordance with section 1 of this
act. Upon conviction, the court shall immediately transmit conviction
data to the department of licensing necessary for the administration of
section 1 of this act.

--- END ---