BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.655 and 1990 c 250 s 56 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No vehicle shall be driven or moved on any public highway
unless such vehicle is so constructed or loaded as to prevent any of
its load from dropping, sifting, leaking, or otherwise escaping
therefrom, except that sand may be dropped for the purpose of securing
traction. Any person operating a vehicle from which any glass or
objects have fallen or escaped, which would constitute an obstruction
or injure a vehicle or otherwise endanger travel upon such public
highway shall immediately cause the public highway to be cleaned of all
such glass or objects and shall pay any costs therefor.
(2) No person may operate on any public highway any vehicle with
any load unless the load and such covering as required thereon by
subsection (3) of this section is securely fastened to prevent the
covering or load from becoming loose, detached, or in any manner a
hazard to other users of the highway.
(3) Any vehicle operating on a paved public highway with a load of
dirt, sand, or gravel susceptible to being dropped, spilled, leaked, or
otherwise escaping therefrom shall be covered so as to prevent
spillage. ((Covering of such loads is not required if six inches of
freeboard is maintained within the bed.))
(4) Any vehicle with deposits of mud, rocks, or other debris on the
vehicle's body, fenders, frame, undercarriage, wheels, or tires shall
be cleaned of such material before the operation of the vehicle on a
paved public highway.
(5) The state patrol may make necessary rules to carry into effect
the provisions of this section, applying such provisions to specific
conditions and loads and prescribing means, methods, and practices to
effectuate such provisions.
(6) Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit a public
maintenance vehicle from dropping sand on a highway to enhance
traction, or sprinkling water or other substances to clean or maintain
a highway.

--- END ---