BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.12.0251 and 1997 c 301 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the
use of any article of tangible personal property brought into the state
of Washington by a nonresident thereof for his or her use or enjoyment
while temporarily within the state of Washington unless such property
is used in conducting a nontransitory business activity within the
state of Washington; or in respect to the use by a nonresident of
Washington of a motor vehicle or trailer which is registered or
licensed under the laws of the state of his or her residence, and which
is not required to be registered or licensed under the laws of
Washington, including motor vehicles or trailers exempt pursuant to a
declaration issued by the department of licensing under RCW 46.85.060;
or in respect to the use of household goods, personal effects, and
private motor vehicles, not including motor homes, by a bona fide
resident of Washington, or nonresident members of the armed forces who
are stationed in Washington pursuant to military orders, if such
articles were acquired and used by such person in another state while
a bona fide resident thereof and such acquisition and use occurred more
than ninety days prior to the time he or she entered Washington; or in
respect to the use of a motor home by a bona fide resident of
Washington, or nonresident members of the armed forces who are
stationed in Washington pursuant to military orders, if the motor home
was registered or licensed by the person in another state while a bona
fide resident of that state, and the person produces specific
documentation, as determined by the department of revenue, indicating
that he or she was not a resident of Washington at any time during the
six months before bringing the motor home into Washington.
For purposes of this section, "state" means a state of the United
States, any political subdivision thereof, the District of Columbia,
and any foreign country or political subdivision thereof.

--- END ---