BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 50.32 RCW
to read as follows:
In filing an appeal, petition for hearing, petition for review, or
advisement order under this chapter, the time period shall be computed
by excluding the day of delivery or mailing of the determination,
redetermination, denial, order and notice of assessment, or decision
and including the last day. If the last day is a Saturday or Sunday or
a holiday under RCW 1.16.050, the appeal, petition for hearing,
petition for review, or advisement order must be perfected by the next
business day.

--- END ---