BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17.080 and 2002 c 75 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) On the day the treasurer is designated, each candidate or
political committee shall file with the commission and the county
auditor or elections officer of the county in which the candidate
resides, or in the case of a political committee, the county in which
the treasurer resides, in addition to any statement of organization
required under RCW 42.17.040 or 42.17.050, a report of all
contributions received and expenditures made prior to that date, if
any.
(2) At the following intervals each treasurer shall file with the
commission and the county auditor or elections officer of the county in
which the candidate resides, or in the case of a political committee,
the county in which the committee maintains its office or headquarters,
and if there is no office or headquarters then in the county in which
the treasurer resides, a report containing the information required by
RCW 42.17.090:
(a) On the twenty-first day and the seventh day immediately
preceding the date on which the election is held; and
(b) On the tenth day of the first month after the election:
PROVIDED, That this report shall not be required following a primary
election from:
(i) A candidate whose name will appear on the subsequent general
election ballot; or
(ii) Any continuing political committee; and
(c) On the tenth day of each month in which no other reports are
required to be filed under this section: PROVIDED, That such report
shall only be filed if the committee has received a contribution or
made an expenditure in the preceding calendar month and either the
total contributions received or total expenditures made since the last
such report exceed two hundred dollars.
When there is no outstanding debt or obligation, and the campaign
fund is closed, and the campaign is concluded in all respects, and in
the case of a political committee, the committee has ceased to function
and has dissolved, the treasurer shall file a final report. Upon
submitting a final report, the duties of the treasurer shall cease and
there shall be no obligation to make any further reports.
The report filed twenty-one days before the election shall report
all contributions received and expenditures made as of the end of the
fifth business day before the date of the report. The report filed
seven days before the election shall report all contributions received
and expenditures made as of the end of the one business day before the
date of the report. Reports filed on the tenth day of the month shall
report all contributions received and expenditures made from the
closing date of the last report filed through the last day of the month
preceding the date of the current report.
(3) For the period beginning the first day of the fourth month
preceding the date on which the special or general election is held and
ending on the date of that election, each Monday the treasurer shall
file with the commission and the appropriate county elections officer
a report of each bank deposit made during the previous seven calendar
days. The report shall contain the name of each person contributing
the funds so deposited and the amount contributed by each person.
However, contributions of no more than twenty-five dollars in the
aggregate from any one person may be deposited without identifying the
contributor. A copy of the report shall be retained by the treasurer
for his or her records. In the event of deposits made by a deputy
treasurer, the copy shall be forwarded to the treasurer for his or her
records. Each report shall be certified as correct by the treasurer or
deputy treasurer making the deposit.
(4) If a city requires that candidates or committees for city
offices file reports with a city agency, the candidate or treasurer so
filing need not also file the report with the county auditor or
elections officer.
(5) The treasurer or candidate shall maintain books of account
accurately reflecting all contributions and expenditures on a current
basis within five business days of receipt or expenditure. During the
eight days immediately preceding the date of the election the books of
account shall be kept current within one business day. As specified in
the committee's statement of organization filed under RCW 42.17.040,
the books of account and copies of all reports filed under this section
must be open for public inspection ((as follows:
(a) For at least two consecutive hours between 8:00 a.m. and 8:00
p.m. on the eighth day immediately before the election, except when it
is a legal holiday, in which case on the seventh day immediately before
the election, at the principal headquarters or, if there is no
headquarters, at the address of the treasurer or such other place as
may be authorized by the commission; and
(b) By appointment for inspections to be conducted)) by appointment
at the designated place for inspections between 8:00 a.m. and 8:00 p.m.
on any ((other)) day from the ((seventh)) eighth day immediately before
the election through the day immediately before the election, other
than Saturday, Sunday, or a legal holiday. Copies of all reports filed
under this section may be maintained in paper or electronic form. It
is a violation of this chapter for a candidate or political committee
to refuse to allow and keep an appointment for an inspection to be
conducted during these authorized times and days ((in the week prior to
the election)). The appointment must be allowed at an authorized time
and day for such inspections that is within twenty-four hours of the
time and day that is requested for the inspection.
(6) The treasurer or candidate shall preserve books of account,
bills, receipts, and all other financial records of the campaign or
political committee for not less than five calendar years following the
year during which the transaction occurred.
(7) All reports filed pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this
section shall be certified as correct by the candidate and the
treasurer.
(8) ((Copies of all reports filed pursuant to this section shall be
readily available for public inspection for at least two consecutive
hours Monday through Friday, excluding legal holidays, between 8:00
a.m. and 8:00 p.m., as specified in the committee's statement of
organization filed pursuant to RCW 42.17.040, at the principal
headquarters or, if there is no headquarters, at the address of the
treasurer or such other place as may be authorized by the commission.
(9))) After January 1, 2002, a report that is filed with the
commission electronically need not also be filed with the county
auditor or elections officer.
(((10))) (9) The commission shall adopt administrative rules
establishing requirements for filer participation in any system
designed and implemented by the commission for the electronic filing of
reports.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.17.040 and 1989 c 280 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every political committee, within two weeks after its
organization or, within two weeks after the date when it first has the
expectation of receiving contributions or making expenditures in any
election campaign, whichever is earlier, shall file a statement of
organization with the commission and with the county auditor or
elections officer of the county in which the candidate resides, or in
the case of any other political committee, the county in which the
treasurer resides. A political committee organized within the last
three weeks before an election and having the expectation of receiving
contributions or making expenditures during and for that election
campaign shall file a statement of organization within three business
days after its organization or when it first has the expectation of
receiving contributions or making expenditures in the election
campaign.
(2) The statement of organization shall include but not be limited
to:
(a) The name and address of the committee;
(b) The names and addresses of all related or affiliated committees
or other persons, and the nature of the relationship or affiliation;
(c) The names, addresses, and titles of its officers; or if it has
no officers, the names, addresses, and titles of its responsible
leaders;
(d) The name and address of its treasurer and depository;
(e) A statement whether the committee is a continuing one;
(f) The name, office sought, and party affiliation of each
candidate whom the committee is supporting or opposing, and, if the
committee is supporting the entire ticket of any party, the name of the
party;
(g) The ballot proposition concerned, if any, and whether the
committee is in favor of or opposed to such proposition;
(h) What distribution of surplus funds will be made, in accordance
with RCW 42.17.095, in the event of dissolution;
(i) The contact information and the street address of the place
((and the hours during)) at which the committee will, by appointment,
make available for public inspection its books of account and all
reports filed in accordance with RCW 42.17.080; and
(j) Such other information as the commission may by regulation
prescribe, in keeping with the policies and purposes of this chapter.
(3) Any material change in information previously submitted in a
statement of organization shall be reported to the commission and to
the appropriate county elections officer within the ten days following
the change.

--- END ---