BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature makes the following
findings:
(1) Meritorious cases involving criminal acts are not prosecuted
many times because of a lack of resources such as funding and
personnel.
(2) A viable alternative is to supplement existing resources by
establishing prosecutors pro tem who work either pro bono, at reduced
rates, or at the expense of interested parties, such as the victims of
a crime or their survivors, family, or friends.
(3) If public prosecuting attorneys are unable or unwilling for
whatever reasons to pursue a meritorious case, then citizens have the
right and the duty to initiate prosecutions under an alternative method
in order to achieve justice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.27 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In the interest of justice, a prosecutor pro tem may be
appointed to appear in any superior court in any action on behalf of
the government and conduct the prosecution upon request of the court,
the local prosecutor, the attorney general, the governor, or a private
citizen for good cause shown.
(2) A prosecutor pro tem may be appointed to appear on behalf of
the government and conduct the prosecution only if the court has first
reviewed the attorney certification submitted on a form prescribed by
the supreme court, ruled on the contents of the certification, and
granted the attorney's motion to act as a prosecutor pro tem for good
cause shown. The finding of good cause shall be made on the record.
(3) A prosecutor pro tem shall represent the government in criminal
cases in the court granting the attorney's motion and in appeals for
which the attorney was appointed, except in cases where the attorney
has a conflict of interest.
(4) While acting as prosecutor pro tem, the attorney has all of the
powers of a prosecuting attorney. It is the primary duty of all
prosecutors pro tem not to convict, but to see that justice is done.
They shall not suppress facts or secrete witnesses capable of
establishing the innocence of the accused.
(5) If the appointed prosecutor pro tem is also an attorney for the
government, the duties of the appointed office are additional duties of
the attorney's present office, and the attorney is not entitled to
additional compensation. Nothing in this section prevents a court of
a county from contracting with another court to pay expenses and
reimburse compensation paid by a county to an attorney for the
government who is appointed to perform additional duties.
(6) If the appointed prosecutor pro tem is not an attorney for the
government, before the attorney enters upon the duties of the office of
prosecutor pro tem, the attorney shall take and subscribe an oath or
affirmation that he or she will faithfully and impartially discharge
the duties of his or her office of prosecutor pro tem to the best of
his or her ability. This oath, or affirmation, shall be administered
and certified by an officer authorized to administer oaths, without
charge. The attorney is qualified to perform the duties of the office
of prosecutor pro tem for which the attorney is appointed on filing an
oath with the clerk of the court. The attorney shall act pro bono or
receive nonpublic compensation from interested parties for the
performance of the attorney's duties as prosecutor pro tem. If the
attorney receives public compensation for the performance of the
attorney's duties as prosecutor pro tem, the attorney shall receive
compensation in the same amount and manner as an attorney appointed to
represent an indigent person.

--- END ---