BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.56.020 and 1996 c 153 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The county treasurer shall be the receiver and collector of all
taxes extended upon the tax rolls of the county, whether levied for
state, county, school, bridge, road, municipal or other purposes, and
also of all fines, forfeitures or penalties received by any person or
officer for the use of his or her county. All taxes upon real and
personal property made payable by the provisions of this title shall be
due and payable to the treasurer on or before the thirtieth day of
April and, except as provided in this section, shall be delinquent
after that date.
(2) Each tax statement shall include a notice that checks for
payment of taxes may be made payable to "Treasurer of . . . . . .
County" or other appropriate office, but tax statements shall not
include any suggestion that checks may be made payable to the name of
the individual holding the office of treasurer nor any other
individual.
(3) ((When)) If the total amount of tax or special assessments on
personal property or on any lot, block or tract of real property
payable by one person is fifty dollars or more, ((and if)) then one-half of such tax shall be ((paid)) due and payable on or before the
thirtieth day of April, and the remainder of such tax shall be due and
payable on or before the thirty-first day of October following and
shall be delinquent after that date.
(4) ((When)) If the total amount of tax or special assessments on
any lot, block or tract of real property or on any mobile home payable
by one person is fifty dollars or more, and if one-half of such tax
((be)) is paid after the thirtieth day of April but before the thirty-first day of October, then together with the applicable interest and
penalty on one-half of the ((full)) amount of tax payable for that
year, the remainder of such tax shall be due and payable on or before
the thirty-first day of October following and shall be delinquent after
that date.
(5) Delinquent taxes under this section are subject to interest at
the rate of twelve percent per annum computed on a monthly basis on the
full year amount of tax unpaid from the date of delinquency until paid.
Interest shall be calculated at the rate in effect at the time of
payment of the tax, regardless of when the taxes were first delinquent.
In addition, delinquent taxes under this section are subject to
penalties as follows:
(a) A penalty of three percent of the full year amount of tax
unpaid shall be assessed ((on the tax delinquent)) on June 1st of the
year in which the tax is due.
(b) An additional penalty of eight percent shall be assessed on the
amount of tax delinquent on December 1st of the year in which the tax
is due.
(6) ((Subsection (5) of this section notwithstanding, no interest
or penalties may be assessed for the period April 30, 1996, through
December 31, 1996, on delinquent taxes imposed in 1995 for collection
in 1996 which are imposed on the personal residences owned by military
personnel who participated in the situation known as "Joint Endeavor."
(7))) For purposes of this chapter, "interest" means both interest
and penalties.
(((8))) (7) All collections of interest on delinquent taxes shall
be credited to the county current expense fund; but the cost of
foreclosure and sale of real property, and the fees and costs of
distraint and sale of personal property, for delinquent taxes, shall,
when collected, be credited to the operation and maintenance fund of
the county treasurer prosecuting the foreclosure or distraint or sale;
and shall be used by the county treasurer as a revolving fund to defray
the cost of further foreclosure, distraint and sale for delinquent
taxes without regard to budget limitations.

--- END ---