BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.08.010 and 2002 c 281 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this title or rules adopted under this title, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Director" means the director of fish and wildlife.
(2) "Department" means the department of fish and wildlife.
(3) "Commission" means the state fish and wildlife commission.
(4) "Person" means and includes an individual; a corporation; a
public or private entity or organization; a local, state, or federal
agency; all business organizations, including corporations and
partnerships; or a group of two or more individuals acting with a
common purpose whether acting in an individual, representative, or
official capacity.
(5) "Fish and wildlife officer" means a person appointed and
commissioned by the director, with authority to enforce this title and
rules adopted pursuant to this title, and other statutes as prescribed
by the legislature. Fish and wildlife officer includes a person
commissioned before June 11, 1998, as a wildlife agent or a fisheries
patrol officer.
(6) "Ex officio fish and wildlife officer" means a commissioned
officer of a municipal, county, state, or federal agency having as its
primary function the enforcement of criminal laws in general, while the
officer is in the appropriate jurisdiction. The term "ex officio fish
and wildlife officer" includes special agents of the national marine
fisheries service, state parks commissioned officers, United States
fish and wildlife special agents, department of natural resources
enforcement officers, and United States forest service officers, while
the agents and officers are within their respective jurisdictions.
(7) "To hunt" and its derivatives means an effort to kill, injure,
capture, or harass a wild animal or wild bird.
(8) "To trap" and its derivatives means a method of hunting using
devices to capture wild animals or wild birds.
(9) "To fish," "to harvest," and "to take," and their derivatives
means an effort to kill, injure, harass, or catch a fish or shellfish.
(10) "Open season" means those times, manners of taking, and places
or waters established by rule of the commission for the lawful hunting,
fishing, taking, or possession of game animals, game birds, game fish,
food fish, or shellfish that conform to the special restrictions or
physical descriptions established by rule of the commission or that
have otherwise been deemed legal to hunt, fish, take, harvest, or
possess by rule of the commission. "Open season" includes the first
and last days of the established time.
(11) "Closed season" means all times, manners of taking, and places
or waters other than those established by rule of the commission as an
open season. "Closed season" also means all hunting, fishing, taking,
or possession of game animals, game birds, game fish, food fish, or
shellfish that do not conform to the special restrictions or physical
descriptions established by rule of the commission as an open season or
that have not otherwise been deemed legal to hunt, fish, take, harvest,
or possess by rule of the commission as an open season.
(12) "Closed area" means a place where the hunting of some or all
species of wild animals or wild birds is prohibited.
(13) "Closed waters" means all or part of a lake, river, stream, or
other body of water, where fishing or harvesting is prohibited.
(14) "Game reserve" means a closed area where hunting for all wild
animals and wild birds is prohibited.
(15) "Bag limit" means the maximum number of game animals, game
birds, or game fish which may be taken, caught, killed, or possessed by
a person, as specified by rule of the commission for a particular
period of time, or as to size, sex, or species.
(16) "Wildlife" means all species of the animal kingdom whose
members exist in Washington in a wild state. This includes but is not
limited to mammals, birds, reptiles, amphibians, fish, and
invertebrates. The term "wildlife" does not include feral domestic
mammals, old world rats and mice of the family Muridae of the order
Rodentia, or those fish, shellfish, and marine invertebrates classified
as food fish or shellfish by the director. The term "wildlife"
includes all stages of development and the bodily parts of wildlife
members.
(17) "Wild animals" means those species of the class Mammalia whose
members exist in Washington in a wild state and the species Rana
catesbeiana (bullfrog). The term "wild animal" does not include feral
domestic mammals or old world rats and mice of the family Muridae of
the order Rodentia.
(18) "Wild birds" means those species of the class Aves whose
members exist in Washington in a wild state.
(19) "Protected wildlife" means wildlife designated by the
commission that shall not be hunted or fished.
(20) "Endangered species" means wildlife designated by the
commission as seriously threatened with extinction.
(21) "Game animals" means wild animals that shall not be hunted
except as authorized by the commission.
(22) "Fur-bearing animals" means game animals that shall not be
trapped except as authorized by the commission.
(23) "Game birds" means wild birds that shall not be hunted except
as authorized by the commission.
(24) "Predatory birds" means wild birds that may be hunted
throughout the year as authorized by the commission.
(25) "Deleterious exotic wildlife" means species of the animal
kingdom not native to Washington and designated as dangerous to the
environment or wildlife of the state.
(26) "Game farm" means property on which wildlife is held or raised
for commercial purposes, trade, or gift. The term "game farm" does not
include publicly owned facilities.
(27) "Person of disability" means a permanently disabled person who
is not ambulatory without the assistance of a wheelchair, crutches, or
similar devices.
(28) "Fish" includes all species classified as game fish or food
fish by statute or rule, as well as all fin fish not currently
classified as food fish or game fish if such species exist in state
waters. The term "fish" includes all stages of development and the
bodily parts of fish species.
(29) "Raffle" means an activity in which tickets bearing an
individual number are sold for not more than twenty-five dollars each
and in which a permit or permits are awarded to hunt or for access to
hunt big game animals or wild turkeys on the basis of a drawing from
the tickets by the person or persons conducting the raffle.
(30) "Youth" means a person fifteen years old for fishing and under
sixteen years old for hunting.
(31) "Senior" means a person seventy years old or older.
(32) "License year" means the period of time for which a
recreational license is valid. The license year begins April 1st, and
ends March 31st.
(33) "Saltwater" means those marine waters seaward of river mouths.
(34) "Freshwater" means all waters not defined as saltwater
including, but not limited to, rivers upstream of the river mouth,
lakes, ponds, and reservoirs.
(35) "State waters" means all marine waters and fresh waters within
ordinary high water lines and within the territorial boundaries of the
state.
(36) "Offshore waters" means marine waters of the Pacific Ocean
outside the territorial boundaries of the state, including the marine
waters of other states and countries.
(37) "Concurrent waters of the Columbia river" means those waters
of the Columbia river that coincide with the Washington-Oregon state
boundary.
(38) "Resident" means a person who has maintained a permanent place
of abode within the state for at least ninety days immediately
preceding an application for a license, has established by formal
evidence an intent to continue residing within the state, and who is
not licensed to hunt or fish as a resident in another state.
(39) "Nonresident" means a person who has not fulfilled the
qualifications of a resident.
(40) "Shellfish" means those species of marine and freshwater
invertebrates that have been classified and that shall not be taken
except as authorized by rule of the commission. The term "shellfish"
includes all stages of development and the bodily parts of shellfish
species.
(41) "Commercial" means related to or connected with buying,
selling, or bartering.
(42) "To process" and its derivatives mean preparing or preserving
fish, wildlife, or shellfish.
(43) "Personal use" means for the private use of the individual
taking the fish or shellfish and not for sale or barter.
(44) "Angling gear" means a line attached to a rod and reel capable
of being held in hand while landing the fish or a hand-held line
operated without rod or reel.
(45) "Fishery" means the taking of one or more particular species
of fish or shellfish with particular gear in a particular geographical
area.
(46) "Limited-entry license" means a license subject to a license
limitation program established in chapter 77.70 RCW.
(47) "Seaweed" means marine aquatic plant species that are
dependent upon the marine aquatic or tidal environment, and exist in
either an attached or free floating form, and includes but is not
limited to marine aquatic plants in the classes Chlorophyta,
Phaeophyta, and Rhodophyta.
(48) "Trafficking" means offering, attempting to engage, or
engaging in sale, barter, or purchase of fish, shellfish, wildlife, or
deleterious exotic wildlife.
(49) "Invasive species" means a plant species or a nonnative animal
species that either:
(a) Causes or may cause displacement of, or otherwise threatens,
native species in their natural communities;
(b) Threatens or may threaten natural resources or their use in the
state;
(c) Causes or may cause economic damage to commercial or
recreational activities that are dependent upon state waters; or
(d) Threatens or harms human health.
(50) "Prohibited aquatic animal species" means an invasive species
of the animal kingdom that has been classified as a prohibited aquatic
animal species by the commission.
(51) "Regulated aquatic animal species" means a potentially
invasive species of the animal kingdom that has been classified as a
regulated aquatic animal species by the commission.
(52) "Unregulated aquatic animal species" means a nonnative animal
species that has been classified as an unregulated aquatic animal
species by the commission.
(53) "Unlisted aquatic animal species" means a nonnative animal
species that has not been classified as a prohibited aquatic animal
species, a regulated aquatic animal species, or an unregulated aquatic
animal species by the commission.
(54) "Aquatic plant species" means an emergent, submersed,
partially submersed, free-floating, or floating-leaving plant species
that grows in or near a body of water or wetland.
(55) "Freshwater-specific rule" means a rule adopted by the
commission that affects recreational fishing on all of, or a portion
of, a specific river, stream, lake, or other freshwater body, and that
could potentially be enforced with a criminal penalty.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.04.090 and 1996 c 267 s 35 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission shall adopt permanent rules and amendments to or
repeals of existing rules by approval of a majority of the members by
resolution, entered and recorded in the minutes of the commission((:
PROVIDED, That)). However, the commission may not adopt rules after
July 23, 1995, that are based solely on a section of law stating a
statute's intent or purpose, on the enabling provisions of the statute
establishing the agency, or on any combination of such provisions, for
statutory authority to adopt any rule.
(2) The commission shall adopt emergency rules by approval of a
majority of the members. The commission, when adopting emergency rules
under RCW 77.12.150, shall adopt rules in conformance with chapter
34.05 RCW. Judicial notice shall be taken of the rules filed and
published as provided in RCW 34.05.380 and 34.05.210.
(3) A copy of an emergency rule, certified as a true copy by a
member of the commission, the director, or by a person authorized in
writing by the director to make the certification, is admissible in
court as prima facie evidence of the adoption and validity of the rule.
(4)(a) A new freshwater-specific rule, as that term is defined in
RCW 77.08.010, adopted by the commission after June 30, 2003, expires
no later than four years after the date it takes effect, unless a
majority of the members of the commission approve a reauthorization of
the rules for the affected specific body of water. Rules reauthorized
by the commission remain in effect for four years, or until they are
amended, repealed, or again reauthorized by the commission, whichever
comes first.
(b) An existing freshwater-specific rule, as that term is defined
in RCW 77.08.010, that was adopted on or before June 30, 2003, expires
no later than as provided in this subsection (4)(b), unless they are
reauthorized by the commission prior to the expiration date set for the
affected water body:
(i) March 31, 2005, for any freshwater-specific rules relating to
water bodies located primarily or entirely east of the crest of the
Cascade range; and
(ii) March 31, 2007, for any freshwater-specific rules relating to
water bodies located primarily or entirely west of the crest of the
Cascade range.
(c) Prior to reauthorizing any freshwater-specific rules, the
commission must hold at least one public hearing where citizens can
present testimony regarding the freshwater-specific rules affecting the
water body in question.
(d) Beginning in calendar year 2008, and continuing each year
thereafter, the commission must review, and hold a public hearing on,
the freshwater-specific rules for at least twenty-five percent of the
state's freshwater bodies governed by such rules. No freshwater body
with corresponding freshwater-specific rules may go more than four
years between commission reviews.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.12.047 and 2001 c 253 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 77.04.090, the commission may adopt,
amend, or repeal rules as follows:
(a) Specifying the times when the taking of wildlife, fish, or
shellfish is lawful or unlawful.
(b) Specifying the areas and waters in which the taking and
possession of wildlife, fish, or shellfish is lawful or unlawful.
(c) Specifying and defining the gear, appliances, or other
equipment and methods that may be used to take wildlife, fish, or
shellfish, and specifying the times, places, and manner in which the
equipment may be used or possessed.
(d) Regulating the importation, transportation, possession,
disposal, landing, and sale of wildlife, fish, shellfish, or seaweed
within the state, whether acquired within or without the state.
(e) Regulating the prevention and suppression of diseases and pests
affecting wildlife, fish, or shellfish.
(f) Regulating the size, sex, species, and quantities of wildlife,
fish, or shellfish that may be taken, possessed, sold, or disposed of.
(g) Specifying the statistical and biological reports required from
fishers, dealers, boathouses, or processors of wildlife, fish, or
shellfish.
(h) Classifying species of marine and freshwater life as food fish
or shellfish.
(i) Classifying the species of wildlife, fish, and shellfish that
may be used for purposes other than human consumption.
(j) Regulating the taking, sale, possession, and distribution of
wildlife, fish, shellfish, or deleterious exotic wildlife.
(k) Establishing game reserves and closed areas where hunting for
wild animals or wild birds may be prohibited.
(l) Regulating the harvesting of fish, shellfish, and wildlife in
the federal exclusive economic zone by vessels or individuals
registered or licensed under the laws of this state.
(m) Authorizing issuance of permits to release, plant, or place
fish or shellfish in state waters.
(n) Governing the possession of fish, shellfish, or wildlife so
that the size, species, or sex can be determined visually in the field
or while being transported.
(o) Other rules necessary to carry out this title and the purposes
and duties of the department.
(2) Subsections (1)(a), (b), (c), (d), and (f) of this section do
not apply to private tideland owners and lessees and the immediate
family members of the owners or lessees of state tidelands, when they
take or possess oysters, clams, cockles, borers, or mussels, excluding
razor clams, produced on their own private tidelands or their leased
state tidelands for personal use.
"Immediate family member" for the purposes of this section means a
spouse, brother, sister, grandparent, parent, child, or grandchild.
(3) Except for subsection (1)(g) of this section, this section does
not apply to private sector cultured aquatic products as defined in RCW
15.85.020. Subsection (1)(g) of this section does apply to such
products.

--- END ---