BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that the
department of fish and wildlife is charged with the responsibility of
managing the state's fish and wildlife populations. Managing dynamic
populations is a complicated task, and the department must complete the
task while allowing a maximum number of individuals to enjoy hunting,
fishing, and other outdoor sports. In order to accomplish this goal,
the legislature recognizes that often elaborate and at times complex
laws may be necessary.
However, the legislature finds that these laws, although necessary,
can be confusing to the average sportsperson. Too often a hunter or
fisher may wish to comply with the state's hunting and fishing laws,
only to find that he or she did not properly interpret their meaning.
As historically drafted, the fish and wildlife code provides for a
series of criminal infractions. The result of this construction is
that a well-meaning sportsperson may face criminal charges if he or she
unintentionally misunderstands or misinterprets a hunting or fishing
law.
The legislature further finds that the historical construction of
the fish and wildlife code does not result in a proper level of
enforcement discretion. Although the native fish and game of our state
deserve the protection provided by the fish and wildlife code and its
associated rules, the sportspeople of Washington deserve the benefit of
the state's doubt that many first-time offenses are unintentional and
are the unfortunate result of the complexity of modern wildlife
management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Whenever an individual purchases a recreational hunting or
fishing license, he or she must also be provided with a copy of all
relevant laws and rules, in the form of a bound publication or
rulebook.
(2) The department is responsible for preparing the rulebook
required by this section, and for providing all locations where
recreational licenses can be purchased with adequate copies of the
rulebook.
(3) The front cover of the rulebook required by this section must
contain, in large print, a warning that explains:
(a) The duty of all sportspeople to abide by the laws and rules
contained within the rulebook;
(b) The possible financial and criminal penalties for failure to
abide by the laws and rules; and
(c) That different laws and rules may apply in particular water
bodies, parts of water bodies, areas of the state, and times of the
year, all of which should be understood prior to fishing or hunting.
(4) All locations where recreational licenses are sold must clearly
display a sign, provided by the department, indicating that rulebooks
are available at no additional cost.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.32.070 and 1998 c 191 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All applications for a recreational license, tag, or stamp must
contain a notice to the applicant that:
(a) He or she is entitled to a copy of the rulebook produced under
section 2 of this act at no additional cost; and
(b) He or she is responsible for abiding by the rules contained in
the rulebook, and failure to do so could result in serious financial or
criminal penalties.
(2) Applicants for a license, permit, tag, or stamp shall furnish
the information required by the director. The commission may adopt
rules requiring licensees or permittees to keep records and make
reports concerning the taking of fish, shellfish, and wildlife.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.15.070 and 2000 c 107 s 231 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Fish and wildlife officers and ex officio fish and wildlife
officers may seize without warrant boats, airplanes, vehicles,
motorized implements, conveyances, gear, appliances, or other articles
they have probable cause to believe have been held with intent to
violate or used in violation of this title or rule of the commission or
director. However, fish and wildlife officers or ex officio fish and
wildlife officers may not seize any item or article, other than for
evidence, if under the circumstances, it is reasonable to conclude that
the violation was inadvertent or if the person will only be charged
with a natural resources infraction and not a criminal penalty. The
property seized is subject to forfeiture to the state under this
section regardless of ownership. Property seized may be recovered by
its owner by depositing into court a cash bond equal to the value of
the seized property but not more than twenty-five thousand dollars.
Such cash bond is subject to forfeiture in lieu of the property.
Forfeiture of property seized under this section is a civil forfeiture
against property and is intended to be a remedial civil sanction.
(2) In the event of a seizure of property under this section,
jurisdiction to begin the forfeiture proceedings shall commence upon
seizure. Within fifteen days following the seizure, the seizing
authority shall serve a written notice of intent to forfeit property on
the owner of the property seized and on any person having any known
right or interest in the property seized. Notice may be served by any
method authorized by law or court rule, including service by certified
mail with return receipt requested. Service by mail is deemed complete
upon mailing within the fifteen-day period following the seizure.
(3) Persons claiming a right of ownership or right to possession of
property are entitled to a hearing to contest forfeiture. Such a claim
shall specify the claim of ownership or possession and shall be made in
writing and served on the director within forty-five days of the
seizure. If the seizing authority has complied with notice
requirements and there is no claim made within forty-five days, then
the property shall be forfeited to the state.
(4) If any person timely serves the director with a claim to
property, the person shall be afforded an opportunity to be heard as to
the person's claim or right. The hearing shall be before the director
or director's designee, or before an administrative law judge appointed
under chapter 34.12 RCW, except that a person asserting a claim or
right may remove the matter to a court of competent jurisdiction if the
aggregate value of the property seized is more than five thousand
dollars.
(5) The hearing to contest forfeiture and any subsequent appeal
shall be as provided for in chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative
procedure act. The seizing authority has the burden to demonstrate
that it had reason to believe the property was held with intent to
violate or was used in violation of this title or rule of the
commission or director. The person contesting forfeiture has the
burden of production and proof by a preponderance of evidence that the
person owns or has a right to possess the property and:
(a) That the property was not held with intent to violate or used
in violation of this title; or
(b) If the property is a boat, airplane, or vehicle, that the
illegal use or planned illegal use of the boat, airplane, or vehicle
occurred without the owner's knowledge or consent, and that the owner
acted reasonably to prevent illegal uses of such boat, airplane, or
vehicle.
(6) A forfeiture of a conveyance encumbered by a perfected security
interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if the secured
party neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or omission.
No security interest in seized property may be perfected after seizure.
(7) If seized property is forfeited under this section the
department may retain it for official use unless the property is
required to be destroyed, or upon application by any law enforcement
agency of the state, release such property to the agency for the use of
enforcing this title, or sell such property, and deposit the proceeds
to the wildlife fund, as provided for in RCW 77.12.170.

Sec. 5 RCW 77.15.140 and 1998 c 190 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful taking of unclassified fish or
wildlife if:
(a) The person kills, hunts, fishes, takes, holds, possesses,
transports, or maliciously injures or harms fish or wildlife that is
not classified as big game, game fish, game animals, game birds, food
fish, shellfish, protected wildlife, or endangered wildlife; and
(b) The act violates any rule of the commission or the director.
(2)(a) A first-time unlawful taking of unclassified fish or
wildlife is a natural resource infraction under chapter 7.84 RCW.
(b) A subsequent unlawful taking of unclassified fish or wildlife
is a misdemeanor.

Sec. 6 RCW 77.15.170 and 1999 c 258 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of waste of fish and wildlife in the second
degree if:
(a) The person kills, takes, or possesses fish, shellfish, or
wildlife and the value of the fish, shellfish, or wildlife is greater
than twenty dollars but less than two hundred fifty dollars; and
(b) The person recklessly allows such fish, shellfish, or wildlife
to be wasted.
(2) A person is guilty of waste of fish and wildlife in the first
degree if:
(a) The person kills, takes, or possesses fish, shellfish, or
wildlife having a value of two hundred fifty dollars or more or
wildlife classified as big game; and
(b) The person recklessly allows such fish, shellfish, or wildlife
to be wasted.
(3)(a)(i) A first-time waste of fish and wildlife in the second
degree is a ((misdemeanor)) natural resource infraction under chapter
7.84 RCW.
(ii) A subsequent waste of fish and wildlife in the second degree
is a misdemeanor.
(b) Waste of fish and wildlife in the first degree is a gross
misdemeanor. Upon conviction, the department shall revoke any license
or tag used in the crime and shall order suspension of the person's
privileges to engage in the activity in which the person committed
waste of fish and wildlife in the first degree for a period of one
year.
(4) It is prima facie evidence of waste if a processor purchases or
engages a quantity of food fish, shellfish, or game fish that cannot be
processed within sixty hours after the food fish, game fish, or
shellfish are taken from the water, unless the food fish, game fish, or
shellfish are preserved in good marketable condition.

Sec. 7 RCW 77.15.230 and 1999 c 258 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful use of department lands or
facilities if the person enters upon, uses, or remains upon department-owned or department-controlled lands or facilities in violation of any
rule of the department.
(2)(a) A first-time unlawful use of department lands or facilities
is a natural resource infraction under chapter 7.84 RCW.
(b) A subsequent unlawful use of department lands or facilities is
a misdemeanor.

Sec. 8 RCW 77.15.280 and 1998 c 190 s 47 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of violating rules requiring reporting of
fish or wildlife harvest if the person:
(a) Fails to make a harvest log report of a commercial fish or
shellfish catch in violation of any rule of the commission or the
director;
(b) Fails to maintain a trapper's report or taxidermist ledger in
violation of any rule of the commission or the director;
(c) Fails to submit any portion of a big game animal for a required
inspection required by rule of the commission or the director; or
(d) Fails to return a catch record card or wildlife harvest report
to the department as required by rule of the commission or director.
(2) ((Violating rules requiring reporting of fish or wildlife
harvest)) (a) A violation of subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section
is a misdemeanor.
(b) A first-time violation of subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this
section is a natural resource infraction under chapter 7.84 RCW.
(c) A subsequent violation of subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this
section is a misdemeanor.

Sec. 9 RCW 77.15.380 and 2001 c 253 s 39 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful recreational fishing in the
second degree if the person fishes for, takes, possesses, or harvests
fish or shellfish and:
(a) The person does not have and possess the license or the catch
record card required by chapter 77.32 RCW for such activity; or
(b) The action violates any rule of the commission or the director
regarding seasons, bag or possession limits but less than two times the
bag or possession limit, closed areas, closed times, or any other rule
addressing the manner or method of fishing or possession of fish,
except for use of a net to take fish as provided for in RCW 77.15.580.
(2)(a) A first-time unlawful recreational fishing in the second
degree is a natural resource infraction under chapter 7.84 RCW.
(b) A subsequent unlawful recreational fishing in the second degree
is a misdemeanor.

Sec. 10 RCW 77.15.390 and 2001 c 253 s 40 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful taking of seaweed if the person
takes, possesses, or harvests seaweed and:
(a) The person does not have and possess the license required by
chapter 77.32 RCW for taking seaweed; or
(b) The action violates any rule of the department or the
department of natural resources regarding seasons, possession limits,
closed areas, closed times, or any other rule addressing the manner or
method of taking, possessing, or harvesting of seaweed.
(2)(a) A first-time unlawful taking of seaweed is a natural
resource infraction under chapter 7.84 RCW.
(b) A subsequent unlawful taking of seaweed is a misdemeanor.
(3) Nothing in this ((does not)) section affects the rights of the
state to recover civilly for trespass, conversion, or theft of state-owned valuable materials.

Sec. 11 RCW 77.15.400 and 2001 c 253 s 41 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful hunting of wild birds in the
second degree if the person:
(a) Hunts for, takes, or possesses a wild bird and the person does
not have and possess all licenses, tags, stamps, and permits required
under this title;
(b) Maliciously destroys, takes, or harms the eggs or nests of a
wild bird except when authorized by permit;
(c) Violates any rule of the commission or director regarding
seasons, bag or possession limits but less than two times the bag or
possession limit, closed areas, closed times, or other rule addressing
the manner or method of hunting or possession of wild birds; or
(d) Possesses a wild bird taken during a closed season for that
wild bird or taken from a closed area for that wild bird.
(2) A person is guilty of unlawful hunting of wild birds in the
first degree if the person takes or possesses two times or more than
the possession or bag limit for wild birds allowed by rule of the
commission or director.
(3)(a)(i) A first-time unlawful hunting of wild birds in the second
degree is a ((misdemeanor)) natural resource infraction under chapter
7.84 RCW.
(ii) A subsequent unlawful hunting of wild birds in the second
degree is a misdemeanor.
(b) Unlawful hunting of wild birds in the first degree is a gross
misdemeanor.

Sec. 12 RCW 77.15.430 and 1999 c 258 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful hunting of wild animals in the
second degree if the person:
(a) Hunts for, takes, or possesses a wild animal that is not
classified as big game, and does not have and possess all licenses,
tags, or permits required by this title;
(b) Violates any rule of the commission or director regarding
seasons, bag or possession limits but less than two times the bag or
possession limit, closed areas including game reserves, closed times,
or other rule addressing the manner or method of hunting or possession
of wild animals not classified as big game; or
(c) Possesses a wild animal that is not classified as big game
taken during a closed season for that wild animal or from a closed area
for that wild animal.
(2) A person is guilty of unlawful hunting of wild animals in the
first degree if the person takes or possesses two times or more than
the possession or bag limit for wild animals that are not classified as
big game animals as allowed by rule of the commission or director.
(3)(a)(i) A first-time unlawful hunting of wild animals in the
second degree is a ((misdemeanor)) natural resource infraction under
chapter 7.84 RCW.
(ii) A subsequent unlawful hunting of wild animals in the second
degree is a misdemeanor.
(b) Unlawful hunting of wild animals in the first degree is a gross
misdemeanor.

Sec. 13 RCW 77.15.440 and 1998 c 190 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful use of weapons, traps, or dogs
on game reserves if:
(a) The person uses firearms, other hunting weapons, or traps on a
game reserve; or
(b) The person negligently allows a dog upon a game reserve.
(2) This section does not apply to persons on a public highway or
if the conduct is authorized by rule of the department.
(3) This section does not apply to a person in possession of a
handgun if the person in control of the handgun possesses a valid
concealed pistol license and the handgun is concealed on the person.
(4)(a) A first-time unlawful use of weapons, traps, or dogs on game
reserves is a natural resource infraction under chapter 7.84 RCW.
(b) A subsequent unlawful use of weapons, traps, or dogs on game
reserves is a misdemeanor.

--- END ---