BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.08A.290 and 1997 c 58 s 316 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature that the department ((is
authorized to)) may engage in competitive contracting using
performance-based contracts to provide ((all work activities authorized
in chapter 58, Laws of 1997, including the job search component
authorized in section 312 of this act)) services as described in RCW
74.08A.250 to WorkFirst recipients.
(2) The department may use competitive performance-based
contracting to select which vendors will participate in the WorkFirst
program. Performance-based contracts shall be awarded based on factors
that include but are not limited to the criteria listed in RCW
74.08A.410, past performance of the contractor, demonstrated ability to
perform the contract effectively, financial strength of the contractor,
and merits of the proposal for services submitted by the contractor.
Contracts shall be made without regard to whether the contractor is a
public or private entity.
(3) The department may contract for an evaluation of the
competitive contracting practices and outcomes to be performed by an
independent entity with expertise in government privatization and
competitive strategies. The evaluation shall include quarterly
progress reports to the fiscal committees of the legislature and to the
governor, starting at the first quarter after the effective date of the
first competitive contract and ending two years after the effective
date of the first competitive contract.
(4) The department shall seek independent assistance in developing
contracting strategies to implement this section. Assistance may
include but is not limited to development of contract language, design
of requests for proposal, developing full cost information on
government services, evaluation of bids, and providing for equal
competition between private and public entities.

--- END ---