BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The institute for public policy shall
conduct a study to research at-risk youth programs. The institute for
public policy shall conduct the necessary research in order to
recommend to the legislature the criteria, processes, and institutional
arrangements under which proven best practices could be identified, the
reductions in the state justice system caseloads estimated, and the
unit cost and total cost savings estimated for the intervention and
prevention programs focused on youth at high risk for involvement with
the juvenile and adult justice systems. The development of criteria,
processes, and institutional arrangements for the limited purposes of
this study shall not be construed to define best practices for all
programs. The institute for public policy shall report its findings
and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 12, 2003.

--- END ---