BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.44.115 and 1998 c 221 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Photographs" or "films" means the making of a photograph,
motion picture film, videotape, or any other recording or transmission
of the image of a person;
(b) "Place where he or she would have a reasonable expectation of
privacy" means:
(i) A place where a reasonable person would believe that he or she
could disrobe in privacy, without being concerned that his or her
undressing was being photographed or filmed by another; or
(ii) A place where one may reasonably expect to be safe from casual
or hostile intrusion or surveillance;
(c) "Surveillance" means secret observation of the activities of
another person for the purpose of spying upon and invading the privacy
of the person;
(d) "Views" means the intentional looking upon of another person
for more than a brief period of time, in other than a casual or cursory
manner, with the unaided eye or with a device designed or intended to
improve visual acuity.
(2)(a) A person commits the crime of voyeurism in the first degree
if, for the purpose of arousing or gratifying the sexual desire of any
person, he or she knowingly views, photographs, or films another
person, without that person's knowledge and consent, while the person
being viewed, photographed, or filmed is in a place where he or she
would have a reasonable expectation of privacy.
(b) A person commits the crime of voyeurism in the second degree
if, under circumstances not constituting voyeurism in the first degree,
for the purpose of arousing or gratifying the sexual desire of any
person, he or she knowingly views, photographs, or films another person
under or through the clothing being worn by that other person, without
that person's consent and in a manner or under circumstances that
violate a reasonable expectation of privacy.
(3)(a) Voyeurism in the first degree is a class C felony.
(b) Voyeurism in the second degree is a gross misdemeanor.
(4) This section does not apply to viewing, photographing, or
filming by personnel of the department of corrections or of a local
jail or correctional facility for security purposes or during
investigation of alleged misconduct by a person in the custody of the
department of corrections or the local jail or correctional facility.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.04.080 and 1998 c 221 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Prosecutions for criminal offenses shall not be commenced after
the periods prescribed in this section.
(a) The following offenses may be prosecuted at any time after
their commission:
(i) Murder;
(ii) Homicide by abuse;
(iii) Arson if a death results;
(iv) Vehicular homicide;
(v) Vehicular assault if a death results;
(vi) Hit-and-run injury-accident if a death results (RCW
46.52.020(4)).
(b) The following offenses shall not be prosecuted more than ten
years after their commission:
(i) Any felony committed by a public officer if the commission is
in connection with the duties of his or her office or constitutes a
breach of his or her public duty or a violation of the oath of office;
(ii) Arson if no death results; or
(iii) Violations of RCW 9A.44.040 or 9A.44.050 if the rape is
reported to a law enforcement agency within one year of its commission;
except that if the victim is under fourteen years of age when the rape
is committed and the rape is reported to a law enforcement agency
within one year of its commission, the violation may be prosecuted up
to three years after the victim's eighteenth birthday or up to ten
years after the rape's commission, whichever is later. If a violation
of RCW 9A.44.040 or 9A.44.050 is not reported within one year, the rape
may not be prosecuted: (A) More than three years after its commission
if the violation was committed against a victim fourteen years of age
or older; or (B) more than three years after the victim's eighteenth
birthday or more than seven years after the rape's commission,
whichever is later, if the violation was committed against a victim
under fourteen years of age.
(c) Violations of the following statutes shall not be prosecuted
more than three years after the victim's eighteenth birthday or more
than seven years after their commission, whichever is later: RCW
9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, 9A.44.070, 9A.44.080,
9A.44.100(1)(b), or 9A.64.020.
(d) The following offenses shall not be prosecuted more than six
years after their commission: Violations of RCW 9A.82.060 or
9A.82.080.
(e) The following offenses shall not be prosecuted more than five
years after their commission: Any class C felony under chapter 74.09,
82.36, or 82.38 RCW.
(f) Bigamy shall not be prosecuted more than three years after the
time specified in RCW 9A.64.010.
(g) A violation of RCW 9A.56.030 must not be prosecuted more than
three years after the discovery of the offense when the victim is a tax
exempt corporation under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3).
(h) No other felony may be prosecuted more than three years after
its commission; except that in a prosecution under RCW 9A.44.115(2)(a),
if the person who was viewed, photographed, or filmed did not realize
at the time that he or she was being viewed, photographed, or filmed,
the prosecution must be commenced within two years of the time the
person who was viewed or in the photograph or film first learns that he
or she was viewed, photographed, or filmed.
(i) No gross misdemeanor may be prosecuted more than two years
after its commission; except that in a prosecution under RCW
9A.44.115(2)(b), if the person who was viewed, photographed, or filmed
did not realize at the time that he or she was being viewed,
photographed, or filmed, the prosecution must be commenced within one
year of the time the person who was viewed or in the photograph or film
first learns that he or she was viewed, photographed, or filmed.
(j) No misdemeanor may be prosecuted more than one year after its
commission.
(2) The periods of limitation prescribed in subsection (1) of this
section do not run during any time when the person charged is not
usually and publicly resident within this state.
(3) If, before the end of a period of limitation prescribed in
subsection (1) of this section, an indictment has been found or a
complaint or an information has been filed, and the indictment,
complaint, or information is set aside, then the period of limitation
is extended by a period equal to the length of time from the finding or
filing to the setting aside.

--- END ---