BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.63.110 and 2002 c 279 s 15 and 2002 c 175 s 36 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be
assessed a monetary penalty. No penalty may exceed two hundred and
fifty dollars for each offense unless authorized by this chapter or
title.
(2) The monetary penalty for a violation of RCW 46.55.105(2) is two
hundred fifty dollars for each offense. No penalty assessed under this
subsection (2) may be reduced.
(3) The supreme court shall prescribe by rule a schedule of
monetary penalties for designated traffic infractions. This rule shall
also specify the conditions under which local courts may exercise
discretion in assessing fines and penalties for traffic infractions.
The legislature respectfully requests the supreme court to adjust this
schedule every two years for inflation.
(4) There shall be a penalty of twenty-five dollars for failure to
respond to a notice of traffic infraction except where the infraction
relates to parking as defined by local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution or failure to pay a monetary penalty imposed pursuant to
this chapter. A local legislative body may set a monetary penalty not
to exceed twenty-five dollars for failure to respond to a notice of
traffic infraction relating to parking as defined by local law,
ordinance, regulation, or resolution. The local court, whether a
municipal, police, or district court, shall impose the monetary penalty
set by the local legislative body.
(5) Monetary penalties provided for in chapter 46.70 RCW which are
civil in nature and penalties which may be assessed for violations of
chapter 46.44 RCW relating to size, weight, and load of motor vehicles
are not subject to the limitation on the amount of monetary penalties
which may be imposed pursuant to this chapter.
(6) Whenever a monetary penalty is imposed by a court under this
chapter it is immediately payable. If ((the person is unable to pay at
that time the court may, in its discretion, grant an extension of the
period in which the penalty may be paid. If the penalty is not paid on
or before the time established for payment the court shall notify the
department of the failure to pay the penalty)) a person is not able to
pay a monetary penalty in full, and not more than one year has passed
since the later of the effective date of this act or the date the
penalty became payable, the court shall offer to enter into a payment
plan with the person, unless the person has previously been granted a
payment plan with respect to the same monetary penalty, in which case
the court may, at its discretion, implement a payment plan. Once a
person has entered into a payment plan and made an initial payment, the
court shall notify the department that the infraction has been
adjudicated, and the department shall rescind any suspension of the
person's driver's license or driver's privilege based on failure to
respond to that infraction. "Payment plan," as used in this section,
means a plan that requires reasonable payments based on the financial
ability of the person to pay. The person may voluntarily pay an amount
at any time in addition to the payments required under the payment
plan:
(a) If a payment required to be made under the payment plan is
delinquent or the person fails to complete a community restitution
program on or before the time established under the payment plan,
unless the court determines good cause therefore and adjusts the
payment plan or the community restitution plan accordingly, the court
shall notify the department of the person's failure to meet the
conditions of the plan, and the department shall suspend the person's
driver's license or driving privilege until the penalty has been paid
((and the penalty provided in subsection (4) of this section has been
paid)), including penalties imposed under subsection (4) of this
section, or until the court notifies the department that the person is
again participating in a payment plan or community restitution plan
approved by the court.
(b) If a person has not entered into a payment plan with the court
and has not paid the penalty in full on or before the time established
for payment, the court shall notify the department of the delinquency.
The department shall suspend the person's driver's license or driving
privilege until the penalty has been paid, including the penalty in
subsection (4) of this section, or until the person has entered into a
payment plan or community restitution plan under this section.
(c) If the payment plan is to be administered by the court, the
court may assess the person a reasonable administrative fee to be
wholly retained by the city or county with jurisdiction. The
administrative fee shall not exceed ten dollars per infraction.
(d) Nothing in this section precludes a court from contracting with
an outside entity to administer a payment plan. When an outside entity
is used for the administration of a plan, the court may assess the
person a reasonable fee for those administrative services. Fees
collected under this subsection shall be wholly retained by the city or
county with jurisdiction, for payment of costs of administration.
(e) If a community restitution program for offenders is available
in the jurisdiction, the court shall allow conversion of all or part of
the monetary penalties due under this subsection (6) to community
restitution if the person is unable to make reasonable time payments.
(f) No person may enter into a second or subsequent payment plan if
he or she is failing to meet the conditions of a prior plan.
(7) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this section
and not subject to the limitation of subsection (1) of this section, a
person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be assessed
a fee of five dollars per infraction. Under no circumstances shall
this fee be reduced or waived. Revenue from this fee shall be
forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the emergency medical
services and trauma care system trust account under RCW 70.168.040.
(8)(a) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this
section and not subject to the limitation of subsection (1) of this
section, a person found to have committed a traffic infraction other
than of RCW 46.61.527 shall be assessed an additional penalty of ten
dollars. The court may not reduce, waive, or suspend the additional
penalty unless the court finds the offender to be indigent. If a
community restitution program for offenders is available in the
jurisdiction, the court shall allow offenders to offset all or a part
of the penalty due under this subsection (8) by participation in the
community restitution program.
(b) Revenue from the additional penalty must be remitted under
chapters 2.08, 3.46, 3.50, 3.62, 10.82, and 35.20 RCW. Money remitted
under this subsection to the state treasurer must be deposited as
provided in RCW 43.08.250. The balance of the revenue received by the
county or city treasurer under this subsection must be deposited into
the county or city current expense fund. Moneys retained by the city
or county under this subsection shall constitute reimbursement for any
liabilities under RCW 43.135.060.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.64.025 and 1999 c 86 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever any person violates his or her written promise to
appear in court, ((or)) fails to appear for a scheduled court hearing,
or fails to comply with the terms of a citation, the court in which the
defendant failed to appear or comply shall promptly give notice of such
fact to the department of licensing. Whenever thereafter the case in
which the defendant failed to appear or comply is adjudicated, the
court hearing the case shall promptly file with the department a
certificate showing that the case has been adjudicated.
(2)(a) Where compliance with the terms of a misdemeanor citation
includes the payment of a monetary penalty, and a person is not able to
pay the monetary penalty in full, and not more than one year has passed
since the later of the effective date of this act or the date payment
of the penalty became due, the court shall offer to enter into a
payment plan with the person, unless the person has previously been
granted a payment plan with respect to the same monetary penalty, in
which case the court may, at its discretion, implement a payment plan.
"Payment plan," as used in this section, means a plan that requires
reasonable payments based on the financial ability of the person to
pay. The person may voluntarily pay any amount at any time in addition
to these payments. If a person has entered into a payment plan under
this subsection, the court shall not notify the department of licensing
that the person has failed to comply with the terms of a citation as it
applies to payment of the monetary penalty unless a payment required to
be made under the payment plan is delinquent and the court has not
determined good cause therefore and adjusted the payment plan or the
community restitution plan accordingly.
(b) If the payment plan is to be administered by the court, the
court may assess the person a reasonable administrative fee to be
wholly retained by the city or county with jurisdiction. The
administrative fee shall not exceed ten dollars per misdemeanor.
(c) Nothing in this section precludes a court from contracting with
an outside entity to administer a payment plan. When an outside entity
is used for the administration of a plan, the court may assess the
person a reasonable fee for those administrative services. Fees
collected under this subsection shall be wholly retained by the city or
county with jurisdiction, for payment of costs of administration.
(d) No person may enter into a second or subsequent payment plan if
he or she is failing to comply with the terms of a prior plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect January 1, 2004.

--- END ---