BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2002 c 242 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
The legislature finds that the community economic revitalization
board plays a valuable and unique role in stimulating and diversifying
local economies, attracting private investment, creating new jobs, and
generating additional state and local tax revenues by investing in
public facilities projects that result in new or expanded economic
development. The legislature also finds that it is in the best
interest of the state and local communities to secure a stable and
dedicated source of funds for the community economic revitalization
board. It is the intent of the legislature to establish an ongoing
funding source for the community economic revitalization board that
will be used exclusively to advance economic development
infrastructure. ((This act provides a temporary funding source until
such time as a more permanent funding solution can be established.))
This act provides a partial funding solution by directing that
beginning July 1, 2005, the interest earnings generated by the public
works assistance account shall be used to fund the community economic
revitalization board's financial assistance programs. These funds are
not for use other than for the stated purpose and goals of the
community economic revitalization board.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.84.092 and 2002 c 242 s 2, 2002 c 114 s 24, and
2002 c 56 s 402 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking
water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund,
the federal forest revolving account, the health services account, the
public health services account, the health system capacity account, the
personal health services account, the state higher education
construction account, the higher education construction account, the
highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account,
the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan
revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health
supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puyallup
tribal settlement account, the regional transportation investment
district account, the resource management cost account, the site
closure account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the
state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the
Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system
plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco
settlement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the
tuition recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond
retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the
volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation equipment
fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement account,
the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the
urban arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.84 RCW
to read as follows:
The proportionate share of earnings based on the average daily
balance in the public works assistance account shall be placed in the
public facilities construction loan revolving fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 2 and 3 of this act take effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---