BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limits and provisions of this section, a credit
is authorized against the tax otherwise due under this chapter for
corporations establishing corporate headquarters in this state, or
expanding or adding to an existing corporate headquarters.
(2) In order to qualify for the credit, each of the following shall
be satisfied:
(a) The qualifying real property costs of the corporate
headquarters establishment, expansion, or addition are at least fifty
thousand dollars. "Qualifying real property costs" means:
(i) Costs incurred in the design, preparation, and development of
establishing, expanding, or adding to a corporate headquarters; and
(ii)(A) Direct construction costs; or
(B) With respect to leased facilities, direct lease costs during
the first five years of operations for the corporate headquarters.
(b) The headquarters establishment, expansion, or addition results
in the creation of:
(i) At least forty new jobs performing headquarters related
functions and services or research and development related functions
and services. These jobs must be permanent, full-time positions
located in this state; and
(ii) At least twenty of the above-referenced new jobs must be
classified as headquarters staff employees.
(c) The corporation principally conducts high-technology
activities.
(3) The amount of the credit is equal to twenty percent of the
qualifying real property costs listed in subsection (2)(a) of this
section.
(4) For a headquarters establishment, expansion, or addition that
meets the criteria of subsection (2) of this section, an additional
credit equal to twenty percent of the cost for tangible personal
property may be taken if the following conditions are met:
(a) The personal property is:
(i) Capitalized as personal property for federal income tax
purposes; and
(ii) Purchased for the establishment, expansion, or addition of a
corporate headquarters, or for the establishment, expansion, or
addition of a research and development facility which is part of the
same corporate project as the headquarters establishment, addition, or
expansion; and
(iii) Used for corporate headquarters related functions and
services or research and development related functions and services in
this state.
(b) The establishment, expansion, or addition of a corporate
headquarters or research and development facility results in:
(i) The creation of at least seventy-five new full-time jobs
performing either:
(A) Headquarters related functions and services; or
(B) Research and development related functions and services.
The jobs must have an average level of income of more than one and
one-half times the per capita income of this state based on the most
recent estimates of current per capita income data available from the
office of financial management as of the end of the reporting period in
which the jobs are filled; and
(ii) An average income level of all the corporation's employees in
this state of more than twice the per capita income in the state based
on the most recent estimates of current per capita income data
available from the office of financial management as of the end of the
reporting period in which the jobs are filled.
(5)(a)(i) For facilities which are constructed, the credit may only
be claimed in the reporting period when the headquarters establishment,
expansion, or addition, and the research and development facility
establishment, expansion, or addition, in the case of corporations
qualifying under subsection (4) of this section, is placed in service
for federal income tax purposes. For construction projects completed
in phases and placed in service for federal income tax purposes in more
than one reporting period, the credit may only be claimed in the
reporting period in which property that qualifies for the credit is
placed in service. Credits may not be obtained for costs incurred more
than three years after the reporting period in which the first property
for which the credit is claimed is placed in service. The credit may
not be claimed for personal property which replaces personal property
for which the credit was already claimed. The department may for good
cause extend the time for incurring additional costs and for claiming
the credit if the project is not completed within the time period
allowed by this subsection (5).
(ii) For leased real property, the credit may only be claimed in
the reporting period in which the first direct lease costs are
incurred.
(b) The staffing requirements of subsection (2)(b) of this section
and, if applicable, subsection (4)(b) of this section, shall be met by
the end of the second calendar year following the most recent calendar
year in which the credit is claimed. The person claiming the credit
shall provide documented plans to meet the staffing requirements at the
time the credit is first claimed in a form and manner as required by
the department. If the staffing requirements are not met within the
time required by this subsection (5), the person that claimed the
credits shall be liable for payment of the additional taxes represented
by the amount of credits taken under this section, with interest.
(6) Unused credit may be carried forward for ten years after the
credit is claimed. Unused credit may be carried forward fifteen years
after the credit is claimed if the criteria set forth in subsection
(4)(b) of this section are met. No credit may be claimed in a
reporting period in which the qualifying employment requirements
provided in this section are not met.
(7) For the purposes of this section, unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, the following definitions apply.
(a) "Corporate headquarters" means the facility or portion of a
facility where corporate staff employees are physically employed, and
where the majority of the company's financial, personnel, legal,
planning, information technology, or other headquarters related
functions are handled either on a regional or national basis. A
corporate headquarters must be a regional corporate headquarters or a
national corporate headquarters.
(i) National corporate headquarters must be the sole corporate
headquarters in the nation and handle headquarters related functions on
a national basis. A national corporate headquarters is deemed to
handle headquarters related functions on a national basis from this
state if the corporation has a facility in this state from which the
corporation engages in interstate commerce by providing goods or
services for customers outside of this state in return for
compensation.
(ii) Regional corporate headquarters must be the sole corporate
headquarters within the region and must handle headquarters related
functions on a regional basis. For purposes of this section, "region"
or "regional" means a geographic area comprised of either:
(A) At least five states, including this state; or
(B) Two or more states, including this state, if the entire
business operations of the corporation are performed within fewer than
five states.
(b) "New job" means an employment position created in the
corporation in this state at the time the new facility, expansion, or
addition is initially staffed, but does not include an employment
position created when an employee is transferred from an existing
location in this state to the new or expanded facility. "New job"
includes an employment position that is created at a temporary location
in this state pending completion of the new facility, expansion, or
addition.
(c) "Full-time position" means an employment position requiring a
minimum of thirty-five hours of labor per week.
(d) "Headquarters related functions and services" means financial,
personnel, administrative, legal, planning, information technology, or
similar business activities.
(e) "Headquarters staff employees" means executive, administrative,
or professional employees performing headquarters related functions and
services.
(i) An "executive employee" means an employee in a full-time
position in which the employee spends at least eighty percent of his or
her time managing the enterprise and directing the work of at least two
employees. An executive employee has the authority to hire and fire or
to make recommendations related to hiring, firing, advancement, and
promotion decisions, and must customarily exercise discretionary
powers.
(ii) An "administrative employee" means an employee in a full-time
position who does not perform manual labor and whose employment is
directly related to management policies or general headquarters
operations. An administrative employee must customarily exercise
discretion and independent judgment.
(iii) A "professional employee" means an employee whose primary
duty is work requiring knowledge of an advanced type in a field of
science or learning. This knowledge is characterized by a prolonged
course of specialized study. The work must be original and creative in
nature, and the work may not be standardized over a specific period of
time. The work must require consistent exercise of discretion and the
employee must spend at least eighty percent of the time performing
headquarters related functions and services.
(f) "Research and development" means the same as in RCW 82.63.010.
(g) "Research and development facility" means the same as
"qualified buildings" under RCW 82.63.010.
(h) "Direct lease costs" means cash lease payments. The term does
not include any accrued, costs.
(i) "High-technology" means "advanced computing," "advanced
materials," "biotechnology," "electronic device technology," or
"environmental technology" as those terms are defined in RCW 82.63.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---