BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.01.230 and 1994 c 262 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of licensing is authorized to accept checks and
money orders for payment of drivers' licenses, certificates of
ownership and registration, motor vehicle excise taxes, gross weight
fees, and other fees and taxes collected by the department, in
accordance with regulations adopted by the director. The director's
regulations shall duly provide for the public's convenience consistent
with sound business practice and shall encourage the annual renewal of
vehicle registrations by mail to the department, authorizing checks and
money orders for payment. Such regulations shall contain provisions
for cancellation of any registrations, licenses, or permits paid for by
checks or money orders which are not duly paid and for the necessary
accounting procedures in such cases: PROVIDED, That any bona fide
purchaser for value of a vehicle shall not be liable or responsible for
any prior uncollected taxes and fees paid, pursuant to this section, by
a check which has subsequently been dishonored: AND PROVIDED FURTHER,
That no transfer of ownership of a vehicle may be denied to a bona fide
purchaser for value of a vehicle if there are outstanding uncollected
fees or taxes for which a predecessor paid, pursuant to this section,
by check which has subsequently been dishonored nor shall the new owner
be required to pay any fee for replacement vehicle license number
plates that may be required pursuant to RCW 46.16.270 as now or
hereafter amended.
(2) It is a traffic infraction to fail to surrender within ten days
to the department or any authorized agent of the department any
certificate, license, or permit after being notified that such
certificate, license, or permit has been canceled pursuant to this
section. Notice of cancellation may be accomplished by sending a
notice by first class mail using the last known address in department
records for the holder of the certificate, license, or permit, and
recording the transmittal on an affidavit of first class mail.
(3) Whenever registrations, licenses, or permits have been paid for
by checks that have been dishonored by nonacceptance or nonpayment, a
reasonable handling fee may be assessed for each such instrument.
Notwithstanding provisions of any other laws, county auditors, agents,
and subagents, appointed or approved by the director pursuant to RCW
46.01.140, may collect restitution, and where they have collected
restitution may retain the reasonable handling fee. The amount of the
reasonable handling fee may be set by rule by the director.
(4) In those counties where the county auditor has been appointed
an agent of the director under RCW 46.01.140, the auditor shall
continue to process mail-in registration renewals until directed
otherwise by legislative authority. Subagents appointed by the
director under RCW 46.01.140 have the same authority to mail out
registrations and replacement plates to internet payment option
customers as the agents until directed otherwise by legislative
authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect October 1, 2003.

--- END ---