BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.19.050 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 9 s 7 are each amended
to read as follows:
The litter tax imposed in this chapter does not apply to:
(1) The manufacture or sale of products for use and consumption
outside the state;
(2) The value of products or gross proceeds of the sales exempt
from tax under RCW 82.04.330; ((or))
(3) The sale of products for resale by a qualified grocery
distribution cooperative to customer-owners of the grocery distribution
cooperative. For the purposes of this section, "qualified grocery
distribution cooperative" and "customer-owner" have the meanings given
in RCW 82.04.298; or
(4) The sale of food or beverages by retailers that are sold solely
for consumption indoors on the seller's premises.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---