BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.30 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This section applies to policies of property insurance if the
insured or proposed insured is:
(a) An individual;
(b) A religious organization;
(c) An educational organization; or
(d) Any other nonprofit organization that is organized and operated
for religious, charitable, or educational purposes.
(2) An insurer may not cancel, refuse to issue, or refuse to renew
a policy described in subsection (1) of this section solely on the
basis that the insured or a similarly situated insured has made one or
more claims against a policy during the preceding sixty months for a
loss that is the result of malicious harassment under RCW 9A.36.080 and
committed against the person or property of the insured.
(3) Upon cancellation of or refusal to renew any policy subject to
this section after an insured covered by subsection (1) of this section
has submitted a claim that is the result of malicious harassment
committed against the person or property of the insured, the insurer
shall report the cancellation or nonrenewal to the commissioner.
(4) A violation of this section is an unfair practice under RCW
49.60.030.
(5) Nothing in this section prevents an insurer from taking any of
the actions set forth in subsection (2) of this section on the basis of
criteria that are not made invalid by this section or any other rule or
law.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.60.030 and 1997 c 271 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The right to be free from discrimination because of race,
creed, color, national origin, sex, or the presence of any sensory,
mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or
service animal by a disabled person is recognized as and declared to be
a civil right. This right shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) The right to obtain and hold employment without discrimination;
(b) The right to the full enjoyment of any of the accommodations,
advantages, facilities, or privileges of any place of public resort,
accommodation, assemblage, or amusement;
(c) The right to engage in real estate transactions without
discrimination, including discrimination against families with
children;
(d) The right to engage in credit transactions without
discrimination;
(e) The right to engage in insurance transactions or transactions
with health maintenance organizations without discrimination:
PROVIDED, That a practice which is not unlawful under RCW 48.30.300,
48.44.220, ((or)) 48.46.370, or section 1 of this act does not
constitute an unfair practice for the purposes of this subparagraph;
and
(f) The right to engage in commerce free from any discriminatory
boycotts or blacklists. Discriminatory boycotts or blacklists for
purposes of this section shall be defined as the formation or execution
of any express or implied agreement, understanding, policy or
contractual arrangement for economic benefit between any persons which
is not specifically authorized by the laws of the United States and
which is required or imposed, either directly or indirectly, overtly or
covertly, by a foreign government or foreign person in order to
restrict, condition, prohibit, or interfere with or in order to exclude
any person or persons from any business relationship on the basis of
race, color, creed, religion, sex, the presence of any sensory, mental,
or physical disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or service
animal by a disabled person, or national origin or lawful business
relationship: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That nothing herein contained shall
prohibit the use of boycotts as authorized by law pertaining to labor
disputes and unfair labor practices.
(2) Any person deeming himself or herself injured by any act in
violation of this chapter shall have a civil action in a court of
competent jurisdiction to enjoin further violations, or to recover the
actual damages sustained by the person, or both, together with the cost
of suit including reasonable attorneys' fees or any other appropriate
remedy authorized by this chapter or the United States Civil Rights Act
of 1964 as amended, or the Federal Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988
(42 U.S.C. Sec. 3601 et seq.).
(3) Except for any unfair practice committed by an employer against
an employee or a prospective employee, or any unfair practice in a real
estate transaction which is the basis for relief specified in the
amendments to RCW 49.60.225 contained in chapter 69, Laws of 1993, any
unfair practice prohibited by this chapter which is committed in the
course of trade or commerce as defined in the Consumer Protection Act,
chapter 19.86 RCW, is, for the purpose of applying that chapter, a
matter affecting the public interest, is not reasonable in relation to
the development and preservation of business, and is an unfair or
deceptive act in trade or commerce.

--- END ---