BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.16.340 and 1991 c 212 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All claims or causes of action based on intentional conduct
brought by any person for recovery of damages for injury suffered as a
result of childhood sexual abuse shall be commenced within the later of
the following periods:
(a) Within ((three)) ten years of the act alleged to have caused
the injury or condition;
(b) Within ((three)) ten years of the time the victim discovered or
reasonably should have discovered that the injury or condition was
caused by said act; or
(c) Within ((three)) ten years of the time the victim discovered
that the act caused the injury for which the claim is brought:
PROVIDED, That the time limit for commencement of an action under
this section is tolled for a child until the child reaches the age of
eighteen years.
(2) The victim need not establish which act in a series of
continuing sexual abuse or exploitation incidents caused the injury
complained of, but may compute the date of discovery from the date of
discovery of the last act by the same perpetrator which is part of a
common scheme or plan of sexual abuse or exploitation.
(3) The knowledge of a custodial parent or guardian shall not be
imputed to a person under the age of eighteen years.
(4) For purposes of this section, "child" means a person under the
age of eighteen years.
(5) As used in this section, "childhood sexual abuse" means any act
committed by the defendant against a complainant who was less than
eighteen years of age at the time of the act and which act would have
been a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW or RCW 9.68A.040 or prior laws of
similar effect at the time the act was committed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1(1) of this act applies to all
claims or causes of action arising on or after the effective date of
this act and any claim or cause of action arising before the effective
date of this act that, as of the effective date of this act, was not
barred because of the expiration of the applicable statute of
limitations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---