BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.4451 and 1997 c 238 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed against the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter, as
provided in this section. The maximum credit for a taxpayer for a
reporting period is ((thirty-five)) seventy dollars multiplied by the
number of months in the reporting period, as determined under RCW
82.32.045.
(2) When the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter is
equal to or less than the maximum credit, a credit is allowed equal to
the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter.
(3) When the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter exceeds
the maximum credit, a reduced credit is allowed equal to twice the
maximum credit, minus the tax otherwise due under this chapter, but not
less than zero.
(4) The department may prepare a tax credit table consisting of tax
ranges using increments of no more than five dollars and a
corresponding tax credit to be applied to those tax ranges. The table
shall be prepared in such a manner that no taxpayer will owe a greater
amount of tax by using the table than would be owed by performing the
calculation under subsections (1) through (3) of this section. A table
prepared by the department under this subsection shall be used by all
taxpayers in taking the credit provided in this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.16.040 and 1996 c 111 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to persons engaging
in one or more businesses taxable under this chapter whose total gross
income is less than ((two)) four thousand dollars for a monthly period
or portion thereof. Any person claiming exemption under this section
may be required to file returns even though no tax may be due. If the
total gross income for a taxable monthly period is two thousand
dollars, or more, no exemption or deductions from the gross operating
revenue is allowed by this provision.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.32.045 and 1999 c 357 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, payments of the
taxes imposed under chapters 82.04, 82.08, 82.12, 82.14, and 82.16 RCW,
along with reports and returns on forms prescribed by the department,
are due monthly within twenty-five days after the end of the month in
which the taxable activities occur.
(2) The department of revenue may relieve any taxpayer or class of
taxpayers from the obligation of remitting monthly and may require the
return to cover other longer reporting periods, but in no event may
returns be filed for a period greater than one year. For these
taxpayers, tax payments are due on or before the last day of the month
next succeeding the end of the period covered by the return.
(3) The department of revenue may also require verified annual
returns from any taxpayer, setting forth such additional information as
it may deem necessary to correctly determine tax liability.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the
department may relieve any person of the requirement to file returns if
the following conditions are met:
(a) The person's value of products, gross proceeds of sales, or
gross income of the business, from all business activities taxable
under chapter 82.04 RCW, is less than ((twenty-eight)) fifty-six
thousand dollars per year;
(b) The person's gross income of the business from all activities
taxable under chapter 82.16 RCW is less than ((twenty-four)) forty-eight thousand dollars per year; and
(c) The person is not required to collect or pay to the department
of revenue any other tax or fee which the department is authorized to
collect.

--- END ---