BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
A school district may choose to comply with a requirement of any
nature imposed by the state, or any instrumentality of the state, if
the total state moneys provided to the school district that may be
expended or are required to be expended by the school district to meet
the requirement are not sufficient to pay for all the costs of meeting
the requirement. If these state moneys are not sufficient, the
requirement shall lose its mandatory nature and shall become a
recommendation or option for the school district and a penalty may not
be imposed on the school district for failing to comply with the
requirement.

--- END ---