BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 57.08.016 and 1999 c 153 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be no private sale of real property where the
((appraised)) estimated value exceeds the sum of two thousand five
hundred dollars. Estimated value shall be determined by the board of
commissioners based upon advice from a real estate appraiser or broker
as it considers appropriate. Subject to the provisions of subsection
(2) of this section, no real property of the district shall be sold for
less than ninety percent of the value ((thereof as)). Where the
estimated value exceeds two thousand five hundred dollars, an appraised
value shall be established by a written appraisal made not more than
six months prior to the date of sale by three disinterested real estate
brokers licensed under the laws of the state or by one professionally
designated real estate appraiser((s)) as defined in RCW 74.46.020. The
appraisal shall be signed by the brokers or appraiser((s)) and filed
with the secretary of the board of commissioners of the district, who
shall keep it at the office of the district open to public inspection.
Any notice of intention to sell real property of the district shall
recite the estimated value, or the appraised value ((thereof)) if an
appraisal has been made.
(2) If no purchasers can be obtained for the property at ninety
percent or more of its appraised value after one hundred twenty days of
offering the property for sale, the board of commissioners of the
district may adopt a resolution stating that the district has been
unable to sell the property at the ninety percent amount. The district
then may sell the property at the highest price it can obtain at public
auction. A notice of intention to sell at public auction shall be
published once a week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of
general circulation in the district. The notice shall describe the
property, state the time and place at which it will be offered for sale
and the terms of sale, and shall call for bids, fix the conditions
thereof, and reserve the right to reject any and all bids for good
cause.
(3) As an alternative to the requirements under subsections (1) and
(2) of this section, a water-sewer district may dispose of easements or
other interests in real property by private sale, even when the
estimated value exceeds the sum of two thousand five hundred dollars,
when the potential buyer owns real property abutting or adjacent to the
real property, and when the board of commissioners has determined that
no productive use could be made of the property other than by
incorporation with the abutting or adjacent real property.
Determination of appraised value, selling price, and procedures for
sale shall be as described in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
Notice of a proposed private sale shall be given as described in RCW
57.08.015.

--- END ---