BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.93 RCW
to read as follows:
For a proposal by a city to assume less than all of the area of a
water-sewer district under chapter 35.13A RCW:
(1) In addition to the factors of RCW 36.93.170, the board shall
consider the following factors and the effect of the proposal on the
following factors:
(a) Rates and charges for the city and district systems;
(b) Operation and maintenance of the city and district systems;
(c) Staffing levels and employees of the city and district;
(d) Condition, age, and type of system facilities in the city and
district;
(e) Water supply rights and contracts and sewer service contracts
of the city and district; and
(f) Financing of capital improvements to the city and district
systems.
(2) In accordance with the first paragraph of RCW 35.13A.050, the
board shall identify the relevant facilities and determine as part of
its decision the economically useful life, sufficient available
capacity, and reasonable rates for the facilities.
(3) The board shall determine as part of its decision a division of
assets and liabilities between the city and district.
(4) The board shall hire a consultant or consultants to prepare a
report on the factors, identifications, and determinations of
subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section. The consultants shall
consider any information or reports prepared by the city and district
regarding the proposal. The cost of the consultant's report shall be
borne by the city.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.13A RCW
to read as follows:
When a city assumes less than all of the territory of a water-sewer
district under this chapter, the city shall install and maintain, at
its cost and expense, a water consumption meter on every line providing
water between the district and the city. Each meter shall be located
at the boundary between the city and district or as close thereto as
physically possible, or as agreed to by the city and district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35.13A RCW
to read as follows:
If a city desires to impose a utility business and occupation tax
on water delivered to or sewer service provided in territory assumed
under this chapter, it shall pass an ordinance specifically imposing
the tax on the delivery or service, even if it has passed a general
ordinance imposing the tax. The ordinance shall be deemed to impose
the tax for the first time in the assumed territory for purposes of RCW
35.21.706, and shall be subject to referendum in accordance with RCW
35.21.706. The ordinance shall be effective before the filing of a
notice of intention in counties with a boundary review board, or before
the passage of the ordinance assuming the territory in counties without
a boundary review board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---