BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.24.300 and 1985 c 443 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person, including but not limited to ((a)) health care
professionals, health care personnel, and volunteer providers of
emergency or medical services, who, without compensation or the
expectation of compensation renders emergency care at the scene of an
emergency or who participates in transporting, not for compensation or
the expectation of compensation, therefrom an injured person or persons
for emergency medical treatment shall not be liable for civil damages
resulting from any act or omission in the rendering of such emergency
care or in transporting such persons, other than acts or omissions
constituting gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct. Any
person rendering emergency care during the course of regular employment
and receiving compensation or expecting to receive compensation for
rendering such care is excluded from the protection of this subsection.

--- END ---