BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
Any person, including but not limited to contractors, builders,
tradespeople, and other providers of construction, remodel, or repair
services, who, without compensation or the expectation of compensation,
renders emergency repairs to any structure at the scene of any
accident, disaster, or emergency that has caused or resulted in damage
to the structure is not liable for civil damages resulting from any act
or omission in the rendering of such emergency repairs, other than acts
or omissions constituting gross negligence or willful or wanton
misconduct. Any person rendering emergency repairs during the course
of regular employment and receiving compensation or expecting to
receive compensation for rendering such repairs is excluded from the
protection of this section.
For the purposes of this section, "accident, disaster, or
emergency" includes an earthquake, windstorm, hurricane, landslide,
flood, volcanic eruption, explosion, fire, or any similar occurrence.

--- END ---