BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Citizens demand and deserve more accountability of public
programs;
(2) Washington state government and other entities that receive tax
dollars must continuously improve the way they operate and deliver
services so citizens receive maximum value for their tax dollars;
(3) A comprehensive system of measuring performance is necessary to
evaluate the effectiveness of agency programs and agency performance
management practices, and to demonstrate accountability; and
(4) Fair, independent, and professional audits of agency
performance are necessary to ensure that government programs are
achieving their intended goals and using their resources in the most
productive manner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 For purposes of sections 3 through 6 of this
act:
(1) "Board" means the citizen oversight board created in section 3
of this act.
(2) "Draft work plan" means the work plan for conducting
performance audits of state agencies proposed by the board based on the
statewide performance system review.
(3) "Final performance audit report" means a written document
released by the citizen oversight board that includes the findings and
comments from the preliminary performance audit report.
(4) "Final work plan" means the work plan for conducting
performance audits of state agencies adopted by the board.
(5) "Performance audit" means an objective and systematic
assessment of a state agency or any of its programs, functions, or
activities by an independent evaluator in order to help public
officials improve efficiency, effectiveness, and accountability.
Performance audits include economy and efficiency audits and program
effectiveness audits.
(6) "Performance system review" means an objective and systematic
assessment of a state agency's performance and outcome measures and its
systems for managing towards accomplishment of the outcomes.
(7) "Preliminary performance audit report" means a written document
prepared after the completion of a performance audit to be submitted
for comment before the final performance audit report. The preliminary
performance audit report must contain the audit findings and any
proposed recommendations to improve the efficiency, effectiveness, or
accountability of the state agency being audited.
(8) "State agency" or "agency" means a state agency, department,
office, officer, board, commission, bureau, division, institution, or
institution of higher education. "State agency" includes all elective
offices in the executive branch of state government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The citizen oversight board is created
to improve efficiency, effectiveness, and accountability in state
government.
(2) The board shall consist of eight members as follows:
(a) One member shall be the state auditor, who shall be a nonvoting
member;
(b) One member shall be the chair of the joint legislative audit
and review committee, or his or her designee, who shall be a nonvoting
member;
(c) One member shall be the director of the office of financial
management, who shall be a nonvoting member;
(d) Four of the members shall be selected by the governor as
follows: Each major caucus of the house of representatives and the
senate shall submit a list of three names. The lists may not include
the names of members of the legislature. The governor shall select a
person from each list provided by each caucus; and
(e) The governor shall select one additional member.
(3) The board shall elect a chair. Neither the chair of the joint
legislative audit and review committee, the director of the office of
financial management, nor the state auditor may serve as chair.
(4) Appointees shall be individuals who have a basic understanding
of state government operations with knowledge and expertise in
performance management, quality management, strategic planning,
performance assessments, or closely related fields.
(5) Members selected under subsection (2)(d) and (e) of this
section shall serve for terms of four years, with the terms expiring on
June 30th on the fourth year of the term. However, in the case of the
initial members, two members shall serve four-year terms, two members
shall serve three-year terms, and one member shall serve a two-year
term, with each of the terms expiring on June 30th of the applicable
year. Appointees may be reappointed to serve more than one term.
(6) The joint legislative audit and review committee and the office
of financial management shall provide clerical, technical, and
management personnel to the board to serve as the board's staff
jointly.
(7) The board shall meet at least once a quarter and may hold
additional meetings at the call of the chair or by a majority vote of
the members of the board.
(8) The members of the board shall be compensated in accordance
with RCW 43.03.220 and reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance
with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The board will work with the office of
financial management and the joint legislative audit and review
committee regarding reviews of agency performance measurement systems.
The reviews shall include regular assessments of the measures and
methods that state agencies use to manage program and agency
performance.
(a) The office of financial management shall review the performance
measurement systems of state agencies. The purpose of these reviews is
to ensure that the governor, agency management, and the legislature
have the means to adequately and accurately assess the performance and
outcomes of those agencies and departments. Where two or more agencies
have shared responsibility for functions or priorities of government,
these reviews can also ensure that effective interagency cooperation
and collaboration occurs in areas such as program coordination,
administrative structures, information systems, and administration of
grants and loans.
(b) The office of financial management shall review the performance
measurement system of each agency, board, department, or institution
not less than every five years. In setting the schedule and the extent
of reviews, the office of financial management shall consider the
timing and results of other recent reviews and audits conducted by the
joint legislative audit and review committee and performance audits
under subsection (2) of this section, the seriousness of past findings,
any inadequate remedial action taken by an agency, department, or
institution, whether a state agency lacks performance and outcome
measures, and the desirability to include a diverse range of agencies
each year.
(c) The office of financial management shall work with the board to
develop the criteria, schedule, and methodology for conducting these
reviews. The reviews may include, but not be limited to, the
following:
(i) A determination of whether the performance and outcome measures
are consistent with legislative mandates, strategic plans, mission
statements, and goals and objectives, and whether the legislature has
established clear mandates, strategic plans, mission statements, and
goals and objectives that lend themselves to performance and outcome
measure;
(ii) An examination of how agency management uses the measures to
manage resources in an efficient and effective manner;
(iii) An assessment of how performance benchmarks are used to
assess overall performance compared to external standards and
benchmarks;
(iv) An examination of how measurement data is used to make
planning and operational improvements;
(v) A determination of how performance measures are used in the
budget planning, development, and allotment process and the extent to
which the agency is in compliance with its responsibilities under RCW
43.88.090;
(vi) A review of how performance data are reported to the
legislature;
(vii) An assessment of whether the performance measure data are
reliable and collected in a uniform and timely manner;
(viii) An assessment of whether the collection of measures used by
an agency is balanced and reflects service quality, internal and
external customer satisfaction, productivity, efficiency, program
effectiveness, and regulatory compliance;
(ix) An assessment of the effectiveness of agency programs related
to planning, resourcing, organizing, directing, and controlling program
operations, and the systems put in place for measuring, evaluating,
reporting, and monitoring program performance. Such systems include
personnel systems, purchasing systems, contracting systems,
organizational structures, and information technology systems; and
(x) Recommendations as necessary or appropriate.
(d) Completed performance measurement system reviews shall be
presented to the board and the governor and published on the internet.
Final reports shall also be transmitted to the joint legislative audit
and review committee and the appropriate policy and fiscal standing
committees of the legislature.
(e) The office of financial management shall provide guidance and
training to state agencies to support their development of performance
measurement systems.
(2) The board shall work with the state auditor's office and the
joint legislative audit and review committee regarding performance
audits of state government.
(a) The board shall establish criteria for performance audits.
Agencies shall be audited using criteria that include generally
accepted government auditing standards. Audits may evaluate the
effectiveness of agency programs as well as agency internal performance
management systems and controls.
(b) The board shall use the results of the performance system
reviews conducted by the office of financial management, as well as
input from citizens, state employees, state managers, the joint
legislative audit and review committee, public officials, and others to
prepare a draft work plan for conducting performance audits. The board
shall develop a schedule and common methodology for conducting these
audits.
(c) The draft work plan may include a list of agencies, programs,
or systems to be audited on a timeline decided by the board based on a
number of factors including risk, importance, and citizen concerns.
All audits shall be designed to be completed within a six-month period.
(d) Before adopting the final work plan, the board shall consult
with the legislative auditor and other appropriate oversight and audit
entities to coordinate work plans and avoid duplication of effort in
their planned performance audits of state government agencies. The
board shall defer to the joint legislative audit and review committee
work plan if a similar audit is included on both work plans for
auditing.
(e) The state auditor shall contract with qualified independent
evaluators to conduct the performance audits included in the final work
plan approved by the board. In conducting the audits, the independent
evaluator may consult with agency front-line employees and internal
auditors.
(f) The audits may evaluate efficiency as well as program
effectiveness and may include:
(i) The extent to which legislative, regulatory, or organizational
goals and objectives are being achieved;
(ii) The relative ability of alternative approaches to yield better
program performance or eliminate factors that inhibit program
effectiveness;
(iii) The relative cost and benefits or cost-effectiveness of
program performance;
(iv) Whether a program produced intended results or produced
effects that were not intended by the program's objectives;
(v) The extent to which programs duplicate, overlap, or conflict
with other related programs;
(vi) The validity and reliability of performance measures
concerning program effectiveness and results, or economy and
efficiency.
(g) Audits may also identify and recognize best practices.
(h) The state auditor shall solicit comments on preliminary
performance audit reports from the audited state agency, the office of
the governor, the office of financial management, the board, and the
joint legislative audit and review committee for comment. Comments
must be received within thirty days after receipt of the preliminary
performance audit report unless a different time period is approved by
the state auditor. All comments shall be incorporated into the final
performance audit report. The final audit report shall include the
objectives, scope, and methodology; the audit results, including
findings and recommendations; conclusions; and identification of best
practices.
(i) The final reports shall be submitted to the board by the state
auditor. The board shall release final reports to the citizens of
Washington, the governor, and the appropriate legislative committees.
Final performance audit reports shall be posted on the internet.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The citizen oversight board shall establish
an annual assessment and performance grading program. The program
shall consist of conducting annual performance assessments and grading
state agency performance. Assessments shall be implemented on a
phased-in schedule. Initial areas to be assessed shall include quality
management, productivity and fiscal efficiency, program effectiveness,
contract management and oversight, internal audit, internal and
external customer satisfaction, statutory and regulatory compliance,
and technology systems and on-line services. As part of this program,
the board shall:
(1) Consult with and seek input from elected officials, state
employees, and professionals with a background in performance
management for establishing the grading standards. In developing the
criteria, the board shall consider already developed best practices and
audit criteria used by government or nongovernment organizations.
Before the assessment, the agencies shall be given the criteria for the
assessment and the standards for grading; and
(2) Contract or partner with public or private entities that have
expertise in public sector reviews and/or technical expertise in
individual assessment areas to perform the assessments and grading of
all state agencies. The board may contract or partner with more than
one entity for different assessment areas.
The board shall submit the results of the assessment and grading
program to the governor, the appropriate legislative committees, and
the public by December 15th of each year. The results of the annual
assessments and performance grading shall be posted on the internet.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The reviewed agency is responsible for
follow-up and corrective action on performance measurement system
reviews. Agencies under the authority of or appointed by the governor
shall submit periodic progress reports detailing actions undertaken
toward achieving resolution to the governor and the board until all
resolution has occurred. Agencies under the authority of an elected
official other than the governor shall submit periodic progress reports
detailing actions undertaken toward achieving resolution to the board
until all resolution has occurred. Progress reports shall be available
on the internet.
(2) The audited agency is responsible for follow-up and corrective
action on all performance audit findings and recommendations. The
audited agency's plan for addressing each audit finding and
recommendation shall be included in the final audit report. The plan
shall provide the name of the contact person responsible for each
action, the action planned, and the anticipated completion date. If
the audited agency does not agree with the audit findings and
recommendations or believes action is not required, then the action
plan shall include an explanation and specific reasons.
Agencies under the authority of or appointed by the governor, shall
submit periodic progress reports to the governor and the board until
all resolution has occurred. Agencies under the authority of an
elected official other than the governor shall submit periodic reports
to the board of the action taken by the audited agency until all
resolution has occurred. Progress reports shall be available on the
internet.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.88 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to the authority given the state auditor in RCW
43.88.160(6), the state auditor is only authorized to contract for and
oversee performance audits pursuant to section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW
to read as follows:
The citizen oversight board created in section 3 of this act and
its powers and duties shall be terminated June 30, 2011, as provided in
section 9 of this act. The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall contract with a private entity for the review in this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective June 30, 2012:
(1) Section 2 of this act;
(2) Section 3 of this act;
(3) Section 4 of this act;
(4) Section 5 of this act;
(5) Section 6 of this act; and
(6) Section 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2004, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 2 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---