BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.44.020 and 2000 c 162 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Court" means the superior court of the state of Washington,
juvenile department.
(2) "Law enforcement agency" means the police department, the
prosecuting attorney, the state patrol, the director of public safety,
or the office of the sheriff.
(3) "Practitioner of the healing arts" or "practitioner" means a
person licensed by this state to practice podiatric medicine and
surgery, optometry, chiropractic, nursing, dentistry, osteopathic
medicine and surgery, or medicine and surgery or to provide other
health services. The term "practitioner" includes a duly accredited
Christian Science practitioner: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That a person who
is being furnished Christian Science treatment by a duly accredited
Christian Science practitioner will not be considered, for that reason
alone, a neglected person for the purposes of this chapter.
(4) "Institution" means a private or public hospital or any other
facility providing medical diagnosis, treatment or care.
(5) "Department" means the state department of social and health
services.
(6) "Child" or "children" means any person under the age of
eighteen years of age.
(7) "Professional school personnel" include, but are not limited
to, teachers, counselors, administrators, child care facility
personnel, and school nurses.
(8) "Social service counselor" means anyone engaged in a
professional capacity during the regular course of employment in
encouraging or promoting the health, welfare, support or education of
children, or providing social services to adults or families, including
mental health, drug and alcohol treatment, and domestic violence
programs, whether in an individual capacity, or as an employee or agent
of any public or private organization or institution.
(9) "Psychologist" means any person licensed to practice psychology
under chapter 18.83 RCW, whether acting in an individual capacity or as
an employee or agent of any public or private organization or
institution.
(10) "Pharmacist" means any registered pharmacist under chapter
18.64 RCW, whether acting in an individual capacity or as an employee
or agent of any public or private organization or institution.
(11) "Member of the clergy" means any regularly licensed,
accredited, or ordained minister, priest, ((or)) rabbi, imam, similarly
situated religious or spiritual leader of any church ((or)), religious
denomination, religious body, spiritual community, or sect, or person
performing official duties that are recognized as the duties of a
member of the clergy under the discipline, tenets, doctrine, or custom
of the person's church, religious denomination, religious body,
spiritual community, or sect, whether acting in an individual capacity
or as an employee ((or)), agent, or official of any public or private
organization or institution.
(12) "Abuse or neglect" means the injury, sexual abuse, sexual
exploitation, negligent treatment, or maltreatment of a child by any
person under circumstances which indicate that the child's health,
welfare, and safety is harmed, excluding conduct permitted under RCW
9A.16.100. An abused child is a child who has been subjected to child
abuse or neglect as defined in this section.
(13) "Child protective services section" means the child protective
services section of the department.
(14) "Sexual exploitation" includes: (a) Allowing, permitting, or
encouraging a child to engage in prostitution by any person; or (b)
allowing, permitting, encouraging, or engaging in the obscene or
pornographic photographing, filming, or depicting of a child by any
person.
(15) "Negligent treatment or maltreatment" means an act or omission
that evidences a serious disregard of consequences of such magnitude as
to constitute a clear and present danger to the child's health,
welfare, and safety. The fact that siblings share a bedroom is not, in
and of itself, negligent treatment or maltreatment.
(16) "Child protective services" means those services provided by
the department designed to protect children from child abuse and
neglect and safeguard such children from future abuse and neglect, and
conduct investigations of child abuse and neglect reports.
Investigations may be conducted regardless of the location of the
alleged abuse or neglect. Child protective services includes referral
to services to ameliorate conditions that endanger the welfare of
children, the coordination of necessary programs and services relevant
to the prevention, intervention, and treatment of child abuse and
neglect, and services to children to ensure that each child has a
permanent home. In determining whether protective services should be
provided, the department shall not decline to provide such services
solely because of the child's unwillingness or developmental inability
to describe the nature and severity of the abuse or neglect.
(17) "Malice" or "maliciously" means an evil intent, wish, or
design to vex, annoy, or injure another person. Such malice may be
inferred from an act done in willful disregard of the rights of
another, or an act wrongfully done without just cause or excuse, or an
act or omission of duty betraying a willful disregard of social duty.
(18) "Sexually aggressive youth" means a child who is defined in
RCW 74.13.075(1)(b) as being a sexually aggressive youth.
(19) "Unfounded" means available information indicates that, more
likely than not, child abuse or neglect did not occur. No unfounded
allegation of child abuse or neglect may be disclosed to a child-placing agency, private adoption agency, or any other provider licensed
under chapter 74.15 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.44.030 and 1999 c 267 s 20 and 1999 c 176 s 30 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) When any practitioner, county coroner or medical examiner,
law enforcement officer, professional school personnel, registered or
licensed nurse, social service counselor, psychologist, pharmacist,
member of the clergy, licensed or certified child care providers or
their employees, employee of the department, juvenile probation
officer, placement and liaison specialist, responsible living skills
program staff, HOPE center staff, or state family and children's
ombudsman or any volunteer in the ombudsman's office has reasonable
cause to believe that a child has suffered abuse or neglect, he or she
shall report such incident, or cause a report to be made, to the proper
law enforcement agency or to the department as provided in RCW
26.44.040.
(b) The reporting requirement also applies to department of
corrections personnel who, in the course of their employment, observe
offenders or the children with whom the offenders are in contact. If,
as a result of observations or information received in the course of
his or her employment, any department of corrections personnel has
reasonable cause to believe that a child has suffered abuse or neglect,
he or she shall report the incident, or cause a report to be made, to
the proper law enforcement agency or to the department as provided in
RCW 26.44.040.
(c) The reporting requirement shall also apply to any adult who has
reasonable cause to believe that a child who resides with them, has
suffered severe abuse, and is able or capable of making a report. For
the purposes of this subsection, "severe abuse" means any of the
following: Any single act of abuse that causes physical trauma of
sufficient severity that, if left untreated, could cause death; any
single act of sexual abuse that causes significant bleeding, deep
bruising, or significant external or internal swelling; or more than
one act of physical abuse, each of which causes bleeding, deep
bruising, significant external or internal swelling, bone fracture, or
unconsciousness.
(d) The report must be made at the first opportunity, but in no
case longer than forty-eight hours after there is reasonable cause to
believe that the child has suffered abuse or neglect. The report must
include the identity of the accused if known.
(2)(a) The reporting requirement of subsection (1) of this section
does not apply to a member of the clergy with regard to information
obtained by the member of the clergy in his or her professional
character as a religious or spiritual advisor when the information is
obtained solely as a result of a confession made pursuant to the
clergy-penitent privilege as provided in RCW 5.60.060(3), and the
member of the clergy is authorized to hear such confession, and has a
duty under the discipline, tenets, doctrine, or custom of his or her
church, religious denomination, religious body, spiritual community, or
sect to keep the confession secret. The privilege shall not apply and
the member of the clergy shall report child abuse or neglect pursuant
to this section if: The member of the clergy has received the
information from any source other than from a confession.
(b) Nothing in this subsection shall exempt a member of the clergy
from making a report of child abuse or neglect as required in
subsection (1) of this section when the member of the clergy is acting
in some other capacity that would otherwise require him or her to make
a report.
(3) The reporting requirement of subsection (1) of this section
does not apply to the discovery of abuse or neglect that occurred
during childhood if it is discovered after the child has become an
adult. However, if there is reasonable cause to believe other children
are or may be at risk of abuse or neglect by the accused, the reporting
requirement of subsection (1) of this section does apply.
(((3))) (4) Any other person who has reasonable cause to believe
that a child has suffered abuse or neglect may report such incident to
the proper law enforcement agency or to the department of social and
health services as provided in RCW 26.44.040.
(((4))) (5) The department, upon receiving a report of an incident
of alleged abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child
who has died or has had physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him
or her other than by accidental means or who has been subjected to
alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident to the proper law
enforcement agency. In emergency cases, where the child's welfare is
endangered, the department shall notify the proper law enforcement
agency within twenty-four hours after a report is received by the
department. In all other cases, the department shall notify the law
enforcement agency within seventy-two hours after a report is received
by the department. If the department makes an oral report, a written
report must also be made to the proper law enforcement agency within
five days thereafter.
(((5))) (6) Any law enforcement agency receiving a report of an
incident of alleged abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter,
involving a child who has died or has had physical injury or injuries
inflicted upon him or her other than by accidental means, or who has
been subjected to alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident in
writing as provided in RCW 26.44.040 to the proper county prosecutor or
city attorney for appropriate action whenever the law enforcement
agency's investigation reveals that a crime may have been committed.
The law enforcement agency shall also notify the department of all
reports received and the law enforcement agency's disposition of them.
In emergency cases, where the child's welfare is endangered, the law
enforcement agency shall notify the department within twenty-four
hours. In all other cases, the law enforcement agency shall notify the
department within seventy-two hours after a report is received by the
law enforcement agency.
(((6))) (7) Any county prosecutor or city attorney receiving a
report under subsection (((5))) (6) of this section shall notify the
victim, any persons the victim requests, and the local office of the
department, of the decision to charge or decline to charge a crime,
within five days of making the decision.
(((7))) (8) The department may conduct ongoing case planning and
consultation with those persons or agencies required to report under
this section, with consultants designated by the department, and with
designated representatives of Washington Indian tribes if the client
information exchanged is pertinent to cases currently receiving child
protective services. Upon request, the department shall conduct such
planning and consultation with those persons required to report under
this section if the department determines it is in the best interests
of the child. Information considered privileged by statute and not
directly related to reports required by this section must not be
divulged without a valid written waiver of the privilege.
(((8))) (9) Any case referred to the department by a physician
licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW on the basis of an expert
medical opinion that child abuse, neglect, or sexual assault has
occurred and that the child's safety will be seriously endangered if
returned home, the department shall file a dependency petition unless
a second licensed physician of the parents' choice believes that such
expert medical opinion is incorrect. If the parents fail to designate
a second physician, the department may make the selection. If a
physician finds that a child has suffered abuse or neglect but that
such abuse or neglect does not constitute imminent danger to the
child's health or safety, and the department agrees with the
physician's assessment, the child may be left in the parents' home
while the department proceeds with reasonable efforts to remedy
parenting deficiencies.
(((9))) (10) Persons or agencies exchanging information under
subsection (((7))) (8) of this section shall not further disseminate or
release the information except as authorized by state or federal
statute. Violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor.
(((10))) (11) Upon receiving reports of alleged abuse or neglect,
the department or law enforcement agency may interview children. The
interviews may be conducted on school premises, at day-care facilities,
at the child's home, or at other suitable locations outside of the
presence of parents. Parental notification of the interview must occur
at the earliest possible point in the investigation that will not
jeopardize the safety or protection of the child or the course of the
investigation. Prior to commencing the interview the department or law
enforcement agency shall determine whether the child wishes a third
party to be present for the interview and, if so, shall make reasonable
efforts to accommodate the child's wishes. Unless the child objects,
the department or law enforcement agency shall make reasonable efforts
to include a third party in any interview so long as the presence of
the third party will not jeopardize the course of the investigation.
(((11))) (12) Upon receiving a report of alleged child abuse and
neglect, the department or investigating law enforcement agency shall
have access to all relevant records of the child in the possession of
mandated reporters and their employees.
(((12))) (13) The department shall maintain investigation records
and conduct timely and periodic reviews of all cases constituting abuse
and neglect. The department shall maintain a log of screened-out
nonabusive cases.
(((13))) (14) The department shall use a risk assessment process
when investigating alleged child abuse and neglect referrals. The
department shall present the risk factors at all hearings in which the
placement of a dependent child is an issue. Substance abuse must be a
risk factor. The department shall, within funds appropriated for this
purpose, offer enhanced community-based services to persons who are
determined not to require further state intervention.
The department shall provide annual reports to the legislature on
the effectiveness of the risk assessment process.
(((14))) (15) Upon receipt of a report of alleged abuse or neglect
the law enforcement agency may arrange to interview the person making
the report and any collateral sources to determine if any malice is
involved in the reporting.
(((15))) (16) The department shall make reasonable efforts to learn
the name, address, and telephone number of each person making a report
of abuse or neglect under this section. The department shall provide
assurances of appropriate confidentiality of the identification of
persons reporting under this section. If the department is unable to
learn the information required under this subsection, the department
shall only investigate cases in which: (a) The department believes
there is a serious threat of substantial harm to the child; (b) the
report indicates conduct involving a criminal offense that has, or is
about to occur, in which the child is the victim; or (c) the department
has, after investigation, a report of abuse or neglect that has been
founded with regard to a member of the household within three years of
receipt of the referral.

Sec. 3 RCW 9A.04.080 and 1998 c 221 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Prosecutions for criminal offenses shall not be commenced after
the periods prescribed in this section.
(a) The following offenses may be prosecuted at any time after
their commission:
(i) Murder;
(ii) Homicide by abuse;
(iii) Arson if a death results;
(iv) Vehicular homicide;
(v) Vehicular assault if a death results;
(vi) Hit-and-run injury-accident if a death results (RCW
46.52.020(4)).
(b) The following offenses shall not be prosecuted more than ten
years after their commission:
(i) Any felony committed by a public officer if the commission is
in connection with the duties of his or her office or constitutes a
breach of his or her public duty or a violation of the oath of office;
(ii) Arson if no death results; or
(iii) Violations of RCW 9A.44.040 or 9A.44.050 if the rape is
reported to a law enforcement agency within one year of its commission;
except that if the victim is under fourteen years of age when the rape
is committed and the rape is reported to a law enforcement agency
within one year of its commission, the violation may be prosecuted up
to three years after the victim's eighteenth birthday or up to ten
years after the rape's commission, whichever is later. If a violation
of RCW 9A.44.040 or 9A.44.050 is not reported within one year, the rape
may not be prosecuted: (A) More than three years after its commission
if the violation was committed against a victim fourteen years of age
or older; or (B) more than three years after the victim's eighteenth
birthday or more than seven years after the rape's commission,
whichever is later, if the violation was committed against a victim
under fourteen years of age.
(c) Violations of the following statutes shall not be prosecuted
more than three years after the victim's eighteenth birthday or more
than seven years after their commission, whichever is later: RCW
9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, 9A.44.070, 9A.44.080,
9A.44.100(1)(b), or 9A.64.020.
(d) The following offenses shall not be prosecuted more than six
years after their commission: Violations of RCW 9A.82.060 or
9A.82.080.
(e) The following offenses shall not be prosecuted more than five
years after their commission: Any class C felony under chapter 74.09,
82.36, or 82.38 RCW.
(f) Bigamy shall not be prosecuted more than three years after the
time specified in RCW 9A.64.010.
(g) A violation of RCW 9A.56.030 must not be prosecuted more than
three years after the discovery of the offense when the victim is a tax
exempt corporation under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3).
(h) No other felony may be prosecuted more than three years after
its commission; except that in a prosecution under RCW 9A.44.115, if
the person who was viewed, photographed, or filmed did not realize at
the time that he or she was being viewed, photographed, or filmed, the
prosecution must be commenced within two years of the time the person
who was viewed or in the photograph or film first learns that he or she
was viewed, photographed, or filmed.
(i) A violation of RCW 26.44.080 must not be prosecuted more than
ten years after the disclosure of the information that was the subject
of the reporting requirement under RCW 26.44.030 should have occurred.
(j) No other gross misdemeanor may be prosecuted more than two
years after its commission.
(((j))) (k) No misdemeanor may be prosecuted more than one year
after its commission.
(2) The periods of limitation prescribed in subsection (1) of this
section do not run during any time when the person charged is not
usually and publicly resident within this state.
(3) If, before the end of a period of limitation prescribed in
subsection (1) of this section, an indictment has been found or a
complaint or an information has been filed, and the indictment,
complaint, or information is set aside, then the period of limitation
is extended by a period equal to the length of time from the finding or
filing to the setting aside.

--- END ---