BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.15.192 and 2001 c 1 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 77.15.194
through 77.15.198.
(1) "Animal" means any nonhuman vertebrate.
(2) "Body-gripping trap" means a trap that grips an animal's body
or body part. Body-gripping trap includes, but is not limited to,
steel-jawed leghold traps, padded-jaw leghold traps, Conibear traps,
neck snares, and nonstrangling foot snares. Cage and box traps((,))
and suitcase-type live beaver traps((, and common rat and mouse traps))
are not considered body-gripping traps.
(3) "Person" means a human being and, where appropriate, a public
or private corporation, an unincorporated association, a partnership,
a government, or a governmental instrumentality.
(4) "Raw fur" means a pelt that has not been processed for purposes
of retail sale.
(5) "Animal problem" means any animal that threatens or damages
timber or private property or threatens or injures livestock or any
other domestic animal.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.15.194 and 2001 c 1 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Except as provided in this section, it is unlawful to use or
authorize the use of any steel-jawed leghold trap, neck snare, or other
body-gripping trap to capture any mammal for recreation or commerce in
fur.
(2) It is unlawful to knowingly buy, sell, barter, or otherwise
exchange, or offer to buy, sell, barter, or otherwise exchange the raw
fur of a mammal or a mammal that has been trapped in this state with a
steel-jawed leghold trap or any other body-gripping trap, whether or
not pursuant to permit.
(3) Except as provided in this section, it is unlawful to use or
authorize the use of any steel-jawed leghold trap or any other body-gripping trap to capture any animal((, except as provided in
subsections (4) and (5) of this section)).
(4) Nothing in this section prohibits the use of a Conibear trap in
water, a padded leghold trap, or a nonstrangling type foot snare with
a special permit granted by (([the])) the director under (a) through
(d) of this subsection. Issuance of the special permits shall be
governed by rules adopted by the department and in accordance with the
requirements of this section. Every person granted a special permit to
use a trap or device listed in this subsection shall check the trap or
device at least every twenty-four hours.
(a) Nothing in this section prohibits the director, in consultation
with the department of social and health services or the United States
department of health and human services from granting a permit to use
traps listed in this subsection for the purpose of protecting people
from threats to their health and safety.
(b) Nothing in this section prohibits the director from granting a
special permit to use traps listed in this subsection to a person who
applies for such a permit in writing, and who establishes that there
exists on a property an animal problem that has not been and cannot be
reasonably abated by the use of nonlethal control tools, including but
not limited to guard animals, electric fencing, or box and cage traps,
or if such nonlethal means cannot be reasonably applied. Upon making
a finding in writing that the animal problem has not been and cannot be
reasonably abated by nonlethal control tools or if the tools cannot be
reasonably applied, the director may authorize the use, setting,
placing, or maintenance of the traps for a period not to exceed thirty
days.
(c) Nothing in this section prohibits the director from granting a
special permit to department employees or agents to use traps listed in
this subsection where the use of the traps is the only practical means
of protecting threatened or endangered species as designated under RCW
77.08.010.
(d) Nothing in this section prohibits the director from issuing a
permit to use traps listed in this subsection, excluding Conibear
traps, for the conduct of legitimate wildlife research.
(5) Nothing in this section prohibits the United States fish and
wildlife service, its employees or agents, from using a trap listed in
subsection (4) of this section where the fish and wildlife service
determines, in consultation with the director, that the use of such
traps is necessary to protect species listed as threatened or
endangered under the federal endangered species act (16 U.S.C. Sec.
1531 et seq.).
(6) Nothing in this section prohibits the use of any trap designed
primarily for the capture of moles or rodents.

--- END ---