BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1)(a) The legislature finds that existing
law as it relates to the suspension of commercial fishing licenses does
not take into account the real-life circumstances faced by the state's
commercial fishing fleets. The nature of the commercial fishing
industry, together with the complexity of fisheries regulations, is
such that honest mistakes can be made by well-meaning and otherwise
law-abiding fishers. Commercial fishing violations that occur within
an acceptable margin of error should not result in the suspension of
fishing privileges. Likewise, fishers facing the possibility of
license suspension or revocation deserve the opportunity to explain any
extenuating circumstances prior to having his or her professional
privileges suspended.
(b) The legislature intends, by creating the license suspension
review committee, to provide a fisher with the opportunity to explain
any extenuating circumstances that led to a commercial fishing
violation. The legislature intends for the license suspension review
committee to give serious considerations to the case-specific facts and
scenarios leading up to a violation, and for the license suspension
review committee to only issue license suspensions when the facts
indicate a willful act that undermines the conservation of fish stocks.
Frivolous violations should not result in the suspension of privileges,
and should be punished only by the criminal sanctions attached to the
underlying crime.
(2)(a) The legislature further finds that gross abuses of fish
stocks should not be tolerated. Individuals convicted of even one
violation that is egregious in nature, causing serious detriment to a
fishery or the competitive disposition of other fishers, should have
his or her license suspended and revoked.
(b) The legislature intends for the license suspension review
committee to take egregious fisheries' violations seriously. When
dealing with individuals convicted of only one violation, the license
suspension review committee should only consider suspension for
individuals that are convicted of violations that are of a severe
magnitude and show a wanton disregard for the public's resource.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.15.700 and 2001 c 253 s 46 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall impose revocation and suspension of privileges
upon conviction in the following circumstances:
(1) If directed by statute for an offense;
(2) If the department finds that actions of the defendant
demonstrated a willful or wanton disregard for conservation of fish or
wildlife. Such suspension of privileges may be permanent. This
subsection (2) does not apply to violations involving commercial
fishing;
(3) If a person is convicted twice within ten years for a violation
involving unlawful hunting, killing, or possessing big game, the
department shall order revocation and suspension of all hunting
privileges for two years. RCW 77.12.722 or 77.16.050 as it existed
before June 11, 1998, may comprise one of the convictions constituting
the basis for revocation and suspension under this subsection;
(4) If a person is convicted three times in ten years of any
violation of recreational hunting or fishing laws or rules, the
department shall order a revocation and suspension of all recreational
hunting and fishing privileges for two years((;
(5) If a person is convicted twice within five years of a gross
misdemeanor or felony involving unlawful commercial fish or shellfish
harvesting, buying, or selling, the department shall impose a
revocation and suspension of the person's commercial fishing privileges
for one year. A commercial fishery license revoked under this
subsection may not be used by an alternate operator or transferred
during the period of suspension)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 77.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If a person is convicted of two or more qualifying commercial
fishing violations within a three-year period, the person's privileges
to participate in the commercial fishery to which the violations
applied may be suspended by the director for up to one year. A
commercial fishery license that is suspended under this section may not
be transferred after the director issues a notice of suspension, or
used by an alternative operator or transferred during the period of
suspension, if the person who is the subject of the suspension notice
is the person who owns the commercial fishery license.
(2) For the purposes of this section only, "qualifying commercial
fishing violation" means either:
(a) A conviction under RCW 77.15.500, 77.15.510, 77.15.520,
77.15.530, 77.15.550(1)(a), 77.15.570, 77.15.580, or 77.15.590;
(b) A gross misdemeanor or felony involving commercial fish
harvesting, buying, or selling that is unlawful under the terms of the
license, this title, or the rules issued pursuant to this title, if the
quantity of unlawfully harvested, possessed, bought, or sold fish,
other than shellfish, groundfish, or coastal pelagic species of
baitfish totals greater than six percent, by weight, of the harvest
available for inspection at the time of citation and the cumulative
value of the unlawfully harvested fish is more than two hundred fifty
dollars at the time of citation;
(c) A gross misdemeanor or felony involving commercial groundfish
or coastal pelagic baitfish harvest, buying, or selling that is
unlawful under the terms of the license, this title, or the rules
issued under this title, if: (i) The quantity of unlawfully harvested,
possessed, bought, or sold groundfish or coastal pelagic baitfish
totals greater than ten percent, by weight, of the harvest available
for inspection at the time of citation and has a cumulative value
greater than five hundred dollars; or (ii) the quantity, by weight, of
the unlawfully commercially harvested groundfish or coastal pelagic
baitfish is ten percent greater than the landing allowances provided
under rules adopted by the department for species categorized as over-fished by the national marine fisheries service; or
(d) A gross misdemeanor or felony involving commercial shellfish
harvesting, buying, or selling that is unlawful under the terms of the
license, this title, or the rules issued pursuant to this title, if the
quantity of unlawfully harvested, possessed, bought, or sold shellfish:
(i) Totals greater than six percent of the harvest available for
inspection at the time of citation; and (ii) totals fifty or more
individual shellfish.
(3)(a) The director may refer a person convicted of one qualifying
commercial fishing violation to the license suspension review committee
if the director feels that the qualifying commercial fishing violation
was of a severe enough magnitude to justify suspension of the
individual's license renewal privileges.
(b) The director may refer any person convicted of one egregious
shellfish violation to the license suspension review committee.
(c) For the purposes of this section only, "egregious shellfish
violation" means a gross misdemeanor or felony involving commercial
shellfish harvesting, buying, or selling that is unlawful under the
terms of the license, this title, or the rules issued pursuant to this
title, if the quantity of unlawfully harvested, possessed, bought, or
sold shellfish: (i) Totals more than twenty percent of the harvest
available for inspection at the time of citation; (ii) totals five
hundred or more individual shellfish; and (iii) is valued at two
thousand five hundred dollars or more.
(4) A person who has a commercial fishing license suspended or
revoked under this section may file an appeal with the license
suspension review committee pursuant to section 4 of this act. An
appeal must be filed within thirty-one days of notice of license
suspension or revocation. If an appeal is filed, the suspension or
revocation issued by the department does not take effect until after
the license suspension review committee has come to a final conclusion.
If no appeal is filed within thirty-one days of notice of license
suspension or revocation, the right to an appeal is considered waived.
All suspensions ordered under this section take effect either thirty-one days following the conviction for the second qualifying commercial
fishing violation, or upon a final decision ordered by the license
suspension review committee, whichever is later.
(5) A fishing privilege suspended under this section is in addition
to the statutory penalties assigned to the underlying crime.
(6) For the purposes of this section only, the burden is on the
state to show the dollar amount or the percent of a harvest that is
comprised of unlawfully harvested, bought, or sold individual fish or
shellfish.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 77.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The license suspension review committee is created. The
license suspension review committee may only hear appeals from
commercial fishers who have had a license revoked or suspended pursuant
to section 3 of this act.
(2)(a) The license suspension review committee is composed of five
voting members and up to four alternates.
(b) Two of the members must be appointed by the director and may be
department employees.
(c) Three members, and up to four alternates, must be peer-group
members, who are individuals owning a commercial fishing license issued
by the department. If a peer-group member appears before the license
suspension review committee because of a qualifying commercial fishing
violation, the member must recuse himself or herself from the
proceedings relating to that violation. No two voting peer-group
members may reside in the same county. All peer-group members must be
appointed by the commission, who may accept recommendations from
professional organizations that represent commercial fishing interests
or from the legislative authority of any Washington county.
(d) All license suspension review committee members serve a two-year renewable term.
(e) The commission may develop minimum member standards for service
on the license suspension review committee, and standards for
terminating a member before the expiration of his or her term.
(3) The license suspension review committee must convene and make
a final decision on a license renewal suspension within three months of
referral from the department.
(4) The license suspension review committee shall collect the
information and hear the testimony that it feels necessary to decide on
the proper length, if any, of a suspension of a commercial license.
The decisions may be based on extenuating circumstances presented by
the individual convicted of the qualifying commercial fishing violation
or considerations of the type and magnitude of violations that have
been committed by the individual. The maximum length of any suspension
may not exceed one year.
(5) All decisions of the license suspension review committee must
be decided by a majority vote of all voting members. Alternate
committee members may only vote when one of the voting members is
unavailable, has been recused, or has decided not to vote on the case
before the committee. Nonvoting alternates may be present and may
participate at all license suspension review committee meetings.
(6) All decisions of the license suspension review committee are
final, except for judicial review.
(7) Members of the license suspension review committee serve as
volunteers, and are not eligible for compensation other than travel
expenses pursuant to RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(8) Staff of the license suspension review committee must be
provided by the department.

--- END ---