BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.50.880 and 2001 c 204 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state board for community and technical colleges shall
provide recommendations to the apprenticeship council and
apprenticeship programs, established under chapter 49.04 RCW, on
matters of related and supplemental instruction for apprentices,
coordination of instruction with job experiences, and the qualification
of teachers for such instruction.
(2) Community and technical colleges shall grade related and
supplemental instruction for apprentices in the same manner as other
courses providing academic credit applicable to an associate degree.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.15.515 and 1993 sp.s. c 18 s 13 and 1993 sp.s. c
15 s 8 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The boards of trustees of the community college districts may
operate summer schools on either a self-supporting or a state-funded
basis.
If summer school is operated on a self-supporting basis, the fees
charged shall be retained by the colleges, and shall be sufficient to
cover the direct costs, which are instructional salaries and related
benefits, supplies, publications, and records.
Community colleges that have self-supporting summer schools shall
continue to receive general fund state support for: (a) Vocational
programs that require that students enroll in a four quarter sequence
of courses that includes summer quarter due to clinical or laboratory
requirements; (b) vocational apprenticeship; and ((for)) (c) ungraded
courses limited to adult basic education, ((vocational
apprenticeship,)) aging and retirement, small business management,
industrial first aid, and parent education.
(2) The board of trustees of a community college district may
permit the district's state-funded, full-time equivalent enrollment
level, as provided in the omnibus state appropriations act, to vary.
If the variance is above the state-funded level, the district may
charge those students above the state-funded level a fee equivalent to
the amount of tuition and fees that are charged students enrolled in
state-funded courses. These fees shall be retained by the colleges.
(3) The state board for community and technical colleges shall
ensure compliance with this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.15.069 and 1997 c 403 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As used in this section, each of the following subsections is
a separate tuition category:
(a) Resident undergraduate students and all other resident students
not in first professional, graduate, or law programs;
(b) Nonresident undergraduate students and all other nonresident
students not in first professional graduate or law programs;
(c) Resident graduate students;
(d) Resident law students;
(e) Nonresident graduate students;
(f) Nonresident law students;
(g) Resident first professional students; and
(h) Nonresident first professional students.
(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, as used in this
section "first professional programs" means programs leading to one of
the following degrees: Doctor of medicine, doctor of dental surgery,
or doctor of veterinary medicine.
(3) The building fee for each academic year shall be a percentage
of total tuition fees. This percentage shall be calculated by the
higher education coordinating board and be based on the actual
percentage the building fee is of total tuition for each tuition
category in the 1994-95 academic year, rounded up to the nearest half
percent.
(4) The governing boards of each institution of higher education,
except for the technical colleges, shall charge to and collect from
each student a services and activities fee. A governing board may
increase the existing fee annually, consistent with budgeting
procedures set forth in RCW 28B.15.045, by a percentage not to exceed
the annual percentage increase in student tuition fees for the
applicable tuition category: PROVIDED, That such percentage increase
shall not apply to that portion of the services and activities fee
previously committed to the repayment of bonded debt. The services and
activities fee committee provided for in RCW 28B.15.045 may initiate a
request to the governing board for a fee increase.
(5) Tuition and services and activities fees consistent with
subsection (4) of this section shall be set by the state board for
community and technical colleges for community college summer school
students unless the community college charges fees in accordance with
RCW 28B.15.515.
(6) Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, each governing
board of a community college may charge such fees for ungraded courses,
noncredit courses, community services courses, courses offered for the
purpose of satisfying related and supplemental instruction for
apprentices, and self-supporting courses as it, in its discretion, may
determine, consistent with the rules of the state board for community
and technical colleges.

--- END ---