BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Apprenticeships are very rigorous and highly structured
programs with specific academic and work training requirements;
(2) There is a misperception that apprenticeships are only for
noncollege bound students; and
(3) The state should expand opportunities for individuals to
progress from an apprenticeship to college by creating pathways that
build on the apprenticeship experience and permit apprentices to earn
an associate degree.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 49.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An apprenticeship committee may recommend to its community or
technical college partner or partners that an associate degree pathway
be developed for the committee's program.
(2) In consultation with the state board for community and
technical colleges, the apprenticeship committee and the college or
colleges involved with the program shall consider the extent
apprentices in the program are likely to pursue an associate degree and
the extent a pathway could reduce redundancy of course requirements
between the apprenticeship and a degree.
(3) If the apprenticeship committee and the college or colleges
involved with the program determine that a pathway would be beneficial
for apprentices and assist them in obtaining an associate degree, the
apprenticeship committee may request that a pathway be established as
provided in section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) At the request of an apprenticeship committee pursuant to
section 2 of this act, the community or technical college or colleges
providing apprentice-related and supplemental instruction for an
apprenticeship program shall develop an associate degree pathway for
the apprentices in that program, if the necessary resources are
available.
(2) In developing a degree program, the community or technical
college or colleges shall ensure, to the extent possible, that related
and supplemental instruction is credited toward the associate degree
and that related and supplemental instruction and other degree
requirements are not redundant.
(3) If multiple community or technical colleges provide related and
supplemental instruction for a single apprenticeship committee, the
colleges shall work together to the maximum extent possible to create
consistent requirements for the pathway.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The state board for community and
technical colleges shall convene a work group to examine current laws,
administrative rules, and practices regarding related and supplemental
instruction for apprentices that is provided by community and technical
colleges.
(2) The objectives of the work group shall be to improve
coordination of related and supplemental instruction by apprenticeship
committees and community and technical colleges and remove or reduce
barriers for apprentices to earn associate degrees. The work group
shall develop common standards for when it is appropriate to make
related and supplemental instruction courses graded rather than
ungraded courses and clarify the standards for tuition waivers for
related and supplemental instruction courses.
(3) The work group shall include, but not be limited to,
representatives from the state board for community and technical
colleges, the state apprenticeship council, the department of labor and
industries, local apprenticeship committees, and community and
technical colleges.
(4) The work group shall report its findings and recommendations to
the legislature, including recommendations for legislative action if
necessary, by December 15, 2003.

--- END ---