BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Firms and organizations that do business with the state expect
and deserve to be paid in an expeditious and timely manner; and
(b) Unjustified delays in paying vendors, construction contractors,
and providers of service may discourage these firms and organizations,
in particular small and medium-sized firms and women and minority-owned
business enterprises, from doing business with the state, and may
ultimately increase the costs to the state government of: (i)
Purchasing materials, equipment, and supplies; (ii) undertaking
construction and reconstruction projects; and (iii) obtaining a wide
variety of professional and other specialized services including those
that are provided to persons in need.
(2) It is the purpose of this chapter to set standards for the
payment of bills incurred by state agencies within specified periods of
time and to require interest payments in situations where contract
payments do not conform to these standards. It is also the intent of
this chapter, consistent with accepted business practices and with
sound principles of fiscal management: (a) To encourage state agencies
in all branches of state government to make payments at least as
expeditiously as they currently do; (b) to reduce existing payment
processing times whenever feasible, while at the same time permitting
the state agencies to perform proper and reasonable financial oversight
activities designed to ensure that the state government receives the
quality of goods and services to which it is entitled; and (c) to
ensure that public funds are spent in a prudent and responsible manner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Contract" means an enforceable agreement entered into by a
contractor and a state agency.
(2) "Contractor" means any person, partnership, firm, corporation,
or association:
(a) Selling materials, equipment, or supplies or leasing property
or equipment to a state agency;
(b) Constructing, reconstructing, rehabilitating, or repairing
buildings or highways for, or on behalf of, a state agency; or
(c) Rendering or providing services pursuant to a contract with a
state agency.
(3) "Designated payment office" means the office designated by the
state agency to which a proper invoice is to be submitted by a
contractor.
(4) "Payment date" means the date on which a check for payment
according to a contract is dated.
(5) "Proper invoice" means a written request for a contract payment
that is submitted by a contractor setting forth the description, price,
and quantity of goods, property, or services delivered or rendered, in
a form and supported by other substantiating documentation as the
individual state agency may reasonably require.
(6) "Receipt of an invoice" means the date on which a proper
invoice is actually received in the designated payment office; or the
date on which the state agency receives the purchased goods, property,
or services covered by the proper invoice, whichever is later; or in
regard to final payments on highway construction contracts, the date
determined in accordance with the provisions of the contract.
(7) "Required payment date" means the date a contract payment must
be made in order for the state agency not to become liable for interest
payments, pursuant to section 3 (2) and (5) of this act.
(8) "Set-off" means the reduction by the state treasurer of a
payment due to a contractor by an amount equal to the amount of an
unpaid legally enforceable debt owed by the contractor to the state.
(9) "State agency" means any department, board, commission, office,
council, institution, or committee in the executive, legislative, or
judicial branches of state government. The term "state agency" also
includes that state's institutions of higher education and the
vocational and technical colleges.
(10) "State funds" means funds held in custody by the state
treasurer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Each state agency which is required to
make a payment from state funds according to a contract and which does
not make the contract payment by the required payment date shall make
an interest payment to the contractor in accordance with this chapter
on the amount of the contract payment which is due, unless failure to
make the contract payment is the result of a lien, attachment, or other
legal process against the money due to the contractor, or unless the
amount of the interest payment, as computed in accordance with the
provisions of section 4 of this act, is less than one hundred dollars.
(2) The required payment date is thirty calendar days, excluding
legal holidays, or ninety calendar days in the case of final payments
on highway construction contracts, excluding legal holidays, after
receipt of an invoice for the amount of the contract payment due,
except when:
(a) The designated payment office in the course of its audit
determines that there is reasonable cause to believe that payment may
not be properly due, in whole or in part;
(b) In accordance with specific statutory or contractual
provisions, payment must be preceded by an inspection period or by an
audit to determine the resources applied or used by a contractor in
fulfilling the terms of the contract;
(c) The necessary state government appropriation required to
authorize payment has not been enacted;
(d) The cash balance of the fund or subfund from which the payment
is to be made is insufficient to finance the payment;
(e) A proper invoice must be examined by the federal government
prior to payment;
(f) The goods or property have not been delivered or the services
have not been rendered by the contractor in compliance with the terms
or conditions of the contract;
(g) The required payment date is modified in accordance with (c) of
this subsection; or
(h) In the case of final payments on highway construction
contracts, the secretary of transportation determines that the
contractor has failed to properly submit the necessary documents and
other submissions required by the contract and other applicable state
and federal laws which enable the department of transportation to
process the final payment properly and expeditiously.
Any time taken to satisfy or rectify any of the types of conditions
described in this subsection shall extend the required payment date by
an equal period of time.
(3) Each state agency has fifteen calendar days after receipt of an
invoice by the state agency at its designated payment office to notify
the contractor of defects in the delivered goods, property, or
services; defects in the invoice; or suspected improprieties of any
kind. The existence of any defects or improprieties shall prevent the
commencement of the time period specified in subsection (2) of this
section. When a state agency fails to notify a contractor of defects
or suspected improprieties within fifteen calendar days of receiving
the invoice, the number of days allowed for payment of the corrected
proper invoice will be reduced by the number of days between the
fifteenth day and the day that notification was transmitted to the
contractor. If the state agency, in these situations, fails to provide
reasonable grounds for its contention that a defect or impropriety
exists, the required payment date shall be calculated from the date of
receipt of an invoice.
(4) Notwithstanding any provision of the public service law or any
tariffs promulgated in accordance with the law to the contrary, the
provisions of this chapter provide the sole basis for determining and
making interest payments on invoices submitted by public utilities to
state agencies.
(5) A proper invoice submitted by the contractor is required to
initiate any payment, except where the contract provides that the
contractor will be paid at predetermined intervals without having to
submit an invoice for each scheduled payment, in which case the state
agency responsible for making the purchase shall submit an approvable
voucher to the state treasurer for the payment that is due and, for the
purposes of determining eligibility for payment of interest and subject
to the exception of time-to-rectify provisions of subsection (2) of
this section, the required payment date is the payment due date
specified in accordance with the contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Interest payments on amounts due to a
contractor according to this chapter shall be paid to the contractor
for the period beginning on the day after the required payment date,
and ending on the payment date, for those payments required according
to this chapter and shall be paid at the rate of interest in effect on
the date when the interest payment is made. Notwithstanding any other
provision of law to the contrary, the interest rate equals one percent
per month.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Except where federal law or the
provisions of section 12 of this act require otherwise, an interest
payment required by this chapter shall be paid from the same
appropriation from which the related proper invoice is paid.
(2) The interest payment shall not reduce the amount of money that
otherwise will be payable to the contractor under the terms of the
contract, and if the obligation to make an interest payment is incurred
in whole or in part because it takes the state treasurer more than
twelve calendar days from the date it receives an approvable voucher
from another state agency, excluding legal holidays, to process a
contract payment, then the portion of the total interest payment that
is attributable to delays by the state treasurer shall be paid from
funds made available to the state treasurer.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, if
the amount of money available from any appropriation to the state
agency which received the proper invoice is insufficient to pay the
interest, and if for any reason it is not feasible for the director of
financial management to exercise the transfer or interchange authority,
the director of financial management may issue a certificate or
certificates transferring or interchanging within a fund the amount
needed to pay the interest on the appropriation within the fund from
the unspent balance of any appropriation that is available to the same
state agency.
(4) In exercising the latter transfer or interchange authority, the
director of financial management shall transfer or interchange amounts
that are not needed to accomplish the purposes for which the
appropriation was made, however, the director of financial management
may, to the extent deemed practicable, transfer or interchange amounts
from appropriations that otherwise would be available for the
administration and operations of the state agency which incurred the
interest payment.
(5) Any certificate or certificates issued by the director of
financial management shall be sent to the state treasurer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Any interest paid to a contractor under the
provisions of this chapter shall not be included as revenue for the
purposes of determining any reimbursement rates applicable to a
contractor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, in the event that an interest payment is made by a
contractor in the course of transacting business with any entity other
than a state agency, the interest shall not be an obligation of the
state, and the state shall not reimburse the contractor for the
interest, nor shall any moneys expended for interest payments be
counted toward any matching requirement applicable to grants or
payments of state funds unless expressly permitted by state law.
(2) If a contractor incurs an interest obligation or charge as a
direct result of the state agency's failure to make a payment in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter, then the state agency
must reimburse the contractor for the amount of the interest obligation
or charge.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The acceptance of payment, in whole or in
part, by a contractor does not constitute a waiver of interest
otherwise due under the provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 No contract entered into between a state
agency and a contractor after July 1, 2003, shall contain any provision
requiring the payment of interest in a manner inconsistent with this
chapter, and any provision contained in a contract which waives the
right to the payment of interest is hereby declared to be contrary to
public policy and wholly void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) The state treasurer shall:
(a) Adopt rules necessary to carry out the state treasurer's
responsibilities under this chapter;
(b) Develop and implement a procedure for calculating the amount of
interest, if any, due to any contractor under the provisions of this
chapter. This procedure shall include provisions for calculating:
(i) The amount of time, in calendar days, between the date of
receipt of a proper invoice by the state agency and the date on which
an approvable voucher was delivered to the state treasurer;
(ii) The amount of time between the date on which an approvable
voucher was delivered to the state treasurer and the payment date;
(iii) The amount of interest, if any, chargeable to the state
agency involved according to this chapter; and
(iv) The amount of interest, if any, chargeable to the state
treasurer according to this chapter;
(c) Develop and implement a procedure for paying interest in not
more than seven days from the payment date on those proper invoices for
which interest is due and for which the director of financial
management does not issue a certificate or certificates increasing,
transferring, or interchanging funds so that an interest payment can be
made according to this chapter. The state treasurer shall also develop
and implement a procedure for paying interest in not more than fourteen
days from the payment date on those proper invoices for which interest
is due and for which the director of financial management does issue a
certificate or certificates increasing, transferring, or interchanging
funds so that an interest payment can be made according to this
chapter;
(d) Develop and implement a procedure by which the state treasurer
notifies contractors expeditiously and directly whenever the state
treasurer rejects a voucher and returns it to a state agency.
(2) The state treasurer shall submit a report to the governor and
the legislature which includes the number and amounts of interest
payments made for each state agency, the number of interest chargeable
days, the number of days taken to process contract payments, the extent
to which delays occurred because a state agency took longer than
allotted under the provisions of this chapter to process the affected
invoices and the extent to which delays occurred because the state
treasurer took longer than allotted by the provisions of this chapter
to process the related vouchers, and a summary of the principal reasons
causing late payments. The report shall be delivered to the governor
and legislature within sixty calendar days after the conclusion of each
fiscal year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Any determination made by a state agency
according to section 3(3) of this act is subject to judicial review.
The proceedings shall only be commenced in the absence, or upon
completion, of other review procedures specified in the applicable
contract or by applicable regulations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of
law to the contrary, the liability of the state treasurer, insofar as
incurring an obligation to make an interest payment to a contractor
under the terms of this chapter is concerned, shall not extend beyond
the date of a notice of intention to file a claim, the date of a notice
of a claim, or the date commencing a legal action for the payment of
interest, whichever occurs first. Any interest payment owed by the
state agency in accordance with the provisions of this chapter as of
this date shall be paid as directed by the court, and to the extent
that the interest payment is attributable to processing delays caused
by the state agency which received the proper invoice or by processing
delays caused by the state treasurer, the interest payment shall be
made from funds available to the state agency or to the state treasurer
at the time of final judgment.
(2) With respect to the court actions or other legal processes
referred to in this section, any interest obligation incurred by the
state agency after the date specified in this chapter, or in accordance
with any other provision of law, shall be determined as prescribed by
any separate provision of law, shall be paid as directed by the court,
and shall be paid from any appropriation available for that purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The provisions of this chapter shall not
apply to payments due and owing by the state:
(1) Under the eminent domain procedure law, chapter 8.04 RCW;
(2) As interest allowed on judgments rendered by a court according
to any provision of law other than those provisions contained in this
chapter;
(3) To the federal government, to any state agency or its related
instrumentalities, to any duly constituted unit of local government
including, but not limited to, counties, cities, towns, school
districts, special districts, or any of their related
instrumentalities, to any public authority or public benefit
corporation, or to employees of state agencies when acting in, or
incidental to, their public employment capacity;
(4) To entities which receive state funds through any intermediary
organization other than a state agency; or
(5) In situations where the state agency exercises a legally
authorized setoff against all or part of the payment due the
contractor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 For the purpose of making a final payment
on a highway construction contract, the date to be used for determining
the receipt of an invoice in section 3(2) of this act is the date the
contract work has been accepted as completed by the secretary of
transportation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 This act may be known and cited as the
expeditious payment act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Sections 1 through 17 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 39 RCW.

--- END ---