BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Pursuant to chapter 43.155 RCW, the
following project loans recommended by the public works board are
authorized to be made with funds appropriated from the public works
assistance account for the 2001-2003 biennium:
(1) Annapolis Water District-domestic water project-decommission
wells 6 and 7, including removing equipment and sealing both wells so
that no water may flow freely between aquifers or to
the surface . . . . . . . . . . . . $318,750
(2) Clark County-road project-construct approximately seven-tenths
of a mile of roadway, install erosion control materials, realign
adjoining street and roads, install traffic control devices and signs,
construct a bike path, make storm drainage improvements, replace
culverts, install sound control devices, add sidewalks, and make other
related improvements to this area of roadway . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000
(3) Highline Water District-domestic water project-construct a
secondary source for the district's 600 zone, replace approximately six
thousand five hundred feet of pipe, construct approximately one
thousand feet of new transmission pipe, and install the equipment and
appurtenances to operate the system. It will also rehabilitate a pump
station along with installing the necessary systems to operate and
control the pump . . . . . . . . . . . . $749,700
(4) Karcher Creek Sewer District-sanitary sewer project-replace and
relocate the Crownwood pump station. Necessary power and sewer line
connections will be made. All associated facilities, equipment,
controls, and related items will be constructed or installed in order
to operate the station safely and efficiently . . . . . . . . . . . . $425,000
(5) Puyallup-road project-improve approximately seven hundred feet
of roadway and construct approximately one thousand feet of a new
arterial street. Approximately one thousand two hundred feet of water
line will be replaced. Approximately four thousand feet of storm pipe
will be installed during the project. And approximately seven hundred
feet of sewer line will be replaced . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
(6) Selah-sanitary sewer project-upgrade its wastewater treatment
system by continuing a project to construct sludge handling, treatment,
and dewatering facilities. The project includes the construction of
these facilities, buildings to house the facilities, and systems to
handle the wastewater. Other equipment and materials necessary to
operate and manage the facilities and processes will
be installed . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,128,400
(7) Williams Lake Sewer District #2-sanitary sewer project-design
and construct new septic tank effluent sewer collection and transport
system at east end of Williams Lake . . . . . . . . . . . . $876,800
(8) Yakima-domestic water project-improve its water system by
constructing a coagulation plant, rehabilitate and upgrade the filter
system, upgrade storage facilities, and install a generation system.
All associated controls, telemetry, and related equipment will be
installed . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,694,500
(9) Friday Harbor-sanitary sewer project-construct a new secondary
wastewater treatment plant. Facilities, equipment, material, controls,
and related items will be constructed or installed in order to run the
plant at optimum performance. A sludge dryer will be installed in
order to develop alternative disposal methods . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
(10) Lake Chelan Reclamation District-sanitary sewer
project-replace or rehabilitate approximately forty thousand feet of
force main, rehabilitate approximately thirty thousand feet of
collector mains, replace five lift stations, upgrade telemetry and odor
control facilities, install emergency generators, upgrade approximately
one thousand six hundred side sewer services, and resurface roadway as
necessary . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,376,050
(11) Val Vue Sewer District-sanitary sewer project-project will
remedy problems associated with leaking manholes, rehabilitation of
sewer mains, installing emergency generators, installing sewer lines,
and replacement of side sewers. Other related equipment and material
will be installed as necessary to reduce infiltration of storm water
and to ensure optimum performance of the system . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,301,350
(12) Spokane-sanitary sewer project-rehabilitate the main line of
its sanitary sewer system in the Central Business District.
Approximately thirty-six pipe sections will be rehabilitated over the
three-year period. Other associated improvements to the sewer system
will be made as needed . . . . . . . . . . . . $901,000
(13) Karcher Creek Sewer District-sanitary sewer project-design and
construct a replacement collection system in the Beach Drive service
area. The project will replace approximately five thousand four
hundred feet of sewer main and two thousand five hundred feet of
lateral sewer pipe. A new sewer main will be constructed to convey
sewage from the pump station to the treatment plant. Other associated
equipment and material will be installed in order to operate and manage
the system . . . . . . . . . . . . $807,500
(14) Mount Vernon-sanitary sewer project-install approximately five
hundred feet of outfall pipe to the wastewater treatment system. Other
related equipment and material will be installed to ensure the system
works as designed . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
(15) City of Camas-road project-reconstruct and improve
approximately two and one-tenths miles of roadway. Improvements
include adding lanes and turn lanes, sidewalks, bike lanes, and related
signage, lighting, erosion control, and other components associated
with a major urban arterial . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
(16) Richland-domestic water project-install water mains, hydrants,
control valves, and related equipment. Decommissioned lines will be
sealed. Lines to the meters will be replaced. All sites disturbed by
the project will be rehabilitated . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,755,000
(17) City of Everett-sanitary sewer project-install pumps and wells
to move and stage effluent, install transmission pipes, install
collection pipes, recondition existing pipe as needed, install at least
one railroad casing system, and install other equipment and material
necessary to complete the transition to the Puget Sound
outfall . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,490,000
(18) City of Cle Elum-sanitary sewer project-construct a regional
wastewater treatment facility to serve the City of Cle Elum, the city's
urban growth area, the Town of South Cle Elum, and a master planned
resort. Build or install all of the associated piping, telemetry,
storage, and treatment facilities. Construct or install related
equipment . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
(19) Douglas County Sewer District 1-sanitary sewer
project-construct approximately two miles of a sewer interceptor line,
four thousand five hundred feet of gravity-fed sewer lines, a two
hundred fifty-gallon a minute lift station, and five thousand eight
hundred feet of force main (all figures are approximate). The district
will install controls and telemetry necessary to manage the system and
will repair all damage to the roadway . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,936,050
(20) Peshastin Water District-domestic water project-replace
approximately four miles of distribution and transmission lines
throughout the district. Two wells will be rehabilitated, sources
meters will be installed, electrical and telemetry systems will be
installed, a new pump station will be constructed, and a new reservoir
will be created. Other associated equipment, material, and systems
will be constructed or installed in order to make the system perform at
its optimum . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,314,600
(21) Seattle-bridge project-construct new approaches to the north
and south ends of the Fremont Bridge and replace electrical and
mechanical equipment. Other related improvements necessary to enhance
public safety and use of the bridge will be made as part of this
project . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(22) City of Bremerton-sanitary sewer project-design and construct
the improvements necessary to virtually eliminate the combined sewer
overflows that affect Anderson Cove. Approximately twelve separate
improvements to the flow diversion process will be implemented as a
result of the design work . . . . . . . . . . . . $475,000
(23) Cowlitz County PUD 1-domestic water project-replace
approximately fifty thousand feet of waterline on several streets
within the Upper Ostrander service area. Install fire hydrants and
other water line related equipment. Replace a reservoir roof. Make
other related system improvements . . . . . . . . . . . . $491,661
(24) City of Bonney Lake-domestic water project-construct a water
treatment facility that includes a disinfection system. The project
also includes the installation of water mains. Corrosion control
facilities will be constructed, including storage tanks, telemetry,
pumps, metering, and related equipment and facilities . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,174,700
(25) City of Battle Ground-road project-rehabilitate and improve
west Main Street for approximately one mile. Four through lanes will
be upgraded. A center turn lane will be installed. Bicycle paths will
be constructed along with curbs and sidewalks. Water and sewer
facilities running under the street will be upgraded. Storm water
drainage will be improved. Traffic controls and signs will be
installed as needed. Other related work to the roadway will be done to
ensure the street is safe and operates as designed . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
(26) City of Enumclaw-sanitary sewer project-upgrade and expand its
wastewater treatment plant by modifying the headworks, adding a
clarifier, constructing aeration basins, adding anaerobic basins and
clarifiers, constructing chemical facilities, installing dewatering
facilities, enlarging the laboratory, increasing plant capacity, and
modifying or upgrading related facilities and equipment . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,250,000
(27) West Richland-sanitary sewer project-install approximately
thirty-two thousand feet of sewer pipe, install access sites,
decommission a lagoon, install a lift station, construct a lined
irrigation canal crossing, repair roadway disturbed by the project, and
install telemetry and related equipment to ensure the system operates
as designed . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000

Total . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,666,061

Sec. 2 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 131 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Public Works Trust Fund (02-4-013)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
$20,000,000 of the general fund federal appropriation is provided
solely for infrastructure projects that will improve water quality and
benefit salmon. Projects should be designed to have immediate benefits
to water quality and salmon as alternatives to habitat acquisition and
improvements. The public works board is authorized and directed to
seek funding through the Northwest power planning council, the
conservation and reinvestment act, and other federal funding sources to
supplement existing loan programs with grants or loans for water
quality projects. The public works board shall utilize existing
programs within chapter 43.155 RCW to distribute these additional
grants or loans, with an emphasis on projects providing immediate
benefits to water quality and salmon habitat. For the purposes of this
section, the public works board may utilize federal funds as grants in
conjunction with loans from chapter 43.155 RCW.

Appropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account -- State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($230,300,000))
$288,372,911
General Fund -- Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,215,700,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,466,000,000))
$1,524,072,911

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---