BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A well-trained construction trades work
force is critical to the ability of the state of Washington to
construct public works. Studies of the state's work force highlight
population trends that, without a concerted effort to offset them, will
lead to an inadequate supply of skilled workers in the construction
industry. State government regularly constructs public works. The
efficient and economical construction of public works projects will be
harmed if there is not an ample supply of trained construction workers.
Apprenticeship training programs are particularly effective in
providing training and experience to individuals seeking to enter or
advance in the work force. By providing for apprenticeship utilization
on public works projects, state government can create opportunities for
training and experience that will help assure that a trained work force
will be available in sufficient numbers in the future for the
construction of public works.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout sections 1 through 3 of this act unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Apprentice" means an apprentice enrolled in a state-approved
apprenticeship training program.
(2) "Apprentice utilization requirement" means the requirement that
the appropriate percentage of labor hours be performed by apprentices.
(3) "Labor hours" means the total hours of workers receiving an
hourly wage who are directly employed on the site of the public works
project. "Labor hours" includes hours performed by workers employed by
the contractor and all subcontractors working on the project. "Labor
hours" does not include hours worked by foremen, superintendents,
owners, and workers who are not subject to prevailing wage
requirements.
(4) "State-approved apprenticeship training program" means an
apprenticeship training program approved by the Washington state
apprenticeship council.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) From July 1, 2003, through December 31,
2003, for all public works estimated to cost two million dollars or
more, all specifications shall require that no less than twelve percent
of the labor hours be performed by apprentices.
(2) From January 1, 2004, and thereafter, for all public works
estimated to cost one million dollars or more, all specifications shall
require that no less than fifteen percent of the labor hours be
performed by apprentices.
(3) Awarding agency directors shall adjust the requirements of this
section for a specific project if a bidder asserts one or more of the
following reasons:
(a) The demonstrated lack of availability of apprentices in
specific geographic areas;
(b) A disproportionately high ratio of material costs to labor
hours, which does not make feasible the required minimum levels of
apprentice participation;
(c) Participating contractors have demonstrated a good faith effort
to comply with the requirements of this act; or
(d) Other criteria the awarding agency director deems appropriate.
(4) If the awarding agency director disputes the validity of the
asserted reason for adjusting the requirements of this section for a
specific project, the awarding agency director has the burden of
establishing that the asserted reason was not valid.
(5) A contractor must make reasonable efforts to apply the
apprentice utilization percentage requirements listed in subsections
(1) and (2) of this section so that the appropriate percentage of labor
hours in each separate craft or trade is performed by apprentices in
that craft or trade.
(6) This section applies only to public works contracts awarded by
the state and the institutions of higher education as defined in RCW
28B.10.016. However, this section does not apply to contracts awarded
by state agencies headed by a separately elected public official and
the department of transportation.
(7)(a) The department of general administration must provide
information and technical assistance to affected agencies and collect
the following data from affected agencies for each project covered by
this section:
(i) The number of apprentices and labor hours worked by them,
categorized by trade or craft;
(ii) The number of journey level workers and labor hours worked by
them, categorized by trade or craft; and
(iii) The number, type, and rationale for the exceptions granted
under subsection (3) of this section.
(b) By January 1, 2004, and each year thereafter, the department of
general administration shall compile and summarize the agency data and
provide reports to the senate commerce and trade committee, the house
of representatives commerce and labor committee, or their successor
committees, and the governor. The report shall include recommendations
on modifications or improvements to the apprentice utilization program.
(8) By January 1, 2004, and each year thereafter, the department of
labor and industries must report to the senate commerce and trade
committee, the house of representatives commerce and labor committee,
or their successor committees, and the governor on skill shortages in
each trade or craft.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act are each
added to chapter 39.04 RCW.

--- END ---