BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that it is in the
public interest for the registered voters affected by a fluoridation
proposal to make the final decision on whether to fluoridate a public
water system as defined by RCW 70.116.030. The legislature further
finds that fluoridation decisions are best made by voters prior to the
addition of fluoride to public water systems.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.05.060 and 1991 c 3 s 308 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, each
local board of health shall have supervision over all matters
pertaining to the preservation of the life and health of the people
within its jurisdiction and shall:
(((1))) (a) Enforce through the local health officer or the
administrative officer appointed under RCW 70.05.040, if any, the
public health statutes of the state and rules promulgated by the state
board of health and the secretary of health;
(((2))) (b) Supervise the maintenance of all health and sanitary
measures for the protection of the public health within its
jurisdiction;
(((3))) (c) Enact such local rules and regulations as are necessary
in order to preserve, promote and improve the public health and provide
for the enforcement thereof;
(((4))) (d) Provide for the control and prevention of any
dangerous, contagious or infectious disease within the jurisdiction of
the local health department;
(((5))) (e) Provide for the prevention, control and abatement of
nuisances detrimental to the public health;
(((6))) (f) Make such reports to the state board of health through
the local health officer or the administrative officer as the state
board of health may require; and
(((7))) (g) Establish fee schedules for issuing or renewing
licenses or permits or for such other services as are authorized by the
law and the rules of the state board of health: PROVIDED, That such
fees for services shall not exceed the actual cost of providing any
such services.
(2) A local board of health shall not authorize the fluoridation of
a public water system as defined by RCW 70.116.030 unless:
(a) A majority of the members of a local board of health vote to
request the county legislative authority to cause a proposition of
fluoridation of a public water system to be submitted to the registered
voters residing within the area described in the board's proposition of
fluoridation at a general or special election; and
(b) Following an election as provided in this subsection, a
majority of the votes cast on the proposition are in favor of
fluoridation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---