BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.96A.095 and 1998 c 296 s 23 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person ((thirteen)) sixteen years of age or older may give
consent for himself or herself to the furnishing of outpatient
treatment by a chemical dependency treatment program certified by the
department. Parental authorization is required for any treatment of a
minor under the age of ((thirteen)) sixteen.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.96A RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) A minor may request and receive outpatient treatment by a
chemical dependency treatment program certified by the department
without parental consent or notification if:
(i) Requiring consent or notification of a parent or guardian would
cause the minor to reject such treatment;
(ii) The provision of such treatment is clinically indicated;
(iii) The failure to provide such treatment would be seriously
detrimental to the minor's well-being;
(iv) The minor has knowingly and voluntarily sought such treatment;
and
(v) In the opinion of the provider of treatment, the minor is
mature enough to participate in the treatment productively.
(b) The chemical dependency treatment provider shall document the
reason for any determination made to treat a minor under the age of
sixteen years without the consent or notification of a parent or
guardian and shall include such documentation in the minor's clinical
record, along with a written statement signed by the minor stating that
he or she:
(i) Is voluntarily seeking such treatment;
(ii) Has discussed with the provider the possibility of involving
his or her parent or guardian in the decision to pursue such treatment;
(iii) Has determined it is not in his or her best interest to
involve his or her parent or guardian in such decision; and
(iv) Has been given adequate opportunity to ask the provider
questions about the course of his or her treatment.
(2) After the tenth session of outpatient chemical dependency
treatment provided to the minor under the age of sixteen years pursuant
to this section, the provider of such treatment shall notify the minor
that consent, notification, or involvement of a parent or guardian is
required to continue treatment, unless such a requirement would be
seriously detrimental to the minor's well-being. If the provider
determines such a requirement would be seriously detrimental to the
minor's well-being, he or she shall document such determination in the
minor's clinical record, review such determination every fifth session
thereafter, and document each such review. If the provider determines
such a requirement would no longer be seriously detrimental to the
minor's well-being, he or she shall require the consent, notification,
or involvement of a parent or guardian as a condition of continuing
treatment.
(3) No provider shall notify a parent or guardian of treatment
provided pursuant to this section or disclose any information
concerning such treatment to a parent or guardian without the consent
of the minor.
(4) A parent or guardian who is not informed of the provision of
outpatient chemical dependency treatment shall not be liable for the
costs of the treatment provided.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.96A.230 and 1998 c 296 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any provider of outpatient treatment who provides outpatient
treatment to a minor ((thirteen)) sixteen years of age or older shall
provide notice of the minor's request for treatment to the minor's
parents if: (1) The minor signs a written consent authorizing the
disclosure; or (2) the treatment program director determines that the
minor lacks capacity to make a rational choice regarding consenting to
disclosure. The notice shall be made within seven days of the request
for treatment, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, and shall
contain the name, location, and telephone number of the facility
providing treatment, and the name of a professional person on the staff
of the facility providing treatment who is designated to discuss the
minor's need for treatment with the parent.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.96A.235 and 1998 c 296 s 25 are each amended to
read as follows:
Parental consent is required for inpatient chemical dependency
treatment of a minor, unless the child meets the definition of a child
in need of services in RCW 13.32A.030(((4))) (5)(c) as determined by
the department: PROVIDED, That parental consent is required for any
treatment of a minor under the age of ((thirteen)) sixteen.
This section does not apply to petitions filed under this chapter.

Sec. 5 RCW 71.34.030 and 1998 c 296 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any minor ((thirteen)) sixteen years or older may request and
receive outpatient treatment without the consent of the minor's parent.
Parental authorization is required for outpatient treatment of a minor
under the age of ((thirteen)) sixteen.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 71.34 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) A minor may request and receive outpatient treatment by a
mental health treatment program certified by the department without
parental consent or notification if:
(i) Requiring consent or notification of a parent or guardian would
cause the minor to reject such treatment;
(ii) The provision of such treatment is clinically indicated;
(iii) The failure to provide such treatment would be seriously
detrimental to the minor's well-being;
(iv) The minor has knowingly and voluntarily sought such treatment;
and
(v) In the opinion of the provider of treatment, the minor is
mature enough to participate in the treatment productively.
(b) The mental health treatment provider shall document the reason
for any determination made to treat a minor under the age of sixteen
years without the consent or notification of a parent or guardian and
shall include such documentation in the minor's clinical record, along
with a written statement signed by the minor stating that he or she:
(i) Is voluntarily seeking such treatment;
(ii) Has discussed with the provider the possibility of involving
his or her parent or guardian in the decision to pursue such treatment;
(iii) Has determined it is not in his or her best interest to
involve his or her parent or guardian in such decision; and
(iv) Has been given adequate opportunity to ask the provider
questions about the course of his or her treatment.
(2) After the tenth session of outpatient mental health treatment
provided to the minor under the age of sixteen years pursuant to this
section, the provider of such treatment shall notify the minor that
consent, notification, or involvement of a parent or guardian is
required to continue treatment, unless such a requirement would be
seriously detrimental to the minor's well-being. If the provider
determines such a requirement would be seriously detrimental to the
minor's well-being, he or she shall document such determination in the
minor's clinical record, review such determination every fifth session
thereafter, and document each such review. If the provider determines
such a requirement would no longer be seriously detrimental to the
minor's well-being, he or she shall require the consent, notification,
or involvement of a parent or guardian as a condition of continuing
treatment.
(3) No provider shall notify a parent or guardian of treatment
provided pursuant to this section or disclose any information
concerning such treatment to a parent or guardian without the consent
of the minor.
(4) A parent or guardian who is not informed of the provision of
outpatient mental health treatment shall not be liable for the costs of
the treatment provided.

Sec. 7 RCW 71.34.040 and 1985 c 354 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
If a minor, ((thirteen)) sixteen years or older, is brought to an
evaluation and treatment facility or hospital emergency room for
immediate mental health services, the professional person in charge of
the facility shall evaluate the minor's mental condition, determine
whether the minor suffers from a mental disorder, and whether the minor
is in need of immediate inpatient treatment. If it is determined that
the minor suffers from a mental disorder, inpatient treatment is
required, the minor is unwilling to consent to voluntary admission, and
the professional person believes that the minor meets the criteria for
initial detention set forth herein, the facility may detain or arrange
for the detention of the minor for up to twelve hours in order to
enable a county-designated mental health professional to evaluate the
minor and commence initial detention proceedings under the provisions
of this chapter.

Sec. 8 RCW 71.34.042 and 1998 c 296 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A minor ((thirteen)) sixteen years or older may admit himself
or herself to an evaluation and treatment facility for inpatient mental
treatment, without parental consent. The admission shall occur only if
the professional person in charge of the facility concurs with the need
for inpatient treatment.
(2) When, in the judgment of the professional person in charge of
an evaluation and treatment facility, there is reason to believe that
a minor is in need of inpatient treatment because of a mental disorder,
and the facility provides the type of evaluation and treatment needed
by the minor, and it is not feasible to treat the minor in any less
restrictive setting or the minor's home, the minor may be admitted to
an evaluation and treatment facility.
(3) Written renewal of voluntary consent must be obtained from the
applicant no less than once every twelve months. The minor's need for
continued inpatient treatments shall be reviewed and documented no less
than every one hundred eighty days.

Sec. 9 RCW 71.34.046 and 1998 c 296 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any minor ((thirteen)) sixteen years or older voluntarily
admitted to an evaluation and treatment facility under RCW 71.34.042
may give notice of intent to leave at any time. The notice need not
follow any specific form so long as it is written and the intent of the
minor can be discerned.
(2) The staff member receiving the notice shall date it
immediately, record its existence in the minor's clinical record, and
send copies of it to the minor's attorney, if any, the county-designated mental health professional, and the parent.
(3) The professional person shall discharge the minor, ((thirteen))
sixteen years or older, from the facility upon receipt of the minor's
notice of intent to leave.

Sec. 10 RCW 71.34.050 and 1995 c 312 s 53 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) When a county-designated mental health professional receives
information that a minor, ((thirteen)) sixteen years or older, as a
result of a mental disorder presents a likelihood of serious harm or is
gravely disabled, has investigated the specific facts alleged and of
the credibility of the person or persons providing the information, and
has determined that voluntary admission for inpatient treatment is not
possible, the county-designated mental health professional may take the
minor, or cause the minor to be taken, into custody and transported to
an evaluation and treatment facility providing inpatient treatment.
If the minor is not taken into custody for evaluation and
treatment, the parent who has custody of the minor may seek review of
that decision made by the county designated mental health professional
in court. The parent shall file notice with the court and provide a
copy of the county designated mental health professional's report or
notes.
(2) Within twelve hours of the minor's arrival at the evaluation
and treatment facility, the county-designated mental health
professional shall serve on the minor a copy of the petition for
initial detention, notice of initial detention, and statement of
rights. The county-designated mental health professional shall file
with the court on the next judicial day following the initial detention
the original petition for initial detention, notice of initial
detention, and statement of rights along with an affidavit of service.
The county-designated mental health professional shall commence service
of the petition for initial detention and notice of the initial
detention on the minor's parent and the minor's attorney as soon as
possible following the initial detention.
(3) At the time of initial detention, the county-designated mental
health professional shall advise the minor both orally and in writing
that if admitted to the evaluation and treatment facility for inpatient
treatment, a commitment hearing shall be held within seventy-two hours
of the minor's provisional acceptance to determine whether probable
cause exists to commit the minor for further mental health treatment.
The minor shall be advised that he or she has a right to
communicate immediately with an attorney and that he or she has a right
to have an attorney appointed to represent him or her before and at the
hearing if the minor is indigent.
(4) Whenever the county designated mental health professional
petitions for detention of a minor under this chapter, an evaluation
and treatment facility providing seventy-two hour evaluation and
treatment must immediately accept on a provisional basis the petition
and the person. Within twenty-four hours of the minor's arrival, the
facility must evaluate the minor's condition and either admit or
release the minor in accordance with this chapter.
(5) If a minor is not approved for admission by the inpatient
evaluation and treatment facility, the facility shall make such
recommendations and referrals for further care and treatment of the
minor as necessary.

Sec. 11 RCW 71.34.052 and 1998 c 296 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If a parent reasonably believes that his or her child is
suffering from a mental disorder and is in need of inpatient treatment,
he or she may bring, or authorize the bringing of, his or her minor
child to an evaluation and treatment facility and request that the
professional person examine the minor to determine whether the minor
has a mental disorder and is in need of inpatient treatment.
(2) The consent of the minor, regardless of age, is not required
((for admission, evaluation, and treatment)) if the parent brings the
minor to the facility.
(3) An appropriately trained professional person may evaluate
whether the minor has a mental disorder. The evaluation shall be
completed within twenty-four hours of the time the minor was brought to
the facility, unless the professional person determines that the
condition of the minor necessitates additional time for evaluation. In
no event shall a minor be held longer than seventy-two hours for
evaluation. If, in the judgment of the professional person, it is
determined it is a medical necessity for the minor to receive inpatient
treatment, the minor may be held for treatment. ((The facility shall
limit treatment to that which the professional person determines is
medically necessary to stabilize the minor's condition until the
evaluation has been completed. Within twenty-four hours of completion
of the evaluation, the professional person shall notify the department
if the child is held for treatment and of the date of admission.
(4) No provider is obligated to provide treatment to a minor under
the provisions of this section. No provider may admit a minor to
treatment under this section unless it is medically necessary.
(5) No minor receiving inpatient treatment under this section may
be discharged from the facility based solely on his or her request.
(6) Prior to the review conducted under RCW 71.34.025, the
professional person shall notify the minor of his or her right to
petition superior court for release from the facility.
(7))) (4) For the purposes of this section "professional person"
does not include a social worker, unless the social worker is certified
under RCW 18.19.110 and appropriately trained and qualified by
education and experience, as defined by the department, in psychiatric
social work.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "medical necessity" means a
requested service which is reasonably calculated to diagnose, correct,
cure, or alleviate a mental disorder, and there is no adequate less
restrictive alternative available.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 71.34 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If, in the judgment of the professional person, it is
determined it is a medical necessity for the minor evaluated pursuant
to a parent request under RCW 71.34.052 to receive inpatient treatment,
the minor may be held for treatment. The facility shall limit
treatment to that which the professional person determines is a medical
necessity to stabilize the minor's condition until the evaluation has
been completed. Within twenty-four hours of completion of the
evaluation, the professional person shall notify the department if the
child is held for treatment and of the date of admission.
(2) No provider is obligated to provide treatment to a minor under
the provisions of this section. No provider may admit a minor to
treatment under this section unless it is a medical necessity as
defined in RCW 71.34.020.
(3) No minor receiving inpatient treatment under this section may
be discharged from the facility based solely on his or her request.
The minor shall be discharged immediately upon the written request of
his or her parents.
(4) Prior to the review conducted under RCW 71.34.025, the
professional person shall notify the minor of his or her right to
petition superior court for release from the facility.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "professional person" does
not include a social worker, unless the social worker is certified
under RCW 18.19.110 and appropriately trained and qualified by
education and experience, as defined by the department, in psychiatric
social work.

Sec. 13 RCW 71.34.054 and 1998 c 296 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If a parent reasonably believes that his or her child is
suffering from a mental disorder and is in need of outpatient mental
health treatment, he or she may bring, or authorize the bringing of,
his or her minor child to a provider of outpatient mental health
treatment and request that an appropriately trained professional person
examine the minor to determine whether the minor has a mental disorder
and is in need of outpatient treatment.
(2) The consent of the minor, regardless of age, is not required
for evaluation if the parent brings the minor to the provider.
(3) The professional person may evaluate whether the minor has a
mental disorder and is in need of outpatient treatment.
(4) Any minor admitted to inpatient treatment under RCW 71.34.042
or 71.34.052 shall be discharged immediately from inpatient treatment
upon written request of the parent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 This act does not affect any existing right
acquired or liability or obligation incurred under the sections amended
or repealed in this act or under any rule or order adopted under those
sections, nor does it affect any proceeding instituted under those
sections.

--- END ---