BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.40.410 and 2001 c 26 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A leasehold interest consisting of three thousand or more
residential and recreational lots that are or may be subleased for
residential and recreational purposes, together with any improvements
thereon, shall be assessed and taxed in the same manner as privately
owned real property. The sublessee of each lot, or the lessee if not
subleased, is liable for the property tax on the lot and improvements
thereon. If property tax for a lot or improvements thereon remains
unpaid for more than three years from the date of delinquency,
including any property taxes that are delinquent as of July 22, 2001,
the county treasurer may proceed to collect the tax in the same manner
as for other property, except that the lessor's interest in the
property shall not be extinguished as a result of any action for the
collection of tax. Collection of property taxes assessed on any such
lot shall be enforceable by foreclosure proceedings ((against any
improvement located on such lot,)) in accordance with real property
foreclosure proceedings authorized in chapter 84.64 RCW. ((Collection
of property taxes assessed against any mobile home located on any such
lot shall proceed in the same manner as with mobile homes located on
private property.))

--- END ---