BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.024 and 1983 c 80 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any driver of a motor vehicle who willfully fails or refuses to
immediately bring his vehicle to a stop and who drives his vehicle in
a reckless manner ((indicating a wanton or wilful disregard for the
lives or property of others)) while attempting to elude a pursuing
police vehicle, after being given a visual or audible signal to bring
the vehicle to a stop, shall be guilty of a class C felony. The signal
given by the police officer may be by hand, voice, emergency light, or
siren. The officer giving such a signal shall be in uniform and his
((vehicle)) or her vehicle's license plate shall be appropriately
marked showing it to be an official police vehicle.
(2) It is an affirmative defense to this section which must be
established by a preponderance of the evidence that: (a) A reasonable
person would not believe that the signal to stop was given by a police
officer; and (b) driving after the signal to stop was reasonable under
the circumstances.
(3) The license or permit to drive or any nonresident driving
privilege of a person convicted of a violation of this section shall be
revoked by the department of licensing.

--- END ---