BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.660 and 1997 c 190 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It shall be unlawful for any person to transport any living
animal on the running board, fenders, hood, or other outside part of
any vehicle, including the bed of a pickup truck, unless suitable
harness, cage, or enclosure be provided and so attached as to protect
such animal from falling or being thrown therefrom.
(2) It shall be unlawful for any person to transport any persons
upon the running board, fenders, hood, or other outside part of any
vehicle, ((except that this provision shall)) including the bed of a
pickup truck.
(a) This subsection (2) does not apply to the outside part of a
vehicle that is equipped with seats with seatbelts and the person is
securely fastened in the seatbelt.
(b) This subsection (2) does not apply to authorized emergency
vehicles or to solid waste collection vehicles that are engaged in
collecting solid waste or recyclables on route at speeds of twenty
miles per hour or less.

--- END ---