BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A sales and use tax may be fixed and imposed in accordance with
the terms of this chapter if:
(a) A county legislative authority submits an authorizing
proposition to the county voters, and the proposition is approved by a
majority of persons voting on the proposition; or
(b) A petition proposing the imposition of a sales and use tax is
filed with the county auditor, the petition is signed by a number of
voters equal to at least ten percent of the number of voters in the
county voting at the last preceding general election, and, after
meeting these requirements, an authorizing proposition is submitted to
the county voters and approved by a majority of persons voting on the
proposition.
(2) A ballot proposition under subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this
section must be submitted to the voters of the county at the next
general election occurring at least sixty days after a county
legislative authority has adopted a resolution to impose the tax under
subsection (1)(a) of this section, or a petition has been filed under
subsection (1)(b) of this section. A county legislative authority may
authorize a special election prior to this general election if it has
been called for this purpose by the authority.
(3) The tax authorized in this section shall be in addition to any
other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons
who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon
the occurrence of any taxable event within the county. The rate of tax
shall equal three-tenths of one percent of the selling price in the
case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use
tax.
(4) A plan for the expenditure of the sales and use tax proceeds
shall be prepared by the county legislative authority at least sixty
days before the election if the proposal is initiated by the county
legislative authority, or within six months after the tax has been
approved by the voters if the proposal is initiated by petition. The
plan may include a provision to allow the distribution of up to ten
percent of the proceeds from the tax to the cities within the county.
Prior to the adoption of this plan, the elected officials of cities
located within the county shall be consulted and a public hearing shall
be held to obtain public input. The proceeds of the tax must be
expended in conformance with this plan.
(5) For purposes of this section, "rural county" means a county
with a population density of less than one hundred persons per square
mile or a county smaller than two hundred twenty-five square miles as
determined by the office of financial management and published each
year by the department for the period July 1st to June 30th.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---