BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.15.012 and 2002 c 186 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever used in chapter 28B.15 RCW:
(1) The term "institution" shall mean a public university, college,
or community college within the state of Washington.
(2) The term "resident student" shall mean:
(a) A financially independent student who has had a domicile in the
state of Washington for the period of one year immediately prior to the
time of commencement of the first day of the semester or quarter for
which the student has registered at any institution and has in fact
established a bona fide domicile in this state primarily for purposes
other than educational;
(b) A dependent student, if one or both of the student's parents or
legal guardians have maintained a bona fide domicile in the state of
Washington for at least one year immediately prior to commencement of
the semester or quarter for which the student has registered at any
institution;
(c) A student classified as a resident based upon domicile by an
institution on or before May 31, 1982, who was enrolled at a state
institution during any term of the 1982-1983 academic year, so long as
such student's enrollment (excepting summer sessions) at an institution
in this state is continuous;
(d) Any student who has spent at least seventy-five percent of both
his or her junior and senior years in high schools in this state, whose
parents or legal guardians have been domiciled in the state for a
period of at least one year within the five-year period before the
student graduates from high school, and who enrolls in a public
institution of higher education within six months of leaving high
school, for as long as the student remains continuously enrolled for
three quarters or two semesters in any calendar year;
(e) Any student who has graduated from high school in this state or
received the equivalent of a high school diploma in this state and who
has attended at least three years of high school in this state, however
a student who is not a citizen of the United States of America shall
file an application for permanent residency and engage in activities
necessary to acquire citizenship, including but not limited to taking
citizenship or civics review classes prior to completing a certificate
or degree program;
(f) A student who is on active military duty stationed in the state
or who is a member of the Washington national guard;
(((f))) (g) A student who is the spouse or a dependent of a person
who is on active military duty stationed in the state;
(((g))) (h) A student who resides in the state of Washington and is
the spouse or a dependent of a person who is a member of the Washington
national guard;
(((h))) (i) A student of an out-of-state institution of higher
education who is attending a Washington state institution of higher
education pursuant to a home tuition agreement as described in RCW
28B.15.725; or
(((i))) (j) A student who meets the requirements of RCW
28B.15.0131: PROVIDED, That a nonresident student enrolled for more
than six hours per semester or quarter shall be considered as attending
for primarily educational purposes, and for tuition and fee paying
purposes only such period of enrollment shall not be counted toward the
establishment of a bona fide domicile of one year in this state unless
such student proves that the student has in fact established a bona
fide domicile in this state primarily for purposes other than
educational.
(3) The term "nonresident student" shall mean any student who does
not qualify as a "resident student" under the provisions of RCW
28B.15.012 and 28B.15.013. Except for students qualifying under
subsection (2)(((h))) (i) of this section, a nonresident student shall
include:
(a) A student attending an institution with the aid of financial
assistance provided by another state or governmental unit or agency
thereof, such nonresidency continuing for one year after the completion
of such semester or quarter.
(b) A person who is not a citizen of the United States of America
who does not have permanent or temporary resident status or does not
hold "Refugee-Parolee" or "Conditional Entrant" status with the United
States immigration and naturalization service or is not otherwise
permanently residing in the United States under color of law and who
does not also meet and comply with all the applicable requirements in
RCW 28B.15.012 and 28B.15.013.
(4) The term "domicile" shall denote a person's true, fixed and
permanent home and place of habitation. It is the place where the
student intends to remain, and to which the student expects to return
when the student leaves without intending to establish a new domicile
elsewhere. The burden of proof that a student, parent or guardian has
established a domicile in the state of Washington primarily for
purposes other than educational lies with the student.
(5) The term "dependent" shall mean a person who is not financially
independent. Factors to be considered in determining whether a person
is financially independent shall be set forth in rules and regulations
adopted by the higher education coordinating board and shall include,
but not be limited to, the state and federal income tax returns of the
person and/or the student's parents or legal guardian filed for the
calendar year prior to the year in which application is made and such
other evidence as the board may require.

--- END ---