BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.37.530 and 1997 c 328 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) It is unlawful:
(((a))) (1) For any person to operate a motorcycle or motor-driven
cycle not equipped with mirrors on the left and right sides of the
motorcycle which shall be so located as to give the driver a complete
view of the highway for a distance of at least two hundred feet to the
rear of the motorcycle or motor-driven cycle: PROVIDED, That mirrors
shall not be required on any motorcycle or motor-driven cycle over
twenty-five years old originally manufactured without mirrors ((and
which has been restored to its original condition and which is being
ridden to or from or otherwise in conjunction with an antique or
classic motorcycle contest, show, or other such assemblage: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That)). No mirror is required on any motorcycle manufactured
prior to January 1, 1931;
(((b))) (2) For any person to operate a motorcycle or motor-driven
cycle which does not have a windshield unless wearing glasses, goggles,
or a face shield ((of a type conforming to rules adopted by the state
patrol));
(((c))) (3) For any person under the age of twenty-one years to
operate or ride upon a motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, or moped on a
state highway, county road, or city street unless wearing upon his or
her head a commercially manufactured protective motorcycle helmet ((of
a type conforming to rules adopted by the state patrol)) except when
the vehicle is an antique motor-driven cycle at least twenty-five years
old, or an automobile that is licensed as a motorcycle, or ((when the))
a vehicle ((is)) equipped with seat belts and roll bars ((approved by
the state patrol)). The motorcycle helmet must be equipped with either
a neck or chin strap which shall be fastened securely while the
motorcycle or motor-driven cycle is in motion. Persons operating
electric-assisted bicycles shall comply with all laws and regulations
related to the use of bicycle helmets;
(((d))) (4) For any person to transport a child under the age of
five on a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle((;
(e) For any person to sell or offer for sale a motorcycle helmet
which does not meet the requirements established by the state patrol.
(2) The state patrol is hereby authorized and empowered to adopt
and amend rules, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act,
concerning the standards and procedures for conformance of rules
adopted for glasses, goggles, face shields, and protective helmets)).

Sec. 2 RCW 46.37.535 and 1990 c 270 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is unlawful for any person to rent out motorcycles, motor-driven
cycles, or mopeds unless the person also has commercially manufactured
motorcycle helmets on hand for rent ((helmets of a type conforming to
rules adopted by the state patrol)).
It shall be unlawful for any person to rent a motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, or moped unless the person has in his or her possession
a commercially manufactured motorcycle helmet ((of a type approved by
the state patrol, regardless of from whom the helmet is obtained)).

--- END ---