BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.02.065 and 2001 c 57 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Documents, materials, or other information as described in
subsection (5) of this section are confidential by law and privileged,
are not subject to public disclosure under chapter 42.17 RCW, and are
not subject to subpoena directed to the commissioner or any person who
received documents, materials, or other information while acting under
the authority of the commissioner. The commissioner is authorized to
use such documents, materials, or other information in the furtherance
of any regulatory or legal action brought as a part of the
commissioner's official duties. The confidentiality and privilege
created by this section and RCW 42.17.31916 applies only to the
commissioner, any person acting under the authority of the
commissioner, the national association of insurance commissioners and
its affiliates and subsidiaries, regulatory and law enforcement
officials of other states and nations, the federal government, and
international authorities.
(2) Neither the commissioner nor any person who received documents,
materials, or other information while acting under the authority of the
commissioner is permitted or required to testify in any private civil
action concerning any confidential and privileged documents, materials,
or information subject to subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The commissioner:
(a) May share documents, materials, or other information, including
the confidential and privileged documents, materials, or information
subject to subsection (1) of this section, with (i) the national
association of insurance commissioners and its affiliates and
subsidiaries, and (ii) regulatory and law enforcement officials of
other states and nations, the federal government, and international
authorities, if the recipient agrees to maintain the confidentiality
and privileged status of the document, material, or other information;
(b) May receive documents, materials, or information, including
otherwise either confidential or privileged, or both, documents,
materials, or information, from (i) the national association of
insurance commissioners and its affiliates and subsidiaries, and (ii)
regulatory and law enforcement officials of other states and nations,
the federal government, and international authorities and shall
maintain as confidential and privileged any document, material, or
information received that is either confidential or privileged, or
both, under the laws of the jurisdiction that is the source of the
document, material, or information; and
(c) May enter into agreements governing the sharing and use of
information consistent with this subsection.
(4) No waiver of an existing privilege or claim of confidentiality
in the documents, materials, or information may occur as a result of
disclosure to the commissioner under this section or as a result of
sharing as authorized in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) Documents, materials, or information, which is either
confidential or privileged, or both, which has been provided to the
commissioner by (a) the national association of insurance commissioners
and its affiliates and subsidiaries, (b) regulatory or law enforcement
officials of other states and nations, the federal government, or
international authorities, or (c) agencies of this state, is
confidential and privileged only if the documents, materials, or
information is protected from disclosure by the applicable laws of the
jurisdiction that is the source of the document, material, or
information.
(6)(a) Working papers, documents, materials, or information
produced by, obtained by, or disclosed to the commissioner or any other
person in the course of a financial or market conduct examination are
not required to be disclosed by the commissioner unless cited by the
commissioner in connection with an agency action as defined in RCW
34.05.010(3).
(b) The commissioner shall notify a party that produced the
documents, materials, or information five business days before
disclosure in connection with an agency action. The notified party may
seek injunctive relief to prevent disclosure of any documents,
materials, or information it believes is confidential or privileged in
a court of competent jurisdiction. In civil actions between private
parties or in criminal actions, disclosure to the commissioner under
this section does not create any privilege or claim of confidentiality
or waive any existing privilege or claim of confidentiality.
(7) The commissioner shall disclose the documents, materials, or
information under subsection (6) of this section related to a financial
or market conduct examination undertaken as a result of a proposed
change of control governed in whole or in part by chapter 48.31B or
48.31C RCW, after receipt of a public disclosure request, unless (a)
the document, material, or information is otherwise privileged or
exempted from public disclosure, and (b) the commissioner finds that
the public interest in disclosure of the document, material, or
information is outweighed by the public interest in nondisclosure in
that particular instance.
(8) Any person may petition the superior court of Thurston county
for information exempt from public disclosure under subsection (6) of
this section. The court shall conduct an in camera review and, based
on a showing of good cause, shall order the commissioner to allow
access to the information by the petitioner, provided the petitioner
maintains the confidentiality of the information and does not disclose
the information to any other person, except upon further order of the
court. After reviewing the information and conducting a regular
hearing, the court shall order public disclosure of the information if
the court finds for cause shown that there is a public interest in the
disclosure of the information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2004.

--- END ---