BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.44.170 and 2002 c 168 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person moving a mobile home as defined in RCW 46.04.302 or
a park model trailer as defined in RCW 46.04.622 upon public highways
of the state must obtain a special permit from the department of
transportation and local authorities pursuant to RCW 46.44.090 and
46.44.093 and shall pay the proper fee as prescribed by RCW 46.44.0941
and 46.44.096.
(2) A special permit issued as provided in subsection (1) of this
section for the movement of any mobile home or a park model
(([trailer])) trailer that is assessed for purposes of property taxes
shall not be valid until the county treasurer of the county in which
the mobile home or park model trailer is located shall endorse or
attach ((thereto)) his or her certificate that all property taxes which
are a lien or which are delinquent, or both, upon the mobile home or
park model trailer being moved have been satisfied. Further, any
mobile home or park model trailer required to have a special movement
permit under this section shall display an easily recognizable decal((:
PROVIDED, That)). However, endorsement or certification by the county
treasurer and the display of ((said)) the decal is not required:
(a) When a mobile home or park model trailer is to enter the state
or is being moved from a manufacturer or distributor to a retail sales
outlet or directly to the purchaser's designated location or between
retail and sales outlets; or
(b) When a signed affidavit of destruction is filed with the county
assessor and the mobile home or park model trailer is being moved to a
disposal site by a landlord as defined in RCW 59.20.030 after (i) the
mobile home or park model trailer has been abandoned as defined in RCW
59.20.030; or (ii) a final judgment for restitution of the premises
under RCW 59.18.410 has been executed in favor of the landlord with
regard to the mobile home or park model trailer. The mobile home or
park model trailer will be removed from the tax rolls and, upon
notification by the assessor, any outstanding taxes on the destroyed
mobile home will be removed by the county treasurer.
(3) If the landlord of a mobile home park takes ownership of a
mobile home or park model trailer with the intent to resell or rent the
same under RCW 59.20.030 after (a) the mobile home or park model
trailer has been abandoned as defined in RCW 59.20.030; or (b) a final
judgment for restitution of the premises under RCW 59.18.410 has been
executed in favor of the landlord with regard to the mobile home or
park model trailer, the outstanding taxes become the responsibility of
the landlord.
(4) It ((shall be)) is the responsibility of the owner of the
mobile home or park model trailer subject to property taxes or the
agent to obtain ((such)) the endorsement and decal from the county
treasurer ((and said decal)) before a mobile home or park model trailer
is moved.
(((3) Nothing herein should be construed as prohibiting)) (5) This
section does not prohibit the issuance of vehicle license plates for a
mobile home or park model trailer subject to property taxes, but ((no
such)) plates shall not be issued unless the mobile home or park model
trailer subject to property taxes for which ((such)) plates are sought
has been listed for property tax purposes in the county in which it is
principally located and the appropriate fee for ((such)) the license
has been paid.
(((4))) (6) The department of transportation and local authorities
are authorized to adopt reasonable rules for implementing the
provisions of this section. The department of transportation shall
adopt rules specifying the design, reflective characteristics, annual
coloration, and for the uniform implementation of the decal required by
this section.

--- END ---