BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 71.09 RCW
to read as follows:
In no case shall a secure community transition facility be sited:
(1) In an area that has been zoned for residential or commercial
uses; or
(2) Adjacent to, immediately across a street or parking lot from,
or within the line of sight of a risk potential activity or facility in
existence at the time a site is listed for consideration. "Within the
line of sight" means that it is possible to reasonably visually
distinguish and recognize individuals.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.09.285 and 2002 c 68 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except with respect to the secure community transition facility
established pursuant to RCW 71.09.250, the secretary shall develop
policy guidelines that balance the average response time of emergency
services to the general area of a proposed secure community transition
facility against the proximity of the proposed site to risk potential
activities and facilities in existence at the time the site is listed
for consideration.
(2) ((In no case shall the policy guidelines permit location of a
facility adjacent to, immediately across a street or parking lot from,
or within the line of sight of a risk potential activity or facility in
existence at the time a site is listed for consideration. "Within the
line of sight" means that it is possible to reasonably visually
distinguish and recognize individuals.
(3))) The policy guidelines shall require that great weight be
given to sites that are the farthest removed from any risk potential
activity.
(((4))) (3) The policy guidelines shall specify how distance from
the location is measured and any variations in the measurement based on
the size of the property within which a proposed facility is to be
located.
(((5))) (4) The policy guidelines shall establish a method to
analyze and compare the criteria for each site in terms of public
safety and security, site characteristics, and program components. In
making a decision regarding a site following the analysis and
comparison, the secretary shall give priority to public safety and
security considerations. The analysis and comparison of the criteria
are to be documented and made available at the public hearings
prescribed in RCW 71.09.315.
(((6))) (5) Policy guidelines adopted by the secretary under this
section shall be considered by counties and cities when providing for
the siting of secure community transition facilities as required under
RCW 36.70A.200.

Sec. 3 RCW 71.09.342 and 2002 c 68 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After October 1, 2002, notwithstanding RCW 36.70A.103 or any
other law, this section preempts and supersedes local plans,
development regulations, permitting requirements, inspection
requirements, and all other laws as necessary to enable the department
to site, construct, renovate, occupy, and operate secure community
transition facilities within the borders of the following:
(a) Any county that had five or more persons civilly committed from
that county, or detained at the special commitment center under a
pending civil commitment petition from that county where a finding of
probable cause has been made, on April 1, 2001, if the department
determines that the county has not met the requirements of RCW
36.70A.200 with respect to secure community transition facilities.
This subsection does not apply to the county in which the secure
community transition facility authorized under RCW 71.09.250(1) is
located; and
(b) Any city located within a county listed in (a) of this
subsection that the department determines has not met the requirements
of RCW 36.70A.200 with respect to secure community transition
facilities.
(2) The department's determination under subsection (1)(a) or (b)
of this section is final and is not subject to appeal under chapter
34.05 or 36.70A RCW.
(3) In no case shall a secure community transition facility be
sited:
(a) In an area that has been zoned for residential or commercial
uses; or
(b) Adjacent to, immediately across a street or parking lot from,
or within the line of sight of a risk potential activity or facility in
existence at the time a site is listed for consideration. "Within the
line of sight" means that it is possible to reasonably visually
distinguish and recognize individuals.
(4) When siting a facility in a county or city that has been
preempted under this section, the department shall consider the policy
guidelines established under RCW ((71.09.275)) 71.09.285 and 71.09.290
and shall hold the hearings required in RCW 71.09.315.
(((4))) (5) Nothing in this section prohibits the department from:
(a) Siting a secure community transition facility in a city or
county that has complied with the requirements of RCW 36.70A.200 with
respect to secure community transition facilities, including a city
that is located within a county that has been preempted. If the
department sites a secure community transition facility in such a city
or county, the department shall use the process established by the city
or county for siting such facilities; or
(b) Consulting with a city or county that has been preempted under
this section regarding the siting of a secure community transition
facility.
(((5))) (6)(a) A preempted city or county may propose public safety
measures specific to any finalist site to the department. The measures
must be consistent with the location of the facility at that finalist
site. The proposal must be made in writing by the date of:
(i) The second hearing under RCW 71.09.315(2)(a) when there are
three finalist sites; or
(ii) The first hearing under RCW 71.09.315(2)(b) when there is only
one site under consideration.
(b) The department shall respond to the city or county in writing
within fifteen business days of receiving the proposed measures. The
response shall address all proposed measures.
(c) If the city or county finds that the department's response is
inadequate, the city or county may notify the department in writing
within fifteen business days of the specific items which it finds
inadequate. If the city or county does not notify the department of a
finding that the response is inadequate within fifteen business days,
the department's response shall be final.
(d) If the city or county notifies the department that it finds the
response inadequate and the department does not revise its response to
the satisfaction of the city or county within seven business days, the
city or county may petition the governor to designate a person with law
enforcement expertise to review the response under RCW 34.05.479.
(e) The governor's designee shall hear a petition filed under this
subsection and shall make a determination within thirty days of hearing
the petition. The governor's designee shall consider the department's
response, and the effectiveness and cost of the proposed measures, in
relation to the purposes of this chapter. The determination by the
governor's designee shall be final and may not be the basis for any
cause of action in civil court.
(f) The city or county shall bear the cost of the petition to the
governor's designee. If the city or county prevails on all issues, the
department shall reimburse the city or county costs incurred, as
provided under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(g) Neither the department's consideration and response to public
safety conditions proposed by a city or county nor the decision of the
governor's designee shall affect the preemption under this section or
the department's authority to site, construct, renovate, occupy, and
operate the secure community transition facility at that finalist site
or at any finalist site.
(((6))) (7) Until June 30, 2009, the secretary shall site,
construct, occupy, and operate a secure community transition facility
sited under this section in an environmentally responsible manner that
is consistent with the substantive objectives of chapter 43.21C RCW,
and shall consult with the department of ecology as appropriate in
carrying out the planning, construction, and operations of the
facility. The secretary shall make a threshold determination of
whether a secure community transition facility sited under this section
would have a probable significant, adverse environmental impact. If
the secretary determines that the secure community transition facility
has such an impact, the secretary shall prepare an environmental impact
statement that meets the requirements of RCW 43.21C.030 and 43.21C.031
and the rules promulgated by the department of ecology relating to such
statements. Nothing in this subsection shall be the basis for any
civil cause of action or administrative appeal.
(((7))) (8) This section does not apply to the secure community
transition facility established pursuant to RCW 71.09.250(1).

Sec. 4 RCW 34.05.4791 and 2002 c 68 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
A petition brought pursuant to RCW 71.09.342(((5))) (6) shall be
heard under the provisions of RCW 34.05.479 except that the decision of
the governor's designee shall be final and is not subject to judicial
review.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---