BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2002 c 10 s 2 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is created the Washington state task force against the
trafficking of persons.
(2) The task force shall consist of the following members:
(a) The director of the office of community development, or the
director's designee;
(b) The secretary of the department of health, or the secretary's
designee;
(c) The secretary of the department of social and health services,
or the secretary's designee;
(d) The director of the department of labor and industries, or the
director's designee;
(e) The commissioner of the employment security department, or the
commissioner's designee;
(f) Nine members, selected by the director of the office of
community development, that represent public and private sector
organizations that provide assistance to persons who are victims of
trafficking.
(3) The task force shall be chaired by the director of the office
of community development, or the director's designee.
(4) The task force shall carry out the following activities:
(a) Measure and evaluate the progress of the state in trafficking
prevention activities;
(b) Identify available federal, state, and local programs that
provide services to victims of trafficking that include, but are not
limited to health care, human services, housing, education, legal
assistance, job training or preparation, interpreting services, English
as a second language classes, and victim's compensation; and
(c) Make recommendations on methods to provide a coordinated system
of support and assistance to persons who are victims of trafficking.
(5) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to
the governor and legislature by November 30, 2002.
(6) The office of community development shall provide necessary
administrative and clerical support to the task force.
(7) The members of the task force shall serve without compensation,
but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(((8) The task force expires March 1, 2003.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act is added to chapter
7.68 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, House Bill 1090, is not provided by June 30, 2003, in the omnibus
appropriations act, this act is null and void.

--- END ---