BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that prescription
drugs are an effective and important part of efforts to maintain and
improve the health of Washington state residents. Yet prescription
drug expenditures in both the public and private sectors are growing at
rates far in excess of consumer or medical inflation, placing a strain
on the ability of public and private health care purchasers to continue
to offer comprehensive health benefits coverage. In addition,
inappropriate use of prescription drugs can have serious health
consequences for Washington state residents.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to develop a comprehensive
prescription drug education and utilization system in Washington state
that will ensure best prescribing practices and pharmaceutical use,
reduce administrative burdens on providers, increase consumer
understanding of and compliance with appropriate use of prescription
drugs, help to control increases in consumer and state health care
spending, and improve prescription drug purchasing through a sound
evidence-based process that evaluates the therapeutic value and cost-effectiveness of prescription drugs.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.05.011 and 2001 c 165 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section shall apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Administrator" means the administrator of the authority.
(2) "State purchased health care" or "health care" means medical
and health care, pharmaceuticals, and medical equipment purchased with
state and federal funds by the department of social and health
services, the department of health, the basic health plan, the state
health care authority, the department of labor and industries, the
department of corrections, the department of veterans affairs, and
local school districts.
(3) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.
(4) "Insuring entity" means an insurer as defined in chapter 48.01
RCW, a health care service contractor as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW,
or a health maintenance organization as defined in chapter 48.46 RCW.
(5) "Flexible benefit plan" means a benefit plan that allows
employees to choose the level of health care coverage provided and the
amount of employee contributions from among a range of choices offered
by the authority.
(6) "Employee" includes all full-time and career seasonal employees
of the state, whether or not covered by civil service; elected and
appointed officials of the executive branch of government, including
full-time members of boards, commissions, or committees; and includes
any or all part-time and temporary employees under the terms and
conditions established under this chapter by the authority; justices of
the supreme court and judges of the court of appeals and the superior
courts; and members of the state legislature or of the legislative
authority of any county, city, or town who are elected to office after
February 20, 1970. "Employee" also includes: (a) Employees of a
county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state if
the legislative authority of the county, municipality, or other
political subdivision of the state seeks and receives the approval of
the authority to provide any of its insurance programs by contract with
the authority, as provided in RCW 41.04.205; (b) employees of employee
organizations representing state civil service employees, at the option
of each such employee organization, and, effective October 1, 1995,
employees of employee organizations currently pooled with employees of
school districts for the purpose of purchasing insurance benefits, at
the option of each such employee organization; and (c) employees of a
school district if the authority agrees to provide any of the school
districts' insurance programs by contract with the authority as
provided in RCW 28A.400.350.
(7) "Board" means the public employees' benefits board established
under RCW 41.05.055.
(8) "Retired or disabled school employee" means:
(a) Persons who separated from employment with a school district or
educational service district and are receiving a retirement allowance
under chapter 41.32 or 41.40 RCW as of September 30, 1993;
(b) Persons who separate from employment with a school district or
educational service district on or after October 1, 1993, and
immediately upon separation receive a retirement allowance under
chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW;
(c) Persons who separate from employment with a school district or
educational service district due to a total and permanent disability,
and are eligible to receive a deferred retirement allowance under
chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW.
(9) "Benefits contribution plan" means a premium only contribution
plan, a medical flexible spending arrangement, or a cafeteria plan
whereby state and public employees may agree to a contribution to
benefit costs which will allow the employee to participate in benefits
offered pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or other sections of the
internal revenue code.
(10) "Salary" means a state employee's monthly salary or wages.
(11) "Participant" means an individual who fulfills the eligibility
and enrollment requirements under the benefits contribution plan.
(12) "Plan year" means the time period established by the
authority.
(13) "Separated employees" means persons who separate from
employment with an employer as defined in:
(a) RCW 41.32.010(11) on or after July 1, 1996; or
(b) RCW 41.35.010 on or after September 1, 2000; or
(c) RCW 41.40.010 on or after March 1, 2002;
and who are at least age fifty-five and have at least ten years of
service under the teachers' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW
41.32.010(40), the Washington school employees' retirement system plan
3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010, or the public employees' retirement
system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.40.010.
(14) "Emergency service personnel killed in the line of duty" means
law enforcement officers and fire fighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030,
and reserve officers and fire fighters as defined in RCW 41.24.010 who
die as a result of injuries sustained in the course of employment as
determined consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and
industries.
(15) "Prescription drug board" means the prescription drug quality
improvement and purchasing board created in section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The prescription drug quality improvement and purchasing board
is created within the authority. The function of the prescription drug
board is to design and approve policies and programs related to
prescription drugs for public and private participants in the
purchasing consortium established under section 4 of this act.
(2) The prescription drug board shall be composed of eleven members
selected as provided in this subsection.
(a) The governor shall select one member of the prescription drug
board from each list of three nominees submitted by statewide
organizations representing each of the following:
(i) One representative of state employees, who represents an
employee union certified as exclusive representative of at least one
bargaining unit of classified employees;
(ii) One member who is a licensed physician;
(iii) One member who is a licensed pharmacist;
(iv) One member representing a health carrier licensed under Title
48 RCW; and
(v) One member representing a private union;
(b) The governor shall select two members of the prescription drug
board from a list of nominees submitted by statewide organizations
representing consumers, one of whom shall represent individuals under
age sixty-five without insurance coverage for prescription drugs and
one of whom shall represent individuals over age sixty-five without
insurance coverage for prescription drugs;
(c) The governor shall select two members of the prescription drug
board from a list of nominees submitted by statewide organizations
representing business, one of whom shall represent small businesses who
employ fifty or fewer employees and one of whom shall represent large
businesses;
(d) One member shall be the secretary of the department of social
and health services; and
(e) One member shall be the administrator.
(3) The members who represent the organizations appointed pursuant
to subsection (2) (a)(v), (b), and (c) of this section shall be
nonvoting members until such time as there are no less than twelve
thousand participants enrolled with the authority for prescription drug
purchasing from the organizations they are appointed to represent.
(4) The governor shall appoint the initial members of the
prescription drug board to staggered terms not to exceed four years.
Members appointed thereafter shall serve two-year terms. Members of
the prescription drug board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW
43.03.250 and shall be reimbursed for their travel expenses while on
official business in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The
prescription drug board shall prescribe rules for the conduct of its
business. The administrator shall serve as chair of the prescription
drug board. Meetings of the prescription drug board shall be at the
call of the chair.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The prescription drug board shall, directly or by contract:
(a) Establish a new, or contract with an existing, pharmacy and
therapeutics committee to develop a preferred drug list for use by
participants in the purchasing consortium.
(i) The pharmacy and therapeutics committee shall be comprised of
licensed physicians, licensed pharmacists, and pharmacoeconomists. At
least one physician and one pharmacist must have demonstrated
experience in serving women and people of color.
(ii) Decisions of the pharmacy and therapeutics committee must be
based on an evidence-based evaluation of the efficacy of prescription
drugs, considering safety, efficacy, and outcomes, and any unique
circumstances regarding women, people of color, elderly, children, and
those with special diseases. Decisions of the pharmacy and
therapeutics committee related to the preferred drug list are binding
on the prescription drug board.
(iii) State purchased health care programs shall adopt the
preferred drug list established by the prescription drug board for
those components of their programs that purchase prescription drugs
directly or through reimbursement of retail pharmacies. In
administering prescription drug benefits under state purchased health
care programs, agencies shall honor a prescriber's direction to
dispense a prescription drug as written on the prescription order;
(b) Establish drug utilization review policies. State purchased
health care programs shall adopt these drug utilization review policies
consistent with the scope of benefits offered through programs
administered by that agency and may implement the policies directly or
by contract or interagency agreement;
(c) Develop and distribute prescriber and consumer education
materials and processes. State purchased health care programs shall
adopt these prescriber and consumer education materials and processes
and may implement the policies directly or by contract or interagency
agreement;
(d) Establish a prescription drug purchasing consortium. State
purchased health care programs shall purchase prescription drugs
through the consortium for those prescription drugs that are purchased
directly by the state and those that are purchased through
reimbursement of retail pharmacies, unless exempted under section 10 or
11 of this act.
(2) Participation in the purchasing consortium and other
prescription drug board activities is purely voluntary for units of
local government, private entities, and individuals who lack
prescription drug coverage. A private entity may limit its
participation to one or more of the prescription drug board's program
components. The prescription drug board may set reasonable fees,
including enrollment fees for participating individuals, to cover
administrative costs attributable to participation of private entities
in prescription drug board activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
No member of the prescription drug board, the pharmacy and
therapeutics committee, or any committee that may be established to
develop utilization review or prescriber and consumer education
policies may be employed by a pharmaceutical manufacturer, or be
employed by any agency administering state purchased health care
programs. As a condition of appointment to the prescription drug board
or any committee, each member must disclose any potential conflict of
interest, including receipt of any remuneration, grants, or other
compensation from a pharmaceutical manufacturer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
The prescription drug consortium account is created in the custody
of the state treasurer. All receipts from the fees from the
prescription drug purchasing consortium created in section 4 of this
act must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account
may be used only for the purposes of this act. Only the administrator
or the administrator's designee may authorize expenditures from the
account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
The prescription drug board and the administrator may solicit and
accept grants or other funds from public and private sources to support
consumer and provider education and other related activities under this
act. Any grants or funds received may be used to enhance these
activities as long as program standards established by the prescription
drug board and the administrator are maintained.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
The administrator shall contract with an independent entity to
evaluate the implementation and impacts of the prescription drug
board's activities under this act.
(1) The evaluation shall assess:
(a) The degree to which the program has influenced prescription
drug prescribing practices among health care providers in Washington,
including a description of how prescribing practices may have changed;
(b) The impact of the program on quality of care and clinical
outcomes for persons enrolled in state purchased health care programs;
(c) The extent to which the program has lessened administrative
burdens on health care providers participating in state purchased
health care programs;
(d) The impact of the program on prescription drug expenditures
across state purchased health care programs; and
(e) The impact of the program on the utilization of, and
expenditures for, other health care services funded by state purchased
health care programs.
(2) The administrator shall make every effort to pursue and obtain
federal or private foundation funding for the evaluation from entities
such as the federal agency for health care research and quality or the
milbank memorial fund. To ensure that results of the evaluation are
objective and unbiased, private foundation funds derived from the
pharmaceutical industry may not be used to fund the evaluation.
(3) The results of the evaluation must be submitted to the governor
and the legislature by January 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 69.41 RCW
to read as follows:
Any pharmacist filling a prescription under the preferred drug list
program established under section 4 of this act shall substitute the
preferred drug for any nonpreferred drug in a given therapeutic
category, unless the prescriber has indicated on the prescription that
the nonpreferred drug must be dispensed as written, in which case the
pharmacist shall dispense the nonpreferred drug as written. When a
substitution is made, or a preferred drug within a therapeutic class
changes, the prescriber must be notified in writing by the dispensing
pharmacist of the specific drug and dose dispensed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in this act preempts state-owned or managed hospitals
licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW from aggregate purchasing through
other programs. These hospitals may choose to participate in the
preferred drug list program under section 4 of this act if drugs can be
obtained at lower cost.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 43.60A
RCW to read as follows:
Nothing in this act preempts state-owned facilities and programs
operated by the department of veterans affairs from aggregate
purchasing through other programs. The department may choose to
participate in the preferred drug list program under section 4 of this
act if drugs can be obtained at lower cost.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The therapeutic consultation service
operated by the department of social and health services expires on
January 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
The prescription drug board and agencies that administer state
purchased health care programs are authorized to adopt rules
implementing this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---