BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.312 and 1998 c 316 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to amounts received for water
services supplied by a water-sewer district established under Title 57
RCW or by an irrigation district established under Title 87 RCW that:
(a) Has less than one thousand five hundred connections; and
(b) Charges residential water rates that exceed one hundred twenty-five percent of the statewide average residential water rate published
on or before July 1st of each year by the department of health.
(2) This chapter does not apply to amounts received for water
services supplied by a water system that:
(a) Is operated or owned by a qualified satellite management agency
under RCW 70.116.134;
(b) Has less than two hundred connections; and
(c) Charges residential water rates that exceed one hundred twenty-five percent of the statewide average residential water rate published
on or before July 1st of each year by the department of health.
(3) To receive an exemption under this section, the water system or
irrigation district shall supply to the department of revenue proof
that an amount equal to at least ninety percent of the value of the
exemption shall be expended to repair, equip, maintain, and upgrade the
water system.
(4) The department of health may use rate information provided in
surveys and reports produced by the association of Washington cities,
an association of elected officials, or other municipal association to
estimate a statewide average residential water rate.
(((5) This section expires July 1, 2004.))

--- END ---