BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29.30.025 and 1990 c 59 s 80 are each amended to read
as follows:
After the close of business on the last day for candidates to file
for office, the ((filing officer)) county auditor shall, from among
those filings made in person ((and)), by mail, and by electronic means,
determine by lot the order in which the names of those candidates will
appear on all ((sample and absentee ballots. In the case of candidates
for city, town, and district office, this procedure shall also
determine the order for candidate names on the official primary ballot
used at the polling place)) primary ballots, including sample ballots.
The determination shall be done publicly and may be witnessed by the
media and by any candidate. If no primary is required for any
nonpartisan office under RCW 29.15.150 or 29.21.015, the names shall
appear on the general election ballot in the order determined by lot.

Sec. 2 RCW 29.33.320 and 1990 c 59 s 28 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary of state shall not approve a vote tallying system
unless it:
(1) Correctly counts votes on ballots on which the proper number of
votes have been marked for any office or issue;
(2) Ignores votes marked for any office or issue where more than
the allowable number of votes have been marked, but correctly counts
the properly voted portions of the ballot;
(3) Accumulates a count of the specific number of ballots tallied
for each precinct, total votes by candidate for each office, and total
votes for and against each issue of the ballot in that precinct;
(4) ((Accommodates rotation of candidates' names on the ballot
under RCW 29.30.040;
(5))) Produces precinct and cumulative totals in printed form; and
(((6))) (5) Except for functions or capabilities unique to this
state, has been tested, certified, and used in at least one other state
or election jurisdiction.

Sec. 3 RCW 35.22.055 and 1974 ex.s. c 1 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, whenever the population
of a city is three hundred thousand persons or more, not less than ten
days before the time for filing declarations of candidacy for election
of freeholders under Article XI, section 10 (Amendment 40), of the
state Constitution, the city clerk shall designate the positions to be
filled by consecutive number, commencing with one. The positions to be
designated shall be dealt with as separate offices for all election
purposes, and each candidate shall file for one, but only one, of the
positions so designated.
In the printing of ballots, the positions of the names of
candidates for each numbered position ((shall be changed as many times
as there are candidates for the numbered positions, following insofar
as applicable the procedure provided for in RCW 29.30.040 for the
rotation of names on primary ballots, the intention being that ballots
at the polls will reflect as closely as practicable the rotation
procedure as provided for therein)) must be arranged in the order
determined under RCW 29.30.025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RCW 29.30.040 (Primaries -- Rotating names of
candidates) and 1990 c 59 s 94, 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 54, & 1965 c 9 s
29.30.040 are each repealed.

--- END ---