BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29.38.010 and 2001 c 241 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The county auditor may designate any precinct having fewer than
two hundred active registered voters at the time of closing of voter
registration as provided in RCW 29.07.160 as a mail ballot precinct.
The county auditor shall notify each registered voter by mail that for
all future primaries and elections the voting in his or her precinct
will be by mail ballot only. In determining the number of registered
voters in a precinct for the purposes of this section, persons who are
ongoing absentee voters under RCW 29.36.240 shall not be counted.
Nothing in this section may be construed as altering the vote tallying
requirements of RCW 29.62.090.
((As soon as ballots are available, the county auditor shall mail
or deliver a ballot and an envelope, preaddressed to the issuing
officer, to each active registered voter. The auditor shall send each
inactive voter either a ballot or an application to receive a ballot.
The auditor shall determine which of the two is to be sent. If the
inactive voter returns a voted ballot, the ballot shall be counted and
the voter's status restored to active. If the inactive voter completes
and returns an application, a ballot shall be sent and the voter's
status restored to active.))
If the precinct exceeds two hundred registered voters, or the
auditor determines to return to a polling place election environment,
the auditor shall notify each registered voter, by mail, of this and
shall provide the address of the polling place to be used.
(2) The county auditor may designate the entire county as a mail
ballot county. The county auditor shall notify each registered voter
by mail that for all future primaries and elections the voting will be
by mail ballot only. If the auditor determines to return to a polling
place election environment, the auditor shall notify each registered
voter, by mail, of this and shall provide the address of the polling
place to be used.

Sec. 2 RCW 29.38.020 and 2001 c 241 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
At any nonpartisan special election not being held in conjunction
with a state primary or general election, the county, city, town, or
district requesting the election pursuant to RCW 29.13.010 or 29.13.020
may also request that the special election be conducted by mail ballot.
The county auditor may honor the request or may determine that the
election is not to be conducted by mail ballot. The decision of the
county auditor in this regard is final.
((For all special elections not being held in conjunction with a
state primary or state general election where voting is conducted by
mail ballot, the county auditor shall, not less than twenty days before
the date of such election, make available to each registered voter a
mail ballot.)) The auditor shall handle inactive voters in the
((same)) manner ((as inactive voters in mail ballot precincts))
provided in section 4 of this act.

Sec. 3 RCW 29.38.030 and 2001 c 241 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
((In an odd-numbered year,)) The county auditor may conduct a
primary or a special election by mail ballot ((concurrently with the
primary:
(1) For an office or ballot measure of a special purpose district
that is entirely within the county;
(2) For an office or ballot measure of a special purpose district
that lies in the county and one or more other counties if the auditor
first secures the concurrence of the county auditors of those other
counties to conduct the primary in this manner district-wide; and
(3) For a ballot measure or nonpartisan office of a county, city,
or town if the auditor first secures the concurrence of the legislative
authority of the county, city, or town involved)).
The county auditor shall notify ((an)) each election jurisdiction
for which a primary or a special election is to be held that the
primary or special election will be conducted by mail ballot.
((A primary in an odd-numbered year may not be conducted by mail
ballot in a precinct with two hundred or more active registered voters
if a partisan office or state office or state ballot measure is to be
voted upon at that primary in the precinct.
To the extent they are not inconsistent with other provisions of
law, the laws governing the conduct of mail ballot special elections
apply to nonpartisan primaries conducted by mail ballot.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 29.38 RCW
to read as follows:
Except as otherwise provided by law, mail ballots must be processed
in the same manner as absentee ballots. Except where a recount or
litigation under RCW 29.04.030 is pending, the county auditor shall
have sufficient mail ballots ready to mail to voters of that county at
least twenty days before a primary, general election, or special
election.
As soon as ballots are available, the county auditor shall mail or
deliver a ballot and an envelope, preaddressed to the issuing officer,
to each active registered voter. The auditor shall send each inactive
voter either a ballot or an application to receive a ballot. The
auditor shall determine which of the two is to be sent. If the
inactive voter returns a voted ballot, the ballot must be counted and
the voter's status restored to active. If the inactive voter completes
and returns an application, a ballot must be sent and the voter's
status restored to active.

Sec. 5 RCW 29.04.040 and 1999 c 158 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No paper ballot precinct may contain more than three hundred
active registered voters. The county legislative authority may divide,
alter, or combine precincts so that, whenever practicable, over-populated precincts shall contain no more than two hundred fifty active
registered voters in anticipation of future growth.
(2) Precinct boundaries may be altered at any time as long as
sufficient time exists prior to a given election for the necessary
procedural steps to be honored. Except as permitted under subsection
(5) of this section, no precinct boundaries may be changed during the
period starting on the thirtieth day prior to the first day for
candidates to file for the primary election and ending with the day of
the general election.
(3) Precincts in which voting machines or electronic voting devices
are used may contain as many as nine hundred active registered voters.
The number of poll-site ballot counting devices at each polling place
is at the discretion of the auditor. The number of devices must be
adequate to meet the expected voter turnout.
(4) On petition of twenty-five or more voters resident more than
ten miles from any polling site, the county legislative authority shall
establish a separate voting precinct therefor.
(5) The county auditor shall temporarily adjust precinct boundaries
when a city or town annexes unincorporated territory to the city or
town. The adjustment shall be made as soon as possible after the
approval of the annexation. The temporary adjustment shall be limited
to the minimum changes necessary to accommodate the addition of the
territory to the city or town and shall remain in effect only until
precinct boundary modifications reflecting the annexation are adopted
by the county legislative authority.
The county legislative authority may establish by ordinance a
limitation on the maximum number of active registered voters in each
precinct within its jurisdiction. The limitation may be different for
precincts based upon the method of voting used for such precincts and
the number may be less than the number established by law, but in no
case may the number exceed that authorized by law.
The county legislative authority of each county in the state
hereafter formed shall, at their first session, divide their respective
counties into election precincts with two hundred fifty active
registered voters or less and establish the boundaries of the
precincts. The county auditor shall thereupon designate the voting
place for each such precinct.
(6) ((In determining the number of active registered voters for the
purposes of this section, persons who are ongoing absentee voters under
RCW 29.36.013 shall not be counted.)) Nothing in this subsection may
be construed as altering the vote tallying requirements of RCW
29.62.090.

--- END ---