BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that chapter 4,
Laws of 1999 sp. sess. strongly encouraged the forest practices board
to adopt administrative rules that were substantially similar to the
recommendations presented to the legislature in the form of the forests
and fish report. The rules adopted pursuant to the 1999 legislation
require all forest landowners to complete a road maintenance and
abandonment plan, and those rules cannot be changed by the forest
practices board without either a final order from a court, direct
instructions from the legislature, or a recommendation from the
adaptive management process. In the time since the enactment of
chapter 4, Laws of 1999 sp. sess., it has become clear that both the
planning aspect and the implementation aspect of the road maintenance
and abandonment plan requirement may cause an unforeseen and unintended
disproportionate financial hardship on small forest landowners.
(2) The legislature further finds that the commissioner of public
lands and the governor have explored solutions that minimize the
hardship caused to small forest landowners by the forest road
maintenance and abandonment requirements of the forests and fish law,
while maintaining protection for public resources. This act represents
the bulk of the recommendations stemming from that process.
(3) The legislature further finds that it is in the state's
interest to help small forest landowners comply with the requirements
of the forest practices rules in a way that does not require the
landowner to spend unreasonably high and unpredictable amounts of money
to complete road maintenance and abandonment plan preparation and
implementation. Small forest landowners provide significant wildlife
habitat and serve as important buffers between urban development and
Washington's public forest land holdings. As such, the legislature
intends to implement the following principles so that small forest
landowners can feel confident that participation in the forests and
fish agreement will not mean the end of the small forest landowners'
way of life:
(a) The state may not require a small forest landowner to invest in
upgrades, replacements, or other engineering of a forest road, and any
culverts that are a part of the road, that do not threaten public
resources or create a barrier to the passage of fish.
(b) Participation in the forests and fish agreement provides a
benefit to both the landowner in terms of federal assurances, and the
public in terms of aquatic habitat preservation and water quality
enhancement; therefore, if conditions do threaten public resources or
create a barrier to the passage of fish, the road maintenance and
abandonment planning process may not require a small forest landowner
to take a positive action that will result in high cost without a
significant portion of that cost being shared by the public.
(c) Some fish barriers are more of a threat to public resources
than others; therefore, no small forest landowner should be required to
repair a fish barrier until higher priority fish barriers on other
lands in the watershed have been repaired.
(d) An existing culvert on land owned by a small forest landowner
may not be required to be replaced before the end of the culvert's
functional life if the culvert is functioning with little risk to
public resources, or if it was installed under an approved forest
practices application or notification, as long as the culvert has been
properly maintained and is capable of passing fish, unless public
funding is available from the small forest landowners office to pay one
hundred percent of the removal and replacement costs.
(e) The preparation of a road maintenance and abandonment plan can
require technical expertise that may require large expenditures before
the time that the landowner plans to conduct any revenue-generating
operations on his or her land; therefore, small forest landowners
should be allowed to complete a simplified road maintenance and
abandonment plan checklist, that does not require professional
engineering or forestry expertise to complete, and that does not need
to be submitted until the time that the landowner plans to conduct a
revenue-generating forest management activity. This act is intended to
provide an alternate way for small forest landowners to comply with the
road maintenance and abandonment plan goals identified in the forest
practices rules.

Sec. 2 RCW 76.09.020 and 2002 c 17 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((For purposes of this chapter:)) The definitions in this section
apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Adaptive management" means reliance on scientific methods to
test the results of actions taken so that the management and related
policy can be changed promptly and appropriately.
(2) "Appeals board" means the forest practices appeals board
created by RCW 76.09.210.
(3) "Aquatic resources" includes water quality, salmon, other
species of the vertebrate classes Cephalaspidomorphi and Osteichthyes
identified in the forests and fish report, the Columbia torrent
salamander (Rhyacotriton kezeri), the Cascade torrent salamander
(Rhyacotriton cascadae), the Olympic torrent salamander (Rhyacotriton
olympian), the Dunn's salamander (Plethodon dunni), the Van Dyke's
salamander (Plethodon vandyke), the tailed frog (Ascaphus truei), and
their respective habitats.
(4) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of public lands.
(5) "Contiguous" means land adjoining or touching by common corner
or otherwise. Land having common ownership divided by a road or other
right of way shall be considered contiguous.
(6) "Conversion to a use other than commercial timber operation"
means a bona fide conversion to an active use which is incompatible
with timber growing and as may be defined by forest practices rules.
(7) "Department" means the department of natural resources.
(8) "Forest land" means all land which is capable of supporting a
merchantable stand of timber and is not being actively used for a use
which is incompatible with timber growing. Forest land does not
include agricultural land that is or was enrolled in the conservation
reserve enhancement program by contract if such agricultural land was
historically used for agricultural purposes and the landowner intends
to continue to use the land for agricultural purposes in the future.
As it applies to the operation of the road maintenance and abandonment
plan element of the forest practices rules on small forest landowners,
the term "forest land" excludes:
(a) Primary residential home sites, which may include up to two and
one-half acres; and
(b) All land that is primarily used for agricultural purposes,
regardless of size, including but not limited to pastures, orchards,
and grazing lands, and the land on which appurtenances necessary to the
production, preparation, or sale of agricultural products exist in
conjunction with the lands producing the products.
(9) "Forest landowner" means any person in actual control of forest
land, whether such control is based either on legal or equitable title,
or on any other interest entitling the holder to sell or otherwise
dispose of any or all of the timber on such land in any manner((:
PROVIDED, That)). However, any lessee or other person in possession of
forest land without legal or equitable title to such land shall be
excluded from the definition of "forest landowner" unless such lessee
or other person has the right to sell or otherwise dispose of any or
all of the timber located on such forest land.
(10) "Forest practice" means any activity conducted on or directly
pertaining to forest land and relating to growing, harvesting, or
processing timber, including but not limited to:
(a) Road and trail construction;
(b) Harvesting, final and intermediate;
(c) Precommercial thinning;
(d) Reforestation;
(e) Fertilization;
(f) Prevention and suppression of diseases and insects;
(g) Salvage of trees; and
(h) Brush control.
"Forest practice" shall not include preparatory work such as tree
marking, surveying and road flagging, and removal or harvesting of
incidental vegetation from forest lands such as berries, ferns,
greenery, mistletoe, herbs, mushrooms, and other products which cannot
normally be expected to result in damage to forest soils, timber, or
public resources.
(11) "Forest practices rules" means any rules adopted pursuant to
RCW 76.09.040.
(12) "Forest road," as it applies to the operation of the road
maintenance and abandonment plan element of the forest practices rules
on small forest landowners, means a road or road segment that crosses
land that meets the definition of forest land, but excludes residential
driveways.
(13) "Forest trees" does not include hardwood trees cultivated by
agricultural methods in growing cycles shorter than fifteen years if
the trees were planted on land that was not in forest use immediately
before the trees were planted and before the land was prepared for
planting the trees. "Forest trees" includes Christmas trees, but does
not include Christmas trees that are cultivated by agricultural
methods, as that term is defined in RCW 84.33.035.
(((13))) (14) "Forests and fish report" means the forests and fish
report to the board dated April 29, 1999.
(((14))) (15) "Grazing lands" means land that is primarily used for
animal foraging on naturally occurring or planted vegetation, but does
not include land that is used by free-ranging livestock. For the
purposes of this subsection, "free-ranging livestock" means animals
that range freely for food, as opposed to being confined in an
enclosure.
(16) "Application" means the application required pursuant to RCW
76.09.050.
(((15))) (17) "Operator" means any person engaging in forest
practices except an employee with wages as his or her sole
compensation.
(((16))) (18) "Person" means any individual, partnership, private,
public, or municipal corporation, county, the department or other state
or local governmental entity, or association of individuals of whatever
nature.
(((17))) (19) "Public resources" means water, fish and wildlife,
and in addition shall mean capital improvements of the state or its
political subdivisions.
(((18))) (20) "Small forest landowner" has the same meaning as
defined in section 9 of this act.
(21) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, of a commercial
species, including Christmas trees. However, "timber" does not include
Christmas trees that are cultivated by agricultural methods, as that
term is defined in RCW 84.33.035.
(((19))) (22) "Timber owner" means any person having all or any
part of the legal interest in timber. Where such timber is subject to
a contract of sale, "timber owner" shall mean the contract purchaser.
(((20))) (23) "Board" means the forest practices board created in
RCW 76.09.030.
(((21))) (24) "Unconfined avulsing channel migration zone" means
the area within which the active channel of an unconfined avulsing
stream is prone to move and where the movement would result in a
potential near-term loss of riparian forest adjacent to the stream.
Sizeable islands with productive timber may exist within the zone.
(((22))) (25) "Unconfined avulsing stream" means generally fifth
order or larger waters that experience abrupt shifts in channel
location, creating a complex flood plain characterized by extensive
gravel bars, disturbance species of vegetation of variable age,
numerous side channels, wall-based channels, oxbow lakes, and wetland
complexes. Many of these streams have dikes and levees that may
temporarily or permanently restrict channel movement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 76.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board must amend the forest practices rules relating to
road maintenance and abandonment plans that exist on the effective date
of this section to reflect the following differences:
(a) A forest landowner who owns a total of eighty acres or less of
forest land in Washington is not required to submit a road maintenance
and abandonment plan for any block of forest land that is twenty
contiguous acres or less in area;
(b) A landowner who satisfies the definition of a small forest
landowner, but who does not qualify under (a) of this subsection, is
only required to submit a checklist road maintenance and abandonment
plan with the abbreviated content requirements provided for in
subsection (3) of this section, and is not required to comply with
annual reporting and review requirements; and
(c) Existing forest roads must be maintained only to the extent
necessary to prevent damage to public resources.
(2) The department must provide a landowner who is either exempted
from submitting a road maintenance and abandonment plan under
subsection (1)(a) of this section, or who qualifies for a checklist
road maintenance and abandonment plan under subsection (1)(b) of this
section, with an educational brochure outlining road maintenance
standards and requirements. In addition, the department must develop
a series of nonmandatory educational workshops on the rules associated
with road construction and maintenance.
(3)(a) A landowner who qualifies for a checklist road maintenance
and abandonment plan under subsection (1)(b) of this section is only
required to submit a checklist, designed by the department in
consultation with the small forest landowner advisory committee created
in RCW 76.13.110, that confirms that the landowner has read the
educational brochure provided under subsection (2) of this section and
is applying the standards identified in subsection (1)(c) of this
section to the management of the landowner's forest roads. When
developing the checklist road maintenance and abandonment plan, the
department shall ensure that the document is limited to an
identification of forest roads that do not provide for the passage of
fish and the passage of some woody debris, does not allow for the
meeting of water quality standards, does not control sediment delivery,
does not protect streambank stability, and does not divert most run-off
to the forest floor.
(b) A landowner who qualifies for the checklist road maintenance
and abandonment plan is not required to submit the checklist before the
time that he or she submits a forest practices application for forest
lands covered by the checklist. The department may encourage and
accept checklists prior to the time that they are due.
(4) The department must monitor the extent of checklist road
maintenance and abandonment plan submissions and rates of compliance
with rules relating to forest roads, and report its findings to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2008, and
December 31, 2013. The legislative reports must measure the success of
the checklist road maintenance and abandonment plan approach and make
any suggestions for adjustments that are necessary to accomplish the
road maintenance and abandonment goals identified in the forests and
fish report. Reports conducted under this section should be linked to
the program evaluations conducted under section 6(8) of this act.
(5) The board shall adopt emergency rules under RCW 34.05.090 by
October 31, 2003, to implement this section. The emergency rules shall
remain in effect until permanent rules can be adopted. The forest
practices rules that relate to road maintenance and abandonment plans
shall remain in effect as they existed on the effective date of this
section until emergency rules have been adopted under this section.
(6) This section is only intended to relate to the board's duties
as they relate to the road maintenance and abandonment plan element of
the forests and fish report. Nothing in this section alters any forest
landowner's duties and responsibilities under any other section of the
forest practices rules, or any other state law or rule.

Sec. 4 RCW 76.09.055 and 2000 c 11 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the declines of fish stocks
throughout much of the state require immediate action to be taken to
help restore these fish runs where possible. The legislature also
recognizes that federal and state agencies, tribes, county
representatives, and private timberland owners have spent considerable
effort and time to develop the forests and fish report. Given the
agreement of the parties, the legislature believes that the immediate
adoption of emergency rules is appropriate in this particular instance.
These rules can implement many provisions of the forests and fish
report to protect the economic well-being of the state, and to minimize
the risk to the state and landowners to legal challenges. This
authority is not designed to set any precedents for the forest
practices board in future rule making or set any precedents for other
rule-making bodies of the state.
(2) The forest practices board is authorized to adopt emergency
rules amending the forest practices rules with respect to the
protection of aquatic resources, in accordance with RCW 34.05.350,
except: (a)(i) That the rules adopted under this section may remain in
effect until permanent rules are adopted, or until June 30, 2001,
whichever is sooner; (ii) that the rules adopted under section 3(5) of
this act must remain in effect until permanent rules are adopted; (b)
notice of the proposed rules must be published in the Washington State
Register as provided in RCW 34.05.320; (c) at least one public hearing
must be conducted with an opportunity to provide oral and written
comments; and (d) a rule-making file must be maintained as required by
RCW 34.05.370. In adopting ((the)) emergency rules consistent with
this section, the board is not required to prepare a small business
economic impact statement under chapter 19.85 RCW, prepare a statement
indicating whether the rules constitute a significant legislative rule
under RCW 34.05.328, prepare a significant legislative rule analysis
under RCW 34.05.328, or follow the procedural requirements of the state
environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW. Except as provided in
section 3 of this act, the forest practices board may only adopt
recommendations contained in the forests and fish report as emergency
rules under this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 76.09.390 and 1999 sp.s. c 4 s 707 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, prior to
the sale or transfer of land or perpetual timber rights subject to
continuing forest land obligations under the forest practices rules
adopted under RCW 76.09.370, as specifically identified in the forests
and fish report the seller shall notify the buyer of the existence and
nature of such a continuing obligation and the buyer shall sign a
notice of continuing forest land obligation indicating the buyer's
knowledge thereof. The notice shall be on a form prepared by the
department and shall be sent to the department by the seller at the
time of sale or transfer of the land or perpetual timber rights and
retained by the department. If the seller fails to notify the buyer
about the continuing forest land obligation, the seller shall pay the
buyer's costs related to such continuing forest land obligation,
including all legal costs and reasonable attorneys' fees, incurred by
the buyer in enforcing the continuing forest land obligation against
the seller. Failure by the seller to send the required notice to the
department at the time of sale shall be prima facie evidence, in an
action by the buyer against the seller for costs related to the
continuing forest land obligation, that the seller did not notify the
buyer of the continuing forest land obligation prior to sale.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to checklist road
maintenance and abandonment plans.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 76.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that many small forest landowners are not
in the financial position to adequately fund all of the fish barrier
removal projects that are both critical to achieving the goals set
forth in chapter 76.09 RCW, and required by the forest practices rules.
The legislature further finds that a state-led cost-sharing program is
necessary to assist small forest landowners with removing and replacing
culverts and other man-made fish barriers that were added to their land
prior to the effective date of this section, to help achieve the goals
of the forests and fish report, and to assist small forest landowners
in complying with the state's fish passage requirements.
(2) The small forest landowner office must, in cooperation with the
department of fish and wildlife, establish a program designed to assist
small forest landowners with repairing or removing fish barriers and
assist lead entities in acquiring the data necessary to fill any gaps
in fish barrier information. The small forest landowner office and the
department of fish and wildlife must work closely with lead entities or
other local watershed groups to make maximum use of current information
regarding the location and priority of current fish barriers. Where
additional barrier inventories are necessary, funding will be sought
for the collection of this information. Methods, protocols, and
formulas for data gathering and prioritizing must be developed in
consultation with the department of fish and wildlife. The department
of fish and wildlife must assist in the training and management of
barrier location data collection.
(3) The small forest landowner office must actively seek out
funding for the program authorized in this section. The small forest
landowner office must work with consenting landowners to identify and
secure funding from local, state, federal, tribal, or nonprofit habitat
restoration organizations and other private sources, including the
salmon recovery funding board, the United States department of
agriculture, the United States department of transportation, the
Washington state department of transportation, the United States
department of commerce, and the federal highway administration.
(4)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the small
forest landowner office, in implementing the program established in
this section, must provide the highest proportion of public funding
available for the removal of any fish barrier or culvert replacement.
(b) In no case may a small forest landowner be required to pay more
than the lesser of either: (i) Twenty-five percent of any costs
associated with the removal of a particular fish barrier or the
replacement of a particular culvert; or (ii) five thousand dollars for
the removal of a particular fish barrier or the replacement of a
particular culvert.
(c) A small forest landowner shall not be required to remove or
replace a culvert before the end of its functional life if the culvert
is functioning with little risk to public resources, or if it was
installed under an approved forest practices application or
notification, as long as the culvert has been properly maintained and
is capable of passing fish, unless one hundred percent of the removal
and replacement cost is provided by the cost-share program established
in this section.
(5) If a small forest landowner is required to contribute a portion
of the funding under the cost-share program established in this
section, that landowner may satisfy his or her required proportion by
providing either direct monetary contributions or in-kind services to
the project. In-kind services may include labor, equipment, materials,
and other landowner-provided services determined by the department to
have an appropriate value to the removal of a particular fish barrier
or the replacement of a particular culvert.
(6)(a) The department, using culvert assessments and ranked
inventory information provided by the department of fish and wildlife
and the appropriate lead entity as delineated in section 8 of this act,
must establish a prioritized list for the funding of fish barrier
removals on property owned by small forest landowners that ensures that
funding is provided first to the known fish barriers existing on forest
land owned by small forest landowners that cause the greatest harm to
public resources.
(b) As the department collects information about the presence of
fish barriers from submitted road maintenance and abandonment plans, it
must share this information with the department of fish and wildlife
and the technical advisory groups established in RCW 77.85.070. If the
addition of the information collected in the road maintenance and
abandonment plans, or any other changes to the scientific instruments
described in section 8 of this act, alters the analysis conducted under
section 8 of this act, the department must alter the funding order
appropriately to reflect the new information.
(7) The department may accept commitments from small forest
landowners that they will participate in the program to remove fish
barriers from their land at any time, regardless of the funding order
given to the barriers on a particular landowner's property.
(8) The program established in this section must be evaluated by
the department and the department of fish and wildlife by December 31,
2008, and December 31, 2013. The evaluations must measure the success
of the program, identify any adjustments to the program that may be
necessary, and provide any information that is available concerning the
location and road conditions of the small forest landowners who are
exempt from filing a road maintenance and abandonment plan under
section 3 of this act. Evaluations conducted under this section should
be linked to compliance monitoring under section 3(4) of this act. The
results of the evaluations must be submitted to the appropriate
committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 76.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall not disapprove a forest practices application
filed by a small forest landowner on the basis that fish barriers have
not been removed or replaced if the small forest landowner filing the
application has committed to participate in the program established in
section 6 of this act for all fish barriers existing on the block of
forest land covered by the forest practices application, and the fish
barriers existing on the block of forest land covered by the forest
practices application are lower on the funding order list established
for the program than the current projects that are capable of being
funded by the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
In coordination with the department of natural resources and lead
entity groups, the department must establish a ranked inventory of fish
barriers on land owned by small forest landowners based on the
principle that culverts blocking the most fish habitat or causing
actual damages to public resources would be replaced first. The
department shall first gather and synthesize all available existing
information about the locations and impacts of fish barriers in
Washington. This information must include, but not be limited to, the
most recently available limiting factors analysis conducted pursuant to
RCW 77.85.060(2), the stock status information contained in the
department of fish and wildlife salmonid stock inventory (SASSI), the
salmon and steelhead habitat inventory and assessment project (SSHIAP),
and any comparable science-based assessment when available. Where
accurate culvert inventory or assessment or fish distribution
information is absent, the department may collect, or contract with
other organizations to collect, consistent with state law, the
appropriate data. The inventory of fish barriers must be kept current
and at a minimum be updated by the beginning of each calendar year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 76.09 RCW
to read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter and sections 6 and 8 of this act,
"small forest landowner" means an owner of forest land who, at the time
of submission of required documentation to the department, has
harvested from his or her own lands in this state no more than an
average timber volume of two million board feet per year during the
three years prior to submitting documentation to the department and who
certifies that he or she does not expect to harvest from his or her own
lands in the state more than an average timber volume of two million
board feet per year during the ten years following the submission of
documentation to the department. However, any landowner who exceeded
the two million board feet annual average timber harvest threshold from
their land in the three years prior to submitting documentation to the
department, or who expects to exceed the threshold during any of the
following ten years, shall still be deemed a "small forest landowner"
if he or she establishes to the department's reasonable satisfaction
that the harvest limits were, or will be, exceeded in order to raise
funds to pay estate taxes or for an equally compelling and unexpected
obligation, such as for a court-ordered judgment or for extraordinary
medical expenses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The legislature does not intend to
appropriate additional funds for the implementation of this act and
expects all affected state agencies to implement this act's provisions
within existing appropriations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---