BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.250 and 1998 c 343 s 5 and 1998 c 312 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person except persons taxable under RCW
82.04.260(5), 82.04.272, or subsection (2) or (3) of this section
engaging within this state in the business of making sales at retail,
as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business
shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the business,
multiplied by the rate of 0.471 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under
chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or
82.08.0263 except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, as to
such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be
equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the business, multiplied by the
rate of 0.484 percent.
(3) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under
chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or
82.08.0263, that are classified by the federal aviation administration
as FAR part 145 certificated repair stations with an airframe class 4
rating and limited capabilities in instruments, radio equipment, and
specialized services, as to such persons, the amount of tax with
respect to such business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales
of the business, multiplied by the rate of .275 percent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person reporting tax under RCW 82.04.250(3) shall file a
report to the department of revenue in the month following each
calendar quarter containing the following information:
(a) Number of production workers;
(b) Average wage of production workers;
(c) Total wages for production workers;
(d) Total sales as measured by taxable receipts for activities
reported under RCW 82.04.250(3); and
(e) Total wages for production workers as a percent of total sales
reported under RCW 82.04.250(3).
(2) A recipient who fails to submit a complete report under this
section is ineligible on a prospective basis for the rate provided in
RCW 82.04.250(3). The department of revenue shall notify the recipient
in writing by mail that he or she is no longer eligible for the rate.
The recipient is ineligible on the effective date of the postmark of
the notice letter from the department of revenue. If the recipient
satisfactorily completes the report, the department of revenue shall
send a letter to the recipient indicating that the basis for the
ineligibility has been corrected. The letter from the department of
revenue is proof that eligibility has been restored, and eligibility is
effective prospectively beginning on the date the letter is postmarked.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect August 1, 2003.

--- END ---