BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.42.005 and 1991 c 347 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is the policy of the state of Washington to recognize and
preserve water rights in accordance with RCW 90.03.010.
(2) The legislature finds that:
(a) The state of Washington is faced with a shortage of water with
which to meet existing and future needs, particularly during the summer
and fall months and in dry years when the demand is greatest;
(b) Consistent with RCW 90.54.180, reallocation, conservation, and
water use efficiency programs, including storage, should be the
preferred methods of addressing water ((uses)) demands because they can
relieve current critical water situations, provide for presently unmet
needs, and assist in meeting future water needs. Presently unmet needs
or current needs includes the water required to increase the frequency
of occurrence of base or minimum flow levels in streams of the state,
the water necessary to satisfy existing water rights, or the water
necessary to provide full supplies to existing water systems with
current supply deficiencies; ((and))
(c) The interests of the state will be served by developing
programs and regional water resource plans, in cooperation with local
governments, federally recognized tribal governments, appropriate
federal agencies, private citizens, and the various water users and
water interests in the state, that increase the overall ability to
manage the state's waters in order to resolve conflicts and to better
satisfy both present and future needs for water; and
(d) The trust water program can be used to achieve a variety of
water resource management objectives throughout the state, including
responding to drought, improving streamflows on a voluntary basis,
providing water mitigation, or reserving water supply for future uses.
The legislature also finds that the trust program can be used to
facilitate the reallocation of water from one beneficial use to
another. The legislature intends to authorize the department to
conduct pilot rule making to test the proposition that water banking
can facilitate the reallocation of water and reduce water transfer
transaction costs.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.42.020 and 1991 c 347 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(2) "Net water savings" means the amount of water that is
determined to be conserved and usable within a specified stream reach
or reaches for other purposes without impairment or detriment to water
rights existing at the time that a water conservation project is
undertaken, reducing the ability to deliver water, or reducing the
supply of water that otherwise would have been available to other
existing water uses.
(3) "Trust water right" means any water right acquired by the state
under this chapter for management in the state's trust water rights
program.
(4) "Pilot planning areas" means the geographic areas designated
under RCW 90.54.045(2).
(5) "Water conservation project" means any project or program that
achieves physical or operational improvements that provide for
increased water use efficiency in existing systems of diversion,
conveyance, application, or use of water under water rights existing on
July 28, 1991.
(6) "Trust authorization credit" means a credit representing the
authorization to use water from the trust water program.
(7) "WRIA" means a water resource inventory area as defined in RCW
90.82.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall conduct a pilot rule-making process under
RCW 34.05.313 authorizing:
(a) The transfer of water rights to the trust water program for
purposes of establishing trust authorization credits; and
(b) The assignment of trust authorization credits from the trust
water program.
(2) The department's pilot rule making may occur in up to five
WRIAs. In selecting WRIAs for the pilot rule making, the department
shall consider the following factors:
(a) The likelihood that the assignment of trust authorization
credits could provide temporary or permanent water supply to address
drought or future water supply demands; and
(b) The existence of plans, programs, or technical resources within
the WRIA to assist with implementation and review of the pilot rule
making.
(3) The department's pilot rule under this section shall require
that the establishment and assignment of trust authorization credits
comply with all applicable requirements of the trust water program.
The assignment of trust authorization credits from the trust water
program shall comply with conditions placed on the transfer of the
water rights to the trust program, unless the party who transferred the
water rights to the trust program indicates on a trust assignment
application that such conditions may be modified or eliminated to
enable a proposed assignment of trust authorization credits.
(4) The department's pilot rule shall include at least the
following provisions:
(a) Procedures for establishing and quantifying consumptive and
nonconsumptive trust authorization credits through the submission of
trust authorization credit applications;
(b) Procedures for utilization of trust authorization credits;
(c) Procedures for assignment of trust authorization credits;
(d) Procedures for ensuring that assignments of trust authorization
credits comply with the impairment provisions of this chapter;
(e) Geographical constraints on trust authorization credits by
basin, subbasin, or water source; and
(f) Procedures for appeals of trust authorization credits'
assignments.
(5) Within one hundred eighty days of adopting any pilot rule under
this section, the department shall request comments from
municipalities, Indian tribes, conservation groups, developers,
agricultural organizations, and the appropriate regional office within
the WRIA to obtain input on the pilot rule and recommendations for the
legislature to consider regarding the trust water right assignment
pilot program. The department shall forward these comments to the
chair and ranking minority member of the appropriate standing
committees of the Legislature within sixty days of receipt.
(6) Conservancy boards established under chapter 90.80 RCW are not
authorized to process applications to establish trust authorization
credits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---