BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 24.03.005 and 2002 c 74 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the
term:
(1) "Corporation" or "domestic corporation" means a corporation not
for profit subject to the provisions of this chapter, except a foreign
corporation.
(2) "Foreign corporation" means a corporation not for profit
organized under laws other than the laws of this state.
(3) "Not for profit corporation" or "nonprofit corporation" means
a corporation no part of the income of which is distributable to its
members, directors or officers.
(4) "Articles of incorporation" and "articles" mean the original
articles of incorporation and all amendments thereto, and includes
articles of merger and restated articles.
(5) "Bylaws" means the code or codes of rules adopted for the
regulation or management of the affairs of the corporation irrespective
of the name or names by which such rules are designated.
(6) "Member" means an individual or entity having membership rights
in a corporation in accordance with the provisions of its articles or
incorporation or bylaws.
(7) "Board of directors" means the group of persons vested with the
management of the affairs of the corporation irrespective of the name
by which such group is designated in the articles or bylaws.
(8) "Insolvent" means inability of a corporation to pay debts as
they become due in the usual course of its affairs.
(9) (("Duplicate originals" means two copies, original or
otherwise, each with original signatures, or one original with original
signatures and one copy thereof.)) "Deliver" means: (a) Mailing; (b)
transmission by facsimile equipment, for purposes of delivering a
demand, consent, notice, or waiver to the corporation or one of its
officers, directors, or members; (c) electronic transmission, in
accordance with the officer's, director's, or member's consent, for
purposes of delivering a demand, consent, notice, or waiver to the
corporation or one of its officers, directors, or members under section
4 of this act; and (d) as prescribed by the secretary of state for
purposes of submitting a record for filing with the secretary of state.
(10) "Conforms to law" as used in connection with duties of the
secretary of state in reviewing ((documents)) records for filing under
this chapter, means the secretary of state has determined that the
((document)) record complies as to form with the applicable
requirements of this chapter.
(11) "Effective date" means, in connection with a ((document))
record filing made by the secretary of state, the date which is shown
by affixing a "filed" stamp on the ((documents)) records. When a
((document)) record is received for filing by the secretary of state in
a form which complies with the requirements of this chapter and which
would entitle the ((document)) record to be filed immediately upon
receipt, but the secretary of state's approval action occurs subsequent
to the date of receipt, the secretary of state's filing date shall
relate back to the date on which the secretary of state first received
the ((document)) record in acceptable form. An applicant may request
a specific effective date no more than thirty days later than the
receipt date which might otherwise be applied as the effective date.
(12) "Electronic transmission" means an electronic communication
(a) not directly involving the physical transfer of a record in a
tangible medium and (b) that may be retained, retrieved, and reviewed
by the sender and the recipient thereof, and that may be directly
reproduced in a tangible medium by a sender and recipient.
(13) "Electronically transmitted" means the initiation of an
electronic transmission.
(14) "Execute," "executes," or "executed" means (a) signed, with
respect to a written record or (b) electronically transmitted along
with sufficient information to determine the sender's identity, with
respect to an electronic transmission, or (c) filed in compliance with
the standards for filing with the office of the secretary of state as
prescribed by the secretary of state, with respect to a record to be
filed with the secretary of state.
(15) "Executed by an officer of the corporation," or words of
similar import, means that any ((document signed)) record executed by
such person shall be and is ((signed)) executed by that person under
penalties of perjury and in an official and authorized capacity on
behalf of the corporation or person making the ((document)) record
submission with the secretary of state and, for the purpose of
((documents)) records filed electronically with the secretary of state,
in compliance with the rules adopted by the secretary of state for
electronic filing.
(((13))) (16) "An officer of the corporation" means, in connection
with the execution of ((documents)) records submitted for filing with
the secretary of state, the president, a vice president, the secretary,
or the treasurer of the corporation.
(((14))) (17) "Public benefit not for profit corporation" or
"public benefit nonprofit corporation" means a corporation no part of
the income of which is distributable to its members, directors, or
officers and that holds a current tax exempt status as provided under
26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or is specifically exempted from the
requirement to apply for its tax exempt status under 26 U.S.C. Sec.
501(c)(3).
(18) "Record" means information inscribed on a tangible medium or
contained in an electronic transmission.
(19) "Tangible medium" means a writing, copy of a writing,
facsimile, or a physical reproduction, each on paper or on other
tangible material.
(20) "Writing" does not include an electronic transmission.
(21) "Written" means embodied in a tangible medium.

Sec. 2 RCW 24.03.007 and 2002 c 74 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary of state may adopt rules to facilitate electronic
filing. The rules will detail the circumstances under which the
electronic filing of ((documents)) records will be permitted, how the
((documents)) records will be filed, and how the secretary of state
will return filed ((documents)) records. The rules may also impose
additional requirements related to implementation of electronic filing
processes, including but not limited to file formats, signature
technologies, delivery, and the types of entities((, records,)) or
((documents)) records permitted.

Sec. 3 RCW 24.03.008 and 2002 c 74 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
A ((document)) record submitted to the secretary of state for
filing under this chapter must be accompanied by an exact or conformed
copy of the ((document)) record, unless the secretary of state provides
by rule that an exact or conformed copy is not required.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 24.03 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A notice to be provided by electronic transmission must be
electronically transmitted.
(2) Notice to members and directors in an electronic transmission
that otherwise complies with the requirements of this chapter is
effective only with respect to members and directors who have
consented, in the form of a record, to receive electronically
transmitted notices under this chapter.
(a) Notice to members and directors includes material that this
chapter requires or permits to accompany the notice.
(b) A member or director who provides consent, in the form of a
record, to receipt of electronically transmitted notices shall
designate in the consent the message format accessible to the
recipient, and the address, location, or system to which these notices
may be electronically transmitted.
(c) A member or director who has consented to receipt of
electronically transmitted notices may revoke the consent by delivering
a revocation to the corporation in the form of a record.
(d) The consent of any member or director is revoked if the
corporation is unable to electronically transmit two consecutive
notices given by the corporation in accordance with the consent, and
this inability becomes known to the secretary of the corporation or
other person responsible for giving the notice. The inadvertent
failure by the corporation to treat this inability as a revocation does
not invalidate any meeting or other action.
(3) Notice to members or directors who have consented to receipt of
electronically transmitted notices may be provided notice by posting
the notice on an electronic network and delivering to the member or
director a separate record of the posting, together with comprehensible
instructions regarding how to obtain access to this posting on the
electronic network.
(4) Notice provided in an electronic transmission is effective when
it: (a) Is electronically transmitted to an address, location, or
system designated by the recipient for that purpose, and is made
pursuant to the consent provided by the recipient; or (b) has been
posted on an electronic network and a separate record of the posting
has been delivered to the recipient together with comprehensible
instructions regarding how to obtain access to the posting on the
electronic network.

Sec. 5 RCW 24.03.017 and 1982 c 35 s 73 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any corporation organized under any act of the state of Washington
for any one or more of the purposes for which a corporation may be
organized under this chapter and for no purpose other than those
permitted by this chapter, and to which this chapter does not otherwise
apply, may elect to have this chapter and the provisions thereof apply
to such corporation. Such corporation may so elect by having a
resolution to do so adopted by the governing body of such corporation
and by delivering to the secretary of state a statement of election in
accordance with this section. Such statement of election shall be
executed ((in duplicate)) by the corporation by an officer of the
corporation, and shall set forth:
(1) The name of the corporation;
(2) The act which created the corporation or pursuant to which it
was organized;
(3) That the governing body of the corporation has elected to have
this chapter and the provisions thereof apply to ((said)) the
corporation.
((Duplicate originals of such)) The statement of election shall be
delivered to the secretary of state. If the secretary of state finds
that the statement of election conforms to law, the secretary of state
shall, when fees in the same amount as required by this chapter for
filing articles of incorporation have been paid, endorse on ((each of
such duplicates)) the statement the word "filed" and the effective date
of the filing thereof, shall file ((one of such duplicate originals))
the statement, and shall issue a certificate of elective coverage to
which ((the other duplicate original)) an exact or conformed copy of
the statement shall be affixed.
The certificate of elective coverage together with the ((duplicate
original)) exact or conformed copy of the statement affixed thereto by
the secretary of state shall be returned to the corporation or its
representative. Upon the filing of the statement of elective coverage,
the provisions of this chapter shall apply to ((said)) the corporation
which thereafter shall be subject to and shall have the benefits of
this chapter and the provisions thereof as they exist on the date of
filing such statement of election and as they may be amended from time
to time thereafter, including, without limiting the generality of the
foregoing, the power to amend its charter or articles of incorporation,
whether or not created by special act of the legislature, delete
provisions therefrom and add provisions thereto in any manner and to
any extent it may choose to do from time to time so long as its amended
articles shall not be inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 24.03.020 and 1986 c 240 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
One or more persons of the age of eighteen years or more, or a
domestic or foreign, profit or nonprofit, corporation, may act as
incorporator or incorporators of a corporation by ((signing)) executing
and delivering to the secretary of state articles of incorporation for
such corporation.

Sec. 7 RCW 24.03.045 and 1998 c 102 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The corporate name:
(1) Shall not contain any word or phrase which indicates or implies
that it is organized for any purpose other than one or more of the
purposes contained in its articles of incorporation.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this subsection, must
be distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state from:
(i) The corporate name or reserved name of a corporation or
domestic corporation organized or authorized to transact business under
this chapter;
(ii) A corporate name reserved or registered under chapter 23B.04
RCW;
(iii) The fictitious name adopted under RCW 23B.15.060 by a foreign
corporation authorized to transact business in this state because its
real name is unavailable;
(iv) The name or reserved name of a mutual corporation or
miscellaneous corporation incorporated or authorized to do business
under chapter 24.06 RCW;
(v) The name or reserved name of a foreign or domestic limited
partnership formed or registered under chapter 25.10 RCW;
(vi) The name or reserved name of a limited liability company
organized or registered under chapter 25.15 RCW; and
(vii) The name or reserved name of a limited liability partnership
registered under chapter 25.04 RCW.
(b) A corporation may apply to the secretary of state for
authorization to use a name that is not distinguishable upon the
records from one or more of the names described in (a) of this
subsection. The secretary of state shall authorize use of the name
applied for if:
(i) The other corporation, company, holder, limited liability
partnership, or limited partnership consents to the use in ((writing))
the form of a record and files with the secretary of state
((documents)) records necessary to change its name or the name reserved
or registered to a name that is distinguishable upon the records of the
secretary of state from the name of the applying corporation; or
(ii) The applicant delivers to the secretary of state a certified
copy of the final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction
establishing the applicant's right to use the name applied for in this
state.
(c) A corporation may use the name, including the fictitious name,
of another domestic or foreign corporation, limited liability company,
limited partnership, or limited liability partnership, that is used in
this state if the other entity is formed or authorized to transact
business in this state, and the proposed user corporation:
(i) Has merged with the other corporation, limited liability
company, or limited partnership; or
(ii) Has been formed by reorganization of the other corporation.
(3) Shall be transliterated into letters of the English alphabet,
if it is not in English.
(4) Shall not include or end with "incorporated," "company,"
"corporation," "partnership," "limited partnership," or "Ltd.," or any
abbreviation thereof, but may use "club," "league," "association,"
"services," "committee," "fund," "society," "foundation," ". . . . . .,
a nonprofit corporation," or any name of like import.
(5) May only include the term "public benefit" or names of like
import if the corporation has been designated as a public benefit
nonprofit corporation by the secretary in accordance with this chapter.
(6) A name shall not be considered distinguishable upon the records
of the secretary of state by virtue of:
(a) A variation in any of the following designations for the same
name: "Corporation," "incorporated," "company," "limited,"
"partnership," "limited partnership," "limited liability company," or
"limited liability partnership," or the abbreviations "corp.," "inc.,"
"co.," "ltd.," "LP," "L.P.," "LLP," "L.L.P.," "LLC," or "L.L.C.";
(b) The addition or deletion of an article or conjunction such as
"the" or "and" from the same name;
(c) Punctuation, capitalization, or special characters or symbols
in the same name; or
(d) Use of abbreviation or the plural form of a word in the same
name.
(7) This title does not control the use of assumed business names
or "trade names."

Sec. 8 RCW 24.03.050 and 1986 c 240 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each corporation shall have and continuously maintain in this
state:
(1) A registered office which may be, but need not be, the same as
its principal office. The registered office shall be at a specific
geographic location in this state, and be identified by number, if any,
and street, or building address or rural route, or, if a commonly known
street or rural route address does not exist, by legal description. A
registered office may not be identified by post office box number or
other nongeographic address. For purposes of communicating by mail,
the secretary of state may permit the use of a post office address in
conjunction with the registered office address if the corporation also
maintains on file the specific geographic address of the registered
office where personal service of process may be made.
(2) A registered agent, which agent may be either an individual
resident in this state whose business office is identical with such
registered office, or a domestic corporation, whether for profit or not
for profit, or a foreign corporation, whether for profit or not for
profit, authorized to transact business or conduct affairs in this
state, having an office identical with such registered office, or a
domestic limited liability company whose business office is identical
with the registered office, or a foreign limited liability company
authorized to conduct affairs in this state whose business address is
identical with the registered office. A registered agent shall not be
appointed without having given prior ((written)) consent to the
appointment, in the form of a record. The ((written)) consent shall be
filed with the secretary of state in such form as the secretary may
prescribe. The ((written)) consent shall be filed with or as a part of
the ((document)) record first appointing a registered agent. In the
event any individual ((or)), corporation, or limited liability company
has been appointed agent without consent, that person ((or)),
corporation, or limited liability company may file a notarized
statement attesting to that fact, and the name shall ((forthwith))
immediately be removed from the records of the secretary of state.
No Washington corporation or foreign corporation authorized to
conduct affairs in this state may be permitted to maintain any action
in any court in this state until the corporation complies with the
requirements of this section.

Sec. 9 RCW 24.03.055 and 1993 c 356 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A corporation may change its registered office or change its
registered agent, or both, upon filing in the office of the secretary
of state in the form prescribed by the secretary of state a statement
setting forth:
(1) The name of the corporation.
(2) If the current registered office is to be changed, the street
address to which the registered office is to be changed.
(3) If the current registered agent is to be changed, the name of
the new registered agent.
(4) That the address of its registered office and the address of
the office of its registered agent, as changed, will be identical.
Such statement shall be executed by the corporation by an officer
of the corporation, and delivered to the secretary of state, together
with a ((written)) consent, in the form of a record, of the registered
agent to ((his or its)) the appointment, if applicable. If the
secretary of state finds that such statement conforms to the provisions
of this chapter, the secretary of state shall endorse thereon the word
"Filed," and the month, day, and year of the filing thereof, and file
the statement. The change of address of the registered office, or the
appointment of a new registered agent, or both, as the case may be,
shall become effective upon filing unless a later date is specified.
Any registered agent of a corporation may resign as such agent upon
filing a ((written)) notice thereof, ((executed in duplicate)) in the
form of a record, with the secretary of state, who shall ((forthwith
mail a)) immediately deliver an exact or conformed copy thereof to the
corporation in care of an officer, who is not the resigning registered
agent, at the address of such officer as shown by the most recent
annual report of the corporation. The appointment of such agent shall
terminate upon the expiration of thirty days after receipt of such
notice by the secretary of state.
If a registered agent changes the agent's business address to
another place within the state, the agent may change such address and
the address of the registered office of any corporation of which the
agent is a registered agent, by filing a statement as required by this
section except that it need be ((signed)) executed only by the
registered agent, it need not be responsive to subsection (3) of this
section, and it must recite that a copy of the statement has been
((mailed)) delivered to the secretary of the corporation.

Sec. 10 RCW 24.03.080 and 1969 ex.s. c 115 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
((Written or printed)) (1) Notice, in the form of a record, in a
tangible medium, or in an electronic transmission, stating the place,
day, and hour of the annual meeting and, in case of a special meeting,
the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called, shall be
delivered not less than ten nor more than fifty days before the date of
the meeting, ((either personally or by mail,)) by or at the direction
of the president, or the secretary, or the officers or persons calling
the meeting, to each member entitled to vote at such meeting. Notice
of regular meetings other than annual shall be made by providing each
member with the adopted schedule of regular meetings for the ensuing
year at any time after the annual meeting and ten days prior to the
next succeeding regular meeting and at any time when requested by a
member or by such other notice as may be prescribed by the bylaws.
(2) If notice is provided in a tangible medium, it may be
transmitted by: Mail, private carrier, or personal delivery; telegraph
or teletype; or telephone, wire, or wireless equipment that transmits
a facsimile of the notice. If mailed, such notice shall be deemed to
be delivered when deposited in the United States mail addressed to the
member at his or her address as it appears on the records of the
corporation, with postage thereon prepaid. Other forms of notice in a
tangible medium described in this subsection are effective when
received.
(3) If notice is provided in an electronic transmission, it must
satisfy the requirements of section 4 of this act.

Sec. 11 RCW 24.03.085 and 1969 ex.s. c 115 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The right of the members, or any class or classes of members,
to vote may be limited, enlarged or denied to the extent specified in
the articles of incorporation or the bylaws. Unless so limited,
enlarged or denied, each member, regardless of class, shall be entitled
to one vote on each matter submitted to a vote of members.
(2) A member may vote in person or, if so authorized by the
articles of incorporation or the bylaws, may vote by proxy in the form
of a record executed ((in writing)) by the member or ((by his)) a duly
authorized attorney-in-fact. No proxy shall be valid after eleven
months from the date of its execution, unless otherwise provided in the
proxy.
(3) Where directors or officers are to be elected by members, the
bylaws may provide that such elections may be conducted by mail or by
electronic transmission, as described in this subsection, if the name
of each candidate to be voted upon is set forth in a record
accompanying or contained in the notice of meeting. If the bylaws
provide, an election may be conducted by electronic transmission if the
corporation has designated an address, location, or system to which the
ballot may be electronically transmitted and the ballot is
electronically transmitted to the designated address, location, or
system, in an executed electronically transmitted record. Members
voting by mail or electronic transmission are present for all purposes
of quorum, count of votes, and percentages of total voting power
present.
(4) The articles of incorporation or the bylaws may provide that in
all elections for directors every member entitled to vote shall have
the right to cumulate his vote and to give one candidate a number of
votes equal to his vote multiplied by the number of directors to be
elected, or by distributing such votes on the same principle among any
number of such candidates.

Sec. 12 RCW 24.03.113 and 1986 c 240 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
A director of a corporation who is present at a meeting of its
board of directors at which action on any corporate matter is taken
shall be presumed to have assented to the action taken unless the
director's dissent or abstention shall be entered in the minutes of the
meeting or unless the director shall ((file)) deliver his or her
((written)) dissent or abstention to such action ((with)) to the person
acting as the secretary of the meeting before the adjournment thereof,
or shall ((forward)) deliver such dissent or abstention ((by registered
mail)) to the secretary of the corporation immediately after the
adjournment of the meeting which dissent or abstention must be in the
form of a record. Such right to dissent or abstain shall not apply to
a director who voted in favor of such action.

Sec. 13 RCW 24.03.120 and 1986 c 240 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
Meetings of the board of directors, regular or special, may be held
either within or without this state.
Regular meetings of the board of directors or of any committee
designated by the board of directors may be held with or without notice
as prescribed in the bylaws. Special meeting of the board of directors
or any committee designated by the board of directors shall be held
upon such notice as is prescribed in the bylaws. Attendance of a
director or a committee member at a meeting shall constitute a waiver
of notice of such meeting, except where a director or a committee
member attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting to the
transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called
or convened. Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose
of, any regular or special meeting of the board of directors or any
committee designated by the board of directors need be specified in the
notice or waiver of notice of such meeting unless required by the
bylaws. If notice of regular or special meetings is provided by
electronic transmission, it must satisfy the requirements of section 4
of this act.
Except as may be otherwise restricted by the articles of
incorporation or bylaws, members of the board of directors or any
committee designated by the board of directors may participate in a
meeting of such board or committee by means of a conference telephone
or similar communications equipment by means of which all persons
participating in the meeting can hear each other at the same time and
participation by such means shall constitute presence in person at a
meeting.

Sec. 14 RCW 24.03.135 and 1986 c 240 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each corporation shall keep at its registered office, its principal
office in this state, or at its secretary's office if in this state,
the following documents in the form of a record:
(1) Current articles and bylaws;
(2) A ((record)) list of members, including names, addresses, and
classes of membership, if any;
(3) Correct and adequate ((records)) statements of accounts and
finances;
(4) A ((record)) list of officers' and directors' names and
addresses;
(5) Minutes of the proceedings of the members, if any, the board,
and any minutes which may be maintained by committees of the board.
((Records may be written, or electronic if capable of being converted
to writing.))
The corporate records shall be open at any reasonable time to
inspection by any member of more than three months standing or a
representative of more than five percent of the membership.
Cost of inspecting or copying shall be borne by such member except
for costs for copies of articles or bylaws. Any such member must have
a purpose for inspection reasonably related to membership interests.
Use or sale of members' lists by such member if obtained by inspection
is prohibited.
The superior court of the corporation's or such member's residence
may order inspection and may appoint independent inspectors. Such
member shall pay inspection costs unless the court orders otherwise.

Sec. 15 RCW 24.03.155 and 1986 c 240 s 26 are each amended to
read as follows:
After the issuance of the certificate of incorporation an
organization meeting of the board of directors named in the articles of
incorporation shall be held, either within or without this state, at
the call of a majority of the directors named in the articles of
incorporation, for the purpose of adopting bylaws, electing officers
and the transaction of such other business as may come before the
meeting. The directors calling the meeting shall give at least three
days' notice thereof by mail, facsimile transmission, or electronic
transmission to each director so named, which notice shall be in the
form of a record and shall state the time and place of the meeting. If
notice is provided by electronic transmission, it must satisfy the
requirements of section 4 of this act. Any action permitted to be
taken at the organization meeting of the directors may be taken without
a meeting if each director ((signs an instrument)) executes a record
stating the action so taken.

Sec. 16 RCW 24.03.165 and 1986 c 240 s 27 are each amended to
read as follows:
Amendments to the articles of incorporation shall be made in the
following manner:
(1) Where there are members having voting rights, with regard to
the question, the board of directors shall adopt a resolution setting
forth the proposed amendment and directing that it be submitted to a
vote at a meeting of members having voting rights, which may be either
an annual or a special meeting. ((Written or printed)) Notice in the
form of a record setting forth the proposed amendment or a summary of
the changes to be effected thereby shall be given to each member
entitled to vote at such meeting within the time and in the manner
provided in this chapter for the giving of notice of meetings of
members. The proposed amendment shall be adopted upon receiving at
least two-thirds of the votes which members present at such meeting or
represented by proxy are entitled to cast.
(2) Where there are no members, or no members having voting rights,
with regard to the question, an amendment shall be adopted at a meeting
of the board of directors upon receiving the vote of a majority of the
directors in office.
Any number of amendments may be submitted and voted upon at any one
meeting.

Sec. 17 RCW 24.03.170 and 1982 c 35 s 85 are each amended to read
as follows:
The articles of amendment shall be executed ((in duplicate)) by the
corporation by an officer of the corporation, and shall set forth:
(1) The name of the corporation.
(2) The amendment so adopted.
(3) Where there are members having voting rights, (a) a statement
setting forth the date of the meeting of members at which the amendment
was adopted, that a quorum was present at such meeting, and that such
amendment received at least two-thirds of the votes which members
present at such meeting or represented by proxy were entitled to cast,
or (b) a statement that such amendment was adopted by a consent in
((writing signed)) the form of a record executed by all members
entitled to vote with respect thereto.
(4) Where there are no members, or no members having voting rights,
a statement of such fact, the date of the meeting of the board of
directors at which the amendment was adopted, and a statement of the
fact that such amendment received the vote of a majority of the
directors in office.

Sec. 18 RCW 24.03.183 and 2002 c 74 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
A domestic corporation may at any time restate its articles of
incorporation by a resolution adopted by the board of directors. A
corporation may amend and restate in one resolution, but may not
present the amendments and restatement for filing by the secretary in
a single ((document)) record. Separate articles of amendment, under
RCW 24.03.165 and articles of restatement, under this section, must be
presented notwithstanding the corporation's adoption of a single
resolution of amendment and restatement.
Upon the adoption of the resolution, restated articles of
incorporation shall be executed ((in duplicate)) by the corporation by
one of its officers. The restated articles shall set forth all of the
operative provisions of the articles of incorporation together with a
statement that the restated articles of incorporation correctly set
forth without change the provisions of the articles of incorporation as
amended and that the restated articles of incorporation supersede the
original articles of incorporation and all amendments thereto.
The restated articles of incorporation shall be delivered to the
secretary of state. If the secretary of state finds that the restated
articles of incorporation conform to law, the secretary of state shall,
when all fees required by this title have been paid:
(1) Endorse on the articles the word "Filed" and the date of the
filing;
(2) File the restated articles.
An exact or conformed copy of the restated articles of
incorporation bearing the endorsement affixed thereto by the secretary
of state, shall be returned to the corporation or its representative.
Upon the filing of the restated articles of incorporation by the
secretary of state, the restated articles of incorporation shall become
effective and shall supersede the original articles of incorporation
and all amendments thereto.

Sec. 19 RCW 24.03.195 and 1986 c 240 s 32 are each amended to
read as follows:
A plan of merger or consolidation shall be adopted in the following
manner:
(1) Where the members of any merging or consolidating corporation
have voting rights with regard to the question, the board of directors
of such corporation shall adopt a resolution approving the proposed
plan and directing that it be submitted to a vote at a meeting of
members having voting rights, which may be either an annual or a
special meeting. ((Written or printed)) Notice in the form of a record
setting forth the proposed plan or a summary thereof shall be given to
each member entitled to vote at such meeting within the time and in the
manner provided in this chapter for the giving of notice of meetings of
members. The proposed plan shall be adopted upon receiving at least
two-thirds of the votes which members present at each such meeting or
represented by proxy are entitled to cast.
(2) Where any merging or consolidating corporation has no members,
or no members having voting rights with regard to the question, a plan
of merger or consolidation shall be adopted at a meeting of the board
of directors of such corporation upon receiving the vote of a majority
of the directors in office.
After such approval, and at any time prior to the filing of the
articles of merger or consolidation, the merger or consolidation may be
abandoned pursuant to provisions therefor, if any, set forth in the
plan of merger or consolidation.

Sec. 20 RCW 24.03.200 and 2002 c 74 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon such approval, articles of merger or articles of
consolidation shall be executed by each corporation by an officer of
each corporation, and shall set forth:
(a) The plan of merger or the plan of consolidation;
(b) Where the members of any merging or consolidating corporation
have voting rights, then as to each such corporation (i) a statement
setting forth the date of the meeting of members at which the plan was
adopted, that a quorum was present at such meeting, and that such plan
received at least two-thirds of the votes which members present at such
meeting or represented by proxy were entitled to cast, or (ii) a
statement that such amendment was adopted by a consent in ((writing
signed)) the form of a record executed by all members entitled to vote
with respect thereto;
(c) Where any merging or consolidating corporation has no members,
or no members having voting rights, then as to each such corporation a
statement of such fact, the date of the meeting of the board of
directors at which the plan was adopted and a statement of the fact
that such plan received the vote of a majority of the directors in
office.
(2) The articles of merger or articles of consolidation shall be
delivered to the secretary of state. If the secretary of state finds
that such articles conform to law, the secretary of state shall, when
all fees have been paid as in this chapter prescribed:
(a) Endorse on the articles of merger or consolidation the word
"Filed," and the date of the filing;
(b) File the articles of merger or consolidation.
An exact or conformed copy of the articles of merger or articles of
consolidation bearing the filing endorsement affixed thereto by the
secretary of state, shall be returned to the surviving or new
corporation, as the case may be, or its representative.

Sec. 21 RCW 24.03.207 and 1986 c 240 s 35 are each amended to
read as follows:
One or more foreign corporations and one or more domestic
corporations may be merged or consolidated in the following manner, if
such merger or consolidation is permitted by the laws of the state
under which each such foreign corporation is organized:
(1) Each domestic corporation shall comply with the provisions of
this title with respect to the merger or consolidation as the case may
be, of domestic corporations and each foreign corporation shall comply
with the applicable provisions of the laws of the state under which it
is organized.
(2) If the surviving or new corporation in a merger or
consolidation is to be governed by the laws of any state other than
this state, it shall comply with the provisions of this title with
respect to foreign corporations if it is to transact business in this
state, and in every case it shall file with the secretary of state of
this state:
(a) An agreement that it may be served with process in this state
in any proceeding for the enforcement of any obligation of any domestic
corporation which is a party to the merger or consolidation and in any
proceeding for the enforcement of the rights, if any, of a member of
any such domestic corporation against the surviving or new corporation;
and
(b) An irrevocable appointment of the secretary of state of this
state as its agent to accept service of process in any such proceeding.
The effect of the merger or consolidation shall be the same as in
the case of the merger or consolidation of domestic corporations, if
the surviving or new corporation is to be governed by the laws of this
state. If the surviving or new corporation is to be governed by the
laws of any state other than this state, the effect of the merger or
consolidation shall be the same as in the case of the merger or
consolidation of domestic corporations except as the laws of the other
state provide otherwise.
(3) At any time prior to the effective date of the articles of
merger or consolidation, the merger or consolidation may be abandoned
pursuant to provision therefor, if any, set forth in the plan of merger
or consolidation. In the event the merger or consolidation is
abandoned, the parties thereto shall execute a notice of abandonment in
triplicate ((signed)) executed by an officer for each corporation
((signing)) executing the notice, which must be in the form of a
record. If the secretary of state finds the notice conforms to law,
the secretary of state shall:
(a) Endorse on each of the originals the word "Filed" and the date
of the filing;
(b) File one of the triplicate originals in the secretary of
state's office; and
(c) Issue the other triplicate originals to the respective parties
or their representatives.

Sec. 22 RCW 24.03.215 and 1986 c 240 s 36 are each amended to
read as follows:
A sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all, or
substantially all, the property and assets of a corporation, if not in
the ordinary course of business, may be made upon such terms and
conditions and for such consideration, which may consist in whole or in
part of money or property, real or personal, including shares of any
corporation for profit, domestic or foreign, as may be authorized in
the following manner:
(1) Where there are members having voting rights with regard to the
question, the board of directors shall adopt a resolution recommending
such sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition and directing that it
be submitted to a vote at a meeting of members having voting rights,
which may be either an annual or a special meeting. ((Written or
printed)) Notice in the form of a record stating that the purpose, or
one of the purposes, of such meeting is to consider the sale, lease,
exchange, or other disposition of all, or substantially all, the
property and assets of the corporation shall be given to each member
entitled to vote at such meeting, within the time and in the manner
provided by this chapter for the giving of notice of meetings of
members. At such meeting the members may authorize such sale, lease,
exchange, or other disposition and may fix, or may authorize the board
of directors to fix, any or all of the terms and conditions thereof and
the consideration to be received by the corporation therefor. Such
authorization shall require at least two-thirds of the votes which
members present at such meeting or represented by proxy are entitled to
cast. After such authorization by a vote of members, the board of
directors, nevertheless, in its discretion, may abandon such sale,
lease, exchange, or other disposition of assets, subject to the rights
of third parties under any contracts relating thereto, without further
action or approval by members.
(2) Where there are no members, or no members having voting rights
with regard to the question, a sale, lease, exchange, or other
disposition of all, or substantially all, the property and assets of a
corporation shall be authorized upon receiving the vote of a majority
of the directors in office.

Sec. 23 RCW 24.03.220 and 1986 c 240 s 38 are each amended to
read as follows:
A corporation may dissolve and wind up its affairs in the following
manner:
(1) Where there are members having voting rights with regard to the
question, the board of directors shall adopt a resolution recommending
that the corporation be dissolved, and directing that the question of
such dissolution be submitted to a vote at a meeting of members having
such voting rights, which may be either an annual or a special meeting.
((Written or printed)) Notice in the form of a record stating that the
purpose, or one of the purposes, of such meeting is to consider the
advisability of dissolving the corporation, shall be given to each
member entitled to vote at such meeting, within the time and in the
manner provided in this chapter for the giving of notice of meetings of
members. A resolution to dissolve the corporation shall be adopted
upon receiving at least two-thirds of the votes which members present
at such meeting or represented by proxy are entitled to cast.
(2) Where there are no members, or no members having voting rights
with regard to the question, the dissolution of the corporation shall
be authorized at a meeting of the board of directors upon the adoption
of a resolution to dissolve by the vote of a majority of the directors
in office.
Upon the adoption of such resolution by the members, or by the
board of directors where there are no members or no members having
voting rights, the corporation shall cease to conduct its affairs
except in so far as may be necessary for the winding up thereof, shall
immediately cause a notice of the proposed dissolution to be mailed to
each known creditor of the corporation, to the attorney general with
respect to assets subject to RCW 24.03.225(3), and to the department of
revenue, and shall proceed to collect its assets and apply and
distribute them as provided in this chapter.

Sec. 24 RCW 24.03.230 and 1969 ex.s. c 115 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
A plan providing for the distribution of assets, not inconsistent
with the provisions of this chapter, may be adopted by a corporation in
the process of dissolution and shall be adopted by a corporation for
the purpose of authorizing any transfer or conveyance of assets for
which this chapter requires a plan of distribution, in the following
manner:
(1) Where there are members having voting rights, the board of
directors shall adopt a resolution recommending a plan of distribution
and directing the submission thereof to a vote at a meeting of members
having voting rights, which may be either an annual or a special
meeting. ((Written or printed)) Notice in the form of a record setting
forth the proposed plan of distribution or a summary thereof shall be
given to each member entitled to vote at such meeting, within the time
and in the manner provided in this chapter for the giving of notice of
meetings of members. Such plan of distribution shall be adopted upon
receiving at least two-thirds of the votes which members present at
such meeting or represented by proxy are entitled to cast.
(2) Where there are no members, or no members having voting rights,
a plan of distribution shall be adopted at a meeting of the board of
directors upon receiving a vote of a majority of the directors in
office.
If the plan of distribution includes assets received and held by
the corporation subject to limitations described in subsection (3) of
RCW 24.03.225, notice of the adoption of the proposed plan shall be
submitted to the attorney general by registered or certified mail
directed to him at his office in Olympia, at least twenty days prior to
the meeting at which the proposed plan is to be adopted. No plan for
the distribution of such assets may be adopted without the approval of
the attorney general, or the approval of a court of competent
jurisdiction in a proceeding to which the attorney general is made a
party. In the event that an objection is not filed within twenty days
after the date of mailing, his approval shall be deemed to have been
given.

Sec. 25 RCW 24.03.235 and 1967 c 235 s 48 are each amended to
read as follows:
A corporation may, at any time prior to the issuance of a
certificate of dissolution by the secretary of state, revoke the action
theretofore taken to dissolve the corporation, in the following manner:
(1) Where there are members having voting rights, the board of
directors shall adopt a resolution recommending that the voluntary
dissolution proceedings be revoked, and directing that the question of
such revocation be submitted to a vote at a meeting of members having
voting rights, which may be either an annual or a special meeting.
((Written or printed)) Notice in the form of a record stating that the
purpose, or one of the purposes, of such meeting is to consider the
advisability of revoking the voluntary dissolution proceedings, shall
be given to each member entitled to vote at such meeting, within the
time and in the manner provided in this chapter for the giving of
notice of meetings of members. A resolution to revoke the voluntary
dissolution proceedings shall be adopted upon receiving at least two-thirds of the votes which members present at such meeting or
represented by proxy are entitled to cast.
(2) Where there are no members, or no members having voting rights,
a resolution to revoke the voluntary dissolution proceedings shall be
adopted at a meeting of the board of directors upon receiving the vote
of a majority of the directors in office.
Upon the adoption of such resolution by the members, or by the
board of directors where there are no members or no members having
voting rights, the corporation may thereupon again conduct its affairs.

Sec. 26 RCW 24.03.240 and 1993 c 356 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
If voluntary dissolution proceedings have not been revoked, then
when all debts, liabilities and obligations of the corporation shall
have been paid and discharged, or adequate provision shall have been
made therefor, and all of the remaining property and assets of the
corporation shall have been transferred, conveyed or distributed in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter, articles of dissolution
shall be executed ((in duplicate)) by the corporation by an officer of
the corporation and shall set forth:
(1) The name of the corporation.
(2) Where there are members having voting rights, (a) a statement
setting forth the date of the meeting of members at which the
resolution to dissolve was adopted, that a quorum was present at such
meeting, and that such resolution received at least two-thirds of the
votes which members present at such meeting or represented by proxy
were entitled to cast, or (b) a statement that such resolution was
adopted by a consent in ((writing signed)) the form of a record
executed by all members entitled to vote with respect thereto.
(3) Where there are no members, or no members having voting rights,
a statement of such fact, the date of the meeting of the board of
directors at which the resolution to dissolve was adopted and a
statement of the fact that such resolution received the vote of a
majority of the directors in office.
(4) That all debts, obligations, and liabilities of the corporation
have been paid and discharged or that adequate provision has been made
therefor.
(5) A copy of a revenue clearance certificate issued pursuant to
chapter 82.32 RCW.
(6) That all the remaining property and assets of the corporation
have been transferred, conveyed or distributed in accordance with the
provisions of this chapter.
(7) That there are no suits pending against the corporation in any
court, or that adequate provision has been made for the satisfaction of
any judgment, order or decree which may be entered against it in any
pending suit.

Sec. 27 RCW 24.03.330 and 2002 c 74 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
The application of the corporation for a certificate of authority
shall be delivered to the secretary of state.
If the secretary of state finds that such application conforms to
law, the secretary of state shall, when all fees have been paid as in
this chapter prescribed:
(1) Endorse on each of ((such documents)) the records the word
"Filed," and the date of the filing.
(2) File the application and the copy of the articles of
incorporation and amendments thereto.
(3) Issue a certificate of authority to conduct affairs in this
state.
An exact or conformed copy of the application bearing the filing
endorsement affixed thereto by the secretary of state, shall be
returned to the corporation or its representative.

Sec. 28 RCW 24.03.332 and 1998 c 23 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
For those corporations that have a certificate of authority, are
applying for, or intend to apply for a certificate of authority from
the insurance commissioner as an insurance company under chapter 48.05
RCW, whenever under this chapter corporate ((documents)) records are
required to be filed with the secretary of state, the ((documents))
records shall be filed with the insurance commissioner rather than the
secretary of state.

Sec. 29 RCW 24.03.340 and 1982 c 35 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each foreign corporation authorized to conduct affairs in this
state shall have and continuously maintain in this state:
(1) A registered office which may be, but need not be, the same as
its principal office. The registered office shall be at a specific
geographic location in this state, and be identified by number, if any,
and street, or building address or rural route, or, if a commonly known
street or rural route address does not exist, by legal description.
A registered office may not be identified by post office box number or
other nongeographic address. For purposes of communicating by mail,
the secretary of state may permit the use of a post office address in
conjunction with the registered office address if the corporation also
maintains on file the specific geographic address of the registered
office where personal service of process may be made.
(2) A registered agent, which agent may be either an individual
resident in this state whose business office is identical with such
registered office, or a domestic corporation, whether for profit or not
for profit, or a foreign corporation, whether for profit or not for
profit, authorized to transact business or conduct affairs in this
state, having an office identical with such registered office or a
domestic limited liability company whose business office is identical
with the registered office or a foreign limited liability company
authorized to conduct affairs in this state whose business address is
identical with the registered office. A registered agent shall not be
appointed without having given prior ((written)) consent in the form of
a record to the appointment. The ((written)) consent shall be filed
with the secretary of state in such form as the secretary may
prescribe. The ((written)) consent shall be filed with or as a part of
the ((document)) record first appointing a registered agent. In the
event any individual ((or)), corporation, or limited liability company
has been appointed agent without consent, that person ((or)),
corporation, or limited liability company may file a notarized
statement attesting to that fact, and the name shall ((forthwith))
immediately be removed from the records of the secretary of state.
No foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this
state may be permitted to maintain any action in any court in this
state until the corporation complies with the requirements of this
section.

Sec. 30 RCW 24.03.345 and 1993 c 356 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
A foreign corporation authorized to conduct affairs in this state
may change its registered office or change its registered agent, or
both, upon filing in the office of the secretary of state in a form
approved by the secretary of state a statement setting forth:
(1) The name of the corporation.
(2) If the current registered office is to be changed, the street
address to which the registered office is to be changed.
(3) If the current registered agent is to be changed, the name of
the new registered agent.
(4) That the address of its registered office and the address of
the office of its registered agent, as changed, will be identical.
Such statement shall be executed by the corporation by an officer
of the corporation, and delivered to the secretary of state, together
with a ((written)) consent, in the form of a record, of the registered
agent to ((his or its)) the appointment, if applicable. If the
secretary of state finds that such statement conforms to the provisions
of this chapter, the secretary of state shall endorse thereon the word
"Filed," and the month, day, and year of the filing thereof, and file
the statement. The change of address of the registered office, or the
appointment of a new registered agent, or both, as the case may be,
shall become effective upon filing unless a later date is specified.
Any registered agent in this state appointed by a foreign
corporation may resign as such agent upon filing a ((written)) notice
thereof, in the form of a record, executed in duplicate, with the
secretary of state who shall ((forthwith mail)) immediately deliver a
copy thereof to the secretary of the foreign corporation at its
principal office as shown by its most recent annual report. The
appointment of such agent shall terminate upon the expiration of thirty
days after receipt of such notice by the secretary of state.
If a registered agent changes his or her business address to
another place within the state, the registered agent may change such
address and the address of the registered office of any corporation of
which the registered agent is a registered agent by filing a statement
as required by this section, except that it need be ((signed)) executed
only by the registered agent, it need not be responsive to subsection
(3) of this section, and it must recite that a copy of the statement
has been ((mailed)) delivered to the corporation.

Sec. 31 RCW 24.03.365 and 1967 c 235 s 74 are each amended to
read as follows:
A foreign corporation authorized to conduct affairs in this state
shall procure an amended certificate of authority in the event it
changes its corporate name, or desires to pursue in this state other or
additional purposes than those set forth in its prior application for
a certificate of authority, by making application therefor to the
secretary of state.
The requirements in respect to the form and contents of such
application, the manner of its execution, the filing of ((duplicate
originals thereof)) the application with the secretary of state, the
issuance of an amended certificate of authority and the effect thereof,
shall be the same as in the case of an original application for a
certificate of authority.

Sec. 32 RCW 24.03.380 and 1986 c 240 s 50 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The certificate of authority of a foreign corporation to
conduct affairs in this state shall be revoked by the secretary of
state upon the conditions prescribed in this section when:
(a) The corporation has failed to file its annual report within the
time required by this chapter, or has failed to pay any fees or
penalties prescribed by this chapter when they have become due and
payable; or
(b) The corporation has failed for thirty days to appoint and
maintain a registered agent in this state as required by this chapter;
or
(c) The corporation has failed, for thirty days after change of its
registered agent or registered office, to file in the office of the
secretary of state a statement of such change as required by this
chapter; or
(d) The corporation has continued to exceed or abuse the authority
conferred upon it by this chapter; or
(e) A misrepresentation has been made of any material matter in any
application, report, affidavit, or other ((document)) record submitted
by such corporation pursuant to this chapter.
(2) Prior to revoking a certificate of authority under subsection
(1) of this section, the secretary of state shall give the corporation
written notice of the corporation's delinquency or omission by first
class mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the corporation's registered
agent. If, according to the records of the secretary of state, the
corporation does not have a registered agent, the notice may be given
by mail addressed to the corporation at its last known address or at
the address of any officer or director of the corporation, as shown by
the records of the secretary of state. Notice is deemed to have been
given five days after the date deposited in the United States mail,
correctly addressed, and with correct postage affixed. The notice
shall inform the corporation that its certificate of authority shall be
revoked at the expiration of sixty days following the date the notice
had been deemed to have been given, unless it corrects the delinquency
or omission within the sixty-day period.
(3) Any notice provided by the secretary of state under this
section shall be designed to clearly identify and warn the recipient of
the contents thereof. A delinquency notice shall provide a succinct
and readable description of the delinquency or omission, the date on
which dissolution will occur, and the action necessary to cure the
delinquency or omission prior to dissolution.
(4) The attorney general may take such action regarding revocation
of a certificate of authority as is provided by RCW 24.03.250 for the
dissolution of a domestic corporation. The procedures of RCW 24.03.250
shall apply to any action under this section. The clerk of any
superior court entering a decree of revocation of a certificate of
authority shall file a certified copy, without cost or filing fee, with
the office of the secretary of state.

Sec. 33 RCW 24.03.410 and 1993 c 269 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary of state shall establish fees by rule and collect:
(1) For furnishing a certified copy of any charter document or any
other ((document)) record, instrument, or paper relating to a
corporation.
(2) For furnishing a certificate, under seal, attesting to the
status of a corporation or any other certificate.
(3) For furnishing copies of any ((document)) record, instrument or
paper relating to a corporation.
(4) At the time of any service of process on him or her as
registered agent of a corporation an amount that may be recovered as
taxable costs by the party to the suit or action causing such service
to be made if such party prevails in the suit or action.

Sec. 34 RCW 24.03.425 and 1967 c 235 s 86 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each director and officer of a corporation, domestic or foreign,
who fails or refuses within the time prescribed by this chapter to
answer truthfully and fully interrogatories propounded to him or her by
the secretary of state in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter, or who signs any articles, statement, report, application or
other ((document)) record filed with the secretary of state which is
known to such officer or director to be false in any material respect,
shall be deemed to be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction
thereof may be fined in any amount not exceeding five hundred dollars.

Sec. 35 RCW 24.03.430 and 1982 c 35 s 112 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of state may propound to any corporation, domestic or
foreign, subject to the provisions of this chapter, and to any officer
or director thereof, such interrogatories as may be reasonably
necessary and proper to enable the secretary of state to ascertain
whether such corporation has complied with all the provisions of this
chapter applicable to such corporation. Such interrogatories shall be
answered within thirty days after the mailing thereof, or within such
additional time as shall be fixed by the secretary of state, and the
answers thereto shall be full and complete and shall be made in writing
and under oath. If such interrogatories be directed to an individual
they shall be answered by ((him)) that individual, and if directed to
a corporation they shall be answered by the president, vice president,
secretary or assistant secretary thereof. The secretary of state need
not file any ((document)) record to which such interrogatories relate
until such interrogatories be answered as herein provided, and not then
if the answers thereto disclose that such ((document)) record is not in
conformity with the provisions of this chapter. The secretary of state
shall certify to the attorney general, for such action as the attorney
general may deem appropriate, all interrogatories and answers thereto
which disclose a violation of any of the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 36 RCW 24.03.445 and 1986 c 240 s 56 are each amended to
read as follows:
If the secretary of state shall fail to approve any articles of
incorporation, amendment, merger, consolidation or dissolution, or any
other ((document)) record required by this chapter to be approved by
the secretary of state before the same shall be filed in his or her
office, the secretary of state shall give written notice of disapproval
to the person or corporation, domestic or foreign, delivering the same,
specifying the reasons therefor. Within thirty days from such
disapproval such person or corporation may appeal to the superior court
pursuant to the provisions of the administrative procedure act, chapter
34.05 RCW.

Sec. 37 RCW 24.03.450 and 1982 c 35 s 116 are each amended to
read as follows:
All certificates issued by the secretary of state in accordance
with the provisions of this chapter, and all copies of ((documents))
records filed in the office of the secretary of state in accordance
with the provisions of this chapter when certified by the secretary of
state under the seal of the state, shall be taken and received in all
courts, public offices, and official bodies as prima facie evidence of
the facts therein stated. A certificate by the secretary of state
under the seal of this state, as to the existence or nonexistence of
the facts relating to corporations which would not appear from a
certified copy of any of the ((foregoing documents)) records or
certificates under this section shall be taken and received in all
courts, public offices, and official bodies as prima facie evidence of
the existence or nonexistence of the facts therein stated.

Sec. 38 RCW 24.03.460 and 1967 c 235 s 93 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever any notice is required to be given to any member or
director of a corporation under the provisions of this chapter or under
the provisions of the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the
corporation, a waiver ((thereof in writing signed)) in the form of a
record executed by the person or persons entitled to such notice,
whether before or after the time stated therein, shall be equivalent to
the giving of such notice.

Sec. 39 RCW 24.03.465 and 1967 c 235 s 94 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any action required by this chapter to be taken at a meeting of the
members or directors of a corporation, or any action which may be taken
at a meeting of the members or directors, may be taken without a
meeting if a consent in ((writing)) the form of a record, setting forth
the action so taken, shall be ((signed)) executed by all of the members
entitled to vote with respect to the subject matter thereof, or all of
the directors, as the case may be.
Such consent shall have the same force and effect as a unanimous
vote, and may be stated as such in any articles or ((document)) record
filed with the secretary of state under this chapter.

--- END ---