BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 22.09.660 and 1983 c 305 s 64 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon determining that an emergency storage situation appears to
exist, the director may authorize the warehouseman to forward grain
that is covered by negotiable receipts to other licensed warehouses for
storage without canceling and reissuing the negotiable receipts ((for
not more than thirty days)) pursuant to conditions established by rule.

--- END ---