BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.12.370 and 2002 c 188 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may enter into exchange agreements with local,
state, or federal agencies, tribal governments, or private nonprofit
((groups incorporated in this state that are organized for
environmental conservation purposes)) nature conservancy corporations
as defined in RCW 64.04.130, to convey properties under the
jurisdiction of the department that serve as environmental mitigation
sites, as full or part consideration for the grantee assuming all
future maintenance and operation obligations and costs required to
maintain and operate the environmental mitigation site in perpetuity.
(2) Tribal governments shall only be eligible to participate in an
exchange agreement if they:
(a) Provide the department with a valid waiver of their tribal
sovereign immunity from suit. The waiver must allow the department to
enforce the terms of the exchange agreement or quitclaim deed in state
court; and
(b) Agree that the property shall not be placed into trust status.
(3) The conveyances must be by quitclaim deed executed by the
secretary of transportation, and must expressly restrict the use of the
property to a mitigation site consistent with preservation of the
functions and values of the site, and must provide for the automatic
reversion to the department if the property is not used as a mitigation
site or is not maintained in a manner that complies with applicable
permits, laws, and regulations pertaining to the maintenance and
operation of the mitigation site.

--- END ---