BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created a risk management unit within the
department. The secretary shall appoint a risk manager to supervise
the risk management unit.
(2) The risk management unit shall:
(a) Identify liability and property risk that may have a
significant economic impact on the department;
(b) Evaluate existing loss control programs within the department
as appropriate to suggest improvements and recognize successful safety
policies and procedures;
(c) Identify new methods to eliminate or improve conditions and
practices that contribute to loss whenever practical;
(d) Identify methods to assist the department to meet the
requirements for insurance coverage or service; and
(e) Maintain loss history information for the purpose of
identifying and analyzing risk exposures.
(3) The risk management unit shall continually report its findings
to the secretary and make recommendations to the secretary on the
application of prudent safety, security, loss prevention, and loss
minimization methods so as to reduce or avoid risk or loss.
(4) When carrying out its duties under this section, the risk
management unit may consult with the risk management division within
the office of financial management established in RCW 43.41.300.

--- END ---