BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.04.062 and 1997 c 58 s 1006 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon written request of a person who has been properly identified
as an officer of the law or a properly identified United States
immigration official the department shall disclose to such officer the
current address and location of a recipient of public welfare if the
officer furnishes the department with such person's name and social
security account number and satisfactorily demonstrates that such
recipient is a fugitive, that the location or apprehension of such
fugitive is within the officer's official duties, and that the request
is made in the proper exercise of those duties.
When the department becomes aware that a public assistance
recipient is the subject of an outstanding warrant, the department may
contact the appropriate law enforcement agency and, if the warrant is
valid, provide the law enforcement agency with the location of the
recipient.
On a quarterly basis, the department shall coordinate with the
state patrol to determine if any recipients of public assistance have
outstanding warrants from any court of competent jurisdiction for a
felony or misdemeanor. The department shall immediately provide the
name and address of any person found to have an outstanding warrant for
his or her arrest to the state patrol. The department shall suspend
payments pursuant to RCW 74.08.290 for any period a recipient is
imprisoned.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
On a quarterly basis, the Washington state patrol shall coordinate
with the department of social and health services to determine if any
recipients of public assistance have outstanding warrants from any
court of competent jurisdiction for a felony or misdemeanor.

--- END ---