BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.09.020 and 2002 c 68 s 4 and 2002 c 58 s 2 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(2) "Health care facility" means any hospital, hospice care center,
licensed or certified health care facility, health maintenance
organization regulated under chapter 48.46 RCW, federally qualified
health maintenance organization, federally approved renal dialysis
center or facility, or federally approved blood bank.
(3) "Health care practitioner" means an individual or firm licensed
or certified to engage actively in a regulated health profession.
(4) "Health care services" means those services provided by health
professionals licensed pursuant to RCW 18.120.020(4).
(5) "Health profession" means those licensed or regulated
professions set forth in RCW 18.120.020(4).
(6) "Less restrictive alternative" means court-ordered treatment in
a setting less restrictive than total confinement which satisfies the
conditions set forth in RCW 71.09.092.
(7) "Likely to engage in predatory acts of sexual violence if not
confined in a secure facility" means that the person more probably than
not will engage in such acts if released unconditionally from detention
on the sexually violent predator petition. Such likelihood must be
evidenced by a recent overt act if the person is not totally confined
at the time the petition is filed under RCW 71.09.030.
(8) "Mental abnormality" means a congenital or acquired condition
affecting the emotional or volitional capacity which predisposes the
person to the commission of criminal sexual acts in a degree
constituting such person a menace to the health and safety of others.
(9) "Predatory" means acts directed towards: (a) Strangers; (b)
individuals with whom a relationship has been established or promoted
for the primary purpose of victimization; or (c) persons of casual
acquaintance with whom no substantial personal relationship exists.
(10) "Recent overt act" means any act or threat that has either
caused harm of a sexually violent nature or creates a reasonable
apprehension of such harm in the mind of an objective person who knows
of the history and mental condition of the person engaging in the act.
(11) "Risk potential activity" or "risk potential facility" means
an activity or facility that provides a higher incidence of risk to the
public from persons conditionally released from the special commitment
center. Risk potential activities and facilities include: Public and
private schools, school bus stops, licensed day care and licensed
preschool facilities, public parks, publicly dedicated trails, sports
fields, playgrounds, recreational and community centers, churches,
synagogues, temples, mosques, public libraries, public and private
campgrounds and youth camps, private homes, apartments, condominiums,
and others identified by the department following the hearings on a
potential site required in RCW 71.09.315. For purposes of this
chapter, "school bus stops" does not include bus stops established
primarily for public transit.
(12) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services
or the secretary's designee.
(13) "Secure facility" means a residential facility for persons
civilly confined under the provisions of this chapter that includes
security measures sufficient to protect the community. Such facilities
include total confinement facilities, secure community transition
facilities, and any residence used as a court-ordered placement under
RCW 71.09.096.
(14) "Secure community transition facility" means a residential
facility for persons civilly committed and conditionally released to a
less restrictive alternative under this chapter. A secure community
transition facility has supervision and security, and either provides
or ensures the provision of sex offender treatment services. Secure
community transition facilities include but are not limited to the
facilities established pursuant to RCW 71.09.250 and any
community-based facilities established under this chapter and operated
by the secretary or under contract with the secretary.
(15) "Sexually violent offense" means an act committed on, before,
or after July 1, 1990, that is: (a) An act defined in Title 9A RCW as
rape in the first degree, rape in the second degree by forcible
compulsion, rape of a child in the first or second degree, statutory
rape in the first or second degree, indecent liberties by forcible
compulsion, indecent liberties against a child under age fourteen,
incest against a child under age fourteen, or child molestation in the
first or second degree; (b) a felony offense in effect at any time
prior to July 1, 1990, that is comparable to a sexually violent offense
as defined in (a) of this subsection, or any federal or out-of-state
conviction for a felony offense that under the laws of this state would
be a sexually violent offense as defined in this subsection; (c) an act
of murder in the first or second degree, assault in the first or second
degree, assault of a child in the first or second degree, kidnapping in
the first or second degree, burglary in the first degree, residential
burglary, or unlawful imprisonment, which act, either at the time of
sentencing for the offense or subsequently during civil commitment
proceedings pursuant to this chapter, has been determined beyond a
reasonable doubt to have been sexually motivated, as that term is
defined in RCW 9.94A.030; or (d) an act as described in chapter 9A.28
RCW, that is an attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy
to commit one of the felonies designated in (a), (b), or (c) of this
subsection.
(16) "Sexually violent predator" means any person who has been
convicted of or charged with a crime of sexual violence and who suffers
from a mental abnormality or personality disorder which makes the
person likely to engage in predatory acts of sexual violence if not
confined in a secure facility.
(17) "Total confinement facility" means a facility that provides
supervision and sex offender treatment services in a total confinement
setting. Total confinement facilities include the special commitment
center and any similar facility designated as a secure facility by the
secretary.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.09.285 and 2002 c 68 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except with respect to the secure community transition facility
established pursuant to RCW 71.09.250, the secretary shall develop
policy guidelines that balance the average response time of emergency
services to the general area of a proposed secure community transition
facility against the proximity of the proposed site to risk potential
activities and facilities in existence at the time the site is listed
for consideration.
(2) ((In no case shall the policy guidelines permit location of a
facility adjacent to, immediately across a street or parking lot from,
or within the line of sight of a risk potential activity or facility in
existence at the time a site is listed for consideration. "Within the
line of sight" means that it is possible to reasonably visually
distinguish and recognize individuals.
(3))) The policy guidelines shall require that great weight be
given to sites that are the farthest removed from any risk potential
activity.
(((4))) (3) The policy guidelines shall specify how distance from
the location is measured and any variations in the measurement based on
the size of the property within which a proposed facility is to be
located.
(((5))) (4) The policy guidelines shall establish a method to
analyze and compare the criteria for each site in terms of public
safety and security, site characteristics, and program components. In
making a decision regarding a site following the analysis and
comparison, the secretary shall give priority to public safety and
security considerations. The analysis and comparison of the criteria
are to be documented and made available at the public hearings
prescribed in RCW 71.09.315.
(((6))) (5) Policy guidelines adopted by the secretary under this
section shall be considered by counties and cities when providing for
the siting of secure community transition facilities as required under
RCW 36.70A.200.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 71.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In no case may a secure community transition facility be sited:
(a) Adjacent to, immediately across a street or parking lot from,
or within the line of sight of a risk potential activity or facility in
existence at the time a site is listed for consideration; or
(b) Within twenty-five hundred feet of a public or private
campground or youth camp.
(2) "Within the line of sight" means that it is possible to
reasonably visually distinguish and recognize individuals.
(3) This section does not apply to the secure community transition
facility established pursuant to RCW 71.09.250(1).

Sec. 4 RCW 71.09.342 and 2002 c 68 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After October 1, 2002, notwithstanding RCW 36.70A.103 or any
other law, this section preempts and supersedes local plans,
development regulations, permitting requirements, inspection
requirements, and all other laws as necessary to enable the department
to site, construct, renovate, occupy, and operate secure community
transition facilities within the borders of the following:
(a) Any county that had five or more persons civilly committed from
that county, or detained at the special commitment center under a
pending civil commitment petition from that county where a finding of
probable cause has been made, on April 1, 2001, if the department
determines that the county has not met the requirements of RCW
36.70A.200 with respect to secure community transition facilities.
This subsection does not apply to the county in which the secure
community transition facility authorized under RCW 71.09.250(1) is
located; and
(b) Any city located within a county listed in (a) of this
subsection that the department determines has not met the requirements
of RCW 36.70A.200 with respect to secure community transition
facilities.
(2) The department's determination under subsection (1)(a) or (b)
of this section is final and is not subject to appeal under chapter
34.05 or 36.70A RCW.
(3) When siting a facility in a county or city that has been
preempted under this section, the department shall consider the policy
guidelines established under RCW 71.09.275 and 71.09.290 and shall hold
the hearings required in RCW 71.09.315.
(4) Nothing in this section prohibits the department from:
(a) Siting a secure community transition facility in a city or
county that has complied with the requirements of RCW 36.70A.200 with
respect to secure community transition facilities, including a city
that is located within a county that has been preempted. If the
department sites a secure community transition facility in such a city
or county, the department shall use the process established by the city
or county for siting such facilities; or
(b) Consulting with a city or county that has been preempted under
this section regarding the siting of a secure community transition
facility.
(5)(a) A preempted city or county may propose public safety
measures specific to any finalist site to the department. The measures
must be consistent with the location of the facility at that finalist
site. The proposal must be made in writing by the date of:
(i) The second hearing under RCW 71.09.315(2)(a) when there are
three finalist sites; or
(ii) The first hearing under RCW 71.09.315(2)(b) when there is only
one site under consideration.
(b) The department shall respond to the city or county in writing
within fifteen business days of receiving the proposed measures. The
response shall address all proposed measures.
(c) If the city or county finds that the department's response is
inadequate, the city or county may notify the department in writing
within fifteen business days of the specific items which it finds
inadequate. If the city or county does not notify the department of a
finding that the response is inadequate within fifteen business days,
the department's response shall be final.
(d) If the city or county notifies the department that it finds the
response inadequate and the department does not revise its response to
the satisfaction of the city or county within seven business days, the
city or county may petition the governor to designate a person with law
enforcement expertise to review the response under RCW 34.05.479.
(e) The governor's designee shall hear a petition filed under this
subsection and shall make a determination within thirty days of hearing
the petition. The governor's designee shall consider the department's
response, and the effectiveness and cost of the proposed measures, in
relation to the purposes of this chapter. The determination by the
governor's designee shall be final and may not be the basis for any
cause of action in civil court.
(f) The city or county shall bear the cost of the petition to the
governor's designee. If the city or county prevails on all issues, the
department shall reimburse the city or county costs incurred, as
provided under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(g) Neither the department's consideration and response to public
safety conditions proposed by a city or county nor the decision of the
governor's designee shall affect the preemption under this section or
the department's authority to site, construct, renovate, occupy, and
operate the secure community transition facility at that finalist site
or at any finalist site.
(6) Until June 30, 2009, the secretary shall site, construct,
occupy, and operate a secure community transition facility sited under
this section in an environmentally responsible manner that is
consistent with the substantive objectives of chapter 43.21C RCW, and
shall consult with the department of ecology as appropriate in carrying
out the planning, construction, and operations of the facility. The
secretary shall make a threshold determination of whether a secure
community transition facility sited under this section would have a
probable significant, adverse environmental impact. If the secretary
determines that the secure community transition facility has such an
impact, the secretary shall prepare an environmental impact statement
that meets the requirements of RCW 43.21C.030 and 43.21C.031 and the
rules promulgated by the department of ecology relating to such
statements. Nothing in this subsection shall be the basis for any
civil cause of action or administrative appeal.
(7)(a) In no case may a secure community transition facility be
sited:
(i) Adjacent to, immediately across a street or parking lot from,
or within the line of sight of a risk potential activity or facility in
existence at the time a site is listed for consideration; or
(ii) Within twenty-five hundred feet of a public or private
campground or youth camp.
(b) "Within the line of sight" means that it is possible to
reasonably visually distinguish and recognize individuals.
(8) This section does not apply to the secure community transition
facility established pursuant to RCW 71.09.250(1).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The provisions of this act are retroactive
and apply to all sites and possible sites for secure community
transition facilities selected prior to the effective date of this act
except for the facility sited under RCW 71.09.250(1).

--- END ---