BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.76.200 and 1993 c 180 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of harming a police dog ((or)), accelerant
detection dog, or police horse, if he or she maliciously injures,
disables, shoots, or kills by any means any dog or horse that the
person knows or has reason to know to be a police dog or accelerant
detection dog, as defined in RCW 4.24.410, or police horse, as defined
in subsection (2) of this section, whether or not the dog or horse is
actually engaged in police or accelerant detection work at the time of
the injury.
(2) "Police horse" means any horse used or kept for use by a law
enforcement officer in discharging any legal duty or power of his or
her office.
(3) Harming a police dog ((or)), accelerant detection dog, or
police horse is a class C felony.

--- END ---