BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.440 and 1997 c 80 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to RCW 46.61.400(1), and except in those instances
where a lower maximum lawful speed is provided by this chapter or
otherwise, it shall be unlawful for the operator of any vehicle to
operate the same at a speed in excess of twenty miles per hour when
operating any vehicle upon a highway either inside or outside an
incorporated city or town when passing any marked school or playground
crosswalk when such marked crosswalk is fully posted with standard
school speed limit signs or standard playground speed limit signs. The
speed zone at the crosswalk shall extend three hundred feet in either
direction from the marked crosswalk.
(2) A county or incorporated city or town may create a school or
playground speed zone on a highway bordering a marked school or
playground, in which zone it is unlawful for a person to operate a
vehicle at a speed in excess of twenty miles per hour. The school or
playground speed zone may extend three hundred feet from the border of
the school or playground property.
(3) A person found to have committed any infraction relating to
speed restrictions within a school or playground speed zone shall be
assessed a monetary penalty equal to twice the penalty assessed under
RCW 46.63.110. This penalty may not be waived, reduced, or suspended.
(((3))) (4) The school zone safety account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. Fifty percent of the moneys collected
under subsection (((2))) (3) of this section shall be deposited into
the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only by the
Washington traffic safety commission solely to fund projects in local
communities to improve school zone safety, pupil transportation safety,
and student safety in school bus loading and unloading areas. Only the
director of the traffic safety commission or the director's designee
may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for expenditures until July 1, 1999, after which date moneys
in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

--- END ---