BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.44.100 and 1999 c 189 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as permitted by this title, no person shall open the package
containing liquor or consume liquor in a public place. Every person
who violates any provision of this section shall be guilty of a class
3 civil infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW. As an alternative penalty
for the offense provided by this section, the legislative body of a
county or city may enact an ordinance providing for a misdemeanor
penalty for this offense when it occurs in a business district. The
ordinance shall: (1) Require that the arresting officer have probable
cause to believe that the person is inebriated; and (2) define business
district.

--- END ---