BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the need to
strengthen accountability for the performance of the state's
transportation system. A critical component is the participation of
the citizens in measuring transportation system performance against
benchmarks established in chapter 5, Laws of 2002. In creating a
citizen oversight panel, the legislature intends to involve and
strengthen citizen oversight of the state's transportation system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The citizen oversight panel is created.
(2) The panel will consist of seven members appointed by the
governor, for terms of four years, except that at least half the
members initially appointed will be appointed for terms of two years.
The members of the panel must be chosen so the panel will have
experience and expertise related to, but not limited to, the following
areas: (a) Performance measurement and attainment, and best management
practices; (b) budgeting and accounting, cost controls, and reporting;
(c) transportation planning and congestion management; (d) public
transportation and transit agency operations; (e) civil engineering;
(f) transportation construction management and administration; (g)
construction work force training and safety; and (h) crafting and
implementing environmental mitigation plans.
(3) Members of the panel may not be removed before the expiration
of their terms unless for cause based upon a determination of
incapacity, incompetence, neglect of duty, or malfeasance in office by
the Thurston county superior court, upon petition and show cause
proceedings brought for that purpose in that court and directed to the
panel member in question.
(4) No member may be appointed for more than three consecutive
terms.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The citizen oversight panel must oversee
and review the establishment and attainment of transportation
performance measures directed in RCW 47.01.012 to ensure an efficient
and effective state transportation system. To this end, the panel:
(a) Will analyze, investigate, and evaluate data and information on
existing performance measures and benchmarks to:
(i) Determine the effectiveness and adequacy of current performance
measures and benchmarks; and
(ii) Determine the need for modification or creation of additional
performance measures and benchmarks;
(b) Will work in cooperation with the department of transportation
in establishing, reviewing, and revising state performance measures and
benchmarks as needed;
(c) May request additional information or data from the department
of transportation as needed;
(d) May make recommendations to the governor and the legislature on
the need to revise or add policy goals to those currently in statute
that will result in increased efficiencies, create savings, and improve
the delivery of transportation services to the public;
(e) Will issue an annual report to the governor and the legislature
detailing the panel's research activities, findings, and any
recommendations resulting from their efforts as well as a status report
on the performance measures currently in use by the department and the
results of those measures.
(2) The panel may hire secretarial staff and professional staff as
necessary to support the duties, functions, responsibilities, and
activities of the panel. The panel may acquire office space and
equipment for the staff. The legislative evaluation and accountability
program will provide data and information technology support consistent
with the support currently supplied to existing legislative committees.
(3) In addition to its regular staff, the panel may contract out
for technical personnel to assist and advise the panel in the
performance of its duties if needed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The panel shall meet periodically. It
may adopt its own rules and may establish its own procedures. It shall
act collectively in harmony with recorded resolutions or motions
adopted by a majority vote of the members. The panel will be
compensated from the general appropriation for the joint legislative
audit and review committee and in accordance with RCW 43.03.250.
(2) Each member of the panel will be compensated in accordance with
RCW 43.03.250 and reimbursed for actual necessary traveling and other
expenses in going to, attending, and returning from meetings of the
panel or that are incurred in the discharge of duties requested by the
chair. However, in no event may a panel member be compensated in any
year for more than one hundred twenty days, except the chair may be
compensated for not more than one hundred fifty days. Service on the
panel does not qualify as a service credit for the purposes of a public
retirement system.
(3) The panel shall keep proper records and is subject to audit by
the state auditor or other auditing entities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act are each
added to chapter 47.01 RCW.

--- END ---