BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 INTENT. It is essential that the
legislature improve the accountability and efficiency of
transportation-related agencies. Taxpayers must know that their tax
dollars are being well spent to deliver critically needed
transportation projects and services. To accomplish this, a system of
transportation performance audits must be established to provide
oversight and accountability of transportation-related agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Economy and efficiency audit" has the meaning contained in
chapter 44.28 RCW.
(2) "Joint legislative audit and review committee" means the agency
created in chapter 44.28 RCW, or its statutory successor.
(3) "Legislative auditor" has the meaning contained in chapter
44.28 RCW.
(4) "Legislative transportation committee" means the agency created
in chapter 44.40 RCW, or its statutory successor.
(5) "Performance audit" has the meaning contained in chapter 44.28
RCW.
(6) "Performance review" means an outside evaluation of how a state
agency uses its performance measures to assess the outcomes of its
legislatively authorized activities.
(7) "Program audit" has the meaning contained in chapter 44.28 RCW.
(8) "Transportation-related agencies" means any agency, board, or
commission that receives funding for transportation-related purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 REVIEWS OF TRANSPORTATION-RELATED AGENCIES.
(1) The joint legislative audit and review committee, in consultation
with the legislative transportation committee, shall review the
performance and outcome measures of transportation-related agencies.
The purpose of these reviews is to ensure that the legislature has the
means to adequately and accurately assess the performance and outcomes
of those agencies and departments. Where two or more agencies have
shared responsibility for functions or priorities of government, these
reviews can also determine whether effective interagency cooperation
and collaboration occurs in areas such as program coordination,
administrative structures, information systems, and administration of
grants and loans.
(2) In conducting these reviews, the joint legislative audit and
review committee shall work in consultation with the legislative
transportation committee, as directed in subsection (1) of this
section, the office of financial management, and other state agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 AUTHORIZATION TO RETAIN PROFESSIONAL
EXPERTISE. (1) To the greatest extent possible, the legislative
auditor shall contract with and consult with private independent
professional and technical experts to optimize the independence of the
reviews and performance audits. In determining the need to contract
with private experts, the legislative auditor shall consider the degree
of difficulty of the review or audit, the relative cost of contracting
for expertise, and the need to maintain auditor independence from the
subject agency or program.
(2) The joint legislative audit and review committee may solicit
the expertise of the state auditor in conducting reviews of
transportation-related agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 REVIEW METHODOLOGY. (1) The joint
legislative audit and review committee shall develop a schedule and
common methodology for conducting these reviews. The performance and
outcome measures of each agency or department must be reviewed at least
every five years. In setting the schedule and the extent of these
performance reviews, the joint legislative audit and review committee
shall consider the timing and results of other recent state, federal,
and independent reviews and audits, the seriousness of past findings,
any inadequate remedial action taken by an agency or department,
whether an agency or department lacks performance and outcome measures,
and the desirability to include a diverse range of agencies or programs
each year.
(2) The legislative transportation committee must review and
approve the schedule and methodology for conducting the performance
review of transportation-related agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 SCOPE OF REVIEWS. The reviews must include
at least:
(1) A determination of whether the performance and outcome measures
are consistent with legislative mandates, strategic plans, mission
statements, and goals and objectives, and whether the legislature has
established clear mandates, strategic plans, mission statements, and
goals and objectives that lend themselves to performance and outcome
measurement;
(2) An examination of how agency management uses the measures to
manage resources in an efficient and effective manner;
(3) An assessment of how performance benchmarks are established for
the purpose of assessing overall performance compared to external
standards and benchmarks;
(4) An examination of how an analysis of the measurement data is
used to make planning and operational improvements;
(5) A determination of how performance and outcome measures are
used in the budget planning, development, and allotment processes and
the extent to which the agency is in compliance with its
responsibilities under RCW 43.88.090;
(6) A review of how performance data are reported to and used by
the legislature both in policy development and resource allocation;
(7) An assessment of whether the performance measure data are
reliable and collected in a uniform and timely manner;
(8) A determination whether targeted funding investments and
established priorities of government actually produce the intended and
expected services and benefits; and
(9) Recommendations as necessary or appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 PRESENTATION AND PUBLICATION OF PERFORMANCE
REVIEWS. Completed performance measure reviews must be presented to
the legislative transportation committee and the joint legislative
audit and review committee, and published in the same manner as
prescribed for performance audits in RCW 44.28.088. Published
performance reviews must be made available to the public through the
joint legislative audit and review committee's web site and through
customary public communications. Final reports must also be
transmitted to the appropriate policy and fiscal standing committees of
the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 PERFORMANCE AUDITS--DETERMINATION OF
NECESSITY. After reviewing the performance or outcome measures of an
agency or department, the legislative transportation committee shall
recommend whether a full performance audit of the agency or department,
or a specific program within the agency or department, is appropriate,
and publicly post those recommendations. The legislative
transportation committee shall solicit input from the public at a
subsequent hearing to decide whether and how to proceed with a full
performance audit. If the legislative transportation committee decides
by a majority vote that a full performance audit of an agency or
department, a specific program within an agency or department, or
multiple agencies is appropriate, the legislative transportation
committee shall direct the joint legislative audit and review committee
to add that audit to its biennial performance audit work plan under RCW
44.28.080 and 44.28.083.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 CONTENTS OF AUDIT REPORT. When conducting
a full performance audit of an agency or department, or a specific
program within an agency or department, or multiple agencies, in
accordance with section 10 of this act, the legislative auditor shall
solicit input from appropriate industry representatives or experts.
The audit report must make recommendations regarding the continuation,
abolition, consolidation, or reorganization of each affected agency,
department, or program. The audit report must identify opportunities
to develop government partnerships, and eliminate program redundancies
that will result in increased quality, effectiveness, and efficiency of
state agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 SCOPE OF PERFORMANCE AUDIT. The
legislative auditor shall determine in writing the scope of the
performance audit. The joint legislative audit and review committee
and the legislative transportation committee must review and approve
the final scope of the audit. Before approving the final scope of the
performance audit, the legislative auditor, the joint legislative audit
and review committee, and the legislative transportation committee
shall consider inclusion of the following elements in the scope of the
audit:
(1) Identification of potential cost savings in the agency, its
programs, and its services;
(2) Identification and recognition of best practices;
(3) Identification of funding to the agency, to programs, and to
services that can be eliminated or reduced;
(4) Identification of programs and services that can be eliminated,
reduced, or transferred to the private sector;
(5) Analysis of gaps and overlaps in programs and services and
recommendations for improving, dropping, blending, or separating
functions to correct gaps or overlaps;
(6) Analysis and recommendations for pooling information technology
systems;
(7) Analysis of the roles and functions of the agency, its
programs, and its services and their compliance with statutory
authority and recommendations for eliminating or changing those roles
and functions and ensuring compliance with statutory authority;
(8) Recommendations for eliminating or changing statutes, rules,
and policy directives as may be necessary to ensure that the agency
carry out reasonably and properly those functions expressly vested in
the department by statute; and
(9) Verification of the reliability and validity of department
performance data, self-assessments, and performance measurement systems
as required under RCW 43.88.090.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The legislative auditor shall take steps to
ensure that the department of transportation is the first agency
subject to the performance review and audit process established in this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 44.40 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislative transportation committee or its successor shall
work with the joint legislative audit and review committee to review
and audit transportation-related agencies, as directed in chapter 44.--
RCW (sections 1 through 11 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 11 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 44 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Section captions used in this act are not
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---