BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 73.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature declares that:
(1) November of each year will be known as veterans' history
awareness month;
(2) The week in November in which veterans' day occurs is
designated as a time for people of this state to celebrate the
contributions to the state by veterans; and
(3) Educational institutions, public entities, and private
organizations are encouraged to designate time for appropriate
activities in commemoration of the contributions of America's veterans.

--- END ---