BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.07.100 and 2002 c 301 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to
establishments issued a permit or licensed under the provisions of:
(((1))) (a) Chapter 69.25 RCW, the Washington wholesome eggs and
egg products act;
(((2))) (b) Chapter 69.28 RCW, the Washington state honey act;
(((3))) (c) Chapter 16.49 RCW, the meat inspection act;
(((4))) (d) Chapter 77.65 RCW, relating to the direct retail
endorsement for wild-caught seafood;
(((5))) (e) Title 66 RCW, relating to alcoholic beverage control;
and
(((6))) (f) Chapter 69.30 RCW, the sanitary control of shellfish
act. However, if any such establishments process foods not
specifically provided for in the above entitled acts, such
establishments shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter.
(2) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to:
(a) Restaurants or food service establishments; and
(b) The slaughter and preparation of one thousand or fewer chickens
in a calendar year by the agricultural producer of the chickens for the
sale of the whole or cut-up raw chickens by the producer directly to
retail customers.

--- END ---