BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Insured" means a current policyholder or a person or entity
that is covered under the insurance policy.
(b) "Malicious harassment" has the same meaning as RCW 9A.36.080.
Under this section, the perpetrator does not have to be identified for
an act of malicious harassment to have occurred.
(c) "Underwriting action" means an insurer:
(i) Cancels or refuses to renew an insurance policy; or
(ii) Changes the terms or benefits in an insurance policy.
(2) This section applies to property insurance policies if the
insured is:
(a) An individual;
(b) A religious organization;
(c) An educational organization; or
(d) Any other nonprofit organization that is organized and operated
for religious, charitable, or educational purposes.
(3) An insurer may not take an underwriting action on a policy
described in subsection (2) of this section because an insured has made
one or more insurance claims for any loss that occurred during the
preceding sixty months that is the result of malicious harassment. An
insurer may take an underwriting action due to other factors that are
not prohibited by this subsection.
(4) If an insured sustains a loss that is the result of malicious
harassment, the insured must file a report with the police or other law
enforcement authority within thirty days of discovery of the incident.
For incidents of malicious harassment occurring prior to the effective
date of this act, the insured must file the report within six months of
the discovery of the incident. The report must contain sufficient
information to provide an insurer with reasonable notice that the loss
was the result of malicious harassment.
(5) Annually, each insurer must report underwriting actions to the
commissioner if the insurer has taken an underwriting action against
any insured who has filed a claim during the preceding sixty months
that was the result of malicious harassment. The report must include
the policy number, name of the insured, location of the property, and
the reason for the underwriting action.

--- END ---