BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17.130 and 1979 ex.s. c 265 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
No elective official nor any employee of his office nor any person
appointed to or employed by any public office or agency may use or
authorize the use of any of the facilities of a public office or
agency, directly or indirectly, for the purpose of assisting a campaign
for election of any person to any office or for the promotion of or
opposition to any ballot proposition. Facilities of public office or
agency include, but are not limited to, use of stationery, postage,
machines, and equipment, use of employees of the office or agency
during working hours, vehicles, office space, publications of the
office or agency, and clientele lists of persons served by the office
or agency: PROVIDED, That the foregoing provisions of this section
shall not apply to the following activities:
(1) Action taken at an open public meeting by members of an elected
legislative body to express a collective decision, or to actually vote
upon a motion, proposal, resolution, order, or ordinance, or to support
or oppose a ballot proposition so long as (a) any required notice of
the meeting includes the title and number of the ballot proposition,
and (b) members of the legislative body or members of the public are
afforded an approximately equal opportunity for the expression of an
opposing view;
(2) A statement by an elected official in support of or in
opposition to any ballot proposition at an open press conference or in
response to a specific inquiry;
(3) Activities ((which)) that are part of the normal and regular
conduct of the office or agency, including making an objective and fair
presentation of facts relevant to the impact a ballot proposition may
have on the office or agency.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.52.180 and 1995 c 397 s 30 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No state officer or state employee may use or authorize the use
of facilities of an agency, directly or indirectly, for the purpose of
assisting a campaign for election of a person to an office or for the
promotion of or opposition to a ballot proposition. Knowing
acquiescence by a person with authority to direct, control, or
influence the actions of the state officer or state employee using
public resources in violation of this section constitutes a violation
of this section. Facilities of an agency include, but are not limited
to, use of stationery, postage, machines, and equipment, use of state
employees of the agency during working hours, vehicles, office space,
publications of the agency, and clientele lists of persons served by
the agency.
(2) This section shall not apply to the following activities:
(a) Action taken at an open public meeting by members of an elected
legislative body to express a collective decision, or to actually vote
upon a motion, proposal, resolution, order, or ordinance, or to support
or oppose a ballot proposition as long as (i) required notice of the
meeting includes the title and number of the ballot proposition, and
(ii) members of the legislative body or members of the public are
afforded an approximately equal opportunity for the expression of an
opposing view;
(b) Use of public facilities by state officers for the preparation
or delivery of objective and neutral written or verbal communications
initiated by them consisting of explanatory information on the impact
of any ballot propositions that foreseeably may affect a matter that
falls within their constitutional or statutory responsibilities;
(c) A statement by an elected official in support of or in
opposition to any ballot proposition at an open press conference or in
response to a specific inquiry. For the purposes of this subsection,
it is not a violation of this section for an elected official to
respond to an inquiry regarding a ballot proposition, to make
incidental remarks concerning a ballot proposition in an official
communication, or otherwise comment on a ballot proposition without an
actual, measurable expenditure of public funds. The ethics boards
shall adopt by rule a definition of measurable expenditure;
(((c))) (d) Activities that are part of the normal and regular
conduct of the office or agency; and
(((d))) (e) De minimis use of public facilities by statewide
elected officials and legislators incidental to the preparation or
delivery of permissible communications((, including written and verbal
communications initiated by them of their views on ballot propositions
that foreseeably may affect a matter that falls within their
constitutional or statutory responsibilities)).
(3) As to state officers and employees, this section operates to
the exclusion of RCW 42.17.130.

--- END ---