BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.285 and 2001 c 64 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall forthwith revoke the license of any driver for
the period of one calendar year unless otherwise provided in this
section, upon receiving a record of the driver's conviction of any of
the following offenses, when the conviction has become final:
(1) For vehicular homicide the period of revocation shall be two
years. The revocation period shall be tolled during any period of
total confinement for the offense;
(2) Vehicular assault. The revocation period shall be tolled
during any period of total confinement for the offense;
(3) Driving a motor vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or a narcotic drug, or under the influence of any
other drug to a degree which renders the driver incapable of safely
driving a motor vehicle, for the period prescribed in RCW 46.61.5055;
(4) For attempting to elude a pursuing police vehicle the period of
revocation is two years;
(5) Any felony in the commission of which a motor vehicle is used;
(((5))) (6) Failure to stop and give information or render aid as
required under the laws of this state in the event of a motor vehicle
accident resulting in the death or personal injury of another or
resulting in damage to a vehicle that is driven or attended by another;
(((6))) (7) Perjury or the making of a false affidavit or statement
under oath to the department under Title 46 RCW or under any other law
relating to the ownership or operation of motor vehicles;
(((7))) (8) Reckless driving upon a showing by the department's
records that the conviction is the third such conviction for the driver
within a period of two years.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.311 and 2001 c 325 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The department shall not suspend a driver's license or
privilege to drive a motor vehicle on the public highways for a fixed
period of more than one year, except as specifically permitted under
RCW 46.20.267, 46.20.342, or other provision of law. Except for a
suspension under RCW 46.20.267, 46.20.289, 46.20.291(5), 46.61.740, or
74.20A.320, whenever the license or driving privilege of any person is
suspended by reason of a conviction, a finding that a traffic
infraction has been committed, pursuant to chapter 46.29 RCW, or
pursuant to RCW 46.20.291 or 46.20.308, the suspension shall remain in
effect until the person gives and thereafter maintains proof of
financial responsibility for the future as provided in chapter 46.29
RCW. If the suspension is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502
or 46.61.504, the department shall determine the person's eligibility
for licensing based upon the reports provided by the alcoholism agency
or probation department designated under RCW 46.61.5056 and shall deny
reinstatement until enrollment and participation in an approved program
has been established and the person is otherwise qualified. Whenever
the license or driving privilege of any person is suspended as a result
of certification of noncompliance with a child support order under
chapter 74.20A RCW or a residential or visitation order, the suspension
shall remain in effect until the person provides a release issued by
the department of social and health services stating that the person is
in compliance with the order.
(b)(i) The department shall not issue to the person a new,
duplicate, or renewal license until the person pays a reissue fee of
twenty dollars.
(ii) If the suspension is the result of a violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or is the result of administrative action under
RCW 46.20.308, the reissue fee shall be one hundred fifty dollars.
(2)(a) Any person whose license or privilege to drive a motor
vehicle on the public highways has been revoked, unless the revocation
was for a cause which has been removed, is not entitled to have the
license or privilege renewed or restored until: (i) After the
expiration of one year from the date the license or privilege to drive
was revoked; or (ii) after the expiration of the applicable revocation
period provided by RCW 46.20.265, 46.20.285, 46.20.3101, or
46.61.5055((; (iii) after the expiration of two years for persons
convicted of vehicular homicide; or (iv) after the expiration of the
applicable revocation period provided by RCW 46.20.265)).
(b)(i) After the expiration of the appropriate period, the person
may make application for a new license as provided by law together with
a reissue fee in the amount of twenty dollars.
(ii) If the revocation is the result of a violation of RCW
46.20.308, 46.61.502, or 46.61.504, the reissue fee shall be one
hundred fifty dollars. If the revocation is the result of a violation
of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the department shall determine the
person's eligibility for licensing based upon the reports provided by
the alcoholism agency or probation department designated under RCW
46.61.5056 and shall deny reissuance of a license, permit, or privilege
to drive until enrollment and participation in an approved program has
been established and the person is otherwise qualified.
(c) Except for a revocation under RCW 46.20.265, the department
shall not then issue a new license unless it is satisfied after
investigation of the driving ability of the person that it will be safe
to grant the privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the public
highways, and until the person gives and thereafter maintains proof of
financial responsibility for the future as provided in chapter 46.29
RCW. For a revocation under RCW 46.20.265, the department shall not
issue a new license unless it is satisfied after investigation of the
driving ability of the person that it will be safe to grant that person
the privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the public highways.
(3)(a) Whenever the driver's license of any person is suspended
pursuant to Article IV of the nonresident violators compact or RCW
46.23.020 or 46.20.289 or 46.20.291(5), the department shall not issue
to the person any new or renewal license until the person pays a
reissue fee of twenty dollars.
(b) If the suspension is the result of a violation of the laws of
this or any other state, province, or other jurisdiction involving (i)
the operation or physical control of a motor vehicle upon the public
highways while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs, or
(ii) the refusal to submit to a chemical test of the driver's blood
alcohol content, the reissue fee shall be one hundred fifty dollars.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.61.024 and 1983 c 80 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any driver of a motor vehicle who willfully fails or refuses to
immediately bring his vehicle to a stop and who drives his vehicle in
a manner indicating a wanton or willful disregard for the lives or
property of others while attempting to elude a pursuing police vehicle,
after being given a visual or audible signal to bring the vehicle to a
stop, shall be guilty of a class ((C)) B felony. The signal given by
the police officer may be by hand, voice, emergency light, or siren.
The officer giving such a signal shall be in uniform and ((his
vehicle)) shall be ((appropriately marked showing it to be)) driving an
official police vehicle. An official police vehicle means any
municipal, county, or state police vehicle appropriately equipped with
emergency lights and siren.
The license or permit to drive or any nonresident driving privilege
of a person convicted of a violation of this section shall be revoked
for two years by the department of licensing.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.61.520 and 1998 c 211 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When the death of any person ensues within three years as a
proximate result of injury proximately caused by the driving of any
vehicle by any person, the driver is guilty of vehicular homicide if
the driver was operating a motor vehicle:
(a) While under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug,
as defined by RCW 46.61.502; or
(b) In a reckless manner; or
(c) With disregard for the safety of others; or
(d) While attempting to elude a pursuing police vehicle as defined
in RCW 46.61.024.
(2) Vehicular homicide is a class A felony punishable under chapter
9A.20 RCW, except that, for a conviction under subsection (1)(a) of
this section, an additional two years shall be added to the sentence
for each prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.61.522 and 2001 c 300 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of vehicular assault if he or she operates
or drives any vehicle:
(a) In a reckless manner and causes substantial bodily harm to
another; or
(b) While under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug,
as defined by RCW 46.61.502, and causes substantial bodily harm to
another; or
(c) With disregard for the safety of others and causes substantial
bodily harm to another; or
(d) While attempting to elude a pursuing police vehicle as defined
in RCW 46.61.024 and causes substantial bodily harm to another.
(2) Vehicular assault is a class B felony punishable under chapter
9A.20 RCW.
(3) As used in this section, "substantial bodily harm" has the same
meaning as in RCW 9A.04.110.

Sec. 6 RCW 9.94A.515 and 2002 c 340 s 2, 2002 c 324 s 2, 2002 c
290 s 2, 2002 c 253 s 4, 2002 c 229 s 2, 2002 c 134 s 2, and 2002 c 133
s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN
EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVI Aggravated Murder 1 (RCW
10.95.020)

XV Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW
70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIV Murder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

XIII Malicious explosion 2 (RCW
70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1
(RCW 70.74.270(1))

XII Assault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

XI Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

X Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent Liberties (with forcible
compulsion) (RCW
9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW
70.74.280(3))

Manufacture of methamphetamine
(RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Over 18 and deliver heroin,
methamphetamine, a narcotic
from Schedule I or II, or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV
to someone under 18 (RCW
69.50.406)

Sexually Violent Predator Escape
(RCW 9A.76.115)

Vehicular Homicide, by attempting to
elude a pursuing police vehicle
(RCW 46.61.520)

IX Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Controlled Substance Homicide (RCW
69.50.415)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW
70.74.180)

Hit and Run--Death (RCW
46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide by Watercraft, by being
under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW
79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2
(RCW 70.74.270(2))

Over 18 and deliver narcotic from
Schedule III, IV, or V or a
nonnarcotic, except flunitrazepam
or methamphetamine, from
Schedule I-V to someone under 18
and 3 years junior (RCW
69.50.406)

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under
the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.520)

VIII Arson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Deliver or possess with intent to
deliver methamphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Homicide by Watercraft, by the
operation of any vessel in a
reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver amphetamine
(RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver heroin or cocaine
(when the offender has a criminal
history in this state or any other
state that includes a sex offense or
serious violent offense or the
Washington equivalent) (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Possession of Ephedrine or any of its
Salts or Isomers or Salts of
Isomers, Pseudoephedrine or any
of its Salts or Isomers or Salts of
Isomers, Pressurized Ammonia
Gas, or Pressurized Ammonia Gas
Solution with intent to
manufacture methamphetamine
(RCW 69.50.440)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW
9A.88.070)

Selling for profit (controlled or
counterfeit) any controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Theft of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation
of any vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VII Burglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Civil Disorder Training (RCW
9A.48.120)

Dealing in depictions of minor
engaged in sexually explicit
conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible
compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW
9A.76.140)

Involving a minor in drug dealing
(RCW 69.50.401(f))

Malicious placement of an explosive 3
(RCW 70.74.270(3))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver heroin or cocaine
(except when the offender has a
criminal history in this state or
any other state that includes a sex
offense or serious violent offense
or the Washington equivalent)
(RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Sending, bringing into state depictions
of minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct (RCW
9.68A.060)

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in
the first degree (RCW
9.41.040(1)(a))

Use of a Machine Gun in Commission
of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for
the safety of others (RCW
46.61.520)

VI Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW
9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW
9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW
9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver narcotics from
Schedule I or II (except heroin or
cocaine) or flunitrazepam from
Schedule IV (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful Storage of Ammonia (RCW
69.55.020)

V Abandonment of dependent person 1
(RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing money or property for
extortionate extension of credit
(RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail Jumping with class A Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW
9A.42.020)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW
9A.44.160)

Delivery of imitation controlled
substance by person eighteen or
over to person under eighteen
(RCW 69.52.030(2))

Domestic Violence Court Order
Violation (RCW 10.99.040,
10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070,
or 74.34.145)

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit
(RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect
Extensions of Credit (RCW
9A.82.040)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW
9.94.070)

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW
9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1
(RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1
(RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains
(RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 1 (RCW
9A.56.070(1))

Vehicular Assault, by attempting to
elude a pursuing police vehicle
(RCW 46.61.522)

IV Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault by Watercraft (RCW
79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by
Witness (RCW 9A.72.090,
9A.72.100)

Cheating 1 (RCW 9.46.1961)

Commercial Bribery (RCW
9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Endangerment with a Controlled
Substance (RCW 9A.42.100)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit and Run -- Injury (RCW
46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit and Run with Vessel -- Injury
Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2)(a))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under
Age Fourteen (subsequent sex
offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting
Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Knowingly Trafficking in Stolen
Property (RCW 9A.82.050(2))

Malicious Harassment (RCW
9A.36.080)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver narcotics from
Schedule III, IV, or V or
nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V
(except marijuana, amphetamine,
methamphetamines, or
flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))

Residential Burglary (RCW
9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Use of Proceeds of Criminal
Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1)
and (2))

Vehicular Assault, by being under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, or by the operation or
driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from
Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

III Abandonment of dependent person 2
(RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault 3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication with a Minor for
Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW
9A.46.120)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW
9A.42.030)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Delivery of a material in lieu of a
controlled substance (RCW
69.50.401(c))

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW
9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW
9A.76.150)

Maintaining a Dwelling or Place for
Controlled Substances (RCW
69.50.402(a)(6))

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property
(RCW 81.60.070)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver marijuana (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Manufacture, distribute, or possess
with intent to distribute an
imitation controlled substance
(RCW 69.52.030(1))

Patronizing a Juvenile Prostitute
(RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW
9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW
9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW
9A.88.080)

Recklessly Trafficking in Stolen
Property (RCW 9A.82.050(1))

Securities Act violation (RCW
21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW
9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent
conviction or threat of death)
(RCW 9.61.230)

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW
9A.40.040)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the
second degree (RCW
9.41.040(1)(b))

Unlawful Use of Building for Drug
Purposes (RCW 69.53.010)

Vehicular Assault, by the operation or
driving of a vehicle with disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from Work
Release (RCW 72.65.070)

II Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police
Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

Computer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))

Create, deliver, or possess a counterfeit
controlled substance (RCW
69.50.401(b))

Escape from Community Custody
(RCW 72.09.310)

Health Care False Claims (RCW
48.80.030)

Identity Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(2)(b))

Improperly Obtaining Financial
Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW
9A.48.070)

Possession of controlled substance that
is either heroin or narcotics from
Schedule I or II or flunitrazepam
from Schedule IV (RCW
69.50.401(d))

Possession of phencyclidine (PCP)
(RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.56.150)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one
thousand five hundred dollars or
more) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW
48.30A.015)

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW
2.48.180)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or
Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

I ((Attempting to Elude a Pursuing
Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)))

False Verification for Welfare (RCW
74.08.055)

Forged Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged Prescription for a Controlled
Substance (RCW 69.50.403)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW
9A.48.080)

Possess Controlled Substance that is a
Narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or
V or Non-narcotic from Schedule
I-V (except phencyclidine or
flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(d))

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 2 (RCW
9A.56.070(2))

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two
hundred fifty dollars or more but
less than one thousand five
hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(4))

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts
(RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW
9.91.140 (2) and (3))

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Sec. 7 RCW 9.94A.515 and 2002 c 340 s 2, 2002 c 324 s 2, 2002 c
290 s 7, 2002 c 253 s 4, 2002 c 229 s 2, 2002 c 134 s 2, and 2002 c 133
s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN
EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVI Aggravated Murder 1 (RCW
10.95.020)

XV Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW
70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIV Murder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

XIII Malicious explosion 2 (RCW
70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1
(RCW 70.74.270(1))

XII Assault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

XI Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

X Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent Liberties (with forcible
compulsion) (RCW
9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW
70.74.280(3))

Sexually Violent Predator Escape
(RCW 9A.76.115)

Vehicular Homicide, by attempting to
elude a pursuing police vehicle
(RCW 46.61.520)

IX Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW
70.74.180)

Hit and Run--Death (RCW
46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide by Watercraft, by being
under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW
79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2
(RCW 70.74.270(2))

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under
the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.520)

VIII Arson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Homicide by Watercraft, by the
operation of any vessel in a
reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW
9A.88.070)

Theft of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation
of any vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VII Burglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Civil Disorder Training (RCW
9A.48.120)

Dealing in depictions of minor
engaged in sexually explicit
conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible
compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW
9A.76.140)

Malicious placement of an explosive 3
(RCW 70.74.270(3))

Sending, bringing into state depictions
of minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct (RCW
9.68A.060)

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in
the first degree (RCW
9.41.040(1)(a))

Use of a Machine Gun in Commission
of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for
the safety of others (RCW
46.61.520)

VI Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW
9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW
9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW
9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful Storage of Ammonia (RCW
69.55.020)

V Abandonment of dependent person 1
(RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing money or property for
extortionate extension of credit
(RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail Jumping with class A Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW
9A.42.020)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW
9A.44.160)

Domestic Violence Court Order
Violation (RCW 10.99.040,
10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070,
or 74.34.145)

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit
(RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect
Extensions of Credit (RCW
9A.82.040)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW
9.94.070)

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW
9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1
(RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1
(RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains
(RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 1 (RCW
9A.56.070(1))

Vehicular Assault, by attempting to
elude a pursuing police vehicle
(RCW 46.61.522)

IV Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault by Watercraft (RCW
79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by
Witness (RCW 9A.72.090,
9A.72.100)

Cheating 1 (RCW 9.46.1961)

Commercial Bribery (RCW
9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Endangerment with a Controlled
Substance (RCW 9A.42.100)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit and Run -- Injury (RCW
46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit and Run with Vessel -- Injury
Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2)(a))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under
Age Fourteen (subsequent sex
offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting
Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Knowingly Trafficking in Stolen
Property (RCW 9A.82.050(2))

Malicious Harassment (RCW
9A.36.080)

Residential Burglary (RCW
9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Use of Proceeds of Criminal
Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1)
and (2))

Vehicular Assault, by being under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, or by the operation or
driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from
Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

III Abandonment of dependent person 2
(RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault 3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication with a Minor for
Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW
9A.46.120)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW
9A.42.030)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW
9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW
9A.76.150)

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property
(RCW 81.60.070)

Patronizing a Juvenile Prostitute
(RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW
9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW
9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW
9A.88.080)

Recklessly Trafficking in Stolen
Property (RCW 9A.82.050(1))

Securities Act violation (RCW
21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW
9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent
conviction or threat of death)
(RCW 9.61.230)

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW
9A.40.040)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the
second degree (RCW
9.41.040(1)(b))

Vehicular Assault, by the operation or
driving of a vehicle with disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from Work
Release (RCW 72.65.070)

II Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police
Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

Computer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))

Escape from Community Custody
(RCW 72.09.310)

Health Care False Claims (RCW
48.80.030)

Identity Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(2)(b))

Improperly Obtaining Financial
Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW
9A.48.070)

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.56.150)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one
thousand five hundred dollars or
more) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW
48.30A.015)

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW
2.48.180)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or
Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

I ((Attempting to Elude a Pursuing
Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)))

False Verification for Welfare (RCW
74.08.055)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW
9A.48.080)

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 2 (RCW
9A.56.070(2))

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two
hundred fifty dollars or more but
less than one thousand five
hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(4))

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts
(RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW
9.91.140 (2) and (3))

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Section 6 of this act expires July 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Section 7 of this act takes effect July 1,
2004.

--- END ---