BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the state
parks and outdoor recreation funding task force created in section 303,
chapter 371, Laws of 2002 requires additional time to evaluate the
services and funding needs for state parks and outdoor recreation
lands. The legislature recognizes that there are limited resources
available for managing these lands. The legislature intends to
continue the task force to complete the work initiated in 2002 and
develop additional recommendations for the 2004 legislative session.
(2) The state parks and outdoor recreation funding task force is
continued and is composed of the current fifteen members, four members
of the senate appointed by the president of the senate and to include
two members from each caucus, four members of the house of
representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives and to include two members from each caucus, three
members appointed by the governor and to include at least one
representative of a broad coalition of users of the state's parks and
outdoor recreation programs, one member appointed by the commissioner
of public lands, one member appointed by the chair of the fish and
wildlife commission, one member appointed by the chair of the state
parks and recreation commission, and one member appointed by the
interagency committee for outdoor recreation. An additional member
shall be appointed by an organization, selected by the chair and vice-chair of the task force, that represents employees of the state parks
and recreation commission, the fish and wildlife commission, and the
department of natural resources. Any vacancies that might occur on the
task force must be filled by the original appointing authority. The
task force shall elect its own officers, be staffed by staff of the
legislature, and may appoint an advisory committee of additional
persons and organizations interested in the operation and funding of
state parks and outdoor recreation.
(3) The task force shall conduct a thorough evaluation of the
organizational structures and service delivery of the outdoor
recreation sites and programs managed by the state parks and recreation
commission, the department of fish and wildlife, and the department of
natural resources. The task force shall make recommendations to the
legislature by December 1, 2003, identifying priorities for managing
state parks and outdoor recreation lands and stable long-term funding
to adequately support those activities.
(4) This section expires April 1, 2004.

--- END ---