BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the state
parks and recreation commission, the department of natural resources,
and the fish and wildlife commission have difficulty maintaining
recreation sites they own because of insufficient funds. The
legislature also finds that the lack of funds to maintain and repair
these recreation sites may result in the closure of some of these sites
to the public at a time when the demand for outdoor recreation areas
continues to increase.
(2) The legislature recognizes that many state residents and
visitors to Washington enjoy visiting state-owned recreation sites
throughout different parts of the state, and that people will visit
lands owned by more than one state agency. The legislature is aware
that the parks and recreation commission is considering a statewide
day-use parking fee, the fish and wildlife commission has an annual
pass for parking at their access sites, and the department of natural
resources currently does not charge a day-use parking fee at their
recreation sites. The legislature finds that any day-use parking fees
or annual passes should be coordinated among these agencies so that
people have the opportunity to buy a single day-use parking pass that
will be accepted at recreation sites owned by all three of these state
agencies. The legislature also finds that the creation of a single
renewable annual recreation parking pass may result in many more people
visiting a number of recreation sites within the state because of
better maintained facilities and increased awareness of recreation
opportunities. It is therefore the intent of the legislature to create
an evergreen recreation pass that will be available to serve as a
renewable annual recreation parking pass for state-owned recreation
sites in lieu of day-use parking fees, that this recreation parking
pass will be widely available, and that the purchase of this pass is
optional for members of the general public. It is also the intent of
the legislature to encourage coordination with federal natural resource
recreational land managers and neighboring states to develop a regional
recreational parking pass.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agency" or "agencies" includes the department of fish and
wildlife, the department of natural resources, and the parks and
recreation commission.
(2) "Pass" means the evergreen recreation pass created in section
3 of this act.
(3) "Recreation site" means those areas designated by an agency
where a day-use parking fee or annual parking permit is required.
(4) "Visitation" means the total number of visitor days to agency
recreation sites as determined by a survey conducted by the interagency
committee for outdoor recreation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The evergreen recreation pass is created
effective January 1, 2004, as a renewable annual parking pass that is
valid at any recreation sites owned by the agencies. The pass is in
lieu of any other day-use parking fee or annual parking permit required
by these agencies, including day-use parking fees established by the
parks and recreation commission and the annual fish and wildlife lands
vehicle use permit issued by the department of fish and wildlife under
RCW 77.32.380. The cost of the pass may not exceed thirty-five
dollars, except that the amount of the fee may be adjusted for
inflation by the office of financial management subject to the
limitation contained in RCW 43.135.055(1).
(2) A person has the option to either purchase the pass or to
purchase the individual day-use parking passes or annual parking
permits required by the agencies.
(3)(a) The pass must be made available for purchase from each
agency requiring a day-use parking fee or annual parking permit.
(b) The pass must also be available for purchase through the
department of licensing. The department of licensing shall include a
notice of the availability of this pass, including the opportunity to
renew the pass, in each notice of license plate tab renewals. The
department of licensing shall also encourage private vendors to
distribute the pass and to make the pass available for persons renewing
licenses on-line.
(4) Agencies may enter into agreements with federal agencies and
neighboring state natural resource agencies to develop a regional
recreation pass. Agencies shall evaluate and develop a proposal for
implementing an interagency pass that includes access to state and
federal recreation lands by December 1, 2003, and report their findings
to the appropriate standing committees of the legislature.
(5) Agencies may develop premium passes that combine additional
licenses and services that include but are not limited to camping, boat
launch, boat moorage, hunting, and fishing. Agencies may also develop
marketing proposals that include offering discounts to the cost of the
pass for private vendors that distribute premium passes and the
evergreen recreation pass.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The pass must be displayed so that it is
clearly visible from outside of the motor vehicle before parking at a
recreation site.
(2) Annual passes must be available during any month of the year.
(3) Failure to display the pass or the equivalent agency day-use
parking pass or annual parking permit in accordance with this section
is a natural resource infraction under chapter 7.84 RCW. Agency
employees and general authority law enforcement officers may issue a
notice of infraction to the registered owner of any motor vehicle
parking without either the pass or the equivalent agency day-use
parking pass or annual parking permit. The penalty for failure to
clearly display the required pass or permit is sixty-six dollars. This
penalty is reduced to ten dollars if the registered owner provides
proof to the court that he or she purchased either a pass or the
equivalent agency day-use parking pass or annual parking permit within
fifteen days after the issuance of the notice of violation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Revenues obtained from the sale of the
pass shall be distributed to the agencies participating in the pass
program based on visitation to agency lands by purchasers of the pass
during the prior year.
(2) Visitation is determined by a survey conducted by the
interagency committee for outdoor recreation in 2004 and updated every
four years. Revenues collected in 2004 must be distributed in the
following manner: Fifty percent to the state parks and recreation
commission; twenty-five percent to the department of fish and wildlife;
and twenty-five percent to the department of natural resources.
Beginning January 1, 2005, the first annual survey of purchasers of the
pass by the interagency committee for outdoor recreation will determine
the revenue distribution based on visitation for each agency.
(3) Before revenues from the pass are distributed to agencies based
on visitation, the department of licensing must be reimbursed for
reasonable expenses incurred for promoting and selling the pass, and
the interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall be reimbursed
for conducting the survey.
(4) Funds received from sales of the pass must be used for
operation, maintenance, repair, and equipment for recreation sites.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.30 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "recreation site" has the
same meaning as defined in section 2 of this act.
(2) The department may charge persons a fee for parking motor
vehicles at clearly identified department recreation sites.
(3) A person may purchase and display an evergreen recreation pass,
created in section 3 of this act, in lieu of a day-use pass or permit
required by the department for parking at recreation sites owned by the
department. Nothing in this section alters the authority of the
department to determine the recreation sites at which a day-use pass or
permit will be required for access.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 79A.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "recreation site" has the
same meaning as defined in section 2 of this act.
(2) A person may purchase and display an evergreen recreation pass,
created in section 3 of this act, in lieu of a day-use pass or permit
required by the commission for access to recreation sites owned by the
commission. Nothing in this section alters the authority of the
commission to determine the recreation sites at which a day-use pass or
permit will be required for access.

Sec. 8 RCW 77.32.380 and 2001 c 243 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Persons who enter upon or use clearly identified department
improved access facilities with a motor vehicle may be required to
display a current annual fish and wildlife lands vehicle use permit on
the motor vehicle while within or while using an improved access
facility. An "improved access facility" is a clearly identified area
specifically created for motor vehicle parking, and includes any boat
launch or boat ramp associated with the parking area, but does not
include the department parking facilities at the Gorge Concert Center
near George, Washington. One vehicle use permit shall be issued at no
charge with an initial purchase of either an annual saltwater,
freshwater, combination, small game hunting, big game hunting, or
trapping license issued by the department. The annual fee for a fish
and wildlife lands vehicle use permit, if purchased separately, is ten
dollars. A person to whom the department has issued a vehicle use
permit or who has purchased a vehicle use permit separately may
purchase additional vehicle use permits from the department at a cost
of five dollars per vehicle use permit. Revenue derived from the sale
of fish and wildlife lands vehicle use permits shall be used solely for
the stewardship and maintenance of department improved access
facilities.
Youth groups may use department improved access facilities without
possessing a vehicle use permit when accompanied by a vehicle use
permit holder.
The department may accept contributions into the state wildlife
fund for the sound stewardship of fish and wildlife. Contributors
shall be known as "conservation patrons" and, for contributions of
twenty dollars or more, shall receive a fish and wildlife lands vehicle
use permit free of charge.
(2) The vehicle use permit must be displayed from the interior of
the motor vehicle so that it is clearly visible from outside of the
motor vehicle before entering upon or using the motor vehicle on a
department improved access facility. The vehicle use permit can be
transferred between two vehicles and must contain space for the vehicle
license numbers of each vehicle.
(3) Failure to display the fish and wildlife lands vehicle use
permit if required by this section is an infraction under chapter 7.84
RCW, and department employees are authorized to issue a notice of
infraction to the registered owner of any motor vehicle entering upon
or using a department improved access facility without such a vehicle
use permit. The penalty for failure to clearly display the vehicle use
permit is sixty-six dollars. This penalty is reduced to thirty dollars
if the registered owner provides proof to the court that he or she
purchased a vehicle use permit within fifteen days after the issuance
of the notice of violation.
(4) In lieu of displaying the vehicle use permit required under
this section, persons who enter upon or use clearly identified
department improved access facilities may display the evergreen
recreation pass created in section 3 of this act. Nothing in this
section alters the authority of the department to determine the
recreation sites at which a day-use pass or permit will be required for
access. For the purposes of this subsection (4), "recreation site" has
the same meaning as defined in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 9 RCW 4.24.210 and 1997 c 26 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section,
any public or private landowners or others in lawful possession and
control of any lands whether designated resource, rural, or urban, or
water areas or channels and lands adjacent to such areas or channels,
who allow members of the public to use them for the purposes of outdoor
recreation, which term includes, but is not limited to, the cutting,
gathering, and removing of firewood by private persons for their
personal use without purchasing the firewood from the landowner,
hunting, fishing, camping, picnicking, swimming, hiking, bicycling,
skateboarding or other nonmotorized wheel-based activities,
hanggliding, paragliding, the riding of horses or other animals, clam
digging, pleasure driving of off-road vehicles, snowmobiles, and other
vehicles, boating, nature study, winter or water sports, viewing or
enjoying historical, archaeological, scenic, or scientific sites,
without charging a fee ((of any kind therefor)), shall not be liable
for unintentional injuries to such users.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section,
any public or private landowner or others in lawful possession and
control of any lands whether rural or urban, or water areas or channels
and lands adjacent to such areas or channels, who offer or allow such
land to be used for purposes of a fish or wildlife cooperative project,
or allow access to such land for cleanup of litter or other solid
waste, shall not be liable for unintentional injuries to any volunteer
group or to any other users.
(3) Any public or private landowner, or others in lawful possession
and control of the land, may charge an administrative fee of up to
twenty-five dollars for the cutting, gathering, and removing of
firewood from the land. Nothing in this section shall prevent the
liability of such a landowner or others in lawful possession and
control for injuries sustained to users by reason of a known dangerous
artificial latent condition for which warning signs have not been
conspicuously posted. Nothing in RCW 4.24.200 and 4.24.210 limits or
expands in any way the doctrine of attractive nuisance. Usage by
members of the public, volunteer groups, or other users is permissive
and does not support any claim of adverse possession.
(4) For purposes of this section, a license or permit issued for
statewide use under authority of ((chapter 43.51 RCW, Title 75, or))
Title 77 RCW, chapter 79A.05 RCW, or the evergreen recreation pass
created in chapter 79A.-- RCW (sections 1 through 5 of this act) is not
a fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 79A RCW.

--- END ---