BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the department of
fish and wildlife is responsible for the proper management of the
state's diverse wildlife resources. Wildlife management often requires
the department of fish and wildlife to immobilize individual animals in
order for the animals to be moved, treated, examined, or for other
legitimate purposes. The legislature finds that it is often necessary
for the department to use certain controlled substances to accomplish
these purposes. Therefore, the legislature finds that the department
of fish and wildlife, in coordination with the board of pharmacy,
should be enabled to use approved controlled substances in order to
accomplish its legitimate wildlife management goals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of fish and wildlife may apply to the department for
registration pursuant to the applicable provisions of this chapter to
purchase, possess, and administer controlled substances for use in
chemical capture programs. The department of fish and wildlife may not
permit a person to administer controlled substances unless the person
has demonstrated adequate knowledge of the potential hazards and proper
techniques to be used in administering controlled substances.
The department may issue a limited registration to carry out the
provisions of this section. The board may adopt rules to ensure strict
compliance with the provisions of this section. The board, in
consultation with the department of fish and wildlife, may by rule add
or remove additional controlled substances for use in chemical capture
programs. The board may suspend or revoke registration upon
determination that the person administering controlled substances has
not demonstrated adequate knowledge as required by this section. This
authority is granted in addition to any other power to suspend or
revoke registration as provided by law.

--- END ---