BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 72.01.410 and 2002 c 171 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Whenever any child under the age of eighteen is convicted in
the courts of this state of a crime amounting to a felony, and is
committed for a term of confinement in a correctional institution
wherein adults are confined, the secretary of corrections, after making
an independent assessment and evaluation of the child and determining
that the needs and correctional goals for the child could better be met
by the programs and housing environment provided by the juvenile
correctional institution, with the consent of the secretary of social
and health services, may transfer such child to a juvenile correctional
institution, or to such other institution as is now, or may hereafter
be authorized by law to receive such child, until such time as the
child arrives at the age of twenty-one years, whereupon the child shall
be returned to the institution of original commitment. Retention
within a juvenile detention facility or return to an adult correctional
facility shall regularly be reviewed by the secretary of corrections
and the secretary of social and health services with a determination
made based on the level of maturity and sophistication of the
individual, the behavior and progress while within the juvenile
detention facility, security needs, and the program/treatment
alternatives which would best prepare the individual for a successful
return to the community. Notice of such transfers shall be given to
the clerk of the committing court and the parents, guardian, or next of
kin of such child, if known.
(b) An offender under the age of eighteen who has been convicted in
adult criminal court and committed to a term of confinement at the
department of corrections must be evaluated by the secretary of
corrections upon the offender's initial intake and classification to
determine if the offender is eligible to be transferred to a juvenile
facility under this section. The secretary of corrections shall
consult with the secretary of the department of social and health
services when making the evaluation.
(c) The secretary of corrections and the secretary of the
department of social and health services shall jointly develop
screening criteria for the transfer of offenders under this section.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this subsection, an
offender under the age of eighteen who is convicted in adult criminal
court and who is committed to a term of confinement at the department
of corrections must be placed in a housing unit, or a portion of a
housing unit, that is separated from offenders eighteen years of age or
older, until the offender reaches the age of eighteen.
(b) An offender who reaches eighteen years of age may remain in a
housing unit for offenders under the age of eighteen if the secretary
of corrections determines that: (i) The offender's needs and the
correctional goals for the offender could continue to be better met by
the programs and housing environment that is separate from offenders
eighteen years of age and older; and (ii) the programs or housing
environment for offenders under the age of eighteen will not be
substantially affected by the continued placement of the offender in
that environment. The offender may remain placed in a housing unit for
offenders under the age of eighteen until such time as the secretary of
corrections determines that the offender's needs and correctional goals
are no longer better met in that environment but in no case past the
offender's twenty-first birthday.
(c) An offender under the age of eighteen may be housed in an
intensive management unit or administrative segregation unit containing
offenders eighteen years of age or older if it is necessary for the
safety or security of the offender or staff. In these cases, the
offender shall be kept physically separate from other offenders at all
times.

--- END ---