BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.185B.020 and 1993 c 478 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish the affordable housing advisory
board to consist of ((twenty-one)) twenty-two members.
(a) The following ((eighteen)) nineteen members shall be appointed
by the governor:
(i) Two representatives of the residential construction industry;
(ii) Two representatives of the home mortgage lending profession;
(iii) One representative of the real estate sales profession;
(iv) One representative of the apartment management and operation
industry;
(v) One representative of the for-profit housing development
industry;
(vi) One representative of for-profit rental housing owners;
(vii) One representative of the nonprofit housing development
industry;
(((vii))) (viii) One representative of homeless shelter operators;
(((viii))) (ix) One representative of lower-income persons;
(((ix))) (x) One representative of special needs populations;
(((x))) (xi) One representative of public housing authorities as
created under chapter 35.82 RCW;
(((xi))) (xii) Two representatives of the Washington association of
counties, one representative shall be from a county that is located
east of the crest of the Cascade mountains;
(((xii))) (xiii) Two representatives of the association of
Washington cities, one representative shall be from a city that is
located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains;
(((xiii))) (xiv) One representative to serve as chair of the
affordable housing advisory board;
(((xiv))) (xv) One representative at large.
(b) The following three members shall serve as ex officio,
nonvoting members:
(i) The director or the director's designee;
(ii) The executive director of the Washington state housing finance
commission or the executive director's designee; and
(iii) The secretary of social and health services or the
secretary's designee.
(2)(a) The members of the affordable housing advisory board
appointed by the governor shall be appointed for four-year terms,
except that the chair shall be appointed to serve a two-year term. The
terms of five of the initial appointees shall be for two years from the
date of appointment and the terms of six of the initial appointees
shall be for three years from the date of appointment. The governor
shall designate the appointees who will serve the two-year and three-year terms. The members of the advisory board shall serve without
compensation, but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided
in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(b) The governor, when making appointments to the affordable
housing advisory board, shall make appointments that reflect the
cultural diversity of the state of Washington.
(3) The affordable housing advisory board shall serve as the
department's principal advisory body on housing and housing-related
issues, and replaces the department's existing boards and task forces
on housing and housing-related issues.
(4) The affordable housing advisory board shall meet regularly and
may appoint technical advisory committees, which may include members
of the affordable housing advisory board, as needed to address specific
issues and concerns.
(5) The department, in conjunction with the Washington state
housing finance commission and the department of social and health
services, shall supply such information and assistance as are deemed
necessary for the advisory board to carry out its duties under this
section.
(6) The department shall provide administrative and clerical
assistance to the affordable housing advisory board.

--- END ---