BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An offender is eligible for the youthful offender sentencing
alternative if:
(a) The offender has been convicted in adult criminal court
pursuant to RCW 13.04.030(1)(e)(v) of any charge other than murder in
the first degree or murder in the second degree, or an attempt to
commit murder in the first or second degree;
(b) The offender has no prior convictions for any serious violent
offense; and
(c) The offender has not previously been transferred to the
department of corrections from a facility for juveniles under RCW
13.40.280.
(2) If the court finds that the offender is eligible for this
alternative, the court may impose the youthful offender sentencing
alternative under subsection (3) of this section, unless after a
hearing on the motion of the court or either party, the court
determines that this alternative is not appropriate for the offender.
The court shall set forth its reasons for not imposing the youthful
offender sentencing alternative in written findings of fact and
conclusions of law.
(3) If the court determines that the youthful offender sentencing
alternative is appropriate for the offender, the court shall impose a
sentence under this chapter, suspend the execution of the sentence, and
impose the following conditions of suspension:
(a) Commitment of the offender to the custody of the department of
social and health services for placement in a juvenile correctional
facility for the length of time that the offender would have served in
total confinement with the department of corrections under the
suspended sentence or until the offender's twenty-first birthday,
whichever is shorter;
(b) Crime-related prohibitions;
(c) Any other conditions as the court may find appropriate.
(4)(a) The department of social and health services shall place an
offender sentenced under this section in a juvenile correctional
facility, subject to capacity, unless the department of social and
health services determines, after an intake evaluation, that placement
in the facility is not appropriate.
(b) The department of social and health services shall have
jurisdiction over an offender sentenced under this section until the
offender is returned to the custody of the department of corrections or
until the offender's twenty-first birthday, whichever occurs first.
(c) The department of social and health services shall submit
annual reports to the court and the department of corrections regarding
the offender's compliance with the conditions of the youthful offender
sentencing alternative.
(5)(a) No sooner than three months prior to the offender's twenty-first birthday or an expected release date, the offender shall appear
before the court to determine compliance with the youthful offender
sentencing alternative.
(b) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, if the court
determines at the hearing that the offender has made sufficient
progress in available rehabilitative programs, has not reoffended, and
has not posed a serious threat to the physical safety of others, the
court shall: (i) Order the offender released from the custody of the
department of social and health services; (ii) enter a finding that
the offender has completed the requirements of the suspended sentence;
(iii) order that the offense for which the offender received a youthful
offender sentencing alternative be considered a juvenile adjudication
for all purposes and not an adult conviction; and (iv) determine if a
period of community custody would be appropriate for the offender based
on recommendations from the department of social and health services
and the department of corrections. If the court determines a period of
community custody is appropriate, the court shall order a period of
community custody not to exceed forty-eight months, and the department
of corrections shall have jurisdiction over the offender for the
purposes of supervision of community custody.
(c)(i) For offenders convicted of rape in the first degree or rape
in the second degree and whose suspended adult sentence would require
the offender to be incarcerated beyond the offender's twenty-first
birthday, if the court finds that the offender has made sufficient
progress in available rehabilitative programs, has not reoffended, and
has not posed a serious threat to the physical safety of others, the
court shall: (A) Order the offender released from the custody of the
department of social and health services; and (B) determine if the
offender should be returned to the custody of the department of
corrections for a period of confinement in an adult facility until the
offender's twenty-fifth birthday or for the length of time remaining on
the adult sentence, whichever period is shorter. If the court finds
that the offender's return to the custody of the department of
corrections is not appropriate, the court shall enter the order and
findings listed in (b) of this subsection.
(ii) For offenders returned to the department of corrections, no
sooner than three months prior to the offender's twenty-fifth birthday
or an expected release date, the offender shall appear before the
court. If the court finds that the offender has made sufficient
progress in available rehabilitative programs, has not reoffended, and
has not posed a serious threat to the physical safety of others, the
court shall: (A) Order the offender released from the custody of the
department of corrections; (B) order that the offense for which the
offender received a youthful offender sentencing alternative be
considered a juvenile adjudication for all purposes and not an adult
conviction; (C) enter a finding that the offender has completed the
requirements of the suspended sentence; and (D) order a period of
community custody not to exceed forty-eight months, unless the court
finds that community custody is not appropriate.
(6) The court, upon its own motion or upon application by the
department of social and health services or the department of
corrections, may revoke the suspended sentence at any time while the
offender is serving the youthful offender sentencing alternative and
order execution of the sentence if the offender:
(a) Fails to comply with any of the conditions imposed by the
court;
(b) Fails to make sufficient progress in rehabilitative programs
made available to the offender;
(c) Constitutes a serious threat to the physical safety of others;
or
(d) Reoffends.
(7) If the court revokes the suspended sentence while the offender
is in custody of the department of social and health services, the
court shall order execution of the original sentence. The offender
shall be removed from the custody of the department of social and
health services and returned to the department of corrections to serve
the suspended sentence imposed. The offender's confinement time served
while in the custody of the department of social and health services
shall be credited to the offender.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.505 and 2002 c 289 s 6 and 2002 c 175 s 6 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) When a person is convicted of a felony, the court shall impose
punishment as provided in this chapter.
(2)(a) The court shall impose a sentence as provided in the
following sections and as applicable in the case:
(i) Unless another term of confinement applies, the court shall
impose a sentence within the standard sentence range established in RCW
9.94A.510;
(ii) RCW 9.94A.700 and 9.94A.705, relating to community placement;
(iii) RCW 9.94A.710 and 9.94A.715, relating to community custody;
(iv) RCW 9.94A.545, relating to community custody for offenders
whose term of confinement is one year or less;
(v) RCW 9.94A.570, relating to persistent offenders;
(vi) RCW 9.94A.540, relating to mandatory minimum terms;
(vii) RCW 9.94A.650, relating to the first-time offender waiver;
(viii) RCW 9.94A.660, relating to the drug offender sentencing
alternative;
(ix) RCW 9.94A.670, relating to the special sex offender sentencing
alternative;
(x) RCW 9.94A.712, relating to certain sex offenses;
(xi) RCW 9.94A.535, relating to exceptional sentences;
(xii) RCW 9.94A.589, relating to consecutive and concurrent
sentences;
(xiii) Section 1 of this act, relating to the youthful offender
sentencing alternative.
(b) If a standard sentence range has not been established for the
offender's crime, the court shall impose a determinate sentence which
may include not more than one year of confinement; community
restitution work; until July 1, 2000, a term of community supervision
not to exceed one year and on and after July 1, 2000, a term of
community custody not to exceed one year, subject to conditions and
sanctions as authorized in RCW 9.94A.710 (2) and (3); and/or other
legal financial obligations. The court may impose a sentence which
provides more than one year of confinement if the court finds reasons
justifying an exceptional sentence as provided in RCW 9.94A.535.
(3) If the court imposes a sentence requiring confinement of thirty
days or less, the court may, in its discretion, specify that the
sentence be served on consecutive or intermittent days. A sentence
requiring more than thirty days of confinement shall be served on
consecutive days. Local jail administrators may schedule court-ordered
intermittent sentences as space permits.
(4) If a sentence imposed includes payment of a legal financial
obligation, it shall be imposed as provided in RCW 9.94A.750,
9.94A.753, 9.94A.760, and 43.43.7541.
(5) Except as provided under RCW 9.94A.750(4) and 9.94A.753(4), a
court may not impose a sentence providing for a term of confinement or
community supervision, community placement, or community custody which
exceeds the statutory maximum for the crime as provided in chapter
9A.20 RCW.
(6) The sentencing court shall give the offender credit for all
confinement time served before the sentencing if that confinement was
solely in regard to the offense for which the offender is being
sentenced.
(7) The court shall order restitution as provided in RCW 9.94A.750
and 9.94A.753.
(8) As a part of any sentence, the court may impose and enforce
crime-related prohibitions and affirmative conditions as provided in
this chapter.
(9) The court may order an offender whose sentence includes
community placement or community supervision to undergo a mental status
evaluation and to participate in available outpatient mental health
treatment, if the court finds that reasonable grounds exist to believe
that the offender is a mentally ill person as defined in RCW 71.24.025,
and that this condition is likely to have influenced the offense. An
order requiring mental status evaluation or treatment must be based on
a presentence report and, if applicable, mental status evaluations that
have been filed with the court to determine the offender's competency
or eligibility for a defense of insanity. The court may order
additional evaluations at a later date if deemed appropriate.
(10) In any sentence of partial confinement, the court may require
the offender to serve the partial confinement in work release, in a
program of home detention, on work crew, or in a combined program of
work crew and home detention.
(11) In sentencing an offender convicted of a crime of domestic
violence, as defined in RCW 10.99.020, if the offender has a minor
child, or if the victim of the offense for which the offender was
convicted has a minor child, the court may, as part of any term of
community supervision, community placement, or community custody, order
the offender to participate in a domestic violence perpetrator program
approved under RCW 26.50.150.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.505 and 2002 c 290 s 17, 2002 c 289 s 6, and
2002 c 175 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) When a person is convicted of a felony, the court shall impose
punishment as provided in this chapter.
(2)(a) The court shall impose a sentence as provided in the
following sections and as applicable in the case:
(i) Unless another term of confinement applies, the court shall
impose a sentence within the standard sentence range established in RCW
9.94A.510 or 9.94A.517;
(ii) RCW 9.94A.700 and 9.94A.705, relating to community placement;
(iii) RCW 9.94A.710 and 9.94A.715, relating to community custody;
(iv) RCW 9.94A.545, relating to community custody for offenders
whose term of confinement is one year or less;
(v) RCW 9.94A.570, relating to persistent offenders;
(vi) RCW 9.94A.540, relating to mandatory minimum terms;
(vii) RCW 9.94A.650, relating to the first-time offender waiver;
(viii) RCW 9.94A.660, relating to the drug offender sentencing
alternative;
(ix) RCW 9.94A.670, relating to the special sex offender sentencing
alternative;
(x) RCW 9.94A.712, relating to certain sex offenses;
(xi) RCW 9.94A.535, relating to exceptional sentences;
(xii) RCW 9.94A.589, relating to consecutive and concurrent
sentences;
(xiii) Section 1 of this act, relating to the youthful offender
sentencing alternative.
(b) If a standard sentence range has not been established for the
offender's crime, the court shall impose a determinate sentence which
may include not more than one year of confinement; community
restitution work; until July 1, 2000, a term of community supervision
not to exceed one year and on and after July 1, 2000, a term of
community custody not to exceed one year, subject to conditions and
sanctions as authorized in RCW 9.94A.710 (2) and (3); and/or other
legal financial obligations. The court may impose a sentence which
provides more than one year of confinement if the court finds reasons
justifying an exceptional sentence as provided in RCW 9.94A.535.
(3) If the court imposes a sentence requiring confinement of thirty
days or less, the court may, in its discretion, specify that the
sentence be served on consecutive or intermittent days. A sentence
requiring more than thirty days of confinement shall be served on
consecutive days. Local jail administrators may schedule court-ordered
intermittent sentences as space permits.
(4) If a sentence imposed includes payment of a legal financial
obligation, it shall be imposed as provided in RCW 9.94A.750,
9.94A.753, 9.94A.760, and 43.43.7541.
(5) Except as provided under RCW 9.94A.750(4) and 9.94A.753(4), a
court may not impose a sentence providing for a term of confinement or
community supervision, community placement, or community custody which
exceeds the statutory maximum for the crime as provided in chapter
9A.20 RCW.
(6) The sentencing court shall give the offender credit for all
confinement time served before the sentencing if that confinement was
solely in regard to the offense for which the offender is being
sentenced.
(7) The court shall order restitution as provided in RCW 9.94A.750
and 9.94A.753.
(8) As a part of any sentence, the court may impose and enforce
crime-related prohibitions and affirmative conditions as provided in
this chapter.
(9) The court may order an offender whose sentence includes
community placement or community supervision to undergo a mental status
evaluation and to participate in available outpatient mental health
treatment, if the court finds that reasonable grounds exist to believe
that the offender is a mentally ill person as defined in RCW 71.24.025,
and that this condition is likely to have influenced the offense. An
order requiring mental status evaluation or treatment must be based on
a presentence report and, if applicable, mental status evaluations that
have been filed with the court to determine the offender's competency
or eligibility for a defense of insanity. The court may order
additional evaluations at a later date if deemed appropriate.
(10) In any sentence of partial confinement, the court may require
the offender to serve the partial confinement in work release, in a
program of home detention, on work crew, or in a combined program of
work crew and home detention.
(11) In sentencing an offender convicted of a crime of domestic
violence, as defined in RCW 10.99.020, if the offender has a minor
child, or if the victim of the offense for which the offender was
convicted has a minor child, the court may, as part of any term of
community supervision, community placement, or community custody, order
the offender to participate in a domestic violence perpetrator program
approved under RCW 26.50.150.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.94A.030 and 2002 c 175 s 5 and 2002 c 107 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the indeterminate sentence review board created
under chapter 9.95 RCW.
(2) "Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit," or
"collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department,
means that the department, either directly or through a collection
agreement authorized by RCW 9.94A.760, is responsible for monitoring
and enforcing the offender's sentence with regard to the legal
financial obligation, receiving payment thereof from the offender, and,
consistent with current law, delivering daily the entire payment to the
superior court clerk without depositing it in a departmental account.
(3) "Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.
(4) "Community corrections officer" means an employee of the
department who is responsible for carrying out specific duties in
supervision of sentenced offenders and monitoring of sentence
conditions.
(5) "Community custody" means that portion of an offender's
sentence of confinement in lieu of earned release time or imposed
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.505(2)(b), 9.94A.650 through 9.94A.670, section
1 of this act, 9.94A.690, 9.94A.700 through 9.94A.715, or 9.94A.545,
served in the community subject to controls placed on the offender's
movement and activities by the department. For offenders placed on
community custody for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000, the
department shall assess the offender's risk of reoffense and may
establish and modify conditions of community custody, in addition to
those imposed by the court, based upon the risk to community safety.
(6) "Community custody range" means the minimum and maximum period
of community custody included as part of a sentence under RCW
9.94A.715, as established by the commission or the legislature under
RCW 9.94A.850, for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000.
(7) "Community placement" means that period during which the
offender is subject to the conditions of community custody and/or
postrelease supervision, which begins either upon completion of the
term of confinement (postrelease supervision) or at such time as the
offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of earned release.
Community placement may consist of entirely community custody, entirely
postrelease supervision, or a combination of the two.
(8) "Community restitution" means compulsory service, without
compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by the
offender.
(9) "Community supervision" means a period of time during which a
convicted offender is subject to crime-related prohibitions and other
sentence conditions imposed by a court pursuant to this chapter or RCW
16.52.200(6) or 46.61.524. Where the court finds that any offender has
a chemical dependency that has contributed to his or her offense, the
conditions of supervision may, subject to available resources, include
treatment. For purposes of the interstate compact for out-of-state
supervision of parolees and probationers, RCW 9.95.270, community
supervision is the functional equivalent of probation and should be
considered the same as probation by other states.
(10) "Confinement" means total or partial confinement.
(11) "Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to Titles
10 or 13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of guilty, and
acceptance of a plea of guilty.
(12) "Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court
prohibiting conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the
crime for which the offender has been convicted, and shall not be
construed to mean orders directing an offender affirmatively to
participate in rehabilitative programs or to otherwise perform
affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts necessary to monitor
compliance with the order of a court may be required by the department.
(13) "Criminal history" means the list of a defendant's prior
convictions and juvenile adjudications, whether in this state, in
federal court, or elsewhere.
(a) The history shall include, where known, for each conviction (i)
whether the defendant has been placed on probation and the length and
terms thereof; and (ii) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and
the length of incarceration.
(b) A conviction may be removed from a defendant's criminal history
only if it is vacated pursuant to RCW 9.96.060, 9.94A.640, 9.95.240, or
a similar out-of-state statute, or if the conviction has been vacated
pursuant to a governor's pardon.
(c) The determination of a defendant's criminal history is distinct
from the determination of an offender score. A prior conviction that
was not included in an offender score calculated pursuant to a former
version of the sentencing reform act remains part of the defendant's
criminal history.
(14) "Day fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing court that
equals the difference between the offender's net daily income and the
reasonable obligations that the offender has for the support of the
offender and any dependents.
(15) "Day reporting" means a program of enhanced supervision
designed to monitor the offender's daily activities and compliance with
sentence conditions, and in which the offender is required to report
daily to a specific location designated by the department or the
sentencing court.
(16) "Department" means the department of corrections.
(17) "Determinate sentence" means a sentence that states with
exactitude the number of actual years, months, or days of total
confinement, of partial confinement, of community supervision, the
number of actual hours or days of community restitution work, or
dollars or terms of a legal financial obligation. The fact that an
offender through earned release can reduce the actual period of
confinement shall not affect the classification of the sentence as a
determinate sentence.
(18) "Disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings of an
offender remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any
amount required by law to be withheld. For the purposes of this
definition, "earnings" means compensation paid or payable for personal
services, whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or
otherwise, and, notwithstanding any other provision of law making the
payments exempt from garnishment, attachment, or other process to
satisfy a court-ordered legal financial obligation, specifically
includes periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement programs,
or insurance policies of any type, but does not include payments made
under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020 and 50.40.050,
or Title 74 RCW.
(19) "Drug offender sentencing alternative" is a sentencing option
available to persons convicted of a felony offense other than a violent
offense or a sex offense and who are eligible for the option under RCW
9.94A.660.
(20) "Drug offense" means:
(a) Any felony violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of
a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(d)) or forged prescription for a
controlled substance (RCW 69.50.403);
(b) Any offense defined as a felony under federal law that relates
to the possession, manufacture, distribution, or transportation of a
controlled substance; or
(c) Any out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws
of this state would be a felony classified as a drug offense under (a)
of this subsection.
(21) "Earned release" means earned release from confinement as
provided in RCW 9.94A.728.
(22) "Escape" means:
(a) Sexually violent predator escape (RCW 9A.76.115), escape in the
first degree (RCW 9A.76.110), escape in the second degree (RCW
9A.76.120), willful failure to return from furlough (RCW 72.66.060),
willful failure to return from work release (RCW 72.65.070), or willful
failure to be available for supervision by the department while in
community custody (RCW 72.09.310); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as an escape
under (a) of this subsection.
(23) "Felony traffic offense" means:
(a) Vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW
46.61.522), eluding a police officer (RCW 46.61.024), or felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW 46.52.020(4)); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a felony
traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(24) "Fine" means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing
court to be paid by the offender to the court over a specific period of
time.
(25) "First-time offender" means any person who has no prior
convictions for a felony and is eligible for the first-time offender
waiver under RCW 9.94A.650.
(26) "Home detention" means a program of partial confinement
available to offenders wherein the offender is confined in a private
residence subject to electronic surveillance.
(27) "Legal financial obligation" means a sum of money that is
ordered by a superior court of the state of Washington for legal
financial obligations which may include restitution to the victim,
statutorily imposed crime victims' compensation fees as assessed
pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court costs, county or interlocal drug funds,
court-appointed attorneys' fees, and costs of defense, fines, and any
other financial obligation that is assessed to the offender as a result
of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for vehicular assault while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW
46.61.522(1)(b), or vehicular homicide while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), legal financial
obligations may also include payment to a public agency of the expense
of an emergency response to the incident resulting in the conviction,
subject to RCW 38.52.430.
(28) "Most serious offense" means any of the following felonies or
a felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies:
(a) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or
criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A
felony;
(b) Assault in the second degree;
(c) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(d) Child molestation in the second degree;
(e) Controlled substance homicide;
(f) Extortion in the first degree;
(g) Incest when committed against a child under age fourteen;
(h) Indecent liberties;
(i) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(j) Leading organized crime;
(k) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(l) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(m) Promoting prostitution in the first degree;
(n) Rape in the third degree;
(o) Robbery in the second degree;
(p) Sexual exploitation;
(q) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving of
a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner;
(r) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(s) Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual
motivation;
(t) Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW
9.94A.602;
(u) Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to December 2,
1993, that is comparable to a most serious offense under this
subsection, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense
that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a
most serious offense under this subsection;
(v)(i) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
9A.88.100(1) (a), (b), and (c), chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess.
as it existed until July 1, 1979, RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as
it existed from July 1, 1979, until June 11, 1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988;
(ii) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988,
if: (A) The crime was committed against a child under the age of
fourteen; or (B) the relationship between the victim and perpetrator is
included in the definition of indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through July 27, 1997,
or RCW 9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993,
through July 27, 1997.
(29) "Nonviolent offense" means an offense which is not a violent
offense.
(30) "Offender" means a person who has committed a felony
established by state law and is eighteen years of age or older or is
less than eighteen years of age but whose case is under superior court
jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030 or has been transferred by the
appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court pursuant to RCW
13.40.110. Throughout this chapter, the terms "offender" and
"defendant" are used interchangeably.
(31) "Partial confinement" means confinement for no more than one
year in a facility or institution operated or utilized under contract
by the state or any other unit of government, or, if home detention or
work crew has been ordered by the court, in an approved residence, for
a substantial portion of each day with the balance of the day spent in
the community. Partial confinement includes work release, home
detention, work crew, and a combination of work crew and home
detention.
(32) "Persistent offender" is an offender who:
(a)(i) Has been convicted in this state of any felony considered a
most serious offense; and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (a) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least two separate
occasions, whether in this state or elsewhere, of felonies that under
the laws of this state would be considered most serious offenses and
would be included in the offender score under RCW 9.94A.525; provided
that of the two or more previous convictions, at least one conviction
must have occurred before the commission of any of the other most
serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or
(b)(i) Has been convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape
of a child in the first degree, child molestation in the first degree,
rape in the second degree, rape of a child in the second degree, or
indecent liberties by forcible compulsion; (B) any of the following
offenses with a finding of sexual motivation: Murder in the first
degree, murder in the second degree, homicide by abuse, kidnapping in
the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree, assault in the first
degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the first
degree, or burglary in the first degree; or (C) an attempt to commit
any crime listed in this subsection (32)(b)(i); and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least one occasion,
whether in this state or elsewhere, of an offense listed in (b)(i) of
this subsection or any federal or out-of-state offense or offense under
prior Washington law that is comparable to the offenses listed in
(b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for rape of a child in the
first degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection
only when the offender was sixteen years of age or older when the
offender committed the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in
the second degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this
subsection only when the offender was eighteen years of age or older
when the offender committed the offense.
(33) "Postrelease supervision" is that portion of an offender's
community placement that is not community custody.
(34) "Restitution" means a specific sum of money ordered by the
sentencing court to be paid by the offender to the court over a
specified period of time as payment of damages. The sum may include
both public and private costs.
(35) "Risk assessment" means the application of an objective
instrument supported by research and adopted by the department for the
purpose of assessing an offender's risk of reoffense, taking into
consideration the nature of the harm done by the offender, place and
circumstances of the offender related to risk, the offender's
relationship to any victim, and any information provided to the
department by victims. The results of a risk assessment shall not be
based on unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.
(36) "Serious traffic offense" means:
(a) Driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any
drug (RCW 46.61.502), actual physical control while under the influence
of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504), reckless driving
(RCW 46.61.500), or hit-and-run an attended vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5));
or
(b) Any federal, out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for
an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a
serious traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(37) "Serious violent offense" is a subcategory of violent offense
and means:
(a)(i) Murder in the first degree;
(ii) Homicide by abuse;
(iii) Murder in the second degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(v) Assault in the first degree;
(vi) Kidnapping in the first degree;
(vii) Rape in the first degree;
(viii) Assault of a child in the first degree; or
(ix) An attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to
commit one of these felonies; or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a serious
violent offense under (a) of this subsection.
(38) "Sex offense" means:
(a)(i) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW other than
RCW 9A.44.130(11);
(ii) A violation of RCW 9A.64.020;
(iii) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9.68A RCW other than
RCW 9.68A.070 or 9.68A.080; or
(iv) A felony that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt,
criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit such crimes;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a sex
offense in (a) of this subsection;
(c) A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW
9.94A.835 or 13.40.135; or
(d) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a sex
offense under (a) of this subsection.
(39) "Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes for which
the defendant committed the crime was for the purpose of his or her
sexual gratification.
(40) "Standard sentence range" means the sentencing court's
discretionary range in imposing a nonappealable sentence.
(41) "Statutory maximum sentence" means the maximum length of time
for which an offender may be confined as punishment for a crime as
prescribed in chapter 9A.20 RCW, RCW 9.92.010, the statute defining the
crime, or other statute defining the maximum penalty for a crime.
(42) "Total confinement" means confinement inside the physical
boundaries of a facility or institution operated or utilized under
contract by the state or any other unit of government for twenty-four
hours a day, or pursuant to RCW 72.64.050 and 72.64.060.
(43) "Transition training" means written and verbal instructions
and assistance provided by the department to the offender during the
two weeks prior to the offender's successful completion of the work
ethic camp program. The transition training shall include instructions
in the offender's requirements and obligations during the offender's
period of community custody.
(44) "Victim" means any person who has sustained emotional,
psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or property as
a direct result of the crime charged.
(45) "Violent offense" means:
(a) Any of the following felonies:
(i) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an
attempt to commit a class A felony;
(ii) Criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a
class A felony;
(iii) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(v) Indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion;
(vi) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(vii) Arson in the second degree;
(viii) Assault in the second degree;
(ix) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(x) Extortion in the first degree;
(xi) Robbery in the second degree;
(xii) Drive-by shooting;
(xiii) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving
of a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a
reckless manner; and
(xiv) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a violent
offense in (a) of this subsection; and
(c) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a violent
offense under (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(46) "Work crew" means a program of partial confinement consisting
of civic improvement tasks for the benefit of the community that
complies with RCW 9.94A.725.
(47) "Work ethic camp" means an alternative incarceration program
as provided in RCW 9.94A.690 designed to reduce recidivism and lower
the cost of corrections by requiring offenders to complete a
comprehensive array of real-world job and vocational experiences,
character-building work ethics training, life management skills
development, substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling, literacy
training, and basic adult education.
(48) "Work release" means a program of partial confinement
available to offenders who are employed or engaged as a student in a
regular course of study at school.

Sec. 5 RCW 9.94A.585 and 2000 c 28 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A sentence within the standard sentence range for the offense
shall not be appealed. For purposes of this section, a sentence
imposed on a first-time offender under RCW 9.94A.650 or on a youthful
offender under section 1 of this act shall also be deemed to be within
the standard sentence range for the offense and shall not be appealed.
(2) A sentence outside the standard sentence range for the offense
is subject to appeal by the defendant or the state. The appeal shall
be to the court of appeals in accordance with rules adopted by the
supreme court.
(3) Pending review of the sentence, the sentencing court or the
court of appeals may order the defendant confined or placed on
conditional release, including bond.
(4) To reverse a sentence which is outside the standard sentence
range, the reviewing court must find: (a) Either that the reasons
supplied by the sentencing court are not supported by the record which
was before the judge or that those reasons do not justify a sentence
outside the standard sentence range for that offense; or (b) that the
sentence imposed was clearly excessive or clearly too lenient.
(5) A review under this section shall be made solely upon the
record that was before the sentencing court. Written briefs shall not
be required and the review and decision shall be made in an expedited
manner according to rules adopted by the supreme court.
(6) The court of appeals shall issue a written opinion in support
of its decision whenever the judgment of the sentencing court is
reversed and may issue written opinions in any other case where the
court believes that a written opinion would provide guidance to
sentencing courts and others in implementing this chapter and in
developing a common law of sentencing within the state.
(7) The department may petition for a review of a sentence
committing an offender to the custody or jurisdiction of the
department. The review shall be limited to errors of law. Such
petition shall be filed with the court of appeals no later than ninety
days after the department has actual knowledge of terms of the
sentence. The petition shall include a certification by the department
that all reasonable efforts to resolve the dispute at the superior
court level have been exhausted.

Sec. 6 RCW 9.94A.585 and 2002 c 290 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A sentence within the standard sentence range, under RCW
9.94A.510 or 9.94A.517, for an offense shall not be appealed. For
purposes of this section, a sentence imposed on a first-time offender
under RCW 9.94A.650 or on a youthful offender under section 1 of this
act shall also be deemed to be within the standard sentence range for
the offense and shall not be appealed.
(2) A sentence outside the standard sentence range for the offense
is subject to appeal by the defendant or the state. The appeal shall
be to the court of appeals in accordance with rules adopted by the
supreme court.
(3) Pending review of the sentence, the sentencing court or the
court of appeals may order the defendant confined or placed on
conditional release, including bond.
(4) To reverse a sentence which is outside the standard sentence
range, the reviewing court must find: (a) Either that the reasons
supplied by the sentencing court are not supported by the record which
was before the judge or that those reasons do not justify a sentence
outside the standard sentence range for that offense; or (b) that the
sentence imposed was clearly excessive or clearly too lenient.
(5) A review under this section shall be made solely upon the
record that was before the sentencing court. Written briefs shall not
be required and the review and decision shall be made in an expedited
manner according to rules adopted by the supreme court.
(6) The court of appeals shall issue a written opinion in support
of its decision whenever the judgment of the sentencing court is
reversed and may issue written opinions in any other case where the
court believes that a written opinion would provide guidance to
sentencing courts and others in implementing this chapter and in
developing a common law of sentencing within the state.
(7) The department may petition for a review of a sentence
committing an offender to the custody or jurisdiction of the
department. The review shall be limited to errors of law. Such
petition shall be filed with the court of appeals no later than ninety
days after the department has actual knowledge of terms of the
sentence. The petition shall include a certification by the department
that all reasonable efforts to resolve the dispute at the superior
court level have been exhausted.

Sec. 7 RCW 13.40.300 and 2000 c 71 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In no case may a juvenile offender be committed by the juvenile
court to the department of social and health services for placement in
a juvenile correctional institution beyond the juvenile offender's
twenty-first birthday. A juvenile may be under the jurisdiction of the
juvenile court or the authority of the department of social and health
services beyond the juvenile's eighteenth birthday only if prior to the
juvenile's eighteenth birthday:
(a) Proceedings are pending seeking the adjudication of a juvenile
offense and the court by written order setting forth its reasons
extends jurisdiction of juvenile court over the juvenile beyond his or
her eighteenth birthday;
(b) The juvenile has been found guilty after a fact finding or
after a plea of guilty and an automatic extension is necessary to allow
for the imposition of disposition; ((or))
(c) Disposition has been held and an automatic extension is
necessary to allow for the execution and enforcement of the court's
order of disposition. If an order of disposition imposes commitment to
the department, then jurisdiction is automatically extended to include
a period of up to twelve months of parole, in no case extending beyond
the offender's twenty-first birthday; or
(d) The offender has been sentenced under section 1 of this act,
the youthful offender sentencing alternative.
(2) If the juvenile court previously has extended jurisdiction
beyond the juvenile offender's eighteenth birthday and that period of
extension has not expired, the court may further extend jurisdiction by
written order setting forth its reasons.
(3) In no event may the juvenile court have authority to extend
jurisdiction over any juvenile offender beyond the juvenile offender's
twenty-first birthday except for the purpose of enforcing an order of
restitution or penalty assessment.
(4) Notwithstanding any extension of jurisdiction over a person
pursuant to this section, the juvenile court has no jurisdiction over
any offenses alleged to have been committed by a person eighteen years
of age or older.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 2 and 5 of this act expire July 1,
2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 3 and 6 of this act take effect
July 1, 2004.

--- END ---