BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Licensee" means every insurance agent, broker, or solicitor
licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW.
(b) "Residential mortgage loan" means any loan primarily for
personal, family, or household use secured by a mortgage or deed of
trust on residential real estate upon which is constructed or intended
to be constructed a single-family dwelling or multiple family dwelling
of four or less units.
(c) "Single premium credit insurance" means credit insurance
purchased with a single premium payment at inception of coverage.
(2) An insurer or licensee may not issue or sell any single premium
credit insurance product in connection with a residential mortgage loan
unless:
(a) The term of the single premium credit insurance policy is the
same as the term of the loan;
(b) The debtor is given the option to buy credit insurance paid
with monthly premiums; and
(c) The single premium credit insurance policy provides for a full
refund of premiums to the debtor if the credit insurance is canceled
within sixty days of the date of the loan.
(3) This section does not apply to residential mortgage loans if:
(a) The loan amount does not exceed ten thousand dollars, exclusive
of fees;
(b) The repayment term of the loan does not exceed five years; and
(c) The term of the single premium credit insurance does not exceed
the repayment term of the loan.

--- END ---