BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the state of Washington
to protect the public against the serious health and safety risks that
dangerous wild animals pose to the community.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) "Animal control authority" means an
entity acting alone or in concert with other local governmental units
for enforcement of the animal control laws of the city, county, and
state and the shelter and welfare of animals.
(2) "Potentially dangerous wild animal" means one of the following
types of animals, whether bred in the wild or in captivity, and any or
all hybrids thereof, which is capable of inflicting serious or fatal
injuries:
(a) Class mammalia
(i) Order carnivora
(A) Family felidae, only lions, tigers, captive-bred cougars,
jaguars, cheetahs, and leopards;
(B) Family canidae, only wolves;
(C) Family ursidae, all bears;
(D) Family hyaenidae, such as hyenas;
(ii) Order perissodactyla, only rhinoceroses;
(iii) Order primates, such as lemurs, monkeys, chimpanzees, and
gorillas;
(iv) Order proboscidae, such as elephants;
(b) Class reptilia
(i) Order squamata
(A) Family varanidae, only water monitors and crocodile monitors;
(B) All venomous species, such as boomslangs, African twig snakes,
coral snakes, cobras, mambas, keelback snakes, copperheads,
cottonmouths, and rattlesnakes; and
(ii) Order crocodilia, such as crocodiles, alligators, caimans, and
gavials.
(3) "Person" means any individual, partnership, corporation,
organization, trade or professional association, firm, limited
liability company, joint venture, association, trust, estate, or any
other legal entity, and any officer, member, shareholder, director,
employee, agent, or representative thereof.
(4) "Possessor" means any person who owns, possesses, keeps,
harbors, brings into the state, or has custody or control of a
potentially dangerous wild animal.
(5) "Wildlife sanctuary" means a nonprofit organization as
described in RCW 84.36.800, that operates a place of refuge where
abused, neglected, unwanted, impounded, abandoned, orphaned, or
displaced animals are provided care for their lifetime or released back
to their natural habitat and, with respect to any animal owned by the
organization, does not:
(a) Conduct any activity that is not inherent to the animal's
nature, natural conduct, or the animal in its natural habitat;
(b) Use the animal for any type of entertainment;
(c) Sell, trade, or barter the animal or the animal's body parts;
or
(d) Breed the animal for any purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The provisions of this chapter do not
apply to:
(a) Institutions authorized by the Washington department of fish
and wildlife to hold, possess, and propagate deleterious exotic
wildlife pursuant to RCW 77.12.047, such as zoos and aquariums
accredited by the American zoo and aquarium association;
(b) Duly incorporated nonprofit animal protection organizations,
such as humane societies and shelters, housing an animal at the written
request of the animal control authority or acting under the authority
of this chapter;
(c) Animal control officers, law enforcement agents, or county
sheriffs acting under the authority of this chapter;
(d) Licensed veterinary hospitals or clinics;
(e) A holder of a valid wildlife rehabilitation permit issued by
the Washington department of fish and wildlife;
(f) Any wildlife sanctuary;
(g) Any licensed or accredited research or medical institution;
(h) Any licensed or accredited educational institution;
(i) Any lawfully operated circus or rodeo;
(j) An individual who is in possession of a monkey that has been
obtained through and trained by a licensed and accredited nonprofit
organization dedicated to improving the quality of lives for
quadriplegic individuals;
(k) A person temporarily transporting and displaying a potentially
dangerous wild animal through the state if the transit time is not more
than twenty-one days and the animal is at all times maintained within
a confinement sufficient to prevent the animal from escaping;
(l) Domesticated animals subject to this title or native wildlife
subject to Title 77 RCW; and
(m) A person displaying animals at a fair approved by the
Washington department of agriculture pursuant to chapter 15.76 or 36.37
RCW.
(2) This chapter does not require a city or county that does not
have an animal control authority to create that office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A person shall not own, possess, keep,
harbor, bring into the state, or have custody or control of a
potentially dangerous wild animal, except as provided in subsection (3)
of this section.
(2) A person shall not breed a potentially dangerous wild animal.
(3) A person in legal possession of a potentially dangerous wild
animal prior to the effective date of this act and who is the legal
possessor of the animal may keep possession of the animal until July 1,
2009. The person must maintain veterinary records, acquisition papers
for the animal, if available, or other documents or records that
establish that the person possessed the animal prior to the effective
date of this act. The person shall have the burden of proving that he
or she possessed the animal prior to the effective date of this act.
(4) A person who possesses a potentially dangerous wild animal as
allowed under subsection (3) of this section may, prior to July 1,
2009, apply to the animal control authority for permission to maintain
possession of the animal after July 1, 2009. The animal control
authority may allow the possessor to maintain possession of the animal
for a time period determined by the animal control authority and under
conditions specified by the animal control authority. The animal
control authority shall not unreasonably deny permission for a person
to maintain possession of a potentially dangerous wild animal after
July 1, 2009, if the person has proper documentation establishing that
the potentially dangerous wild animal was lawfully possessed by the
person prior to the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The animal control authority may
immediately confiscate a potentially dangerous wild animal if:
(a) The animal is possessed after July 1, 2009, and the possessor
has not been granted permission to maintain possession after July 1,
2009, as allowed under section 4 of this act; or
(b) The animal control authority has probable cause to believe that
the animal was acquired after the effective date of this act in
violation of section 4 of this act.
(2) A potentially dangerous wild animal that is confiscated under
this section may be returned to the possessor only if the animal
control authority establishes that the possessor had possession of the
animal prior to the effective date of this act and if the return of the
animal does not violate section 4 of this act.
(3) The animal control authority shall serve notice upon the
possessor in person or by regular and certified mail, return receipt
requested, notifying the possessor of the confiscation, that the
possessor is responsible for payment of reasonable costs for caring and
providing for the animal during the confiscation, and that the
possessor must meet the requirements of subsection (2) of this section
in order for the animal to be returned to the possessor.
(4) If a potentially dangerous wild animal confiscated under this
section is not returned to the possessor, the animal control authority
may release the animal to a facility such as a wildlife sanctuary, zoo,
or aquarium. If the animal control authority is unable to relocate the
animal within a reasonable period of time, it may euthanize the animal.
(5) An animal control authority may euthanize a potentially
dangerous wild animal under this section only if all other reasonable
placement options, including relocation to a wildlife sanctuary, zoo,
or aquarium, are unavailable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A city or county may adopt an ordinance
governing potentially dangerous wild animals that is more restrictive
than this chapter. However, nothing in this chapter requires a city or
county to adopt an ordinance to be in compliance with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A person who acquires possession of a
potentially dangerous wild animal after the effective date of this act,
or who possesses a potentially dangerous wild animal after July 1,
2009, in violation of section 4 of this act, is liable for a civil
penalty of not less than two hundred dollars and not more than two
thousand dollars for each animal with respect to which there is a
violation and for each day the violation continues.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The animal control authority and its staff
and agents, local law enforcement agents, and county sheriffs are
authorized and empowered to enforce the provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 16 RCW.

--- END ---