BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 40.14.025 and 1996 c 245 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary of state and the director of financial management
shall jointly establish a procedure and formula for allocating the
costs of services provided by the division of archives and records
management to state agencies. The total amount allotted for services
to state agencies shall not exceed the appropriation to the archives
and records management account during any allotment period.
(([(2)])) (2) There is created the archives and records management
account in the state treasury which shall consist of all fees and
charges collected under this section((, RCW 36.22.175, and 40.14.027)).
The account shall be appropriated exclusively for the payment of costs
and expenses incurred in the operation of the division of archives and
records management as specified by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
The imaging account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All receipts collected under RCW 40.14.020(8) for contract
imaging, micrographics, reproduction, and duplication services provided
by the division of archives and records management must be deposited
into the account and expenditures from the account may be used only for
these purposes. Only the secretary of state or the secretary's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
The local government archives account is created in the custody of
the state treasurer. All receipts collected by the county auditors
under RCW 40.14.027 and 36.22.175 for local government services, such
as providing records scheduling, security microfilm inspection and
storage, archival preservation, cataloging, and indexing for local
government records and digital data and access to those records and
data through the regional branch archives of the division of archives
and records management, must be deposited into the account and
expenditures from the account may be used only for these purposes.
Only the secretary of state or the secretary's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures. However, all fees collected under RCW
36.22.175(3) may be spent only by appropriation.

Sec. 4 RCW 40.14.027 and 2001 c 146 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
State agencies shall collect a surcharge of twenty dollars from the
judgment debtor upon the satisfaction of a warrant filed in superior
court for unpaid taxes or liabilities. The surcharge is imposed on the
judgment debtor in the form of a penalty in addition to the filing fee
provided in RCW 36.18.012(10). The surcharge revenue shall be
transmitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the archives and
records management account.
Surcharge revenue deposited in the local government archives ((and
records management)) account under section 3 of this act shall be
expended by the secretary of state exclusively for disaster recovery,
essential records protection services, and records management training
for local government agencies by the division of archives and records
management. The secretary of state shall, with local government
representatives, establish a committee to advise the state archivist on
the local government archives and records management program.

Sec. 5 RCW 36.22.175 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to any other charge authorized by law, the county
auditor shall charge a surcharge of one dollar per instrument for each
document recorded. Revenue generated through this surcharge shall be
transmitted monthly to the state treasurer for deposit in the local
government archives ((and records management)) account under section 3
of this act. These funds shall be used solely for providing records
scheduling, security microfilm inspection and storage, archival
preservation, cataloging, and indexing for local government records and
digital data and access to those records and data through the regional
branch archives of the division of archives and records management.
The division of archives and records management within the office
of the secretary of state shall provide records management training for
local governments and shall establish a competitive grant program to
solicit and prioritize project proposals from local governments for
potential funding to be paid for by funds from the auditor surcharge
and tax warrant surcharge revenues. Application for specific projects
may be made by local government agencies only. The state archivist in
consultation with the advisory committee established under RCW
40.14.027 shall adopt rules governing project eligibility, evaluation,
awarding of grants, and other criteria including requirements for
records management training for grant recipients.
(2) The advisory committee established under RCW 40.14.027 shall
review grant proposals and establish a prioritized list of projects to
be considered for funding by January 1st of each even-numbered year,
beginning in 2002. The evaluation of proposals and development of the
prioritized list must be developed through open public meetings.
Funding for projects shall be granted according to the ranking of each
application on the prioritized list and projects will be funded only to
the extent that funds are available. A grant award may have an
effective date other than the date the project is placed on the
prioritized list.
(3) In addition to any other surcharge authorized by law, the
county auditor shall charge a surcharge of one dollar per instrument
for every document recorded after January 1, 2002. Revenue generated
through this surcharge shall be transmitted to the state treasurer
monthly for deposit in the local government archives ((and records
management)) account under section 3 of this act to be used exclusively
for the construction and improvement of a specialized regional facility
located in eastern Washington designed to serve the archives, records
management, and digital data management needs of local government.
To the extent the facilities are used for the storage and retrieval
of state agency records and digital data, that portion of the
construction of such facilities used for state government records and
data shall be supported by other charges and fees paid by state
agencies and shall not be supported by the surcharge authorized in this
subsection.
At such time that all debt service from construction on such
facility has been paid, fifty percent of the surcharge authorized by
this subsection shall be reverted to the centennial document
preservation and modernization account as prescribed in RCW 36.22.170
and fifty percent of the surcharge authorized by this section shall be
reverted to the state treasurer for deposit in the archives and records
management account to serve the archives, records management, and
digital data management needs of local government.

--- END ---