BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.07 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary of state may solicit and accept gifts, grants,
conveyances, bequests, and devises of real or personal property, or
both, in trust or otherwise, and sell, lease, exchange, invest, or
expend these donations or the proceeds, rents, profits, and income from
the donations except as limited by the donor's terms.
(2) Moneys received under this section may be used only for the
following purposes:
(a) Conducting oral histories;
(b) Archival activities; and
(c) Washington state library activities.
(3) Moneys received under this section must be deposited in the
oral history, state library, and archives account established in
section 2 of this act.
(4) The secretary of state shall adopt rules to govern and protect
the receipt and expenditure of the proceeds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.07 RCW
to read as follows:
The oral history, state library, and archives account is created in
the custody of the state treasurer. All moneys received under section
1 of this act must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the
account may be made only for the purposes of the oral history program
under RCW 43.07.220, archives program under RCW 40.14.020, and state
library program under chapter 27.04 RCW. Only the secretary of state
or the secretary of state's designee may authorize expenditures from
the account. An appropriation is not required for expenditures, but
the account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 42.17.710 and 1993 c 2 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) During the period beginning on the thirtieth day before the
date a regular legislative session convenes and continuing thirty days
past the date of final adjournment, and during the period beginning on
the date a special legislative session convenes and continuing through
the date that session adjourns, no state official or a person employed
by or acting on behalf of a state official or state legislator may
solicit or accept contributions to a public office fund, to a candidate
or authorized committee, or to retire a campaign debt.
(2) This section does not apply to activities authorized in section
1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 42.52 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not prohibit the secretary of state or a designee
from soliciting and accepting contributions to the oral history, state
library, and archives account created in section 2 of this act.

--- END ---