BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29.33.041 and 1990 c 59 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary of state shall inspect, evaluate, ((and publicly))
test, and hold a public demonstration of all voting systems or
components of voting systems that are submitted for review under RCW
29.33.051. The secretary of state shall determine whether the voting
systems conform with all of the requirements of this title, the
applicable rules adopted in accordance with this title, and with
generally accepted safety requirements. The secretary of state shall
also determine whether the voting systems accommodate ranked voting.
The secretary of state shall post the report of certification to a
publicly available electronic medium and transmit a ((copy of the
report of any)) notice of the examination ((under this section)),
within thirty days after completing the examination, to the county
auditor of each county.

Sec. 2 RCW 29.33.081 and 1990 c 59 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
((If)) Only voting systems or devices or vote tallying systems
((are to)) that have been approved by the secretary of state may be
used for conducting a primary or election((, only those that have the
approval of the secretary of state or had been approved under this
chapter or chapter 29.34 RCW before March 22, 1982, may be used)). Any
modification, change, or improvement to any voting system or component
of a system ((that)) must be submitted to the secretary of state for
review. After review, the modification may be accepted if it does not
impair ((its)) system accuracy, efficiency, or capacity or extend
((its)) system function((, may be made without)). If, after review,
the secretary of state determines that the modification does impair
system accuracy, efficiency, or capacity or extend system function, the
modification must be submitted for reexamination or reapproval by the
secretary of state under RCW 29.33.041.

Sec. 3 RCW 29.33.130 and 1990 c 59 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
The county auditor of a county in which voting systems are used is
responsible for the preparation, maintenance, and operation of those
systems, and must provide proof that the system and its component
software, in the version used, are state certified. The auditor may
employ and direct persons to perform some or all of these functions.

Sec. 4 RCW 29.33.145 and 1998 c 58 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
An agreement to purchase or lease a voting system or a component of
a voting system is subject to that system or component passing an
acceptance test, conducted by the county auditor as purchaser or
lessee, sufficient to demonstrate that the equipment is the same as
that certified by the secretary of state and that the equipment is
operating correctly as delivered to the county.

Sec. 5 RCW
29.33.300 and 1990 c 59 s 26 are each amended to read
as follows:
No voting device ((shall)) may be approved by the secretary of
state unless it:
(1) Secures to the voter secrecy in the act of voting;
(2) Permits the voter to vote for any person for any office and
upon any measure that he or she has the right to vote for;
(3) Permits the voter to vote for all the candidates of one party
or in part for the candidates of one or more other parties;
(4) Correctly registers all votes cast for any and all persons and
for or against any and all measures;
(5) Provides that a vote for more than one candidate cannot be cast
by one single operation of the voting device or vote tally system
except when voting for president and vice-president of the United
States; and
(6) Except for functions or capabilities unique to this state, has
been tested((, certified, and used in at least one other state or
election jurisdiction)) and approved by the appropriate independent
testing authority approved by the federal elections commission or its
statutory successor.

Sec. 6 RCW 29.33.310 and 1990 c 59 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ballot ((on a single voting device shall)) displayed to a voter
may not contain the names of candidates for the offices of United
States representative, state senator, state representative, county
council, or county commissioner in more than one district. ((In all
general elections, primaries, and special elections, in each polling
place the voting devices containing ballots for candidates from each
congressional, legislative, or county council or commissioner district
shall be grouped together and physically separated from those devices
containing ballots for other districts. Each voter shall be directed
by the precinct election officers to the correct group of voting
devices.))

Sec. 7 RCW 29.33.320 and 1990 c 59 s 28 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary of state shall not approve a vote tallying system
unless it:
(1) Correctly counts votes on ballots on which the proper number of
votes have been marked for any office or issue;
(2) Ignores votes marked for any office or issue where more than
the allowable number of votes have been marked, but correctly counts
the properly voted portions of the ballot;
(3) Accumulates a count of the specific number of ballots tallied
for each precinct, total votes by candidate for each office, and total
votes for and against each issue of the ballot in that precinct;
(4) Accommodates rotation of candidates' names on the ballot under
RCW 29.30.040;
(5) Produces precinct and cumulative totals in printed form; and
(6) Except for functions or capabilities unique to this state, has
been tested((, certified, and used in at least one other state or
election jurisdiction)) and approved by the appropriate independent
testing authority approved by the federal elections commission or its
statutory successor.

Sec. 8 RCW 29.33.330 and 1990 c 59 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
In preparing a voting device for a primary or election, a record
((shall)) must be made of the ballot format installed in each device
and the precincts or portion of a precinct for which that device has
been prepared. Except where provided by a rule adopted under RCW
29.04.210, after being prepared for a primary or election, each device
((shall)) must be sealed with a uniquely numbered seal and provided to
the inspector of the appropriate polling place.

Sec. 9 RCW 29.33.350 and 1998 c 58 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
At least three days before each state primary or general election,
the office of the secretary of state shall provide for the conduct of
tests of the programming for each vote tallying system to be used at
that primary or general election. The test must verify that the system
will correctly count the vote cast for all candidates and on all
measures appearing on the ballot at that primary or general election.
The office of the secretary of state shall adopt rules specifying the
manner of conducting these programming tests. The test ((shall)) must
verify the capability of the vote tallying system to perform all of the
functions that can reasonably be expected to occur during conduct of
that particular primary or election. If any error is detected, the
cause ((shall)) must be determined and corrected, and an errorless
total ((shall)) must be produced before the primary or election.
Such tests ((shall)) must be observed by at least one
representative from each major political party, if representatives have
been appointed by the respective major political parties and are
present at the test, and ((shall)) must be open to candidates, the
press, and the public. The county auditor and any political party
observers shall certify that the test has been conducted in accordance
with this section. The county auditor shall provide proof that the
version of the voting system and software used are state certified.
Copies of ((this)) these certifications ((shall)) must be retained by
the secretary of state and the county auditor. All programming
materials, test results, and test ballots ((shall)) must be securely
((sealed)) stored until the day of the primary or general election.

Sec. 10 RCW 29.04.200 and 1998 c 245 s 26 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((Beginning January 1, 1993,)) No voting device or machine may
be used ((in a county with a population of seventy thousand or more))
to conduct a primary or general or special election in this state
unless it correctly records on a separate ballot the votes cast by each
elector for any person and for or against any measure and such separate
ballots are available for audit purposes after such a primary or
election.
(2) ((Beginning January 1, 1993,)) The secretary of state shall not
certify under this title any voting device or machine ((for use in
conducting)) to conduct a primary or general or special election in
this state ((unless the device or machine correctly records on a
separate ballot the votes cast by each elector for any person and for
or against any measure and such separate ballots are available for
audit purposes after such a primary or election)) that uses punched
holes to record the voter's choices.
(((3) Beginning January 1, 1993, a county with a population of less
than seventy thousand may use a voting machine or device for conducting
a primary or general or special election which does not record on a
separate ballot, available for audit purposes after the primary or
election, the votes cast by each elector for any person and for or
against any measure if:
(a) The device was certified under this title before January 1,
1993, for use in this state;
(b) The device otherwise satisfies the requirements of this title;
and
(c) Not more than twenty percent of the votes cast during any
primary or general or special election conducted after January 1, 1998,
in the county are cast using such a machine or device.
(4) The purpose of subsection (3) of this section is to permit less
populous counties to replace voting equipment in stages over several
years. These less populous counties are, nonetheless, encouraged to
secure as expeditiously as possible voting equipment which would
satisfy the requirements of subsection (1) of this section established
for more populous counties.))

Sec. 11 RCW 29.04.200 and 2003 c ... s 10 (section 10 of this
act) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) No voting device or machine may be used to conduct a primary or
general or special election in this state unless it correctly records
on a separate ballot the votes cast by each elector for any person and
for or against any measure and such separate ballots are available for
audit purposes after such a primary or election.
(2) The secretary of state shall not certify under this title any
voting device or machine to conduct a primary or general or special
election in this state that uses punched holes to record the voter's
choices.
(3) Beginning January 1, 2006, no voting device or machine that
uses punched holes to record the voter's choices may be used to conduct
a primary or general or special election in this state.

Sec. 12 RCW 29.85.051 and 1991 c 81 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor who knowingly:
(1) Deceives any voter in recording his or her vote by providing
incorrect or misleading recording information or by providing faulty
election equipment or records; ((or))
(2) Records the vote of any voter in a manner other than as
designated by the voter; or
(3) Commits either of the acts under subsection (1) or (2) of this
section by electronic means.
Such a gross misdemeanor is punishable to the same extent as a
gross misdemeanor that is punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 29.85 RCW
to read as follows:
A person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable under chapter
9A.20 RCW who knowingly:
(1) Tampers with or impedes the use of any form of electronic
voting or vote recording system; or
(2) Tampers with or impedes access to a vote reporting or election
results reporting system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Section 11 of this act takes effect once
the state receives funding from the federal government to replace
voting systems and vote tallying equipment as required in Public Law
107-252 (October 29, 2002), known as the "Help America Vote Act of
2002," including any amounts received under subsequent amendments to
the act. If federal funding is not provided by January 1, 2005,
section 11 of this act is void in its entirety.

--- END ---