BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
2003-05 BIENNIUM
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The transportation budget of the state
is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth, the several
amounts specified, or as much thereof as may be necessary to accomplish
the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated from the several
accounts and funds named to the designated state agencies and offices
for employee compensation and other expenses, for capital projects, and
for other specified purposes, including the payment of any final
judgments arising out of such activities, for the period ending June
30, 2005.
(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this act.
(a) "Fiscal year 2004" or "FY 2004" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2004.
(b) "Fiscal year 2005" or "FY 2005" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2005.
(c) "FTE" means full-time equivalent.
(d) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an
unappropriated status.
(e) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only
for the specified purpose.

GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES--OPERATING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION
COMMISSION
Grade Crossing Protective Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $293,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 FOR THE MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $352,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $822,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The entire appropriation in this section
is provided solely for road maintenance purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $315,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The entire appropriation is provided
solely for costs associated with the motor fuel quality program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW
COMMITTEE--OPERATING PROGRAM
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,429,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $1,429,000 is provided for the joint
legislative audit and review committee to conduct full performance
audits of transportation agencies and departments under Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5748, House Bill No. 1121, or House Bill No. 2227. In
addition to the audits identified in these bills, the joint legislative
audit and review committee shall conduct a targeted performance audit
of the Washington state patrol. For this performance audit, the joint
legislative audit and review committee shall put its highest priority
on the following topics: (1) An assessment of the types and categories
of services, including a contrast of public highway policing and
general policing services provided by the patrol, and the
organizational structures used to deliver these services; (2) an
evaluation of the linkages among expenditures, including a
differentiation between transportation and general fund sources to
insure appropriate funding allocations, organizational structures,
service delivery, accountability, and outcomes; and (3) an evaluation
of the patrol's fiscal policies and procedures. The joint legislative
audit and review committee shall provide a progress report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2003, and a
final report, including findings and recommendations, by September 30,
2004. If neither Substitute Senate Bill No. 5748, House Bill No. 1121,
or House Bill No. 2227 is enacted by August 1, 2003, this section is
null and void.

GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES--CAPITAL
NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 FOR WASHINGTON STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION -- CAPITAL PROJECTS
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The motor vehicle account -- state
appropriation is a one-time reappropriation and is provided solely for
the Beacon Rock state park entrance road project. Any of the
appropriations not expended by June 30, 2005, shall revert to the motor
vehicle account -- state.

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES--OPERATING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 FOR THE WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY
COMMISSION
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,174,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,744,000
School Zone Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,059,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,977,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The commission may oversee up to four pilot projects
implementing the use of traffic safety cameras to detect speeding, and
violations at railroad crossings and stoplights.
(a) In order to ensure adequate time in the 2003-05 biennium to
evaluate the effectiveness of the pilot program, any projects
authorized by the commission must be authorized by December 31, 2003.
(b) If a county or city has established an authorized automated
traffic safety camera program under this section, the compensation paid
to the manufacturer or vendor of the equipment used must be based only
upon the value of the equipment and services provided or rendered in
support of the system, and may not be based upon a portion of the fine
or civil penalty imposed or the revenue generated by the equipment.
(c) The traffic safety commission shall use the following
guidelines to administer the program:
(i) Traffic safety cameras may take pictures of the vehicle and
vehicle license plate only, and only while an infraction is occurring;
(ii) The law enforcement agency of the city or county government
shall plainly mark the locations where the automated traffic
enforcement system is used by placing signs on street locations that
clearly indicate to a driver that he or she is entering a zone where
traffic laws are enforced by an automated traffic enforcement system;
(iii) Cities and counties using traffic safety cameras must provide
periodic notice by mail to its citizens indicating the zones in which
the traffic safety cameras will be used;
(iv) Notices of infractions must be mailed to the registered owner
of a vehicle within fourteen days of the infraction occurring;
(v) The owner of the vehicle is not responsible for the violation
if the owner of the vehicle, within fourteen days of receiving
notification of the violation, mails to the issuing law enforcement
agency, a declaration under penalty of perjury, stating that the
vehicle involved was, at the time, stolen or in the care, custody, or
control of some person other than the registered owner, or any other
extenuating circumstances;
(vi) Infractions detected through the use of traffic safety cameras
are not part of the registered owner's driving record under RCW
46.52.101 and 46.52.120;
(vii) If a notice of infraction is sent to the registered owner and
the registered owner is a rental car business, the infraction will be
dismissed against the business if it mails to the issuing agency,
within fourteen days of receiving the notice, a declaration under
penalty of perjury of the name and known mailing address of the
individual driving or renting the vehicle when the infraction occurred.
If the business is unable to determine who was driving or renting the
vehicle at the time the infraction occurred, the business must sign a
declaration under penalty of perjury to this effect. The declaration
must be mailed to the issuing agency within fourteen days of receiving
the notice of traffic infraction. Timely mailing of this declaration
to the issuing agency relieves a rental car business of any liability
under this section for the notice of infraction. A declaration form
suitable for this purpose must be included with each automated traffic
infraction notice issued, along with instructions for its completion
and use;
(viii) For purposes of the pilot projects, infractions generated by
the use of traffic safety cameras will be exempt from the provisions of
RCW 3.50.100 and will be processed in the same manner as parking
violations; and
(ix) By June 30, 2005, the traffic safety commission shall provide
a report to the legislature regarding the use, public acceptance,
outcomes, and other relevant issues regarding traffic safety cameras
demonstrated by the pilot projects.
(2) $1,555,000 of the school zone safety account--state
appropriation is provided as matching funds for the following school
safety enhancement projects, as proposed by local agencies, schools,
and tribal governments in response to the department of
transportation's highways and local programs request for information
for potential projects to be financed under Referendum No. 51:

Agency Project Title

Cheney School Crosswalk Improvement Project

Skokomish Indian Tribe Skokomish School Safety Sidewalk Program

Brier 37th Pl SW & 233rd Pl SW Sidewalk

Sunnyside Lincoln Ave Sidewalks

Lynnwood Olympic View Dr - 76th Ave SW to 169th St SW

Steilacoom Cherrydale Elementary School Safety Enhancement

Yakima W Valley School Zone Flashers

Camas SD SR 500 at 15th St Interchange

Seattle Meadowbrook Playfield - NE 105th St

Vancouver Franklin ES Sidewalk Improvements

(3) If one or more of the projects under subsection (1) of this
section cannot be completed or no longer seeks state matching funds,
the following projects may be substituted in order of priority:

Agency Project Title

Davenport Davenport Sixth St School Sidewalk

Edmonds 96th Ave W Pedestrian Improvements

Mountlake Terrace 223rd St SW - 44th Ave W to Cedar Way Elementary

Yakima Englewood/Powerhouse Intersection Safety Project

(4) The highways and local programs division within the department
of transportation must provide assistance to the commission in
administering this program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 FOR THE BOARD OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERS
Pilotage Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $272,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 FOR THE LEGISLATIVE TRANSPORTATION
COMMITTEE
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $774,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) No funding is provided for the staffing, administration and
operations of the house of representatives transportation committee.
Existing staff assigned to the house of representatives transportation
committee shall be transferred to the house of representatives in the
office of program research. All tangible and intangible property that
has been acquired by, or allocated for use by the house of
representatives transportation committee and its staff, including but
not limited to office space and equipment, information systems
technology, and employer-related assets, rights, privileges, and
liabilities shall be transferred to the house of representatives. Any
property acquired by, or allocated for use by the senate transportation
committee and its staff shall be transferred to the senate.
(2) The legislative transportation committee shall develop and
adopt an interim work plan that identifies tasks, resources available
to carry out the work plan, deliverables or desired outcomes, and a
timeline for completing the interim work plan. The following subjects
shall be given consideration for that work plan:
(a) A review of the costs to the state of allowing citizens to use
credit cards to pay for licensing services, and to explore options for
lowering these costs; and
(b) An analysis of the causal relationship between distracted
drivers and traffic safety, and whether legislation would be beneficial
in reducing accidents or fatalities attributable to distracted drivers.
If legislation is warranted, draft legislation must be submitted prior
to the 2004 legislative session.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 FOR THE TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $391,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided for the commission
only through June 30, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 FOR THE FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC
INVESTMENT BOARD
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $616,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD--OPERATING PROGRAM
Rural Arterial Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $769,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,927,000
County Arterial Preservation Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $719,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,415,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD--OPERATING PROGRAM
Urban Arterial Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,611,000
Transportation Improvement Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,620,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,231,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- FIELD
OPERATIONS BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $170,170,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,167,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $175,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $176,512,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The Washington state patrol shall evaluate
the costs and benefits of retaining the agency's Beechjet aircraft as
an internal asset or selling it to a private air service provider.
This analysis must consider that any potential sale of the aircraft
include an agreement that the state reserves the right to priority
access to the jet in the event of an emergency. The state patrol must
report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by December 15,
2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- SUPPORT
SERVICES BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $72,727,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,290,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,017,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The authority to expend $542,000 of the
state highway account--state appropriation is subject to receipt of
$1,620,000 in interoperability funding from the military department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING --
MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $85,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $77,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,315,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,639,000
DOL Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $107,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,230,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- INFORMATION SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $126,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,339,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,521,000
DOL Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $637,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,689,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- VEHICLE
SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $585,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,404,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
DOL Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,130,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,479,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- DRIVER
SERVICES
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,576,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $86,016,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $254,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $88,846,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY -- PROGRAM C
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,196,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,163,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,898,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $363,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,620,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $250,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely to retain an external consultant to provide an
assessment of the department's review of current major information
technology systems and planning for system and application
modernization. The consultant shall also work with the department to
prepare an application modernization strategy and preliminary project
plan. The department must provide a report on their proposed
application modernization plan to the transportation committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2004.
(2) The department shall work with the office of financial
management and the department of information services to ensure that
(a) the department's current and future system development is
consistent with the overall direction of other key state systems; and
(b) when possible, common statewide information systems are used or
developed to encourage coordination and integration of information used
by the department and other state agencies and to avoid duplication.
(3) $2,150,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
and $2,150,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation are
reappropriated and provided solely for implementation of a new revenue
collection system, including the integration of the regional fare
coordination system (smart card), at the Washington state ferries.
Each December, annual updates are to be provided to the transportation
committees of the legislature concerning the status of implementing and
completing this project, with updates concluding the first December
after full project implementation.
(4) The department will contract with the department of information
services to conduct a survey that identifies possible opportunities and
benefits associated with siting and use of technology and wireless
facilities located on state right of way authorized by RCW 47.60.140.
A report will be made to the appropriate legislative committees by
December 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 215 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS AND CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM D -- OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,048,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 216 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- AVIATION -- PROGRAM F
Aeronautics Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,986,000
Aircraft Search and Rescue Safety and Education
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $160,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,146,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $1,300,000 of the aeronautics account--state appropriation is provided solely for additional preservation
grants to airports. Funding is constrained to additional excise and/or
fuel tax generated as a result of Senate Bill No. 5392. If Senate Bill
No. 5392 is not enacted by June 30, 2003, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 217 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT -- PROGRAM H
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,710,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,110,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $14,310,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the staffing, activities, and overhead of the
department's environmental affairs office. This funding is provided in
lieu of program funding in sections 305 and 306 of this act.
(2) $3,100,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the staffing and activities of the transportation
permit efficiency and accountability committee. If neither Senate Bill
No. 5279 or House Bill No. 2214 become law by June 30, 2003, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 218 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS--PROGRAM K
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,176,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 219 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM M
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $287,177,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,426,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,253,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $292,856,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) If portions of the appropriations in this section are required
to fund maintenance work resulting from major disasters not covered by
federal emergency funds such as fire, flooding, and major slides,
supplemental appropriations will be requested to restore state funding
for ongoing maintenance activities.
(2) The department shall request an unanticipated receipt for any
federal moneys received for emergency snow and ice removal and shall
place an equal amount of the motor vehicle account -- state into
unallotted status. This exchange shall not affect the amount of
funding available for snow and ice removal.
(3) The department shall request an unanticipated receipt for any
private or local funds received for reimbursements of third party
damages that are in excess of the motor vehicle account--private/local
appropriation. The department shall place an equal amount of the motor
vehicle account--state appropriation into reserve.
(4) Funding is provided for maintenance on the state system to
allow for a continuation of the level of service targets included in
the 2001-03 biennium. In delivering the program, the department should
concentrate on the following areas:
(a) Meeting or exceeding the target for structural bridge repair on
a statewide basis;
(b) Eliminating the number of activities delivered in the "f" level
of service at the region level;
(c) Reducing the number of activities delivered in the "d" level of
service by increasing the resources directed to those activities on a
statewide and region basis; and
(d) Evaluating, analyzing, and potentially redistributing resources
within and among regions to provide greater consistency in delivering
the program statewide and in achieving overall level of service
targets.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 220 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q -- OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,869,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,994,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $4,960,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for continuing the expanded incident response program
begun in the 2001-2003 biennium. The department and the Washington
state patrol shall continue to consult and coordinate with private
sector partners, such as towing companies, media, auto, insurance and
trucking associations, and the legislative transportation committee to
ensure that limited state resources are used most effectively. No
funds shall be used to purchase tow trucks.
(2) The department will implement the motorist information sign
program and shall not contract with private providers to provide the
service. The department is required to charge fees sufficient to
recover the costs of providing and maintaining the signs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 221 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT -- PROGRAM S
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,553,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $636,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,093,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $973,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,255,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 222 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH -- PROGRAM T
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,665,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,778,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,021,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,464,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,940,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely to process and analyze all citizen, city, county, and
state highway collision reports.
(2) Funds provided to the department in accordance with RCW
46.68.110(2) and 46.68.120(3) may be used by the department to support
the processing and analysis of city and county collision reports.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 223 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES -- PROGRAM U
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,922,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $35,595,000 of the motor vehicle fund--state appropriation is
provided solely for the liabilities attributable to the department of
transportation. This includes one fiscal year's amount of the
requested increase in self-insurance premiums. The office of financial
management must provide a detailed accounting of the revenues and
expenditures of the self-insurance fund to the transportation
committees of the legislature on December 31st and June 30th of each
year.
(2) Payments in this section represent charges from other state
agencies to the department of transportation.
(a) FOR PAYMENT OF OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT DIVISION OF RISK
MANAGEMENT FEES . . . . . . . . . . . . $989,000
(b) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE OFFICE OF
THE STATE AUDITOR . . . . . . . . . . . . $823,000
(c) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
FACILITIES AND SERVICES AND CONSOLIDATED MAIL SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,850,000
(d) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE
DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,252,000
(e) FOR PAYMENT OF SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY PREMIUMS AND
ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,639,000
(f) FOR PAYMENT OF THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION CAPITAL
PROJECTS SURCHARGE . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,846,000
(g) FOR ARCHIVES AND RECORDS MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . $523,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 224 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM V
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,528,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,529,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,574,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $155,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,786,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $4,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a grant program for nonprofit
providers of transportation for persons with special transportation
needs. The priority in use of these moneys shall be to provide
additional service. Grants may be for capital purposes as long as
additional service is provided or to maintain service which otherwise
may be terminated. Grant criteria shall also be based on need,
including the availability of other providers of service in the area,
efforts to coordinate trips among providers and riders, and the cost
effectiveness of trips provided.
(2) $1,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants to implement section 9 of
House Bill No. 2228. In administering grants, the department shall
give priority to programs providing the greatest reduction in trips and
commute miles and to the level of contribution of the public agency,
nonprofit organization, developer, and property manager to achieving
those reductions. The department shall act to insure, to the extent
possible, that grants are distributed equitably among each eligible
type of recipient.
(3) $6,528,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
and $3,472,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation are provided solely for a park and ride lot grant
program. Priority will be given to projects located within areas
served by public transit agencies. Before any project can proceed,
there must be an agreement between the Washington state department of
transportation and the public transit agency that the park and ride lot
will be served by the public transit agency for a minimum of ten years.
If service is discontinued before the amount of time specified in the
agreement, the public transit agency will be required to refund the
cost of the park and ride lot back to the department of transportation.
Additional criteria for selecting projects will include leveraging
funds other than state funds, estimated usage, convenience to commuter
routes, and corridor congestion.
(4) $9,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the rural mobility grant program.
Priority will be given to grants that add service. Capital grants can
be included as long as additional service is added or the grant would
keep current service from being reduced or eliminated.
(5) $5,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a vanpool grant program for public
transit agencies. The grant program will cover capital costs only; no
operating costs are eligible for funding under this grant program.
Only grants that add vanpools are eligible, no supplanting of transit
funds currently funding vanpools is allowed. Additional criteria for
selecting grants will include leveraging funds other than state funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 225 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- MARINE -- PROGRAM X
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $315,191,000

The appropriation in this section is provided to the Washington
state ferries to implement the 5.5.5 strategic plan subject to the
following modifications, conditions, and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is based on the budgeted expenditure of
$32,660,000 for vessel operating fuel in the 2003-2005 biennium. If
the actual cost of fuel is less than this budgeted amount, the excess
amount may not be expended. If the actual cost exceeds this amount,
the department shall request a supplemental appropriation.
(2) The appropriation provides for the compensation of ferry
employees. The expenditures for compensation paid to ferry employees
during the 2003-2005 biennium may not exceed $211,387,000 plus a dollar
amount, as prescribed by the office of financial management, that is
equal to any insurance benefit increase granted general government
employees in excess of $520.27 a month annualized per eligible marine
employee multiplied by the number of eligible marine employees for
fiscal year 2004 and $606.25 a month annualized per eligible marine
employee multiplied by the number of eligible marine employees for
fiscal year 2005, a dollar amount as prescribed by the office of
financial management for costs associated with pension amortization
charges, and a dollar amount prescribed by the office of financial
management for salary increases during the 2003-2005 biennium. For the
purposes of this section, the expenditures for compensation paid to
ferry employees shall be limited to salaries and wages and employee
benefits as defined in the office of financial management's policies,
regulations, and procedures named under objects of expenditure "A" and
"B" (7.2.6.2).
The prescribed salary increase or decrease dollar amount that shall
be allocated from the governor's compensation appropriations is in
addition to the appropriation contained in this section and may be used
to increase or decrease compensation costs, effective July 1, 2003, and
thereafter, as established in the 2003-2005 general fund operating
budget.
(3) The Washington state ferries will continue to provide on-going
service to Sidney, British Columbia.
(4) The Washington state ferries will provide on-going commuter
passenger-only ferry service on the Vashon-Seattle, Southworth-Seattle,
and Kingston-Seattle routes.
(5) The Washington state ferries will develop a plan to increase
passenger-only farebox recovery to at least forty percent by July 1,
2003, through increased fares, lower operation costs, and other cost-saving measures as appropriate. The department must report to the
transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2003 on the
options, strategies, and decisions implemented to achieve farebox
recovery targets.
(6) The department must provide a separate accounting of passenger-only ferry service costs and auto ferry service costs, and must provide
periodic reporting to the legislature on the financial status of both
passenger-only and auto ferry service in Washington state.
(7) The Washington state ferries will conduct an evaluation of the
passenger-only ferry system. At a minimum the evaluation must address
the effectiveness of existing passenger-only routes, and identify
improvement opportunities. The department will include in this
evaluation a review of recommendations for expanded passenger-only
ferry service, including new routes and markets, previously submitted
to the department by established citizen advisory groups. The
department must report to the transportation committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2004, on the options, strategies, and
recommendations for improving the passenger-only ferry system.
(8) The Washington state ferries will evaluate the feasibility of
contracting with a public or private organization to provide passenger-only ferry service. The Washington state ferries will also compare the
costs and benefits of such state-contracted service to the costs and
benefits of such service if provided by an alternative public-private
partnership, involving a public benefit transit agency or other entity.
The department must report to the transportation committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2004, on the options, strategies, and
recommendations for contracted passenger-only ferry service.
(9) The Washington state ferries must work with the department's
information technology division to implement a new revenue collection
system, including the integration of the regional fare coordination
system (smart card). Each December, annual updates are to be provided
to the transportation committees of the legislature concerning the
status of implementing and completing this project, with updates
concluding the first December after full project implementation.
(10) The Washington state ferries shall evaluate the benefits and
costs of selling the depreciation rights to ferries purchased by the
state in the future through sale and lease-back agreements, as
permitted under RCW 47.60.010. The department is authorized to issue
a request for proposal to solicit proposals from potential buyers. The
department must report to the transportation committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2004, on the options, strategies, and
recommendations for sale/lease-back agreements on existing ferry boats
as well as future ferry boat purchases.
(11) The Washington state ferries shall work with the department of
general administration, office of state procurement to improve the
existing fuel procurement process and solicit, identify, and evaluate,
purchasing alternatives to reduce the overall cost of fuel and mitigate
the impact of market fluctuations and pressure on both short- and long-term fuel costs. Consideration shall include, but not be limited to,
long-term fuel contracts, partnering with other public entities, and
possibilities for fuel storage in evaluating strategies and options.
The department shall report back to the transportation committees of
the legislature by December 1, 2003, on the options, strategies, and
recommendations for managing fuel purchases and costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 226 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- OPERATING
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,075,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $30,831,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Amtrak service contract and
Talgo maintenance contract associated with providing and maintaining
the state-supported passenger rail service.
(2) $7,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for operating an additional passenger
run between Seattle and Portland, Oregon. If an additional run is not
established, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) The department is directed to explore scheduling changes that
will reduce the delay in Seattle when traveling from Portland to
Vancouver B.C.
(4) The department is directed to explore opportunities with
British Columbia concerning the possibility of leasing an existing
Talgo trainset to B.C. during the day for a commuter run when the Talgo
is not in use during the Bellingham layover.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 227 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,682,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,569,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,251,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Up to $75,000 of the total appropriation
is provided to fund the state's share of the 2004 Washington marine
cargo forecast study. Public port districts, acting through their
association, must provide funding to cover the remaining cost of the
forecast.

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES--CAPITAL
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
State Patrol Highway Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,455,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $2,455,000 of the state patrol highway
account--state appropriation is provided for capital improvements at
district and detachment offices statewide during the 2003-2005
biennium. These projects include improvements at the state patrol's
Shelton training academy during the 2003-2005 biennium, including the
design and partial construction of a water/sewer system, emergency
generator replacement, and other minor works projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION
BOARD--CAPITAL PROGRAM
Rural Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,000,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $362,000
County Arterial Preservation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,745,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,107,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $362,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided for county ferries as set forth in RCW
47.56.724(4).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT
BOARD--CAPITAL PROGRAM
Urban Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $99,168,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $98,455,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $197,623,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The transportation improvement account--state appropriation includes $23,955,000 in proceeds from the sale of
bonds authorized in RCW 47.26.500. The transportation improvement
board may authorize the use of current revenues available to the agency
in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS) -- CAPITAL
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,933,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $14,933,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
is provided solely to implement the activities and projects included in
the transportation executive information systems project list named
03HTCPL3--house transportation committee facilities project list.
Changes to the list may occur under the following conditions and
restrictions:
(a) Projects that have unplanned carry-forward expenditures from
the 2001-03 biennium may be added to the list in order to complete the
project following approval by the office of financial management;
(b) Projects that were completed in the 2001-03 biennium and do not
require expenditure in the 2003-05 biennium may be removed from the
list following approval by the office of financial management;
(c) If planned construction of a project is unavoidably delayed,
the department may advance construction of a similar project provided
that funding has been identified to complete both projects following
approval by the office of financial management; and
(d) In the event of an emergency, the department is allowed to add
emergency projects to the list and delay currently funded projects in
order to fund the emergency projects following approval by the office
of financial management.
The department will provide every calendar quarter to the house
transportation committee and the senate highway and transportation
committee a report detailing any changes to the project list and the
reasons for the change.
(2) The department shall develop a standard design for all
maintenance facilities to be funded under this section. Prior to
developing design standards, the department must solicit input from all
personnel classifications typically employed at maintenance facilities.
By September 1, 2003, the department must submit a report to the
legislative transportation committees describing the stakeholder
involvement process undertaken and the adopted design standards for
maintenance facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--IMPROVEMENTS--PROGRAM I
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $613,178,000
Motor Vehicle Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $193,240,000
Motor Vehicle Account--Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,663,000
Special Category C Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,279,000
Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $613,300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,486,660,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $613,178,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation,
$193,240,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation,
$16,663,000 of the motor vehicle account--local appropriation, and
$50,279,000 of the special category c account--state appropriation are
provided solely to implement the activities and projects included in
the transportation executive information systems project list named
03HTCPL4--house transportation committee project list. In order to
provide the flexibility needed to manage a large highway construction
program with a significant amount of federal funds, changes to the list
may occur under the following conditions and restrictions:
(a) Projects that have unplanned carry-forward expenditures from
the 2001-03 biennium may be added to the list in order to complete the
project following approval by the office of financial management;
(b) Projects that were completed in the 2001-03 biennium and do not
require expenditure in the 2003-05 biennium may be removed from the
list following approval by the office of financial management;
(c) Projects may be added when the department of transportation
identifies the projects associated with activity funding allocations as
long as the activity allocation is reduced by the amount of the
projects added following approval by the office of financial
management;
(d) If planned construction of a project is unavoidably delayed,
the department may advance construction of a similar project provided
that funding has been identified to complete both projects following
approval by the office of financial management;
(e) In order to maximize federal funding and ensure that the state
does not lose any available federal funds, projects may be added to the
list that utilize additional federal funds provided that state match is
available and there are no projects where the state funds can be
supplanted following approval by the office of financial management;
and
(f) In the event of an emergency, the department is allowed to add
emergency projects to the list and delay currently funded projects in
order to fund the emergency projects following approval by the office
of financial management.
The department will provide every calendar quarter to the house
transportation committee and the senate highway and transportation
committee a report detailing any changes to the project list and the
reasons for the change.
(2) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
$53,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.843. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation. The motor
vehicle account--state appropriation includes $18,038,000 in unexpended
proceeds from bond sales authorized in RCW 47.10.843 for mobility and
economic initiative improvement projects.
(3) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
$428,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by House
Bill No. 2232. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(4) To manage some projects more efficiently, federal funds may be
transferred from program Z to program I to replace those federal funds
in a dollar-for-dollar match. Fund transfers authorized under this
subsection shall not affect project prioritization status.
Appropriations shall initially be allotted as appropriated in this act.
The department shall not transfer funds as authorized under this
subsection without approval of the transportation commission and the
director of financial management. The department shall submit a report
on those projects receiving fund transfers to the transportation
committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 1,
2004.
(5) The Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account--state appropriation
includes $567,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
RCW 47.10.843. The Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account--state
appropriation includes $46,300,000 in unexpended proceeds from the
January 2003 bond sale authorized in RCW 47.10.843 for the Tacoma
Narrows bridge project.
(6) The special category C account--state appropriation includes
$44,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.812. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available in the special category C account in lieu of
bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(7) $2,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for an environmental impact statement on increasing
capacity across the Columbia River in southwest Washington. This
appropriation will not complete the environmental impact statement.
(8) $4,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the environmental impact statement on the widening
of SR 520 Evergreen floating bridge subject to the following
conditions:
(a) The "6-lane expandable to 8" alternative will be kept as one of
the environmental impact statement (EIS) alternatives but it will no
longer be designated the preliminary preferred alternative. The EIS
identification of a preferred alternative will occur after all
alternatives are fully evaluated;
(b) The standards contained in the DO NO HARM statement will be the
primary and major standards used to evaluate the impacts of each
alternative;
(c) The "8-lane" alternative will be dropped, and will no longer be
included in the DEIS;
(d) A "4-lane expandable to include 2-lanes of fixed guide way HCT"
alternative will be added to the alternatives studied in the DEIS. Two
variants of this alternative will be studied: (i) With 4 general
purpose lanes, and (ii) with 2 general purpose lanes and 2 "hot" lanes;
and
(e) The DEIS evaluation of the impact of the hot lanes must
explicitly include the socio-economic impacts on different income
groups resulting from the price rationing of highway transportation
services.
(9) $250,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation and
an equal amount from the city of Seattle are provided solely for an
analysis of the impacts that an expansion of SR 520 Evergreen floating
bridge will have on the streets of North Capitol Hill, Roanoke Park,
and Montlake. An advisory committee with 2 members each from Portage
Bay/Roanoke Park Community Council, Montlake Community Council, and the
North Capitol Hill community organization along with the secretary of
transportation is established. The 7 member committee shall hire and
oversee the contract with a transportation consulting organization to
(a) perform an analysis of such impacts and (b) design a traffic and
circulation plan that mitigates the adverse consequences of such
impacts. If the city of Seattle does not agree to provide $250,000 by
January 1, 2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) $14,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
is provided for design and to begin construction of the Fast 1
identified grade separation/underpass project at Broad Street/Elliot
Avenue.
(11) $9,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
is provided for the SR 522, University of Washington-Bothell campus
access project. This amount will cover approximately one-half of the
construction costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--PRESERVATION--PROGRAM P
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $204,732,000
Motor Vehicle Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $458,010,000
Motor Vehicle Account--Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,086,000
Multimodal Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,690,000
Multimodal Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,247,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $681,765,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $204,732,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation,
$458,010,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation,
$13,086,000 of the motor vehicle account--local appropriation,
$1,690,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation, and $4,247,000 of the multimodal transportation
account--federal appropriation are provided solely to implement the
activities and projects included in the transportation executive
information systems project list named 03HTCPL4--house transportation
committee project list. In order to provide the flexibility needed to
manage a large highway construction program with a significant amount
of federal funds, changes to the list may occur under the following
conditions and restrictions:
(a) Projects that have unplanned carry-forward expenditures from
the 2001-03 biennium may be added to the list in order to complete the
project following approval by the office of financial management;
(b) Projects that were completed in the 2001-03 biennium and do not
require expenditure in the 2003-05 biennium may be removed from the
list following approval by the office of financial management;
(c) Projects may be added when the department of transportation
identifies the projects associated with activity funding allocations as
long as the activity allocation is reduced by the amount of the
projects added following approval by the office of financial
management;
(d) If planned construction of a project is unavoidably delayed,
the department may advance construction of a similar project provided
that funding has been identified to complete both projects following
approval by the office of financial management;
(e) In order to maximize federal funding and ensure that the state
does not lose any available federal funds, projects may be added to the
list that utilize additional federal funds provided that state match is
available and there are no projects where the state funds can be
supplanted following approval by the office of financial management;
and
(f) In the event of an emergency, the department is allowed to add
emergency projects to the list and delay currently funded projects in
order to fund the emergency projects following approval by the office
of financial management.
The department will provide every calendar quarter to the house
transportation committee and the senate highway and transportation
committee a report detailing any changes to the project list and the
reasons for the change.
(2) The department of transportation is authorized to maximize the
use of federal and state funds to implement the provisions of this
section.
(3) To manage some projects more efficiently, federal funds may be
transferred from program Z to program P to replace those federal funds
in a dollar-for-dollar match. Fund transfers authorized under this
subsection shall not affect project prioritization status.
Appropriations shall initially be allotted as appropriated in this act.
The department shall not transfer funds as authorized under this
subsection without approval of the transportation commission and the
director of financial management. The department shall submit a report
on those projects receiving fund transfers to the transportation
committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 1,
2004.
(4) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
$2,850,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW
47.10.761 and 47.10.762 for emergency purposes.
(5) The department of transportation shall continue to implement
the lowest life cycle cost planning approach to pavement management
throughout the state to encourage the most effective and efficient use
of pavement preservation funds. Emphasis should be placed on
increasing the number of roads addressed on time and reducing the
number of roads past due.
(6) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
$77,700,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.843. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q--CAPITAL
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,688,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,510,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,198,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $11,688,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
and $14,510,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement the activities and projects included in
the transportation executive information systems project list named
03HTCPL4--house transportation committee project list. In order to
provide the flexibility needed to manage a large highway construction
program with a significant amount of federal funds, changes to the list
may occur under the following conditions and restrictions:
(a) Projects that have unplanned carry-forward expenditures from
the 2001-03 biennium may be added to the list in order to complete the
project following approval by the office of financial management;
(b) Projects that were completed in the 2001-03 biennium and do not
require expenditure in the 2003-05 biennium may be removed from the
list following approval by the office of financial management;
(c) Projects may be added when the department of transportation
identifies the projects associated with activity funding allocations as
long as the activity allocation is reduced by the amount of the
projects added following approval by the office of financial
management;
(d) If planned construction of a project is unavoidably delayed,
the department may advance construction of a similar project provided
that funding has been identified to complete both projects following
approval by the office of financial management;
(e) In order to maximize federal funding and ensure that the state
does not lose any available federal funds, projects may be added to the
list that utilize additional federal funds provided that state match is
available and there are no projects where the state funds can be
supplanted following approval by the office of financial management;
and
(f) In the event of an emergency, the department is allowed to add
emergency projects to the list and delay currently funded projects in
order to fund the emergency projects following approval by the office
of financial management.
The department will provide every calendar quarter to the house
transportation committee and the senate highway and transportation
committee a report detailing any changes to the project list and the
reasons for the change.
(2) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
$10,024,000 for state matching funds for federally selected competitive
grant or congressional earmark projects other than the commercial
vehicle information system and network. These moneys shall be placed
into reserve status until such time as federal funds are secured and a
state match is required.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION --
WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM W
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $149,959,000
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account --
Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,800,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $184,759,000

The appropriations in this section are provided for improving the
Washington state ferry system, including, but not limited to, vessel
acquisition, vessel construction, major and minor vessel improvements,
and terminal construction and improvements. The appropriations in this
section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(1) $149,959,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account--state appropriation, and $34,800,000 of the Puget Sound capital
construction account--federal appropriation are provided solely to
implement the activities and projects included in the transportation
executive information systems project list named 03HTCPL4--house
transportation committee project list. In order to provide the
flexibility needed to manage a large ferry construction program with a
significant amount of federal funds, changes to the list may occur
under the following conditions and restrictions:
(a) Projects that have unplanned carry-forward expenditures from
the 2001-03 biennium may be added to the list in order to complete the
project following approval by the office of financial management;
(b) Projects that were completed in the 2001-03 biennium and do not
require expenditure in the 2003-05 biennium may be removed from the
list following approval by the office of financial management;
(c) Projects may be added when the department of transportation
identifies the projects associated with activity funding allocations as
long as the activity allocation is reduced by the amount of the
projects added following approval by the office of financial
management;
(d) If planned construction of a project is unavoidably delayed,
the department may advance construction of a similar project provided
that funding has been identified to complete both projects following
approval by the office of financial management;
(e) In order to maximize federal funding and ensure that the state
does not lose any available federal funds, projects may be added to the
list that utilize additional federal funds provided that state match is
available and there are no projects where the state funds can be
supplanted following approval by the office of financial management;
and
(f) In the event of an emergency, the department is allowed to add
emergency projects to the list and delay currently funded projects in
order to fund the emergency projects following approval by the office
of financial management.
The department will provide every calendar quarter to the house
transportation committee and the senate highway and transportation
committee a report detailing any changes to the project list and the
reasons for the change.
(2) The Puget Sound capital construction account -- state
appropriation includes $45,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for vessel and terminal acquisition, major
and minor improvements, and long lead time materials acquisition for
the Washington state ferries. The transportation commission may
authorize the use of current revenues available to the motor vehicle
account in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state
appropriation.
(3) Of the funds appropriated in this section, $5,337,000 is
provided for emergency repairs, $77,272,000 is provided for terminal
preservation and improvements, $84,191,000 is provided for vessel
preservation, $13,283,000 is provided for passenger-only vessel and
terminal preservation and improvements, and $4,676,000 is
reappropriated for work not completed in the 2001-03 biennium.
(4) The Washington state ferries must prepare a strategic plan for
the placement of multimodal terminals in Washington state. This plan
should, at a minimum, identify and evaluate potential sites for
multimodal terminals, and identify and evaluate possible financing
options for placement of these terminals. No improvement funds may be
spent on new terminals until the strategic plan has been completed.
The department must report to the transportation committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2004, on the options, strategies, and
recommendations for locating and financing multimodal terminals.
(5) The Washington state ferries must conduct an analysis of the
long-term need for the Shaw Terminal. At a minimum, this analysis
should address the viability and role of the terminal, as well as the
availability and suitability of alternative methods of accessing Shaw
Island. No preservation funds may be spent on the Shaw Terminal until
the Shaw Terminal analysis has been completed. The department must
report to the transportation committees of the legislature by December
1, 2003, on the options, strategies, and recommendations for the Shaw
Island terminal.
(6)(a) The department of transportation should work with the
Washington state treasurer and others, as appropriate, to identify and
evaluate alternative financing options to add new boats to the
Washington state ferries system. This evaluation should be focused on
providing the department future flexibility. The current financing
plan assumes that two auto boats and one passenger-only boat will be
financed through revenues generated through mechanisms provided in
current law, with an additional 2 auto boats and one passenger-only
boat financed through additional revenues. The department shall
evaluate the possibilities of financing a fifth auto boat through
operating savings, additional financing mechanisms, or a combination of
the two approaches.
(b) Unless specific 30-year exemptions are received from the United
States Coast Guard in operating the international run, the new ferries
must be of comparable quality and design to the Jumbo Mark II Class
ferry and meet the certifications of the United States Coast Guard, the
American Bureau of Shipping, and safety of life at sea.
(c) In developing a plan for new boats, the department shall work
with other parties interested in acquiring similar boats to determine
if partnerships can be developed that would reduce the costs per boat
for all parties through contracting with a shipbuilder for a larger
number of boats to be delivered. The department must report to the
transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2003, on
the options, strategies, and recommendations for financing
alternatives.
(7) The department shall evaluate the existing process for
designing and building new vessels. In reviewing the process, the
department shall compare and contrast standard shipbuilding industry
methods with current authorized design-build processes; including the
industry use of owner's requirements or functional specifications as a
basis for developing contract specifications and contract guidance
drawings. Additional analysis of existing processes with industry
practices should include a comparison of the impact of the two
approaches on the overall, long-term vehicle operating, maintenance,
and preservation costs. A report of the findings shall be provided to
the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2003.
(8) The next new class of auto ferries shall be known as the "San
Juan" class ferry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- CAPITAL
Essential Rail Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $770,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,348,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,499,000
Washington Fruit Express Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,117,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $49,348,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation and $9,499,000 of the multimodal transportation account--federal appropriation, $770,000 of the essential rail assistance
account--state appropriation are provided solely to implement the
activities and projects included in the transportation executive
information systems project list named 03HTCPL5--house transportation
committee rail project list. Changes to the list may occur under the
following conditions and restrictions:
(a) Projects that have unplanned carry-forward expenditures from
the 2001-03 biennium may be added to the list in order to complete the
project following approval by the office of financial management;
(b) Projects that were completed in the 2001-03 biennium and do not
require expenditure in the 2003-05 biennium may be removed from the
list following approval by the office of financial management;
(c) If planned construction of a project is unavoidably delayed,
the department may advance construction of a similar project provided
that funding has been identified to complete both projects following
approval by the office of financial management;
(d) In order to maximize federal funding and ensure that the state
does not lose any available federal funds, projects may be added to the
list that utilize additional federal funds provided that state match is
available and there are no projects where the state funds can be
supplanted following approval by the office of financial management;
and
(e) In the event of an emergency, the department is allowed to add
emergency projects to the list and delay currently funded projects in
order to fund the emergency projects following approval by the office
of financial management.
The department will provide every calendar quarter to the house
transportation committee and the senate highway and transportation
committee a report detailing any changes to the project list and the
reasons for the change.
(2) $770,000 of the essential rail assistance account--state
appropriation and $230,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state appropriation are provided solely for emerging projects that
would result in maintaining service on light-density rail lines, or
would result in creating new jobs in rural or depressed areas.
Projects selected to be funded under this section and not specifically
identified by the list referenced in subsection (1) of this section
must be approved in advance by the office of financial management.
(3) $662,000 of the multimodal transportation account--federal
appropriation is provided solely for small scale improvements on the
Pacific Northwest Corridor.
(4) $500,000 of the Washington fruit express account--state
appropriation is provided solely for leasing Washington fruit express
cars.
(5) The appropriations in this section are subject to the
conditions and limitations of section 501 of this act.
(6) $2,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is to be placed in reserve status by the office of
financial management to be held until the department identifies the
location for a new transload facility at either Wenatchee or Quincy.
The funds are to be released upon determination of a location and
approval by the office of financial management.
(7) $7,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for an additional train set for
operation between Seattle and Portland, Oregon. If negotiations with
the state of Oregon for purchase of an existing train set fail or
alternative options for securing a train set does not materialize, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- CAPITAL
Highway Infrastructure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $207,000
Highway Infrastructure Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,602,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,116,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,760,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,685,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $17,211,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
and $5,034,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation are provided solely to implement the activities and
projects included in the transportation executive information systems
project list named 03HTCPL4--house transportation committee project
list. In order to provide the flexibility needed to manage a large
highway construction program with a significant amount of federal
funds, changes to the list may occur under the following conditions and
restrictions:
(a) Projects that have unplanned carry-forward expenditures from
the 2001-03 biennium may be added to the list in order to complete the
project following approval by the office of financial management;
(b) Projects that were completed in the 2001-03 biennium and do not
require expenditure in the 2003-05 biennium may be removed from the
list following approval by the office of financial management;
(c) If planned construction of a project is unavoidably delayed,
the department may advance construction of a similar project provided
that funding has been identified to complete both projects following
approval by the office of financial management; and
(d) In the event of an emergency, the department is allowed to add
emergency projects to the list and delay currently funded projects in
order to fund the emergency projects following approval by the office
of financial management.
The department will provide every calendar quarter to the house
transportation committee and the senate highway and transportation
committee a report detailing any changes to the project list and the
reasons for the change.
(2) To manage some projects more efficiently, federal funds may be
transferred from program Z to programs I and P and state funds shall be
transferred from programs I and P to program Z to replace those federal
funds in a dollar-for-dollar match. Fund transfers authorized under
this subsection shall not affect project prioritization status.
Appropriations shall initially be allotted as appropriated in this act.
The department may not transfer funds as authorized under this
subsection without approval of the transportation commission and the
director of financial management. The department shall submit a report
on those projects receiving fund transfers to the transportation
committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 1,
2004.
(3) $8,486,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
reappropriated and provided for local freight mobility improvement
projects.
(4) The motor vehicle--state appropriation includes $20,452,000 in
unexpended proceeds from bond sales authorized by RCW 47.10.843.
(5) $7,576,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely to fund the first
phase of a multiphase cooperative project with the state of Oregon to
dredge the Columbia River. The department shall not expend the
appropriation in this section unless agreement on ocean disposal sites
has been reached that protects the state's commercial crab fishery.
The amount provided in this subsection shall lapse unless the state of
Oregon appropriates a dollar-for-dollar match to fund its share of the
project.
(6) $1,156,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
reappropriated and provided solely for additional small city pavement
preservation program grants, to be administered by the department's
highways and local programs division. The department shall review all
projects receiving grant awards under this program at least
semiannually to determine whether the projects are making satisfactory
progress. Any project that has been awarded small city pavement
preservation program grant funds, but does not report activity on the
project within one year of grant award, should be reviewed by the
department to determine whether the grant should be terminated. The
department must promptly close out grants when projects have been
completed, and identify where unused grant funds remain because actual
project costs were lower than estimated in the grant award. The
department shall expeditiously extend new grant awards to qualified
projects when funds become available either because grant awards have
been rescinded for lack of sufficient project activity or because
completed projects returned excess grant funds upon project closeout.
(7) $4,010,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
reappropriated and provided solely for additional traffic and
pedestrian safety improvements near schools. The highways and local
programs division within the department of transportation shall
administer this program. The department shall review all projects
receiving grant awards under this program at least semiannually to
determine whether the projects are making satisfactory progress. Any
project that has been awarded traffic and pedestrian safety improvement
grant funds, but does not report activity on the project within one
year of grant award should be reviewed by the department to determine
whether the grant should be terminated. The department must promptly
close out grants when projects have been completed, and identify where
unused grant funds remain because actual project costs were lower than
estimated in the grant award. The department shall expeditiously
extend new grant awards to qualified projects when funds become
available either because grant awards have been rescinded for lack of
sufficient project activity or because completed projects returned
excess grant funds upon project closeout.
(8) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
$12,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by House Bill
No. 2232. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE FUND AND
TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUE
Highway Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $263,647,000
Ferry Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,340,000
Transportation Improvement Board Bond Retirement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,721,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,247,000
Special Category C Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $440,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $348,635,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL AGENT CHARGES
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $360,000
Special Category C Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $92,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $457,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
MVFT BONDS AND TRANSFERS
(1) Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge
account . . . . . . . . . . . . $567,000,000

The department of transportation is authorized to sell up to
$567,000,000 in bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for the Tacoma
Narrows bridge project. Proceeds from the sale of the bonds shall be
deposited into the motor vehicle account. The department of
transportation shall inform the treasurer of the amount to be
deposited.

(2) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Puget Sound capital construction
account . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000,000

The department of transportation is authorized to sell up to
$45,000,000 in bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for vessel and
terminal acquisition, major and minor improvements, and long lead-time
materials acquisition for the Washington state ferries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES
FOR DISTRIBUTION
(1) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation for
motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to
cities and counties . . . . . . . . . . . . $441,359,000
(2) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For license permit and fee distributions to cities
and counties . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,652,000
(3) Multimodal Account--State Appropriation for distributions to
transit agencies . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000

For assistance in providing special needs transportation.
$6,000,000 is to be distributed quarterly in fiscal year 2004, starting
September 30 and $6,000,000 is to be distributed quarterly in fiscal
year 2005, starting September 30. Distributions shall be prorated
based on the amount expended demand response service and route deviated
service in calendar year 2001 as reported in the "Summary of Public
Transportation-2001" published by the department of transportation. No
transit agency may receive more than thirty percent of these
distributions in any fiscal year. The amount over thirty percent will
be prorated to the remaining transit agencies based on the above demand
response service and route deviated service expenditures. The
department of transportation shall notify the state treasurer of the
amounts to be distributed to each transit agency.

(4) Multimodal Account--State Appropriation for distributions to
qualifying transit agencies . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Provided to implement sales tax equalization as required by House
Bill No. 2229. If House Bill No. 2229 is not enacted into law the
amount provided for distribution in this subsection shall lapse. The
department of revenue will notify the state treasurer of the amounts
and agencies to receive the distribution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS
(1) State Patrol Highway Account -- State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor
Vehicle Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
(2) Motor Vehicle Account -- State
Appropriation: For motor vehicle fuel tax
refunds and transfers . . . . . . . . . . . . $465,152,000
(3) Highway Safety Account -- State
Appropriation: For transfer to the multimodal
transportation account -- state . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

The state treasurer shall perform the transfers from the state
patrol highway account and the highway safety account to the motor
vehicle account on a quarterly basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 406 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRANSFERS
(1) Motor Vehicle Fund -- State Appropriation:
For transfer to Puget Sound Ferry Operations
Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,757,000
(2) RV Account -- State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Motor Vehicle Fund -- State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,954,000
(3) Motor Vehicle Fund--State Appropriation:
For transfer to Puget Sound Capital Construction
Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $84,000,000
(4) Multimodal Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,400,000
(5) Multimodal Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to Puget Sound Capital Construction
Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,300,000
(6) Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to Puget Sound Capital Construction
Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,000,000

The transfers identified in this section are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(a) The department of transportation shall only transfer funds in
subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section up to the level provided,
on an as-needed basis.
(b) The department of transportation shall transfer funds in
subsection (6) of this section up to the amount identified, provided
that a minimum balance of $5,000,000 is retained in the Puget Sound
ferry operations account.
(c) The amount identified in subsection (6) of this section may not
include any revenues collected as passenger fares.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 407 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS--TRANSFERS
State Patrol Highway Account: For transfer to the
department of retirement systems expense account:
For the administrative expenses of the judicial
retirement system . . . . . . . . . . . . $223,304

NEW SECTION. Sec. 408 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT -- CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS AND EMPLOYEE HEALTH BENEFITS
Pilotage Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
Aeronautics Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000
State Patrol Highway Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,823,000
State Patrol Highway Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,000
State Patrol Highway Account--Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Rural Arterial Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000
Highway Safety Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $891,000
Highway Safety Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,919,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,211,000
Urban Arterial Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
Transportation Improvement Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
County Arterial Preservation Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000
Department of Licensing Services Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,960,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 409 STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS.
In addition to the amounts appropriated in this act for revenue for
distribution, state contributions to the law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' retirement system, and bond retirement and interest
including ongoing bond registration and transfer charges, transfers,
interest on registered warrants, and certificates of indebtedness,
there is also appropriated such further amounts as may be required or
available for these purposes under any statutory formula or under any
proper bond covenant made under law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 410 The department of transportation is
authorized to undertake federal advance construction projects under the
provisions of 23 U.S.C. Sec. 115 in order to maintain progress in
meeting approved highway construction and preservation objectives. The
legislature recognizes that the use of state funds may be required to
temporarily fund expenditures of the federal appropriations for the
highway construction and preservation programs for federal advance
construction projects prior to conversion to federal funding.

PROVISIONS NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT APPROPRIATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 The department of transportation shall
maximize the use of state, federal, and local funds to implement the
provisions of this act. Appropriations shall initially be allotted as
appropriated by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not
permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be
used for other than that specified purpose. After approval by the
director of the office of financial management and unless specifically
prohibited by this act, the department may transfer appropriations
between the motor vehicle account--state, motor vehicle account--federal, and motor vehicle account--private/local appropriations and
between the multimodal transportation account--state, multimodal
transportation account--federal, and multimodal account--local
appropriations. However, the department shall not expend more than the
total amount appropriated for both these accounts.

2001-03 BIENNIUMTRANSPORTATION AGENCIES
Sec. 1201 2002 c 359 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE LEGISLATIVE TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,596,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations and specified amounts are provided solely
for that activity:
(1) $2,823,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation is
provided for the operation of the house of representatives
transportation committee.
(2) To the extent possible, this appropriation shall utilize funds
allocated under RCW 46.68.110(2).
(3) To the extent possible, this appropriation shall utilize funds
allocated under RCW 46.68.120(3).
(4) The house of representatives transportation committee shall
conduct a study of the use of motorized scooters. The study shall, at
a minimum, identify and analyze the safety issues associated with use
of motorized scooters, including use by children, commuters, and the
disabled. House of representatives transportation committee cochairs
shall each appoint one member from their respective caucus to serve as
cochair of the study group. The chair of the senate transportation
committee may also appoint two members from the senate transportation
committee, one from each caucus, to participate in the study. The
study shall be staffed by house of representatives transportation
committee staff. The study group shall report back to the house of
representatives transportation committee by January 1, 2002.
(((4))) (5) The house of representatives transportation committee
shall conduct a study of the effect of the weight of fire-fighting
apparatus on state roadways. The study shall determine, at a minimum,
the various types of fire-fighting apparatus currently in use on state
roadways; the size, weight and load effect of fire-fighting apparatus
that are currently in use or that potentially could be in use on the
state roadways, as well as on state bridges; and the effect on public
safety. The study may examine state and federal laws that affect fire-fighting apparatuses. House of representatives transportation
committee cochairs shall each appoint one member from their respective
caucus to serve as cochair of the study group. The study shall be
staffed by house of representatives transportation committee staff.
The study group will report back to the house of representatives
transportation committee by January 1, 2002.
(((5))) (6) The legislative transportation committee shall conduct
a feasibility study of potential for economic partnerships between the
Washington state ferries and local government entities, including but
not limited to port districts. The study is intended to improve ferry
terminals. The study shall, at a minimum, identify the market,
physical, and economic factors that should be examined in determining
whether an economic or commercial development partnership project on or
around Washington state ferry terminals is likely to produce revenue
for the partners. The study shall apply those factors to an analysis
of each terminal used by Washington state ferries and recommend whether
further exploration of state and local partnerships would be of
potential economic benefit to the partners. The entity selected to
perform the study through the request for proposals process will report
back to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1,
2001.
(((6))) (7) The legislative transportation committee, in
cooperation with an areawide transportation system or systems, shall
undertake an evaluation of providing locally sponsored transit services
in a local community supplemental to those services provided by an
areawide system. The evaluation shall address:
(a) The costs and benefits of providing such services;
(b) The impact of such service on ridership on the areawide system
and on any regional systems;
(c) Funding options for supplemental services; and
(d) Institutional arrangements affecting the institution of
supplemental services.
The committee shall work with the department of transportation,
areawide transit providers, community officials, private businesses,
labor organizations, and others as appropriate in conducting the
evaluation, and in developing a pilot project if feasible. The
committee shall also conduct a study of local transit systems with the
purpose of making recommendations to make local transit services more
seamless and efficient. The committee shall provide an interim
progress report to the legislature by January 2002. The committee
shall report its findings to the legislature not later than December 1,
2002.
(((7))) (8) The legislative transportation committee shall
undertake an evaluation of the statutory exemptions for transportation
taxes, including but not limited to motor vehicle fuel taxes. The
committee shall report its findings to the legislature by December 1,
2003.
(((8))) (9) The legislative transportation committee will convene
a working group to review the costs, processes, and other
considerations relating to special vehicle license plates. The working
group will also review special license plate tabs and emblems. The
committee will report its findings to the legislature by December 1,
2002.
(((9))) (10) The legislative transportation committee shall form a
working group to evaluate the feasibility of developing an alternative
corridor to Interstate 5 and Interstate 405 to expedite the movement of
commerce between the Canadian border, the central Puget Sound region,
the south Puget Sound region, and more southerly areas. The corridor
would run from approximately the Canadian border in the north to
approximately Lewis county in the south. This alternative corridor
analysis shall address truck, rail, pipeline, and other utility needs
for the corridor, to determine the feasibility of financing and
constructing such a corridor, taking into consideration: (a)
Anticipated present and future freight demand as well as freight
traffic relief for existing state highway and rail routes; (b) the
potential for carrying general purpose traffic to provide relief for
other state highway routes; (c) a cost-benefit analysis detailing
various funding possibilities, including federal funds and the use of
charges and tolls to fund construction and operation of the corridor as
a utility corridor and a toll facility; (d) an analysis detailing
possible right of way locations, including but not limited to property
donations, trades, or credits between or among the public and private
sector; and (e) possible private sector, local, or other partnerships
that may be used to fund the project. The working group shall report
its findings to the full committee by December 15, 2002.

Sec. 1202 2002 c 359 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($164,147,000))
$163,540,000
State Patrol Highway Account --
Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,278,000))
$7,544,000
State Patrol Highway Account --
Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($169,000))
$282,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($171,594,000))
$171,366,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations and specified amounts are provided solely
for the activities of the field operations bureau:
(1) As a result of the elimination of the vehicle inspection number
(VIN) program, no permanent Washington state patrol employee shall be
displaced from employment without the opportunity to fill a vacant
patrol position for which he or she has a preference and meets the
minimum qualifications. For the purpose of the VIN program
elimination, the guidelines under chapter 356-26 WAC (Registers-Certifications) shall be suspended for those employees holding the
classification of VIN 1 or 2.
(2) To the extent possible, the agency shall transfer displaced VIN
personnel into the 20 newly created school bus inspection and motor
carrier safety assistance program positions. The agency shall fill
existing vacant positions within the commercial vehicle division with
displaced VIN personnel. The agency shall report by December 31, 2001,
to the senate and house of representatives transportation committees on
efforts to relocate displaced VIN personnel.

Sec. 1203 2002 c 359 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- SUPPORT SERVICES BUREAU
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,247,000
State Patrol Highway Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($71,736,000))
$71,230,000
State Patrol Highway Account --
Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $735,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($77,718,000))
$77,212,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations and specified amounts are provided solely
for the activities of the support services bureau:
(1) $67,000 of the state patrol highway account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for the patrol to work jointly with
the department of transportation, the military department, and the
department of natural resources, in coordination with the state
interoperability executive committee, on the development and
implementation of a secure geographical information system database to
illustrate locations and specifications of statewide radio and
microwave towers
(2) $5,247,000 of the multimodal transportation account -- state
appropriation and $2,299,000 of the state patrol highway account -- state
appropriation is a one time funding of general fund activities. The
general fund will resume funding these activities beginning in the
2003-05 biennium.
(3) The Washington state patrol shall review the policy of allowing
commissioned uniformed officers to use personally assigned vehicles for
commuting purposes. This provision applies to every Washington state
patrol officer except the chief and any officer that requires use of a
vehicle for work performed throughout the day. The agency shall submit
to the house of representatives and senate transportation committees by
December 1, 2002, a list of officers that use vehicles for commuting
purposes and any revisions to the vehicle use policy resulting from the
review required under this subsection.

Sec. 1204 2002 c 359 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $88,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $81,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,724,000))
$7,740,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,400,000))
$4,403,000
Licensing Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $173,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,524,000))
$12,543,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations and specified amounts are provided solely
for the activities referenced:
(1) $6,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5354 in the
form passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 5354 is not enacted
in the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(2) $14,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation and
$3,000 of the highway safety account -- state appropriation are provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6814 in the form
passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6814 is not enacted in
the form passed by the legislature the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(3) $26,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation and
$1,000 of the highway safety account -- state appropriation are provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6748 in the form
passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6748 is not enacted in
the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(4) $2,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation and
$4,000 of the highway safety account -- state appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5626 in the form
passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 5626 is not enacted in
the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(5) $11,000 of the highway safety account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6461 in the
form passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6461 is not enacted
in the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1205 2002 c 359 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- INFORMATION SYSTEMS
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,735,000))
$5,742,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,695,000
Licensing Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $213,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,723,000))
$9,730,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department of licensing shall report to the legislative
transportation committees on the progress of the expanded internet
service no later than December 15, 2002.
(2) $4,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5354 in the
form passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 5354 is not enacted
in the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(3) $4,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation and
$2,000 of the highway safety account -- state appropriation are provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6814 in the form
passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6814 is not enacted in
the form passed by the legislature the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(4) $19,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation and
$1,000 of the highway safety account -- state appropriation are provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6748 in the form
passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6748 is not enacted in
the form passed by the legislature the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(5) $1,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation and
$3,000 of the highway safety account -- state appropriation are provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5626 in the form
passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 5626 is not enacted in
the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(6) $8,000 of the highway safety account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6461 in the
form passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6461 is not enacted
in the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1206 2002 c 359 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- VEHICLE SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $578,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($58,191,000))
$58,479,000
Licensing Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,240,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($63,035,000))
$63,323,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations and specified amounts are provided solely
for the activities referenced:
(1) $82,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6814 in the
form passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6814 is not enacted
in the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(2) $376,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6748 in the
form passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6748 is not enacted
in the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(3) $77,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5354 in the
form passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 5354 is not enacted
in the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(4) The department shall work cooperatively with the national guard
to develop and make available a national guard sticker which may be
affixed to a license plate. The stickers shall be available upon
application. The department shall charge a fee for the stickers
sufficient to defray the costs of production.
(5) The department shall work cooperatively with the Washington
state council of fire fighters to develop and make available a fire
fighter sticker which may be affixed to a license plate. The stickers
shall be available upon application to members of the international
association of fire fighters. The department shall charge a fee for
the stickers sufficient to defray the costs of production.
(6) $22,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5626 in the
form passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 5626 is not enacted
in the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1207 2002 c 359 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- DRIVER SERVICES
Motorcycle Safety Education Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,573,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($82,175,000))
$82,662,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $788,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($85,536,000))
$86,023,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department of licensing shall prepare a capital project
plan adopting a process for using certificates of participation to
purchase licensing services offices if the combined principle and
interest payments are the same or less than existing or future leases
on comparable facilities.
(2) $21,000 of the highway safety fund -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6748 in the
form passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6748 is not enacted
in the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(3) $36,000 of the highway safety fund -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6814 in the
form passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6814 is not enacted
in the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(4) $162,000 of the highway safety account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6461 in the
form passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6461 is not enacted
in the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(5) $56,000 of the highway safety account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5626 in the
form passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 5626 is not enacted
in the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1208 2002 c 359 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- AVIATION -- PROGRAM F
Aeronautics Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,349,000))
$4,967,000
Aircraft Search and Rescue Safety and
Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $160,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,509,000))
$5,127,000

Sec. 1209 2002 c 359 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES -- PROGRAM U

Payments in this section represent charges from other state
agencies to the department of transportation.
(1) FOR PAYMENT OF WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES TORT LIABILITY AND
SETTLEMENTS
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,626,000
(((1))) (2) FOR PAYMENT OF DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
OFFICE OF RISK MANAGEMENT FEES
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $464,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operations -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $154,000
(((2))) (3) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE OFFICE OF THE STATE AUDITOR
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $713,000
(((3))) (4) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION FACILITIES AND SERVICES AND CONSOLIDATED MAIL SERVICES
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,047,000
(((4))) (5) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,237,000
(((5))) (6) FOR PAYMENT OF SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY PREMIUMS AND
ADMINISTRATION
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,755,000
Motor Vehicle Fund -- Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,204,000

The office of risk management shall evaluate the risk pool premium
assessments to ensure that proper tracking, measuring, and reporting
methods have been utilized to ensure funding equity has been
maintained. "Funding equity" includes but is not limited to
demonstrating that premiums assessed to the department of
transportation will, over time, not exceed claims paid in order to
ensure that premiums paid by the department of transportation are not
unconstitutionally expended for nonhighway purposes. The office of
risk management shall make a full report of its findings to the
legislature no later than January 15, 2002.

(6) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS
ENTERPRISES
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $251,000
(7) FOR PAYMENT OF THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION CAPITAL
PROJECTS SURCHARGE
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,547,000
(8) FOR ARCHIVES AND RECORDS MANAGEMENT
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $457,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($42,829,000))
$48,455,000

Sec. 1210 2002 c 359 s 226 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- MARINE -- PROGRAM X
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($311,312,000))
$312,612,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations and specified amounts are provided solely
for that activity:
(1) The appropriation is based on the budgeted expenditure of
$35,159,000 for vessel operating fuel in the 2001-2003 biennium. If
the actual cost of fuel is less than this budgeted amount, the excess
amount may not be expended. If the actual cost exceeds this amount,
the department shall request a supplemental appropriation.
(2) The appropriation provides for the compensation of ferry
employees. The expenditures for compensation paid to ferry employees
during the 2001-2003 biennium may not exceed $207,065,000 plus a dollar
amount, as prescribed by the office of financial management, that is
equal to any insurance benefit increase granted general government
employees in excess of $432.82 a month annualized per eligible marine
employee multiplied by the number of eligible marine employees for the
respective fiscal year, a dollar amount as prescribed by the office of
financial management for costs associated with pension amortization
charges, and a dollar amount prescribed by the office of financial
management for salary increases during the 2001-2003 biennium. For the
purposes of this section, the expenditures for compensation paid to
ferry employees shall be limited to salaries and wages and employee
benefits as defined in the office of financial management's policies,
regulations, and procedures named under objects of expenditure "A" and
"B" (7.2.6.2).
The prescribed salary and insurance benefit increase or decrease
dollar amount that shall be allocated from the governor's compensation
appropriations is in addition to the appropriation contained in this
section and may be used to increase or decrease compensation costs,
effective July 1, 2001, and thereafter, as established in the 2001-2003
general fund operating budget.
(3) The department shall issue a request for information from
entities interested in purchasing advertising on board Washington state
ferry vessels. The department shall evaluate the proposals and report
back to the legislature's transportation committees in January 2002
regarding the potential for revenue from different types of
advertising.
(4) The department may enter into contracts with private vendors to
sell ferry tickets and medium at locations other than Washington state
ferry terminals or facilities.
(a) The department may enter into the contracts only (i) with
private vendors that are already established businesses offering goods
for sale to the general public; and (ii) if it determines that the
vendor's established location has the potential to serve a significant
percentage of the customers using a particular ferry route.
(b) The department may adopt necessary rules and procedures to
allow the use of credit and debit cards to purchase ferry tickets or
medium from a private vendor who has contracted with the department to
sell ferry tickets or medium. The department may establish a
convenience fee to be paid by all persons purchasing ferry tickets and
medium at locations other than Washington state ferry terminals or
facilities. The convenience fee must be sufficient to offset the
charges imposed on the department by the credit and debit card
companies. In no event may the use of credit or debit cards authorized
by this section create a loss of revenue to the state. The use of a
personal credit card does not rely upon the credit of the state as
prohibited by Article VIII, section 5 of the state Constitution.
(5) The legislature recognizes the value of a regional fare
collection system to promote intermodal travel throughout Washington
state ferries' Puget Sound service area and therefore encourages the
department to resume participation in the regional fare coordination
project (smart card). The department shall develop a request for
funding of the on-going operating costs associated with the regional
fare coordination project and shall present this request to the 2003
legislature. The request for funding shall be sufficient to support a
system that prevents the disclosure of personally identifying
information of persons who use a smart card to facilitate payment of
ferry fares. The requested system may facilitate the disclosure of
aggregate information on fare collection to governmental agencies or
groups concerned with public transportation or public safety as long as
the data does not contain any personally identifying information. The
requested system shall not prevent the release of personally
identifying information to law enforcement agencies when required by a
subpoena.

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES CAPITAL FACILITIES
Sec. 1301 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS) -- CAPITAL
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,046,000))
$12,371,000

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS
Sec. 1401 2002 c 359 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND
REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT
TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE FUND AND TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUE
Highway Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($208,206,000))
$196,524,000
Ferry Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,473,000
Transportation Improvement Board Bond Retirement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($40,856,000))
$38,088,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,588,000))
$1,473,000
Special Category C Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($631,000))
$114,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($340,000))
$76,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($307,094,000))
$288,748,000

Sec. 1402 2002 c 359 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND
REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL
AGENT CHARGES
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($459,000))
$201,000
Special Category C Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($41,000))
$17,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($534,000))
$252,000

Sec. 1403 2002 c 359 s 403 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION
Motor Vehicle Account Appropriation for
motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to
cities and counties . . . . . . . . . . . . (($428,981,000))
$425,501,000
Motor Vehicle Account Appropriation for
motor vehicle license, permit, and fee distributions
to cities and counties . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,304,000

Sec. 1404 2002 c 359 s 404 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS
(1) RV Account -- State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Motor Vehicle Fund -- State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,344,000))
$542,000

The department of transportation shall only transfer funds provided
under this subsection (((1) of this section)) on an as-needed basis.

(2) ((Public Transportation Systems Account --
State Appropriation: For transfer to the
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,911,000
(3))) State Patrol Highway Account -- State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor
Vehicle Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,657,000
(((4))) (3) Motor Vehicle Account -- State
Appropriation: For motor vehicle fuel tax
refunds and transfers . . . . . . . . . . . . (($453,279,000))
$448,264,000
(((6))) (4) Urban Arterial Trust Account -- State
Appropriation: For transfer of excess City
Hardship Assistance Program revenues to
cities . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
(((7))) (5) Highway Safety Account -- State
Appropriation: For transfer to the multimodal
transportation account . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
(((8))) (6) Motor Vehicle Account -- State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Tacoma
Narrows toll bridge account . . . . . . . . . . . . (($839,000,000))
$39,000,000
(((9))) (7) Highway Safety Account -- State
Appropriation: For transfer to the motor
vehicle account -- state . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

(((1))) If Senate Bill No. 6814 is enacted in the form passed by
the legislature, $16,191,000 of the transfer from the Washington state
patrol account -- state to the motor vehicle account -- state shall lapse.
The state treasurer shall perform the transfers from the state patrol
highway account to the motor vehicle account on a quarterly basis.
(((2) The department of transportation is authorized to sell up to
$800,000,000 in bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for the Tacoma
Narrows bridge project. Proceeds from the sale of the bonds shall be
deposited into the motor vehicle account. The department of
transportation shall inform the treasurer of the amount to be
deposited.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1405 A new section is added to 2001 2nd sp.s.
c 14 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER--BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR MVFT BONDS AND TRANSFERS

Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation: For
transfer to the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge
account . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000,000

The department of transportation is authorized to sell up to
$800,000,000 in bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for the Tacoma
Narrows bridge project. Proceeds from the sale of the bonds shall be
deposited into the motor vehicle account. The department of
transportation shall inform the treasurer of the amount to be
deposited.

PROVISIONS NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT APPROPRIATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1501 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1502 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

INDEX PAGE #

BOARD OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD
CAPITAL PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
OPERATING PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING
DRIVER SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 9, 50
INFORMATION SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
INFORMATION SYSTEMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 48
MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 9, 46
VEHICLE SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 9, 49
DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 40
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AVIATION -- PROGRAM F . . . . . . . . . . . . 11, 51
CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES -- PROGRAM U . . . . . . . . . . . . 14, 51
ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS--PROGRAM K . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS AND CONSTRUCTION--PROGRAM D . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM M . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
IMPROVEMENTS--PROGRAM I . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY--PROGRAM C . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
MARINE -- PROGRAM X . . . . . . . . . . . . 16, 53
PRESERVATION--PROGRAM P . . . . . . . . . . . . 25
PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS) -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 55
PROGRAM D -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT--PROGRAM H . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM V . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 32
RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
TRAFFIC OPERATIONS--PROGRAM Q--CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 39
TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT -- PROGRAM S . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH -- PROGRAM T . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM W . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE--OPERATING PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
LEGISLATIVE TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 6, 42
MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS AND EMPLOYEE HEALTH BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 40
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
STATE TREASURER
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST . . . . . . . . . . . . 36, 37, 55, 56
MVFT BONDS AND TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 58
STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 56
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 38, 56
STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 40
TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD
CAPITAL PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
OPERATING PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
WASHINGTON STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
CAPITAL PROJECTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
WASHINGTON STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 8, 44
SUPPORT SERVICES BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 8, 45
WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
--- END ---