BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.53.010 and 1989 c 36 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The practice of optometry is defined as the examination of the
human eye, the examination and ascertaining any defects of the human
vision system and the analysis of the process of vision. The practice
of optometry may include, but not necessarily be limited to, the
following:
(a) The employment of any objective or subjective means or method,
including the use of drugs ((topically applied to the eye)), for
diagnostic and therapeutic purposes by those licensed under this
chapter and who meet the requirements of subsections (2) and (3) of
this section, and the use of any diagnostic instruments or devices for
the examination or analysis of the human vision system, the measurement
of the powers or range of human vision, or the determination of the
refractive powers of the human eye or its functions in general; and
(b) The prescription and fitting of lenses, prisms, therapeutic or
refractive contact lenses and the adaption or adjustment of frames and
lenses used in connection therewith; and
(c) The prescription and provision of visual therapy, therapeutic
aids, and other optical devices((, and the treatment with topically
applied drugs by those licensed under this chapter and who meet the
requirements of subsections (2) and (3) of this section)); and
(d) The ascertainment of the perceptive, neural, muscular, or
pathological condition of the visual system; and
(e) The adaptation of prosthetic eyes.
(2)(a) Those persons using topical drugs for diagnostic purposes in
the practice of optometry shall have a minimum of sixty hours of
didactic and clinical instruction in general and ocular pharmacology as
applied to optometry, ((and for therapeutic purposes, an additional
minimum of seventy-five hours of didactic and clinical instruction)) as
established by the board, and certification from an institution of
higher learning, accredited by those agencies recognized by the United
States office of education or the council on postsecondary
accreditation to qualify for certification by the optometry board of
Washington to use drugs for diagnostic ((and therapeutic)) purposes.
(b) Those persons using or prescribing topical drugs for
therapeutic purposes in the practice of optometry must be certified
under (a) of this subsection, and must have an additional minimum of
seventy-five hours of didactic and clinical instruction as established
by the board, and certification from an institution of higher learning,
accredited by those agencies recognized by the United States office of
education or the council on postsecondary accreditation to qualify for
certification by the optometry board of Washington to use drugs for
therapeutic purposes.
(c) Those persons using or prescribing drugs administered orally
for diagnostic or therapeutic purposes in the practice of optometry
shall be certified under (b) of this subsection, and shall have an
additional minimum of sixteen hours of didactic and eight hours of
supervised clinical instruction as established by the board, and
certification from an institution of higher learning, accredited by
those agencies recognized by the United States office of education or
the council on postsecondary accreditation to qualify for certification
by the optometry board of Washington to administer, dispense, or
prescribe oral drugs for diagnostic or therapeutic purposes.
(d) Those persons administering epinephrine by injection for
treatment of anaphylactic shock in the practice of optometry must be
certified under (b) of this subsection and must have an additional
minimum of four hours of didactic and supervised clinical instruction,
as established by the board, and certification from an institution of
higher learning, accredited by those agencies recognized by the United
States office of education or the council on postsecondary
accreditation to qualify for certification by the optometry board to
administer epinephrine by injection.
(e) Such course or courses shall be the fiscal responsibility of
the participating and attending optometrist.
(3) The board shall establish a ((schedule)) list of topical drugs
for diagnostic and treatment purposes limited to the practice of
optometry, and no person licensed pursuant to this chapter shall
prescribe, dispense, purchase, possess, or administer drugs except as
authorized and to the extent permitted by the board.
(4) The board must establish a list of oral Schedule III through V
controlled substances and any oral legend drugs, with the approval of
and after consultation with the board of pharmacy. No person licensed
under this chapter may use, prescribe, dispense, purchase, possess, or
administer these drugs except as authorized and to the extent permitted
by the board. No optometrist may use, prescribe, dispense, or
administer oral corticosteroids.
(a) The board, with the approval of and in consultation with the
board of pharmacy, must establish, by rule, specific guidelines for the
prescription and administration of drugs by optometrists, so that
licensed optometrists and persons filling their prescriptions have a
clear understanding of which drugs and which dosages or forms are
included in the authority granted by this section.
(b) An optometrist may not:
(i) Prescribe, dispense, or administer a controlled substance for
more than seven days in treating a particular patient for a single
trauma, episode, or condition or for pain associated with or related to
the trauma, episode, or condition; or
(ii) Prescribe an oral drug within ninety days following ophthalmic
surgery unless the optometrist consults with the treating
ophthalmologist.
(c) If treatment exceeding the limitation in (b)(i) of this
subsection is indicated, the patient must be referred to a physician
licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW.
(d) The prescription or administration of drugs as authorized in
this section is specifically limited to those drugs appropriate to
treatment of diseases or conditions of the human eye and the adnexa
that are within the scope of practice of optometry. The prescription
or administration of drugs for any other purpose is not authorized by
this section.
(5) The board shall develop a means of identification and
verification of optometrists certified to use therapeutic drugs for the
purpose of issuing prescriptions as authorized by this section.
(6) Nothing in this chapter may be construed to authorize the use,
prescription, dispensing, purchase, possession, or administration of
any Schedule I or II controlled substance. The provisions of this
subsection must be strictly construed.
(7) With the exception of the administration of epinephrine by
injection for the treatment of anaphylactic shock, no injections or
infusions may be administered by an optometrist.
(8) Nothing in this chapter may be construed to authorize
optometrists to perform ophthalmic surgery. Ophthalmic surgery is
defined as any invasive procedure in which human tissue is cut,
ablated, or otherwise penetrated by incision, injection, laser,
ultrasound, or other means, in order to: Treat human eye diseases;
alter or correct refractive error; or alter or enhance cosmetic
appearance. Nothing in this chapter limits an optometrist's ability to
use diagnostic instruments utilizing laser or ultrasound technology.
Ophthalmic surgery, as defined in this subsection, does not include
removal of superficial ocular foreign bodies, epilation of misaligned
eyelashes, placement of punctal or lacrimal plugs, diagnostic dilation
and irrigation of the lacrimal system, orthokeratology, prescription
and fitting of contact lenses with the purpose of altering refractive
error, or other similar procedures within the scope of practice of
optometry.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.53.140 and 1991 c 3 s 138 are each
amended to read
as follows:
It shall be unlawful for any person:
(1) To sell or barter, or offer to sell or barter any license
issued by the secretary; or
(2) To purchase or procure by barter any license with the intent to
use the same as evidence of the holder's qualification to practice
optometry; or
(3) To alter with fraudulent intent in any material regard such
license; or
(4) To use or attempt to use any such license which has been
purchased, fraudulently issued, counterfeited or materially altered as
a valid license; or
(5) To practice optometry under a false or assumed name, or as a
representative or agent of any person, firm or corporation with which
the licensee has no connection: PROVIDED, Nothing in this chapter nor
in the optometry law shall make it unlawful for any lawfully licensed
optometrist or association of lawfully licensed optometrists to
practice optometry under the name of any lawfully licensed optometrist
who may transfer by inheritance or otherwise the right to use such
name; or
(6) To practice optometry in this state either for him or herself
or any other individual, corporation, partnership, group, public or
private entity, or any member of the licensed healing arts without
having at the time of so doing a valid license issued by the secretary
of health; or
(7) To in any manner barter or give away as premiums either on his
or her own account or as agent or representative for any other purpose,
firm or corporation, any eyeglasses, spectacles, lenses or frames; or
(8) To use drugs in the practice of optometry, except ((those
topically applied for diagnostic or therapeutic purposes)) as
authorized under RCW 18.53.010; or
(9) To use advertising whether printed, radio, display, or of any
other nature, which is misleading or inaccurate in any material
particular, nor shall any such person in any way misrepresent any goods
or services (including but without limitation, its use, trademark,
grade, quality, size, origin, substance, character, nature, finish,
material, content, or preparation) or credit terms, values, policies,
services, or the nature or form of the business conducted; or
(10) To advertise the "free examination of eyes," "free
consultation," "consultation without obligation," "free advice," or any
words or phrases of similar import which convey the impression to the
public that eyes are examined free or of a character tending to deceive
or mislead the public, or in the nature of "bait advertising;" or
(11) To use an advertisement of a frame or mounting which is not
truthful in describing the frame or mounting and all its component
parts. Or advertise a frame or mounting at a price, unless it shall be
depicted in the advertisement without lenses inserted, and in addition
the advertisement must contain a statement immediately following, or
adjacent to the advertised price, that the price is for frame or
mounting only, and does not include lenses, eye examination and
professional services, which statement shall appear in type as large as
that used for the price, or advertise lenses or complete glasses, viz.:
frame or mounting with lenses included, at a price either alone or in
conjunction with professional services; or
(12) To use advertising, whether printed, radio, display, or of any
other nature, which inaccurately lays claim to a policy or continuing
practice of generally underselling competitors; or
(13) To use advertising, whether printed, radio, display or of any
other nature which refers inaccurately in any material particular to
any competitors or their goods, prices, values, credit terms, policies
or services; or
(14) To use advertising whether printed, radio, display, or of any
other nature, which states any definite amount of money as "down
payment" and any definite amount of money as a subsequent payment, be
it daily, weekly, monthly, or at the end of any period of time.

Sec. 3 RCW 69.41.030 and 1996 c 178 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be unlawful for any person to sell, deliver, or possess
any legend drug except upon the order or prescription of a physician
under chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic physician and surgeon under
chapter 18.57 RCW, an optometrist licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW who
is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010, a dentist
under chapter 18.32 RCW, a podiatric physician and surgeon under
chapter 18.22 RCW, a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW, a
commissioned medical or dental officer in the United States armed
forces or public health service in the discharge of his or her official
duties, a duly licensed physician or dentist employed by the veterans
administration in the discharge of his or her official duties, a
registered nurse or advanced registered nurse practitioner under
chapter 18.79 RCW when authorized by the nursing care quality assurance
commission, an osteopathic physician assistant under chapter 18.57A RCW
when authorized by the board of osteopathic medicine and surgery, a
physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW when authorized by the
medical quality assurance commission, a physician licensed to practice
medicine and surgery or a physician licensed to practice osteopathic
medicine and surgery, a dentist licensed to practice dentistry, a
podiatric physician and surgeon licensed to practice podiatric medicine
and surgery, or a veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary
medicine, in any province of Canada which shares a common border with
the state of Washington or in any state of the United States:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the above provisions shall not apply to sale,
delivery, or possession by drug wholesalers or drug manufacturers, or
their agents or employees, or to any practitioner acting within the
scope of his or her license, or to a common or contract carrier or
warehouseman, or any employee thereof, whose possession of any legend
drug is in the usual course of business or employment: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That nothing in this chapter or chapter 18.64 RCW shall
prevent a family planning clinic that is under contract with the
department of social and health services from selling, delivering,
possessing, and dispensing commercially prepackaged oral contraceptives
prescribed by authorized, licensed health care practitioners.

Sec. 4 RCW 69.50.101 and 1998 c 222 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, definitions of terms
shall be as indicated where used in this chapter:
(a) "Administer" means to apply a controlled substance, whether by
injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, directly to the
body of a patient or research subject by:
(1) a practitioner authorized to prescribe (or, by the
practitioner's authorized agent); or
(2) the patient or research subject at the direction and in the
presence of the practitioner.
(b) "Agent" means an authorized person who acts on behalf of or at
the direction of a manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser. It does
not include a common or contract carrier, public warehouseperson, or
employee of the carrier or warehouseperson.
(c) "Board" means the state board of pharmacy.
(d) "Controlled substance" means a drug, substance, or immediate
precursor included in Schedules I through V as set forth in federal or
state laws, or federal or board rules.
(e)(1) "Controlled substance analog" means a substance the chemical
structure of which is substantially similar to the chemical structure
of a controlled substance in Schedule I or II and:
(i) that has a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on
the central nervous system substantially similar to the stimulant,
depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of
a controlled substance included in Schedule I or II; or
(ii) with respect to a particular individual, that the individual
represents or intends to have a stimulant, depressant, or
hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system substantially
similar to the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the
central nervous system of a controlled substance included in Schedule
I or II.
(2) The term does not include:
(i) a controlled substance;
(ii) a substance for which there is an approved new drug
application;
(iii) a substance with respect to which an exemption is in effect
for investigational use by a particular person under Section 505 of the
federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 355, to the extent
conduct with respect to the substance is pursuant to the exemption; or
(iv) any substance to the extent not intended for human consumption
before an exemption takes effect with respect to the substance.
(f) "Deliver" or "delivery," means the actual or constructive
transfer from one person to another of a substance, whether or not
there is an agency relationship.
(g) "Department" means the department of health.
(h) "Dispense" means the interpretation of a prescription or order
for a controlled substance and, pursuant to that prescription or order,
the proper selection, measuring, compounding, labeling, or packaging
necessary to prepare that prescription or order for delivery.
(i) "Dispenser" means a practitioner who dispenses.
(j) "Distribute" means to deliver other than by administering or
dispensing a controlled substance.
(k) "Distributor" means a person who distributes.
(l) "Drug" means (1) a controlled substance recognized as a drug in
the official United States pharmacopoeia/national formulary or the
official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, or any
supplement to them; (2) controlled substances intended for use in the
diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in
individuals or animals; (3) controlled substances (other than food)
intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of
individuals or animals; and (4) controlled substances intended for use
as a component of any article specified in (1), (2), or (3) of this
subsection. The term does not include devices or their components,
parts, or accessories.
(m) "Drug enforcement administration" means the drug enforcement
administration in the United States Department of Justice, or its
successor agency.
(n) "Immediate precursor" means a substance:
(1) that the state board of pharmacy has found to be and by rule
designates as being the principal compound commonly used, or produced
primarily for use, in the manufacture of a controlled substance;
(2) that is an immediate chemical intermediary used or likely to be
used in the manufacture of a controlled substance; and
(3) the control of which is necessary to prevent, curtail, or limit
the manufacture of the controlled substance.
(o) "Isomer" means an optical isomer, but in RCW 69.50.101(r)(5),
69.50.204(a) (12) and (34), and 69.50.206(a)(4), the term includes any
geometrical isomer; in RCW 69.50.204(a) (8) and (42), and 69.50.210(c)
the term includes any positional isomer; and in RCW 69.50.204(a)(35),
69.50.204(c), and 69.50.208(a) the term includes any positional or
geometric isomer.
(p) "Manufacture" means the production, preparation, propagation,
compounding, conversion, or processing of a controlled substance,
either directly or indirectly or by extraction from substances of
natural origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by
a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis, and includes any
packaging or repackaging of the substance or labeling or relabeling of
its container. The term does not include the preparation, compounding,
packaging, repackaging, labeling, or relabeling of a controlled
substance:
(1) by a practitioner as an incident to the practitioner's
administering or dispensing of a controlled substance in the course of
the practitioner's professional practice; or
(2) by a practitioner, or by the practitioner's authorized agent
under the practitioner's supervision, for the purpose of, or as an
incident to, research, teaching, or chemical analysis and not for sale.
(q) "Marijuana" or "marihuana" means all parts of the plant
Cannabis, whether growing or not; the seeds thereof; the resin
extracted from any part of the plant; and every compound, manufacture,
salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seeds or
resin. The term does not include the mature stalks of the plant, fiber
produced from the stalks, oil or cake made from the seeds of the plant,
any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or
preparation of the mature stalks (except the resin extracted
therefrom), fiber, oil, or cake, or the sterilized seed of the plant
which is incapable of germination.
(r) "Narcotic drug" means any of the following, whether produced
directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of vegetable
origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a
combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:
(1) Opium, opium derivative, and any derivative of opium or opium
derivative, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers,
whenever the existence of the salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is
possible within the specific chemical designation. The term does not
include the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium.
(2) Synthetic opiate and any derivative of synthetic opiate,
including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers,
esters, and ethers, whenever the existence of the isomers, esters,
ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation.
(3) Poppy straw and concentrate of poppy straw.
(4) Coca leaves, except coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves
from which cocaine, ecgonine, and derivatives or ecgonine or their
salts have been removed.
(5) Cocaine, or any salt, isomer, or salt of isomer thereof.
(6) Cocaine base.
(7) Ecgonine, or any derivative, salt, isomer, or salt of isomer
thereof.
(8) Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any quantity
of any substance referred to in subparagraphs (1) through (7).
(s) "Opiate" means any substance having an addiction-forming or
addiction-sustaining liability similar to morphine or being capable of
conversion into a drug having addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining
liability. The term includes opium, substances derived from opium
(opium derivatives), and synthetic opiates. The term does not include,
unless specifically designated as controlled under RCW 69.50.201, the
dextrorotatory isomer of 3-methoxy-n-methylmorphinan and its salts
(dextromethorphan). The term includes the racemic and levorotatory
forms of dextromethorphan.
(t) "Opium poppy" means the plant of the species Papaver somniferum
L., except its seeds.
(u) "Person" means individual, corporation, business trust, estate,
trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government,
governmental subdivision or agency, or any other legal or commercial
entity.
(v) "Poppy straw" means all parts, except the seeds, of the opium
poppy, after mowing.
(w) "Practitioner" means:
(1) A physician under chapter 18.71 RCW, a physician assistant
under chapter 18.71A RCW, an osteopathic physician and surgeon under
chapter 18.57 RCW, an optometrist licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW who
is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010 subject to any
limitations in RCW 18.53.010, a dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW, a
podiatric physician and surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW, a veterinarian
under chapter 18.92 RCW, a registered nurse, advanced registered nurse
practitioner, or licensed practical nurse under chapter 18.79 RCW, a
pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW or a scientific investigator under
this chapter, licensed, registered or otherwise permitted insofar as is
consistent with those licensing laws to distribute, dispense, conduct
research with respect to or administer a controlled substance in the
course of their professional practice or research in this state.
(2) A pharmacy, hospital or other institution licensed, registered,
or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct research with
respect to or to administer a controlled substance in the course of
professional practice or research in this state.
(3) A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery, a
physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery, a
dentist licensed to practice dentistry, a podiatric physician and
surgeon licensed to practice podiatric medicine and surgery, or a
veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary medicine in any state of
the United States.
(x) "Prescription" means an order for controlled substances issued
by a practitioner duly authorized by law or rule in the state of
Washington to prescribe controlled substances within the scope of his
or her professional practice for a legitimate medical purpose.
(y) "Production" includes the manufacturing, planting, cultivating,
growing, or harvesting of a controlled substance.
(z) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.
(aa) "State," unless the context otherwise requires, means a state
of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of
Puerto Rico, or a territory or insular possession subject to the
jurisdiction of the United States.
(bb) "Ultimate user" means an individual who lawfully possesses a
controlled substance for the individual's own use or for the use of a
member of the individual's household or for administering to an animal
owned by the individual or by a member of the individual's household.
(cc) "Electronic communication of prescription information" means
the communication of prescription information by computer, or the
transmission of an exact visual image of a prescription by facsimile,
or other electronic means for original prescription information or
prescription refill information for a Schedule III-V controlled
substance between an authorized practitioner and a pharmacy or the
transfer of prescription information for a controlled substance from
one pharmacy to another pharmacy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any
provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---