BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A capital budget is hereby adopted and,
subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the several dollar
amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as shall be
sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby
appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during
the period ending June 30, 2005, out of the several funds specified in
this act.

PART 1
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Deferred Maintenance Reduction Backlog Projects: Regional Archive
(04-1-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: This appropriation is for the changes to
the central Washington regional archives HVAC system to upgrade control
systems.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Rural Washington Loan Fund (88-2-002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $558,000
Rural Washington Loan Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,739,295
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,297,295

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,353,072
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,650,367

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Rural Washington Loan Fund (RWLF) (04-4-009)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,900,000
Rural Washington Loan Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,581,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,481,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,132,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,613,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Building for the Arts (00-2-005)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation shall support the
projects listed in section 109, chapter 8, Laws of 2001 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,963,092

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,886,908
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Building for the Arts (04-4-007)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is subject to the
provisions of RCW 43.63A.750. The following projects are eligible for
funding:

Projects Location Recommendation

Cornish College Seattle $700,000

Velocity dance center Seattle $35,000

Artspace (Tashiro Kaplan) Seattle $300,000

Friends of Gladish Pullman $37,000

Seattle art museum Seattle $700,000

Pratt fine arts center Seattle $700,000

Broadway center Tacoma $400,000

Vashon allied arts Vashon $80,000

Columbia city gallery Seattle $110,000

Lincoln theatre Mt. Vernon $110,000

Squaxin Island museum Shelton $100,000

Historic cooper school Seattle $32,000

Olympic theatre arts Sequim $265,000

S'Klallam longhouse Kingston $200,000

Western Washington center for the arts Port Orchard $165,000

Richland players theatre Richland $51,000

Orcas sculpture park Eastsound $15,000

Subtotal $4,000,000

Alternate Projects

Children's museum Everett $200,000

Pacific Northwest ballet Bellevue $268,000

World kite museum Long Beach $32,000

Subtotal $500,000

TOTAL $4,500,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Community Economic Revitalization Board (CERB) (00-2-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
conditions and limitations in section 123, chapter 8, Laws of 2001 2nd
sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,871,748

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,769,252
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,641,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Community Economic Revitalization (CERB) (02-4-003)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation must be used solely to
provide loans to eligible local governments and grants to the extent
permissible by law. The department shall ensure that all principal and
interest payments from loans made on moneys from this account are paid
into this account.

Reappropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,431,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,931,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Community Economic Revitalization Board (CERB) (04-4-008)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for loans to local governments.

Appropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,491,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,718,769
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,209,769

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
County Public Facility Construction (00-2-010)

Reappropriation:
Distressed County Facilities Construction Loan
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $538,989

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,461,011
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Cancer Research Facility Grant (01-S-005)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is provided as a grant for equipment and
facilities improvements for a prostate cancer research project at the
University of Washington medical center. The reappropriation must be
matched by an equal amount from nonstate sources.
(2) The legislature does not intend to reappropriate amounts not
expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Public Works Trust Fund (01-H-001)

Reappropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $93,593,068

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $93,593,068

NEW SECTION. Sec. 112 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Public Works Trust Fund (02-4-013)

Reappropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $184,479,943

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $103,893,068
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $288,372,911

NEW SECTION. Sec. 113 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Public Works Trust Fund (04-4-001)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Expenditures of the appropriation shall
comply with chapter 43.155 RCW.

Appropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $261,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,319,499,999
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,580,699,999

NEW SECTION. Sec. 114 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Fort Vancouver National Historic Reserve (01-S-002)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,987,248

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,752
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 115 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Chewelah Peak Environmental Learning Center (01-S-003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,221
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,977,779
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 116 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Fox Theater Project (01-S-006)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $688,006
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,311,994
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 117 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Des Moines Beach Park - Structure Relocation (01-S-010)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $246,875

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,125
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 118 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Upper Kittitas County - Emergency Management Service Facility
(01-S-012)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funds are provided as a matching grant for enhanced emergency
services related to highway travel and incidental local needs. The
funds shall be retained in allotment reserve until the office of
financial management approves a plan submitted by the recipient
organization for the generation of matching funds and the provision for
emergency services needs on Interstate 90. The office of financial
management shall identify the recipient entity or organization that is
best suited to provide enhanced emergency services for the Cle Elum/I-90 region.
(2) The legislature does not intend to reappropriate amounts not
expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $908,500

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,500
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $920,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 119 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
West Central Community Center (01-S-016)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,431

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,569
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 120 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Milton Skate Park (01-H-016)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $115,537

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,463
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $117,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 121 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Pierce County Fairgrounds (01-H-017)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $95,125

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,875
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 122 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Coastal Erosion Grants (01-S-019)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) Funds are provided for coastal erosion grants in southwest
Washington in partnership with other state and federal funds. Grays
Harbor county is the lead agency in the administration of the grants.
(b) The legislature does not intend to reappropriate amounts not
expended by June 30, 2005.
(2) The appropriation of $750,000 is for a study to assess the most
cost-effective alternatives for addressing erosion at Fort Canby's
Benson beach. The study is to be done by the southwest Washington
coastal partnership involving local, state, and federal agencies; Grays
Harbor county is the lead agency in the administration of this
appropriation.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $583,155
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $666,845
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 123 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
City of Grandview Infrastructure Development (02-S-006)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is provided for allocation by the
department to the city of Grandview for infrastructure development,
including but not limited to streets, water, sewer, and other utilities
associated with the siting of a warehouse distribution center.
(2) The legislature does not intend to reappropriate amounts not
expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 124 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Local/Community Projects: Job Creation and Infrastructure Projects
(02-S-005)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation shall support the projects as listed in
section 202, chapter 238, Laws of 2002 as amended by section 901,
chapter 10, Laws of 2003.
(2) The legislature does not intend to reappropriate amounts not
expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,213,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,213,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 125 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Community Services Facilities Program (02-4-007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of RCW 43.63A.125. The reappropriation shall support the
projects in section 111, chapter 8, Laws of 2001 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,814,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,911,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,725,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 126 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Community Services Facilities Program (04-4-006)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.125. The following projects
are eligible for funding:

Projects Location Recommendation

Assistance league Everett $400,000

Benton affordable housing Richland $25,000

Boys and girls clubs/Pierce county Tacoma $187,500

Boys and girls clubs/Thurston county Olympia $102,175

Catholic community services Seattle $400,000

Children's therapy center Kent $250,000

Eritrean association Seattle $346,000

First AME child/family center Seattle $194,000

Girl scouts/Pacific peaks DuPont $400,000

Hopelink Carnation $201,521

Horizons Sunnyside $175,000

Kent youth/family services Kent $400,000

LIHI Seattle $131,084

Lopez children's center Lopez $220,000

Neighborhood House Seattle $60,000

Opportunity council Bellingham $400,000

Senior services/Seattle King county Seattle $400,000

S'Klallam development fund Kingston $69,000

Southeast Washington center
for the deaf Pasco $27,000

St. Anne's childcare center Spokane $400,000

St. James family center Cathlamet $18,000

Valley boys and girls club Clarkston $400,000

Yelm community center Yelm $400,000

YMCA/Snohomish county Marysville $275,000

Youth Orion center Seattle $50,000

TOTAL $5,931,280

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,931,280

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,931,280

NEW SECTION. Sec. 127 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Drinking Water Assistance Program (02-4-008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding from the state public works trust fund program shall be
matched with new federal sources to improve the quality of drinking
water in the state, and shall be used solely for projects that achieve
the goals of the federal safe drinking water act.
(2) The department shall report to the appropriate committees of
the legislature by January 1, 2004, on the progress of the program,
including administrative and technical assistance procedures, the
application process, and funding priorities.

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 128 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Drinking Water Assistance Account (04-4-002)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Expenditures of the appropriation shall comply with RCW
70.119A.170.
(2) The state building construction account appropriation is
provided solely for grants for the development of plans, engineering
and financing reports, acquiring land and facilities, and other
preconstruction activities associated with the development of water
storage and groundwater storage and recovery projects. Proposed
projects must be consistent with the recommendations of the water
storage task force and the governor's water strategy. Priority for the
use of these funds must be given to: Projects that have been
identified for early action through watershed plans, comprehensive
irrigation district management plans, or similar plans; to projects
that are part of an approved habitat conservation plan or other
intergovernmental agreement; or to joint projects with federal entities
such as the bureau of reclamation. The department shall develop and
administer this grants program in conjunction with the departments of
agriculture and fish and wildlife. Decisions regarding which projects
are funded must be by unanimous agreement of all three departments.
The department shall seek local and federal funds to augment the
funding provided by this appropriation.

Appropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 129 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Drinking Water SRF - Authorization to Use Loan Repayments
(04-4-010)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Expenditures of the appropriation shall
comply with RCW 70.119A.170.

Appropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 130 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Farmworker Housing Assistance (02-4-011)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is provided solely for facilities housing
low-income migrant, seasonal, or temporary farmworkers.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature that operation of the
facilities built under this section be in compliance with 8 U.S.C. Sec.
1342.
(3) The department shall minimize the amount of these funds that
are utilized for staff and administrative purposes or other operational
expenses.
(4) The department shall work with the farmworker housing advisory
committee to prioritize funding of projects to the areas of highest
need.
(5) Funding may also be provided, to the extent qualified projects
are submitted, for health and safety projects.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 131 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing
(02-4-010)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Meeting the conditions and limitations under section 117,
chapter 8, Laws of 2001 2nd sp. sess. when combined with the prior
biennial expenditures.
(2) The reappropriation in this section shall not be included in
the annual funds available for determining the administrative costs
authorized under RCW 43.185.050.

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 132 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing
(04-4-003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) At least $9,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for
weatherization administered through the energy matchmakers program.
(2) $5,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to promote
development of safe and affordable housing units for persons eligible
for services from the division of developmental disabilities within the
department of social and health services.
(3) $2,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for grants
to nonprofit organizations and public housing authorities for revolving
loan, self-help housing programs for low and moderate income families.
(4) $1,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for
shelters, transitional housing, or other housing facilities for victims
of domestic violence.
(5) $8,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for
facilities housing low-income migrant, seasonal, or temporary
farmworkers. It is the intent of the legislature that operation of the
facilities built under this section be in compliance with 8 U.S.C. Sec.
1342. The department shall minimize the amount of these funds that are
utilized for staff and administrative purposes or other operational
expenses. The department shall work with the farmworker housing
advisory committee to prioritize funding of projects to the areas of
highest need. Funding may also be provided, to the extent qualified
projects are submitted, for health and safety projects.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $275,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 133 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Housing for Homeless Families with Children (02-4-012 and 04-4-005)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation in this section is for project number
02-4-012. The appropriation in this section is for project number
04-4-005.
(2) The appropriation and reappropriation in this section are
provided solely for the development of emergency shelters and
transitional housing opportunities for homeless families with children.
The department shall minimize the amount of funds that are utilized for
staff and administrative purposes or other operational expenses.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 134 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Highline School District Aircraft Noise Mitigation (03-H-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
conditions and limitations in section 205, chapter 238, Laws of 2002.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,400,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 135 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Local/Community Projects (04-4-011)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The projects must comply with RCW 43.63A.125(2)(c) and other
standard requirements for community projects administered by the
department.
(2) The appropriation is provided for the following list of
projects:

Project Location Amount

Art Crate field Bethel $250,000

Asia Pacific cultural center Tacoma $100,000

Asotin aquatic center Asotin $250,000

Auburn YMCA Auburn $250,000

Bank restoration: Skykomish river Snohomish county $181,000

Bellevue open space enhancement Bellevue $900,000

Bremerton waterfront projects Bremerton $1,000,000

Burke museum Seattle $500,000

Capital arts center and sculpture garden Olympia $250,000

Capitol theatre Yakima $1,000,000

Chinese reconciliation project Tacoma $300,000

Clark lake park Kent $400,000

Colman school Seattle $300,000

Confluence Lewis and Clark Various $3,000,000

Crossroads community center Bellevue $500,000

Eastside heritage center Bellevue $200,000

Eatonville city projects Eatonville $150,000

Edmonds center for the arts Edmonds $500,000

Farmers market and maritime park Bellingham $1,000,000

Firstenberg community center Vancouver $500,000

Former capitol historic marker Olympia $2,000

Friends of the falls Spokane $250,000

Frontier park Pierce county $165,000

Graham fire district emergency services center Graham $150,000

Grandmother's Hill Tukwila $300,000

Greenbank farm Whidbey Island $1,500,000

Highline historical society Highline $499,000

Historical cabins project Federal Way $106,000

Hugs foundation-city of Raymond Raymond $21,500

Japanese-American memorial Bainbridge Island $2,000,000

McCaw hall Seattle $1,500,000

Naval museum Bremerton $750,000

New Phoebe house Tacoma $25,000

Orting schools evacuation bridge Orting $250,000

Pine lake park phase 2 Sammamish $300,000

Rainier historical museum/community center Rainier $20,000

Ritzville public development authority Ritzville $50,000

Seattle heart alliance Seattle $1,000,000

South Hill community park Pierce county $250,000

South Wenatchee family services center Wenatchee $500,000

Stonerose interpretive center Republic $8,000

Sweetwater creek restoration Hood Canal $500,000

Thyme Patch park Seattle $5,000

Ustalady beach acquisition Island county $135,000

West Hylebos state park Federal Way $250,000

William Factory business incubator Tacoma $560,000

Wing Luke Asian art museum Seattle $1,500,000

Yakima ball fields Yakima $350,000

Youth development center Federal Way $100,000

TOTAL $24,577,500

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,577,500

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,577,500

NEW SECTION. Sec. 136 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
State Games (04-4-850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: If the department cannot identify federal
funds for this project to the office of financial management by
December 1, 2003, this appropriation shall lapse.

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 137 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Merrill Hall Fire Repairs - Horticulture Building (01-H-020)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In addition to the funds provided in this section, the
University of Washington may utilize appropriated funds for minor works
to address emergent needs for Merrill hall.
(2) The legislature does not intend to reappropriate amounts not
expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 138 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Budget System Improvements (02-1-004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
following conditions and limitations in section 147, chapter 8, Laws of
2001 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $141,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 139 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Capital Monitoring (04-2-028)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The office of financial management shall review each agency
request for project funding for inclusion in the 2004 supplemental
capital budget and the 2005-07 capital budget with particular emphasis
on major projects to ensure that the amount requested by the agency is
appropriate for predesign, design, and construction, depending on the
phase of the project being requested. The office of financial
management shall pay particular attention to: (a) Whether the
construction phase of the project is consistent with the predesign and
design when applicable; (b) that the budgeted amount requested is at an
appropriate level for the various components that make up the cost of
the project such as project management; (c) that standard measurements
such as cost per square foot are reasonable; and (d) that any equipment
related to the project is an appropriate capital expenditure. The
office of financial management may seek assistance from the department
of general administration.
(2) The office of financial management shall consult with state
agencies, higher education institutions, and the legislature and
recommend criteria for funding equipment in the capital budget. This
recommendation shall be made to the legislative fiscal committees by
September 1, 2003.
(3) $150,000 of this appropriation shall be used to conduct a study
of the realignment of military forces and alternative uses of the land
and facilities currently used by the Washington State military
department readiness centers and armories for the Washington army
national guard.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 140 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
East Plaza Repairs (96-1-002)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The scope of this project does not include
a pedestrian bridge or overpass to or from Office Building Two. No
funds from this appropriation or any other appropriation shall be
expended for a pedestrian bridge or overpass.

Reappropriation:
State Vehicle Parking Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,567,200
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,425,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,992,200

NEW SECTION. Sec. 141 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Office Building Two Rehabilitation (98-1-007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: No funds in this appropriation shall be
expended for a pedestrian bridge in the east plaza repairs project (96-1-002) or in this project.

Reappropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,771,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,629,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 142 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Transportation Building Preservation (98-1-008)

Reappropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,001,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,863,065
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,090,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,954,065

NEW SECTION. Sec. 143 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Heritage Park/Capitol Lake (00-1-007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $405,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,362,700
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,767,700

NEW SECTION. Sec. 144 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Heritage Park (01-H-004)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) This appropriation shall be used to complete the northeast
sector of Heritage park, the area east of Capitol lake and north of the
Burlington Northern-Santa Fe railroad tracks, and the hillside located
north of the temple of justice.
(2) The department shall give priority to developing the park so
that underground utilities are installed, topsoil laid, and grass
planted in the northeast sector. No funds are to be used to demolish
the existing restroom/storage facility or to build a new facility.

Reappropriation:
Capitol Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $976,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,124,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 145 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Legislative Building: Rehabilitation and Capital Addition
(01-1-008)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is
subject to the conditions and limitations of section 109, chapter 238,
Laws of 2002 and section 904, chapter 10, Laws of 2003.

Reappropriation:
Capital Historic District Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $68,450,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,450,000
Appropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,031,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $102,781,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 146 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Capitol Campus: Infrastructure Preservation (02-1-003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $901,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $849,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 147 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
North Cascades Gateway Center Minor Works (02-1-004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $362,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $488,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 148 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Thurston County Facilities: Preservation (02-1-002)

Reappropriation:
Capitol Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $518,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,466,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,984,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,925,774
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,909,774

NEW SECTION. Sec. 149 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Job Creation and Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $210,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $540,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 150 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation: Capitol Campus
(04-1-003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: This appropriation shall not be used for
studies.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,425,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,425,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 151 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Emergency Repairs (04-1-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation shall only be used for
unanticipated building or infrastructure repairs necessary for the
protection of capital assets and protection of health or safety. The
legislature does not intend for this appropriation to be used for
routine maintenance.

Appropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,100,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 152 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Engineering and Architectural Services (04-2-014)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section shall be used to provide
project management services to state agencies as required by RCW
43.19.450 that are essential and mandated activities defined as core
services and are included in the engineering and architectural
services' responsibilities and task list for general public works
projects of normal complexity. The general public works projects
included are all those financed by the state capital budget, 2003
legislative session, with individual total project values up to $20
million.
(2) The department may negotiate agreements with agencies for
additional fees to manage projects financed by financial contracts,
other alternative financing, projects with a total value greater than
$20 million, or for the nonstate funded portion of projects with mixed
funding sources.
(3) The department shall review each community and technical
college request and the requests of other client agencies for funding
any project over $2.5 million for inclusion in the 2004 supplemental
capital budget and the 2005-07 capital budget to ensure that the amount
requested by the agency is appropriate for predesign, design, and
construction, depending on the phase of the project being requested.
The department shall pay particular attention: (a) That the budgeted
amount requested is at an appropriate level for the various components
that make up the cost of the project such as project management; and
(b) that standard measurements such as cost per square foot are
reasonable. The department shall also assist the office of financial
management with review of other agency projects as requested.

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,909,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,537,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,586,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,586,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 153 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Historic Buildings - Exteriors Preservation (04-1-012)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: This appropriation is for the sole purpose
of capital projects on the capitol campus that correct immediate
restoration deficiencies. It does not include survey, planning, or
interior work.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,475,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,600,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,075,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 154 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Legislative Buildings - O'Brien and Newhouse Building Improvements
(01-H-021)

Reappropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities
Account -- State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 155 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
State Capitol Master Plan Update (04-2-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall update the state
capital master plan. The department and the insurance commissioner
shall revise their agreement for the department to study constructing
a new building on the capitol campus to house the insurance
commissioner and others and incorporate that study into the state
master plan update. The $100,000 the insurance commissioner is
providing for that study shall be used for the state capital master
plan update under this section.

Appropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 156 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Minor Works - Facility Preservation: Statewide (04-1-004)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The purpose of this appropriation is to address minor works
projects under one million dollars total project cost, regardless of
whether the project is completed in one biennia.
(2) The appropriation shall not be used for studies, surveys, or
carpet replacement.

Appropriation:
State Vehicle Parking Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $220,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,055,000
General Administration Service Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,270,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,545,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,545,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 157 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Bremerton Readiness Center (02-2-004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
conditions and limitations in section 183, chapter 8, Laws of 2001 2nd
sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,100,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,800,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $923,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,823,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 158 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Combined Support Maintenance Shop (02-2-011)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,281,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,544,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,825,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 159 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Minor Works to Support Federal Construction Projects (02-1-001)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,300,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,525,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,525,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 160 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Energy Management Control Systems (04-2-006)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $365,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $365,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 161 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Preservation Projects - Statewide (02-1-006)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $235,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $485,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 162 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Minor Works - Preservation (04-1-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The purpose of this appropriation is to
correct deficiencies to state-owned facilities and does not include
parking lot repairs or paving.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,799,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,799,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 163 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Job Creation and Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation shall support the projects as listed in
section 207, chapter 238, Laws of 2002 2nd sp. sess.
(2) The legislature does not intend to reappropriate amounts not
expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 164 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Communication Security - Emergency Management Division-Building No.
20 (04-1-002)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 165 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Minor Works to Support Federal Construction Projects (04-1-003)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,150,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,798,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,948,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,948,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 166 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Infrastructure Savings (04-1-850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 915 of this act may have their remaining funds transferred
to this appropriation for other preservation projects approved by the
office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

NEW SECTION. Sec. 167 FOR THE STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER
Washington State Convention and Trade Center Omnibus Minor Works
(04-1-002)

Appropriation:
State Convention and Trade Center Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,045,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,045,000

(End of part)

PART 2
HUMAN SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Echo Glen Children's Center - Site: Infrastructure Improvements
(96-2-229)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $925,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,369,607
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,794,607

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Green Hill School Redevelopment: 416 Bed Institution (96-2-230)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,177,721
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,477,721

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Echo Glen Children's Center - Vocational Education: Construction
(98-2-211)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: To the extent that the department realizes
project savings, funds reappropriated in this section may be
transferred to infrastructure savings or used for a facilities
condition assessment and preservation survey.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,236,667
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,386,667

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Western State Hospital: Legal Offender Unit (98-2-052)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The purpose of the appropriations is to
complete construction, renovate wards, and demolish North Hall.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,590,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,701,751
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,294,341

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Child Study and Treatment Center - Cottages: Modifications, Phase
3 (00-1-015)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,741,600
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,641,600

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Eastern State Hospital: Campus Renovation, Phase 5 (00-2-002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,600,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Echo Glen Children's Center - Eleven Cottages: Renovation
(00-1-041)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,490,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $525,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,265,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Maple Lane School - Multi-Services Building: Renovation (00-1-003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Special Commitment Center - Secure Facility: Construction, Phase
3 (00-2-001)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: To the extent that the department projects
savings and efficiencies through design or scope changes, funds
appropriated in this section may be transferred to minor works--health,
safety, and code requirements (04-1-111) for expenditure for minor
works projects.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,158,212

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,665,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,823,212

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Special Commitment Center - Less Restrictive Alternative: New
Building (02-2-075)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: To the extent that the department projects
savings and efficiencies through design or scope changes, funds
appropriated in this section may be transferred to minor works--health,
safety, and code requirements (04-1-111) for expenditure for minor
works projects.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,132,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,207,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Special Commitment Center - Regional SCTF: New 12 Bed Facility
(04-2-502)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Child Care Facilities for Students and State Employees (01-S-003)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funds are provided to recapitalize child care facilities grant
programs and provide for administration of the program. These funds
may be used by state agencies and higher education institutions to
provide child care facilities for employees and students. Grants to
state agencies will be provided and administered per chapter 41.04 RCW.
Grants for higher education child care facilities will be transferred
into accounts administered through chapter 28B.135 RCW.
(2) The department may expend up to $95,000 in the 2003-2005
biennium for administration and contract management.
(3) The legislature does not intend to reappropriate amounts not
expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Eastern State Hospital - Activity Therapy Building: Renovation
(02-1-060)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,000
Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Statewide: Omnibus Preservation Projects (02-1-069)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) No expenditures from the reappropriation should be made for
developmental disabilities facilities subject to closure.
(2) $340,000 of the state building construction account--state
reappropriation is to be expended on the oakridge group home for
miscellaneous repairs and is contingent upon the office of financial
management transferring that amount from infrastructure project:
Savings (02-1-053) to this appropriation by June 30, 2003.
(3) The legislature does not intend to reappropriate amounts not
expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,450,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,385,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,835,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,005,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,840,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 215 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Statewide: Omnibus Programmatic Projects (02-2-070)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $385,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $425,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $810,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $190,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 216 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Western State Hospital - Power Plant: Revisions/Smokestack Removal
(03-1-012)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,080,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 217 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Department of Social and Health Services: Capital Project
Management (04-1-110)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 218 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Juvenile Rehabilitation - Acute Mental Health Unit: New Facility
(04-2-203)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The purpose of this appropriation is to
complete a predesign and siting study on existing state owned property
that addresses the need for a functional program and the optimum size
of the program based on forecasted population.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,502,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,402,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 219 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Lakeland Village - Cottages: Renovation, Phases 3 and 4 (04-1-402)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 220 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Maple Lane School - Steam Plant and Tunnels: Upgrade (04-1-207)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 221 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works - Program: Mental Health (04-2-365)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 222 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (04-1-111)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 223 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (04-1-112)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 224 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (04-1-113)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 225 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Statewide - Emergency Repairs (04-1-116)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation shall only be used for
unanticipated building or infrastructure repairs necessary for the
protection of capital assets or protection of health or safety. The
legislature does not intend for this appropriation to be used for
routine maintenance.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 226 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Statewide - Hazards Abatement and Demolition (04-1-119)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) No more than $50,000 of this appropriation shall be used for
hazardous materials surveys.
(2) The remainder of the appropriation shall be used to demolish
abandoned structures at facilities other than those managed by the
division of developmental disabilities as approved by the office of
financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 227 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Infrastructure Savings (04-1-850)

Projects that are completed in accordance with section 915 of this
act may have their remaining funds transferred to this appropriation
for other preservation projects approved by the office of financial
management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Sec. 228 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
Eastern State Hospital: Legal Offender Unit (98-2-002)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the conditions
and limitations of section 906 of this act.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,365,463))
$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,330,537
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,696,000))
$15,580,537

NEW SECTION. Sec. 229 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Drinking Water Assistance Program (02-4-004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for
an interagency agreement with the department of community, trade, and
economic development to make, in cooperation with the public works
board, loans to local governments and public water systems for projects
and activities to protect and improve the state's drinking water
facilities and resources.

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 230 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Drinking Water Assistance Program (04-4-003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: This appropriation is provided solely for
an interagency agreement with the department of community, trade, and
economic development to make, in cooperation with the public works
board, loans to local governments and public water systems for projects
and activities to protect and improve the state's drinking water
facilities and resources.

Appropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,122,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,122,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 231 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Public Health Laboratory: Biosafety Level 3 Facility (02-2-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,231,485

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,231,485

NEW SECTION. Sec. 232 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Public Health Laboratory: C Wing Remodel (02-2-002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $295,900

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $295,900

NEW SECTION. Sec. 233 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Public Health Laboratory: Chiller Plant Upgrade (02-1-004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,355,142

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,355,142

NEW SECTION. Sec. 234 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Public Health Laboratory: E Wing Remodel (02-2-003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $295,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $295,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 235 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Retsil Veterans' Home: Minor Works Mechanical/Electrical/HVAC
(02-1-001)

Reappropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $520,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $520,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 236 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Retsil: 240 Bed Nursing Facility (02-2-008)

Reappropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,730,700
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,691,590
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,558,410
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,980,700

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,980,700

NEW SECTION. Sec. 237 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Historic District Management Plan (04-1-850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is for the completion of
an historic district management plan that will address a federal
requirement related to demolition of historically significant buildings
and other structures as identified by the state historical preservation
office.

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 238 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Emergency Repairs (04-1-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation shall only be used for
unanticipated building or infrastructure repairs necessary for the
protection of capital assets or protection of health or safety. The
legislature does not intend for this appropriation to be used for
routine maintenance.

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 239 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Infrastructure Savings (04-1-851)

Projects that are completed in accordance with section 915 of this
act may have their remaining funds transferred to this appropriation
for other preservation projects approved by the office of financial
management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

NEW SECTION. Sec. 240 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Correctional Industries Space (98-2-005)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,368,519

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,431,481
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 241 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Coyote Ridge Corrections Center: Expansion (98-2-011)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,054,117

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,607,834
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,661,951

NEW SECTION. Sec. 242 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Stafford Creek Corrections Center: Construction (98-2-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,436,433

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $191,151,952
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $197,588,385

NEW SECTION. Sec. 243 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Local Criminal Justice Facilities (99-2-003)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation from the state building construction
account--state appropriation is provided solely for grants to local
jurisdictions for jail capacity expansion projects. Grants provided in
this section shall be limited to up to $500,000 per jurisdiction.
(2) $500,000 of the state building construction account--state
reappropriation increase in this section is provided solely for grants
to local jurisdictions for the construction of jail beds.
(3) The legislature does not intend to reappropriate amounts not
expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,019,674
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,668,195
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,687,869

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,097,603
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,785,472

NEW SECTION. Sec. 244 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Violent Offender/Truth in Sentencing Grant Administration
(99-2-004)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $672,287
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $94,194
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $766,481

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $271,521
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,038,002

NEW SECTION. Sec. 245 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Monroe Corrections Center: 100 Bed Management and Segregation Unit
(00-2-008)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: It is the intent of the legislature to
explore the concept of an anaerobic digester to treat dairy nutrients
in Snohomish county, with the Monroe honor farm being one possible site
for such a project. The department shall not sell, lease, or otherwise
dispose of the Monroe honor farm site until the department has
completed an evaluation of this site for an anaerobic digester and the
feasibility of selling or leasing the property to a cooperative venture
to construct and operate such a project. The department shall seek the
participation of the Tulalip tribes of Washington state, northwest
chinook recovery, the Washington state dairy federation, and others in
this evaluation, and shall report to the natural resource and fiscal
committees of the legislature no later than December 1, 2004.

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,964,679
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,575,906
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,540,585

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,674,031

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,223,416
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,100,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,538,032

NEW SECTION. Sec. 246 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: Intensive Management Unit
Improvements (00-1-025)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,100,964
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,600,964

NEW SECTION. Sec. 247 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Monroe Corrections Center: Regional Training Center (02-2-016)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,812,140

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $162,860
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,975,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 248 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Minor Works: Omnibus Preservation (02-1-015)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,124,489

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $494,758
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,619,247

NEW SECTION. Sec. 249 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Minor Works: Program (02-2-030)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,291,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $234,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,525,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 250 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Olympic Corrections Center: Replace Telecomm System (02-1-041)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $406,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,406,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 251 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Pine Lodge: Replace Telecommunication System (02-1-009)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $774,944

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $362,917
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,139,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 252 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Statewide Intensive Management Unit Repairs (02-1-040)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,544,656

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,344
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,612,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 253 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center: Building Water Pipe Replacement
Phase 2 (02-1-008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,281,299

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $412,701
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,694,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 254 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center: Domestic Water System Improvements
(02-1-007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $231,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,531,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 255 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center: Replace Steam/Condensate Piping
(02-1-006)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,170,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,170,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 256 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: Replace Electrical Supply System
(02-1-024)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,729,706
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,242,715

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $331,294
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,016,473
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,320,188

NEW SECTION. Sec. 257 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: Replace Sanitary/Domestic Water
Lines (02-1-026)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $870,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,499,687
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,569,687

NEW SECTION. Sec. 258 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Coyote Ridge Corrections Center: Expand Minimum Security Facility
by 210 Beds (03-2-002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,804,073

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $589,927
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,394,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 259 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
McNeil Island Corrections Center: Water Tank Replacement
(03-1-022)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,394,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,394,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 260 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
McNeil Island Corrections Center: Replace Submarine Electric Power
Cable (04-1-006)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,902,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $980,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,882,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 261 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (04-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 262 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code (04-1-021)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 263 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (04-1-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 264 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Emergency Repairs (04-1-036)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation shall only be used for
unanticipated building or infrastructure repairs necessary for the
protection of capital assets or protection of health or safety. The
legislature does not intend for this appropriation to be used for
routine maintenance.

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 265 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: Convert BAR Units from Medium to
Close Custody (04-2-004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,809,202

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,809,202

NEW SECTION. Sec. 266 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: North Close Security Compound
(04-2-005)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Allotment for design is contingent upon the submittal of a
scope of work and timeline work plan for ongoing facility master
planning by the department of corrections covering all agency
institutions.
(2) The department shall incorporate the integration of operating
and capital in the scope of work and master planning effort to include
a minimum six-year planning horizon.
(3) The master plan shall include an analysis of forecasted
offender population growth, gender, custody level, infrastructure
needs, capacity and a system-wide view of facility needs. Alternatives
should be generated that include the management of excess capacity.
(4) Allotment for construction is contingent upon the submittal of
a draft system-wide facility master plan for the department of
corrections.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $133,940,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $133,940,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 267 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Infrastructure Savings (04-1-850)

Projects that are completed in accordance with section 915 of this
act may have their remaining funds transferred to this appropriation
for other preservation projects approved by the office of financial
management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

(End of part)

PART 3
NATURAL RESOURCES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Referendum 38 Water Supply Facilities (74-2-006)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is provided solely for projects under
contracts on or before June 30, 2003. Reappropriated funds not
associated with contracted projects lapse June 30, 2003.
(2) The office of financial management may grant waivers from this
lapse requirement for specific projects upon findings of exceptional
circumstances after notification of the chairs of the house of
representatives capital budget committee and senate ways and means
committee.
(3) The department shall submit a report to the office of financial
management and house of representatives capital budget committee and
senate ways and means committee by December 1, 2003, listing all
projects funded from this section.
(4) $614,000 of the reappropriation from the state drought
preparedness account is provided solely to purchase or lease water
pursuant to section 308 of this act.

Reappropriation:
State Drought Preparedness--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $614,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,716,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,330,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,268,071
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,598,071

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Referendum 38 Water Supply Facilities (02-4-006)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $250,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely to study the
development of the Lake Wenatchee water storage project.
(2) The department shall submit a report to the office of financial
management, the house of representatives capital budget committee, and
the senate ways and means committee by December 1, 2003, listing all
projects funded from this section.

Reappropriation:
State and Local Improvements Revolving
Account (Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,394,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $606,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Local Toxics Grants to Locals for Cleanup and Prevention (88-2-008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is provided solely for projects under
contract on or before June 30, 2003. Reappropriated funds not
associated with contracted projects lapse June 30, 2003. The office of
financial management may grant waivers from this lapse requirement for
specific projects upon findings of exceptional circumstances after
notification of the chairs of the house of representatives capital
budget committee and senate ways and means committee.
(2) The department shall submit a report to the office of financial
management and house of representatives capital budget committee and
senate ways and means committee by December 1, 2003, listing all
projects funded from this section.

Reappropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,791,440

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $84,039,482
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $133,830,922

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Local Toxics Grants to Locals for Cleanup and Prevention (04-4-008)

Appropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account (90-2-002)

Reappropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,410,700

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,083,222
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $83,494,002

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Low-Level Nuclear Waste Disposal Trench Closure (97-2-012)

Reappropriation:
Site Closure Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,255,168

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,028,898
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,284,066

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Low-level Nuclear Waste Disposal Trench Site Investigation
(04-4-010)

Appropriation:
Site Closure Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,141,415

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,141,415

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Rights Purchase/Lease (99-1-005)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided for the
purchase or lease of water rights under the trust water rights program
under chapters 90.42 and 90.38 RCW, for the purpose of improving stream
and river flows in fish critical basins.

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,343,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,145,551
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,488,551

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Rights Purchase/Lease (04-1-005)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided for the
purchase or lease of water rights. It is also provided for the purpose
of improving stream and river flows in fish critical basins under the
trust water rights program under chapters 90.42 and 90.38 RCW.

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
State Drought Preparedness--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Irrigation Efficiencies (01-H-010)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation and reappropriation are provided solely to
provide grants to conservation districts to assist the agricultural
community to implement water conservation measures and irrigation
efficiencies in the 16 critical basins. A conservation district
receiving funds shall manage each grant to ensure that a portion of the
water saved by the water conservation measure or irrigation efficiency
will be placed as a purchase or a lease in the trust water rights
program to enhance instream flows. The proportion of saved water
placed in the trust water rights program must be equal to the
percentage of the public investment in the conservation measure or
irrigation efficiency. The percentage of the public investment may not
exceed 85 percent of the total cost of the conservation measure or
irrigation efficiency. In awarding grants, a conservation district
shall give first priority to family farms.
(2) By February 1, 2003, the state conservation commission shall
submit a progress report to the appropriate standing committees of the
legislature on: (a) The amount of public funds expended from this
section; and (b) the location and amount of water placed in the trust
water rights program pursuant to this section.

Reappropriation:
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,650,000
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,117,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,767,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,233,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 311 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Measuring Devices (01-H-009)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for
water measuring devices and gauges. The department shall prioritize
the distribution of water measuring devices and gauges to locations
participating in the department of fish and wildlife's fish screens and
cooperative compliance programs.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 312 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Fund (02-4-007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
conditions and limitations of section 315, chapter 8, Laws of 2001 2nd
sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,083,411

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $115,983,563
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $134,066,974

NEW SECTION. Sec. 313 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Infrastructure and Conveyance Projects (04-4-850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The state building construction account appropriation in this
section is provided solely for grants to finance water infrastructure
and conveyance projects in the sixteen salmon critical basins
identified in the statewide strategy to recover salmon. The purpose of
this funding is to develop projects for enhanced water supply that
resolves conflicts among water needs for municipal water supply,
agricultural water supply, and fish restoration.
(2) Priority for the use of these funds must be given to projects
that have been identified for early action through watershed plans,
comprehensive irrigation district management plans, or similar plan; or
to projects that are part of an approved habitat conservation plan, or
other intergovernmental agreement. Projects may precede completion of
comprehensive watershed plans if resolution of the conflicts is
necessary and the actions are compatible with the long-term planning
effort. The department shall develop and administer this grants
program in conjunction with the departments of agriculture and fish and
wildlife. Decisions regarding which projects are funded must be by
unanimous agreement of all three departments. The department shall
seek local and federal funds to augment the funding provided by this
appropriation.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 314 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (04-4-007)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $7,547,044 of the water quality account appropriation is
provided for the extended grant payment to Metro/King county.
(2) Up to $10,000,000 of the water quality account appropriation is
provided for the extended grant payment to Spokane for the Spokane-Rathdrum Prairie aquifer.
(3) $2,000,000 of the state building construction account -- state
appropriation is provided for water quality facility grants for
communities with a population of less than 5,000. The department shall
give priority consideration to: (a) Communities subject to a
regulatory order from the department of ecology for noncompliance with
water quality regulations; (b) projects for which design work has been
completed; and (c) projects with a local match from reasonable water
quality rates and charges.
(4) $1,500,000 of the state building construction--state
appropriation is provided for water conveyance facilities to implement
the 1996 memorandum of agreement regarding utilization of Skagit river
basin water resources for in-stream and out-of-stream purposes.
(5) $2,000,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a grant to the city of Duvall for
construction of a sewage treatment plant.
(6) $1,000,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Klickitat wastewater treatment
project.
(7) The remaining appropriation in this section is provided for
statewide water quality implementation and planning grants and loans.
The department shall give priority consideration to projects located in
basins with critical or depressed salmonid stocks.
(8) In addition to the annual project progress reporting
requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the department shall file quarterly
project progress reports with the office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,452,956
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,547,044
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 315 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account (02-4-002)

Reappropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $149,099,023
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,474,405
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $188,573,428

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $166,029,368
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $354,602,796

NEW SECTION. Sec. 316 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Program (04-4-002)

Appropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,663,333
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,466,666
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $111,129,999

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $462,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $573,129,999

NEW SECTION. Sec. 317 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Supply Facilities Program (04-4-006)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The state building construction account appropriation is
provided solely for grants for the development of plans, engineering
and financing reports, acquiring land and facilities, and other
preconstruction activities associated with the development of water
storage and groundwater storage and recovery projects. Proposed
projects must be consistent with the recommendations of the water
storage task force and the governor's water strategy. Priority for the
use of these funds must be given to: Projects that have been
identified for early action through watershed plans, comprehensive
irrigation district management plans, or similar plans; to projects
that are part of an approved habitat conservation plan or other
intergovernmental agreement; or to joint projects with federal entities
such as the bureau of reclamation. The department shall develop and
administer this grants program in conjunction with the departments of
agriculture and fish and wildlife. Decisions regarding which projects
are funded must be by unanimous agreement of all three departments.
The department shall seek local and federal funds to augment the
funding provided by this appropriation. The state building
construction account--state appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure for development of water storage projects in the Yakima
river basin, among which the Black Rock reservoir project may be
included.
(2) In addition to the annual project progress reporting
requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the department shall file quarterly
project progress reports with the office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 318 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Padilla Bay Expansion (02-2-006)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,472,891
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $693,353
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,166,244

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,417,196
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $568,804
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,986,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $527,756
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,680,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 319 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Lewis and Clark Trail Bicentennial (00-1-010)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is
provided solely to renovate facilities and enhance exhibits at Lewis
and Clark trail interpretive centers located at Sacajawea state park
and Fort Canby state park.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,337,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,837,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 320 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Facility Improvement (01-S-005)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $200,000 is provided solely for funding of
the twin tunnels bridge on the Iron Goat trail.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,750,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 321 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Beacon Rock Pierce Trust (02-3-018)

Reappropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 322 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Beacon Rock Pierce Trust (04-2-018)

Appropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 323 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Coastal Facility Relocation (00-1-005)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 324 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Coastal Facility Relocation (02-1-017)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
conditions and limitations in section 324, chapter 8, Laws of 2001 2nd
sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $584,500
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,084,500

NEW SECTION. Sec. 325 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Facility Preservation (02-1-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely to
continue minor works projects that reduce the deferred maintenance
backlog.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 326 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (04-1-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely to continue minor works projects that reduce the
deferred maintenance backlog.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,737,500

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,737,500

NEW SECTION. Sec. 327 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Fort Worden (02-1-003)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for
park preservation and for development of the multipurpose dining and
meeting facility.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,569,365
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,069,365

NEW SECTION. Sec. 328 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Cama Beach State Park Development (99-2-001)

Reappropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $310,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $690,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 329 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Facilities Preservation: Statewide (98-1-003)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,784,535
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,684,532

NEW SECTION. Sec. 330 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Statewide Facility Preservation and Deferred Maintenance (99-1-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,875,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 331 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Major Park Renovation - Cama Beach (02-1-022)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is
provided to complete electrical power, water, and sewer utilities, and
for other park development and renovation.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Appropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 332 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Natural/Historic Stewardship (02-1-006)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 333 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Historic Structure and Land Use Program (00-1-007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 334 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Historic Stewardship (04-1-010)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 335 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Park Housing (02-2-008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 336 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Parkland Acquisition Account (02-2-016)

Reappropriation:
Parkland Acquisition Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,951,417

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,583
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 337 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Parkland Acquisition (04-2-013)

Appropriation:
Parkland Acquisition Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 338 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Iron Horse Trail (04-2-016)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In addition to the annual project progress reporting
requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the commission shall file quarterly
project progress reports with the office of financial management.
(2) The commission shall submit a study of potential user fees that
could support maintenance, operation, and capital renewal costs of the
agency's three cross-state trails. This study must be submitted to the
office of financial management by June 30, 2004.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $262,500

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $262,500

NEW SECTION. Sec. 339 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Recreation Development-Grayland Beach (02-2-007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 340 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Statewide Boat Pumpout - Federal Clean Vessel Act (02-2-020)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $797,528

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $202,472
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 341 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Statewide Boat Pumpout - Federal Clean Vessel Act (04-4-014)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 342 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Job Creation and Infrastructure (03-1-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The legislature does not intent to reappropriate amounts not
expended by June 30, 2005.
(2) The reappropriation shall support the projects as listed in
section 211, chapter 238, Laws of 2002.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,900,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 343 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Deception Pass State Park Renovation (04-1-019)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is for design and permits for park and marine
crew area relocation.
(2) This appropriation shall be held in allotment reserve until the
commission completes a predesign and scoping document that describes
the park renovation plan in total, including those projects funded
through other fund sources.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 344 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Emergency Repairs (04-1-012)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation shall only be used for
unanticipated building or infrastructure repairs necessary for the
protection of capital assets or protection of health or safety. The
legislature does not intend for this appropriation to be used for
routine maintenance.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,200,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 345 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Facility Assessment (04-2-011)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The commission shall submit to the
legislature, no later than October 15, 2003, a report regarding the
current condition and prospective content of the state parks system for
the system's centennial in 2013. The report and its proposals must
include the following elements: Lands, facilities, and programs within
the current state parks system, park renovation needs, development of
new public-use facilities on existing state park lands, the rearranging
of park assets for better public use, and how these investments relate
to the recreation needs of the state's growing population. The report
also is to include a financing strategy including but not limited to
private/public resources potentially available for the centennial.

Appropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 346 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Recreation Development (04-2-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $100,000 of the appropriation shall be used to retain a
consultant to conduct a predesign study for a headquarters building
located in Thurston county. The predesign shall compare a new leased
facility against options to build and evaluate appropriate funding
strategies.
(2) $900,000 of the appropriation shall be used to install fee
collection stations at selected parks statewide.
(3) In addition to the annual project progress reporting
requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the commission shall file quarterly
project progress reports with the office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 347 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Fort Canby Improvements (04-2-850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $750,000 is for the Realvest upland area.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 348 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Boating Facilities Projects (98-2-001)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,020,871

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,553,140
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,574,011

NEW SECTION. Sec. 349 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Firearms Range Program (98-2-004)

Reappropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $147,078

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $426,591
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $573,669

NEW SECTION. Sec. 350 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Wildlife and Recreation Program (WWRP) (98-2-003)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Reappropriated funds that are not obligated to a specific
project may be used to fund projects from the list of alternate
projects in biennia succeeding the biennium in which the funds were
originally appropriated.
(2) The agency shall report to the legislature by December 1, 2003,
on the reason for funds in this section not being expended.

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,226,384
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,682,381
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,908,765

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,881,867
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $77,790,632

NEW SECTION. Sec. 351 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Wildlife and Recreation Program (WWRP) (02-4-003)

The reappropriations in this section are for the wildlife and
recreation program under chapter 43.99A RCW and RCW 43.99A.040 are
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is provided for the approved list of
projects included in LEAP capital document No. 2001-24, as developed on
June 7, 2001, and LEAP capital document No. 2002-21, as developed on
March 12, 2002.
(2) The department of natural resources shall manage lands acquired
through project No. 00-1427 "North Bay NAP" as a natural resources
conservation area under chapter 79.71 RCW.

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,089,319
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,200,926
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,290,245

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,709,755
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 352 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Washington Wildlife and Recreation Program (WWRP) (04-4-002)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided for the
approved list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2003-56, as
developed on April 25, 2003. In addition to the annual project
progress reporting requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the committee shall
file quarterly project progress reports with the office of financial
management.

Appropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,700,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,300,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $120,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $165,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 353 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Firearms and Archery Range Program (FARR) (02-0-001)

Reappropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 354 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Firearms and Archery Range Recreation Program (FARR) (04-4-006)

Appropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 355 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Hatchery Management Program (02-4-009)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,795,350

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,404,650
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 356 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Hatchery Management Program (04-4-010)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 357 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Land and Water Conservation (LWCF) (02-4-005)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $1,500,000 of the recreation resources
account--federal is reappropriated for projects chosen by the
interagency committee for outdoor recreation.

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,274,772

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,228
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 358 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Land and Water Conservation Fund (LWCF) (04-4-007)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,735,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,735,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 359 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
National Recreation Trails (NRTP) (98-2-006)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $307,046

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,760,568
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,067,614

NEW SECTION. Sec. 360 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
National Recreation Trails Program (NRTP) (02-4-006)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,712,706

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $420,230
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,132,936

NEW SECTION. Sec. 361 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
National Recreation Trails Program (NRTP) (04-4-008)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,260,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,260,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 362 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Program (NOVA) (98-2-002)

Reappropriation:
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities
Program Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,031,006

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,064,917
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,095,923

NEW SECTION. Sec. 363 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle (NOVA) (02-4-002)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation for the nonhighway and off-road vehicle
program under RCW 46.09.170(1)(d)(i) is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: A portion of the reappropriation may be
used for grants to projects to research, develop, publish, and
distribute informational guides and maps of nonhighway and off-road
vehicle trails and associated facilities meeting the requirements,
guidelines, spirit, and intent of the federal Americans with
disabilities act.
(2) The reappropriation for the nonhighway and off-road vehicle
program under RCW 46.09.170(1)(d)(ii) is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The portion of the reappropriation that
applies to grants for capital facilities may be used for grants to
projects that meet the requirements, guidelines, spirit, and intent of
the federal Americans with disabilities act and do not compromise or
impair sensitive natural resources. The portion of the reappropriation
that applies to grants for management, maintenance, and operation of
existing off-road vehicle recreation facilities may be used to bring
the facilities into compliance with the requirements, guidelines,
spirit, and intent of the federal Americans with disabilities act.
(3) The reappropriation for the nonhighway and off-road vehicle
program under RCW 46.09.170(1)(d)(iii) is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funds may be expended for nonhighway road
recreation facilities which may include recreational trails that are
accessed by nonhighway roads and are intended solely for nonmotorized
recreational uses.

Reappropriation:
Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities Program
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,487,410

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,040,141
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,527,551

NEW SECTION. Sec. 364 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities Program (NOVA)
(04-4-004)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $450,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to maintain
and operate existing ORV and other recreation facilities, including ORV
campgrounds, on lands managed by the department of natural resources
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2004.
(2) $3,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for
maintenance and operation of state park campgrounds and facilities.

Appropriation:
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities Program
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,932,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,932,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 365 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Salmon Recovery (00-2-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The agency shall report to the legislature
by December 1, 2003, on the reason for funds in this section not being
expended.

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,098,600
Salmon Recovery Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,904,213
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,002,813

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,566,576
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $101,569,389

NEW SECTION. Sec. 366 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Salmon Recovery (02-4-007)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Activities funded through grants provided in this section shall
be consistent with the salmon recovery funding board's goals, mission,
and responsibilities.
(2) Jobs for the environment projects submitted by lead entities
are eligible to receive funding, including wages for jobs for the
environment participants.

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,075,104
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,339,976
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,415,080

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,577,920
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,993,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 367 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Salmon Recovery Fund Board Programs (SRFB) (04-4-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,240,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for phase 1 of restoration of
anadromous fish habitat in Manastash creek.
(2) The water quality account--state appropriation in this section
is provided solely to assist regional recovery planning efforts
statewide. The salmon recovery funding board shall contract with the
governor's salmon recovery office to assist regional recovery boards to
develop regional recovery plans by June 30, 2005.

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,000,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 368 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Boating Facilities Program (02-4-001)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,588,503

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $345,510
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,934,013

NEW SECTION. Sec. 369 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Boating Facilities Program (BFP) (04-4-003)

Appropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,982,959

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,982,959

NEW SECTION. Sec. 370 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Boating Infrastructure Grant (BIG) (02-4-010)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,960,650

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,350
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 371 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Boating Infrastructure Grant Program (BIG) (04-4-009)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 372 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Family Forest Fish Blockages Program (04-4-011)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) This appropriation is provided solely for the salmon recovery
funding board in consultation with the small forest landowner office of
the department of natural resources and the department of fish and
wildlife to provide grants to correct fish passage blockages on
nonindustrial forest lands. Selection of projects must be coordinated
with the other salmon recovery grant programs provided in section 366
of this act.
(2) In addition to the annual project progress reporting
requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the committee shall file quarterly
project progress reports with the office of financial management.
(3) The committee may not expend more than $100,000 of the
appropriation for administrative or staff costs.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 373 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Skykomish Flood Mitigation Project (01-H-013)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $318,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $618,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 374 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program (00-2-004 and 04-4-004)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is for
project number 00-2-004. The appropriation is for project number 04-4-004.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 375 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Dairy Nutrient Management Grants Program (02-4-002)

Reappropriation:
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 376 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Puget Sound District Grants (02-4-003 and 04-4-005)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is for
project number 02-4-003. The appropriation is for project number 04-4-005.

Reappropriation:
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
Appropriation:
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $840,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,680,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 377 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Water Quality Grants Program (02-4-001 and 04-4-002)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is for
project number 02-4-001. The appropriation is for project number 04-4-002.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 378 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Columbia Basin Groundwater Management Program (04-4-850)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 379 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Fish Screens (01-H-011)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are
provided solely for the inventory, design, construction, and
installation of fish screens and fishways. To the extent practicable
and cost effective, the department shall contract for the design,
construction, and installation of fish screens and fishways. Funds
provided by these appropriations may be used to match federal funds
appropriated under HR 1444, the fisheries restoration and irrigation
mitigation act of 2000.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 380 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Code Compliance and Protection (02-1-005)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: This section reappropriates a portion of
the appropriations made in section 389, chapter 8, Laws of 2001 2nd sp.
sess.

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $506,700
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $856,700

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,856,700

NEW SECTION. Sec. 381 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Commercial and Recreational Customer Satisfaction Improvements
(02-2-006)

Reappropriation:
Warm Water Game Fish Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $505,000
Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,005,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,060,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 382 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Diverse Fish and Wildlife Population Health and Protection
(02-2-004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $190,000
Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,045,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,235,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,015,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 383 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
ESA Compliance on Agency Lands (02-2-002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 384 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Facility and Infrastructure Standards and Renovations (02-1-009)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall expend the
reappropriated funds as detailed in section 390, chapter 8, Laws of
2001 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,290,000
Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,690,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,931,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,621,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 385 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Facility, Infrastructure, Lands, and Access Condition Improvement
(04-1-003)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $400,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation is for Nasalle hatchery.
(2) $1,300,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation is for the Tokul creek hatchery.

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,575,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,175,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,175,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 386 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Fish and Wildlife Opportunity Improvements (04-2-006)

Appropriation:
Warm Water Game Fish Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $550,000
Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 387 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Forest and Fish Road Upgrade and Abandonment on Agency Lands
(02-1-003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 388 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Partnership Improvements with Internal and External Customers
(02-2-008)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Expenditures of the reappropriation in
this section for fencing must comply with chapter 16.60 RCW.

Reappropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
Game Special Wildlife Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $580,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,695,400
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,275,400

NEW SECTION. Sec. 389 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Culvert Replacement for Fish Passage (03-S-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely to
the department of fish and wildlife to replace culverts on state lands
that impair fish passage. The department shall prioritize projects
that affect fish species listed as threatened or endangered under the
federal endangered species act.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $420,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 390 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Job Creation and Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation shall support the projects as listed in
section 212, chapter 238, Laws of 2002.
(2) The legislature does not intend to reappropriate amounts not
expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $970,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,070,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,040,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 391 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Watchable Fish and Wildlife Recreation Sites (02-2-007)

Reappropriation:
Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $995,076

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,924
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 392 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Fish and Wildlife Population and Habitat Protection (04-1-002)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,830,000
General Fund--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,300,000
Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,830,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,830,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 393 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Hatchery Reform, Retrofits, and Condition Improvement (04-1-001)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000
General Fund--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 394 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Internal and External Partnership Improvements (04-1-007)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Expenditures of the appropriation in this
section for fencing shall comply with chapter 16.60 RCW.

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
General Fund--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Game Special Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
Game Special Wildlife Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Game Special Wildlife Account--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 395 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Washington Department of Fish and Wildlife Energy Savings
(04-1-016)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 396 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Wind Power Mitigation (04-2-850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided to support
the development and implementation of a wind power alternative
mitigation pilot program, the purpose of which is to maximize the
habitat value of mitigation funds and streamline the mitigation process
for wind power projects. The program must combine the acquisition of
strategically important habitat by the department with annual funding
from wind developers for restoration, management, and monitoring of
these critical habitat areas. The appropriation is for the department
to undertake the acquisition component of the program.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 397 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Youth Sport Fishing Program (04-2-017)

Appropriation:
Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 398 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Forest Legacy (00-2-020 and 02-2-015)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation provides $184,309 for
project number 00-2-020 and $4,200,000 for project number 02-2-015.

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,384,309

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,885,691
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,270,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 399 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Minor Works (02-2-001)

Reappropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $256,230
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $482,466
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $455,575
Agricultural College Trust Management Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $68,950
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,263,221

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,006,779
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,270,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 400 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Marine Station Public Access (02-2-019)

Reappropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $110,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $175,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Agricultural Asset Preservation (04-1-017)

Appropriation:
Resource Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Grants (00-2-014)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall report to the
legislature by December 1, 2003, on the reason for funds in this
section not being expended.

Reappropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,485,269

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,485,269

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Grants (02-4-018)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided for a list
of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2001-44, as developed on June
7, 2001.

Reappropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,630,075

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,934,925
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,565,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Grants (04-4-018)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section is provided for a list of
projects in LEAP capital document No. 2003-17, as developed on April
14, 2003.
(2) The committee shall submit a list of recommended projects to be
funded from the aquatic lands enhancement account in the 2005-2007
capital budget. The list shall result from a competitive grants
program developed by the committee based upon, at a minimum: (a) A
uniform criteria for selecting projects and awarding grants for up to
fifty percent of the total project cost; (b) local community support
for the project; and (c) environmental benefits to be derived from
projects. This process must be coordinated with the salmon recovery
funding board selection process. The list of projects must be
submitted to the office of financial management by September 15, 2004.

Appropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,356,400

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,622,319
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,978,719

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Commercial Development/Local Improvement Districts (04-2-009)

Appropriation:
Resource Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 406 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Communication Site Repairs (04-1-024)

Appropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
Resource Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 407 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Community and Technical College Trust Land Acquisition (04-2-014)

Appropriation:
Community and Technical College Forest Reserve
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $96,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $96,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 408 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Forest Legacy (04-2-015)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 409 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Hazardous Waste Removal (04-1-006)

Appropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
Resource Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 410 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Land Bank (04-2-013)

Appropriation:
Resource Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 411 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Marine Station Public Access (04-2-019)

Appropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $175,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,775,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 412 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code (04-2-001)

Appropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $133,400
Resource Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $232,000
Agricultural College Trust Management Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $394,400

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $394,400

NEW SECTION. Sec. 413 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Mobile Radio System Upgrade (04-2-022)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall study and evaluate
options for a comprehensive user fee system that equally distributes
the cost to operate, maintain, and capitalize the radio system to all
users on the network. The study must include an evaluation of a user
fee system based on access to the network and not on radio inventory.
The department shall report the study's findings and recommendations to
the office of financial management by September 15, 2003.

Appropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $227,400
Resource Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $386,500
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,659,800
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,273,700

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,273,700

NEW SECTION. Sec. 414 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Natural Area Facilities Preservation (04-1-016)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall submit a study of
funding source options that fully support the maintenance, operation,
and capitalization of its natural area preserve facilities. This study
must be submitted to the office of financial management by September
15, 2003.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $185,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $185,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 415 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Natural Resource Real Property Replacement (04-2-012)

Appropriation:
Natural Resources Real Property Replacement
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 416 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Trust Land Transfer Program (04-2-851)

The state building construction account appropriation in this
section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(1) The total appropriation is provided to the department solely to
transfer from trust status or enter into thirty-year timber harvest
restrictive easements/leases for certain trust lands of state-wide
significance deemed appropriate for state park, fish and wildlife
habitat, natural area preserve, natural resources conservation area,
open space, or recreation purposes.
(2) Property transferred under this section shall be appraised and
transferred at fair market value. The value of the timber transferred
shall be deposited by the department to the common school construction
account in the same manner as timber revenues from other common school
trust lands. No deduction shall be made for the resource management
cost account under RCW 79.64.040. The value of the land transferred
shall be deposited in the natural resources real property replacement
account. These funds shall be expended by the department for the
exclusive purpose of acquiring real property of equal value to be
managed as common school trust land.
(3) Property subject to easement/lease agreements under this
section shall be appraised at fair market value both with and without
the imposition of the easement/lease. The entire difference in
appraised value shall be deposited by the department to the common
school construction fund in the same manner as lease revenues from
other common school trust lands. No deduction shall be made for the
resource management cost account under RCW 79.64.040.
(4) All reasonable costs incurred by the department to implement
this section are authorized to be paid out of this appropriation.
Authorized costs include the actual cost of appraisals, staff time,
environmental reviews, surveys, and other similar costs.
(5) Intergrant exchanges between common school and other trust
lands of equal value may occur if the exchange is in the interest of
each trust, as determined by the board of natural resources.
(6) Prior to or concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the
department, with full cooperation of the receiving agencies, shall
execute and record a real property instrument that dedicates the
transferred properties to the purposes identified in subsection (1) of
this section for a minimum period of thirty years. The department of
natural resources, in consultation with the receiving state agencies,
shall develop policy to address requests to replace transferred
properties subject to the recorded property instrument that are no
longer deemed appropriate for the purposes identified in subsection (1)
of this section.
(7) The department and receiving agencies shall work in good faith
to carry out the intent of this section. However, the department or
receiving agencies may remove a property from the transfer list based
on new, substantive information, if it is determined that transfer of
the property is not in the statewide interest of either the common
school trust or the receiving agency.
(8) The department shall execute trust land transfers and
easements/leases such that, after the deduction of reasonable costs as
provided in subsection (4) of this section, eighty percent of the
appropriation in this section is deposited in the common school
construction fund. To achieve the 80:20 ratio, the department may
offset transfers of property with low timber-to-land ratios with
easements/leases on other properties.
(9) On June 30, 2005, the state treasurer shall transfer all
remaining uncommitted funds from this appropriation to the common
school construction fund and the appropriation in this section shall be
reduced by an equivalent amount.
(10) The appropriation in this section is provided for a list of
projects in LEAP capital document No. 2003-24, as developed on April
14, 2003.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,000,000
Natural Resources Real Property Replacement
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $316,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 417 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Real Estate Repair, Maintenance, and Tenant Improvements (04-1-005)

Appropriation:
Resource Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 418 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Recreation Facilities Preservation (04-1-011)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall submit a study of
funding source options that will fully support the maintenance,
operation, and capitalization of its recreational facilities to the
office of financial management by September 15, 2003.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 419 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Right of Way Acquisition (04-2-007)

Appropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Resource Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 420 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Riparian Open Space Program (04-2-023)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In addition to the annual project progress reporting
requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the department shall file quarterly
project progress reports with the office of financial management.
(2) The department may not expend more than $100,000 of the
appropriation for administrative or staff costs.
(3) The resource management cost account--state appropriation is
solely for a riparian inventory system.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Resource Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 421 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Statewide Estuarine Restoration Projects (04-2-021)

Appropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 422 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Wetland Grants (04-2-004)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 423 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Family Forest Fish Blockages (04-4-851)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 424 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
Agriculture Water Infrastructure/Conveyance Projects (04-1-850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is provided for the development,
implementation, and support of comprehensive irrigation district
management plan pilot projects. The appropriation may be used for
early action projects that are identified in the comprehensive
irrigation district management plan process.
(2) The department shall develop and administer this grants program
in conjunction with the departments of agriculture and fish and
wildlife. Decisions regarding which projects are funded must be by
unanimous agreement of all three departments. The department shall
seek local and federal funds to augment the funding provided by this
appropriation.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 425 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
Fair Improvements (04-4-850)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

(End of part)

PART 4
TRANSPORTATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Seattle Toxicology Lab (00-2-009)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,059,864
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,655,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,514,864

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Minor Works - Facility Preservation: Fire Training Academy
(04-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Spokane Crime Laboratory Construction (02-2-013)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,365,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $635,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
Columbia River Dredging (03-H-001)

The reappropriation in this section is provided solely to fund the
second phase of a multiphase cooperative project with the state of
Oregon to dredge the Columbia river. The amount in this section lapses
unless the state of Oregon appropriates a dollar-for-dollar match to
fund its share of the project.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,700,000

(End of part)

PART 5
EDUCATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
School Construction Assistance Grants (02-4-001)

The reappropriations in this section are for project numbers
00-2-001, 00-2-002, and 02-04-001.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,946
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $246,000,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $246,036,946

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $645,475,724
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $891,512,670

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
State Bonds for Common School Construction

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
deposit into the common school construction account--state for school
construction assistance grants.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,000,000
State Education Building Construction Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $127,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $327,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
School Construction Assistance Grants (04-4-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $200,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to fund up to
two FTEs in the office of the state fire marshal to exclusively review
K-12 construction documents, provide on-site construction inspections,
and final acceptance inspections for fire and life safety in accordance
with the state building code. These services shall only be provided to
those districts that are located in counties without qualified review
and inspection capabilities and who request such services.
(2) $100,000 of the appropriation shall be held in reserve for a
study on space and cost requirements in the K-12 school construction
program. The office of financial management shall release the funds to
the state board of education after the development and acceptance of a
study outline that does not replicate previous studies. In the event
that no study is conducted, the funds shall lapse.
(3) $28,000,000 of the appropriation shall be used by the board to
increase area cost allowance in the board's formula for distribution of
grants to school districts by $10.44 in fiscal year 2004 and an
additional $10.44 in fiscal year 2005.
(4) The appropriation in this section includes the amounts
deposited in the common school construction account under section 602
of this act.

Appropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $393,200,408

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,765,823,833
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,184,024,241

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
Resource Efficiency Pilot Project (04-4-851)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,750,000 of this appropriation is provided solely for costs
directly associated with the design and construction of five public K-12 schools that meet or exceed comprehensive design standards for high
performance and sustainable school building standards.
(2) Up to $150,000 of this appropriation shall be used to:
(a) Develop a technical manual to facilitate the use of high
performance and sustainable school building standards by K-12 schools;
(b) Develop incentives for school districts participating in this
program to construct buildings that achieve a significant life-cycle
savings over current practices;
(c) Integrate the technical manual with other applicable K-12
construction manuals, rules, and policies;
(d) Report to the appropriate standing committees of the
legislature on the potential for sustainable building practices to
reduce expenditures for school construction.
The board may contract with one or more entities to fulfill the
requirements of subsection (2) of this section and may require match
funding of up to one hundred percent for participating nongovernmental
entities.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605 FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
Highline School District Airport Noise Abatement (04-4-850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is for noise abatement
related construction in the Highline school district. The board shall
enter into an interagency agreement with the department of community,
trade, and economic development to administer the appropriation in this
subsection on behalf of the board. The port of Seattle, Highline
school district, and the federal aviation administration must each
match this state appropriation before the state appropriation may be
used; the match and allotment may be done on an annual basis. The
department's policies for local/community projects shall apply to this
project.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 606 FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
Port Angeles School District North Olympic Skill Center (04-4-852)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: This appropriation completes the state
contribution to this project.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 607 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
State School Construction Assistance Program Staff (02-4-001 and
04-2-001)

The reappropriation in this section is for project number 02-4-001.
The appropriation is for project number 04-2-001.

Reappropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Appropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,101,433

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,251,433

NEW SECTION. Sec. 608 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
Ahlsten: Material Center and Braille Production (02-2-003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,084,179

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,257,009
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,341,278

NEW SECTION. Sec. 609 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
Campus Preservation (02-1-002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $401,426

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $198,574
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 610 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
Distance Learning Center/Covered Play Area (02-2-004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,213,226

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $575,774
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,789,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 611 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
Irwin: Old Main, Kennedy, and Dry Building Preservation (02-1-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $233,555

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,747,445
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,981,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 612 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
Boiler House Renovation/Electrical Vault Replacement (04-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $668,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $668,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 613 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (04-1-004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $770,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,830,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 614 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
Kennedy, Dry, and Irwin Buildings Preservation (04-1-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,279,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,279,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 615 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Law School Building (94-2-017)

Reappropriation:
Higher Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,600,000
Higher Education Non-Proprietary Local Capital
Accounts--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,400,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,855,500
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,855,500

NEW SECTION. Sec. 616 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Tacoma Campus Phase 2A (00-2-017)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: No money from the reappropriation in this
section may be expended that would be inconsistent with the
recommendations of the higher education coordinating board and the
project design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of financial
management.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,635,933
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,635,933

NEW SECTION. Sec. 617 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Tacoma Land Acquisition (01-2-029)

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 618 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Emergency Power Expansion: Phase 1 (02-1-009)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,700,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 619 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Emergency Power Expansion Phase 2 (02-2-024)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,461,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,461,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 620 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Life Sciences II Building (02-2-028)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the University of
Washington providing sufficient evidence to the office of financial
management of local revenue to support issuance of bonded debt and
accompanying debt service associated with this project.

Reappropriation:
Higher Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,025,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,025,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 621 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Minor Repairs Programs (02-1-026)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The University of Washington shall provide
$19,000,000 in local nonappropriated funds for this project.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $520,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $480,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 622 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Special Projects: Code Requirements (02-1-025)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 623 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Tacoma Campus Phase 2B (02-2-027)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,349,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,349,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 624 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Urgent Deferred Renewal/Modernization (02-1-031)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 625 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Bothell Phase 2B Offramp (02-2-014)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is subject to:
(1) The university agrees to repay the general fund--state from
local UW Bothell revenues for debt service on the bonds issued to
support this project.
(2) If at least $8,000,000 is not appropriated in the 2003-05
omnibus transportation budget by June 30, 2003, for the UW
Bothell/Cascadia Community College phase 2B offramp, this appropriation
shall lapse.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,390,000
Appropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $110,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 626 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Job Creation and Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the conditions and
limitations of section 218, chapter 238, Laws of 2002.
(2) The legislature does not intend to reappropriate amounts not
expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 627 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Campus Communications Infrastructure (04-1-011)

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 628 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Guggenheim Hall Renovation (02-1-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,312,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,000,948
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,312,948

NEW SECTION. Sec. 629 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
HSC H Wing: Infrastructure (03-1-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The purpose of the appropriation is to
design building and infrastructure systems improvements in the H-wing
of the Warren G. Magnuson health sciences center.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,996,716

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,996,716

NEW SECTION. Sec. 630 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Minor Works - Program (04-2-004)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The University of Washington shall provide
an additional $10,000,000 in local nonappropriated funds for this
project.

Appropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,899,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,899,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,899,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 631 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Architecture Hall Renovation (02-1-008)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,634,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,643,943
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,281,943

NEW SECTION. Sec. 632 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Johnson Hall Renovation (04-1-005)

Appropriation:
State Education Building Construction Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,055,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,055,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 633 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Infrastructure Repairs
(04-1-851)

The appropriation in this section is provided to keep facilities
owned and used for educational and general operations of state colleges
and universities in adequate condition or better. The legislature
intends that maintenance, mechanical adjustments, repairs, and minor
works supported by this project extend the remaining useful life of the
facility, be of an enduring nature lasting thirteen years or longer,
and shall only take place in state-owned building structures where
educational and general program missions are housed.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 634 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (04-1-031)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The University of Washington shall provide
and additional $10,000,000 in local nonappropriated funds for this
project.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,500,000
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 635 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Infrastructure Savings (04-1-850)

Projects that are completed in accordance with section 915 of this
act may have their remaining funds transferred to this appropriation
for other preservation projects approved by the office of financial
management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

NEW SECTION. Sec. 636 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Pullman: Murrow Hall Addition - New Facility (98-2-008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,560,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,560,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 637 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Pullman: Education Addition Cleveland Hall (98-2-032)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,540,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,160,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 638 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Pullman: Johnson Hall Addition - Plant Bioscience Building
(00-2-007)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Allotment for this appropriation is
contingent on the commitment of at least $10,000,000 in federal funds
for a related facility or addition.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
Appropriation:
State Education Building Construction Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 639 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Pullman: Shock Physics Building (00-2-080)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,900,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 640 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Vancouver: Engineering and Life Sciences Building (00-2-904)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) No money from the reappropriation may be expended that would be
inconsistent with the recommendations of the higher education
coordinating board and the project design, scope, and schedule approved
by the office of financial management.
(2) The legislature does not intend to reappropriate amounts not
expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,470,650
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,470,650

NEW SECTION. Sec. 641 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Vancouver: Student Services Center (00-2-905)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) No money from the reappropriation may be expended that would be
inconsistent with the recommendations of the higher education
coordinating board and the project design, scope, and schedule approved
by the office of financial management.
(2) The legislature does not intend to reappropriate amounts not
expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $605,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,555,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 642 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Pullman: Campus Infrastructure - Preservation (02-1-073)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,130,841
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,730,841
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,461,682

NEW SECTION. Sec. 643 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Pullman: Energy Plant (02-1-501)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 644 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Pullman: Minor Capital Improvements (MCI) (02-2-002)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,700,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 645 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Vancouver: Multimedia/Electronic Communication Classroom
Building (02-2-907)

No money from the reappropriation may be expended that would be
inconsistent with the recommendations of the higher education
coordinating board and the project design, scope, and schedule approved
by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,400,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 646 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Branch Campuses: Minor Campus Projects (00-1-901)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 647 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Preservation (02-1-004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,800,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 648 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Safety (02-1-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 649 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Job Creation and Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the conditions and
limitations in section 219, chapter 238, Laws of 2002.
(2) The legislature does not intend to reappropriate amounts not
expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,800,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 650 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Facility Preservation - Statewide (04-1-901)

Appropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,105,100
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,105,100

NEW SECTION. Sec. 651 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Prosser Multipurpose Building (04-2-942)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 652 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Pullman: Biomedical Sciences Facility (04-2-009)

Appropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,715,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,965,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 653 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Pullman: Biotechnology/Life Sciences 1 (04-2-085)

Appropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 654 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation: Pullman (04-1-073)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,521,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,521,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 655 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Pullman: Equipment Omnibus Appropriation (04-2-003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
the purchase of equipment to improve, upgrade, or replace necessary
instructional and research apparatus throughout the university. The
appropriation shall not be used for vehicles, laptop computers, small
printers, disposable items, or other items with a useful life of less
than one year.

Appropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 656 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Pullman: Hospital Renovation (04-2-058)

Appropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 657 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Program: Pullman (04-2-002)

Appropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 658 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Facility Preservation: Pullman (04-1-004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,775,000
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,225,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 659 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code: Pullman (04-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 660 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Pullman: WSUnet Infrastructure (04-2-074)

Appropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,420,400
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,420,400

NEW SECTION. Sec. 661 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU TriCities: Bioproducts and Sciences Building (04-2-940)

Appropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,199,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,099,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 662 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Infrastructure Savings (04-1-850)

Projects that are completed in accordance with section 915 of this
act may have their remaining funds transferred to this appropriation
for other preservation projects approved by the office of financial
management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

NEW SECTION. Sec. 663 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Infrastructure Repairs
(04-1-851)

The appropriation in this section is provided to keep facilities
owned and used for educational and general operations of state colleges
and universities in adequate condition or better. The legislature
intends that maintenance, mechanical adjustments, repairs, and minor
works supported by this project extend the remaining useful life of the
facility, be of an enduring nature lasting thirteen years or longer,
and shall only take place in state-owned building structures where
educational and general program missions are housed.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 664 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Wastewater Reclamation Project (04-1-852)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,713,000
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,713,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,713,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 665 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
EWU Computing and Engineering Sciences Building (Cheney Hall)
(00-2-009)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,675,000
Appropriation:
State Education Building Construction Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,000,482

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,225,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,225,482

NEW SECTION. Sec. 666 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
EWU Campus Network Upgrade (02-2-004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 667 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
EWU Classroom Renewal (02-2-007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $775,000
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 668 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
EWU Infrastructure Preservation (02-1-002)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,600,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 669 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
EWU Roof Replacement (02-1-004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,794,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,044,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 670 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
EWU Water System Preservation and Expansion (02-1-008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $986,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,736,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 671 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
EWU Minor Works: Preservation (02-1-003)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,250,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 672 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
EWU Minor Works: Program (02-2-008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 673 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
EWU Classroom Renewal (04-2-013)

Appropriation:
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $691,325

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,016,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,200,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,907,325

NEW SECTION. Sec. 674 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code (04-1-850)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 675 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (04-1-006)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 676 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (04-1-012)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,172,518
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,172,518

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,172,518

NEW SECTION. Sec. 677 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Program (04-2-017)

Appropriation:
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 678 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Roof Replacements (04-1-024)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,844,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,750,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,344,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 679 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Senior Hall Renovation (00-1-003)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: This appropriation is for phase one of a
proposed two phase project. The legislature is not committing to
funding phase two of the project.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $730,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $581,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,311,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 680 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
EWU University Visitor Center and Formal Entry (04-2-010)

Appropriation:
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $975,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $975,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 681 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Infrastructure Repairs
(04-1-852)

The appropriation in this section is provided to keep facilities
owned and used for educational and general operations of state colleges
and universities in adequate condition or better. The legislature
intends that maintenance, mechanical adjustments, repairs, and minor
works supported by this project extend the remaining useful life of the
facility, be of an enduring nature lasting thirteen years or longer,
and shall only take place in state-owned building structures where
educational and general program missions are housed.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 682 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Infrastructure Savings (04-1-851)

Projects that are completed in accordance with section 915 of this
act may have their remaining funds transferred to this appropriation
for other preservation projects approved by the office of financial
management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

NEW SECTION. Sec. 683 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Music Education Facility (00-2-001)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Allowable expenditure for equipment is
limited to $2,400,000 and does not include moving costs, small musical
instruments, vehicles, laptop computers, small printers, disposable
items, or other items with a useful life of less than one year.

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,022,619
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $977,381
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 684 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
CWU/Des Moines Higher Education Center (02-2-101)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Appropriation:
State Education Building Construction Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,175,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 685 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
McConnell Stage Remodel (02-1-004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,748,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $352,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 686 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Omnibus: Preservation (02-1-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $568,320

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,206,680
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,775,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 687 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Omnibus: Program (02-2-002)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $350,000 of this reappropriation is provided for interior
classroom improvements within the Olympic south building of Pierce
College at Fort Steilacoom.
(2) The legislature does not intend to reappropriate amounts not
expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,206,047

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,193,953
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 688 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Randall/Michaelsen Life Safety (02-1-003)

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,295,909

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $504,091
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 689 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Dean Hall: Walnut Mall Utility Upgrade (04-1-002)

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $560,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,560,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,528,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,088,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 690 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Program (04-2-028)

Appropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,914,400

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,914,400

NEW SECTION. Sec. 691 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (04-1-026)

Appropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,163,500

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,163,500

NEW SECTION. Sec. 692 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code (04-1-025)

Appropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 693 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (04-1-027)

Appropriation:
Central Washington University Capital
Projects Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,561,200

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,061,200

NEW SECTION. Sec. 694 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Infrastructure Repairs
(04-1-852)

The appropriation in this section is provided to keep facilities
owned and used for educational and general operations of state colleges
and universities in adequate condition or better. The legislature
intends that maintenance, mechanical adjustments, repairs, and minor
works supported by this project extend the remaining useful life of the
facility, be of an enduring nature lasting thirteen years or longer,
and shall only take place in state-owned building structures where
educational and general program missions are housed.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 695 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Infrastructure Savings (04-1-850)

Projects that are completed in accordance with section 915 of this
act may have their remaining funds transferred to this appropriation
for other preservation projects approved by the office of financial
management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

NEW SECTION. Sec. 696 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Life Safety/Code Compliance (02-1-013)

Reappropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,363,314

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,136,686
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 697 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works Preservation (02-1-014)

Reappropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,574,845

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $625,155
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 698 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Seminar Building Phase II: Construction (02-2-004)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations shall not be used for
vehicles, laptop computers, small printers, disposable items, or other
items with a useful life of less than one year.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,500,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $971,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,721,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 699 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Daniel J. Evans Building: Modernization Phase I (04-2-006)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,097,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,653,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 700 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Emergency Repairs (04-1-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation shall only be used for
unanticipated building or infrastructure repairs necessary for the
protection of capital assets and protection of health or safety. The
legislature does not intend for this appropriation to be used for
routine maintenance.

Appropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works: Infrastructure Preservation (04-1-001)

Appropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Lab II 3rd Floor: Chemistry Labs Remodel (04-2-007)

Appropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code (04-1-004)

Appropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 704 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (04-1-005)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,350,000
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 705 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works - Program (04-2-003)

Appropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 706 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Infrastructure Repairs
(04-1-851)

The appropriation in this section is provided to keep facilities
owned and used for educational and general operations of state colleges
and universities in adequate condition or better. The legislature
intends that maintenance, mechanical adjustments, repairs, and minor
works supported by this project extend the remaining useful life of the
facility, be of an enduring nature lasting thirteen years or longer,
and shall only take place in state-owned building structures where
educational and general program missions are housed.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 707 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Infrastructure Savings (04-1-850)

Projects that are completed in accordance with section 915 of this
act may have their remaining funds transferred to this appropriation
for other preservation projects approved by the office of financial
management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

NEW SECTION. Sec. 708 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Campus Infrastructure Development (98-2-024)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,160,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,419,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,780,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,059,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 709 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Communications Facility (98-2-053)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations shall not be used for
vehicles, laptop computers, small printers, disposable items, or other
items with a useful life of less than one year.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,500,000
Appropriation:
State Education Building Construction Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,920,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,973,400
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,393,400

NEW SECTION. Sec. 710 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (02-1-070)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 711 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Preservation - Safety (02-1-071)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 712 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Program (02-2-072)

Reappropriation:
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,031,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,831,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 713 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Job Creation and Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the conditions and
limitations in section 905, chapter 10, Laws of 2003.
(2) The legislature does not intend to reappropriate amounts not
expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 714 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (04-1-076)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,080,000
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,080,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,080,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 715 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (04-1-075)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,905,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,905,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 716 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Program (04-2-077)

Appropriation:
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,858,671

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,858,671

NEW SECTION. Sec. 717 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code (04-1-074)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,965,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,965,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 718 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Academic Instruction Center (02-2-026)

Appropriation:
State Education Building Construction Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,618,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $115,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,047,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,780,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 719 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Campus Roadway Development (04-2-073)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The purpose of the appropriation is to complete a predesign of
potential south campus roadway options and general circulation issues
that avoids significant impacts on adjacent neighborhoods and conforms
to the city of Bellingham traffic plans.
(2) The predesign shall also investigate options to achieve higher
rates of alternative modes of transportation among faculty, staff, and
students, minimize surface parking, and make improvements for traffic
circulation, including public transit. Safe movement of pedestrians
and bicyclists shall be a priority.
(3) Allotment for predesign is contingent upon the completion of a
communication and public involvement plan for this project that is
consistent with the significant projects section of the Western
Washington University institutional master plan and adjacent
neighborhood plans adopted by the city of Bellingham, the city of
Bellingham Western Washington University neighborhood plan, and the
neighborhood meeting requirements contained in Bellingham municipal
code 20.40.060. The communication and public involvement plan shall
seek to maximize public input through coordination of the planning
effort with established neighborhood advisory groups and boards
recognized by the city of Bellingham.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $329,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $329,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 720 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Shannon Point Marine Undergraduate Center (04-2-059)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The university has independently completed a predesign for this
facility. Allotment for design is contingent upon the completion of an
addendum to that predesign that addresses federal and grant funding for
construction, equipment, and operating costs for the new facility.
(2) The office of financial management shall coordinate review of
the predesign addendum with the legislative fiscal committees prior to
allotment for design.
(3) This appropriation is for design and construction that is
subject to separate allotment. No further appropriations for equipment
are anticipated.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $807,000
Western Washington University Capital Projects Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,191,329
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,998,329

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,998,329

NEW SECTION. Sec. 721 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Planetarium Improvements (04-2-950)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is for replacement of
the projector and other upgrades. The state must be matched by local
or donated funds.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 722 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Infrastructure Repairs
(04-1-852)

The appropriation in this section is provided to keep facilities
owned and used for educational and general operations of state colleges
and universities in adequate condition or better. The legislature
intends that maintenance, mechanical adjustments, repairs, and minor
works supported by this project extend the remaining useful life of the
facility, be of an enduring nature lasting thirteen years or longer,
and shall only take place in state-owned building structures where
educational and general program missions are housed.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 723 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Infrastructure Savings (04-1-851)

Projects that are completed in accordance with section 915 of this
act may have their remaining funds transferred to this appropriation
for other preservation projects approved by the office of financial
management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

NEW SECTION. Sec. 724 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Lewis and Clark Trail Interpretive Infrastructure Grant Program
(02-4-001)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is
provided for development of station camp 1805 as a national historic
park in conjunction with the projected relocation of highway 101 in
Pacific county.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 725 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Lewis and Clark Station Camp Park Project (02-S-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $552,226
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,552,226

NEW SECTION. Sec. 726 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Olympia: State Capital Museum Preservation Projects (02-1-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $649,397
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $705,397

NEW SECTION. Sec. 727 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Tacoma: Stadium Way Research Center Preservation Projects
(02-1-004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $68,830

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $271,017
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $339,847

NEW SECTION. Sec. 728 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Tacoma - State History Museum Preservation Projects (02-1-002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,841,621
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,111,621

NEW SECTION. Sec. 729 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Washington Heritage Project (02-4-004)

The reappropriation in this section shall support the projects as
listed in section 734, chapter 8, Laws of 2001 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,319,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,819,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 730 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Stadium Way Research Center: Code Violation Correction (04-1-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $461,200

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $461,200

NEW SECTION. Sec. 731 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Washington Heritage Project (04-4-004)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
27.34.330.
(2) The appropriation is provided for the following list of
projects:

Project Amount Recommended

Museum of flight $350,000

Lopez Island historical
society $60,000

Spokane parks and
recreation $136,000

Georgetown community
council $50,000

Museum of history and
industry $350,000

Fort Nisqually living
history museum $350,000

Ilwaco heritage foundation $179,400

Jefferson county public
works $350,000

Historic Seattle PDA $350,000

American museum of
radio $151,799

Gig Harbor - peninsula
historical society $140,000

Bigelow House
preservation association $33,900

Northwest maritime center $350,000

Suquamish museum and
tribal cultural center $7,000

City of Roslyn $181,816

Duwamish tribal service,
inc. $350,000

City of Sprague $98,000

Spokane symphony $56,925

Enumclaw plateau
historical society $54,054

Gallery one $115,500

World kite museum and
hall of fame $115,500

City of Port Angeles $112,200

Vashon parks $37,724

San Juan historical
museum $8,800

Subtotal $3,988,618

Alternate Projects:

Clymer museum $113,598

Jefferson county historical
society $115,500

City of Lynnwood $37,835

City of Mt. Vernon $66,664

White river valley
museum $115,500

Town of LaConner $2,376

Highline historical society $14,909

TOTAL with alternates $4,455,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,988,618

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,988,618

NEW SECTION. Sec. 732 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
State History Museum Preservation (04-1-850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is for paver
replacement.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 733 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Community College: Allied Health Building (98-2-661)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $175,089

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,861,686
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,036,775

NEW SECTION. Sec. 734 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clover Park: Transportation Trade - Construction (96-2-662)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,380,368

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,665,032
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,045,400

NEW SECTION. Sec. 735 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Olympic College Poulsbo Center: Construction (96-2-654)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,596,675
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,046,675

NEW SECTION. Sec. 736 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellingham Technical College: Health/Business Building (98-2-672)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,737,347

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,199,252
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,936,599

NEW SECTION. Sec. 737 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lake Washington Technical College: Phase 3 - New Facility
(98-2-673)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,627,984

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,370,016
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,005,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 738 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Renton Technical College: Technology Resource Center (98-2-674)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,379,770

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,391,230
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,771,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 739 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Skagit Valley Community College: Whidbey Higher Education Center
(98-2-675)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $641,516

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,278,097
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,919,613

NEW SECTION. Sec. 740 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Centralia College: Instructional Building Replacement (99-2-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $172,934

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,227,066
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 741 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM

Clark College: Clark Center at Washington State University
Vancouver (00-2-680)

No money from the appropriations in this section may be expended
that would be inconsistent with the recommendations of the higher
education coordinating board and the project design, scope, and
schedule approved by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,096,000
Appropriation:
State Education Building Construction Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,009,800

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $668,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,773,800

NEW SECTION. Sec. 742 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Facilities Repairs "A" (00-1-050)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,784,463
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $85,847
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,870,310

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,870,310

NEW SECTION. Sec. 743 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: Drama/Music Class - Renovation
(00-2-322)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $398,031

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,031,969
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,430,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 744 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Highline Community College: CWU/Des Moines Higher Education Center
(00-2-678)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $985,949
Appropriation:
State Education Building Construction Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,052,400

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,359,051
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,397,400

NEW SECTION. Sec. 745 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works - Program (Minor Improvements) (00-1-130)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,587,700
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $308,506
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,896,206

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,953,794
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 746 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Olympic College: Physical Plant Building Replacement (00-2-002)

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $416,607

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,421,705
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,698,993

NEW SECTION. Sec. 747 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College Puyallup: Phase III Expansion (00-2-676)

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $723,985
Appropriation:
State Education Building Construction Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,374,774

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,236,215
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,334,974

NEW SECTION. Sec. 748 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Shoreline Community College: Library/Technical Center (00-2-319)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $215,408

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,034,592
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 749 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Site Repairs "A" (00-1-090)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $631,778

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,210,222
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,842,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 750 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Puget Sound Community College: Humanities/General Education
Complex (00-2-679)

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,092,690
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,350,248

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $812,310
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,255,248

NEW SECTION. Sec. 751 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Whatcom Community College: Classroom/Lab Building (00-2-677)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $372,634
Appropriation:
State Education Building Construction Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,932,400

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $599,266
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,904,300

NEW SECTION. Sec. 752 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Yakima Valley Community College: Higher Education Center
(00-2-954)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,214,248

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,285,752
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 753 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: Science Building (01-2-688)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,396,409

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,407,191
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,903,600

NEW SECTION. Sec. 754 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College: Science Building (01-2-687)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,379,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,929,265
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,408,265

NEW SECTION. Sec. 755 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Technology Institute Partner College Computer Labs (01-2-689)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided to
complete construction and equip three computer science and language
labs, each approximately 1,200 square feet, located in the following
college districts: Highline, Olympic, and South Puget Sound, as
provided in section 824, chapter 8, Laws of 2001 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $345,722

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,154,278
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 756 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bates Technical College: LRC/Vocational (02-2-684)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,796,206

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $94,346
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,168,902
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,059,454

NEW SECTION. Sec. 757 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellevue Community College: "A" Building Renovation (02-1-320)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,025,531

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $540,569
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,566,100

NEW SECTION. Sec. 758 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellingham Technical College: Replacement (02-1-239)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,280,328

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $77,572
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,357,900

NEW SECTION. Sec. 759 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Big Bend Community College: Library Replacement (02-1-232)

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,128,718

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $368,282
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,497,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 760 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM

Clover Park Technical College: Building 18 Machine Trades
(02-1-343)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,583,308

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $208,492
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,791,800

NEW SECTION. Sec. 761 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Columbia Basin College: Building "A" Renovation (02-1-333)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,387,456

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,046,644
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,434,100

NEW SECTION. Sec. 762 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Edmonds Community College: Instructional Lab Building (02-2-685)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,939,060

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,491,466
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,488,526

NEW SECTION. Sec. 763 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Facility Repairs "A" (02-1-050)

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,716,919

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,943,409
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,660,328

NEW SECTION. Sec. 764 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Grays Harbor College: Library Renovation (02-1-311)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,142,150

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,437,350
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,579,500

NEW SECTION. Sec. 765 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: International Program Replacement
(02-1-222)

Reappropriation:
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $501,790

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $85,280
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $587,070

NEW SECTION. Sec. 766 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lake Washington Technical College: Replacement (02-1-240)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,536,746

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $378,554
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,915,300

NEW SECTION. Sec. 767 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lower Columbia College: Physical Science Portables Replacement
(02-1-226)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,445,865

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $513,935
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,959,800

NEW SECTION. Sec. 768 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works - Preservation (Emergency Funds) (02-1-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation shall only be used for unanticipated
building or infrastructure repairs necessary for the protection of
capital assets and protection of health or safety. The legislature
does not intend for this appropriation to be used for routine
maintenance.
(2) The legislature does not intend to reappropriate amounts not
expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,912,186

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,087,814
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 769 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works - Program (02-1-130)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the conditions and
limitations in section 795(1), chapter 8, Laws of 2001 2nd sp. sess.
(2) The legislature does not intent to reappropriate amounts not
expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,744,801
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,365,870
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,110,671

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,110,071

NEW SECTION. Sec. 770 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Peninsula College: Buildings D and E Renovation (02-1-310)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,656,850

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,950
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,669,800

NEW SECTION. Sec. 771 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College Fort Steilacoom: Portables Replacement (02-1-223)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,134,848

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $317,252
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,452,100

NEW SECTION. Sec. 772 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Roof Repairs "A" (02-1-010)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,370,213

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,102,864
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,473,077

NEW SECTION. Sec. 773 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College: Edison Hall Renovation
(02-1-315)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,705,209

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,103,991
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,809,200

NEW SECTION. Sec. 774 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College: Portables Replacement
(02-1-215)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,808,687

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $88,713
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,897,400

NEW SECTION. Sec. 775 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Shoreline Community College: Building 800 Renovation (02-1-319)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,858,057

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $163,043
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,021,100

NEW SECTION. Sec. 776 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Site Repairs "A" (02-1-090)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $200,000 of the reappropriation from the state building
construction account--state is provided solely to South Seattle
Community College for the Seattle Chinese gardens. The reappropriation
must be matched by $200,000 in additional contributions toward the
project from local government.
(2) The legislature does not intend to reappropriate amounts not
expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $89,000
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,852,474
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,941,474

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,601,758
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,543,232

NEW SECTION. Sec. 777 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Skagit Valley College: Office Space Replacement (02-1-213)

Reappropriation:
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $752,777

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,912
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $762,689

NEW SECTION. Sec. 778 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Puget Sound Community College: Family Education/Child Center
(02-1-238)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,718,357

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $413,643
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,132,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 779 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Seattle Community College: Building "A" Replacement
(02-1-217)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,190,236

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $287,164
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,477,400

NEW SECTION. Sec. 780 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Falls Community College: Library Renovation (02-1-331)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,269,005

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $332,995
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,602,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 781 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College: Information Technology Vocational Center
(02-2-683)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $534,671
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,531,900

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $663,429
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,730,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 782 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College: Portable Buildings Replacement
(02-1-236)

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,437,867

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,133
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,457,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 783 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Walla Walla Community College: Basic Skills/Computer Lab
(02-2-686)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $573,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,300
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,431,700
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,041,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 784 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Walla Walla Community College: Parent/Child Center Replacement
(02-1-234)

Reappropriation:
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $222,907

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $168,323
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $391,230

NEW SECTION. Sec. 785 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Job Creation and Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation in this section shall support the projects
as listed in section 224, chapter 238, Laws of 2002.
(2) The legislature does not intend to reappropriate amounts not
expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $865,437
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,209,178
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,074,615

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,525,560
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,600,175

NEW SECTION. Sec. 786 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellevue Community College: "D" Building Renovation (04-1-308)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,418,700

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,418,700

NEW SECTION. Sec. 787 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellevue Community College: NWCET Expansion (04-2-402)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The purpose of the appropriation is to build an additional
4,000 square feet of open lab space to accommodate new and expanding
information technology and media programs.
(2) State funds will be matched with nonstate resources of at least
$500,000.
(3) Allotment of funds shall be in accordance with RCW 43.88.150.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 788 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellevue Community College: Science and Technology (04-2-690)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The purpose of the appropriation is to
conduct a predesign study of alternatives for a replacement building in
compliance with adopted master and strategic plans and which
additionally addresses projected enrollment demands, operating budget
impacts, options for reduction of parking needs, and cost effective
ways to meet new local environmental regulations.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 789 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Cascadia Community College: Center for Arts, Technology,
Communications (04-2-693)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The purpose of the appropriation is to conduct a predesign
study of alternatives for a building to house new programs that
integrate arts and languages with technology, media, and business
programs.
(2) The predesign shall be consistent with the college's adopted
strategic plan and colocated campus master plan and additionally
address projected enrollment demands, operating budget impacts, and
options for reduction of parking needs.
(3) The college shall coordinate planning efforts with the
University of Washington, Bothell and address the timing of
construction of the south campus access in the predesign.
(4) Any necessary modifications to the colocated campus master plan
should result in an addendum to the campus master plan to be submitted
for review by the office of financial management and the legislative
fiscal committees.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $159,900

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $159,900

NEW SECTION. Sec. 790 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Centralia Community College Science Building (04-2-850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The purpose of this appropriation is to conduct a predesign
study for a science building that will address a range of alternatives,
meet the needs of project enrollment in the sciences, and be sited in
a location that maximizes future development of the campus.
(2) The predesign shall be consistent with the college's adopted
strategic and facility master plans and additionally address projected
enrollment demands, operating budget impacts, and options for reduction
of parking needs.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 791 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clark College: Renovation - Applied Arts 5 (04-1-303)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,872,413

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,872,413

NEW SECTION. Sec. 792 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clark College: Stout Hall (04-1-203)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,049,889

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,049,889

NEW SECTION. Sec. 793 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clark College: East County Satellite (04-1-689)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The purpose of this appropriation is to conduct a predesign
study of alternatives for a potential satellite campus.
(2) The predesign shall be consistent with the college's adopted
strategic and master plans and additionally address projected
enrollment demands, operating budget impacts, and options for reduction
of parking needs.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 794 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Columbia Basin College: Renovation - "T" Building (04-1-307)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,058,500

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,058,500

NEW SECTION. Sec. 795 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Edmonds Community College: Renovation - Mountlake Terrace Hall
(04-1-311)

Appropriation:
State Education Building Construction Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,827,030

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,827,030

NEW SECTION. Sec. 796 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Everett Community College: Pilchuck/Glacier (04-1-205)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,311,700

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,633,300
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,945,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 797 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Everett Community College: Renovation - Monte Cristo Hall
(04-1-305)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,352,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,352,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 798 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Everett Community College: Undergraduate Education Center (04-2-692)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The purpose of this appropriation is to conduct a predesign
study of alternatives for a potential undergraduate education center to
meet the projected enrollment demands of academic transfer students.
(2) The predesign shall be consistent with the college's adopted
strategic and master plans and additionally address projected
enrollment demands, operating budget impacts, reuse or disposition of
existing facilities, and options for reduction of parking needs.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $126,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $126,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 799 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Facility Repairs "A" (04-1-050)

Appropriation:
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,428,699

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,428,699

NEW SECTION. Sec. 800 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Grays Harbor College: Replacement - Instructional Building
(04-1-204)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,263,300

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,371,700
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,635,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: Computer Technology Center
(04-2-682)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $356,193
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,984,800

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $658,507
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,999,500

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM

Lake Washington Technical College: Renovation - East/West
Buildings (04-1-312)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,420,800

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,420,800

NEW SECTION. Sec. 803 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lake Washington Technical College: Redmond Land Acquisition (04-2-403)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The purpose of the appropriation is to purchase property for
expansion, storm water retention and parking requirements.
(2) State funds must be matched with nonstate resources of at least
$500,000.
(3) Allotment of funds shall be in accordance with RCW 43.88.150.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 804 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lower Columbia College: Instructional/Fine Arts Building
Replacement (04-1-214)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,473,314

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,473,314

NEW SECTION. Sec. 805 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works - Program (04-2-130)

Appropriation:
State Education Building Construction Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,040,317

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,040,317

NEW SECTION. Sec. 806 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works: Facility Preservation (04-1-001)

Appropriation:
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 807 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Miscellaneous Projects (04-4-850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is for large equipment at the following
colleges: $325,000 for Bates Technical Institute and $325,000 for
Clover Park Community College; and $100,000 for parking improvements at
Tacoma Community College.
(2) The appropriation shall not be used for vehicles, laptop
computers, small printers, disposable items, or other items with a
useful life of less than one year.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 808 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
North Seattle Community College: Arts and Science Renovation
(04-1-309)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,785,700

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,785,700

NEW SECTION. Sec. 809 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Olympic College: Science and Technology Building Replacement
(04-1-202)

Appropriation:
State Education Building Construction Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,098,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,098,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 810 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Peninsula College: Science and Technology Building (04-1-208)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The purpose of this appropriation is to conduct a predesign
study of alternatives for a potential replacement of existing science
lab facilities.
(2) The predesign shall be consistent with the college's adopted
strategic and master plans and additionally address projected
enrollment demands, operating budget impacts, reuse or disposition of
existing facilities, and options for reduction of parking needs.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $82,800

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $82,800

NEW SECTION. Sec. 811 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Peninsula Community College: North Olympic Skill Center and
Resource Center (04-2-406)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Peninsula Community College shall match state funds with
nonstate resources of at least $500,000.
(2) Allotment of funds shall be in accordance with RCW 43.88.150.
(3) This completes the state contribution to this project.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 812 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College: Fort Steilacoom - Health Science Center (04-3-306)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is for the design and construction of, and
equipment necessary to transform, a pool building into a multi-use
health science and wellness education facility.
(2) The state board for community and technical colleges shall
submit a major project report to the office of financial management
with copies to the legislative fiscal committees in accordance with the
established procedures for major project reports. In addition, the
report will contain a cost tracking form that links expenditures by C-100 category.
(3) Following occupancy of the project, the state board for
community and technical colleges, with the assistance of the department
of general administration division of engineering and architectural
services and the community college, shall submit a final budget
reconciliation that summarizes all costs for the project, including
equipment, regardless of the fund source.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,928,800

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,928,800

NEW SECTION. Sec. 813 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College Puyallup: Communication Arts and Allied Health
Building (04-1-691)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The purpose of this appropriation is to conduct a predesign
study of alternatives for a potential building to accommodate increased
capacity in professional and technical programs.
(2) The predesign shall be consistent with the college's adopted
strategic and master plans and additionally address projected
enrollment demands, operating budget impacts, reuse or disposition of
existing facilities, and options for reduction of parking needs.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 814 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College Fort Steilacoom: Science and Technology Building
(04-1-694)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The purpose of this appropriation is to conduct a predesign
study of alternatives for a potential replacement of existing science
lab facilities.
(2) The predesign shall be consistent with the college's adopted
strategic and master plans and additionally address projected
enrollment demands, operating budget impacts, reuse or disposition of
existing facilities, and options for reduction of parking needs.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $190,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $190,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 815 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College: Fort Steilacoom - Child Care Center (04-2-401)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The purpose of the appropriation is to construct a 10,000
square foot childcare center as identified in the college's master
plan.
(2) State funds must be matched with nonstate resources in the
amount of $2,250,000.
(3) Allotment of funds shall be in accordance with RCW 43.88.150.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 816 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Roof Repairs "A" (04-1-010)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,265,677
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,265,677

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,265,677

NEW SECTION. Sec. 817 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College: Renovation - Broadway Edison
(04-1-310)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is for the renovation of and equipment for
the student services administrative areas in the Broadway Edison
building.
(2) The state board for community and technical colleges shall
submit a major project report to the office of financial management
with copies to the legislative fiscal committees in accordance with the
established procedures for major project reports. In addition, the
report will contain a cost tracking form that links expenditures by C-100 category.
(3) Following occupancy of the project, the state board for
community and technical colleges, with the assistance of the department
of general administration and the community college, shall submit a
final budget reconciliation that summarizes all costs for the project,
including equipment, regardless of the funding source.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,995,800

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,995,800

NEW SECTION. Sec. 818 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Seattle Central: Replacement North Plaza Building (04-1-275)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is for the design and construction of, and
equipment for, an information technology program. The space for the
program is created by adding a floor to another structure.
(2) The state board for community and technical colleges shall
submit a major project report to the office of financial management
with copies to the legislative fiscal committees in accordance with the
established procedures for major project reports. In addition, the
report will contain a cost tracking form that links expenditures by C-100 category.
(3) Following occupancy of the project, the state board for
community and technical colleges, with the assistance of the department
of general administration and the community college, shall submit a
final budget reconciliation that summarizes all costs for the project,
including equipment, regardless of the fund source.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,976,200

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,976,200

NEW SECTION. Sec. 819 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Infrastructure Repairs
(04-1-950)

The appropriation in this section is provided to keep facilities
owned and used for educational and general operations of state colleges
and universities in adequate condition or better. The legislature
intends that maintenance, mechanical adjustments, repairs, and minor
works supported by this project extend the remaining useful life of the
facility, be of an enduring nature lasting thirteen years or longer,
and shall only take place in state-owned building structures where
educational and general program missions are housed.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 820 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Site Repairs "A" (04-1-090)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,305,624

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,305,624

NEW SECTION. Sec. 821 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Skagit Valley College: Science Building Replacement (04-1-209)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The college shall complete a predesign for a science building
that will address a range of alternatives, meet the needs of projected
enrollment in the sciences, and be sited in a location that maximizes
future development of the campus.
(2) The appropriation shall be used to complete predesign, amend
master plan documents, and complete infrastructure planning so that the
proposed project is consistent with the college's strategic plan and
facilities master plan.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 822 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Puget Sound Community College: Science Complex (04-2-695)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The purpose of the appropriation is to conduct a predesign
study of alternatives for additional natural science laboratory and
classroom space in compliance with adopted master and strategic plans.
(2) The predesign shall additionally address projected enrollment
demands, operating budget impacts, options for reduction of parking
needs and cost-effective ways to meet local environmental regulations.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $93,200

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $93,200

NEW SECTION. Sec. 823 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Community College Science Building Replacement (04-1-212)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,721,600
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,721,600

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,721,600

NEW SECTION. Sec. 824 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Seattle Community College: Instructional Technology Center
(04-2-681)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $713,759
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,236,600

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $910,641
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,861,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 825 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM

South Seattle Community College: Renovation - Pastry Vocational
Program (04-1-314)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,613,100

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,613,100

NEW SECTION. Sec. 826 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Seattle Community College: Replacement Portables (04-1-210)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is for the design and construction of, and
equipment for, general classroom space replacing substandard portable
classrooms.
(2) The state board for community and technical colleges shall
submit a major project report to the office of financial management
with copies to the legislative fiscal committees in accordance with the
established procedures for major project reports. In addition, the
report will contain a cost tracking form that links expenditures by C-100 category.
(3) Following occupancy of the project, the state board for
community and technical colleges, with the assistance of the department
of general administration and the community college, shall submit a
final budget reconciliation that summarizes all costs for the project,
including equipment, regardless of the fund source.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,882,200

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,882,200

NEW SECTION. Sec. 827 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College: Renovation - Building 7 (04-1-313)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is for the design and construction of, and
equipment for, an extensive renovation of an instructional building and
its systems.
(2) The state board for community and technical colleges shall
submit a major project report to the office of financial management
with copies to the legislative fiscal committees in accordance with the
established procedures for major project reports. In addition, the
report will contain a cost tracking form that links expenditures by C-100 category.
(3) Following occupancy of the project, the state board for
community and technical colleges, with the assistance of the department
of general administration and the community college, shall submit a
final budget reconciliation that summarizes all costs for the project,
including equipment, regardless of the fund source.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,988,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,988,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 828 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College: Replacement - Portable Buildings
(04-1-206)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,622,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,622,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 829 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Walla Walla Community College: Health Science Facility (04-1-211)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,261,400

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,261,400

NEW SECTION. Sec. 830 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Wenatchee Valley College: Portable Replacement (04-1-201)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 831 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Yakima Valley Community College: Renovation - Sundquist Annex
(04-1-302)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,852,700

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,852,700

NEW SECTION. Sec. 832 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Yakima Valley: Classroom Building Replacement (04-1-207)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Allotment for design is contingent upon the completion of a
predesign for a building to replace Anthon, Sundquist, and Glenn halls
and the approval of the predesign by the office of financial
management.
(2) The office of financial management shall coordinate review of
the predesign with the legislative fiscal committees prior to allotment
for design.
(3) The predesign should address a range of alternatives, meet the
needs of projected enrollments, and be sited in a location that
maximizes future development of the campus.
(4) The appropriation may be used to complete predesign, amend
master plan documents, and complete infrastructure planning so the
proposed project is consistent with the college's strategic plan and
facilities master plan.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 833 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Cascadia Community College: UW Bothell/Cascadia CC Phase 2B
Offramp (02-2-999)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The community college agrees to repay the general fund--state
from local community college revenues for debt service on the bonds
issued to support this project.
(2) If at least $8,000,000 is not appropriated in the 2003-05
omnibus transportation budget by June 30, 2003, for the UW
Bothell/Cascadia Community College phase 2B offramp, this appropriation
shall lapse.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,390,000
Appropriation:
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,990,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 834 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Infrastructure Savings (04-1-850)

Projects that are completed in accordance with section 915 of this
act may have their remaining funds transferred to this appropriation
for other preservation projects approved by the office of financial
management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

(End of part)

PART 6
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 The estimated debt service costs impacting
future general fund expenditures related solely to new capital
appropriations within this act are $18,827,417 during the 2003-2005
fiscal period; $111,194,423 during the 2005-2007 fiscal period;
$155,435,444 during the 2007-2009 fiscal period; $155,435,444 during
the 2009-2011 fiscal period; and $155,435,444 during the 2011-2013
period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902 Allotments for appropriations in this act
shall be provided in accordance with the capital project review
requirements adopted by the office of financial management. The office
of financial management shall notify the house of representatives
capital budget committee and the senate ways and means committee of
allotment releases based on review by the office of financial
management. No expenditure may be incurred or obligation entered into
for appropriations in this act until the office of financial management
has given final approval to the allotment of the funds to be expended
or encumbered. For allotments under this act, the allotment process
includes, in addition to the statement of proposed expenditures for the
current biennium, a category or categories for any reserve amounts and
amounts expected to be expended in future biennia. Projects that will
be employing alternative public works construction procedures under
chapter 39.10 RCW are subject to the allotment procedures defined in
this section and RCW 43.88.110. Contracts shall not be executed that
call for expenditures in excess of the approved allotment, and the
total amount shown in such contracts for the cost of future work that
has not been appropriated shall not exceed the amount identified for
such work in the level of funding approved by the office of financial
management at the completion of predesign.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 903 To ensure that major construction projects
are carried out in accordance with legislative and executive intent,
appropriations in this act in excess of $5,000,000 shall not be
expended or encumbered until the office of financial management has
reviewed and approved the agency's predesign and other documents, and
approved an allotment for the project that includes specific
authorization to enter into a contract to expend or encumber funds.
The predesign document shall include but not be limited to program,
site, and cost analysis in accordance with the predesign manual adopted
by the office of financial management. To improve monitoring of major
construction projects, progress reports shall be submitted by the
agency administering the project to the office of financial management
and to the fiscal committees of the house of representatives and
senate. Reports will be submitted on July 1st and December 31st each
year in a format to be developed by the office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 904 Appropriations in this act for design and
construction of facilities on higher education campuses shall be
expended only after funds are allotted to institutions of higher
education on the basis of: (1) Comparable unit cost standards, as
determined by the office of financial management in consultation with
the higher education coordinating board; (2) costs consistent with
other higher education teaching facilities in the state; and (3)
student full-time equivalent enrollment levels as established by the
office of financial management in consultation with the higher
education coordinating board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 905 To ensure that minor works appropriations
are carried out in accordance with legislative intent, funds
appropriated in this act shall not be allotted until project lists are
on file at the office of financial management. Minor works
appropriations shall not be used for studies unless expressly
authorized elsewhere in this act. The office of financial management
shall forward copies of these project lists to the house of
representatives capital budget committee and the senate ways and means
committee. No expenditure may be incurred or obligation entered into
for minor works appropriations until the office of financial management
has approved the allotment of the funds to be expended. The office of
financial management shall encourage state agencies to incorporate
accessibility planning and improvements into the normal and customary
capital program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 906 (1) The legislature expects projects to be
ready to proceed in a timely manner depending on the type or phase of
the project or program that is the subject of the appropriation in this
act. Except for major projects that customarily may take more than two
biennia to complete from predesign to the end of construction, or large
infrastructure grant or loan programs supporting projects that often
take more than two biennia to complete, the legislature generally does
not intend to reappropriate funds more than once, particularly for
smaller grant programs, local/community projects, and minor works.
(2) Agencies shall expedite the expenditure of reappropriations and
appropriations in this act in order to: (a) Rehabilitate
infrastructure resources; (b) accelerate environmental rehabilitation
and restoration projects for the improvement of the state's natural
environment; (c) reduce additional costs associated with acquisition
and construction inflationary pressures; and (d) provide additional
employment opportunities associated with capital expenditures.
(3) To the extent feasible, agencies are directed to accelerate
expenditure rates at their current level of permanent employees and
shall use contracted design and construction services wherever
necessary to meet the goals of this section.
(4) The office of financial management shall report the following
to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by January 30,
2005: (a) A listing of reappropriations in the governor's 2005-2007
capital budget recommendation that will be reappropriated more than
once and have ten percent or more of the original appropriation
unexpended; and (b) an explanation of why the appropriation remains
unexpended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 907 ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES
THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS. The following agencies may enter into
financial contracts, paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or
nonappropriated, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the
principal amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under
this section, agencies shall use the most economical financial contract
option available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase
agreements, lease-development with option to purchase agreements or
financial contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures
made by an agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue
date of the authorized financial contract and any certificates of
participation therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of
the financial contract and any certificates of participation therein to
the extent provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the
state finance committee.
State agencies may enter into agreements with the department of
general administration and the state treasurer's office to develop
requests to the legislature for acquisition of properties and
facilities through financial contracts. The agreements may include
charges for services rendered.
(1) Department of general administration: Enter into a financing
contract for an amount approved by the office of financial management
for costs and financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to lease develop or lease purchase a state office
building of 150,000 to 200,000 square feet on state-owned property in
Tumwater according to the terms of the agreement with the Port of
Olympia when the property was acquired or within the preferred
development/leasing areas in Thurston county. The building shall be
constructed and financed so that agency occupancy costs will not exceed
comparable private market rental rates. The comparable general office
space rate shall be calculated based on the three latest Thurston
county leases of new space of at least 100,000 rentable square feet
adjusted for inflation as determined by the department of general
administration. The department of general administration shall
coordinate with potential state agency tenants whose current lease
expire near the time of occupancy so that buyout of current leases do
not add to state expense. The office of financial management shall
certify to the state treasurer: (a) The project description and dollar
amount; and (b) that all requirements of this subsection (1) have been
met.
(2) Department of corrections:
(a) Enter into a financing contract for up to $400,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
to construct a waste transfer station and purchase a garbage truck at
the McNeil Island corrections center.
(b) Enter into a financing contract for up to $4,588,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
to construct a transportation services warehouse and offices for
correctional industries.
(3) Community and technical colleges:
(a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Bellevue Community
College for up to $20,000,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase North Center campus.
(b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Big Bend Community
College for up to $6,500,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an international
conference and training center and dining services center building.
(c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Clark Community
College for up to $9,839,464 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a bookstore,
meeting rooms, student lounge, and study space.
(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Green River
Community College for up to $6,487,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase Kent
Station higher education center.
(e) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Seattle Central
Community College for up to $3,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an above-ground parking garage.
(f) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of South Puget Sound
Community College for up to $660,000 plus financing expenses and
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct parking and
stormwater mitigation facilities.
(g) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of South Puget Sound
Community College for up to $2,500,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase
approximately twenty-five acres of land for a permanent Hawks Prairie
campus.
(h) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Spokane Community
College for up to $725,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase land.
(i) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla
Community College for up to $2,708,800 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase land and
construct a building for professional-technical instruction.
(j) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla
Community College for up to $504,400 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase land and
buildings at the Clarkston center.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 908 FOR THE ARTS COMMISSION--ART WORK
ALLOWANCE POOLING. (1) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated
in this act for original construction of school plant facilities is
provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210. The Washington
state arts commission may combine the proceeds from individual projects
in order to fund larger works of art or mobile art displays in
consultation with the superintendent of public instruction and
representatives of school district boards.
(2) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for
original construction or any major renovation or remodel work exceeding
two hundred thousand dollars by colleges or universities is provided
solely for the purposes of RCW 28B.10.027. The Washington state arts
commission may combine the proceeds from individual projects in order
to fund larger works of art or mobile art displays in consultation with
the board of regents or trustees.
(3) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for
original construction of any public building by a state agency as
defined in RCW 43.17.020 is provided solely for the purposes of RCW
43.17.200. The Washington state arts commission may combine the
proceeds from individual projects in order to fund larger works of art
or mobile art displays in consultation with the state agency.
(4) At least eighty-five percent of the moneys spent by the
Washington state arts commission during the 2003-2005 biennium for the
purposes of RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200 must be expended
solely for direct acquisition of works of art.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 909 The amounts shown under the headings
"Prior Biennia," "Future Biennia," and "Total" in this act are for
informational purposes only and do not constitute legislative approval
of these amounts. "Prior biennia" typically refers to the immediate
prior biennium for reappropriations, but may refer to multiple biennia
in the case of specific projects. A "future biennia" amount is an
estimate of what may be appropriated for the project or program in the
2005-07 biennium and the following four biennia; and amount of zero
does not necessarily constitute legislative intent to not provide
funding for the project or program in the future.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 910 "Reappropriations" in this act are
appropriations and, unless the context clearly provides otherwise, are
subject to the relevant conditions and limitations applicable to
appropriations. Reappropriations shall be limited to the unexpended
balances remaining on June 30, 2003, from the 2001-2003 biennial
appropriations for each project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 911 To carry out the provisions of this act,
the governor may assign responsibility for predesign, design,
construction, and other related activities to any appropriate agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 912 If any federal moneys appropriated by this
act for capital projects are not received by the state, the department
or agency to which the moneys were appropriated may replace the federal
moneys with funds available from private or local sources. No
replacement may occur under this section without the prior approval of
the director of financial management in consultation with the senate
ways and means committee and the house of representatives capital
budget committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 913 (1) Unless otherwise stated, for all
appropriations under this act that require a match of nonstate money or
in-kind contributions, the following requirement, consistent with RCW
43.88.150, shall apply: Expenditures of state money shall be timed so
that the state share of project expenditures never exceeds the intended
state share of total project costs.
(2) Provision of the full amount of required matching funds is not
required to permit the expenditure of capital budget appropriations for
phased projects if a proportional amount of the required matching funds
is provided for each distinct, identifiable phase of the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 914 Any capital improvements or capital
projects involving construction or major expansion of a state office
facility, including, but not limited to, district headquarters,
detachment offices, and off-campus faculty offices, must be reviewed by
the department of general administration for possible consolidation,
collocation, and compliance with state office standards before
allotment of funds. The intent of the requirement imposed by this
section is to eliminate duplication and reduce total office space
requirements where feasible, while ensuring proper service to the
public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 915 (1) The governor, through the office of
financial management, may authorize a transfer of appropriation
authority provided for a capital project that is in excess of the
amount required for the completion of such project to another capital
project for which the appropriation is insufficient. No such transfer
may be used to expand the capacity of any facility beyond that intended
by the legislature in making the appropriation. Such transfers may be
effected only between capital appropriations to a specific department,
commission, agency, or institution of higher education and only between
capital projects that are funded from the same fund or account. No
transfers may occur between projects to local government agencies
except where the grants are provided within a single omnibus
appropriation and where such transfers are specifically authorized by
the implementing statutes that govern the grants.
(2) For purposes of this section, the governor may find that an
amount is in excess of the amount required for the completion of a
project only if: (a) The project as defined in the notes to the budget
document is substantially complete and there are funds remaining; or
(b) bids have been let on a project and it appears to a substantial
certainty that the project as defined in the notes to the budget
document can be completed within the biennium for less than the amount
appropriated in this act.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the legislature intends that
each project be defined as proposed to the legislature in the
governor's budget document, unless it clearly appears from the
legislative history that the legislature intended to define the scope
of a project in a different way.
(4) Transfers of funds to an agency's infrastructure savings
appropriation are subject to review and approval by the office of
financial management. Expenditures from an infrastructure savings
appropriation are limited to projects that have a primary purpose to
correct infrastructure deficiencies or conditions that: (a) Adversely
affect the ability to utilize the infrastructure for its current
programmatic use; (b) reduce the life expectancy of the infrastructure;
or (c) increase the operating costs of the infrastructure for its
current programmatic use. Eligible infrastructure projects may include
structures and surface improvements, site amenities, utility systems
outside building footprints and natural environmental changes or
requirements as part of an environmental regulation, a declaration of
emergency for an infrastructure issue in conformance with RCW
43.88.250, or infrastructure planning as part of a facility master
plan.
(5) A report of any transfer effected under this section, except
emergency projects or any transfer under $250,000, shall be filed with
the legislative fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives by the office of financial management at least thirty
days before the date the transfer is effected. The office of financial
management shall report all emergency or smaller transfers within
thirty days from the date of transfer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 916 NONTAXABLE AND TAXABLE BOND PROCEEDS.
Portions of the appropriation authority granted by this act from the
state building construction account may be transferred to the state
taxable building construction account as deemed necessary by the state
finance committee to comply with the federal internal revenue service
rules and regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond
proceeds. The state treasurer shall submit written notification to the
director of financial management if it is determined that a shift of
appropriation authority from the state building construction account to
the state taxable building construction account is necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 917 The office of financial management, in
consultation with the department of general administration, shall
identify capital projects that may benefit from an energy analysis to
determine whether there are alternate, more economical, and energy
efficient means of completing the work. The office of financial
management shall hold appropriations in allotment reserve on the
following types of capital projects until this analysis can be
completed: Heating, ventilation, and air conditioning modifications,
chiller plants, steam plants, boilers, chilled water or steam lines,
building control systems, lighting improvements, or other major energy
using systems that may warrant additional analysis. Agencies receiving
appropriations for such projects are encouraged to utilize energy
performance contracts or alternative financing for equipment in lieu of
state appropriated funds. The office of financial management may
transfer funds remaining in allotment reserve to infrastructure savings
projects within the agency that has realized savings from energy
efficiency alternatives.

Sec. 918 RCW 43.135.045 and 2002 c 33 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The emergency reserve fund is established in the state
treasury. During each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall deposit
in the emergency reserve fund all general fund -- state revenues in
excess of the state expenditure limit for that fiscal year. Deposits
shall be made at the end of each fiscal quarter based on projections of
state revenues and the state expenditure limit. The treasurer shall
make transfers between these accounts as necessary to reconcile actual
annual revenues and the expenditure limit for fiscal year 2000 and
thereafter.
(2) The legislature may appropriate moneys from the emergency
reserve fund only with approval of at least two-thirds of the members
of each house of the legislature, and then only if the appropriation
does not cause total expenditures to exceed the state expenditure limit
under this chapter. However, during the 2001-2003 biennium, the
legislature may transfer moneys from the emergency reserve fund to the
general fund only with approval of a majority of the members of each
house of the legislature, and then only if the appropriation does not
cause total expenditures to exceed the state expenditure limit under
this chapter.
(3) The emergency reserve fund balance shall not exceed five
percent of annual general fund -- state revenues as projected by the
official state revenue forecast. Any balance in excess of five percent
shall be transferred on a quarterly basis by the state treasurer as
follows: Seventy-five percent to the student achievement fund hereby
created in the state treasury and twenty-five percent to the general
fund balance. The treasurer shall make transfers between these
accounts as necessary to reconcile actual annual revenues for fiscal
year 2000 and thereafter. When per-student state funding for the
maintenance and operation of K-12 education meets a level of no less
than ninety percent of the national average of total funding from all
sources per student as determined by the most recent published data
from the national center for education statistics of the United States
department of education, as calculated by the office of financial
management, further deposits to the student achievement fund shall be
required only to the extent necessary to maintain the ninety-percent
level. Remaining funds are part of the general fund balance and these
funds are subject to the expenditure limits of this chapter.
(4) The education construction fund is hereby created in the state
treasury.
(a) Funds may be appropriated from the education construction fund
exclusively for common school construction or higher education
construction. During the fiscal years beginning July 1, 2003, and
ending June 30, 2005, funds may also be used for higher education
facilities preservation and maintenance.
(b) Funds may be appropriated for any other purpose only if
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and if
approved by a vote of the people at the next general election. An
appropriation approved by the people under this subsection shall result
in an adjustment to the state expenditure limit only for the fiscal
period for which the appropriation is made and shall not affect any
subsequent fiscal period.
(5) Funds from the student achievement fund shall be appropriated
to the superintendent of public instruction strictly for distribution
to school districts to meet the provisions set out in the student
achievement act. Allocations shall be made on an equal per full-time
equivalent student basis to each school district.
(6) Earnings of the emergency reserve fund under RCW
43.84.092(4)(a) shall be transferred quarterly to the multimodal
transportation account, except for those earnings that are in excess of
thirty-five million dollars each fiscal year. Within thirty days
following any fiscal year in which earnings transferred to the
multimodal transportation account under this subsection did not total
thirty-five million dollars, the state treasurer shall transfer from
the emergency reserve fund an amount necessary to bring the total
deposited in the multimodal transportation account under this
subsection to thirty-five million dollars. The revenues to the
multimodal transportation account reflected in this subsection provide
ongoing support for the transportation programs of the state. However,
it is the intent of the legislature that any new long-term financial
support that may be subsequently provided for transportation programs
will be used to replace and supplant the revenues reflected in this
subsection, thereby allowing those revenues to be returned to the
purposes to which they were previously dedicated.

Sec. 919 RCW 43.135.045 and 2001 c 3 s 9, 2000 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 1,
and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) The emergency reserve fund is established in the state
treasury. During each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall deposit
in the emergency reserve fund all general fund -- state revenues in
excess of the state expenditure limit for that fiscal year. Deposits
shall be made at the end of each fiscal quarter based on projections of
state revenues and the state expenditure limit. The treasurer shall
make transfers between these accounts as necessary to reconcile actual
annual revenues and the expenditure limit for fiscal year 2000 and
thereafter.
(2) The legislature may appropriate moneys from the emergency
reserve fund only with approval of at least two-thirds of the members
of each house of the legislature, and then only if the appropriation
does not cause total expenditures to exceed the state expenditure limit
under this chapter.
(3) The emergency reserve fund balance shall not exceed five
percent of annual general fund -- state revenues as projected by the
official state revenue forecast. Any balance in excess of five percent
shall be transferred on a quarterly basis by the state treasurer as
follows: Seventy-five percent to the student achievement fund hereby
created in the state treasury and twenty-five percent to the general
fund balance. The treasurer shall make transfers between these
accounts as necessary to reconcile actual annual revenues for fiscal
year 2000 and thereafter. When per-student state funding for the
maintenance and operation of K-12 education meets a level of no less
than ninety percent of the national average of total funding from all
sources per student as determined by the most recent published data
from the national center for education statistics of the United States
department of education, as calculated by the office of financial
management, further deposits to the student achievement fund shall be
required only to the extent necessary to maintain the ninety-percent
level. Remaining funds are part of the general fund balance and these
funds are subject to the expenditure limits of this chapter.
(4) The education construction fund is hereby created in the state
treasury.
(a) Funds may be appropriated from the education construction fund
exclusively for common school construction or higher education
construction. During the fiscal years beginning July 1, 2003, and
ending June 30, 2005, funds may also be used for higher education
facilities preservation and maintenance.
(b) Funds may be appropriated for any other purpose only if
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and if
approved by a vote of the people at the next general election. An
appropriation approved by the people under this subsection shall result
in an adjustment to the state expenditure limit only for the fiscal
period for which the appropriation is made and shall not affect any
subsequent fiscal period.
(5) Funds from the student achievement fund shall be appropriated
to the superintendent of public instruction strictly for distribution
to school districts to meet the provisions set out in the student
achievement act. Allocations shall be made on an equal per full-time
equivalent student basis to each school district.
(6) Earnings of the emergency reserve fund under RCW
43.84.092(4)(a) shall be transferred quarterly to the multimodal
transportation account, except for those earnings that are in excess of
thirty-five million dollars each fiscal year. Within thirty days
following any fiscal year in which earnings transferred to the
multimodal transportation account under this subsection did not total
thirty-five million dollars, the state treasurer shall transfer from
the emergency reserve fund an amount necessary to bring the total
deposited in the multimodal transportation account under this
subsection to thirty-five million dollars. The revenues to the
multimodal transportation account reflected in this subsection provide
ongoing support for the transportation programs of the state. However,
it is the intent of the legislature that any new long-term financial
support that may be subsequently provided for transportation programs
will be used to replace and supplant the revenues reflected in this
subsection, thereby allowing those revenues to be returned to the
purposes to which they were previously dedicated.

Sec. 920 RCW 46.09.170 and 1995 c 166 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) From time to time, but at least once each year, the state
treasurer shall refund from the motor vehicle fund one percent of the
motor vehicle fuel tax revenues collected under chapter 82.36 RCW,
based on the tax rate in effect January 1, 1990, less proper deductions
for refunds and costs of collection as provided in RCW 46.68.090. The
treasurer shall place these funds in the general fund as follows:
(a) Forty percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway
vehicle account and administered by the department of natural resources
solely for planning, maintenance, and management of ORV recreation
facilities, nonhighway roads, and nonhighway road recreation
facilities. The funds under this subsection shall be expended in
accordance with the following limitations:
(i) Not more than five percent may be expended for information
programs under this chapter;
(ii) Not less than ten percent and not more than fifty percent may
be expended for ORV recreation facilities;
(iii) Not more than twenty-five percent may be expended for
maintenance of nonhighway roads;
(iv) Not more than fifty percent may be expended for nonhighway
road recreation facilities;
(v) Ten percent shall be transferred to the interagency committee
for outdoor recreation for grants to law enforcement agencies in those
counties where the department of natural resources maintains ORV
facilities. This amount is in addition to those distributions made by
the interagency committee for outdoor recreation under (d)(i) of this
subsection;
(b) Three and one-half percent shall be credited to the ORV and
nonhighway vehicle account and administered by the department of fish
and wildlife solely for the acquisition, planning, development,
maintenance, and management of nonhighway roads and recreation
facilities;
(c) Two percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway vehicle
account and administered by the parks and recreation commission solely
for the maintenance and management of ORV use areas and facilities; and
(d) Fifty-four and one-half percent, together with the funds
received by the interagency committee for outdoor recreation under RCW
46.09.110, shall be credited to the nonhighway and off-road vehicle
activities program account to be administered by the committee for
planning, acquisition, development, maintenance, and management of ORV
recreation facilities and nonhighway road recreation facilities; ORV
user education and information; and ORV law enforcement programs.
During the biennium ending on June 30, 2005, a portion of these funds
may be appropriated to the department of natural resources to maintain
and operate existing ORV and other recreation facilities, including ORV
campgrounds, for the state parks and recreation commission to maintain
and operate campgrounds and other facilities, and for other activities
identified in this section. The funds under this subsection shall be
expended in accordance with the following limitations, except that
during the biennium ending on June 30, 2005, funds appropriated to the
committee from motor vehicle fuel tax revenues for the activities in
(d)(ii) and (iii) of this subsection shall be reduced by the amounts
appropriated to the department of natural resources and the state parks
and recreation commission as provided in this subsection:
(i) Not more than twenty percent may be expended for ORV education,
information, and law enforcement programs under this chapter;
(ii) Not less than an amount equal to the funds received by the
interagency committee for outdoor recreation under RCW 46.09.110 and
not more than sixty percent may be expended for ORV recreation
facilities;
(iii) Not more than twenty percent may be expended for nonhighway
road recreation facilities.
(2) On a yearly basis an agency may not, except as provided in RCW
46.09.110, expend more than ten percent of the funds it receives under
this chapter for general administration expenses incurred in carrying
out this chapter.

Sec. 921 RCW 79A.15.030 and 2000 c 11 s 66 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, moneys
appropriated for this chapter shall be divided equally between the
habitat conservation and outdoor recreation accounts and shall be used
exclusively for the purposes specified in this chapter.
(2) Moneys deposited in these accounts shall be invested as
authorized for other state funds, and any earnings on them shall be
credited to the respective account.
(3) All moneys deposited in the habitat conservation and outdoor
recreation accounts shall be allocated under RCW 79A.15.040 and
79A.15.050 as grants to state or local agencies for acquisition,
development, and renovation within the jurisdiction of those agencies,
subject to legislative appropriation. The committee may use or permit
the use of any funds appropriated for this chapter as matching funds
where federal, local, or other funds are made available for projects
within the purposes of this chapter.
(4) Projects receiving grants under this chapter that are developed
or otherwise accessible for public recreational uses shall be available
to the public on a nondiscriminatory basis.
(5) The committee may make grants to an eligible project from both
the habitat conservation and outdoor recreation accounts and any one or
more of the applicable categories under such accounts described in RCW
79A.15.040 and 79A.15.050.
(6) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2003, and ending June 30,
2005, the appropriation shall be divided as provided in section 352 of
this act.

Sec. 922 RCW 79A.15.040 and 1999 c 379 s 917 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except for the biennium beginning July 1, 2003, and ending June
30, 2005, moneys appropriated for this chapter to the habitat
conservation account shall be distributed in the following way:
(a) Not less than thirty-five percent for the acquisition and
development of critical habitat;
(b) Not less than twenty percent for the acquisition and
development of natural areas;
(c) Not less than fifteen percent for the acquisition and
development of urban wildlife habitat; and
(d) The remaining amount shall be considered unallocated and shall
be used by the committee to fund high priority acquisition and
development needs for critical habitat, natural areas, and urban
wildlife habitat. During the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2001, the
remaining amount reappropriated from the fiscal biennium ending June
30, 1999, may be allocated for matching grants for riparian zone
habitat protection projects that implement watershed plans under the
program established in section 329(6), chapter 235, Laws of 1997.
(2) In distributing these funds, the committee retains discretion
to meet the most pressing needs for critical habitat, natural areas,
and urban wildlife habitat, and is not required to meet the percentages
described in subsection (1) of this section in any one biennium.
(3) Only state agencies may apply for acquisition and development
funds for critical habitat and natural areas projects under subsection
(1)(a), (b), and (d) of this section.
(4) State and local agencies may apply for acquisition and
development funds for urban wildlife habitat projects under subsection
(1)(c) and (d) of this section.

Sec. 923 RCW 79A.15.050 and 1999 c 379 s 941 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except for the biennium beginning July 1, 2003, and ending June
30, 2005, moneys appropriated for this chapter to the outdoor
recreation account shall be distributed in the following way:
(a) Not less than twenty-five percent to the state parks and
recreation commission for the acquisition and development of state
parks, with at least seventy-five percent of this money for acquisition
costs. However, during the 1999-2001 biennium, distributions for
acquisition and development of state parks shall not exceed four
million two hundred fifty thousand dollars, and the proportion for
acquisition costs shall be determined by the commission;
(b) Not less than twenty-five percent for the acquisition,
development, and renovation of local parks, with at least fifty percent
of this money for acquisition costs;
(c) Not less than fifteen percent for the acquisition and
development of trails;
(d) Not less than ten percent for the acquisition and development
of water access sites, with at least seventy-five percent of this money
for acquisition costs; and
(e) The remaining amount shall be considered unallocated and shall
be distributed by the committee to state and local agencies to fund
high priority acquisition and development needs for parks, trails, and
water access sites.
(2) In distributing these funds, the committee retains discretion
to meet the most pressing needs for state and local parks, trails, and
water access sites, and is not required to meet the percentages
described in subsection (1) of this section in any one biennium.
(3) Only local agencies may apply for acquisition, development, or
renovation funds for local parks under subsection (1)(b) of this
section.
(4) State and local agencies may apply for funds for trails under
subsection (1)(c) of this section.
(5) State and local agencies may apply for funds for water access
sites under subsection (1)(d) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 924 The University of Washington shall develop
a ten year program for the eventual relocation of the residents of the
floating homes located at 1409 NE Boat street. After meeting and
negotiating with the affected residents, the University of Washington
shall develop a report to the legislature. The report, giving the
various options for achieving relocation, shall be submitted no later
than January 15, 2004, to the senate ways and means committee and the
house of representatives capital budget committee. Relocation may
include the purchase and rental back of existing homes through reverse
declining purchase agreements, the physical relocation of the floating
homes to other locations, the creation of a buy-back fund, the
relocation of residents in concert with the purchase of the existing
residences, or other creative real estate transactions that achieve the
relocation of the existing residents or floating homes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 925 (1) The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall conduct a performance audit of state capital planning,
design, and construction processes. In conducting this study, the
committee shall select a sample of major capital projects from the
1995-97 through the 2003-05 biennia in higher education, corrections,
social and health services, and other state agencies. Capital projects
selected for this sample shall accommodate regional differences within
the state. The committee shall consider the following topics in
conducting this performance audit:
(a) Agency development, evaluation, and justification of the cost
drivers and cost elements associated with each of the major phases of
a capital project: General or master planning, predesign, design,
construction, and postconstruction review;
(b) Evaluation of the management and fiscal controls surrounding
agency capital project decision making and implementation processes,
such as policy goals, planning procedures, budget limits, cost and
performance standards, criteria for selecting project priorities,
written instructions, review processes, as well as management,
oversight, reporting, and accountability systems;
(c) Processes and standards for cost-effective and efficient design
and construction contracting, management, oversight, and review;
(d) Assignment of agency staff and administrative costs to major
capital construction projects and the relationship of such agency costs
to project delivery;
(e) Extent of the practice of including equipment as part of the
basic capital project costs, and how equipment costs are estimated and
evaluated for inclusion in projects; and
(f) Comparison of costs to public and private sector benchmarks,
when available and where appropriate, in establishing cost parameters
for state capital construction projects.
(2) State agencies, including state public higher education
institutions, shall provide any requested information concerning the
planning, selection, design, contracting, implementation, management,
costs, performance, and outcomes of projects to the joint legislative
audit and review committee in a timely manner, including relevant
proprietary information that may be associated with individual firms.
However, any proprietary information provided to the committee for this
performance audit shall be deemed confidential and shall not be subject
to public disclosure.
(3) In conducting this performance audit, the committee shall work
closely with the appropriate legislative fiscal committees and shall
consult with the office of financial management, the department of
general administration, the department of corrections, the department
of social and health services, the higher education coordinating board,
the state board for community and technical colleges, individual higher
education institutions, and other agencies as appropriate. The
committee may contract for consulting services in conducting this
performance audit. In its final report, the committee shall make
recommendations as appropriate. The committee shall provide a progress
report to the appropriate legislative committees by January 9, 2004,
and a final report by January 8, 2005.

Sec. 926 RCW 42.17.310 and 2002 c 335 s 1, 2002 c 224 s 2, 2002
c 205 s 4, and 2002 c 172 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) The following are exempt from public inspection and copying:
(a) Personal information in any files maintained for students in
public schools, patients or clients of public institutions or public
health agencies, or welfare recipients.
(b) Personal information in files maintained for employees,
appointees, or elected officials of any public agency to the extent
that disclosure would violate their right to privacy.
(c) Information required of any taxpayer in connection with the
assessment or collection of any tax if the disclosure of the
information to other persons would (i) be prohibited to such persons by
RCW 84.08.210, 82.32.330, 84.40.020, or 84.40.340 or (ii) violate the
taxpayer's right to privacy or result in unfair competitive
disadvantage to the taxpayer.
(d) Specific intelligence information and specific investigative
records compiled by investigative, law enforcement, and penology
agencies, and state agencies vested with the responsibility to
discipline members of any profession, the nondisclosure of which is
essential to effective law enforcement or for the protection of any
person's right to privacy.
(e) Information revealing the identity of persons who are witnesses
to or victims of crime or who file complaints with investigative, law
enforcement, or penology agencies, other than the public disclosure
commission, if disclosure would endanger any person's life, physical
safety, or property. If at the time a complaint is filed the
complainant, victim or witness indicates a desire for disclosure or
nondisclosure, such desire shall govern. However, all complaints filed
with the public disclosure commission about any elected official or
candidate for public office must be made in writing and signed by the
complainant under oath.
(f) Test questions, scoring keys, and other examination data used
to administer a license, employment, or academic examination.
(g) Except as provided by chapter 8.26 RCW, the contents of real
estate appraisals, made for or by any agency relative to the
acquisition or sale of property, until the project or prospective sale
is abandoned or until such time as all of the property has been
acquired or the property to which the sale appraisal relates is sold,
but in no event shall disclosure be denied for more than three years
after the appraisal.
(h) Valuable formulae, designs, drawings, computer source code or
object code, and research data obtained by any agency within five years
of the request for disclosure when disclosure would produce private
gain and public loss.
(i) Preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations, and intra-agency
memorandums in which opinions are expressed or policies formulated or
recommended except that a specific record shall not be exempt when
publicly cited by an agency in connection with any agency action.
(j) Records which are relevant to a controversy to which an agency
is a party but which records would not be available to another party
under the rules of pretrial discovery for causes pending in the
superior courts.
(k) Records, maps, or other information identifying the location of
archaeological sites in order to avoid the looting or depredation of
such sites.
(l) Any library record, the primary purpose of which is to maintain
control of library materials, or to gain access to information, which
discloses or could be used to disclose the identity of a library user.
(m) Financial information supplied by or on behalf of a person,
firm, or corporation for the purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or
proposal for (i) a ferry system construction or repair contract as
required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750 or (ii) highway
construction or improvement as required by RCW 47.28.070.
(n) Railroad company contracts filed prior to July 28, 1991, with
the utilities and transportation commission under RCW 81.34.070, except
that the summaries of the contracts are open to public inspection and
copying as otherwise provided by this chapter.
(o) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
private persons pertaining to export services provided pursuant to
chapter 43.163 RCW and chapter 53.31 RCW, and by persons pertaining to
export projects pursuant to RCW 43.23.035.
(p) Financial disclosures filed by private vocational schools under
chapters 28B.85 and 28C.10 RCW.
(q) Records filed with the utilities and transportation commission
or attorney general under RCW 80.04.095 that a court has determined are
confidential under RCW 80.04.095.
(r) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
businesses or individuals during application for loans or program
services provided by chapters 43.163, 43.160, 43.330, and 43.168 RCW,
or during application for economic development loans or program
services provided by any local agency.
(s) Membership lists or lists of members or owners of interests of
units in timeshare projects, subdivisions, camping resorts,
condominiums, land developments, or common-interest communities
affiliated with such projects, regulated by the department of
licensing, in the files or possession of the department.
(t) All applications for public employment, including the names of
applicants, resumes, and other related materials submitted with respect
to an applicant.
(u) The residential addresses or residential telephone numbers of
employees or volunteers of a public agency which are held by any public
agency in personnel records, public employment related records, or
volunteer rosters, or are included in any mailing list of employees or
volunteers of any public agency.
(v) The residential addresses and residential telephone numbers of
the customers of a public utility contained in the records or lists
held by the public utility of which they are customers, except that
this information may be released to the division of child support or
the agency or firm providing child support enforcement for another
state under Title IV-D of the federal social security act, for the
establishment, enforcement, or modification of a support order.
(w)(i) The federal social security number of individuals governed
under chapter 18.130 RCW maintained in the files of the department of
health, except this exemption does not apply to requests made directly
to the department from federal, state, and local agencies of
government, and national and state licensing, credentialing,
investigatory, disciplinary, and examination organizations; (ii) the
current residential address and current residential telephone number of
a health care provider governed under chapter 18.130 RCW maintained in
the files of the department, if the provider requests that this
information be withheld from public inspection and copying, and
provides to the department an accurate alternate or business address
and business telephone number. On or after January 1, 1995, the
current residential address and residential telephone number of a
health care provider governed under RCW 18.130.040 maintained in the
files of the department shall automatically be withheld from public
inspection and copying unless the provider specifically requests the
information be released, and except as provided for under RCW
42.17.260(9).
(x) Information obtained by the board of pharmacy as provided in
RCW 69.45.090.
(y) Information obtained by the board of pharmacy or the department
of health and its representatives as provided in RCW 69.41.044,
69.41.280, and 18.64.420.
(z) Financial information, business plans, examination reports, and
any information produced or obtained in evaluating or examining a
business and industrial development corporation organized or seeking
certification under chapter 31.24 RCW.
(aa) Financial and commercial information supplied to the state
investment board by any person when the information relates to the
investment of public trust or retirement funds and when disclosure
would result in loss to such funds or in private loss to the providers
of this information.
(bb) Financial and valuable trade information under RCW 51.36.120.
(cc) Client records maintained by an agency that is a domestic
violence program as defined in RCW 70.123.020 or 70.123.075 or a rape
crisis center as defined in RCW 70.125.030.
(dd) Information that identifies a person who, while an agency
employee: (i) Seeks advice, under an informal process established by
the employing agency, in order to ascertain his or her rights in
connection with a possible unfair practice under chapter 49.60 RCW
against the person; and (ii) requests his or her identity or any
identifying information not be disclosed.
(ee) Investigative records compiled by an employing agency
conducting a current investigation of a possible unfair practice under
chapter 49.60 RCW or of a possible violation of other federal, state,
or local laws prohibiting discrimination in employment.
(ff) Business related information protected from public inspection
and copying under RCW 15.86.110.
(gg) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the clean Washington
center in applications for, or delivery of, program services under
chapter 70.95H RCW.
(hh) Information and documents created specifically for, and
collected and maintained by a quality improvement committee pursuant to
RCW 43.70.510 or 70.41.200, or by a peer review committee under RCW
4.24.250, regardless of which agency is in possession of the
information and documents.
(ii) Personal information in files maintained in a data base
created under RCW 43.07.360.
(jj) Financial and commercial information requested by the public
stadium authority from any person or organization that leases or uses
the stadium and exhibition center as defined in RCW 36.102.010.
(kk) Names of individuals residing in emergency or transitional
housing that are furnished to the department of revenue or a county
assessor in order to substantiate a claim for property tax exemption
under RCW 84.36.043.
(ll) The names, residential addresses, residential telephone
numbers, and other individually identifiable records held by an agency
in relation to a vanpool, carpool, or other ride-sharing program or
service. However, these records may be disclosed to other persons who
apply for ride-matching services and who need that information in order
to identify potential riders or drivers with whom to share rides.
(mm) The personally identifying information of current or former
participants or applicants in a paratransit or other transit service
operated for the benefit of persons with disabilities or elderly
persons.
(nn) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
and use transit passes and other fare payment media including, but not
limited to, stored value smart cards and magnetic strip cards, except
that an agency may disclose this information to a person, employer,
educational institution, or other entity that is responsible, in whole
or in part, for payment of the cost of acquiring or using a transit
pass or other fare payment media, or to the news media when reporting
on public transportation or public safety. This information may also
be disclosed at the agency's discretion to governmental agencies or
groups concerned with public transportation or public safety.
(oo) Proprietary financial and commercial information that the
submitting entity, with review by the department of health,
specifically identifies at the time it is submitted and that is
provided to or obtained by the department of health in connection with
an application for, or the supervision of, an antitrust exemption
sought by the submitting entity under RCW 43.72.310. If a request for
such information is received, the submitting entity must be notified of
the request. Within ten business days of receipt of the notice, the
submitting entity shall provide a written statement of the continuing
need for confidentiality, which shall be provided to the requester.
Upon receipt of such notice, the department of health shall continue to
treat information designated under this section as exempt from
disclosure. If the requester initiates an action to compel disclosure
under this chapter, the submitting entity must be joined as a party to
demonstrate the continuing need for confidentiality.
(pp) Records maintained by the board of industrial insurance
appeals that are related to appeals of crime victims' compensation
claims filed with the board under RCW 7.68.110.
(qq) Financial and commercial information supplied by or on behalf
of a person, firm, corporation, or entity under chapter 28B.95 RCW
relating to the purchase or sale of tuition units and contracts for the
purchase of multiple tuition units.
(rr) Any records of investigative reports prepared by any state,
county, municipal, or other law enforcement agency pertaining to sex
offenses contained in chapter 9A.44 RCW or sexually violent offenses as
defined in RCW 71.09.020, which have been transferred to the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs for permanent electronic
retention and retrieval pursuant to RCW 40.14.070(2)(b).
(ss) Credit card numbers, debit card numbers, electronic check
numbers, card expiration dates, or bank or other financial account
numbers supplied to an agency for the purpose of electronic transfer of
funds, except when disclosure is expressly required by law.
(tt) Financial information, including but not limited to account
numbers and values, and other identification numbers supplied by or on
behalf of a person, firm, corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or other entity related to an application for a liquor
license, gambling license, or lottery retail license.
(uu) Records maintained by the employment security department and
subject to chapter 50.13 RCW if provided to another individual or
organization for operational, research, or evaluation purposes.
(vv) Individually identifiable information received by the work
force training and education coordinating board for research or
evaluation purposes.
(ww) Those portions of records assembled, prepared, or maintained
to prevent, mitigate, or respond to criminal terrorist acts, which are
acts that significantly disrupt the conduct of government or of the
general civilian population of the state or the United States and that
manifest an extreme indifference to human life, the public disclosure
of which would have a substantial likelihood of threatening public
safety, consisting of:
(i) Specific and unique vulnerability assessments or specific and
unique response or deployment plans, including compiled underlying data
collected in preparation of or essential to the assessments, or to the
response or deployment plans; and
(ii) Records not subject to public disclosure under federal law
that are shared by federal or international agencies, and information
prepared from national security briefings provided to state or local
government officials related to domestic preparedness for acts of
terrorism.
(xx) Commercial fishing catch data from logbooks required to be
provided to the department of fish and wildlife under RCW 77.12.047,
when the data identifies specific catch location, timing, or
methodology and the release of which would result in unfair competitive
disadvantage to the commercial fisher providing the catch data.
However, this information may be released to government agencies
concerned with the management of fish and wildlife resources.
(yy) Sensitive wildlife data obtained by the department of fish and
wildlife. However, sensitive wildlife data may be released to
government agencies concerned with the management of fish and wildlife
resources. Sensitive wildlife data includes:
(i) The nesting sites or specific locations of endangered species
designated under RCW 77.12.020, or threatened or sensitive species
classified by rule of the department of fish and wildlife;
(ii) Radio frequencies used in, or locational data generated by,
telemetry studies; or
(iii) Other location data that could compromise the viability of a
specific fish or wildlife population, and where at least one of the
following criteria are met:
(A) The species has a known commercial or black market value;
(B) There is a history of malicious take of that species; or
(C) There is a known demand to visit, take, or disturb, and the
species behavior or ecology renders it especially vulnerable or the
species has an extremely limited distribution and concentration.
(zz) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
recreational licenses under RCW 77.32.010 or commercial licenses under
chapter 77.65 or 77.70 RCW, except name, address of contact used by the
department, and type of license, endorsement, or tag. However, the
department of fish and wildlife may disclose personally identifying
information to:
(i) Government agencies concerned with the management of fish and
wildlife resources;
(ii) The department of social and health services, child support
division, and to the department of licensing in order to implement RCW
77.32.014 and 46.20.291; and
(iii) Law enforcement agencies for the purpose of firearm
possession enforcement under RCW 9.41.040.
(aaa)(i) Discharge papers of a veteran of the armed forces of the
United States filed at the office of the county auditor before July 1,
2002, that have not been commingled with other recorded documents.
These records will be available only to the veteran, the veteran's next
of kin, a deceased veteran's properly appointed personal representative
or executor, a person holding that veteran's general power of attorney,
or to anyone else designated in writing by that veteran to receive the
records.
(ii) Discharge papers of a veteran of the armed forces of the
United States filed at the office of the county auditor before July 1,
2002, that have been commingled with other records, if the veteran has
recorded a "request for exemption from public disclosure of discharge
papers" with the county auditor. If such a request has been recorded,
these records may be released only to the veteran filing the papers,
the veteran's next of kin, a deceased veteran's properly appointed
personal representative or executor, a person holding the veteran's
general power of attorney, or anyone else designated in writing by the
veteran to receive the records.
(iii) Discharge papers of a veteran filed at the office of the
county auditor after June 30, 2002, are not public records, but will be
available only to the veteran, the veteran's next of kin, a deceased
veteran's properly appointed personal representative or executor, a
person holding the veteran's general power of attorney, or anyone else
designated in writing by the veteran to receive the records.
(iv) For the purposes of this subsection (1)(aaa), next of kin of
deceased veterans have the same rights to full access to the record.
Next of kin are the veteran's widow or widower who has not remarried,
son, daughter, father, mother, brother, and sister.
(bbb) Those portions of records containing specific and unique
vulnerability assessments or specific and unique emergency and escape
response plans at a city, county, or state adult or juvenile
correctional facility, the public disclosure of which would have a
substantial likelihood of threatening the security of a city, county,
or state adult or juvenile correctional facility or any individual's
safety.
(ccc) Information compiled by school districts or schools in the
development of their comprehensive safe school plans pursuant to RCW
28A.320.125, to the extent that they identify specific vulnerabilities
of school districts and each individual school.
(ddd) Information regarding the infrastructure and security of
computer and telecommunications networks, consisting of security
passwords, security access codes and programs, access codes for secure
software applications, security and service recovery plans, security
risk assessments, and security test results to the extent that they
identify specific system vulnerabilities.
(eee) Proprietary information deemed confidential for the purposes
of section 919 of this act.
(2) Except for information described in subsection (1)(c)(i) of
this section and confidential income data exempted from public
inspection pursuant to RCW 84.40.020, the exemptions of this section
are inapplicable to the extent that information, the disclosure of
which would violate personal privacy or vital governmental interests,
can be deleted from the specific records sought. No exemption may be
construed to permit the nondisclosure of statistical information not
descriptive of any readily identifiable person or persons.
(3) Inspection or copying of any specific records exempt under the
provisions of this section may be permitted if the superior court in
the county in which the record is maintained finds, after a hearing
with notice thereof to every person in interest and the agency, that
the exemption of such records is clearly unnecessary to protect any
individual's right of privacy or any vital governmental function.
(4) Agency responses refusing, in whole or in part, inspection of
any public record shall include a statement of the specific exemption
authorizing the withholding of the record (or part) and a brief
explanation of how the exemption applies to the record withheld.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 927 Sections 918 through 923 and 926 of this
act expire June 30, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 928 FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
Education Savings Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,000,000
Education Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $79,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $13,500,000 in fiscal year 2004 and $13,500,000 in fiscal year
2005 of the education savings account appropriation shall be deposited
in the common school construction account.
(2) $16,000,000 in fiscal year 2004 and $36,000,000 in fiscal year
2005 of the education construction account appropriation shall be
deposited in the common school construction account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 929 A new section is added to chapter 43.63A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The airport impact mitigation account is created in the custody
of the state treasury. Moneys deposited in the account, including
moneys received from the port of Seattle for purposes of this section,
may be used only for airport mitigation purposes as provided in this
section. Only the director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.
(2) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall establish a competitive process to prioritize applications for
airport impact mitigation assistance through the account created in
subsection (1) of this section. The department shall conduct a
solicitation of project applications in the airport impact area as
defined in subsection (4) of this section. Eligible applicants include
public entities such as cities, counties, schools, parks, fire
districts, and shall include organizations eligible to apply for grants
under RCW 43.63A.125. The department of community, trade, and economic
development shall evaluate and rank applications in conjunction with
the airport impact mitigation advisory board established in subsection
(3) of this section using objective criteria developed by the
department in conjunction with the airport impact mitigation advisory
board. At a minimum, the criteria must consider: The extent to which
the applicant is impacted by the airport; and the other resources
available to the applicant to mitigate the impact, including other
mitigation funds. The director of the department of community, trade,
and economic development shall award grants annually to the extent
funds are available in the account created in subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) The director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development shall establish the airport impact mitigation
advisory board comprised of persons in the airport impact area to
assist the director in developing criteria and ranking applications
under this section. The advisory board shall include representation of
local governments, the public in general, businesses, schools,
community services organizations, parks and recreational activities,
and others at the discretion of the director. The advisory board shall
be weighted toward those communities closest to the airport that are
more adversely impacted by airport activities.
(4) The airport impact area includes the incorporated areas of
Burien, Normandy Park, Des Moines, SeaTac, Tukwilla, Kent, and Federal
Way, and the unincorporated portion of west King county.
(5) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall report on its activities related to the account created in this
section by January 1, 2004, and each January 1st thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 930 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 931 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately, except for section 919 of this act which takes effect June
30, 2003.

(End of part)

INDEX PAGE #

CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 133
COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM . . . . . . . . . . . . 151
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 104
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 46
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 57
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 43
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 94
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 33
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 105
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 44
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 128
INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 76
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 107, 217
STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 85
STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER . . . . . . . . . . . . 32
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 66
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 110
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 110
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE . . . . . . . . . . . . 137
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 112
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 147
WASHINGTON STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 105
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 119
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 141
--- END ---