BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29.79 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person who attempts to obtain the signature of a voter on an
initiative or referendum petition that is governed by this chapter
shall disclose to the voter whether the person is being paid to obtain
signatures on the petition before the person requests that the voter
sign the petition.
(2) A person who obtains the signature of a voter on an initiative
or referendum petition that is governed by this chapter shall, before
the voter signs the petition:
(a) Accurately describe to the voter the effect that the initiative
or referendum will have upon the law of this state; and
(b) Provide to the voter:
(i) A comprehensive summary of the initiative or referendum, in
writing, that has been approved by the secretary of state pursuant to
this section;
(ii) Written instructions describing the procedure through which
the voter may request the removal of his or her name from the petition,
including, without limitation, the deadline for requesting the removal
of his or her name;
(iii) A form prescribed by the secretary of state that the voter
may use to request the removal of his or her name from the petition;
and
(iv) A written summary of the requirements of this subsection
(2)(b).
(3) A person who signs a petition for an initiative or referendum
that is governed by this chapter may remove his or her name from the
petition by transmitting his or her request in writing to the secretary
of state at any time before the petition is submitted to the secretary
of state.
(4) The secretary of state, upon consultation with the attorney
general, shall approve or disapprove a comprehensive summary of an
initiative or referendum not later than ten business days after the
comprehensive summary and a copy of the initiative or referendum is
submitted to the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall
approve the comprehensive summary if it completely and accurately
describes the effect that the initiative or referendum will have upon
the law of this state.

--- END ---