BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29.79 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any person soliciting or procuring signatures for an initiative
or referendum petition governed by this chapter must disclose whether
he or she is receiving compensation or other consideration for
soliciting or procuring such signatures by wearing a visible button or
sticker on the front of the body above the waist that accurately states
"Paid" or "Volunteer" in print large enough to occupy at least two
inches in width.
(2) Prior to soliciting or procuring the signature of a voter on an
initiative or referendum petition, the person soliciting or procuring
signatures must:
(a) Accurately describe to the voter the impact that the initiative
or referendum will have on the law of this state;
(b) Give the voter a copy of the seventy-five word summary of the
measure formulated by the attorney general pursuant to RCW 29.79.040;
and
(c) Ask the voter if he or she is registered to vote in Washington,
and if he or she has already signed a petition for the same initiative
or referendum. A voter is not required to display identification prior
to signing an initiative or referendum petition.

--- END ---