BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that buildings can
be designed, constructed, renovated, operated, and maintained in a
cost-effective, resource efficient, and environmentally responsible
manner. This is commonly known as "sustainable," "green," or "high
performance" building. The legislature further finds that sustainable
buildings generally integrate technologies, practices, and systems that
are:
(a) Environmentally sound. Sustainable buildings optimize energy,
water, and materials efficiency; improve indoor environmental quality
and comfort; use environmentally preferable products and processes; are
sited to ensure access to public transportation and affordable housing;
take advantage of proper building orientation; and preserve community
and historic integrity; and
(b) The result of superior design and construction methods.
Sustainable buildings apply life cycle costing to evaluate all relevant
design and construction costs.
(2) The legislature declares that the goals of the state of
Washington, consistent with executive order 02-03, are to site, design,
construct, renovate, operate, and maintain state buildings that are
models of energy, water, and materials efficiency, while providing
healthy, productive, and comfortable indoor environments and long-term
benefits to the state's residents. The legislature intends the
sustainable building goal to be implemented in a cost-effective manner,
while considering externalities, identifying economic and environmental
performance measures, determining cost savings, using life cycle
costing, and adopting an integrated systems approach.
To this end the legislature intends to authorize and direct that
public agencies adopt the United States green building council
leadership in energy and environmental design green building rating
system. The legislature further intends that this rating system guide
the siting, design, construction, operation, and maintenance of state-funded major facilities entering into the predesign process after July
1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Public agency" means every state office, officer, board,
commission, committee, bureau, department, public higher education
institution, and school district.
(2) "Department" means the department of general administration.
(3) "Major facility" means (a) a state-funded construction project
larger than five thousand gross square feet of occupied space, and (b)
a building renovation project when the cost is greater than fifty
percent of the assessed value and the project is larger than five
thousand gross square feet of occupied space.
"Major facility" does not include garages, maintenance facilities,
transmitter buildings, pumping stations, or other similar building
types as determined by the department.
(4) "State-funded" means, except for school districts, the public
agency received an appropriation for the facility or project in the
capital or transportation appropriations act. For school districts,
"state-funded" means a project that receives assistance from the state
school construction assistance grants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, if a public agency, or school district that receives one
hundred percent of its funding for a major facility from the state or
federal government, or both, determines that any major facility is to
be constructed or renovated, then during the design phase of the
construction or renovation the agency shall require the use of the
United States green building council leadership in energy and
environmental design "silver standard" according to the guidelines
developed in section 4 of this act.
(2) If a school district receives less than one hundred percent of
its funding for a major facility from the state, federal government, or
both, then during the design phase of the construction or renovation
the school district shall require the use of the lower United States
green building council leadership in energy and environmental design
"certified standard," or a comparable design standard with equivalent
thresholds as may be adopted by the department, according to the
guidelines developed in section 4 of this act.
(3) A new project over fifty thousand square feet and a building
renovation project when the cost is greater than fifty percent of the
assessed value and the project is greater than fifty thousand square
feet must be certified through the United States green building council
leadership in energy and environmental design certification process.
(4) If possible, any project that is required to be certified under
this section is encouraged to exceed the silver standard rating.
(5) The design of a state-funded construction project that is not
a major facility must include applicable green building principles when
practical in the design and construction phases.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The department, in consultation with
affected public agencies, shall develop and issue guidelines for
administering this chapter. The purpose of the guidelines is to define
a procedure and method for employing the United States green building
council leadership in energy and environmental design silver and
certified standards, or comparable design standards with equivalent
thresholds as may be adopted by the department.
(2) The department shall develop processes and systems to most
effectively deliver a United States green building council leadership
in energy and environmental design silver and certified standard, or
comparable design standard with equivalent thresholds as may be adopted
by the department, and verify compliance with the established standard.
(3) The department and affected agencies shall provide a biennial
report to the legislature on their efforts in implementing this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The department and affected agencies must
collaborate to identify and include in their biennial report to the
legislature any existing conflicts between sustainable building
requirements and other requirements of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 39 RCW.

--- END ---