BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act takes effect January 1, 2004, if
the proposed amendment to Article II, section 1 of the state
Constitution (HJR --) is validly submitted to and is approved and
ratified by the voters at a general election held in November 2003. If
the proposed amendment is not approved and ratified, this act is void
in its entirety.

Sec. 2 RCW 29.79.120 and 1982 c 116 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
When the person proposing ((any)) an initiative measure to be
submitted to the people has secured upon such initiative petition a
number of signatures of legal voters equal to or exceeding eight
percent of the votes cast for the office of governor at the last
regular gubernatorial election prior to the submission of the
signatures for verification, when the person proposing an initiative
measure to be submitted to the legislature has secured upon the
initiative petition a number of signatures of legal voters equal to or
exceeding six percent of the votes cast for the office of governor at
the last regular gubernatorial election before the submission of the
signatures for verification, or when the person ((or organization))
demanding ((any)) a referendum of an act of the legislature or ((any))
a part ((thereof)) of an act has secured upon ((any such)) the
referendum petition a number of signatures of legal voters equal to or
exceeding four percent of the votes cast for the office of governor at
the last regular gubernatorial election prior to the submission of the
signatures for verification, he or ((they)) she may submit the petition
to the secretary of state for filing.

--- END ---