BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.332.005 and 1995 c 350 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that:
(a) The expansion of international trade is vital to the overall
growth of Washington's economy;
(b) On a per capita basis, Washington state is the most
international trade dependent state in the nation;
(c) The North American free trade agreement (NAFTA) and the general
agreement on tariffs and trade (GATT) highlight the increased
importance of international trade opportunities to the United States
and the state of Washington;
(d) The passage of NAFTA and GATT will have a major impact on the
state's agriculture, aerospace, computer software, and textiles and
apparel sectors;
(e) There is a need to strengthen and coordinate the state's
activities in promoting and developing its agricultural, manufacturing,
and service industries overseas, especially for small and medium-sized
businesses, and minority and women-owned business enterprises; and
(f) The importance of having a coherent vision for advancing
Washington state's interest in the global economy has rarely been so
consequential as it is now.
(2) The legislature declares that the purpose of the office of the
Washington state trade representative is to:
(a) Strengthen and expand the state's activities in marketing its
goods and services overseas;
(b) Review and analyze proposed international trade agreements to
assess their impact on goods and services produced by Washington
businesses; and
(c) Inform the legislature about ongoing trade negotiations, trade
development, and the possible impacts on Washington's economy.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.332.010 and 1995 c 350 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The office of the Washington state trade representative is
created ((under)) in the office of the governor. The office shall
serve as the state's official liaison with foreign governments on trade
matters.
((The office of the Washington state trade representative may
accept or request grants or gifts from citizens and other private
sources to be used to defray the costs of appropriate hosting of
foreign dignitaries, including appropriate gift-giving and reciprocal
gift-giving, or other activities of the office. The office shall open
and maintain a bank account into which it shall deposit all money
received under this section. Such money and the interest accruing
thereon shall not constitute public funds, shall be kept segregated and
apart from funds of the state, and shall not be subject to
appropriation or allotment by the state or subject to chapter 43.88
RCW.)) (2) The office shall:
(a) Work with the department of community, trade, and economic
development, the department of agriculture, and other appropriate state
agencies, and within the agencies' existing resources, review and
analyze proposed and enacted international trade agreements and provide
an assessment of the impact of the proposed or enacted agreement on
Washington's businesses and firms;
(b) Provide input to the office of the United States trade
representative in the development of international trade, commodity,
and direct investment policies that reflect the concerns of the state
of Washington;
(c) Serve as liaison to the legislature on matters of trade policy
oversight including, but not limited to, updates to the legislature
regarding the status of trade negotiations, trade litigation, and the
impacts of trade policy on Washington state businesses;
(d) Work with the international trade division of the department of
community, trade, and economic development and the international
marketing program of the Washington state department of agriculture to
develop a statewide strategy designed to increase the export of
Washington goods and services, particularly goods and services from
small and medium-sized businesses; and
(e) Conduct other activities the governor deems necessary to
promote international trade and foreign investment within the state.
(3) The office shall prepare and submit an annual report on its
activities under subsection (2) of this section to the governor and
appropriate committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.332 RCW
to read as follows:
The office of the Washington state trade representative may accept
or request grants or gifts from citizens and other private sources to
be used to defray the costs of appropriate hosting of foreign
dignitaries, including appropriate gift-giving and reciprocal gift-giving, or other activities of the office. The office shall open and
maintain a bank account into which it shall deposit all money received
under this section. Such money and the interest accruing thereon shall
not constitute public funds, shall be kept segregated and apart from
funds of the state, and shall not be subject to appropriation or
allotment by the state or subject to chapter 43.88 RCW.

--- END ---