BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The degrading institution of slavery
continues throughout the world. Trafficking in people is a modern form
of slavery, and it is the largest manifestation of slavery today. At
least seven hundred thousand people annually, primarily women and
children, are trafficked within or across international borders.
Approximately fifty thousand women and children are trafficked into the
United States each year.
(2) Many people are trafficked into the international sex trade,
often by force, fraud, or coercion. The sex industry has rapidly
expanded over the past several decades. It involves sexual
exploitation of people, predominantly women and girls, involving
activities related to prostitution, pornography, sex tourism, and other
commercial sexual services. The low status of women in many parts of
the world has contributed to a burgeoning of the trafficking industry.
(3) Trafficking in people is not limited to the sex industry. This
growing transnational crime also includes forced labor and involves
significant violations of labor, public health, and human rights
standards worldwide.
(4) Traffickers primarily target women and girls, who are
disproportionately affected by poverty, the lack of access to
education, chronic unemployment, discrimination, and the lack of
economic opportunities in their countries of origin. Traffickers lure
women and girls into their networks through false promises of decent
working conditions at relatively good pay as nannies, maids, dancers,
factory workers, restaurant workers, sales clerks, or models.
Traffickers also buy children from poor families and sell them into
prostitution or into various types of forced or bonded labor.
(5) Trafficking victims are often forced through physical violence
to engage in sex acts or perform slavery-like labor. Such force
includes rape and other forms of sexual abuse, torture, starvation,
imprisonment, threats, psychological abuse, and coercion.
(6) To deter trafficking and bring its perpetrators to justice,
Washington must recognize that trafficking is a serious offense. This
is done by prescribing appropriate punishment, giving priority to the
prosecution of trafficking offenses, developing expertise on issues of
trafficking, and protecting rather than punishing the victims of such
offenses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW
to read as follows:
The attorney general must require assistant attorneys general,
especially those assistant attorneys general who have the department of
social and health services as a client agency, to study trafficking
issues so they can develop a better understanding and an expertise on
these issues. They must also study appropriate punishments, ways to
give priority to trafficking offenses, and ways to protect trafficking
victims.

--- END ---