BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.56 RCW
to read as follows:
The commission shall establish toll facilities on segments of the
state highway system that cross a major mountain pass, subject to the
following conditions:
(1) Tolls may be collected only on Stevens Pass (SR 2), Snoqualmie
Pass (SR 90), and White Pass (SR 12);
(2) The tolls must cover the full cost of establishing and
operating the toll-collection facilities;
(3) The tolls must recover the cost of maintaining and operating
the sections of state highways through the mountain passes identified
in subsection (1) of this section at a rate equal to or greater than
the rate at which fares on the Washington State Ferries recover the
costs of maintaining and operating the state ferry system;
(4) Tolls must be collected from traffic in both directions on the
authorized passes.

--- END ---