BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) It is essential for the health and safety of the young people
of Washington state that they receive medically and factually accurate
and objective information about sexuality, pregnancy, and sexually
transmitted diseases;
(2) Effective sexuality education discussing condoms and
contraception helps delay the onset of sexual activity, reduce the
frequency of sex, and reduce the number of sexual partners; and
(3) Medically accurate information in sex education has contributed
to a recent decline in Washington state's teen pregnancy rate and can
reduce human suffering and health care costs by minimizing sexually
transmitted diseases.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is
added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "medically accurate" means verified or
supported by research conducted in compliance with scientific methods
and published in peer-review journals, where appropriate, and
recognized as accurate and objective by professional organizations and
agencies with expertise in the relevant field, including the American
college of obstetricians and gynecologists, the department of health,
or the centers for disease control and prevention.
(2) In educational programs paid for in whole or in part with
public funds for use in public schools or elsewhere, information given
about sexual anatomy, sexual physiology, and reproductive health shall
be medically accurate. Medically accurate sex education shall present
information that abstinence from sexual intercourse is the most
effective means to prevent unwanted teenage pregnancy, sexually
transmitted diseases, and human immune deficiency virus when
transmitted sexually. Sex education including abstinence only
curriculum that provides students with information regarding failure
and success rates of condoms and other contraceptives in preventing
pregnancy, HIV/AIDS, and other sexually transmitted diseases shall
provide medically accurate information on such rates.
(3) School districts retain the discretion of selecting what
curriculum to use.
(4) All material and instruction in classes that teach sex
education and discuss sexual intercourse shall be age appropriate.

--- END ---