BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 44.52.010 and 1985 c 467 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Economic development and in particular international trade,
tourism, and investment have become increasingly important to
Washington, affecting the state's employment, revenues, and general
economic well-being. Additionally, economic trends are rapidly
changing and the international marketplace has become increasingly
competitive as states and countries seek to improve and safeguard their
own economic well-being. The purpose of the legislative committee on
economic development and international relations is to provide
responsive and consistent involvement by the legislature in economic
development to maintain a healthy state economy and to provide
employment opportunities to Washington residents.
(2) There is created a legislative committee on economic
development and international relations which shall consist of six
senators and six representatives from the legislature and the
lieutenant governor who shall serve as chairperson. The senate members
of the committee shall be appointed by the president of the senate and
the house members of the committee shall be appointed by the speaker of
the house. Not more than three members from each house shall be from
the same political party. A list of appointees shall be submitted
before the close of each regular legislative session during an odd-numbered year or any successive special session convened by the
governor or the legislature prior to the close of such regular session
or successive special session(s) for confirmation of senate members, by
the senate, and house members, by the house. Vacancies occurring shall
be filled by the appointing authority.

--- END ---