BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that prescription
drugs are an effective and important part of efforts to maintain and
improve the health of Washington state residents. Yet prescription
drug expenditures in both the public and private sectors are growing at
rates far in excess of consumer or medical inflation, placing a strain
on the ability of persons who do not have affordable access to adequate
prescription drug coverage to obtain prescription drugs. In addition,
inappropriate use of prescription drugs can have serious health
consequences for Washington state residents.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to develop a program to
promote access to affordable prescription drug coverage to low-income
persons who do not otherwise have adequate coverage to purchase
necessary and appropriate prescription drugs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There is established a program to be known as the medicaid
senior prescription drug program. Neither the benefits of, nor the
eligibility for, the program is considered to be an entitlement. To
the extent funds are appropriated specifically for this purpose, and
subject to any conditions placed on appropriations made for this
purpose, the department shall design and administer the medicaid senior
prescription drug program.
(2) The department is directed to obtain necessary federal waivers
to implement this program. Consistent with federal waiver conditions,
the department is authorized to charge enrollment fees, premiums, or
point-of-service cost-sharing to enrollees of the program.
(3) Eligibility for this program is limited to persons: (a) Who
are age sixty-five and older; (b) whose family income does not exceed
two hundred percent of the federal poverty level as adjusted for family
size and determined annually by the federal department of health and
human services; (c) who do not otherwise have insurance that provides
prescription drug coverage; and (d) who otherwise are eligible under
Title XIX and the state's federal prescription drug waiver program.
(4) The department is authorized to use a cost-effective
prescription drug benefit design. Consistent with federal waiver
conditions, this benefit design can be different than the benefit
design offered under the medical assistance program. The benefit
design may include a deductible benefit that provides coverage when
enrollees incur higher prescription drug costs as defined by the
department. The department also may offer more than one benefit
design.
(5) The department is authorized to limit enrollment of persons who
qualify for the program so as to prevent an overexpenditure of
appropriations for this program or to assure necessary compliance with
federal waiver budget neutrality requirements.
(6) Implementation of this section is subject to obtaining an
approved federal waiver that allows for the collection of premiums from
medicaid clients.
(7) This program will be terminated within twelve months after
implementation of a prescription drug benefit under Title XVIII of the
social security act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
The administrator shall, directly or by interagency agreement or
contract, establish and operate a statewide senior prescription drug
information clearinghouse. The clearinghouse shall:
(1) Promote access to necessary prescription drugs for persons over
age sixty-five who reside in Washington state;
(2) Make information available on a statewide basis regarding
private and public programs that provide financial assistance to
seniors for the purchase of prescription drugs;
(3) Provide educational information about methods to purchase
prescription drugs most cost-effectively and efficiently, including
information about generic drugs and the potential for dangerous drug
interactions; and
(4) Provide individual education and assistance regarding
prescription drug financial assistance programs.
Prior to July 1, 2005, the administrator shall provide for an
evaluation of the effectiveness and potential continuation of the
clearinghouse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The administrator shall employ prescription drug purchasing
methods including the establishment of a broad-based purchasing
consortium of state, local, and private entities to achieve quality
cost-effective prescription drug coverage for their respective
employees, members, or clients. The administrator shall explore joint
purchasing opportunities with other states to achieve quality cost-effective prescription drug coverage for those participating in the
consortium.
(2) Participation by local governments or private entities is
purely voluntary. The administrator may charge reasonable
administrative fees to those entities who choose to participate in the
purchasing consortium.
(3) Unaffiliated individuals who lack prescription drug coverage
following payment of a reasonable annual enrollment fee shall receive
reduced costs comparable to those negotiated by the consortium for its
preferred prescription drugs.
(4) The administrator shall establish an advisory committee
representing the members of the consortium and consumers at large to
advise the administrator and the consortium on the development and
implementation of a cost-effective purchasing plan. The advisory
committee shall file a report to the health care and fiscal committees
of the legislature on the progress to date of the consortium by
December 15, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
The consolidated prescription drug purchasing account is created in
the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts under section 4(2) of
this act from the fees from the preferred drug purchasing consortium
created in section 4 of this act must be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes of
section 4 of this act. Only the administrator or the administrator's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---