BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Average manufacturer price" has the meaning assigned by 42
U.S.C. Sec. 1396r-8(k), as amended; and
(b) "Pharmaceutical manufacturing company" means any entity that is
engaged in the production, preparation, propagation, compounding,
conversion, or processing of prescription drugs, either directly or
indirectly by extraction from substances of natural origin, or
independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of
extraction and chemical synthesis, or any entity engaged in the
packaging, repackaging, labeling, relabeling, or distribution of
prescription drugs. "Pharmaceutical manufacturing company" does not
include a wholesale drug distributor or pharmacist licensed under
chapter 18.64 RCW.
(2) A pharmaceutical manufacturing company, including a
pharmaceutical manufacturing company who manufactures a generic drug
that is sold in this state, shall file with the administrator, upon the
request of the administrator:
(a) The average manufacturer price for the requested prescription
drug or drugs; and
(b) The price that each wholesaler in this state pays the
manufacturer to purchase the requested prescription drug or drugs. The
information required under this subsection must be filed annually or
more frequently as determined by the administrator.
(3) At the administrator's request, a person who engages in the
wholesale distribution of prescription drugs in this state shall file
with the administrator information showing the actual price at which
the wholesale distributor sells a particular drug to a retail pharmacy.
(4) The department and the attorney general may investigate a
pharmaceutical manufacturing company or a person who engages in the
wholesale distribution of prescription drugs to determine the accuracy
of the information provided under subsection (2) or (3) of this
section. The attorney general may bring an action for injunctive
relief, costs, and attorneys' fees, and to impose on a pharmaceutical
manufacturing company that fails to file as required by this section,
or files inaccurate information, a civil penalty of not more than ten
thousand dollars per violation. Each unlawful failure to file, or
filing of inaccurate information, constitutes a separate violation.
(5) The administrator may not disclose information that identifies
a specific manufacturer or wholesaler or the prices charged by a
specific manufacturer or wholesaler for a specific pharmaceutical to
any entity other than a state purchased health care program or a
committee created to facilitate the development, acquisition, or
implementation of state purchased health care under this chapter. This
information must be protected from further disclosure as provided in
RCW 41.05.026.
(6) The administrator may adopt rules to implement this section.

--- END ---