BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 81.77 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to persons registered under chapter
18.27 RCW who haul construction, demolition, and land clearing debris
if (1) debris is hauled in containers of not less than ten cubic yards
in volume and (2) hauling of construction, demolition, or land clearing
debris occurs no more than twenty times per year for each customer.

--- END ---