BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.06.022 and 2002 c 354 s 207 are each amended to
read as follows:
For purposes of this chapter, "manager" means any employee who:
(1) ((Formulates statewide policy or)) Directs the work of an
agency or agency subdivision;
(2) Is responsible to administer one or more statewide policies or
programs of an agency or agency subdivision;
(3) ((Manages, administers, and controls a local branch office of
an agency or agency subdivision, including the physical, financial, or
personnel resources;
(4))) Has substantial responsibility in personnel administration,
legislative relations, public information, auditing, external community
liaison for a major statewide public safety program, or the preparation
and administration of budgets; or
(((5))) (4) Functionally is above the first level of supervision
and exercises authority that is not merely routine or clerical in
nature and requires the consistent use of independent judgment.
No employee who ((is a member of the Washington management
service)) meets this definition may be included in a collective
bargaining unit established under RCW 41.80.001 and 41.80.010 through
41.80.130. Any individual may request the director of the department
of personnel to review a position and determine if it meets this
definition. Appropriate requests shall be investigated by the director
or his or her designee.

--- END ---