BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the use of
performance reviews, as well as outcome and performance measures, is
necessary for demonstrating the accountability of state government to
the public. The legislature also finds that performance measurement is
integral to the efficient and effective management and operation of
state agencies and programs, essential to the achievement of effective
interagency cooperation and management, and integral to identifying
priorities of government for purposes of funding biennial budgets.
Thus, the legislature intends to expand its performance reviews to
provide greater accountability to the public and to ensure that state
government has effective measures for assessing and continuously
improving performance. It is the intent of the legislature that
outcome and performance measures used by state agencies and programs
become a tool for the governor and the legislature in establishing
priorities of government and developing biennial budgets.

Sec. 2 RCW 44.28.005 and 1996 c 288 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Legislative auditor" means the executive officer of the joint
legislative audit and review committee.
(2) "Economy and efficiency audits" means performance audits that
establish: (a) Whether a state agency or unit of local government
receiving state funds is acquiring, protecting, and using its resources
such as personnel, property, and space economically and efficiently;
(b) the causes of inefficiencies or uneconomical practices; and (c)
whether the state agency or local government has complied with
significant laws and rules in acquiring, protecting, and using its
resources.
(3) "Final compliance report" means a written document, as approved
by the joint committee, that states the specific actions a state agency
or unit of local government receiving state funds has taken to
implement recommendations contained in the final performance audit
report and the preliminary compliance report. Any recommendations,
including proposed legislation and changes in the agency's rules and
practices or the local government's practices, based on testimony
received, must be included in the final compliance report.
(4) "Final performance audit report" means a written document
adopted by the joint legislative audit and review committee that
contains the findings and proposed recommendations made in the
preliminary performance audit report, the final recommendations adopted
by the joint committee, any comments to the preliminary performance
audit report by the joint committee, and any comments to the
preliminary performance audit report by the state agency or local
government that was audited.
(5) "Joint committee" means the joint legislative audit and review
committee.
(6) "Local government" means a city, town, county, special purpose
district, political subdivision, municipal corporation, or quasi-municipal corporation, including a public corporation created by such
an entity.
(7) "Performance audit" means an objective and systematic
assessment of a state agency or any of its programs, functions, or
activities, or a unit of local government receiving state funds, by an
independent evaluator in order to help public officials improve
efficiency, effectiveness, and accountability. Performance audits
include economy and efficiency audits and program audits. A
performance audit of a local government may only be made to determine
whether the local government is using state funds for their intended
purpose in an efficient and effective manner.
(8) "Performance measures" are a composite of key indicators of a
program's or activity's inputs, outputs, outcomes, productivity,
timeliness, and/or quality. They are means of evaluating policies and
programs by measuring results against agreed upon program goals or
standards.
(9) "Performance review" means an outside evaluation of how a state
agency uses its performance measures to assess the outcomes of its
legislatively authorized activities.
(10) "Preliminary compliance report" means a written document that
states the specific actions a state agency or unit of local government
receiving state funds has taken to implement any recommendations
contained in the final performance audit report.
(((10))) (11) "Preliminary performance audit report" means a
written document prepared for review and comment by the joint
legislative audit and review committee after the completion of a
performance audit. The preliminary performance audit report must
contain the audit findings and any proposed recommendations to improve
the efficiency, effectiveness, or accountability of the state agency or
local government audited.
(((11))) (12) "Program audits" means performance audits that
determine: (a) The extent to which desired outcomes or results are
being achieved; (b) the causes for not achieving intended outcomes or
results; and (c) compliance with significant laws and rules applicable
to the program.
(((12))) (13) "State agency" or "agency" means a state agency,
department, office, officer, board, commission, bureau, division,
institution, or institution of higher education. "State agency"
includes all elective offices in the executive branch of state
government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 44.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The joint committee shall review the performance and outcome
measures of state agencies and departments that are under the authority
of the governor, or under the authority of a board or commission. The
purpose of these reviews is to ensure that the legislature has the
means to adequately and accurately assess the performance and outcomes
of those agencies and departments. Where two or more agencies have
shared responsibility for functions or priorities of government, these
reviews can also ensure that effective interagency cooperation and
collaboration occurs in areas such as program coordination,
administrative structures, information systems, and administration of
grants and loans.
(2) In conducting these reviews, the joint committee shall work in
cooperation with the office of financial management and state agency
personnel. The legislative auditor may contract with and consult with
public and private independent professional and technical experts as
necessary in conducting the reviews.
(3) The joint committee shall develop a schedule and common
methodology for conducting these reviews. The performance and outcome
measures of each agency or department shall be reviewed not less than
every five years. In setting the schedule and the extent of these
performance reviews, the joint committee shall consider the timing and
results of other recent reviews and audits conducted by the joint
committee, the seriousness of past findings, any inadequate remedial
action taken by an agency or department, whether an agency or
department lacks performance and outcome measures, and the desirability
to include a diverse range of agencies each year. The reviews shall
include, but not be limited to, the following:
(a) A determination of whether the performance and outcome measures
are consistent with legislative mandates, strategic plans, mission
statements, and goals and objectives, and whether the legislature has
established clear mandates, strategic plans, mission statements, and
goals and objectives that lend themselves to performance and outcome
measurement;
(b) An examination of how agency management uses the measures to
manage resources in an efficient and effective manner;
(c) An assessment of how performance benchmarks are established for
the purpose of assessing overall performance compared to external
standards and benchmarks;
(d) An examination of how an analysis of the measurement data is
used to make planning and operational improvements;
(e) A determination of how performance and outcome measures are
used in the budget planning, development, and allotment processes and
the extent to which the agency is in compliance with its
responsibilities under RCW 43.88.090;
(f) A review of how performance data are reported to and used by
the legislature both in policy development and resource allocation;
(g) An assessment of whether the performance measure data are
reliable and collected in a uniform and timely manner; and
(h) Recommendations as necessary or appropriate.
(4) Completed performance measure reviews shall be presented to the
joint committee and published in the same manner as prescribed for
performance audits in RCW 44.28.088. Final reports must also be
transmitted to the appropriate policy and fiscal standing committees of
the legislature.
(5) If, after reviewing an agency's or department's performance or
outcome measures, the joint committee decides by a majority vote that
a full performance audit of the agency or department or multiple
agencies or a specific program within an agency or department would be
appropriate, the joint committee shall add that audit to its biennial
performance audit work plan pursuant to RCW 44.28.080 and 44.28.083.
(6) When conducting a full performance audit of an agency or
department, or a specific program within an agency or department, or
multiple agencies, in accordance with subsection (5) of this section,
the joint committee shall also make recommendations regarding the
continuation, abolition, consolidation, or reorganization of each
affected agency, department, or program.

--- END ---