BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the
balance of powers restoration act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The declaration of rights contained in our
Washington state Constitution, Article I, section 32 states that, "A
frequent recurrence to fundamental principles is essential to the
security of individual right and the perpetuity of free government."
It is the intent of the legislature to reaffirm those fundamental
principles and to restore the balance of powers between and among the
branches of government as established by the people in the state
Constitution, to ensure that all political power is retained by the
people, to protect, maintain, and secure individual rights and the
perpetuity of free government, to guarantee the right of self-
government, and to establish a process for preserving the independence
of the legislative, executive, and judicial departments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The legislature finds the following:
(1) Alexander Hamilton declared in 1778 that if judges "should be
disposed to exercise will instead of judgment the consequence would
equally be the substitution of their pleasure for that of the
legislative body."
Thomas Jefferson declared in 1807, "The Constitution intended that
the three great branches of government should be coordinate, and
independent of each other. As to acts, therefore, which are to be done
by either, it has given no control to another branch....It did not
intend to give the judiciary that control."
Abraham Lincoln declared in 1861, "... the candid citizen must
confess that if the policy of the government upon vital questions,
affecting the whole people, is to be irrevocably fixed by decisions of
the Supreme Court, the instant they are made, in ordinary litigation
between parties, in personal actions, the people will have ceased to be
their own rulers, having to that extent practically resigned their
government into the hands of that eminent tribunal."
(2) The doctrine of judicial review that the courts have the sole
and final say in interpreting the Constitution on behalf of all three
branches of government has been subject to serious analysis and
criticism by scholars, jurists, and others for almost two hundred
years.
(3) The doctrine of judicial review that assumes that the judiciary
has a superior right to conclusively decide constitutionality has no
basis in the written Constitution and should not be binding on the
legislative or executive branches of government acting within their
express spheres of authority provided for in the Constitution.
(4) It is a fundamental principle that all political power is
inherent in the people and not in the institutions of government, that
the very purpose of a written constitution is to establish fundamental
and paramount law, that any act of the legislative, executive, or
judicial branches of government repugnant to the Constitution must be
void, and that nowhere is it stated in the Constitution that the
judiciary has the ultimate right to say what is constitutional and to
order the other branches of government to concur with its determination
as a matter of constitutional law.
(5) For the judiciary to ". . .decide what laws are constitutional
and what are not, not only for themselves in their own sphere of
action, but for the legislative and executive also in their spheres,
would make the judiciary a despotic branch. . ." (Thomas Jefferson,
1804) and lead to tyranny by government, the precise thing the people
of this state intended to prevent by establishing a constitutional
representative government in order to secure the rights of life,
liberty, and the pursuit of happiness for each individual citizen.
(6) Because the judiciary has used the doctrine of judicial review
to override the self-expression of a free people and to override duly
enacted laws, even those of long standing in both form and practice,
the legislature is compelled to reassert its constitutional
prerogatives and restore the balance of powers established in the
fundamental and paramount law.
(7) The respect, deference, and accommodation given to the opinions
of the judiciary by the legislative and executive branches are based on
the intellectual integrity of the court's reasoning in interpreting a
statute, considering and conforming to the plain meaning of the words
contained in it, the intent of the legislators who enacted the statute,
the historical context in which the legislation was passed, and a
reasonable application of the law to the facts before the court.
(8) Officials in the legislative, executive, and judicial branches
are sworn to ultimately uphold the Constitution, not the meaning given
it by another branch. If legislative, executive, or judicial officials
act unconstitutionally they are ultimately responsible to the
electorate and are held accountable exclusively and directly by the
people alone.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If the supreme court or a court of appeals
of the state of Washington determines that a legislative act, or any
part of an act, violates the Washington state Constitution, the
conflict between the two equal branches of government may be resolved
as follows:
(1) Upon determining that it considers a legislative act to be in
conflict with the Constitution, the court may declare its opinion that
it considers the act to be void and unenforceable.
(2) The opinion of the court that an act of the legislature is
unconstitutional is the law of the case before the court unless and
until overruled by a higher court but extends no further than the facts
and the parties of the case. Although the doctrine of stare decisis
does not oblige the judiciary to perpetuate its own errors, the
judicial branch is the proper branch to determine when and how to apply
a rule laid down in a particular case to parties in a subsequent case
involving identical or substantially similar facts.
(3) The house of representatives and the senate during a regular or
special session of the legislature may vote by a constitutional
majority to expressly affirm the constitutionality of the legislative
act and to expressly reject the determination of the court.
(4) A vote to affirm the constitutionality of the legislative act
must be taken forthwith upon the written demand of one-sixth of the
members of the house or senate, and the names of the members voting for
and against the affirmation must be entered on the journal of each
house.
(5) The question before each house must read exclusively, "The
legislature determines, declares, and affirms that . . . . . . (the act
designated by bill number and chapter number as indicated in the
session laws, whether codified or uncodified) as enacted is
constitutional, the opinion of the judiciary notwithstanding."
(6) The question must be placed so that a yea vote is to affirm the
constitutionality of the legislative act.
(7) Upon a positive vote by both the house and the senate to affirm
the constitutionality of the legislative act, the legislative
determination is effective immediately, and the legislative act under
consideration is considered by the legislature to be binding on all
persons affected by it from the original effective date of the act,
notwithstanding the opinion of the judiciary, although the decision of
the case remains binding on the parties to the case.
(8) A determination yea or nay by the legislature is hereby
declared subject to the right of referendum power as reserved to the
people under Article I, section 1 of the Washington state Constitution,
and the question before the people must read exclusively, "The people
determine, declare, and affirm that . . . . (the act designated by bill
number and chapter number as indicated in the session laws, whether
codified or uncodified) as enacted is constitutional, the opinion of
the judiciary notwithstanding."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, morals, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes
effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 44 RCW.

--- END ---