BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.210.280 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 721 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Public school districts and private schools that offer classes
for any of grades kindergarten through twelve ((may)) must provide for
clean, intermittent bladder catheterization of students, or assisted
self-catheterization of students pursuant to RCW 18.79.290((, if the
catheterization is provided for)). The catheterization must be
provided in substantial compliance with:
(a) Rules adopted by the state nursing care quality assurance
commission and the instructions of a registered nurse or advanced
registered nurse practitioner issued under such rules; and
(b) Written policies of the school district or private school which
shall be adopted in order to implement this section and shall be
developed in accordance with such requirements of chapters 41.56 and
41.59 RCW as may be applicable.
(2) ((This section does not require school districts to provide
intermittent bladder catheterization of students.)) School district
employees, except those licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, who have not
agreed in writing to perform clean, intermittent bladder
catheterizations as part of their job description, may file a written
letter of refusal to perform clean, intermittent bladder
catheterization of students. This written letter of refusal may not
serve as grounds for discharge, nonrenewal, or other action adversely
affecting the employee's contract status.
(3) Any public school district or private school that provides
clean, intermittent catheterization shall document the provision of
training given to employees who perform these services. These records
shall be made available for review at any audit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.210
RCW to read as follows:
Any employee of a public school district or private school that
performs health services, such as catheterization, must have a job
description that lists all of the health services that the employee may
be required to perform for students.

--- END ---