BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.410.200 and 2002 c 92 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The Washington professional educator standards board is
created, consisting of ((nineteen)) twenty members to be appointed by
the governor to four-year terms and the superintendent of public
instruction, who shall be an ex officio, nonvoting member.
(b) As the four-year terms of the first appointees expire or
vacancies to the board occur for the first time, the governor shall
appoint or reappoint the members of the board to one-year to four-year
staggered terms. Once the one-year to three-year terms expire, all
subsequent terms shall be for four years, with the terms expiring on
June 30th of the applicable year. The terms shall be staggered in such
a way that, where possible, the terms of members representing a
specific group do not expire simultaneously.
(c) No person may serve as a member of the board for more than two
consecutive full four-year terms.
(d) The governor shall annually appoint the chair of the board from
among the teachers and principals on the board. No board member may
serve as chair for more than two consecutive years.
(2) Seven of the members shall be public school teachers, one shall
be a private school teacher, three shall represent higher education
educator preparation programs, four shall be school administrators, two
shall be educational staff associates, one shall be a classified
employee who assists in public school student instruction, one shall be
a parent, and one shall be a member of the public.
(3) Public school teachers appointed to the board must:
(a) Have at least three years of teaching experience in a
Washington public school;
(b) Be currently certificated and actively employed in a teaching
position; and
(c) Include one teacher currently teaching at the elementary school
level, one at the middle school level, one at the high school level,
and one vocationally certificated.
(4) Private school teachers appointed to the board must:
(a) Have at least three years of teaching experience in a
Washington approved private school; and
(b) Be currently certificated and actively employed in a teaching
position in an approved private school.
(5) Appointees from higher education educator preparation programs
must include two representatives from institutions of higher education
as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 and one representative from an institution
of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.07.020(4).
(6) School administrators appointed to the board must:
(a) Have at least three years of administrative experience in a
Washington public school district;
(b) Be currently certificated and actively employed in a school
administrator position; and
(c) Include two public school principals, one Washington approved
private school principal, and one superintendent.
(7) Educational staff associates appointed to the board must:
(a) Have at least three years of educational staff associate
experience in a Washington public school district; and
(b) Be currently certificated and actively employed in an
educational staff associate position.
(8) Public school classified employees appointed to the board must:
(a) Have at least three years of experience in assisting in the
instruction of students in a Washington public school; and
(b) Be currently employed in a position that requires the employee
to assist in the instruction of students.
(9) Each major caucus of the house of representatives and the
senate shall submit a list of at least one public school teacher. In
making the public school teacher appointments, the governor shall
select one nominee from each list provided by each caucus. The
governor shall appoint the remaining members of the board from a list
of qualified nominees submitted to the governor by organizations
representative of the constituencies of the board, from applications
from other qualified individuals, or from both nominees and applicants.
(((9))) (10) All appointments to the board made by the governor
shall be subject to confirmation by the senate.
(((10))) (11) The governor shall appoint the members of the initial
board no later than June 1, 2000.
(((11))) (12) In appointing board members, the governor shall
consider the diversity of the population of the state.
(((12))) (13) Each member of the board shall be compensated in
accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses incurred in carrying out the duties of the board in accordance
with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(((13))) (14) The governor may remove a member of the board for
neglect of duty, misconduct, malfeasance or misfeasance in office, or
for incompetency or unprofessional conduct as defined in chapter 18.130
RCW. In such a case, the governor shall file with the secretary of
state a statement of the causes for and the order of removal from
office, and the secretary of state shall send a certified copy of the
statement of causes and order of removal to the last known post office
address of the member.
(((14))) (15) If a vacancy occurs on the board, the governor shall
appoint a replacement member from the nominees as specified in
subsection (((8))) (9) of this section to fill the remainder of the
unexpired term. When filling a vacancy of a member nominated by a
major caucus of the legislature, the governor shall select the new
member from a list of at least one name submitted by the same caucus
that provided the list from which the retiring member was appointed.
(((15))) (16) Members of the board shall hire an executive director
and an administrative assistant to reside in the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for administrative purposes only.

--- END ---