BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that some property
owners in Washington are concerned about the possibility of liability
arising when individuals are permitted to engage in potentially
dangerous outdoor recreational activities, such as rock climbing.
Although RCW 4.24.210 provides property owners with immunity from legal
claims for any unintentional injuries suffered by certain individuals
recreating on their land, the legislature finds that it is important to
the promotion of rock climbing opportunities to specifically include
rock climbing as one of the recreational activities that are included
in RCW 4.24.210. By including rock climbing in RCW 4.24.210, the
legislature intends merely to provide assurance to the owners of
property suitable for this type of recreation, and does not intend to
limit the application of RCW 4.24.210 to other types of recreation. By
providing that a landowner shall not be liable for any unintentional
injuries resulting from the condition or use of a fixed anchor used in
rock climbing, the legislature recognizes that such fixed anchors are
recreational equipment used by climbers for which a landowner has no
duty of care.

Sec. 2 RCW 4.24.210 and 1997 c 26 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) or (4) of this
section, any public or private landowners or others in lawful
possession and control of any lands whether designated resource, rural,
or urban, or water areas or channels and lands adjacent to such areas
or channels, who allow members of the public to use them for the
purposes of outdoor recreation, which term includes, but is not limited
to, the cutting, gathering, and removing of firewood by private persons
for their personal use without purchasing the firewood from the
landowner, hunting, fishing, camping, picnicking, swimming, hiking,
bicycling, skateboarding or other nonmotorized wheel-based activities,
hanggliding, paragliding, rock climbing, the riding of horses or other
animals, clam digging, pleasure driving of off-road vehicles,
snowmobiles, and other vehicles, boating, nature study, winter or water
sports, viewing or enjoying historical, archaeological, scenic, or
scientific sites, without charging a fee of any kind therefor, shall
not be liable for unintentional injuries to such users.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) or (4) of this
section, any public or private landowner or others in lawful possession
and control of any lands whether rural or urban, or water areas or
channels and lands adjacent to such areas or channels, who offer or
allow such land to be used for purposes of a fish or wildlife
cooperative project, or allow access to such land for cleanup of litter
or other solid waste, shall not be liable for unintentional injuries to
any volunteer group or to any other users.
(3) Any public or private landowner, or others in lawful possession
and control of the land, may charge an administrative fee of up to
twenty-five dollars for the cutting, gathering, and removing of
firewood from the land.
(4) Nothing in this section shall prevent the liability of ((such))
a landowner or others in lawful possession and control for injuries
sustained to users by reason of a known dangerous artificial latent
condition for which warning signs have not been conspicuously posted.
A fixed anchor used in rock climbing and put in place by someone other
than a landowner is not a known dangerous artificial latent condition
and a landowner under subsection (1) of this section shall not be
liable for unintentional injuries resulting from the condition or use
of such an anchor. Nothing in RCW 4.24.200 and 4.24.210 limits or
expands in any way the doctrine of attractive nuisance. Usage by
members of the public, volunteer groups, or other users is permissive
and does not support any claim of adverse possession.
(((4))) (5) For purposes of this section, a license or permit
issued for statewide use under authority of chapter ((43.51)) 79A.05
RCW((, Title 75,)) or Title 77 RCW is not a fee.

--- END ---