BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.16.010 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 61 are each
amended to read as follows:
For the purpose of this chapter, unless clearly indicated by the
context, words and phrases shall have the following meaning:
(1) "Beneficiary" shall mean any person or persons designated by a
fireman in a writing filed with the board, and who shall be entitled to
receive any benefits of a deceased fireman under this chapter.
(2) "Board" shall mean the municipal firemen's pension board.
(3) "Child or children" shall mean a child or children unmarried
and under eighteen years of age.
(4) "Contributions" shall mean and include all sums deducted from
the salary of firemen and paid into the fund as hereinafter provided.
(5) "Disability" shall mean and include injuries or sickness
sustained as a result of the performance of duty.
(6) "Fireman" or "fire fighter" shall mean any person regularly or
temporarily, or as a substitute, employed and paid as a member of a
fire department, who has passed a civil service examination for fireman
and who is actively employed as a fireman; and shall include any "prior
fireman".
(7) "Fire department" shall mean the regularly organized, full
time, paid, and employed force of firemen of the municipality.
(8) "Fund" shall mean the firemen's pension fund created herein.
(9) "Municipality" shall mean every city and town having a
regularly organized full time, paid, fire department employing firemen.
(10) "Performance of duty" shall mean the performance of work and
labor regularly required of firemen and shall include services of an
emergency nature rendered while off regular duty, but shall not include
time spent in traveling to work before answering roll call or traveling
from work after dismissal at roll call.
(11) "Prior fireman" shall mean a fireman who was actively employed
as a fireman of a fire department prior to the first day of January,
1947, and who continues such employment thereafter.
(12) "Retired fireman" shall mean and include a person employed as
a fireman and retired under the provisions of chapter 50, Laws of 1909,
as amended.
(13) "Widow or widower" means the surviving wife or husband of a
retired fireman who was retired on account of length of service and who
was lawfully married to such fireman; and whenever that term is used
with reference to the wife or former wife or husband or former husband
of a retired fireman who was retired because of disability, it shall
mean his or her lawfully married wife or husband on the date he or she
sustained the injury or contracted the illness that resulted in his or
her disability. Said term shall not mean or include a surviving wife
or husband who by process of law within one year prior to the retired
fireman's death, collected or attempted to collect from him or her
funds for the support of herself or himself or for his or her children.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.16.020 and 1988 c 164 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby created in each city and town a municipal firemen's
pension board to consist of the following five members, ex officio, the
mayor, or in a city of the first class, the mayor or ((his)) a
designated representative who shall be an elected official of the city,
who shall be chairman of the board, the city comptroller or clerk, the
chairman of finance of the city council, or if there is no chairman of
finance, the city treasurer, and in addition, two regularly employed or
retired ((firemen)) fire fighters elected by secret ballot of ((the))
those employed and retired ((firemen. Retired members who are subject
to the jurisdiction of the pension board have both the right to elect
and the right to be elected under this section)) fire fighters who are
subject to the jurisdiction of the board. The members to be elected by
the ((firemen)) fire fighters shall be elected annually for a two year
term. The two ((firemen)) fire fighters elected as members shall, in
turn, select a third eligible member who shall serve as an alternate in
the event of an absence of one of the regularly elected members. In
case a vacancy occurs in the membership of the ((firemen)) fire
fighters or retired members, the members shall in the same manner elect
a successor to serve ((his)) the unexpired term. The board may select
and appoint a secretary who may, but need not be a member of the board.
In case of absence or inability of the chairman to act, the board may
select a chairman pro tempore who shall during such absence or
inability perform the duties and exercise the powers of the chairman.
A majority of the members of ((said)) the board shall constitute a
quorum and have power to transact business.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.26.110 and 2000 c 234 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All claims for disability shall be acted upon and either
approved or disapproved by either type of disability board
((hereafter)) authorized to be created in this section.
(a) Each city having a population of twenty thousand or more shall
establish a disability board having jurisdiction over all members
employed by ((said)) those cities and composed of the following five
members: Two members of the city legislative body to be appointed by
the mayor((,)); one active or retired fire fighter employed by or
retired from the city to be elected by the fire fighters employed by or
retired from the city((,)) who are subject to the jurisdiction of the
board; one active or retired law enforcement officer employed by or
retired from the city to be elected by the law enforcement officers
employed by or retired from the city who are subject to the
jurisdiction of the board; and one member from the public at large who
resides within the city to be appointed by the other four members
((heretofore)) designated in this subsection. ((Retired members who
are subject to the jurisdiction of the board have both the right to
elect and the right to be elected under this section.)) Only those
active or retired fire fighters and law enforcement officers who are
subject to the jurisdiction of the board have the right to elect under
this section. All fire fighters and law enforcement officers employed
by or retired from the city are eligible for election. Each of the
elected members shall serve a two year term. The members appointed
pursuant to this subsection shall serve for two year terms: PROVIDED,
That cities of the first class only, shall retain existing firemen's
pension boards established pursuant to RCW 41.16.020 and existing
boards of trustees of the relief and pension fund of the police
department as established pursuant to RCW 41.20.010 which such boards
shall have authority to act upon and approve or disapprove claims for
disability by fire fighters or law enforcement officers as provided
under the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system act.
(b) Each county shall establish a disability board having
jurisdiction over all members residing in the county and not employed
by a city in which a disability board is established. The county
disability board so created shall be composed of five members to be
chosen as follows: One member of the legislative body of the county to
be appointed by the county legislative body((,)); one member of a city
or town legislative body located within the county which does not
contain a city disability board established pursuant to subsection
(1)(a) of this section to be chosen by a majority of the mayors of such
cities and towns within the county which does not contain a city
disability board((,)); one active fire fighter or retired fire fighter
employed by or retired from the county to be elected by the fire
fighters employed or retired in the county who are not employed by or
retired from a city in which a disability board is established((,)) and
who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board; one law enforcement
officer or retired law enforcement officer employed by or retired from
the county to be elected by the law enforcement officers employed in or
retired from the county who are not employed by or retired from a city
in which a disability board is established((,)) and who are subject to
the jurisdiction of the board; and one member from the public at large
who resides within the county but does not reside within a city in
which a city disability board is established, to be appointed by the
other four members ((heretofore)) designated in this subsection.
However, in counties with a population less than sixty thousand, the
member of the disability board appointed by a majority of the mayors of
the cities and towns within the county that do not contain a city
disability board must be a resident of one of the cities and towns but
need not be a member of a city or town legislative body. ((Retired
members who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board have both the
right to elect and the right to be elected under this section.)) Only
those active or retired fire fighters and law enforcement officers who
are subject to the jurisdiction of the board have the right to elect
under this section. All fire fighters and law enforcement officers
employed by or retired from the county are eligible for election. All
members appointed or elected pursuant to this subsection shall serve
for two year terms.
(2) The members of both the county and city disability boards shall
not receive compensation for their service upon the boards but ((said))
the members shall be reimbursed by their respective county or city for
all expenses incidental to such service as to the amount authorized by
law.
(3) The disability boards authorized for establishment by this
section shall perform all functions, exercise all powers, and make all
such determinations as specified in this chapter.

--- END ---