BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.04.450 and 2000 c 247 s 1103 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Employers of those members under chapters 41.26, ((41.40, and))
41.34, 41.35, and 41.40 RCW who are not specified in RCW 41.04.445 may
choose to implement the employer pick up of all member contributions
without exception under RCW 41.26.080(1)(a), 41.26.450, 41.40.330(1),
41.45.060, 41.45.061, and 41.45.067 and chapter 41.34 RCW. If the
employer does so choose, the employer and members shall be subject to
the conditions and limitations of RCW 41.04.445 (3), (4), and (5) and
RCW 41.04.455.
(2) An employer exercising the option under this section may later
choose to withdraw from and/or reestablish the employer pick up of
member contributions only once in a calendar year following forty-five
days prior notice to the director of the department of retirement
systems.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.26.195 and 1997 c 122 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any member of the teachers' retirement system plans 1, 2, or 3, the
public employees' retirement system plans 1 ((or)), 2, or 3, the school
employees' retirement system plans 2 or 3, or the Washington state
patrol retirement system plans 1 or 2 who has previously established
service credit in the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 1 may make an irrevocable election to have such
service transferred to their current retirement system and plan subject
to the following conditions:
(1) If the individual is employed by an employer in an eligible
position, as of July 1, 1997, the election to transfer service must be
filed in writing with the department no later than July 1, 1998. If
the individual is not employed by an employer in an eligible position,
as of July 1, 1997, the election to transfer service must be filed in
writing with the department no later than one year from the date they
are employed by an employer in an eligible position.
(2) An individual transferring service under this section forfeits
the rights to all benefits as a member of the law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1 and will be permanently
excluded from membership.
(3) Any individual choosing to transfer service under this section
will have transferred to their current retirement system and plan: (a)
All the individual's accumulated contributions; (b) an amount
sufficient to ensure that the employer contribution rate in the
individual's current system and plan will not increase due to the
transfer; and (c) all applicable months of service, as defined in RCW
41.26.030(14)(a).
(4) If an individual has withdrawn contributions from the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1, the
individual may restore the contributions, together with interest as
determined by the director, and recover the service represented by the
contributions for the sole purpose of transferring service under this
section. The contributions must be restored before the transfer can
occur and the restoration must be completed within the time limitations
specified in subsection (1) of this section.
(5) Any service transferred under this section does not apply to
the eligibility requirements for military service credit as defined in
RCW 41.40.170(3) or 43.43.260(3).
(6) If an individual does not meet the time limitations of
subsection (1) of this section, the individual may elect to restore any
withdrawn contributions and transfer service under this section by
paying the amount required under subsection (3)(b) of this section less
any employee contributions transferred.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.26.460 and 2002 c 158 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon retirement for service as prescribed in RCW 41.26.430 or
disability retirement under RCW 41.26.470, a member shall elect to have
the retirement allowance paid pursuant to the following options,
calculated so as to be actuarially equivalent to each other.
(a) Standard allowance. A member electing this option shall
receive a retirement allowance payable throughout such member's life.
However, if the retiree dies before the total of the retirement
allowance paid to such retiree equals the amount of such retiree's
accumulated contributions at the time of retirement, then the balance
shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust,
or organization as the retiree shall have nominated by written
designation duly executed and filed with the department; or if there be
no such designated person or persons still living at the time of the
retiree's death, then to the surviving spouse; or if there be neither
such designated person or persons still living at the time of death nor
a surviving spouse, then to the retiree's legal representative.
(b) The department shall adopt rules that allow a member to select
a retirement option that pays the member a reduced retirement allowance
and upon death, such portion of the member's reduced retirement
allowance as the department by rule designates shall be continued
throughout the life of and paid to a designated person. Such person
shall be nominated by the member by written designation duly executed
and filed with the department at the time of retirement. The options
adopted by the department shall include, but are not limited to, a
joint and one hundred percent survivor option and a joint and fifty
percent survivor option.
(2)(a) A member, if married, must provide the written consent of
his or her spouse to the option selected under this section, except as
provided in (b) of this subsection. If a member is married and both
the member and member's spouse do not give written consent to an option
under this section, the department will pay the member a joint and
fifty percent survivor benefit and record the member's spouse as the
beneficiary. Such benefit shall be calculated to be actuarially
equivalent to the benefit options available under subsection (1) of
this section unless spousal consent is not required as provided in (b)
of this subsection.
(b) If a copy of a dissolution order designating a survivor
beneficiary under RCW 41.50.790 has been filed with the department at
least thirty days prior to a member's retirement:
(i) The department shall honor the designation as if made by the
member under subsection (1) of this section; and
(ii) The spousal consent provisions of (a) of this subsection do
not apply.
(3)(a) Any member who retired before January 1, 1996, and who
elected to receive a reduced retirement allowance under subsection
(1)(b) or (2) of this section is entitled to receive a retirement
allowance adjusted in accordance with (b) of this subsection, if they
meet the following conditions:
(i) The retiree's designated beneficiary predeceases or has
predeceased the retiree; and
(ii) The retiree provides to the department proper proof of the
designated beneficiary's death.
(b) The retirement allowance payable to the retiree, as of July 1,
1998, or the date of the designated beneficiary's death, whichever
comes last, shall be increased by the percentage derived in (c) of this
subsection.
(c) The percentage increase shall be derived by the following:
(i) One hundred percent multiplied by the result of (c)(ii) of this
subsection converted to a percent;
(ii) Subtract one from the reciprocal of the appropriate joint and
survivor option factor;
(iii) The joint and survivor option factor shall be from the table
in effect as of July 1, 1998.
(d) The adjustment under (b) of this subsection shall accrue from
the beginning of the month following the date of the designated
beneficiary's death or from July 1, 1998, whichever comes last.
(4) No later than July 1, 2001, the department shall adopt rules
that allow a member additional actuarially equivalent survivor benefit
options, and shall include, but are not limited to:
(a)(i) A retired member who retired without designating a survivor
beneficiary shall have the opportunity to designate their spouse from
a postretirement marriage as a survivor during a one-year period
beginning one year after the date of the postretirement marriage
provided the retirement allowance payable to the retiree is not subject
to periodic payments pursuant to a property division obligation as
provided for in RCW 41.50.670.
(ii) A member who entered into a postretirement marriage prior to
the effective date of the rules adopted pursuant to this subsection and
satisfies the conditions of (a)(i) of this subsection shall have one
year to designate their spouse as a survivor beneficiary following the
adoption of the rules.
(b) A retired member who elected to receive a reduced retirement
allowance under this section and designated a nonspouse as survivor
beneficiary shall have the opportunity to remove the survivor
designation and have their future benefit adjusted.
(c) The department may make an additional charge, if necessary, to
ensure that the benefits provided under this subsection remain
actuarially equivalent.
(5) No later than July 1, 2003, the department shall adopt rules to
permit:
(a) A court-approved property settlement incident to a court decree
of dissolution made before retirement to provide that benefits payable
to a member who meets the length of service requirements of RCW
41.26.530(1) and the member's divorcing spouse be divided into two
separate benefits payable over the life of each spouse.
The member shall have available the benefit options of subsection
(1) of this section upon retirement, and if remarried at the time of
retirement remains subject to the spousal consent requirements of
subsection (2) of this section. Any reductions of the member's benefit
subsequent to the division into two separate benefits shall be made
solely to the separate benefit of the member.
The nonmember ex spouse shall be eligible to commence receiving
their separate benefit upon reaching the ages provided in RCW
41.26.430(1) and after filing a written application with the
department.
(b) A court-approved property settlement incident to a court decree
of dissolution made after retirement may only divide the benefit into
two separate benefits payable over the life of each spouse if the
nonmember ex spouse was selected as a survivor beneficiary at
retirement.
The retired member may later choose the survivor benefit options
available in subsection (4) of this section. Any actuarial reductions
subsequent to the division into two separate benefits shall be made
solely to the separate benefit of the member.
Both the retired member and the nonmember divorced spouse shall be
eligible to commence receiving their separate benefits upon filing a
copy of the dissolution order with the department in accordance with
RCW 41.50.670.
(c) The department may make an additional charge or adjustment if
necessary to ensure that the separate benefits provided under this
subsection are actuarially equivalent to the benefits payable prior to
the decree of dissolution.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.31A.020 and 2000 c 247 s 408 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) On January 1, 2004, and on January 1st of even-numbered years
thereafter, the member account of a person meeting the requirements of
this section shall be credited by the extraordinary investment gain
amount.
(2) The following persons shall be eligible for the benefit
provided in subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Any member of the teachers' retirement system plan 3, the
Washington school employees' retirement system plan 3, or the public
employees' retirement system plan 3 who earned service credit during
the twelve-month period from September 1st to August 31st immediately
preceding the distribution and had a balance of at least one thousand
dollars in their member account on August 31st of the year immediately
preceding the distribution; or
(b) Any person in receipt of a benefit pursuant to RCW 41.32.875,
41.35.680, or 41.40.820; or
(c) Any person who is a retiree pursuant to RCW 41.34.020(8) and
who:
(i) Completed ten service credit years; or
(ii) Completed five service credit years, including twelve service
months after attaining age fifty-four; or
(d) Any teacher who is a retiree pursuant to RCW 41.34.020(8) and
who has completed five service credit years by July 1, 1996, under plan
2 and who transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.32.817; or
(e) Any classified employee who is a retiree pursuant to RCW
41.34.020(8) and who has completed five service credit years by
September 1, 2000, and who transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.35.510;
or
(f) Any public employee who is a retiree pursuant to RCW
((41.40.010(29))) 41.34.020(8) and who has completed five service
credit years by March 1, 2002, and who transferred to plan 3 under RCW
41.40.795; or
(g) Any person who had a balance of at least one thousand dollars
in their member account on August 31st of the year immediately
preceding the distribution and who:
(i) Completed ten service credit years; or
(ii) Completed five service credit years, including twelve service
months after attaining age fifty-four; or
(h) Any teacher who had a balance of at least one thousand dollars
in their member account on August 31st of the year immediately
preceding the distribution and who has completed five service credit
years by July 1, 1996, under plan 2 and who transferred to plan 3 under
RCW 41.32.817; or
(i) Any classified employee who had a balance of at least one
thousand dollars in their member account on August 31st of the year
immediately preceding the distribution and who has completed five
service credit years by September 1, 2000, and who transferred to plan
3 under RCW 41.35.510; or
(j) Any public employee who had a balance of at least one thousand
dollars in their member account on August 31st of the year immediately
preceding the distribution and who has completed five service credit
years by March 1, 2002, and who transferred to plan 3 under RCW
41.40.795.
(3) The extraordinary investment gain amount shall be calculated as
follows:
(a) One-half of the sum of the value of the net assets held in
trust for pension benefits in the teachers' retirement system combined
plan 2 and 3 fund, the Washington school employees' retirement system
combined plan 2 and 3 fund, and the public employees' retirement system
combined plan 2 and 3 fund at the close of the previous state fiscal
year not including the amount attributable to member accounts;
(b) Multiplied by the amount which the compound average of
investment returns on those assets over the previous four state fiscal
years exceeds ten percent;
(c) Multiplied by the proportion of:
(i) The sum of the service credit on August 31st of the previous
year of all persons eligible for the benefit provided in subsection (1)
of this section; to
(ii) The sum of the service credit on August 31st of the previous
year of:
(A) All persons eligible for the benefit provided in subsection (1)
of this section;
(B) Any person who earned service credit in the teachers'
retirement system plan 2, the Washington school employees' retirement
system plan 2, or the public employees' retirement system plan 2 during
the twelve-month period from September 1st to August 31st immediately
preceding the distribution;
(C) Any person in receipt of a benefit pursuant to RCW 41.32.765,
41.35.420, or 41.40.630; and
(D) Any person with five or more years of service in the teachers'
retirement system plan 2, the Washington school employees' retirement
system plan 2, or the public employees' retirement system plan 2;
(d) Divided proportionally among persons eligible for the benefit
provided in subsection (1) of this section on the basis of their
service credit total on August 31st of the previous year.
(4) The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this
section in the future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual
right to receive this distribution not granted prior to that time.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.35.640 and 1998 c 341 s 205 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any member or beneficiary eligible to receive a retirement
allowance under the provisions of RCW 41.35.680, 41.35.690, or
41.35.710 is eligible to commence receiving a retirement allowance
after having filed written application with the department.
(1) Retirement allowances paid to members shall accrue from the
first day of the calendar month immediately following such member's
separation from employment.
(2) Retirement allowances payable to eligible members no longer in
service, but qualifying for such an allowance pursuant to RCW
((41.35.140)) 41.35.680 shall accrue from the first day of the calendar
month immediately following such qualification.
(3) Disability allowances paid to disabled members shall accrue
from the first day of the calendar month immediately following such
member's separation from employment for disability.
(4) Retirement allowances paid as death benefits shall accrue from
the first day of the calendar month immediately following the member's
death.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.40.660 and 2002 c 158 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon retirement for service as prescribed in RCW 41.40.630 or
retirement for disability under RCW 41.40.670, a member shall elect to
have the retirement allowance paid pursuant to one of the following
options, calculated so as to be actuarially equivalent to each other.
(a) Standard allowance. A member electing this option shall
receive a retirement allowance payable throughout such member's life.
However, if the retiree dies before the total of the retirement
allowance paid to such retiree equals the amount of such retiree's
accumulated contributions at the time of retirement, then the balance
shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust,
or organization as the retiree shall have nominated by written
designation duly executed and filed with the department; or if there be
no such designated person or persons still living at the time of the
retiree's death, then to the surviving spouse; or if there be neither
such designated person or persons still living at the time of death nor
a surviving spouse, then to the retiree's legal representative.
(b) The department shall adopt rules that allow a member to select
a retirement option that pays the member a reduced retirement allowance
and upon death, such portion of the member's reduced retirement
allowance as the department by rule designates shall be continued
throughout the life of and paid to a person nominated by the member by
written designation duly executed and filed with the department at the
time of retirement. The options adopted by the department shall
include, but are not limited to, a joint and one hundred percent
survivor option and a joint and fifty percent survivor option.
(2)(a) A member, if married, must provide the written consent of
his or her spouse to the option selected under this section, except as
provided in (b) of this subsection. If a member is married and both
the member and the member's spouse do not give written consent to an
option under this section, the department shall pay a joint and fifty
percent survivor benefit calculated to be actuarially equivalent to the
benefit options available under subsection (1) of this section unless
spousal consent is not required as provided in (b) of this subsection.
(b) If a copy of a dissolution order designating a survivor
beneficiary under RCW 41.50.790 has been filed with the department at
least thirty days prior to a member's retirement:
(i) The department shall honor the designation as if made by the
member under subsection (1) of this section; and
(ii) The spousal consent provisions of (a) of this subsection do
not apply.
(3)(a) Any member who retired before January 1, 1996, and who
elected to receive a reduced retirement allowance under subsection
(1)(b) or (2) of this section is entitled to receive a retirement
allowance adjusted in accordance with (b) of this subsection, if they
meet the following conditions:
(i) The retiree's designated beneficiary predeceases or has
predeceased the retiree; and
(ii) The retiree provides to the department proper proof of the
designated beneficiary's death.
(b) The retirement allowance payable to the retiree, as of July 1,
1998, or the date of the designated beneficiary's death, whichever
comes last, shall be increased by the percentage derived in (c) of this
subsection.
(c) The percentage increase shall be derived by the following:
(i) One hundred percent multiplied by the result of (c)(ii) of this
subsection converted to a percent;
(ii) Subtract one from the reciprocal of the appropriate joint and
survivor option factor;
(iii) The joint and survivor option factor shall be from the table
in effect as of July 1, 1998.
(d) The adjustment under (b) of this subsection shall accrue from
the beginning of the month following the date of the designated
beneficiary's death or from July 1, 1998, whichever comes last.
(4) No later than July 1, 2001, the department shall adopt rules
that allow a member additional actuarially equivalent survivor benefit
options, and shall include, but are not limited to:
(a)(i) A retired member who retired without designating a survivor
beneficiary shall have the opportunity to designate their spouse from
a postretirement marriage as a survivor during a one-year period
beginning one year after the date of the postretirement marriage
provided the retirement allowance payable to the retiree is not subject
to periodic payments pursuant to a property division obligation as
provided for in RCW 41.50.670.
(ii) A member who entered into a postretirement marriage prior to
the effective date of the rules adopted pursuant to this subsection and
satisfies the conditions of (a)(i) of this subsection shall have one
year to designate their spouse as a survivor beneficiary following the
adoption of the rules.
(b) A retired member who elected to receive a reduced retirement
allowance under this section and designated a nonspouse as survivor
beneficiary shall have the opportunity to remove the survivor
designation and have their future benefit adjusted.
(c) The department may make an additional charge, if necessary, to
ensure that the benefits provided under this subsection remain
actuarially equivalent.
(5) No later than July 1, 2003, the department shall adopt rules to
permit:
(a) A court-approved property settlement incident to a court decree
of dissolution made before retirement to provide that benefits payable
to a member who meets the length of service requirements of RCW
41.40.720 and the member's divorcing spouse be divided into two
separate benefits payable over the life of each spouse.
The member shall have available the benefit options of subsection
(1) of this section upon retirement, and if remarried at the time of
retirement remains subject to the spousal consent requirements of
subsection (2) of this section. Any reductions of the member's benefit
subsequent to the division into two separate benefits shall be made
solely to the separate benefit of the member.
The nonmember ex spouse shall be eligible to commence receiving
their separate benefit upon reaching the age provided in RCW
41.40.630(1) and after filing a written application with the
department.
(b) A court-approved property settlement incident to a court decree
of dissolution made after retirement may only divide the benefit into
two separate benefits payable over the life of each spouse if the
nonmember ex spouse was selected as a survivor beneficiary at
retirement.
The retired member may later choose the survivor benefit options
available in subsection (4) of this section. Any actuarial reductions
subsequent to the division into two separate benefits shall be made
solely to the separate benefit of the member.
Both the retired member and the nonmember divorced spouse shall be
eligible to commence receiving their separate benefits upon filing a
copy of the dissolution order with the department in accordance with
RCW 41.50.670.
(c) ((Any benefit distributed pursuant to chapter 41.31A RCW after
the date of the dissolution order creating separate benefits for a
member and nonmember ex spouse shall be paid solely to the member.
(d))) The department may make an additional charge or adjustment if
necessary to ensure that the separate benefits provided under this
subsection are actuarially equivalent to the benefits payable prior to
the decree of dissolution.

Sec. 7 RCW 41.40.748 and 2002 c 269 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Active members of the Washington state patrol retirement system
who have previously established service credit in the public employees'
retirement system plan 2 while employed in the state patrol as a
commercial vehicle enforcement officer, and who became a commissioned
officer after July 1, 2000, and prior to June 30, 2001, have the
following options:
(a) Remain a member of the public employees' retirement system; or
(b) Transfer service credit earned under the retirement system as
a commercial vehicle enforcement officer to the Washington state patrol
retirement system by making an irrevocable choice filed in writing with
the department of retirement systems within one year of the
department's announcement of the ability to make such a transfer.
(2)(a) Any commissioned officer choosing to transfer under this
section shall have transferred from the retirement system to the
Washington state patrol retirement system:
(i) All the employee's applicable accumulated contributions plus
interest, and an equal amount of employer contributions attributed to
such employee; and
(ii) All applicable months of service as a commercial vehicle
enforcement officer credited to the employee under this chapter as
though that service was rendered as a member of the Washington state
patrol retirement system.
(b) For the applicable period of service, the employee shall pay:
(i) The difference between the contributions the employee paid to
the retirement system, and the contributions which would have been paid
by the employee had the employee been a member of the Washington state
patrol retirement system, plus interest as determined by the director.
This payment shall be made no later than December 31, 2010, or the date
of retirement, whichever comes first;
(ii) The difference between the employer contributions paid to the
public employees' retirement system, and the employer contributions
which would have been payable to the Washington state patrol retirement
system; and
(iii) An amount sufficient to ensure that the funding status of the
Washington state patrol retirement system will not change due to this
transfer.
(c) If the payment required by this subsection is not paid in full
by the deadline, the transferred service credit shall not be used to
determine eligibility for benefits nor to calculate benefits under the
Washington state patrol retirement system. In such case, the
((additional employee and employer contributions)) employee's
accumulated contributions plus interest transferred under this
subsection, and any payments made under this subsection, shall be
refunded to the employee((, and)). The employer shall be entitled to
a credit for the ((payments made)) employer contributions transferred
under (((a) of)) this subsection.
(d) An individual who transfers service credit and contributions
under this subsection is permanently excluded from the public
employees' retirement system for all service as a commercial vehicle
enforcement officer.

Sec. 8 RCW 41.40.801 and 2000 c 247 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any member or beneficiary eligible to receive a retirement
allowance under the provisions of RCW 41.40.820, 41.40.825, or
41.40.835 is eligible to commence receiving a retirement allowance
after having filed written application with the department.
(1) Retirement allowances paid to members shall accrue from the
first day of the calendar month immediately following such member's
separation from employment.
(2) Retirement allowances payable to eligible members no longer in
service, but qualifying for such an allowance pursuant to RCW
((41.40.068)) 41.40.820 shall accrue from the first day of the calendar
month immediately following such qualification.
(3) Disability allowances paid to disabled members shall accrue
from the first day of the calendar month immediately following such
member's separation from employment for disability.
(4) Retirement allowances paid as death benefits shall accrue from
the first day of the calendar month immediately following the member's
death.

Sec. 9 RCW 41.40.845 and 2002 c 158 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon retirement for service as prescribed in RCW 41.40.820 or
retirement for disability under RCW 41.40.825, a member shall elect to
have the retirement allowance paid pursuant to one of the following
options, calculated so as to be actuarially equivalent to each other.
(a) Standard allowance. A member electing this option shall
receive a retirement allowance payable throughout such member's life.
Upon the death of the member, the member's benefits shall cease.
(b) The department shall adopt rules that allow a member to select
a retirement option that pays the member a reduced retirement allowance
and upon death, such portion of the member's reduced retirement
allowance as the department by rule designates shall be continued
throughout the life of and paid to a person nominated by the member by
written designation duly executed and filed with the department at the
time of retirement. The options adopted by the department shall
include, but are not limited to, a joint and one hundred percent
survivor option and a joint and fifty percent survivor option.
(2)(a) A member, if married, must provide the written consent of
his or her spouse to the option selected under this section, except as
provided in (b) of this subsection. If a member is married and both
the member and the member's spouse do not give written consent to an
option under this section, the department shall pay a joint and fifty
percent survivor benefit calculated to be actuarially equivalent to the
benefit options available under subsection (1) of this section unless
spousal consent is not required as provided in (b) of this subsection.
(b) If a copy of a dissolution order designating a survivor
beneficiary under RCW 41.50.790 has been filed with the department at
least thirty days prior to a member's retirement:
(i) The department shall honor the designation as if made by the
member under subsection (1) of this section; and
(ii) The spousal consent provisions of (a) of this subsection do
not apply.
(3) ((The department shall adopt rules that allow a member
additional actuarially equivalent survivor benefit options, and shall
include, but are not limited to:
(a)(i) A retired member who retired without designating a survivor
beneficiary shall have the opportunity to designate their spouse from
a postretirement marriage as a survivor during a one-year period
beginning one year after the date of the postretirement marriage
provided the retirement allowance payable to the retiree is not subject
to periodic payments pursuant to a property division obligation as
provided for in RCW 41.50.670.
(ii) A member who entered into a postretirement marriage prior to
the effective date of the rules adopted under this section and
satisfies the conditions of (a)(i) of this subsection shall have one
year to designate their spouse as a survivor beneficiary following the
adoption of the rules.
(b) A retired member who elected to receive a reduced retirement
allowance under this section and designated a nonspouse as survivor
beneficiary shall have the opportunity to remove the survivor
designation and have their future benefit adjusted.
(c) The department may make an additional charge, if necessary, to
ensure that the benefits provided under this subsection remain
actuarially equivalent.
(4))) No later than July 1, 2002, the department shall adopt rules
that allow a member additional actuarially equivalent survivor benefit
options, and shall include, but are not limited to:
(a)(i) A retired member who retired without designating a survivor
beneficiary shall have the opportunity to designate their spouse from
a postretirement marriage as a survivor during a one-year period
beginning one year after the date of the postretirement marriage
provided the retirement allowance payable to the retiree is not subject
to periodic payments pursuant to a property division obligation as
provided for in RCW 41.50.670.
(ii) A member who entered into a postretirement marriage prior to
the effective date of the rules adopted under this section and
satisfies the conditions of (a)(i) of this subsection shall have one
year to designate their spouse as a survivor beneficiary following the
adoption of the rules.
(b) A retired member who elected to receive a reduced retirement
allowance under this section and designated a nonspouse as survivor
beneficiary shall have the opportunity to remove the survivor
designation and have their future benefit adjusted.
(c) The department may make an additional charge, if necessary, to
ensure that the benefits provided under this subsection remain
actuarially equivalent.
(((5))) (4) No later than July 1, 2003, the department shall adopt
rules to permit:
(a) A court-approved property settlement incident to a court decree
of dissolution made before retirement to provide that benefits payable
to a member who meets the length of service requirements of RCW
41.40.820(1) and the member's divorcing spouse be divided into two
separate benefits payable over the life of each spouse.
The member shall have available the benefit options of subsection
(1) of this section upon retirement, and if remarried at the time of
retirement remains subject to the spousal consent requirements of
subsection (2) of this section. Any reductions of the member's benefit
subsequent to the division into two separate benefits shall be made
solely to the separate benefit of the member.
The nonmember ex spouse shall be eligible to commence receiving
their separate benefit upon reaching the age provided in RCW
41.40.820(1) and after filing a written application with the
department.
(b) A court-approved property settlement incident to a court decree
of dissolution made after retirement may only divide the benefit into
two separate benefits payable over the life of each spouse if the
nonmember ex spouse was selected as a survivor beneficiary at
retirement.
The retired member may later choose the survivor benefit options
available in subsection (((4))) (3) of this section. Any actuarial
reductions subsequent to the division into two separate benefits shall
be made solely to the separate benefit of the member.
Both the retired member and the nonmember divorced spouse shall be
eligible to commence receiving their separate benefits upon filing a
copy of the dissolution order with the department in accordance with
RCW 41.50.670.
(c) Any benefit distributed under chapter 41.31A RCW after the date
of the dissolution order creating separate benefits for a member and
nonmember ex spouse shall be paid solely to the member.
(d) The department may make an additional charge or adjustment if
necessary to ensure that the separate benefits provided under this
subsection are actuarially equivalent to the benefits payable prior to
the decree of dissolution.

Sec. 10 RCW 41.45.060 and 2002 c 26 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state actuary shall provide actuarial valuation results
based on the economic assumptions and asset value smoothing technique
included in RCW 41.45.035 or adopted by the council under RCW 41.45.030
or 41.45.035.
(2) Not later than September 30, 2002, and every two years
thereafter, consistent with the economic assumptions and asset value
smoothing technique included in RCW 41.45.035 or adopted under RCW
41.45.030 or 41.45.035, the council shall adopt and may make changes
to:
(a) A basic state contribution rate for the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system;
(b) Basic employer contribution rates for the public employees'
retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, and the Washington
state patrol retirement system to be used in the ensuing biennial
period; and
(c) A basic employer contribution rate for the school employees'
retirement system for funding both that system and the public
employees' retirement system plan 1.
The contribution rates adopted by the council shall be subject to
revision by the legislature.
(3) The employer and state contribution rates adopted by the
council shall be the level percentages of pay that are needed:
(a) To fully amortize the total costs of the public employees'
retirement system plan 1, the teachers' retirement system plan 1, and
the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan
1 not later than June 30, 2024((, except as provided in subsection (5)
of this section));
(b) To also continue to fully fund the public employees' retirement
system plans 2 and 3, the teachers' retirement system plans 2 and 3,
the school employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3, and the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 in
accordance with RCW 41.45.061, 41.45.067, and this section; and
(c) For the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system
plan 2 the rate charged to employers, except as provided in RCW
41.26.450, shall be thirty percent of the cost of the retirement system
and the rate charged to the state shall be twenty percent of the cost
of the retirement system.
(4) The aggregate actuarial cost method shall be used to calculate
a combined plan 2 and 3 employer contribution rate and a Washington
state patrol retirement system contribution rate.
(5) The council shall immediately notify the directors of the
office of financial management and department of retirement systems of
the state and employer contribution rates adopted. The rates shall be
effective for the ensuing biennial period, subject to any legislative
modifications.
(6) The director of the department of retirement systems shall
collect the rates established in RCW 41.45.053 through June 30, 2003.
Thereafter, the director shall collect those rates adopted by the
council. The rates established in RCW 41.45.053, or by the council,
shall be subject to revision by the council.

Sec. 11 RCW 41.50.110 and 1998 c 341 s 508 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided by RCW 41.50.255 and subsection (6) of this
section, all expenses of the administration of the department ((and)),
the expenses of administration of the retirement systems, and the
expenses of the administration of the office of the state actuary
created in chapters 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.32, 41.40, 41.34, 41.35,
((and)) 43.43, and 44.44 RCW shall be paid from the department of
retirement systems expense fund.
(2) In order to reimburse the department of retirement systems
expense fund on an equitable basis the department shall ascertain and
report to each employer, as defined in RCW 41.26.030, 41.32.010,
41.35.010, or 41.40.010, the sum necessary to defray its proportional
share of the entire expense of the administration of the retirement
system that the employer participates in during the ensuing biennium or
fiscal year whichever may be required. Such sum is to be computed in
an amount directly proportional to the estimated entire expense of the
administration as the ratio of monthly salaries of the employer's
members bears to the total salaries of all members in the entire
system. It shall then be the duty of all such employers to include in
their budgets or otherwise provide the amounts so required.
(3) The department shall compute and bill each employer, as defined
in RCW 41.26.030, 41.32.010, 41.35.010, or 41.40.010, at the end of
each month for the amount due for that month to the department of
retirement systems expense fund and the same shall be paid as are its
other obligations. Such computation as to each employer shall be made
on a percentage rate of salary established by the department. However,
the department may at its discretion establish a system of billing
based upon calendar year quarters in which event the said billing shall
be at the end of each such quarter.
(4) The director may adjust the expense fund contribution rate for
each system at any time when necessary to reflect unanticipated costs
or savings in administering the department.
(5) An employer who fails to submit timely and accurate reports to
the department may be assessed an additional fee related to the
increased costs incurred by the department in processing the deficient
reports. Fees paid under this subsection shall be deposited in the
retirement system expense fund.
(a) Every six months the department shall determine the amount of
an employer's fee by reviewing the timeliness and accuracy of the
reports submitted by the employer in the preceding six months. If
those reports were not both timely and accurate the department may
prospectively assess an additional fee under this subsection.
(b) An additional fee assessed by the department under this
subsection shall not exceed fifty percent of the standard fee.
(c) The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.
(6) Expenses other than those under RCW 41.34.060(((2))) (3) shall
be paid pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 12 RCW 41.50.700 and 2002 c 158 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except under subsection (3) of this section and RCW
41.26.460(5), 41.32.530(5), 41.32.785(5), 41.32.851(4), 41.35.220(4),
41.40.188(5), 41.40.660(5), 41.40.845(4), 43.43.271(4), and 41.34.080,
the department's obligation to provide direct payment of a property
division obligation to an obligee under RCW 41.50.670 shall cease upon
the death of the obligee or upon the death of the obligor, whichever
comes first. However, if an obligor dies and is eligible for a lump
sum death benefit, the department shall be obligated to provide direct
payment to the obligee of all or a portion of the withdrawal of
accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order that complies with
RCW 41.50.670.
(2) The direct payment of a property division obligation to an
obligee under RCW 41.50.670 shall be paid as a deduction from the
member's periodic retirement payment. An obligee may not direct the
department to withhold any funds from such payment.
(3) The department's obligation to provide direct payment to a
nonmember ex spouse from a preretirement divorce meeting the criteria
of RCW 41.26.162(2) or 43.43.270(2) may continue for the life of the
member's surviving spouse qualifying for benefits under RCW 41.26.160,
41.26.161, or 43.43.270(2). Upon the death of the member's surviving
spouse qualifying for benefits under RCW 41.26.160, 41.26.161, or
43.43.270(2), the department's obligation under this subsection shall
cease. The department's obligation to provide direct payment to a
nonmember ex spouse qualifying for a continued split benefit payment
under RCW 41.26.162(3) shall continue for the life of that nonmember ex
spouse.

Sec. 13 RCW 41.54.030 and 1998 c 341 s 703 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A dual member may combine service in all systems for the
purpose of:
(a) Determining the member's eligibility to receive a service
retirement allowance; and
(b) Qualifying for a benefit under RCW 41.32.840(2) ((or)),
41.35.620, or 41.40.790.
(2) A dual member who is eligible to retire under any system may
elect to retire from all the member's systems and to receive service
retirement allowances calculated as provided in this section. Each
system shall calculate the allowance using its own criteria except that
the member shall be allowed to substitute the member's base salary from
any system as the compensation used in calculating the allowance.
(3) The service retirement allowances from a system which, but for
this section, would not be allowed to be paid at this date based on the
dual member's age may be received immediately or deferred to a later
date. The allowances shall be actuarially adjusted from the earliest
age upon which the combined service would have made such dual member
eligible in that system.
(4) The service retirement eligibility requirements of RCW
41.40.180 shall apply to any dual member whose prior system is plan 1
of the public employees' retirement system established under chapter
41.40 RCW.

Sec. 14 RCW 43.43.271 and 2002 c 158 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A member commissioned on or after January 1, 2003, upon
retirement for service as prescribed in RCW 43.43.250 ((or disability
retirement under RCW 43.43.040,)) shall elect to have the retirement
allowance paid pursuant to the following options, calculated so as to
be actuarially equivalent to each other.
(a) Standard allowance. A member electing this option shall
receive a retirement allowance payable throughout the member's life.
However, if the retiree dies before the total of the retirement
allowance paid to the retiree equals the amount of the retiree's
accumulated contributions at the time of retirement, then the balance
shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust,
or organization as the retiree shall have nominated by written
designation duly executed and filed with the department; or if there be
no such designated person or persons still living at the time of the
retiree's death, then to the surviving spouse; or if there be neither
such designated person or persons still living at the time of death nor
a surviving spouse, then to the retiree's legal representative.
(b) The department shall adopt rules that allow a member to select
a retirement option that pays the member a reduced retirement allowance
and upon death, such portion of the member's reduced retirement
allowance as the department by rule designates shall be continued
throughout the life of and paid to a designated person. Such person
shall be nominated by the member by written designation duly executed
and filed with the department at the time of retirement. The options
adopted by the department shall include, but are not limited to, a
joint and one hundred percent survivor option and a joint and fifty
percent survivor option.
(2)(a) A member, if married, must provide the written consent of
his or her spouse to the option selected under this section, except as
provided in (b) of this subsection. If a member is married and both
the member and member's spouse do not give written consent to an option
under this section, the department will pay the member a joint and
fifty percent survivor benefit and record the member's spouse as the
beneficiary. This benefit shall be calculated to be actuarially
equivalent to the benefit options available under subsection (1) of
this section unless spousal consent is not required as provided in (b)
of this subsection.
(b) If a copy of a dissolution order designating a survivor
beneficiary under RCW 41.50.790 has been filed with the department at
least thirty days prior to a member's retirement:
(i) The department shall honor the designation as if made by the
member under subsection (1) of this section; and
(ii) The spousal consent provisions of (a) of this subsection do
not apply.
(3) No later than January 1, 2003, the department shall adopt rules
that allow a member additional actuarially equivalent survivor benefit
options, and shall include, but are not limited to:
(a)(i) A retired member who retired without designating a survivor
beneficiary shall have the opportunity to designate their spouse from
a postretirement marriage as a survivor during a one-year period
beginning one year after the date of the postretirement marriage
provided the retirement allowance payable to the retiree is not subject
to periodic payments pursuant to a property division obligation as
provided for in RCW 41.50.670.
(ii) A member who entered into a postretirement marriage prior to
the effective date of the rules adopted pursuant to this subsection and
satisfies the conditions of (a)(i) of this subsection shall have one
year to designate their spouse as a survivor beneficiary following the
adoption of the rules.
(b) A retired member who elected to receive a reduced retirement
allowance under this section and designated a nonspouse as survivor
beneficiary shall have the opportunity to remove the survivor
designation and have their future benefit adjusted.
(c) The department may make an additional charge, if necessary, to
ensure that the benefits provided under this subsection remain
actuarially equivalent.
(4) No later than July 1, 2003, the department shall adopt rules to
permit:
(a) A court-approved property settlement incident to a court decree
of dissolution made before retirement to provide that benefits payable
to a member who has completed at least five years of service and the
member's divorcing spouse be divided into two separate benefits payable
over the life of each spouse.
The member shall have available the benefit options of subsection
(1) of this section upon retirement, and if remarried at the time of
retirement remains subject to the spousal consent requirements of
subsection (2) of this section. Any reductions of the member's benefit
subsequent to the division into two separate benefits shall be made
solely to the separate benefit of the member.
The nonmember ex spouse shall be eligible to commence receiving
their separate benefit upon reaching the ages provided in RCW
43.43.250(2) and after filing a written application with the
department.
(b) A court-approved property settlement incident to a court decree
of dissolution made after retirement may only divide the benefit into
two separate benefits payable over the life of each spouse if the
nonmember ex spouse was selected as a survivor beneficiary at
retirement.
The retired member may later choose the survivor benefit options
available in subsection (3) of this section. Any actuarial reductions
subsequent to the division into two separate benefits shall be made
solely to the separate benefit of the member.
Both the retired member and the nonmember divorced spouse shall be
eligible to commence receiving their separate benefits upon filing a
copy of the dissolution order with the department in accordance with
RCW 41.50.670.
(c) The department may make an additional charge or adjustment if
necessary to ensure that the separate benefits provided under this
subsection are actuarially equivalent to the benefits payable prior to
the decree of dissolution.

Sec. 15 RCW 43.43.295 and 2001 c 329 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For members commissioned on or after January 1, 2003, except as
provided in RCW 11.07.010, if a member or a vested member who has not
completed at least ten years of service dies, the amount of the
accumulated contributions standing to such member's credit in the
retirement system at the time of such member's death, less any amount
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670,
shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust,
or organization as the member shall have nominated by written
designation duly executed and filed with the department. ((If there be
no such designated person or persons still living at the time of the
member's death, such member's accumulated contributions standing to
such member's credit in the retirement system, less any amount
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670,
shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust,
or organization as the member shall have nominated by written
designation duly executed and filed with the department.)) If there be
no such designated person or persons still living at the time of the
member's death, such member's accumulated contributions standing to
such member's credit in the retirement system, less any amount
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670,
shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse as if in fact such
spouse had been nominated by written designation, or if there be no
such surviving spouse, then to such member's legal representatives.
(2) If a member who is eligible for retirement or a member who has
completed at least ten years of service dies, the surviving spouse or
eligible child or children shall elect to receive either:
(a) A retirement allowance computed as provided for in RCW
43.43.260, actuarially reduced by the amount of any lump sum benefit
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670 and
actuarially adjusted to reflect a joint and one hundred percent
survivor option under RCW 43.43.278 and if the member was not eligible
for normal retirement at the date of death a further reduction from age
fifty-five or when the member could have attained twenty-five years of
service, whichever is less; if a surviving spouse who is receiving a
retirement allowance dies leaving a child or children of the member
under the age of majority, then such child or children shall continue
to receive an allowance in an amount equal to that which was being
received by the surviving spouse, share and share alike, until such
child or children reach the age of majority; if there is no surviving
spouse eligible to receive an allowance at the time of the member's
death, such member's child or children under the age of majority shall
receive an allowance share and share alike calculated under this
section making the assumption that the ages of the spouse and member
were equal at the time of the member's death; or
(b)(i) The member's accumulated contributions, less any amount
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670; or
(ii) If the member dies, one hundred fifty percent of the member's
accumulated contributions, less any amount identified as owing to an
obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a
court order filed under RCW 41.50.670. Any accumulated contributions
attributable to restorations made under RCW 41.50.165(2) shall be
refunded at one hundred percent.
(3) If a member who is eligible for retirement or a member who has
completed at least ten years of service dies, and is not survived by a
spouse or an eligible child, then the accumulated contributions
standing to the member's credit, less any amount identified as owing to
an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a
court order filed under RCW 41.50.670, shall be paid:
(a) To an estate, a person or persons, trust, or organization as
the member shall have nominated by written designation duly executed
and filed with the department; or
(b) If there is no such designated person or persons still living
at the time of the member's death, then to the member's legal
representatives.

Sec. 16 RCW 44.44.040 and 1987 c 25 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The office of the state actuary shall have the following powers and
duties:
(1) Perform all actuarial services for the department of retirement
systems, including all studies required by law. ((Reimbursement for
such services shall be made to the state actuary pursuant to the
provisions of RCW 39.34.130 as now or hereafter amended.))
(2) Advise the legislature and the governor regarding pension
benefit provisions, and funding policies and investment policies of the
state investment board.
(3) Consult with the legislature and the governor concerning
determination of actuarial assumptions used by the department of
retirement systems.
(4) Prepare a report, to be known as the actuarial fiscal note, on
each pension bill introduced in the legislature which briefly explains
the financial impact of the bill. The actuarial fiscal note shall
include: (a) The statutorily required contribution for the biennium
and the following twenty-five years; (b) the biennial cost of the
increased benefits if these exceed the required contribution; and (c)
any change in the present value of the unfunded accrued benefits. An
actuarial fiscal note shall also be prepared for all amendments which
are offered in committee or on the floor of the house of
representatives or the senate to any pension bill. However, a majority
of the members present may suspend the requirement for an actuarial
fiscal note for amendments offered on the floor of the house of
representatives or the senate.
(5) Provide such actuarial services to the legislature as may be
requested from time to time.
(6) Provide staff and assistance to the committee established under
RCW ((46.44.050)) 44.44.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Section 4 of this act takes effect January
1, 2004.

--- END ---