BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.26 RCW
under the subchapter heading "plan 2" to read as follows:
(1) A member of plan 2 who was a member of the public employees'
retirement system while employed providing emergency medical services
for a city, town, county, or district and whose job was relocated from
another department of a city, town, county, or district to a fire
department has the following options:
(a) Remain a member of the public employees' retirement system; or
(b) Leave any service credit earned as a member of the public
employees' retirement system in the public employees' retirement
system, and have all future service earned in the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2, becoming a dual
member under the provisions of chapter 41.54 RCW; or
(c) Make an election no later than June 30, 2008, filed in writing
with the department of retirement systems, to transfer service credit
previously earned as an emergency medical technician for a city, town,
county, or district in the public employees' retirement system plan 1
or plan 2 to the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 2 as defined in RCW 41.26.030. Service credit
that a member elects to transfer from the public employees' retirement
system to the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement
system under this section shall be transferred no earlier than five
years after the effective date the member elects to transfer, and only
after the member earns five years of service credit as a fire fighter
following the effective date the member elects to transfer.
(2) A member of plan 1 who was a member of the public employees'
retirement system while employed providing emergency medical services
for a city, town, county, or district and whose job was relocated from
another department of a city, town, county, or district to a fire
department has the following options:
(a) Remain a member of the public employees' retirement system; or
(b) Leave any service credit earned as a member of the public
employees' retirement system in the public employees' retirement
system, and have all future service earned in the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1.
(3)(a) A member who elects to transfer service credit under
subsection (1)(c) of this section shall make the payments required by
this subsection prior to having service credit earned as an emergency
medical technician for a city, town, county, or district under the
public employees' retirement system plan 1 or plan 2 transferred to the
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2.
However, in no event shall service credit be transferred earlier than
five years after the effective date the member elects to transfer, or
prior to the member earning five years of service credit as a fire
fighter following the effective date the member elects to transfer.
(b) A member who elects to transfer service credit under this
subsection shall pay, for the applicable period of service, the
difference between the contributions the employee paid to the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 or plan 2 and the contributions
that would have been paid by the employee had the employee been a
member of the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement
system plan 2, plus interest on this difference as determined by the
director. This payment must be made no later than five years from the
effective date of the election made under subsection (1)(c) of this
section and must be made prior to retirement.
(c) No earlier than five years after the effective date the member
elects to transfer service credit under this section and upon
completion of the payment required in (b) of this subsection, the
department shall transfer from the public employees' retirement system
plan 1 or plan 2 to the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 2: (i) All of the employee's applicable
accumulated contributions plus interest and an equal amount of employer
contributions; and (ii) all applicable months of service, as defined in
RCW 41.26.030(14)(b), credited to the employee under this chapter for
service as an emergency services provider for a city, town, county, or
district as though that service was rendered as a member of the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2.
(d) Upon transfer of service credit, contributions, and interest
under this subsection, the employee is permanently excluded from
membership in the public employees' retirement system for all service
transfers related to their time served as an emergency medical
technician for a city, town, county, or district under the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 or plan 2.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act expires July 1, 2013.

--- END ---