BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.35.010 and 2001 c 180 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise((:)).
(1) "Retirement system" means the Washington school employees'
retirement system provided for in this chapter.
(2) "Department" means the department of retirement systems created
in chapter 41.50 RCW.
(3) "State treasurer" means the treasurer of the state of
Washington.
(4) "Employer," for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means a school
district or an educational service district.
(5) "Member" means any employee included in the membership of the
retirement system, as provided for in RCW 41.35.030.
(6)(a) "Compensation earnable" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means
salaries or wages earned by a member during a payroll period for
personal services, including overtime payments, and shall include wages
and salaries deferred under provisions established pursuant to sections
403(b), 414(h), and 457 of the United States internal revenue code, but
shall exclude nonmoney maintenance compensation and lump sum or other
payments for deferred annual sick leave, unused accumulated vacation,
unused accumulated annual leave, or any form of severance pay.
(b) "Compensation earnable" for plan 2 and plan 3 members also
includes the following actual or imputed payments, which are not paid
for personal services:
(i) Retroactive payments to an individual by an employer on
reinstatement of the employee in a position, or payments by an employer
to an individual in lieu of reinstatement, which are awarded or granted
as the equivalent of the salary or wage which the individual would have
earned during a payroll period shall be considered compensation
earnable to the extent provided in this subsection, and the individual
shall receive the equivalent service credit;
(ii) In any year in which a member serves in the legislature, the
member shall have the option of having such member's compensation
earnable be the greater of:
(A) The compensation earnable the member would have received had
such member not served in the legislature; or
(B) Such member's actual compensation earnable received for
nonlegislative public employment and legislative service combined. Any
additional contributions to the retirement system required because
compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(A) of this subsection is greater
than compensation earnable under this (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection
shall be paid by the member for both member and employer contributions;
(iii) Assault pay only as authorized by RCW 27.04.100, 72.01.045,
and 72.09.240;
(iv) Compensation that a member would have received but for a
disability occurring in the line of duty only as authorized by RCW
41.40.038;
(v) Compensation that a member receives due to participation in the
leave sharing program only as authorized by RCW 41.04.650 through
41.04.670; and
(vi) Compensation that a member receives for being in standby
status. For the purposes of this section, a member is in standby
status when not being paid for time actually worked and the employer
requires the member to be prepared to report immediately for work, if
the need arises, although the need may not arise.
(7) "Service" for plan 2 and plan 3 members means periods of
employment by a member in an eligible position or positions for one or
more employers for which compensation earnable is paid. Compensation
earnable earned for ninety or more hours in any calendar month shall
constitute one service credit month except as provided in RCW
41.35.180. Compensation earnable earned for at least seventy hours but
less than ninety hours in any calendar month shall constitute one-half
service credit month of service. Compensation earnable earned for less
than seventy hours in any calendar month shall constitute one-quarter
service credit month of service. Time spent in standby status, whether
compensated or not, is not service.
Any fraction of a year of service shall be taken into account in
the computation of such retirement allowance or benefits.
(a) Service in any state elective position shall be deemed to be
full-time service.
(b) A member shall receive a total of not more than twelve service
credit months of service for such calendar year. If an individual is
employed in an eligible position by one or more employers the
individual shall receive no more than one service credit month during
any calendar month in which multiple service for ninety or more hours
is rendered.
(c) For purposes of plan 2 and 3 "forty-five days" as used in RCW
28A.400.300 is equal to two service credit months. Use of less than
forty-five days of sick leave is creditable as allowed under this
subsection as follows:
(i) Less than eleven days equals one-quarter service credit month;
(ii) Eleven or more days but less than twenty-two days equals one-half service credit month;
(iii) Twenty-two days equals one service credit month;
(iv) More than twenty-two days but less than thirty-three days
equals one and one-quarter service credit month; and
(v) Thirty-three or more days but less than forty-five days equals
one and one-half service credit month.
(8) "Service credit year" means an accumulation of months of
service credit which is equal to one when divided by twelve.
(9) "Service credit month" means a month or an accumulation of
months of service credit which is equal to one.
(10) "Membership service" means all service rendered as a member.
(11) "Beneficiary" for plan 2 and plan 3 members means any person
in receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this
chapter resulting from service rendered to an employer by another
person.
(12) "Regular interest" means such rate as the director may
determine.
(13) "Accumulated contributions" means the sum of all contributions
standing to the credit of a member in the member's individual account,
including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), together with the
regular interest thereon.
(14) "Average final compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members
means the member's average compensation earnable of the highest
consecutive sixty months of service credit months prior to such
member's retirement, termination, or death. Periods constituting
authorized leaves of absence may not be used in the calculation of
average final compensation except under RCW 41.40.710(2).
(15) "Final compensation" means the annual rate of compensation
earnable by a member at the time of termination of employment.
(16) "Annuity" means payments for life derived from accumulated
contributions of a member. All annuities shall be paid in monthly
installments.
(17) "Pension" means payments for life derived from contributions
made by the employer. All pensions shall be paid in monthly
installments.
(18) "Retirement allowance" for plan 2 and plan 3 members means
monthly payments to a retiree or beneficiary as provided in this
chapter.
(19) "Employee" or "employed" means a person who is providing
services for compensation to an employer, unless the person is free
from the employer's direction and control over the performance of work.
The department shall adopt rules and interpret this subsection
consistent with common law.
(20) "Actuarial equivalent" means a benefit of equal value when
computed upon the basis of such mortality and other tables as may be
adopted by the director.
(21) "Retirement" means withdrawal from active service with a
retirement allowance as provided by this chapter.
(22) "Eligible position" means any position that, as defined by the
employer, normally requires five or more months of service a year for
which regular compensation for at least seventy hours is earned by the
occupant thereof. For purposes of this chapter an employer shall not
define "position" in such a manner that an employee's monthly work for
that employer is divided into more than one position.
(23) "Ineligible position" means any position which does not
conform with the requirements set forth in subsection (22) of this
section.
(24) "Leave of absence" means the period of time a member is
authorized by the employer to be absent from service without being
separated from membership.
(25) "Retiree" means any person who has begun accruing a retirement
allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from
service rendered to an employer while a member.
(26) "Director" means the director of the department.
(27) "State elective position" means any position held by any
person elected or appointed to statewide office or elected or appointed
as a member of the legislature.
(28) "State actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed
pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).
(29) "Plan 2" means the Washington school employees' retirement
system plan 2 providing the benefits and funding provisions covering
persons who first became members of the public employees' retirement
system on and after October 1, 1977, and transferred to the Washington
school employees' retirement system under RCW 41.40.750.
(30) "Plan 3" means the Washington school employees' retirement
system plan 3 providing the benefits and funding provisions covering
persons who first became members of the system on and after September
1, 2000, or who transfer from plan 2 under RCW 41.35.510.
(31) "Index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual
average consumer price index, Seattle, Washington area, for urban wage
earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of
labor statistics, United States department of labor.
(32) "Index A" means the index for the year prior to the
determination of a postretirement adjustment.
(33) "Index B" means the index for the year prior to index A.
(34) "Adjustment ratio" means the value of index A divided by index
B.
(35) "Separation from service" occurs when a person has terminated
all employment with an employer.
(36) "Member account" or "member's account" for purposes of plan 3
means the sum of the contributions and earnings on behalf of the member
in the defined contribution portion of plan 3.
(37) "Classified employee" means an employee of a school district
or an educational service district who is not eligible for membership
in the teachers' retirement system established under chapter 41.32 RCW.
(38) "Substitute employee" means a classified employee who is
employed by an employer exclusively as a substitute for an absent
employee.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.35.030 and 1998 c 341 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Membership in the retirement system shall consist of all regularly
compensated classified employees and appointive and elective officials
of employers, as defined in this chapter, with the following
exceptions:
(1) Persons in ineligible positions;
(2)(a) Persons holding elective offices or persons appointed
directly by the governor: PROVIDED, That such persons shall have the
option of applying for membership during such periods of employment:
AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That any persons holding or who have held
elective offices or persons appointed by the governor who are members
in the retirement system and who have, prior to becoming such members,
previously held an elective office, and did not at the start of such
initial or successive terms of office exercise their option to become
members, may apply for membership to be effective during such term or
terms of office, and shall be allowed to establish the service credit
applicable to such term or terms of office upon payment of the employee
contributions therefor by the employee with interest as determined by
the director and employer contributions therefor by the employer or
employee with interest as determined by the director: AND PROVIDED
FURTHER, That all contributions with interest submitted by the employee
under this subsection shall be placed in the employee's individual
account in the employee's savings fund and be treated as any other
contribution made by the employee, with the exception that any
contributions submitted by the employee in payment of the employer's
obligation, together with the interest the director may apply to the
employer's contribution, shall not be considered part of the member's
annuity for any purpose except withdrawal of contributions;
(b) A member holding elective office who has elected to apply for
membership pursuant to (a) of this subsection and who later wishes to
be eligible for a retirement allowance shall have the option of ending
his or her membership in the retirement system. A member wishing to
end his or her membership under this subsection must file on a form
supplied by the department a statement indicating that the member
agrees to irrevocably abandon any claim for service for future periods
served as an elected official. A member who receives more than fifteen
thousand dollars per year in compensation for his or her elective
service, adjusted annually for inflation by the director, is not
eligible for the option provided by this subsection (2)(b);
(3) Retirement system retirees: PROVIDED, That following
reemployment in an eligible position, a retiree may elect to
prospectively become a member of the retirement system if otherwise
eligible;
(4) Persons enrolled in state-approved apprenticeship programs,
authorized under chapter 49.04 RCW, and who are employed by employers
to earn hours to complete such apprenticeship programs, if the employee
is a member of a union-sponsored retirement plan and is making
contributions to such a retirement plan or if the employee is a member
of a Taft-Hartley retirement plan;
(5) Persons rendering professional services to an employer on a
fee, retainer, or contract basis or when the income from these services
is less than fifty percent of the gross income received from the
person's practice of a profession;
(6) Substitute employees, except for the purposes of the purchase
of service credit under section 3 of this act. Upon the return or
termination of the absent employee a substitute employee is replacing,
that substitute employee shall no longer be ineligible under this
subsection;
(7) Employees who (a) are not citizens of the United States, (b) do
not reside in the United States, and (c) perform duties outside of the
United States;
(((7))) (8) Employees who (a) are not citizens of the United
States, (b) are not covered by chapter 41.48 RCW, (c) are not excluded
from membership under this chapter or chapter 41.04 RCW, (d) are
residents of this state, and (e) make an irrevocable election to be
excluded from membership, in writing, which is submitted to the
director within thirty days after employment in an eligible position;
(((8))) (9) Employees who are citizens of the United States and who
reside and perform duties for an employer outside of the United States:
PROVIDED, That unless otherwise excluded under this chapter or chapter
41.04 RCW, the employee may apply for membership (a) within thirty days
after employment in an eligible position and membership service credit
shall be granted from the first day of membership service, and (b)
after this thirty-day period, but membership service credit shall be
granted only if payment is made for the noncredited membership service
under RCW 41.50.165(2), otherwise service shall be from the date of
application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 41.35 RCW
under the subchapter heading "provisions applicable to plan 2 and plan
3" to read as follows:
(1) A substitute employee who works five or more months of seventy
or more hours for which earnable compensation is paid in a school year
may apply to the department to establish membership after the end of
the school year during which the work was performed. The application
must:
(a) Include a list of the employers the substitute employee has
worked for;
(b) Include proof of hours worked and compensation earned; and
(c) Be made prior to retirement.
(2) Substitute employees who are members may apply to the
department to receive service after the end of the last day of
instruction of the school year during which the service was performed.
The application must:
(a) Include a list of the employers the substitute employee has
worked for;
(b) Include proof of hours worked and compensation earned; and
(c) Be made prior to retirement.
(3) If the department accepts the substitute employee's application
for service credit, the substitute employee may obtain service credit
by paying the required contribution to the retirement system. The
employer must pay the required employer contribution upon notice from
the department that the substitute employee has made contributions
under this section.
(4) The department shall charge interest prospectively on employee
contributions that are submitted under this section more than six
months after the end of the school year, as defined in RCW 28A.150.040,
for which the substitute employee is seeking service credit. The
interest rate charged to the employee shall take into account interest
lost on employer contributions delayed for more than six months after
the end of the school year.
(5) Each employer shall quarterly notify each substitute employee
it has employed during the school year of the number of hours worked
by, and the compensation paid to, the substitute employee.
(6) If a substitute employee, as defined in RCW 41.35.010(38),
applies to the department under this section for credit for earnable
compensation earned from an employer, the substitute employee must make
contributions for all periods of service for that employer.
(7) The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.

--- END ---