BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The select committee on pension policy is created. The select
committee consists of:
(a) Four members of the senate appointed by the president of the
senate, two of whom are members of the majority party and two of whom
are members of the minority party. At least three of the appointees
shall be members of the senate ways and means committee;
(b) Four members of the house of representatives appointed by the
speaker, two of whom are members of the majority party and two of whom
are members of the minority party. At least three of the appointees
shall be members of the house of representatives appropriations
committee;
(c) Four active members or representatives from organizations of
active members of the state retirement systems appointed by the
governor for staggered three-year terms, with no more than two
appointees representing any one employee retirement system;
(d) Two retired members or representatives of retired members'
organizations of the state retirement systems appointed by the governor
for staggered three-year terms, with no two members from the same
system;
(e) Four employer representatives of members of the state
retirement systems appointed by the governor for staggered three-year
terms; and
(f) The directors of the department of retirement systems and
office of financial management.
(2)(a) The term of office of each member of the house of
representatives or senate serving on the committee runs from the close
of the session in which he or she is appointed until the close of the
next regular session held in an odd-numbered year. If a successor is
not appointed during a session, the member's term continues until the
member is reappointed or a successor is appointed. The term of office
for a committee member who is a member of the house of representatives
or the senate who does not continue as a member of the senate or house
of representatives ceases upon the convening of the next session of the
legislature during the odd-numbered year following the member's
appointment, or upon the member's resignation, whichever is earlier.
All vacancies of positions held by members of the legislature must be
filled from the same political party and from the same house as the
member whose seat was vacated.
(b) Following the terms of members and representatives appointed
under subsection (1)(d) of this section, the retiree positions shall be
rotated to ensure that each system has an opportunity to have a retiree
representative on the committee.
(3) The committee shall elect a chairperson and a vice-chairperson.
The chairperson shall be a member of the senate in even-numbered years
and a member of the house of representatives in odd-numbered years.
(4) The committee shall establish an executive committee of four
members, including the chairperson and the vice-chairperson.
(5) Nonlegislative members of the select committee serve without
compensation, but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(6) The office of state actuary under chapter 44.44 RCW shall
provide staff and technical support to the committee.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.50.110 and 1998 c 341 s 508 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided by RCW 41.50.255 and subsection (6) of this
section, all expenses of the administration of the department ((and)),
the expenses of administration of the retirement systems, and the
expenses of the administration of the office of the state actuary
created in chapters 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.32, 41.40, 41.34, 41.35,
((and)) 43.43, and 44.44 RCW shall be paid from the department of
retirement systems expense fund.
(2) In order to reimburse the department of retirement systems
expense fund on an equitable basis the department shall ascertain and
report to each employer, as defined in RCW 41.26.030, 41.32.010,
41.35.010, or 41.40.010, the sum necessary to defray its proportional
share of the entire expense of the administration of the retirement
system that the employer participates in during the ensuing biennium or
fiscal year whichever may be required. Such sum is to be computed in
an amount directly proportional to the estimated entire expense of the
administration as the ratio of monthly salaries of the employer's
members bears to the total salaries of all members in the entire
system. It shall then be the duty of all such employers to include in
their budgets or otherwise provide the amounts so required.
(3) The department shall compute and bill each employer, as defined
in RCW 41.26.030, 41.32.010, 41.35.010, or 41.40.010, at the end of
each month for the amount due for that month to the department of
retirement systems expense fund and the same shall be paid as are its
other obligations. Such computation as to each employer shall be made
on a percentage rate of salary established by the department. However,
the department may at its discretion establish a system of billing
based upon calendar year quarters in which event the said billing shall
be at the end of each such quarter.
(4) The director may adjust the expense fund contribution rate for
each system at any time when necessary to reflect unanticipated costs
or savings in administering the department.
(5) An employer who fails to submit timely and accurate reports to
the department may be assessed an additional fee related to the
increased costs incurred by the department in processing the deficient
reports. Fees paid under this subsection shall be deposited in the
retirement system expense fund.
(a) Every six months the department shall determine the amount of
an employer's fee by reviewing the timeliness and accuracy of the
reports submitted by the employer in the preceding six months. If
those reports were not both timely and accurate the department may
prospectively assess an additional fee under this subsection.
(b) An additional fee assessed by the department under this
subsection shall not exceed fifty percent of the standard fee.
(c) The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.
(6) Expenses other than those under RCW 41.34.060(((2))) (3) shall
be paid pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 44.44.040 and 1987 c 25 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The office of the state actuary shall have the following powers and
duties:
(1) Perform all actuarial services for the department of retirement
systems, including all studies required by law. ((Reimbursement for
such services shall be made to the state actuary pursuant to the
provisions of RCW 39.34.130 as now or hereafter amended.))
(2) Advise the legislature and the governor regarding pension
benefit provisions, and funding policies and investment policies of the
state investment board.
(3) Consult with the legislature and the governor concerning
determination of actuarial assumptions used by the department of
retirement systems.
(4) Prepare a report, to be known as the actuarial fiscal note, on
each pension bill introduced in the legislature which briefly explains
the financial impact of the bill. The actuarial fiscal note shall
include: (a) The statutorily required contribution for the biennium
and the following twenty-five years; (b) the biennial cost of the
increased benefits if these exceed the required contribution; and (c)
any change in the present value of the unfunded accrued benefits. An
actuarial fiscal note shall also be prepared for all amendments which
are offered in committee or on the floor of the house of
representatives or the senate to any pension bill. However, a majority
of the members present may suspend the requirement for an actuarial
fiscal note for amendments offered on the floor of the house of
representatives or the senate.
(5) Provide such actuarial services to the legislature as may be
requested from time to time.
(6) Provide staff and assistance to the committee established under
((RCW 46.44.050)) section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The select committee on pension policy has the following powers and
duties:
(1) Study pension issues, develop pension policies for public
employees in state retirement systems, and make recommendations to the
legislature;
(2) Study the financial condition of the state pension systems,
develop funding policies, and make recommendations to the legislature;
(3) Consult with the chair and vice-chair on appointing members to
the state actuary appointment committee upon the convening of the state
actuary appointment committee established under section 12 of this act;
and
(4) Receive the results of the actuarial audits of the actuarial
valuations and experience studies administered by the pension funding
council pursuant to RCW 41.45.110. The select committee on pension
policy shall study and make recommendations on changes to assumptions
or contribution rates to the pension funding council prior to adoption
of changes under RCW 41.45.030, 41.45.035, or 41.45.060.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.32.570 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 10 s 3 and 2001 c 317
s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) If a retiree enters employment with an employer sooner than
one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly
retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for
every seven hours worked during that month. This reduction will be
applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment
with an employer for one full calendar month.
(b) The benefit reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will
accrue for a maximum of one hundred forty hours per month. Any monthly
benefit reduction over one hundred percent will be applied to the
benefit the retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent months.
(2) Any retired teacher or retired administrator who enters service
in any public educational institution in Washington state and who has
satisfied the break in employment requirement of subsection (1) of this
section shall cease to receive pension payments while engaged in such
service, after the retiree has rendered service for more than one
thousand five hundred hours in a school year. When a retired teacher
or administrator renders service beyond eight hundred sixty-seven
hours, the department shall collect from the employer the applicable
employer retirement contributions for the entire duration of the
member's employment during that fiscal year.
(3) The department shall collect and provide the state actuary with
information relevant to the use of this section for the ((joint))
select committee on pension policy.
(4) The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this
section in the future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual
right to be employed for more than five hundred twenty-five hours per
year without a reduction of his or her pension.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.40.037 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 10 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1)(a) If a retiree enters employment with an employer sooner than
one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly
retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for
every eight hours worked during that month. This reduction will be
applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment
with an employer for one full calendar month.
(b) The benefit reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will
accrue for a maximum of one hundred sixty hours per month. Any benefit
reduction over one hundred percent will be applied to the benefit the
retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent months.
(2)(a) A retiree from plan 1 who has satisfied the break in
employment requirement of subsection (1) of this section and who enters
employment with an employer may continue to receive pension payments
while engaged in such service for up to one thousand five hundred hours
of service in a calendar year without a reduction of pension. When a
plan 1 member renders service beyond eight hundred sixty-seven hours,
the department shall collect from the employer the applicable employer
retirement contributions for the entire duration of the member's
employment during that calendar year.
(b) A retiree from plan 2 or plan 3 who has satisfied the break in
employment requirement of subsection (1) of this section may work up to
eight hundred sixty-seven hours in a calendar year in an eligible
position, as defined in RCW 41.32.010, 41.35.010, or 41.40.010, or as
a fire fighter or law enforcement officer, as defined in RCW 41.26.030,
without suspension of his or her benefit.
(3) If the retiree opts to reestablish membership under RCW
41.40.023(12), he or she terminates his or her retirement status and
becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall not accrue during the
period of membership and the individual shall make contributions and
receive membership credit. Such a member shall have the right to again
retire if eligible in accordance with RCW 41.40.180. However, if the
right to retire is exercised to become effective before the member has
rendered two uninterrupted years of service, the retirement formula and
survivor options the member had at the time of the member's previous
retirement shall be reinstated.
(4) The department shall collect and provide the state actuary with
information relevant to the use of this section for the ((joint))
select committee on pension policy.
(5) The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this
section in the future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual
right to be employed for more than five months in a calendar year
without a reduction of his or her pension.

Sec. 7 RCW 41.45.020 and 2002 c 26 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Council" means the pension funding council created in RCW
41.45.100.
(2) "Department" means the department of retirement systems.
(3) "Law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system
plan 1" and "law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement
system plan 2" means the benefits and funding provisions under chapter
41.26 RCW.
(4) "Public employees' retirement system plan 1," "public
employees' retirement system plan 2," and "public employees' retirement
system plan 3" mean the benefits and funding provisions under chapter
41.40 RCW.
(5) "Teachers' retirement system plan 1," "teachers' retirement
system plan 2," and "teachers' retirement system plan 3" mean the
benefits and funding provisions under chapter 41.32 RCW.
(6) "School employees' retirement system plan 2" and "school
employees' retirement system plan 3" mean the benefits and funding
provisions under chapter 41.35 RCW.
(7) "Washington state patrol retirement system" means the
retirement benefits provided under chapter 43.43 RCW.
(8) "Unfunded liability" means the unfunded actuarial accrued
liability of a retirement system.
(9) "Actuary" or "state actuary" means the state actuary employed
under chapter 44.44 RCW.
(10) "State retirement systems" means the retirement systems listed
in RCW 41.50.030.
(11) "Classified employee" means a member of the Washington school
employees' retirement system plan 2 or plan 3 as defined in RCW
41.35.010.
(12) "Teacher" means a member of the teachers' retirement system as
defined in RCW 41.32.010(15).
(13) "Select committee" means the select committee on pension
policy created in section 1 of this act.

Sec. 8 RCW 41.45.090 and 1998 c 283 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall collect and keep in convenient form such data
as shall be necessary for an actuarial valuation of the assets and
liabilities of the state retirement systems, and for making an
actuarial investigation into the mortality, service, compensation, and
other experience of the members and beneficiaries of those systems.
The department and state actuary shall enter into a memorandum of
understanding regarding the specific data the department will collect,
when it will be collected, and how it will be maintained. The
department shall notify the state actuary of any changes it makes, or
intends to make, in the collection and maintenance of such data.
At least once in each six-year period, the state actuary shall
conduct an actuarial experience study of the mortality, service,
compensation and other experience of the members and beneficiaries of
each state retirement system, and into the financial condition of each
system. The results of each investigation shall be filed with the
department, the office of financial management, the budget writing
committees of the Washington house of representatives and senate, the
select committee on pension policy, and the pension funding council.
Upon the basis of such actuarial investigation the department shall
adopt such tables, schedules, factors, and regulations as are deemed
necessary in the light of the findings of the actuary for the proper
operation of the state retirement systems.

Sec. 9 RCW 41.45.110 and 1998 c 283 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The pension funding council shall solicit and administer a biennial
actuarial audit of the actuarial valuations used for rate-setting
purposes. This audit will be conducted concurrent with the actuarial
valuation performed by the state actuary. At least once in each six-year period, the pension funding council shall solicit and administer
an actuarial audit of the results of the experience study required in
RCW 41.45.090. Upon receipt of the results of the actuarial audits
required by this section, the pension funding council shall submit the
results to the select committee on pension policy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 RCW 41.54.061 is decodified.

Sec. 11 RCW 44.04.260 and 2001 c 259 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The joint legislative audit and review committee, the legislative
transportation committee, the ((joint)) select committee on pension
policy, the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee, and the joint legislative systems committee are subject to
such operational policies, procedures, and oversight as are deemed
necessary by the facilities and operations committee of the senate and
the executive rules committee of the house of representatives to ensure
operational adequacy of the agencies of the legislative branch. As
used in this section, "operational policies, procedures, and oversight"
includes the development process of biennial budgets, contracting
procedures, personnel policies, and compensation plans, selection of a
chief administrator, facilities, and expenditures. This section does
not grant oversight authority to the facilities and operations
committee of the senate over any standing committee of the house of
representatives or oversight authority to the executive rules committee
of the house of representatives over any standing committee of the
senate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) The state actuary appointment committee
is created. The committee shall consist of: (a) The chair and ranking
minority member of the house of representatives appropriations
committee and the chair and ranking minority member of the senate ways
and means committee; and (b) four members of the select committee on
pension policy appointed jointly by the chair and vice-chair of the
select committee, at least one member representing state retirement
systems active or retired members, and one member representing state
retirement system employers.
(2) The state actuary appointment committee shall be jointly
chaired by the chair of the house of representatives appropriations
committee and the chair of the senate ways and means committee.
(3) The state actuary appointment committee shall appoint or remove
the state actuary by a two-thirds vote of the committee. When
considering the appointment or removal of the state actuary, the
appointment committee shall consult with the director of the department
of retirement systems, the director of the office of financial
management, and other interested parties.
(4) The state actuary appointment committee shall be convened by
the chairs of the house of representatives appropriations committee and
the senate ways and means committee (a) whenever the position of state
actuary becomes vacant, or (b) upon the written request of any four
members of the appointment committee.

Sec. 13 RCW 44.44.030 and 2001 c 259 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to RCW 44.04.260, the state actuary shall have the
authority to select and employ such research, technical, clerical
personnel, and consultants as the actuary deems necessary, whose
salaries shall be fixed by the actuary and approved by the ((joint
committee on pension policy)) the state actuary appointment committee,
and who shall be exempt from the provisions of the state civil service
law, chapter 41.06 RCW.
(2) All actuarial valuations and experience studies performed by
the office of the state actuary shall be signed by a member of the
American academy of actuaries. If the state actuary is not such a
member, the state actuary, after approval by the select committee,
shall contract for a period not to exceed two years with a member of
the American academy of actuaries to assist in developing actuarial
valuations and experience studies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 44.44.015 (Administration) and 2001 c 259 s 10;
(2) RCW 44.44.050 (Joint committee on pension policy -- Membership,
terms, leadership) and 1987 c 25 s 4; and
(3) RCW 44.44.060 (Joint committee on pension policy -- Powers and
duties) and 1987 c 25 s 5.

--- END ---