BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.40 RCW
under the subchapter heading "provisions applicable to plan 1, plan 2,
and plan 3" to read as follows:
(1) A one hundred fifty thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid
to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust or
organization as the member has nominated by written designation duly
executed and filed with the department. If no such designated person
or persons are still living at the time of the member's death, the
member's death benefit shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse
as if in fact the spouse had been nominated by written designation, or
if there is no surviving spouse, then to the member's legal
representatives.
(2) The benefit under this section shall be paid only where death
occurs as a result of injuries sustained in the course of employment.
The determination of eligibility for the benefit shall be made
consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and industries.
The department of labor and industries shall notify the department of
retirement systems by order under RCW 51.52.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.32 RCW
under the subchapter heading "provisions applicable to plan 1, plan 2,
and plan 3" to read as follows:
(1) A one hundred fifty thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid
to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust or
organization as the member has nominated by written designation duly
executed and filed with the department. If no such designated person
or persons are still living at the time of the member's death, the
member's death benefit shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse
as if in fact the spouse had been nominated by written designation, or
if there is no surviving spouse, then to the member's legal
representatives.
(2) The benefit under this section shall be paid only where death
occurs as a result of injuries sustained in the course of employment.
The determination of eligibility for the benefit shall be made
consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and industries.
The department of labor and industries shall notify the department of
retirement systems by order under RCW 51.52.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 41.35 RCW
under the subchapter heading "provisions applicable to plan 2 and plan
3" to read as follows:
(1) A one hundred fifty thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid
to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust or
organization as the member has nominated by written designation duly
executed and filed with the department. If no such designated person
or persons are still living at the time of the member's death, the
member's death benefit shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse
as if in fact the spouse had been nominated by written designation, or
if there is no surviving spouse, then to the member's legal
representatives.
(2) The benefit under this section shall be paid only where death
occurs as a result of injuries sustained in the course of employment.
The determination of eligibility for the benefit shall be made
consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and industries.
The department of labor and industries shall notify the department of
retirement systems by order under RCW 51.52.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW
to read as follows:
A one hundred fifty thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid as
a sundry claim to the estate of an employee of any state agency, the
common school system of the state, or institution of higher education
who dies as a result of injuries sustained in the course of employment
and is not otherwise provided a death benefit through coverage under
their enrolled retirement system under this act. The determination of
eligibility for the benefit shall be made consistent with Title 51 RCW
by the department of labor and industries. The department of labor and
industries shall notify the director of the department of general
administration by order under RCW 51.52.050.

--- END ---