BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Retirement benefits paid under chapter 41.26, 41.40, or 43.43 RCW
to beneficiaries of public safety officers who die in the line of duty
shall be paid in accordance with Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 101(h) as amended
by the Fallen Hero Survivor Benefit Fairness Act of 2001.

--- END ---