BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART 1
HEALTH CARE POLICY TECHNICAL ADVISORY COMMITTEE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 RCW 41.05.150 (Health care policy
technical advisory committee) and 1988 c 107 s 14 are each repealed.

PART 2
GOVERNOR'S SMALL BUSINESS IMPROVEMENT COUNCIL
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 43.175.010 (Governor's small business improvement council--Established -- Membership -- Travel expenses -- Staff support and
administrative assistance) and 1987 c 348 s 6, 1985 c 466 s 62, & 1984
c 282 s 7;
(2) RCW 43.175.020 (Duties) and 1998 c 245 s 53, 1987 c 348 s 7,
1985 c 466 s 63, & 1984 c 282 s 8; and
(3) RCW 43.175.901 (Severability -- 1984 c 282) and 1984 c 282 s 17.

PART 3
REBUILDING FAMILIES ADVISORY COMMITTEE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 By July 1, 2003, the secretary of the
department of corrections shall abolish the rebuilding families
advisory committee.

PART 4
INDEPENDENT LIVING ADVISORY COMMITTEE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 By July 1, 2003, the director of the
department of services for the blind shall abolish the independent
living advisory committee.

PART 5
OCEAN SPOT SHRIMP EMERGING FISHERY ADVISORY BOARD
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 By July 1, 2003, the director of the
department of fish and wildlife shall abolish the ocean spot shrimp
emerging fishery advisory board.

PART 6
FIREARMS RANGE ADVISORY COMMITTEE
Sec. 601 RCW 79A.25.220 and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 71 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) ((A ten-member firearms range advisory committee is hereby
created to provide advice and counsel to the interagency committee for
outdoor recreation. The members shall be appointed by the director of
the interagency committee for outdoor recreation from the following
groups:
(a) Law enforcement;
(b) Washington military department;
(c) Black powder shooting sports;
(d) Rifle shooting sports;
(e) Pistol shooting sports;
(f) Shotgun shooting sports;
(g) Archery shooting sports;
(h) Hunter education;
(i) Hunters; and
(j) General public.
(2) The firearms range advisory committee members shall serve two-year terms with five new members being selected each year beginning
with the third year of the committee's existence. The firearms range
advisory committee members shall not receive compensation from the
firearms range account. However, travel and per diem costs shall be
paid consistent with regulations for state employees.
(3) The interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall provide
administrative, operational, and logistical support for the firearms
range advisory committee.)) Expenses directly incurred for supporting
((this)) the grant program in RCW 79A.25.210 may be charged by the
interagency committee for outdoor recreation against the firearms range
account. Expenses shall not exceed ten percent of the yearly income
for the range account.
(((4))) (2) For the grant program in RCW 79A.25.210, the
interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall ((in cooperation
with the firearms range advisory committee)):
(a) Develop an application process;
(b) Develop an audit and accountability program;
(c) Screen, prioritize, and approve grant applications; and
(d) Monitor compliance by grant recipients.
(((5))) (3) The department of natural resources, the department of
fish and wildlife, and the Washington military department are
encouraged to provide land, facilitate land exchanges, and support the
development of shooting range facilities.

PART 7
WATER TRAIL ADVISORY COMMITTEE
Sec. 701 RCW 79A.05.385 and 1993 c 182 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to its other powers, duties, and functions, the
commission may:
(1) Plan, construct, and maintain suitable facilities for water
trail activities on lands administered or acquired by the commission or
as authorized on lands administered by tribes or other public agencies
or private landowners by agreement.
(2) Provide and issue, upon payment of the proper fee, with the
assistance of those authorized agents as may be necessary for the
convenience of the public, water trail permits to utilize designated
water trail facilities. The commission may((, after consultation with
the water trail advisory committee,)) adopt rules authorizing
reciprocity of water trail permits provided by another state or
Canadian province, but only to the extent that a similar exemption or
provision for water trail permits is issued by that state or province.
(3) Compile, publish, distribute, and charge a fee for maps or
other forms of public information indicating areas and facilities
suitable for water trail activities.
(4) Contract with a public agency, private entity, or person for
the actual conduct of these duties.
(5) Work with individuals or organizations who wish to volunteer
their time to support the water trail recreation program.

Sec. 702 RCW 79A.05.400 and 1993 c 182 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
A person may not participate as a user of the water trail
recreation program without first obtaining a water trail permit. A
person must renew this permit on an annual basis in order to continue
to participate as a user of the program. The fee for the issuance of
the statewide water trail permit for each year shall be determined by
the commission ((after consultation with the water trail advisory
committee)). All statewide water trail permits shall expire on the
last day of December of the year for which the permit is issued.

Sec. 703 RCW 79A.05.410 and 1993 c 182 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
The commission may((, after consultation with the water trail
advisory committee,)) adopt rules to administer the water trail program
and facilities on areas owned or administered by the commission. Where
water trail facilities administered by other public or private entities
are incorporated into the water trail system, the rules adopted by
those entities shall prevail. The commission is not responsible or
liable for enforcement of these alternative rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 704 RCW 79A.05.420 (Water trail advisory
committee) and 2000 c 11 s 41, 1994 c 264 s 21, & 1993 c 182 s 9 are
each repealed.

PART 8
COMMUNITY OUTDOOR ATHLETIC FIELDS ADVISORY COUNCIL
Sec. 801 RCW 79A.25.800 and 2000 c 11 s 80 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that coordinated funding efforts are
needed to maintain, develop, and improve the state's community outdoor
athletic fields. Rapid population growth and increased urbanization
have caused a decline in suitable outdoor fields for community athletic
activities and has resulted in overcrowding and deterioration of
existing surfaces. Lack of adequate community outdoor athletic fields
directly affects the health and well-being of all citizens of the
state, reduces the state's economic viability, and prevents Washington
from maintaining and achieving the quality of life that it deserves.
Therefore, it is the policy of the state and its agencies to maintain,
develop, fund, and improve youth or community athletic facilities,
including but not limited to community outdoor athletic fields.
(2) In carrying out this policy, the legislature intends to promote
the building of new community outdoor athletic fields, the upgrading of
existing community outdoor athletic fields, and the maintenance of
existing community outdoor athletic fields across the state of
Washington. ((The purpose of RCW 79A.25.800 through 79A.25.830 is to
create an advisory council to provide information and advice to the
interagency committee for outdoor recreation in the distribution of the
funds in the youth athletic facility grant account established in RCW
43.99N.060(4).))

Sec. 802 RCW 79A.25.820 and 2000 c 11 s 81 are each amended to
read as follows:
Subject to available resources, the interagency committee for
outdoor recreation((, in consultation with the community outdoor
athletic fields advisory council)) may:
(1) Prepare and update a strategic plan for the development,
maintenance, and improvement of community outdoor athletic fields in
the state. In the preparation of such plan, the interagency committee
for outdoor recreation may use available data from federal, state, and
local agencies having community outdoor athletic responsibilities, user
groups, private sector interests, and the general public. The plan may
include, but is not limited to:
(a) An inventory of current community outdoor athletic fields;
(b) A forecast of demand for these fields;
(c) An identification and analysis of actual and potential funding
sources; and
(d) Other information the interagency committee for outdoor
recreation deems appropriate to carry out the purposes of RCW
79A.25.800 through 79A.25.830;
(2) Determine the eligibility requirements for cities, counties,
and qualified nonprofit organizations to access funding from the youth
athletic facility ((grant)) account created in RCW 43.99N.060(4);
(3) Encourage and provide opportunities for interagency and
regional coordination and cooperative efforts between public agencies
and between public entities and nonprofit organizations involved in the
maintenance, development, and improvement of community outdoor athletic
fields; and
(4) Create and maintain data, studies, research, and other
information relating to community outdoor athletic fields in the state,
and to encourage the exchange of this information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 803 RCW 79A.25.810 (Community outdoor athletic
fields advisory council) and 2001 c 245 s 1 & 1998 c 264 s 2 are each
repealed.

PART 9
ARTHRITIS ADVISORY GROUP
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 By July 1, 2003, the secretary of the
department of health shall abolish the arthritis advisory group.

PART 10
COMMITTEE ON TAXATION AND ADVISORY GROUP TO THE COMMITTEE ON TAXATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001 By July 1, 2003, the director of revenue
shall abolish the committee on taxation and the advisory group to the
committee on taxation created by section 137(1), chapter 371, Laws of
2002.

PART 11
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1101 PART HEADINGS NOT LAW. Part headings
used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1102 Sections 801 and 802 of this act expire
one year after RCW 82.14.0494 expires.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1103 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---