BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that prescription
drugs are an effective and important part of efforts to maintain and
improve the health of Washington state residents. Yet prescription
drug expenditures in both the public and private sectors are growing at
rates far in excess of consumer or medical inflation, placing a strain
on the ability of public and private health care purchasers to continue
to offer comprehensive health benefits coverage. In addition,
inappropriate use of prescription drugs can have serious health
consequences for Washington state residents.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to:
(a) Develop a comprehensive prescription drug education and
utilization system in Washington state that will ensure best
prescribing practices and pharmaceutical use, reduce administrative
burdens on providers, increase consumer understanding of and compliance
with appropriate use of prescription drugs, help to control increases
in consumer and state health care spending, and improve prescription
drug purchasing through a sound evidence-based process that evaluates
the therapeutic value and cost-effectiveness of prescription drugs; and
(b) Develop a program to promote access to affordable prescription
drug coverage to low-income aged or disabled persons who do not
otherwise have adequate coverage to purchase necessary and appropriate
prescription drugs.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.05.011 and 2001 c 165 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section shall apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Administrator" means the administrator of the authority.
(2) "State purchased health care" or "health care" means medical
and health care, pharmaceuticals, and medical equipment purchased with
state and federal funds by the department of social and health
services, the department of health, the basic health plan, the state
health care authority, the department of labor and industries, the
department of corrections, the department of veterans affairs, and
local school districts for whom the authority is providing the school
districts' health insurance programs as provided in RCW 28A.400.350.
(3) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.
(4) "Insuring entity" means an insurer as defined in chapter 48.01
RCW, a health care service contractor as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW,
or a health maintenance organization as defined in chapter 48.46 RCW.
(5) "Flexible benefit plan" means a benefit plan that allows
employees to choose the level of health care coverage provided and the
amount of employee contributions from among a range of choices offered
by the authority.
(6) "Employee" includes all full-time and career seasonal employees
of the state, whether or not covered by civil service; elected and
appointed officials of the executive branch of government, including
full-time members of boards, commissions, or committees; and includes
any or all part-time and temporary employees under the terms and
conditions established under this chapter by the authority; justices of
the supreme court and judges of the court of appeals and the superior
courts; and members of the state legislature or of the legislative
authority of any county, city, or town who are elected to office after
February 20, 1970. "Employee" also includes: (a) Employees of a
county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state if
the legislative authority of the county, municipality, or other
political subdivision of the state seeks and receives the approval of
the authority to provide any of its insurance programs by contract with
the authority, as provided in RCW 41.04.205; (b) employees of employee
organizations representing state civil service employees, at the option
of each such employee organization, and, effective October 1, 1995,
employees of employee organizations currently pooled with employees of
school districts for the purpose of purchasing insurance benefits, at
the option of each such employee organization; and (c) employees of a
school district if the authority agrees to provide any of the school
districts' insurance programs by contract with the authority as
provided in RCW 28A.400.350.
(7) "Board" means the public employees' benefits board established
under RCW 41.05.055.
(8) "Retired or disabled school employee" means:
(a) Persons who separated from employment with a school district or
educational service district and are receiving a retirement allowance
under chapter 41.32 or 41.40 RCW as of September 30, 1993;
(b) Persons who separate from employment with a school district or
educational service district on or after October 1, 1993, and
immediately upon separation receive a retirement allowance under
chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW;
(c) Persons who separate from employment with a school district or
educational service district due to a total and permanent disability,
and are eligible to receive a deferred retirement allowance under
chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW.
(9) "Benefits contribution plan" means a premium only contribution
plan, a medical flexible spending arrangement, or a cafeteria plan
whereby state and public employees may agree to a contribution to
benefit costs which will allow the employee to participate in benefits
offered pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or other sections of the
internal revenue code.
(10) "Salary" means a state employee's monthly salary or wages.
(11) "Participant" means an individual who fulfills the eligibility
and enrollment requirements under the benefits contribution plan.
(12) "Plan year" means the time period established by the
authority.
(13) "Separated employees" means persons who separate from
employment with an employer as defined in:
(a) RCW 41.32.010(11) on or after July 1, 1996; or
(b) RCW 41.35.010 on or after September 1, 2000; or
(c) RCW 41.40.010 on or after March 1, 2002;
and who are at least age fifty-five and have at least ten years of
service under the teachers' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW
41.32.010(40), the Washington school employees' retirement system plan
3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010, or the public employees' retirement
system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.40.010.
(14) "Emergency service personnel killed in the line of duty" means
law enforcement officers and fire fighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030,
and reserve officers and fire fighters as defined in RCW 41.24.010 who
die as a result of injuries sustained in the course of employment as
determined consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and
industries.
(15) "Prescription drug board" means the prescription drug quality
improvement and purchasing board created in section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The prescription drug quality improvement and purchasing board
is created within the authority. The function of the prescription drug
board is to design and approve policies and programs related to
prescription drugs for public and private participants in the
purchasing consortium established under section 4 of this act.
(2) The prescription drug board shall be composed of thirteen
members selected as provided in this subsection.
(a) The governor shall select one member of the prescription drug
board from lists of three nominees submitted by statewide organizations
representing each of the following:
(i) One representative of state employees, who represents an
employee union certified as exclusive representative of at least one
bargaining unit of classified employees;
(ii) One member who is a licensed physician;
(iii) One member who is a licensed pharmacist;
(iv) One member representing a health carrier licensed under Title
48 RCW; and
(v) One member representing a private union;
(b) The governor shall select two members of the prescription drug
board from a list of nominees submitted by statewide organizations
representing consumers, one of whom shall represent individuals under
age sixty-five without insurance coverage for prescription drugs and
one of whom shall represent individuals over age sixty-five without
insurance coverage for prescription drugs;
(c) The governor shall select two members of the prescription drug
board from a list of nominees submitted by statewide organizations
representing business, one of whom shall represent small businesses who
employ fifty or fewer employees and one of whom shall represent large
businesses;
(d) The governor shall select one member who is versed in biologic
medicine through research or academia from the University of Washington
or Washington State University;
(e) One member shall be the secretary of the department of social
and health services or his or her designee;
(f) One member shall be the director of the department of labor and
industries or his or her designee; and
(g) One member shall be the administrator.
(3) The members who represent the organizations appointed pursuant
to subsection (2)(a)(v) and (c) of this section shall be nonvoting
members until such time as there are no less than twelve thousand
participants enrolled with the authority for prescription drug
purchasing from each of the organizations they are appointed to
represent.
(4) The governor shall appoint the initial members of the
prescription drug board to staggered terms not to exceed four years.
Members appointed thereafter shall serve two-year terms. Members of
the prescription drug board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW
43.03.250 and shall be reimbursed for their travel expenses while on
official business in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The
administrator, on behalf of the prescription drug board, shall
prescribe
rules for the conduct of its business. The administrator
shall serve as chair of the prescription drug board. Meetings of the
prescription drug board shall be at the call of the chair.
(5) Members of the prescription drug board are immune from civil
liability for any official acts performed in good faith as members of
the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The prescription drug board shall, directly or by contract:
(a) Adopt a preferred drug list for use as provided in this act
through the establishment of a pharmacy and therapeutics committee.
(i) The pharmacy and therapeutics committee shall be comprised of
practicing licensed physicians, other practicing licensed health
professionals with prescriptive authority, practicing licensed
pharmacists, and pharmacoeconomists. At least one licensed health
professional with prescriptive authority and one pharmacist must have
demonstrated experience in serving women, children, and people of
color. The membership composition must be consistent with applicable
federal requirements under Title XIX of the federal social security act
to allow full participation by the department of social and health
services or other state agencies in activities under this act.
(ii) The pharmacy and therapeutics committee shall review
nationally recognized therapeutic drug classes. The committee must use
an evidence-based process that evaluates the efficacy of prescription
drugs, considering safety, efficacy, likelihood of compliance,
outcomes, and any unique impacts on specific populations based upon
factors such as sex, age, ethnicity, race, or disability. For each
therapeutic class reviewed, the committee must identify the
prescription drugs determined to be most clinically effective, and if
applicable, equally effective. Decisions of the pharmacy and
therapeutics committee regarding the clinical effectiveness of drugs
within a therapeutic class are binding on the prescription drug board.
If a substantial number of prescribers in a peer group are
frequently prescribing nonpreferred drugs in one or more therapeutic
classes, the administrator must provide the pharmacy and therapeutics
committee with information on these prescribing patterns to enable the
committee to review their decisions related to the affected therapeutic
classes.
(iii) State purchased health care programs shall adopt the
preferred drug list established by the prescription drug board for
those components of their programs that purchase prescription drugs
directly or through reimbursement of retail pharmacies consistent with
the scope of benefits offered through those programs. In administering
prescription drug benefits under state purchased health care programs,
agencies shall honor an endorsing prescriber's direction to dispense a
prescription drug as written on the prescription order or to continue
therapy with the drug classes included in section 12 of this act.
(iv) Within one hundred twenty days following establishment of the
pharmacy and therapeutics committee, the drug utilization and education
council within the department of social and health services shall be
disbanded and its functions transferred to the pharmacy and
therapeutics committee.
(v) If a particular class of drugs is being used in a disease
management program sponsored by a state purchased health care program,
efforts shall be made to ensure that the preferred drugs in that class
are consistent with protocols or algorithms used in the disease
management program.
(vi) Members of the pharmacy and therapeutics committee are immune
from civil liability for any official acts performed in good faith as
members of the committee;
(b) Establish drug utilization management policies. State
purchased health care programs shall adopt these drug utilization
management policies consistent with the scope of benefits offered and
populations served through programs administered by that program and
may implement the policies directly or by contract or interagency
agreement. To ensure full participation by the department of social
and health services in drug utilization management activities under
this act, the policies must be consistent with drug utilization review
requirements of Title XIX of the federal social security act. The
pharmacy and therapeutics committee shall conduct drug utilization
management activities for state purchased health care programs and the
consortium as directed by the prescription drug board;
(c) Develop prescriber and consumer education policies. State
purchased health care programs shall adopt these prescriber and
consumer
policies and implement them directly or by contract or
interagency agreement. Effective prescriber education policies are
intended to result in better compliance of prescribers with the
preferred drug list and increased cost savings. Prescriber education
policies should be adequately funded and designed to educate
prescribers to prevent use of more expensive prescription drugs of no
greater clinical benefit, to increase prescribers' awareness of the
preferred drug list and the credible evidence-based process used to
develop it, and the ability to direct that prescriptions be dispensed
as written;
(d) Adopt policies necessary for establishment of a prescription
drug purchasing consortium. The administrator shall implement the
prescription drug purchasing consortium policies adopted by the board,
and shall coordinate state purchased health care programs'
participation in the consortium. State purchased health care programs
shall purchase prescription drugs through the consortium for those
prescription drugs that are purchased directly by the state and those
that are purchased through reimbursement of retail pharmacies, unless
exempted under section 13 of this act. The administrator shall not
require that any supplemental rebate offered by a pharmaceutical
manufacturer for prescription drugs purchased for medical assistance
program clients under chapter 74.09 RCW be extended to state purchased
health care programs other than medical assistance, or to private
individuals or entities participating in the consortium. The
prescription drug board and the administrator shall explore joint
purchasing opportunities with other states to achieve quality cost-effective prescription drug coverage for those participating in the
consortium.
(2) Participation in the purchasing consortium and other
prescription drug board activities is purely voluntary for units of
local government, private entities, and individuals who lack or are
underinsured for prescription drug coverage. Unaffiliated individuals
who participate in the consortium shall receive reduced costs
comparable to those negotiated by the consortium for its preferred
prescription drugs. The prescription drug board may set reasonable
fees, including enrollment fees for participating individuals, to cover
administrative costs attributable to participation of private entities
in prescription drug board activities. A private entity may limit its
participation to one or more of the prescription drug board's program
components.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
Members of the prescription drug board, the pharmacy and
therapeutics committee, or any committee that may be established to
carry out activities under this act are prohibited from being employed
by a pharmaceutical manufacturer, a pharmacy benefits management
company, or be employed by any agency administering state purchased
health care programs, except as specified in section 3(2) (e), (f), and
(g) of this act. As a condition of appointment to the prescription
drug board or any committee, each member must disclose any potential
conflict of interest, including receipt of any remuneration, grants, or
other compensation from a pharmaceutical manufacturer or pharmaceutical
benefits management company.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
The administrator shall:
(1) Directly or by interagency agreement or contract, distribute
the initial preferred drug list and any subsequent revisions to every
provider with prescriptive authority, including with it a description
of how the list was developed, how it will be used, and requesting his
or her endorsement;
(2) Obtain in writing from all prescribers either: (a) An
affirmative statement endorsing the preferred drug list and
acknowledging the therapeutic substitution authority granted to
pharmacists when there is no direction to dispense the prescription as
written, or (b) a statement declining to endorse the preferred drug
list; and
(3) Provide each pharmacy with a listing of the prescribers who
have not endorsed the preferred drug list.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent funds are appropriated specifically for this
purpose, and subject to any conditions placed on appropriations made
for this purpose, the department shall design the medicaid prescription
drug assistance program. Neither the benefits of, nor eligibility for,
the program is considered to be an entitlement.
(2) The department is directed to obtain necessary federal waivers
to implement this program. Consistent with federal waiver conditions,
the department is authorized to charge enrollment fees, premiums, or
point-of-service cost-sharing to enrollees of the program.
(3) Eligibility for this program is limited to persons: (a) Who
are eligible for medicare or age sixty-five and older; (b) whose family
income does not exceed two hundred percent of the federal poverty level
as adjusted for family size and determined annually by the federal
department of health and human services; (c) who do not otherwise have
insurance that provides prescription drug coverage; and (d) who are not
otherwise eligible under Title XIX of the federal social security act.
(4) The department is authorized to use a cost-effective
prescription drug benefit design. Consistent with federal waiver
conditions, this benefit design can be different than the benefit
design offered under the medical assistance program. The benefit
design may include a deductible benefit that provides coverage when
enrollees incur higher prescription drug costs as defined by the
department. The department also may offer more than one benefit
design.
(5) The department is authorized to limit enrollment of persons who
qualify for the program so as to prevent an overexpenditure of
appropriations for this program or to assure necessary compliance with
federal waiver budget neutrality requirements. The department shall
not reduce existing medical assistance program eligibility or benefits
to assure compliance with federal waiver budget neutrality
requirements.
(6) No funds from an approved federal waiver that allows for the
collection of premiums from medicaid clients will be used to finance
the medicaid prescription drug assistance program.
(7) This program will be terminated within twelve months after
implementation of a prescription drug benefit under Title XVIII of the
social security act.
(8) The department shall provide recommendations to the appropriate
committees of the senate and house of representatives by November 15,
2003, on financing options available to support the medicaid
prescription drug assistance program. In recommending financing
options, the department shall explore every opportunity to maximize
federal funding to support the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
The administrator shall, directly or by interagency agreement or
contract, establish and operate a statewide senior prescription drug
information clearinghouse. The clearinghouse shall:
(1) Promote access to necessary prescription drugs for persons over
age sixty-five who reside in Washington state;
(2) Make information available on a statewide basis regarding
private and public programs that provide financial assistance to
seniors for the purchase of prescription drugs;
(3) Provide educational information about the preferred drug list
and methods to purchase prescription drugs most cost-effectively and
efficiently, including information about generic drugs and the
potential for dangerous drug interactions; and
(4) Provide individual education and assistance regarding
prescription drug financial assistance programs.
Prior to July 1, 2005, the administrator shall provide for an
evaluation of the effectiveness and potential continuation of the
clearinghouse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
The prescription drug consortium account is created in the custody
of the state treasurer. All receipts from the fees from the
prescription drug purchasing consortium created in section 4 of this
act must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account
may be used only for the purposes of section 4 of this act. Only the
administrator or the administrator's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section
is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
The prescription drug board and the administrator may solicit and
accept grants or other funds from public and private sources to support
activities under this act, including but not limited to consumer and
provider education. Any grants or funds received may be used to
enhance these activities as long as program standards established by
the prescription drug board and the administrator are maintained.
Except for supplemental rebates, no money from the pharmaceutical
industry shall be used to support the activities under this act.
Private foundations shall be prohibited from passing through funding
from a pharmaceutical manufacturer when it gives the appearance of a
conflict of interest or an attempt to exert undue influence on the
implementation of this act. The administrator shall report to the
appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives on
any grants or funds received under this section within thirty days of
their receipt.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
The administrator shall contract with an independent entity to
evaluate the implementation and impacts of the prescription drug
board's activities under this act.
(1) The evaluation shall assess:
(a) The degree to which the program has influenced prescription
drug prescribing practices among health care providers in Washington,
including a description of how prescribing practices may have changed;
(b) The impact of the program on quality of care and clinical
outcomes for persons enrolled in state purchased health care programs;
(c) The extent to which the program has lessened administrative
burdens on health care providers participating in state purchased
health care programs;
(d) The impact of the program on prescription drug expenditures
across state purchased health care programs; and
(e) The impact of the program on the utilization of, and
expenditures for, other health care services funded by state purchased
health care programs.
(2) The administrator shall make every effort to pursue and obtain
federal or private foundation funding for the evaluation from entities
such as the federal agency for health care research and quality or the
Milbank memorial fund. To ensure that results of the evaluation are
objective and unbiased, private foundation funds derived from the
pharmaceutical industry may not be used to fund the evaluation.
(3) The results of the evaluation must be submitted to the governor
and the legislature by January 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 69.41 RCW
to read as follows:
Any pharmacist filling a prescription under the preferred drug list
program established under section 4 of this act shall substitute the
preferred drug for any nonpreferred drug in a given therapeutic
category, unless:
(1) The endorsing prescriber has indicated on the prescription that
the nonpreferred drug must be dispensed as written; or
(2) The prescription is for a refill of an antipsychotic,
antidepressant, chemotherapy, antiretroviral, or immunosuppressive
drug, in which case the pharmacist shall dispense the nonpreferred drug
as written. When a substitution is made, on a new prescription or as
a result of a change in the preferred drug within a therapeutic class,
the prescriber must be notified in writing by the dispensing pharmacist
of the specific drug and dose dispensed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in this act preempts state-owned or managed hospitals
licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW from aggregate purchasing through
other programs. These hospitals may choose to participate in the
preferred drug list program under section 4 of this act if drugs can be
obtained at lower cost.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
This act does not apply to state purchased health care services
that are purchased from or through health carriers as defined in RCW
48.43.005, or group model health maintenance organizations that are
accredited by the national committee for quality assurance. The
administrator shall exempt those prescribers that practice in a group
model health maintenance organization that is accredited by the
national committee for quality assurance from the endorsement
provisions of section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The therapeutic consultation service
operated by the department of social and health services, with the
exception of the intensive benefits management and academic detailing
components of the program, expires on July 1, 2005. However, the
department shall terminate the therapeutic consultation service four
brand limit program component earlier if, upon monitoring prescriber
compliance with the preferred drug list and trends in the therapeutic
consultation service four brand limit program component, the department
determines the number of pharmacy claims that trigger the four brand
edit exception under therapeutic consultation services is below the
threshold indicated in the biennial omnibus operating budget bill for
three consecutive months. The threshold shall represent the point
where the legislature determines that anticipated savings associated
with the therapeutic consultation service four brand limit program
component no longer justify its operation due to the implementation of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
The health care authority, on behalf of the prescription drug
board, and agencies that administer state purchased health care
programs are authorized to adopt rules implementing this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 If specific funding for this act
referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June
30, 2003, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---