BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.60.010 and 1999 c 143 s 38 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following definitions and the definitions of RCW 9A.56.010 are
applicable in this chapter unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Written instrument" means: (a) Any paper, document, or other
instrument containing written or printed matter or its equivalent; or
(b) any access device, token, stamp, seal, badge, trademark, or other
evidence or symbol of value, right, privilege, or identification;
(2) "Complete written instrument" means one which is fully drawn
with respect to every essential feature thereof;
(3) "Incomplete written instrument" means one which contains some
matter by way of content or authentication but which requires
additional matter in order to render it a complete written instrument;
(4) To "falsely make" a written instrument means to make or draw a
complete or incomplete written instrument which purports to be
authentic, but which is not authentic either because the ostensible
maker is fictitious or because, if real, he did not authorize the
making or drawing thereof;
(5) To "falsely complete" a written instrument means to transform
an incomplete written instrument into a complete one by adding or
inserting matter, without the authority of anyone entitled to grant it;
(6) To "falsely alter" a written instrument means to change,
without authorization by anyone entitled to grant it, a written
instrument, whether complete or incomplete, by means of erasure,
obliteration, deletion, insertion of new matter, transposition of
matter, or in any other manner;
(7) "Forged instrument" means a written instrument which has been
falsely made, completed, or altered;
(8) "Elderly person" means a person sixty years of age or older.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9A.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When any person is found guilty of having committed an offense
against an elderly person under this chapter, the court shall assess a
penalty. The assessment shall be in addition to any other penalty or
fine imposed by law and shall be in the amount of up to ten thousand
dollars for a felony offense and up to five thousand dollars for a
nonfelony offense.
(2) Money collected under subsection (1) of this section shall be
paid by the clerk of the court to the county treasurer who shall
monthly transmit the money to the state treasurer for deposit as
follows:
(a) Fifty percent of the money shall be deposited in the violence
reduction and drug enforcement account under RCW 69.50.520; and
(b) Fifty percent of the money shall be deposited in the public
safety and education account under RCW 43.08.250, to be used solely for
the crime victims' compensation program.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.86.010 and 1961 c 216 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Person" shall include, where applicable, natural persons,
corporations, trusts, unincorporated associations and partnerships.
(2) "Trade" and "commerce" shall include the sale of assets or
services, and any commerce directly or indirectly affecting the people
of the state of Washington.
(3) "Assets" shall include any property, tangible or intangible,
real, personal, or mixed, and wherever situate, and any other thing of
value.
(4) "Elderly person" means a person sixty years of age or older.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 19.86 RCW
to read as follows:
A person who violates or causes another to violate a provision of
this chapter shall pay to the general fund a civil penalty of not more
than ten thousand dollars for each violation if the violation was
committed against an elderly person. A violation of a provision of
this chapter constitutes a separate violation with respect to each
elderly person involved.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 19.86 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Proceeds traceable to or derived from specified unlawful
activity or a violation of this chapter are subject to seizure and
forfeiture if the violation was committed against an elderly person.
The attorney general or county prosecuting attorney may file a civil
action for the forfeiture of proceeds. Unless otherwise provided for
under this section, no property rights exist in these proceeds. All
right, title, and interest in the proceeds vests in the governmental
entity of which the seizing law enforcement agency is a part upon
commission of the act or omission giving rise to forfeiture under this
section.
(2) Real or personal property subject to forfeiture under this
chapter may be seized by any law enforcement officer of this state upon
process issued by a superior court that has jurisdiction over the
property. An agency seizing real property shall file a lis pendens
concerning the property. Real property seized under this section shall
not be transferred or otherwise conveyed until ninety days after
seizure or until a judgment of forfeiture is entered, whichever is
later. Real property seized under this section may be transferred or
conveyed to a person or entity who acquires title by foreclosure or
deed in lieu of foreclosure of a security interest. Seizure of
personal property without process may be made if:
(a) The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search
warrant; or
(b) The property subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior
judgment in favor of the state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture
proceeding based upon this chapter.
(3) A seizure under subsection (2) of this section commences
proceedings for forfeiture. The law enforcement agency under whose
authority the seizure was made shall cause notice of the seizure and
intended forfeiture of the seized proceeds to be served within fifteen
days after the seizure on the owner of the property seized and the
person in charge thereof and any person who has a known right or
interest therein, including a community property interest. Service of
notice of seizure of real property shall be made according to the rules
of civil procedure. However, the state may not obtain a default
judgment with respect to real property against a party who is served by
substituted service absent an affidavit stating that a good faith
effort has been made to ascertain if the defaulted party is
incarcerated within the state, and that there is no present basis to
believe that the party is incarcerated within the state. The notice of
seizure in other cases may be served by any method authorized by law or
court rule including but not limited to service by certified mail with
return receipt requested. Service by mail is complete upon mailing
within the fifteen-day period after the seizure.
(4) If no person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in
writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of
the property within forty-five days of the seizure in the case of
personal property and ninety days in the case of real property, the
property seized shall be deemed forfeited. The community property
interest in real property of a person whose spouse committed a
violation giving rise to seizure of the real property may not be
forfeited if the person did not participate in the violation.
(5) If a person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in
writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of
property within forty-five days of the seizure in the case of personal
property and ninety days in the case of real property, the person or
persons shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to be heard as to
the claim or right. The provisions of RCW 69.50.505(e) shall apply to
any such hearing. The seizing law enforcement agency shall promptly
return property to the claimant upon the direction of the
administrative law judge or court.
(6) Disposition of forfeited property shall be made in the manner
provided for in RCW 69.50.505 (h), (i), and (n).
(7) Forfeited property and net proceeds not required to be paid to
the state treasurer shall be retained by the seizing law enforcement
agency exclusively for the expansion and improvement of consumer
protection-related law enforcement activity. Money retained under this
section may not be used to supplant preexisting fund sources.

--- END ---