BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.005 and 1997 c 66 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this chapter relating to the operation of
vehicles refer exclusively to the operation of vehicles upon highways
except:
(1) Where a different place is specifically referred to in a given
section.
(2) The provisions of RCW 46.52.010 through 46.52.090, 46.61.500
through 46.61.525, and 46.61.5249 shall apply upon highways and
elsewhere throughout the state.
(3)(a) Speeding violations under RCW 46.61.400 that occur on the
private roads within a community organized under chapter 64.38 RCW,
provided that:
(i) A majority of the homeowner's association's board of directors
of a community organized under chapter 64.38 RCW votes to authorize the
issuance of speeding infractions on its private roads, and declares a
speed limit not lower than twenty miles per hour;
(ii) The president of the homeowner's association sends a notarized
letter explaining the vote to the top law enforcement official of the
city or county within whose jurisdiction the private road is located;
(iii) The homeowner's association has provided written notice to
all of the homeowners describing the new authority to issue speeding
infractions; and
(iv) Signs have been posted declaring the speed limit at all
vehicle entrances to the community.
(b) The authorizing vote described in (a) of this subsection may be
repealed by a majority vote of the homeowner's association's board of
directors of a community organized under chapter 64.38 RCW any time
after two years have lapsed from the date the infraction authority was
voted on by the homeowner's association's board of directors. The
repeal shall take effect seven days from the date that the top law
enforcement official of the city or county whose jurisdiction the
private road is located receives a notarized letter from the president
of the homeowner's association. The letter shall document the vote
repealing the authority to issue speeding infractions. Nothing in this
subsection (3) requires law enforcement to expend additional resources
to enforce speeding violations on private roads.

--- END ---