BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.320.110 and 2002 c 371 s 912 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is created a local fund known as the "financial services
regulation fund" which shall consist of all moneys received by the
divisions of the department of financial institutions, except for the
division of securities which shall deposit thirteen percent of all
moneys received, except as provided in section 2 of this act, and which
shall be used for the purchase of supplies and necessary equipment; the
payment of salaries, wages, and utilities; the establishment of
reserves; and other incidental costs required for the proper regulation
of individuals and entities subject to regulation by the department.
The state treasurer shall be the custodian of the fund. Disbursements
from the fund shall be on authorization of the director of financial
institutions or the director's designee. In order to maintain an
effective expenditure and revenue control, the fund shall be subject in
all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required to
permit expenditures and payment of obligations from the fund.
((Between July 1, 2001, and December 31, 2001, the legislature may
transfer up to two million dollars from the financial services
regulation fund to the digital government revolving account. During
the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the
financial services regulation fund to the state general fund such
amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund and
appropriations reductions made by the 2002 supplemental appropriations
act for administrative efficiencies and savings.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.320 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The securities prosecution fund is created in the custody of
the state treasurer and shall consist of all fines received by the
division of securities under RCW 21.20.400(2), 21.20.110, and 21.20.395
and all undistributed funds from orders of disgorgement and restitution
under RCW 21.20.110(8) and 21.20.390(6). No appropriation is required
to permit expenditures from this fund, but the account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.
(2) Expenditures from this fund may be used solely for
administering the fund and for payment of costs, expenses, and charges
incurred in the preparation, initiation, and prosecution of criminal
charges for violations of chapters 21.20, 21.30, 19.100, and 19.110
RCW. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the fund.
(3) Applications for fund expenditures must be submitted by the
attorney general or the proper prosecuting attorney to the director.
The application must clearly identify the alleged criminal violations
identified in subsection (2) of this section and indicate the purpose
for which the funds will be used. The application must also certify
that any funds received will be expended only for the purpose
requested. Funding requests must be approved by the director prior to
any expenditure being incurred by the requesting attorney general or
prosecuting attorney. At the conclusion of the prosecution, the
attorney general or prosecuting attorney shall provide the director
with an accounting of fund expenditures, a summary of the case, and
certify his or her compliance with any rules adopted by the director
relating to the administration of the fund.
(4) If the balance of the securities prosecution fund reaches one
million dollars, all fines received by the division of securities under
RCW 21.20.400(2), 21.20.110, and 21.20.395 and all undistributed funds
from orders of disgorgement and restitution under RCW 21.20.110(8) and
21.20.390(6) shall be deposited in the financial services regulation
fund until such time as the balance in the fund falls below one million
dollars, at which time the fines received by the division of securities
under RCW 21.20.400(2), 21.20.110, and 21.20.395 and all undistributed
funds from orders of disgorgement and restitution under RCW
21.20.110(8) and 21.20.390(6) shall be deposited to the securities
prosecution fund until balance in the fund once again reaches one
million dollars.

Sec. 3 RCW 21.20.400 and 1979 ex.s. c 68 s 28 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any person who willfully violates any provision of this chapter
except RCW 21.20.350, or who willfully violates any rule or order under
this chapter, or who willfully violates RCW 21.20.350 knowing the
statement made to be false or misleading in any material respect,
((shall upon conviction be fined not more than five thousand dollars or
imprisoned not more than ten years, or both; but no)) is guilty of a
class B felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021(1)(b). However, a person
may not be imprisoned for the violation of any rule or order if that
person proves that he or she had no knowledge of the rule or order.
(2) Any person who knowingly alters, destroys, shreds, mutilates,
or conceals a record, document, or other object, or attempts to do so,
with the intent to impair the object's integrity or availability for
use in an official proceeding under this chapter, is guilty of a class
B felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021(1)(b) or punishable by a fine
of not more than five hundred thousand dollars, or both. The fines
paid under this subsection shall be deposited into the securities
prosecution fund.
(3) No indictment or information may be returned under this chapter
more than (a) five years after the ((alleged)) violation, or (b) three
years after the actual discovery of the violation, whichever date of
limitation is later.

Sec. 4 RCW 21.20.410 and 1998 c 15 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director may refer such evidence as may be available
concerning violations of this chapter or of any rule or order hereunder
to the attorney general or the proper prosecuting attorney, who may in
his or her discretion, with or without such a reference, institute the
appropriate criminal proceedings under this chapter.
(2) The director may render such assistance as the prosecuting
attorney requests regarding a reference.
(3) The attorney general or the proper prosecuting attorney may
request that an attorney employed by the director prosecute or assist
in the prosecution of the violation or violations on behalf of the
state. The attorney general or prosecuting attorney may appoint an
employee approved by the director to serve as a special prosecuting
attorney with the powers and duties prescribed by law and delegated by
the attorney general or prosecuting attorney. The appointed attorney
shall serve without compensation from the attorney general or
prosecuting attorney.

Sec. 5 RCW 21.20.110 and 2002 c 65 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director may by order deny, suspend, revoke, restrict,
condition, or limit any application or registration of any broker-dealer, salesperson, investment adviser representative, or investment
adviser; or censure or fine the registrant or an officer, director,
partner, or person ((occupying)) performing similar functions for a
registrant; if the director finds that the order is in the public
interest and that the applicant or registrant or, in the case of a
broker-dealer or investment adviser, any partner, officer, director, or
person ((occupying)) performing similar functions:
(a) Has filed an application for registration under this section
which, as of its effective date, or as of any date after filing in the
case of an order denying effectiveness, was incomplete in any material
respect or contained any statement which was, in the light of the
circumstances under which it was made, false, or misleading with
respect to any material fact;
(b) Has willfully violated or willfully failed to comply with any
provision of this chapter or a predecessor act or any rule or order
under this chapter or a predecessor act, or any provision of chapter
21.30 RCW or any rule or order thereunder;
(c) Has been convicted, within the past ten years, of any
misdemeanor involving a security, or a commodity contract or commodity
option as defined in RCW 21.30.010, or any aspect of the securities,
commodities, business investments, franchises, business opportunities,
insurance, banking, or finance business, or any felony involving moral
turpitude;
(d) Is permanently or temporarily enjoined or restrained by any
court of competent jurisdiction in an action brought by the director,
a state, or a federal government agency from engaging in or continuing
any conduct or practice involving any aspect of the securities,
commodities, business investments, franchises, business opportunities,
insurance, banking, or finance business;
(e) Is the subject of an order entered after notice and opportunity
for hearing:
(i) By the securities administrator of a state or by the Securities
and Exchange Commission denying, revoking, barring, or suspending
registration as a broker-dealer, salesperson, investment adviser, or
investment adviser representative;
(ii) By the securities administrator of a state or by the
Securities and Exchange Commission ((sanctioning)) against a broker-dealer ((or an)), salesperson, investment adviser, or an investment
adviser representative;
(iii) By the Securities and Exchange Commission or self-regulatory
organization suspending or expelling the registrant from membership in
a self-regulatory organization; or
(iv) By a court adjudicating a United States Postal Service fraud;
The director may not commence a revocation or suspension proceeding
more than one year after the date of the order relied on. The director
may not enter an order on the basis of an order under another state
securities act unless that order was based on facts that would
constitute a ground for an order under this section;
(f) Is the subject of an order, adjudication, or determination,
after notice and opportunity for hearing, by the Securities and
Exchange Commission, the Commodities Futures Trading Commission, the
Federal Trade Commission, or a securities or insurance regulator of any
state that the person has ((willfully)) violated the Securities Act of
1933, the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Investment Advisers Act
of 1940, the Investment Company Act of 1940, the Commodities Exchange
Act, the securities, insurance, or commodities law of any state, or a
federal or state law under which a business involving investments,
franchises, business opportunities, insurance, banking, or finance is
regulated;
(g) Has engaged in dishonest or unethical practices in the
securities or commodities business;
(h) Is insolvent, either in the sense that his or her liabilities
exceed his or her assets or in the sense that he or she cannot meet his
or her obligations as they mature; but the director may not enter an
order against an applicant or registrant under this subsection (1)(h)
without a finding of insolvency as to the applicant or registrant;
(i) Has not complied with a condition imposed by the director under
RCW 21.20.100, or is not qualified on the basis of such factors as
training, experience, or knowledge of the securities business, except
as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section;
(j) Has failed to supervise reasonably a salesperson or an
investment adviser representative, or employee, if the salesperson,
investment adviser representative, or employee was subject to the
person's supervision and committed a violation of this chapter or a
rule adopted or order issued under this chapter. For the purposes of
this subsection, no person fails to supervise reasonably another
person, if:
(i) There are established procedures, and a system for applying
those procedures, that would reasonably be expected to prevent and
detect, insofar as practicable, any violation by another person of this
chapter, or a rule or order under this chapter; and
(ii) The supervising person has reasonably discharged the duties
and obligations required by these procedures and system without
reasonable cause to believe that another person was violating this
chapter or rules or orders under this chapter;
(k) Has failed to pay the proper filing fee within thirty days
after being notified by the director of a deficiency, but the director
shall vacate an order under this subsection (1)(k) when the deficiency
is corrected;
(l) Within the past ten years has been found, after notice and
opportunity for a hearing to have:
(i) ((Willfully)) Violated the law of a foreign jurisdiction
governing or regulating the business of securities, commodities,
insurance, or banking;
(ii) Been the subject of an order of a securities regulator of a
foreign jurisdiction denying, revoking, or suspending the right to
engage in the business of securities as a broker-dealer, agent,
investment adviser, or investment adviser representative; or
(iii) Been suspended or expelled from membership by a securities
exchange or securities association operating under the authority of the
securities regulator of a foreign jurisdiction;
(m) Is the subject of a cease and desist order issued by the
Securities and Exchange Commission or issued under the securities or
commodities laws of a state; or
(n) Refuses to allow or otherwise impedes the director from
conducting an audit, examination, or inspection, or refuses access to
any branch office or business location to conduct an audit,
examination, or inspection.
(2) The director, by rule or order, may require that an
examination, including an examination developed or approved by an
organization of securities administrators, be taken by any class of or
all applicants. The director, by rule or order, may waive the
examination as to a person or class of persons if the administrator
determines that the examination is not necessary or appropriate in the
public interest or for the protection of investors.
(3) The director may issue a summary order pending final
determination of a proceeding under this section upon a finding that it
is in the public interest and necessary or appropriate for the
protection of investors.
(4) The director may not impose a fine under this section except
after notice and opportunity for hearing. The fine imposed under this
section may not exceed ((five)) ten thousand dollars for each act or
omission that constitutes the basis for issuing the order. If a
petition for judicial review has not been timely filed under RCW
34.05.542(2), a certified copy of the director's order requiring
payment of the fine may be filed in the office of the clerk of the
superior court in any county of this state. The clerk shall treat the
order of the director in the same manner as a judgment of the superior
court. The director's order so filed has the same effect as a judgment
of the superior court and may be recorded, enforced, or satisfied in
like manner.
(5) Withdrawal from registration as a broker-dealer, salesperson,
investment adviser, or investment adviser representative becomes
effective thirty days after receipt of an application to withdraw or
within such shorter period as the administrator determines, unless a
revocation or suspension proceeding is pending when the application is
filed. If a proceeding is pending, withdrawal becomes effective upon
such conditions as the director, by order, determines. If no
proceeding is pending or commenced and withdrawal automatically becomes
effective, the administrator may nevertheless commence a revocation or
suspension proceeding under subsection (1)(b) of this section within
one year after withdrawal became effective and enter a revocation or
suspension order as of the last date on which registration was
effective.
(6) A person who, directly or indirectly, controls a person not in
compliance with any part of this section may also be sanctioned to the
same extent as the noncomplying person, unless the controlling person
acted in good faith and did not directly or indirectly induce the
conduct constituting the violation or cause of action.
(7) In any action under subsection (1) of this section, the
director may charge the costs, fees, and other expenses incurred by the
director in the conduct of any administrative investigation, hearing,
or court proceeding against any person found to be in violation of any
provision of this section or any rule or order adopted under this
section.
(8) In any action under subsection (1) of this section, the
director may enter an order requiring an accounting, restitution, and
disgorgement, including interest at the legal rate under RCW
4.56.110(3). The director may by rule or order provide for payments to
investors, rates of interest, periods of accrual, and other matters the
director deems appropriate to implement this subsection.
(9) The director shall immediately suspend the license or
certificate of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW
74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person
who is not in compliance with a support order. If the person has
continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the
suspension, reissuance of the license or certificate shall be automatic
upon the director's receipt of a release issued by the department of
social and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance
with the order.

Sec. 6 RCW 21.20.390 and 1995 c 46 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever it appears to the director that any person has engaged or
is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of
any provision of this chapter or any rule or order hereunder, the
director may in his or her discretion:
(1) Issue an order directing the person to cease and desist from
continuing the act or practice and to take appropriate affirmative
action within a reasonable period of time, as prescribed by the
director, to correct conditions resulting from the act or practice
including, without limitation, a requirement to provide restitution((:
PROVIDED, That)). Reasonable notice of and opportunity for a hearing
shall be given((: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That)). The director may issue
a ((temporary)) summary order pending the hearing which shall remain in
effect until ten days after the hearing is held and which shall become
final if the person to whom notice is addressed does not request a
hearing within ((fifteen)) twenty days after the receipt of notice; or
(2) The director may without issuing a cease and desist order,
bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin any
such acts or practices and to enforce compliance with this chapter or
any rule or order ((hereunder)) adopted under this chapter. The court
may grant such ancillary relief, including a civil penalty,
restitution, and disgorgement, as it deems appropriate. Upon a proper
showing a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or writ
of mandamus shall be granted and a receiver or conservator may be
appointed for the defendant or the defendant's assets. The director
may not be required to post a bond. If the director prevails, the
director shall be entitled to a reasonable attorney's fee to be fixed
by the court.
(3) Whenever it appears to the director that any person who has
received a permit to issue, sell, or otherwise dispose of securities
under this chapter, whether current or otherwise, has become insolvent,
the director may petition a court of competent jurisdiction to appoint
a receiver or conservator for the defendant or the defendant's assets.
The director may not be required to post a bond.
(4) The director may bring an action for restitution or damages on
behalf of the persons injured by a violation of this chapter, if the
court finds that private civil action would be so burdensome or
expensive as to be impractical.
(5) In any action under this section, the director may charge the
costs, fees, and other expenses incurred by the director in the conduct
of any administrative investigation, hearing, or court proceeding
against any person found to be in violation of any provision of this
section or any rule or order adopted under this section.
(6) In any action under subsection (1) of this section, the
director may enter an order requiring an accounting, restitution, and
disgorgement, including interest at the legal rate under RCW
4.56.110(3). The director may by rule or order provide for payments to
investors, interest rates, periods of accrual, and other matters the
director deems appropriate to implement this subsection.

Sec. 7 RCW 21.20.395 and 1998 c 15 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person who, in an administrative action by the director, is
found to have knowingly or recklessly violated any provision of this
chapter, or any rule or order under this chapter, may be fined, after
notice and opportunity for hearing, in an amount not to exceed ((five))
ten thousand dollars for each violation.
(2) A person who, in an administrative action by the director, is
found to have knowingly or recklessly violated an administrative order
issued under RCW 21.20.110 or 21.20.390 shall pay an administrative
fine in an amount not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars for each
violation.
(3) The fines paid under subsections (1) and (2) of this section
shall be deposited into the securities prosecution fund.
(4) If a petition for judicial review has not been timely filed
under RCW 34.05.542(2), a certified copy of the director's order
requiring payment of the fine may be filed in the office of the clerk
of the superior court in any county of this state. The clerk shall
treat the order of the director in the same manner as a judgment of the
superior court. The director's order so filed has the same effect as
a judgment of the superior court and may be recorded, enforced, or
satisfied in like manner.

Sec. 8 RCW 9A.20.021 and 1982 c 192 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Felony. Unless a different maximum sentence for a classified
felony is specifically established by statute, no person convicted of
a classified felony shall be punished by confinement or fine exceeding
the following:
(a) For a class A felony, by confinement in a state correctional
institution for a term of life imprisonment, or by a fine in an amount
fixed by the court of fifty thousand dollars, or by both such
confinement and fine;
(b) For a class B felony, by confinement in a state correctional
institution for a term of ten years, or by a fine in an amount fixed by
the court of twenty thousand dollars, or by both such confinement and
fine;
(c) For a class C felony, by confinement in a state correctional
institution for five years, or by a fine in an amount fixed by the
court of ten thousand dollars, or by both such confinement and fine.
(2) Gross misdemeanor. Every person convicted of a gross
misdemeanor defined in Title 9A RCW shall be punished by imprisonment
in the county jail for a maximum term fixed by the court of not more
than one year, or by a fine in an amount fixed by the court of not more
than five thousand dollars, or by both such imprisonment and fine.
(3) Misdemeanor. Every person convicted of a misdemeanor defined
in Title 9A RCW shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail
for a maximum term fixed by the court of not more than ninety days, or
by a fine in an amount fixed by the court of not more than one thousand
dollars, or by both such imprisonment and fine.
(4) This section applies to only those crimes committed on or after
July 1, 1984.

--- END ---