BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29.33 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary of state shall adopt rules and establish
standards for voting technology and systems used by the state or any
political subdivision to be accessible for individuals with
disabilities, including nonvisual accessibility for the blind and
visually impaired, in a manner that provides the same opportunity for
access and participation, including privacy and independence, as other
voters.
(2) At each polling location, at least one voting unit certified by
the secretary of state shall provide access to individuals who are
blind or visually impaired.
(3) Compliance with this provision in regard to voting technology
and systems purchased prior to the effective date of this section shall
be achieved at the time of procurement of an upgrade of technology
compatible with nonvisual voting methods or replacement of existing
voting equipment or systems.
(4) Compliance with subsections (2) and (3) of this section is
contingent on available funds to implement this provision.
(5) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Accessible" includes receiving, using, selecting, and
manipulating voter data and controls.
(b) "Nonvisual" includes synthesized speech, Braille, and other
output methods.
(c) "Blind and visually impaired" excludes persons who are both
deaf and blind.
(6) This section does not apply to voting by absentee ballot.

--- END ---