BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 68.50.010 and 1963 c 178 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The jurisdiction of bodies of all deceased persons who come to
their death suddenly when in apparent good health without medical
attendance within the thirty-six hours preceding death; or where the
circumstances of death indicate death was caused by unnatural or
unlawful means; or where death occurs under suspicious circumstances;
or where a coroner's autopsy or post mortem or coroner's inquest is to
be held; or where death results from unknown or obscure causes, or
where death occurs within one year following an accident; or where the
death is caused by any violence whatsoever, or where death results from
a known or suspected abortion; whether self-induced or otherwise; where
death apparently results from drowning, hanging, burns, electrocution,
gunshot wounds, stabs or cuts, lightning, starvation, radiation,
exposure, alcoholism, narcotics or other addictions, tetanus,
strangulations, suffocation, or smothering; or where death is due to
premature birth or still birth; or where death is due to a violent
contagious disease or suspected contagious disease which may be a
public health hazard; or where death results from alleged rape, carnal
knowledge, or sodomy, where death occurs in a jail or prison; where a
body is found dead or is not claimed by relatives or friends; or where
the deceased is a minor, is hereby vested in the county coroner, which
bodies may be removed and placed in the morgue under such rules as are
adopted by the coroner with the approval of the county commissioners,
having jurisdiction, providing therein how the bodies shall be brought
to and cared for at the morgue and held for the proper identification
where necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 68.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The coroner, medical examiner, or person acting in that
capacity shall promptly notify the department of social and health
services of any instances in which the coroner, medical examiner, or
person acting in that capacity has received notice of a minor's death.
(2) Nothing in this section creates a duty on the part of the
department to investigate the circumstances of a child's death or
otherwise provide child protective services beyond that required by
chapter 26.44 RCW.
(3) Nothing in this section requires the department to keep a
record of all minors on which they have received a notice of death.
The department shall keep a record only when it is determined that
abuse or neglect caused or contributed to the child's death, or when
the case involves a minor for whom the department has previously had an
open child protection or child welfare case.

Sec. 3 RCW 68.50.105 and 1987 c 331 s 58 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Reports and records of autopsies or post mortems shall be
confidential, except that the following persons may examine and obtain
copies of any such report or record: The personal representative of
the decedent as defined in RCW 11.02.005, any family member, the
attending physician, the prosecuting attorney or law enforcement
agencies having jurisdiction, public health officials, the department
of social and health services in cases involving the death of any minor
where abuse or neglect of the child may have caused or contributed to
his or her death or in cases involving any minor for whom the
department has an open child protection or child welfare case or has
had an open child protection or child welfare case in the year
preceding the death of the child, or to the department of labor and
industries in cases in which it has an interest under RCW 68.50.103.
(2) If an investigation is initiated by the department of social
and health services, the department may share coroner's or medical
examiner's documents with the investigators as part of the
investigation process.
(3) The coroner, the medical examiner, or the attending physician
shall, upon request, meet with the family of the decedent to discuss
the findings of the autopsy or post mortem. For the purposes of this
section, the term "family" means the surviving spouse, or any child,
parent, grandparent, grandchild, brother, or sister of the decedent, or
any person who was guardian of the decedent at the time of death.

--- END ---