BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.233 and 2000 c 37 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except for those license plates issued under RCW 46.16.305(1)
before January 1, 1987, under RCW 46.16.305(3), and to commercial
vehicles with a gross weight in excess of twenty-six thousand pounds,
effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on January 1,
2001, all vehicle license plates must be issued on a standard
background, as designated by the department. ((Additionally,))
(2) To ensure maximum legibility and reflectivity, the department
shall periodically provide for the replacement of license plates as
specified by this section, except for commercial vehicles with a gross
weight in excess of twenty-six thousand pounds. ((Frequency of
replacement shall)) The functional lifetime of the license plate must
be established in accordance with empirical studies documenting the
longevity of the reflective materials used to make license plates.
(3) The department may, upon the transfer of a vehicle, require the
new owner to replace the license plates at the same time the new owner
registers the vehicle if the vehicle's existing license plates have
exceeded their functional lifetime. The department may replace license
plates at other times upon request of the current owner if the
functional lifetime of the plates has been exceeded. The department
shall not require replacement of license plates at other times.

--- END ---