BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.46.0356 and 2000 c 228 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature authorizes a business to conduct a promotional
contest of chance as defined in this section, in this state, or
partially in this state, whereby the elements of prize and chance are
present but in which the element of consideration is not present.
(2) Promotional contests of chance under this section are not
gambling as defined in RCW 9.46.0237.
(3) Promotional contests of chance shall be conducted as
advertising and promotional undertakings solely for the purpose of
advertising or promoting the services, goods, wares, and merchandise of
a business.
(4) No person eligible to receive a prize in a promotional contest
of chance may be required to:
(a) Pay any consideration to the promoter or operator of the
business in order to participate in the contest; or
(b) Purchase any service, goods, wares, merchandise, or anything of
value from the business, however, for other than contests entered
through a direct mail solicitation, the promoter or sponsor may give
additional entries or chances upon purchase of service, goods, wares,
or merchandise if the promoter or sponsor provides an alternate method
of entry requiring no consideration.
(5)(a) As used in this section, "consideration" means anything of
pecuniary value required to be paid to the promoter or sponsor in order
to participate in a promotional contest. Such things as visiting a
business location, placing or answering a telephone call, completing an
entry form or customer survey, or furnishing a stamped, self-addressed
envelope do not constitute consideration.
(b) Coupons or entry blanks obtained by purchase of a bona fide
newspaper or magazine or in a program sold in conjunction with a
regularly scheduled sporting event are not consideration.
(6)(a) Vending machines that determine the outcome of a contest are
prohibited from use in a promotional contest.
(b) Unless authorized by the commission, equipment or devices made
for use in a gambling activity are prohibited from use in a promotional
contest.
(7) This section shall not be construed to permit noncompliance
with chapter 19.170 RCW, promotional advertising of prizes, and chapter
19.86 RCW, unfair business practices.

--- END ---