BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.335.240 and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.60.181 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The board of directors of a second class school district shall
build schoolhouses ((and teachers' cottages)) when directed by a vote
of the district to do so((. The board of directors of a second class
school district)) and may purchase real property for any school
district purpose.
(2) The board of directors of a second class school district also
may authorize the construction of teachers' cottages using funds from
the district's capital projects fund or general fund. Rental and other
income from the cottages, including sale of the cottages, may be
deposited, in whole or in part, into the school district's general
fund, debt service fund, or capital projects fund as determined by the
board of directors.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.335.130 and 1983 c 59 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 28A.335.240(2), the proceeds from any
sale of school district real property by a board of directors shall be
deposited to the debt service fund and/or the capital projects fund,
except for amounts required to be expended for the costs associated
with the sale of such property, which moneys may be deposited into the
fund from which the expenditure was incurred.

--- END ---