BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.48.390 and 1999 c 325 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A governing unit may require that each person who is booked at a
city, county, or regional jail pay a fee ((of ten dollars)) based on
the jail's actual booking costs or one hundred dollars, whichever is
less, to the sheriff's department of the county or police chief of the
city in which the jail is located. The fee is payable immediately from
any money then possessed by the person being booked, or any money
deposited with the sheriff's department or city jail administration on
the person's behalf. If the person has no funds at the time of booking
or during the period of incarceration, the sheriff or police chief may
notify the court in the county or city where the charges related to the
booking are pending, and may request the assessment of the fee. Unless
the person is held on other criminal matters, if the person is not
charged, is acquitted, or if all charges are dismissed, the sheriff or
police chief shall return the fee to the person at the last known
address listed in the booking records.

--- END ---