BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of social and health services shall implement
strategies to increase the number of children placed with willing and
able relatives when out-of-home placement is required.
These strategies must include at least the following:
(1) Development of a standardized, statewide protocol to be used
for relative search activities. The protocol must include a
requirement that documentation be maintained in the child's case record
that identifies kin, and documentation that identifies the assessment
criteria and procedures that were followed during initial and ongoing
relative searches. The protocol must be used when child safety
requires out-of-home placement in the following proceedings: Voluntary
placement agreement, dependency, and child in need of services and at-risk youth petitions. To assist with implementation of the protocol,
the department shall request that the juvenile court require parents to
disclose contact information for relatives to the social worker within
two weeks of an entered order.
(2) Development of a policy for conducting active outreach efforts
to identify and locate relatives during initial and ongoing searches.
The policy must include at least the following elements:
(a) A requirement of reasonable efforts to interview known
relatives, friends, teachers, and other identified community members
who may have knowledge of the child's extended family, within sixty
days of the child entering out-of-home care;
(b) Increased use of family group conferences and other appropriate
case consultations to engage extended family members in reunification
efforts, permanency planning, and placement decisions. Family group
conferencing and other case consultations should occur after a child
enters foster care, the department determines that the child is likely
to remain in foster care for more than sixty days, and potential
relative placement resources are available;
(c) Contacts with interested relatives as part of permanency
planning activities and change of placement discussions;
(d) Establishment of a process for ongoing contact with kin who
express interest in being considered as a placement resource for the
child; and
(e) A requirement that when the decision is made to not place the
child with a relative, the department provides documentation as part of
the child's individual service and safety plan that clearly identifies
the rationale for the decision and corrective action or actions the
relative must take to be considered as a viable placement option.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to create an
entitlement to services or to create judicial authority to order the
provision of services to any person or family if the services are
unavailable or unsuitable or the child or family is not eligible for
such services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall collaborate with one or more nonprofit
community-based agencies to develop a grant proposal for submission to
potential funding sources, including governmental entities and private
foundations, to establish a minimum of two pilot projects to assist
kinship caregivers with understanding and navigating the system of
services for children in out-of-home care. The proposal must seek to
establish at least one project in eastern Washington and one project in
western Washington, each project to be managed by a participating
community-based agency.
(2) The kinship care navigators funded through the proposal shall
be responsible for at least the following:
(a) Understanding the various state agency systems serving kinship
caregivers;
(b) Working in partnership with local community service providers;
(c) Tracking trends, concerns, and other factors related to kinship
caregivers; and
(d) Assisting in establishing stable, respectful relationships
between kinship caregivers and department staff.
(3) Implementation of the kinship care navigator pilot projects is
contingent upon receipt of nonstate or private funding for that
purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department of social and health services
shall brief the appropriate committees of the legislature on the
implementation of the kinship care navigator pilot projects with
recommendations on statewide implementation of the pilot projects one
year following implementation of the projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) It is the intent of the legislature in
sections 5 through 7 of this act to assist children in the care of kin
to access appropriate medical and education services. Children being
raised by kin have faced barriers to medical care and school attendance
because their kinship caregivers have not been able to verify that they
are the identified primary caregivers of these children. Such barriers
pose an especially significant challenge to kinship caregivers in
dealing with school officials and health professionals when children
are left in their care with little warning.
(2) To assist kinship caregivers in executing adequate and
appropriate decisions regarding the educational and medical needs of a
child in their care, a kinship caregiver's authorization affidavit is
hereby created. The department of social and health services shall
work with appropriate state and local agencies and entities, including,
but not limited to, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, community social service agencies, and area agencies on
aging, to reproduce and distribute the kinship caregiver's
authorization affidavit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A kinship caregiver eighteen years of age or older who
completes items 1 through 5 of the affidavit provided in section 7 of
this act and signs the affidavit is authorized to enroll a minor in
school and consent to school-related medical care on behalf of the
minor in his or her care.
(2) A kinship caregiver who completes items 1 through 9 of the
affidavit provided in section 7 of this act and signs the affidavit is
authorized to consent to medical care and dental care on behalf of the
minor in his or her care.
(3) The affidavit shall not be valid for more than one year after
the date on which it is executed.
(4) The decision of a kinship caregiver to consent to or to refuse
medical or dental care for a minor shall be superseded by any
contravening decision of the parent or other person having legal
custody of the minor, provided the decision of the parent or other
person having legal custody of the minor does not jeopardize the life,
health, or safety of the minor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person who acts in good faith reliance on a kinship
caregiver's authorization affidavit, provided in section 7 of this act,
to provide medical or dental care, without actual knowledge of facts
contrary to those stated on the affidavit, is not subject to criminal
liability or to civil liability to any person, nor is he or she subject
to professional disciplinary action, for such reliance if the
applicable portions of the affidavit are completed. This section
applies even if medical or dental care is provided to a minor in
contravention of the wishes of the parent or other person having legal
custody of the minor as long as the person providing the medical or
dental care has no actual knowledge of the wishes of the parent or
other person having legal custody of the minor.
(2) A person who relies on the affidavit has no obligation to make
any further inquiry or investigation.
(3) Nothing in this section relieves any person from liability for
violations of other provisions of law.
(4) If the minor stops living with the kinship caregiver, the
kinship caregiver shall notify any school, health care provider,
carrier, or other person or entity to whom the kinship caregiver has
provided the affidavit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
The kinship caregiver's authorization affidavit must be in
substantially the following form:

Kinship Caregiver's Authorization Affidavit

Use of this affidavit is authorized by RCW 74.13.--- (section 5 of
this act).

Instructions: Completion of items 1 through 5 and the signing of
the affidavit is sufficient to authorize enrollment of a minor in
school and authorize school-related medical care. Completion of items
6 through 9 is additionally required to authorize any other medical
care. Print clearly.

The minor named below lives in my home and I am eighteen years of
age or older.
1. Name of minor:
2. Minor's birth date:
3. My name (adult giving authorization):
4. My home address:
5. My telephone number:
6. ( ) I am a grandparent, aunt, uncle, or other qualified relative
of the minor (see elsewhere on this form for a definition of "qualified
relative").
7. Check one or both (for example, if one parent was advised and
the other cannot be located):
( ) I have advised the parent(s) or other person(s) having legal
custody of the minor of my intent to authorize medical care, and
have received no objection.
( ) I am unable to contact the parent(s) or other person(s) having
legal custody of the minor at this time, to notify them of my
intended authorization.
8. My date of birth:
9. My Washington driver's license or identification card number:

**Warning: Do not sign this form if any of the statements above
are incorrect, or you will be committing a crime punishable by a
fine, imprisonment, or both.**

I declare under penalty of perjury under the laws of the State of
Washington that the foregoing is true and correct.

Dated: . . . . . . . . Signed: . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

Notices:

1. This declaration does not affect the rights of the minor's
parents or legal guardian regarding the care, custody, and control of
the minor, and does not mean that the kinship caregiver has legal
custody of the minor.
2. A person who relies on this affidavit has no obligation to make
any further inquiry or investigation.
3. This affidavit is not valid for more than one year after the
date on which it is executed.

Additional Information:

TO KINSHIP CAREGIVERS:
1. "Qualified relative," for purposes of item 6, means a spouse,
parent, stepparent, brother, sister, stepbrother, stepsister, half-brother, half-sister, uncle, aunt, niece, nephew, first cousin, or any
person denoted by the prefix "grand" or "great," or the spouse of any
of the persons specified in this definition, even after the marriage
has been terminated by death or dissolution. For a minor defined as an
"Indian child" under the federal Indian welfare act (25 U.S.C. Sec.
1901 et seq.), the definition of "extended family member" under the
federal Indian welfare act shall apply.
2. If the minor stops living with you, you are required to notify
any school, health care provider, carrier, or other person or entity to
whom you have provided the affidavit.
3. If you do not have the information requested in item 9
(Washington driver's license or I.D.), provide another form of
identification such as your social security number.

TO SCHOOL OFFICIALS:
1. This affidavit constitutes a sufficient basis for a
determination of residency of the minor, without the requirement of a
guardianship or other custody order, unless the school district
determines from actual facts that the minor is not living with the
kinship caregiver.
2. The school district may require additional reasonable evidence
that the kinship caregiver lives at the address provided in item 4.

TO HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS AND CARRIERS:
1. A person who acts in good faith reliance on a kinship
caregiver's authorization affidavit to provide medical or dental care,
without actual knowledge of facts contrary to those stated on the
affidavit, is not subject to criminal liability or to civil liability
to any person, nor is he or she subject to professional disciplinary
action, for such reliance if the applicable portions of the affidavit
are completed.
2. This affidavit does not confer dependency for health care
coverage purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Within existing resources, the department shall establish an
oversight committee to monitor, guide, and report on kinship care
recommendations and implementation activities. The committee shall:
(a) Draft a kinship care definition and set of principles;
(b) Monitor the implementation of recommendations contained in the
2002 kinship care report;
(c) Partner with nonprofit organizations and private sector
businesses to guide a public education awareness campaign; and
(d) Assist with developing future recommendations on kinship care
issues.
(2) The oversight committee must consist of a minimum of thirty
percent kinship caregivers, who shall represent a diversity of kinship
families. Statewide representation with geographic, ethnic, and gender
diversity is required. Other members shall include representatives of
the department, representatives of relevant state agencies,
representatives of the private nonprofit and business sectors, child
advocates, representatives of Washington state Indian tribes as defined
under the federal Indian welfare act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.), and
representatives of the legal or judicial field. Birth parents, foster
parents, and others who have an interest in these issues may also be
included.
(3) To the extent funding is available, the department may
reimburse nondepartmental members of the oversight committee for costs
incurred in participating in the meetings of the oversight committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The kinship care oversight committee shall
brief the appropriate committees of the legislature on the status of
kinship care issues by December 1, 2004.

--- END ---