BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
Sec. 101 2002 c 371 s 108 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPREME COURT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,500,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,487,000))
$5,507,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,987,000))
$11,007,000

Sec. 102 2002 c 371 s 109 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE LAW LIBRARY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,982,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,924,000))
$1,929,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,906,000))
$3,911,000

Sec. 103 2002 c 371 s 110 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,894,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,724,000))
$12,743,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,618,000))
$25,637,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $505,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $606,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for lease increases associated
with the division I facility.
(2) $168,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $159,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for providing compensation
adjustments to nonjudicial staff of the court of appeals. Within the
funds provided in this subsection, the court of appeals shall determine
the specific positions to receive compensation adjustments based on
recruitment and retention difficulties, new duties or responsibilities
assigned, and salary inversion or compression within the court of
appeals.

Sec. 104 2002 c 371 s 112 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,900,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,388,000))
$17,501,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,468,000
Judicial Information Systems Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,758,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($85,514,000))
$87,627,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding provided in the judicial information systems account
appropriation shall be used for the operations and maintenance of
technology systems that improve services provided by the supreme court,
the court of appeals, the office of public defense, and the
administrator for the courts.
(2) No moneys appropriated in this section may be expended by the
administrator for the courts for payments in excess of fifty percent of
the employer contribution on behalf of superior court judges for
insurance and health care plans and federal social security and
medicare and medical aid benefits. As required by Article IV, section
13 of the state Constitution and 1996 Attorney General's Opinion No. 2,
it is the intent of the legislature that the costs of these employer
contributions shall be shared equally between the state and county or
counties in which the judges serve. The administrator for the courts
shall continue to implement procedures for the collection and
disbursement of these employer contributions. During each fiscal year
in the 2001-03 biennium, the office of the administrator for the courts
shall send written notice to the office of community development in the
department of community, trade, and economic development when each
county pays its fifty percent share for the year.
(3) $223,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely for the gender and justice commission.
(4) $308,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely for the minority and justice
commission.
(5) $278,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, $285,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003, and $263,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation are provided solely for the workload associated with tax
warrants and other state cases filed in Thurston county.
(6) $750,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $750,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for court-appointed special
advocates in dependency matters. The administrator for the courts,
after consulting with the association of juvenile court administrators
and the association of court-appointed special advocate/guardian ad
litem programs, shall distribute the funds to volunteer court-appointed
special advocate/guardian ad litem programs. The distribution of
funding shall be based on the number of children who need volunteer
court-appointed special advocate representation and shall be equally
accessible to all volunteer court-appointed special advocate/guardian
ad litem programs. The administrator for the courts shall not retain
more than six percent of total funding to cover administrative or any
other agency costs.
(7) $750,000 of the public safety and education account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for judicial program enhancements.
Within the funding provided in this subsection, the administrator for
the courts, in consultation with the supreme court, shall determine the
program or programs to receive an enhancement. Among the programs that
may be funded from the amount provided in this subsection are unified
family courts.
(8) $1,800,000 of the judicial information systems account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for improvements and enhancements to
the judicial information systems. This funding shall only be expended
after the office of the administrator for the courts certifies to the
office of financial management that there will be at least a $1,000,000
ending fund balance in the judicial information systems account at the
end of the 2001-03 biennium.

Sec. 105 2002 c 371 s 113 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . $170,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,344,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,444,000))
$13,114,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $204,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely to increase the reimbursement for
private attorneys providing constitutionally mandated indigent defense
in nondeath penalty cases.
(2) $51,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 303,
Laws of 1999 (court funding).
(3) Amounts provided from the public safety and education account
appropriation in this section include funding for investigative
services in death penalty personal restraint petitions.
(4) The general fund -- state appropriations are provided solely for
the continuation of a dependency and termination legal representation
funding pilot program.
(a) The goal of the pilot program shall be to enhance the quality
of legal representation in dependency and termination hearings, thereby
reducing the number of continuances requested by contract attorneys,
including those based on the unavailability of defense counsel. To
meet the goal, the pilot shall include the following components:
(i) A maximum caseload requirement of 90 dependency and termination
cases per full-time attorney;
(ii) Implementation of enhanced defense attorney practice
standards, including but not limited to those related to reasonable
case preparation and the delivery of adequate client advice, as
developed by Washington state public defense attorneys and included in
the office of public defense December 1999 report Costs of Defense and
Children's Representation in Dependency and Termination Hearings;
(iii) Use of investigative and expert services in appropriate
cases; and
(iv) Effective implementation of indigency screening of all
dependency and termination parents, guardians, and legal custodians
represented by appointed counsel.
(b) The pilot program shall be established in one eastern and one
western Washington juvenile court.
(c) The director shall contract for an independent evaluation of
the pilot program benefits and costs. A final evaluation shall be
submitted to the governor and the fiscal committees of the legislature
no later than February 1, 2002.
(d) The chair of the office of public defense advisory committee
shall appoint an implementation committee to:
(i) Develop criteria for a statewide program to improve dependency
and termination defense;
(ii) Examine caseload impacts to the courts resulting from improved
defense practices; and
(iii) Identify methods for the efficient use of expert services and
means by which parents may effectively access services.
If sufficient funds are available, the office of public defense
shall contract with the Washington state institute for public policy to
research how reducing dependency and termination case delays affects
foster care and to identify factors that are reducing the number of
family reunifications that occur in dependency and termination cases.
(5) $50,000 of the public safety and education account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for the evaluation required in chapter
92, Laws of 2000 (DNA testing).
(6) $235,000 of the public safety and education account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for the office of public defense to
contract with an existing public defender association to establish a
capital defense assistance center.

Sec. 106 2002 c 371 s 122 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,811,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,070,000))
$4,082,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,868,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,753,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $277,000
New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,163,000
Legal Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $147,422,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($162,364,000))
$162,376,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual
legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for
each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to
the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the
end of each fiscal year.
(2) The attorney general and the office of financial management
shall modify the attorney general billing system to meet the needs of
user agencies for greater predictability, timeliness, and explanation
of how legal services are being used by the agency. The attorney
general shall provide the following information each month to agencies
receiving legal services: (a) The full-time equivalent attorney
services provided for the month; (b) the full-time equivalent
investigator services provided for the month; (c) the full-time
equivalent paralegal services provided for the month; and (d) direct
legal costs, such as filing and docket fees, charged to the agency for
the month.
(3) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim
against the state, that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney
general shall notify the director of financial management and the
chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of
representatives committee on appropriations.
(4)(a) $87,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 is provided solely for the office of the attorney general to
prepare a report by October 1, 2002, on federal and Indian reserved
water rights, and to submit the report to the standing committees of
the legislature having jurisdiction over water resources. The
objectives of the report shall be to:
(i) Examine and characterize the types of water rights issues
involved;
(ii) Examine the approaches of other states to such issues and
their results;
(iii) Examine methods for addressing such issues including, but not
limited to, administrative, judicial, or other methods, or any
combinations thereof; and
(iv) Examine implementation and funding requirements.
(b) Following receipt of the report, the standing committees of the
legislature having jurisdiction over water resources shall seek and
consider the recommendations of the relevant departments and agencies
of the United States, the federally recognized Indian tribes with
water-related interests in the state, and water users in the state and
shall develop recommendations.

Sec. 107 2002 c 371 s 123 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $631,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($600,000))
$609,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,231,000))
$1,240,000

Sec. 108 2002 c 371 s 125 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,893,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($60,499,000))
$60,199,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($173,342,000))
$186,965,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,980,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,094,000
Public Works Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,911,000
Salmon Recovery Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Film and Video Promotion Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
Building Code Council Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,226,000))
$1,061,000
Administrative Contingency Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,777,000
Low-Income Weatherization Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,292,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,513,000
Manufactured Home Installation Training Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $256,000
Community Economic Development Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $113,000
Washington Housing Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,368,000
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $586,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($351,375,000))
$364,533,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature that the department of
community, trade, and economic development receive separate
programmatic allotments for the office of community development and the
office of trade and economic development. Any appropriation made to
the department of community, trade, and economic development for
carrying out the powers, functions, and duties of either office shall
be credited to the appropriate office.
(2) $3,085,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $2,838,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for a contract with the Washington
technology center. For work essential to the mission of the Washington
technology center and conducted in partnership with universities, the
center shall not pay any increased indirect rate nor increases in other
indirect charges above the absolute amount paid during the 1995-97
fiscal biennium.
(3) $61,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $62,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound work plan and agency action item OCD-01.
(4) $10,804,156 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided solely for the drug control and system improvement formula
grant program, to be distributed in state fiscal year 2002 as follows:
(a) $3,603,250 to local units of government to continue
multijurisdictional narcotics task forces;
(b) $620,000 to the department to continue the drug prosecution
assistance program in support of multijurisdictional narcotics task
forces;
(c) $1,363,000 to the Washington state patrol for coordination,
investigative, and supervisory support to the multijurisdictional
narcotics task forces and for methamphetamine education and response;
(d) $200,000 to the department for grants to support tribal law
enforcement needs;
(e) $991,000 to the department of social and health services,
division of alcohol and substance abuse, for drug courts in eastern and
western Washington;
(f) $302,551 to the department for training and technical
assistance of public defenders representing clients with special needs;
(g) $88,000 to the department to continue a substance abuse
treatment in jails program, to test the effect of treatment on future
criminal behavior;
(h) $697,075 to the department to continue domestic violence legal
advocacy;
(i) $903,000 to the department of social and health services,
juvenile rehabilitation administration, to continue youth violence
prevention and intervention projects;
(j) $60,000 to the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs to complete the state and local components of the national
incident-based reporting system;
(k) $60,000 to the department for community-based advocacy services
to victims of violent crime, other than sexual assault and domestic
violence;
(l) $91,000 to the department to continue the governor's council on
substance abuse;
(m) $99,000 to the department to continue evaluation of Byrne
formula grant programs;
(n) $901,180 to the office of financial management for criminal
history records improvement; and
(o) $825,100 to the department for required grant administration,
monitoring, and reporting on Byrne formula grant programs.
These amounts represent the maximum Byrne grant expenditure
authority for each program. No program may expend Byrne grant funds in
excess of the amounts provided in this subsection. If moneys in excess
of those appropriated in this subsection become available, whether from
prior or current fiscal year Byrne grant distributions, the department
shall hold these moneys in reserve and may not expend them without
specific appropriation. These moneys shall be carried forward and
applied to the pool of moneys available for appropriation for programs
and projects in the succeeding fiscal year. As part of its budget
request for the succeeding year, the department shall estimate and
request authority to spend any funds remaining in reserve as a result
of this subsection.
(5) $320,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $320,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for the rural economic opportunity
fund.
(6) $1,250,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $1,250,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for grants to operate, repair, and
staff shelters for homeless families with children.
(7) $2,500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $2,500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for grants to operate transitional
housing for homeless families with children. The grants may also be
used to make partial payments for rental assistance.
(8) $1,250,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $1,250,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for consolidated emergency
assistance to homeless families with children.
(9) $205,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $205,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for grants to Washington Columbia
river gorge counties to implement their responsibilities under the
national scenic area management plan. Of this amount, $390,000 is
provided for Skamania county and $20,000 is provided for Clark county.
(10) $698,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, $698,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003, and $1,101,000 of the administrative contingency account
appropriation are provided solely for contracting with associate
development organizations to maintain existing programs.
(11) $600,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely for sexual assault prevention and
treatment programs.
(12) $680,000 of the Washington housing trust account appropriation
is provided solely to conduct a pilot project designed to lower
infrastructure costs for residential development.
(13) $50,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $50,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided to the department solely for providing
technical assistance to developers of housing for farmworkers.
(14) $370,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, $371,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003, and $25,000 of the film and video promotion account
appropriation are provided solely for the film office to bring film and
video production to Washington state.
(15) $22,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 is provided solely as a matching grant to support the
Washington state senior games. State funding shall be matched with at
least an equal amount of private or local governmental funds.
(16) $500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for grants to food banks and food
distribution centers to increase their ability to accept, store, and
deliver perishable food.
(17) $230,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, $230,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003, and the entire community economic development account
appropriation are provided solely for support of the developmental
disabilities endowment governing board and startup costs of the
endowment program. Startup costs are a loan from the state general
fund and will be repaid from funds within the program as determined by
the governing board. The governing board may use state appropriations
to implement a sliding-scale fee waiver for families earning below 150
percent of the state median family income. The director of the
department, or the director of the subsequent department of community
development, may implement fees to support the program as provided
under RCW 43.330.152.
(18) $880,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely for community-based legal advocates to
assist sexual assault victims with both civil and criminal justice
issues. If Senate Bill No. 5309 is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(19) $65,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $65,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for a contract with a food
distribution program for communities in the southwestern portion of the
state and for workers impacted by timber and salmon fishing closures
and reductions. The department may not charge administrative overhead
or expenses to the funds provided in this subsection.
(20) $120,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $120,000 of the Washington housing trust account
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely as one-time
pass-through funding to currently licensed overnight youth shelters.
If Substitute House Bill No. 2060 (low-income housing) is not enacted
by June 30, 2002, the fiscal year 2003 appropriation shall be made from
the state general fund.
(21) $1,868,000 of the Washington housing trust account
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided solely for emergency
shelter assistance. If Substitute House Bill No. 2060 (low-income
housing) is not enacted by June 30, 2002, the fiscal year 2003
appropriation shall be made from the state general fund.
(22) Repayments of outstanding loans granted under RCW 43.63A.600,
the mortgage and rental assistance program, shall be remitted to the
department, including any current revolving account balances. The
department shall contract with a lender or contract collection agent to
act as a collection agent of the state. The lender or contract
collection agent shall collect payments on outstanding loans, and
deposit them into an interest-bearing account. The funds collected
shall be remitted to the department quarterly. Interest earned in the
account may be retained by the lender or contract collection agent, and
shall be considered a fee for processing payments on behalf of the
state. Repayments of loans granted under this chapter shall be made to
the lender or contract collection agent as long as the loan is
outstanding, notwithstanding the repeal of the chapter.
(23) $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 is provided solely for the community connections program in
Walla Walla.
(24) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided to the office of community development
solely for the purposes of providing assistance to industrial workers
who have been displaced by energy cost-related industrial plant
closures in rural counties. For purposes of this subsection, "rural
county" is as defined in RCW 82.14.370(5). The office of community
development shall distribute the amount in this subsection to community
agencies that assist the displaced industrial workers in meeting basic
needs including, but not limited to, emergency medical and dental
services, family and mental health counseling, food, energy costs,
mortgage, and rental costs. The department shall not retain more than
two percent of the amount provided in this subsection for
administrative costs.
(25) $91,500 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $91,500 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for services related to the
foreign representative contract for Japan.
(26) $81,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 is provided solely for business finance and loan programs.
(27) $150,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 is provided solely for the quick sites initiative program.
(28) $120,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 is provided solely for operating a business information
hotline.
(29) $29,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 is provided solely for travel expenses associated with the
office of trade and economic development's provision of outreach and
technical assistance services to businesses and local economic
development associations.
(30) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for information technology
enhancements designed to improve the delivery of agency services to
customers.
(((32))) (31) $10,111,682 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation is provided solely for the drug control and system
improvement formula grant program, to be distributed in state fiscal
year 2003 as follows:
(a) $3,551,972 to local units of government to continue
multijurisdictional narcotics task forces;
(b) $611,177 to the department to continue the drug prosecution
assistance program in support of multijurisdictional narcotics task
forces;
(c) $1,343,603 to the Washington state patrol for coordination,
investigative, and supervisory support to the multijurisdictional
narcotics task forces and for methamphetamine education and response;
(d) $197,154 to the department for grants to support tribal law
enforcement needs;
(e) $976,897 to the department of social and health services,
division of alcohol and substance abuse, for drug courts in eastern and
western Washington;
(f) $298,246 to the department for training and technical
assistance of public defenders representing clients with special needs;
(g) $687,155 to the department to continue domestic violence legal
advocacy;
(h) $890,150 to the department of social and health services,
juvenile rehabilitation administration, to continue youth violence
prevention and intervention projects;
(i) $89,705 to the department to continue the governor's council on
substance abuse;
(j) $97,591 to the department to continue evaluation of Byrne
formula grant programs;
(k) $494,675 to the office of financial management for criminal
history records improvement;
(l) $60,000 to the department for community-based advocacy services
to victims of violent crime, other than sexual assault and domestic
violence; and
(m) $813,358 to the department for required grant administration,
monitoring, and reporting on Byrne formula grant programs.
These amounts represent the maximum Byrne grant expenditure
authority for each program. No program may expend Byrne grant funds in
excess of the amounts provided in this subsection. If moneys in excess
of those appropriated in this subsection become available, whether from
prior or current fiscal year Byrne grant distributions, the department
shall hold these moneys in reserve and may not expend them without
specific appropriation. These moneys shall be carried forward and
applied to the pool of moneys available for appropriation for programs
and projects in the succeeding fiscal year. As part of its budget
request for the succeeding year, the department shall estimate and
request authority to spend any funds remaining in reserve as a result
of this subsection.
(((33) $165,000 of the building code council account appropriation
for fiscal year 2003 is provided solely for the state building code
council pursuant to Senate Bill No. 5352 (building code council fee
increase). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2002, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(35))) (32) The appropriations in this section reflect a reduction
of $504,000 from the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year
2003. To implement this reduction, the office of trade and economic
development shall take actions consistent with its mission, goals, and
objectives to reduce operating costs. Such action, to the greatest
extent possible, shall maintain direct payments to service providers,
grants to other entities, and other pass-through funds. Examples of
actions that may be taken to effect this reduction include hiring
freezes, employee furloughs, staffing reductions, restricted travel and
training, delaying purchases of equipment, and limiting personal
service contracts.
(((36))) (33) $40,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 is provided solely to implement the state task force
on funding for community-based services to victims of crime as provided
in Senate Bill No. 6763. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2002,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((37))) (34) The appropriations in this section reflect a
reduction of $1,641,000 from the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003. To implement this reduction, the office of community
development shall take actions consistent with its mission, goals, and
objectives to reduce operating costs. Such action, to the greatest
extent possible, shall maintain direct payments to service providers,
grants to other entities, and other pass-through funds. Examples of
actions that may be taken to effect this reduction include hiring
freezes, employee furloughs, staffing reductions, restricted travel and
training, delaying purchases of equipment, and limiting personal
service contracts.

Sec. 109 2002 c 371 s 127 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,456,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,508,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,657,000))
$35,657,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $226,000
State Auditing Services Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($48,872,000))
$60,872,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The office of financial management shall review policies and
procedures regarding purchasing of information technology upgrades by
state agencies. Information technology upgrades include replacement
workstations, network equipment, operating systems and application
software. The review shall document existing policies and procedures,
and shall compare alternative upgrade policies that reduce the overall
cost to state government for maintaining adequate information
technology to meet the existing business needs of state agencies.
Findings and recommendations from this review shall be reported to
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2001.
(2) State agencies that provide services to other state agencies
are expected to reduce their expenditures and to share the savings with
their clients. The office of financial management shall achieve a
reduction of $339,000 in its billings for financial system services
purchased by state agencies in fiscal year 2003. The reduction is
expected to result from both reduced demand for services and reduced
rates.
(3) $500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2671 (permit assistance center). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2002, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(4) $350,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 is provided solely for an assessment and performance scoring
of state agencies and separate systemwide performance audits of two
governmental functions: State capital construction practices and state
contracting practices.
(a) The scorecard on state agencies shall include, but not be
limited to, the following:
(i) Quality and process management practices;
(ii) Independent and internal audit functions;
(iii) Internal and external customer satisfaction;
(iv) Program effectiveness;
(v) Fiscal productivity and efficiency; and
(vi) Statutory and regulatory compliance.
Each agency shall be graded on the categories selected for the
scorecard. The office of financial management shall submit the results
of the performance scoring, forward recommendations for legislation to
the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by
November 30, 2002, and release the results of the performance scoring
to the public.
(b)(i) The office of financial management shall conduct separate
systemwide performance audits on the state's capital construction and
contracting practices using generally accepted government auditing
standards. Each performance audit shall include, but not be limited
to, a review of the following:
(A) Validity and reliability of management's performance measures;
(B) A review of internal controls and internal audits;
(C) The adequacy of systems used for measuring, reporting, and
monitoring performance;
(D) The extent to which legislative, regulatory, and organizational
goals and objectives are being achieved; and
(E) Identification and recognition of best practices.
(ii) The performance audit on state capital construction practices
shall include building projects, highway projects, and architectural
and engineering services. The following state agencies, at a minimum,
shall be subject to audit sampling: Department of transportation,
department of general administration, and state higher education
agencies.
(iii) The performance audit on state contracting practices shall
include state agencies with sufficient activity with personal services
contracts and other types of contracts to evaluate the state's
contracting practices.
(iv) The office of financial management shall grade the results of
the performance audits to indicate agencies' performance regarding
capital construction and contracting practices. The office of
financial management shall report findings from the performance audits
to the governor and appropriate legislative committees by November 30,
2002.
(c) The office of financial management may contract for consulting
services in completing requirements under this subsection.

Sec. 110 2002 c 371 s 128 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS
Administrative Hearings Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,394,000))
$23,473,000

Sec. 111 2002 c 371 s 133 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $211,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($207,000))
$215,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($418,000))
$426,000

Sec. 112 2002 c 371 s 137 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($72,823,000))
$72,820,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($78,149,000))
$77,568,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,131,000
Waste Education/Recycling/Litter Control -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $101,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,000
Oil Spill Administration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($109,000))
$9,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($156,394,000))
$155,810,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $269,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $49,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely to establish and provide staff
support to a committee on taxation to study the elasticity, equity, and
adequacy of the state's tax system.
(a) The committee shall consist of eleven members. The department
shall appoint six academic scholars from the fields of economics,
taxation, business administration, public administration, public
policy, and other relevant disciplines as determined by the department,
after consulting with the majority and minority leaders in the senate,
the co-speakers in the house of representatives, the chair of the ways
and means committee in the senate, and the co-chairs of the finance
committee in the house of representatives. The governor and the chairs
of the majority and minority caucuses in each house of the legislature
shall each appoint one member to the committee. These appointments may
be legislative members. The members of the committee shall either
elect a voting chair from among their membership or a nonvoting chair
who is not a member of the committee. Members of the committee shall
serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses
under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(b) The purpose of the study is to determine how well the current
tax system functions and how it might be changed to better serve the
citizens of the state in the twenty-first century. In reviewing
options for changes to the tax system, the committee shall develop
multiple alternatives to the existing tax system. To the extent
possible, the alternatives shall be designed to increase the harmony
between the tax system of this state and the surrounding states,
encourage commerce and business creation, and encourage home ownership.
In developing alternatives, the committee shall examine and consider
the effects of tax incentives, including exemptions, deferrals, and
credits. The alternatives shall range from incremental improvements in
the current tax structure to complete replacement of the tax structure.
In conducting the study, the committee shall examine the tax structures
of other states and review previous studies regarding tax reform in
this state. In developing alternatives, the committee shall be guided
by administrative simplicity, economic neutrality, fairness, stability,
and transparency. Most of the alternatives presented by the committee
to the legislature shall be revenue neutral and contain no income tax.
(c) The department shall create an advisory group to include, but
not be limited to, representatives of business, state agencies, local
governments, labor, taxpayers, and other advocacy groups. The group
shall provide advice and assistance to the committee.
(d) The committee shall present a final report of its findings and
alternatives to the ways and means committee in the senate and the
finance committee in the house of representatives by November 30, 2002.
(((3))) (2) $109,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided solely for the
department to implement the provisions of House Bill No. 2969
(transportation). If the bill is not enacted by January 1, 2003, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. Further, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse to the extent that funds are
provided for this purpose in the transportation appropriations act.

Sec. 113 2002 c 371 s 143 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,483,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,439,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . $99,000
Liquor Control Board Construction and Maintenance
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,684,000
Liquor Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($125,927,000))
$126,420,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($138,632,000))
$139,125,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,573,000 of the liquor revolving account appropriation is
provided solely for the agency information technology upgrade. This
amount provided in this subsection is conditioned upon satisfying the
requirements of section 902 of this act.
(2) $4,803,000 of the liquor revolving account appropriation is
provided solely for the costs associated with the development and
implementation of a merchandising business system. Expenditures of any
funds for this system are conditioned upon the approval of the
merchandising business system's feasibility study by the information
services board. The amount provided in this subsection is also
conditioned upon satisfying the requirements of section 902 of this
act.
(3) $84,000 of the liquor control board construction and
maintenance account appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided
solely for the liquor control board to employ additional staff during
the holiday season to handle the expected increase in sales volume at
the Seattle distribution center.

Sec. 114 2002 c 371 s 145 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,165,000))
$9,269,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,710,000))
$8,740,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,509,000))
$28,003,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $234,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,269,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,010,000))
$1,369,000
Disaster Response Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,510,000))
$3,238,000
Worker and Community Right to Know Fund -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $283,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,027,000))
$24,768,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,641,000))
$56,927,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($148,358,000))
$153,100,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($1,906,000)) $1,265,000 of the disaster response account--state appropriation is provided solely for the state share of response
and recovery costs associated with federal emergency management agency
(FEMA) disasters approved in the 1999-01 biennium budget. The military
department may, upon approval of the director of financial management,
use portions of the disaster response account -- state appropriation to
offset costs of new disasters occurring before June 30, 2003. The
military department shall submit a report quarterly to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
disaster costs, including: (a) Estimates of total costs; (b)
incremental changes from the previous estimate; (c) actual
expenditures; (d) estimates of total remaining costs to be paid; and
(d) estimates of future payments by biennium. This information shall
be displayed by individual disaster, by fund, and by type of
assistance. The military department shall also submit a report
quarterly to the office of financial management and the legislative
fiscal committees detailing information on the disaster response
account, including: (a) The amount and type of deposits into the
account; (b) the current available fund balance as of the reporting
date; and (c) the projected fund balance at the end of the 2001-03
biennium based on current revenue and expenditure patterns.
(2) $100,000 of the general fund -- state fiscal year 2002
appropriation and $100,000 of the general fund -- state fiscal year 2003
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of the conditional
scholarship program pursuant to chapter 28B.103 RCW.
(3) $60,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $60,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for the implementation of Senate
Bill No. 5256 (emergency management compact). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(4) $35,000 of the general fund -- state fiscal year 2002
appropriation and $35,000 of the general fund -- state fiscal year 2003
appropriation are provided solely for the north county emergency
medical service.
(5) (($2,145,000)) $2,194,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account--state appropriation and (($4,174,000)) $4,423,000 of the Nisqually
earthquake account -- federal appropriation are provided solely for the
military department's costs associated with coordinating the state's
response to the February 28, 2001, earthquake.
(6) (($678,000)) $641,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account--state appropriation and (($3,420,000)) $3,797,000 of the Nisqually
earthquake account -- federal appropriation are provided solely for
mitigation costs associated with the earthquake for state and local
agencies. Of the amount from the Nisqually earthquake account -- state
appropriation, (($217,000)) $227,000 is provided for the state matching
share for state agencies and (($462,000)) $414,000 is provided for one-half of the local matching share for local entities. The amount
provided for the local matching share constitutes a revenue
distribution for purposes of RCW 43.135.060(1).
(7) (($8,970,000)) $10,933,000 of the Nisqually earthquake
account -- state appropriation and (($42,047,000)) $48,707,000 of the
Nisqually earthquake account -- federal appropriation are provided solely
for public assistance costs associated with the earthquake for state
and local agencies. Of the amount from the Nisqually earthquake
account -- state appropriation, (($3,924,000)) $5,639,000 is provided for
the state matching share for state agencies and (($5,046,000))
$5,294,000 is provided for one-half of the local matching share for
local entities. The amount provided for the local matching share
constitutes a revenue distribution for purposes of RCW 43.135.060(1).
(8) (($17,234,000)) $11,000,000 of the Nisqually earthquake
account -- state appropriation is provided solely to cover other response
and recovery costs associated with the Nisqually earthquake that are
not eligible for federal emergency management agency reimbursement.
Prior to expending funds provided in this subsection, the military
department shall obtain prior approval of the director of financial
management. Prior to approving any single project of over $1,000,000,
the office of financial management shall notify the fiscal committees
of the legislature. The military department is to submit a quarterly
report detailing the costs authorized under this subsection to the
office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees.
(9) $2,818,000 of the enhanced 911 account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6034 or House Bill No. 2595 (enhanced 911 excise tax).
If neither bill is enacted by June 30, 2002, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 115 2002 c 371 s 147 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE GROWTH PLANNING HEARINGS BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,497,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,461,000))
$1,499,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,958,000))
$2,996,000

Sec. 116 2002 c 371 s 117 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,485,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,446,000
Archives and Records Management Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,877,000
Archives and Records Management Account--Private/
Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,572,000
Department of Personnel Service Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $701,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,081,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,126,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's
share of primary and general election costs and the costs of conducting
mandatory recounts on state measures. Counties shall be reimbursed
only for those odd-year election costs that the secretary of state
validates as eligible for reimbursement.
(2) $2,143,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $2,578,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for the verification of initiative
and referendum petitions, maintenance of related voter registration
records, and the publication and distribution of the voters and
candidates pamphlet.
(3) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $118,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for legal advertising of state
measures under RCW 29.27.072.
(4)(a) $1,944,004 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2002 and $1,986,772 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for contracting
with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television
coverage of state government deliberations and other events of
statewide significance during the 2001-2003 biennium. An eligible
nonprofit organization must be formed solely for the purpose of, and be
experienced in, providing gavel-to-gavel television coverage of state
government deliberations and other events of statewide significance and
must have received a determination of tax-exempt status under section
501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code. The funding level for
each year of the contract shall be based on the amount provided in this
subsection and adjusted to reflect the implicit price deflator for the
previous year. The nonprofit organization shall be required to raise
contributions or commitments to make contributions, in cash or in kind,
in an amount equal to forty percent of the state contribution. The
office of the secretary of state may make full or partial payment once
all criteria in (a) and (b) of this subsection have been satisfactorily
documented.
(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding
is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage
of public affairs. For that purpose, the secretary of state shall
enter into a four-year contract with the nonprofit organization to
provide public affairs coverage through June 30, 2006.
(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent
audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including
benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in
meeting the intent of the program.
(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection
may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:
(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any
legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any
county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of
Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any
rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state
agency;
(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or
(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel,
lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.
(5)(a) (($149,316)) $137,316 of the archives and records
management--state appropriation and (($597,266)) $550,266 of the
archives and records management--private/local appropriation are
provided solely for the construction of an eastern regional archives.
The amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse if:
(i) The financing contract for the construction of an eastern
regional archives building is not authorized in the capital budget for
the 2001-03 fiscal biennium; or
(ii) Substitute House Bill No. 1926 (increasing the surcharge on
county auditor recording fees) is not enacted by July 31, 2001.
(b) (($566,879)) $598,065 of the archives and records management--state appropriation and (($451,102)) $463,102 of the archives and
records management--private/local appropriation are provided solely for
the design and establishment of an electronic data archive, including
the acquisition of hardware and software. The amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse if:
(i) The financing contract for acquisition of technology hardware
and software for the electronic data archive is not authorized in the
capital budget for the 2001-03 fiscal biennium; or
(ii) Substitute House Bill No. 1926 (increasing the surcharge on
county auditor recording fees) is not enacted by June 30, 2001.
(6) If the financing contract for expansion of the state records
center is not authorized in the capital budget for fiscal biennium
2001-03, then $641,000 of the archives and records management account--state appropriation shall lapse.
(7) $1,635,000 of the archives and records management account--state appropriation is provided solely for operation of the central
microfilming bureau under RCW 40.14.020(8).

(End of part)

PART II
HUMAN SERVICES
Sec. 201 2002 c 371 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- CHILDREN AND FAMILY
SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,104,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($231,042,000))
$236,906,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($369,403,000))
$370,805,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Public Safety and Education Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $964,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,639,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($832,552,000))
$839,818,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,237,000 of the fiscal year 2002 general fund -- state
appropriation, $2,271,000 of the fiscal year 2003 general fund -- state
appropriation, and $1,584,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided solely for the category of services titled
"intensive family preservation services."
(2) $685,000 of the general fund -- state fiscal year 2002
appropriation and $701,000 of the general fund -- state fiscal year 2003
appropriation are provided to contract for the operation of one
pediatric interim care facility. The facility shall provide
residential care for up to thirteen children through two years of age.
Seventy-five percent of the children served by the facility must be in
need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers.
The facility shall also provide on-site training to biological,
adoptive, or foster parents. The facility shall provide at least three
months of consultation and support to parents accepting placement of
children from the facility. The facility may recruit new and current
foster and adoptive parents for infants served by the facility. The
department shall not require case management as a condition of the
contract.
(3) $524,000 of the general fund -- state fiscal year 2002
appropriation, $375,000 of the general fund -- state fiscal year 2003
appropriation, and $161,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation
are provided for up to three nonfacility-based programs for the
training, consultation, support, and recruitment of biological, foster,
and adoptive parents of children through age three in need of special
care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers, except that each
program may serve up to three medically fragile nonsubstance-abuse-affected children. In selecting nonfacility-based programs, preference
shall be given to programs whose federal or private funding sources
have expired or that have successfully performed under the existing
pediatric interim care program.
(4) $1,260,000 of the fiscal year 2002 general fund -- state
appropriation, $1,248,000 of the fiscal year 2003 general fund -- state
appropriation, and $4,150,000 of the violence reduction and drug
enforcement account appropriation are provided solely for the family
policy council and community public health and safety networks. The
funding level for the family policy council and community public health
and safety networks represents a 25 percent reduction below the funding
level for the 1999-2001 biennium. Funding levels shall be reduced 25
percent for both the family policy council and network grants.
Reductions to network grants shall be allocated so as to maintain
current funding levels, to the greatest extent possible, for projects
with the strongest evidence of positive outcomes and for networks with
substantial compliance with contracts for network grants.
(5) $2,215,000 of the fiscal year 2002 general fund -- state
appropriation, $4,394,000 of the fiscal year 2003 general fund -- state
appropriation, and $5,604,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided solely for reducing the average caseload
level per case-carrying social worker. Average caseload reductions are
intended to increase the amount of time social workers spend in direct
contact with the children, families, and foster parents involved with
their open cases. The department shall use some of the funds provided
in several local offices to increase staff that support case-carrying
social workers in ways that will allow social workers to increase
direct contact time with children, families, and foster parents. To
achieve the goal of reaching an average caseload ratio of 1:24 by the
end of fiscal year 2003, the department shall develop a plan for
redeploying 30 FTEs to case-carrying social worker and support
positions from other areas in the children and family services budget.
The FTE redeployment plan shall be submitted to the fiscal committees
of the legislature by December 1, 2001.
(6) $1,000,000 of the fiscal year 2002 general fund -- state
appropriation and $1,000,000 of the fiscal year 2003 general fund--state appropriation are provided solely for increasing foster parent
respite care services that improve the retention of foster parents and
increase the stability of foster placements. The department shall
report quarterly to the appropriate committees of the legislature
progress against appropriate baseline measures for foster parent
retention and stability of foster placements.
(7) $1,050,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided solely for increasing kinship care placements for children who
otherwise would likely be placed in foster care. These funds shall be
used for extraordinary costs incurred by relatives at the time of
placement, or for extraordinary costs incurred by relatives after
placement if such costs would likely cause a disruption in the kinship
care placement. $50,000 of the funds provided shall be contracted to
the Washington institute for public policy to conduct a study of
kinship care placements. The study shall examine the prevalence and
needs of families who are raising related children and shall compare
services and policies of Washington state with other states that have
a higher rate of kinship care placements in lieu of foster care
placements. The study shall identify possible changes in services and
policies that are likely to increase appropriate kinship care
placements.
(8) $3,386,000 of the fiscal year 2002 general fund -- state
appropriation, $5,710,000 of the fiscal year 2003 general fund -- state
appropriation, and $19,819,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided solely for increases in the cost per case
for foster care and adoption support. $16,000,000 of the general
fund -- federal amount shall remain unalloted until the office of
financial management approves a plan submitted by the department to
achieve a higher rate of federal earnings in the foster care program.
That plan shall also be submitted to the fiscal committees of the
legislature and shall indicate projected federal revenue compared to
actual fiscal year 2001 levels. Within the amounts provided for foster
care, the department shall increase the basic rate for foster care to
an average of $420 per month on July 1, 2001. The department shall use
the remaining funds provided in this subsection to pay for increases in
the cost per case for foster care and adoption support. The department
shall seek to control rate increases and reimbursement decisions for
foster care and adoption support cases such that the cost per case for
family foster care, group care, receiving homes, and adoption support
does not exceed the amount assumed in the projected caseload
expenditures plus the amounts provided in this subsection.
(9) $1,767,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, $1,767,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003, and $1,241,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided solely for rate and capacity increases for
child placing agencies. Child placing agencies shall increase their
capacity by 15 percent in fiscal year 2002.
(10) The department shall provide secure crisis residential
facilities across the state in a manner that: (a) Retains geographic
provision of these services; and (b) retains beds in high use areas.
(11) $125,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $125,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for a foster parent retention
program. This program is directed at foster parents caring for
children who act out sexually, as described in House Bill No. 1525
(foster parent retention program).

Sec. 202 2002 c 371 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- JUVENILE
REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $83,151,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($79,107,000))
$79,813,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,803,000))
$13,747,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,110,000
Juvenile Accountability Incentive
Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,461,000
Public Safety and Education
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,047,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,174,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($230,853,000))
$231,503,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $686,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account
appropriation is provided solely for deposit in the county criminal
justice assistance account for costs to the criminal justice system
associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997
(juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are
intended to provide funding for county adult court costs associated
with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be
distributed in accordance with RCW 82.14.310.
(2) $5,980,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of
chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The amounts
provided in this subsection are intended to provide funding for county
impacts associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997
and shall be distributed to counties as prescribed in the current
consolidated juvenile services (CJS) formula.
(3) $1,161,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, $1,162,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003, and $5,190,000 of the violence reduction and drug
enforcement account appropriation are provided solely to implement
community juvenile accountability grants pursuant to chapter 338, Laws
of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). Funds provided in this subsection
may be used solely for community juvenile accountability grants,
administration of the grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the
grants.
(4) $2,515,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account appropriation is provided solely to implement alcohol and
substance abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders.
The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall award these moneys on
a competitive basis to counties that submitted a plan for the provision
of services approved by the division of alcohol and substance abuse.
The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall develop criteria for
evaluation of plans submitted and a timeline for awarding funding and
shall assist counties in creating and submitting plans for evaluation.
(5) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for juvenile rehabilitation
administration to contract with the institute for public policy for
responsibilities assigned in chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code
revisions).
(6) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for a contract for expanded
services of the teamchild project.
(7) $423,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, $754,100 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003, $152,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation,
$172,000 of the public safety and education assistance account
appropriation, and $604,000 of the violence reduction and drug
enforcement account appropriation are provided solely to increase
payment rates for contracted service providers.
(8) $16,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $16,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
167, Laws of 1999 (firearms on school property). The amounts provided
in this subsection are intended to provide funding for county impacts
associated with the implementation of chapter 167, Laws of 1999, and
shall be distributed to counties as prescribed in the current
consolidated juvenile services (CJS) formula.
(9) $3,441,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $3,441,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for distribution to county
juvenile court administrators to fund the costs of processing truancy,
children in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions. The
department shall not retain any portion of these funds to cover
administrative or any other departmental costs. The department, in
conjunction with the juvenile court administrators, shall develop an
equitable funding distribution formula. The formula shall neither
reward counties with higher than average per-petition processing costs
nor shall it penalize counties with lower than average per-petition
processing costs.
(10) $6,000,000 of the public safety and education account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for distribution to county juvenile
court administrators to fund the costs of processing truancy, children
in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions. The department shall
not retain any portion of these funds to cover administrative or any
other departmental costs. The department, in conjunction with the
juvenile court administrators, shall develop an equitable funding
distribution formula. The formula shall neither reward counties with
higher than average per-petition processing costs nor shall it penalize
counties with lower than average per-petition processing costs.
(11) The distributions made under (9) and (10) of this subsection
and distributions from the county criminal justice assistance account
made pursuant to section 801 of this act constitute appropriate
reimbursement for costs for any new programs or increased level of
service for purposes of RCW 43.135.060.
(12) Each quarter during the 2001-03 fiscal biennium, each county
shall report the number of petitions processed and the total actual
costs of processing the petitions in each of the following categories:
Truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth. Counties
shall submit the reports to the department no later than 45 days after
the end of the quarter. The department shall forward this information
to the chair and ranking minority member of the house of
representatives appropriations committee and the senate ways and means
committee no later than 60 days after a quarter ends. These reports
are deemed informational in nature and are not for the purpose of
distributing funds.
(13) $1,692,000 of the juvenile accountability incentive account--federal appropriation is provided solely for the continued
implementation of a pilot program to provide for postrelease planning
and treatment of juvenile offenders with co-occurring disorders.
(14) $22,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account
appropriation is provided solely for the evaluation of the juvenile
offender co-occurring disorder pilot program implemented pursuant to
(m) of this subsection.
(15) $900,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $900,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for the continued implementation
of the juvenile violence prevention grant program established in
section 204, chapter 309, Laws of 1999.
(16) $33,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $29,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for the implementation of House
Bill No. 1070 (juvenile offender basic training). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(17) $21,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $42,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for the implementation of Senate
Bill No. 5468 (chemical dependency). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2001, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(18) The juvenile rehabilitation administration, in consultation
with the juvenile court administrators, may agree on a formula to allow
the transfer of funds among amounts appropriated for consolidated
juvenile services, community juvenile accountability act grants, the
chemically dependent disposition alternative, and the special sex
offender disposition alternative.
(19) $40,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $68,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely to increase payment rates for
contracted service providers.
(20) $945,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 is provided solely for providing additional research-based
services to the juvenile parole population. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall consult with the institute for
public policy in deciding which interventions to provide to the parole
population.
(21) The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall continue to
allot and expend funds provided in this section by the category and
budget unit structure submitted to the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee.

Sec. 203 2002 c 371 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- MENTAL HEALTH
PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES/REGIONAL SUPPORT NETWORKS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $194,566,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($177,206,000))
$178,454,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($358,377,000))
$359,630,000
General Fund -- Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,596,000
Health Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,450,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($758,195,000))
$760,696,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) Regional support networks shall use portions of the general
fund -- state appropriation for implementation of working agreements with
the vocational rehabilitation program which will maximize the use of
federal funding for vocational programs.
(b) From the general fund -- state appropriations in this subsection,
the secretary of social and health services shall assure that regional
support networks reimburse the aging and adult services program for the
general fund -- state cost of medicaid personal care services that
enrolled regional support network consumers use because of their
psychiatric disability.
(c) $388,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, $2,829,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003, and $3,157,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided solely for development and operation of
community residential and support services for persons whose treatment
needs constitute substantial barriers to community placement and who no
longer require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient hospital
level of care, no longer meet the criteria for inpatient involuntary
commitment, and who are clinically ready for discharge from a state
psychiatric hospital. In the event that enough patients are not
transitioned or diverted from the state hospitals to close at least two
hospital wards by July 2002, and four additional wards by April 2003,
a proportional share of these funds shall be transferred to the
appropriations in subsection (2) of this section to support continued
care of the patients in the state hospitals. Primary responsibility
and accountability for provision of appropriate community support for
persons placed with these funds shall reside with the mental health
program and the regional support networks, with partnership and active
support from the alcohol and substance abuse and from the aging and
adult services programs. The department shall negotiate performance-based incentive contracts to provide appropriate community support
services for individuals leaving the state hospitals under this
subsection. The department shall first seek to contract with regional
support networks before offering a contract to any other party. The
funds appropriated in this subsection shall not be considered
"available resources" as defined in RCW 71.24.025 and are not subject
to the standard allocation formula applied in accordance with RCW
71.24.035(13)(a).
(d) At least $1,000,000 of the federal block grant funding
appropriated in this subsection shall be used for (i) initial
development, training, and operation of the community support teams
which will work with long-term state hospital residents prior and
subsequent to their return to the community; and (ii) development of
support strategies which will reduce the unnecessary and excessive use
of state and local hospitals for short-term crisis stabilization
services. Such strategies may include training and technical
assistance to community long-term care and substance abuse providers;
the development of diversion beds and stabilization support teams;
examination of state hospital policies regarding admissions; and the
development of new contractual standards to assure that the statutory
requirement that 85 percent of short-term detentions be managed locally
is being fulfilled. The department shall report to the fiscal and
policy committees of the legislature on the results of these efforts by
November 1, 2001, and again by November 1, 2002.
(e) The department is authorized to implement a new formula for
allocating available resources among the regional support networks.
The distribution formula shall use the number of persons eligible for
the state medical programs funded under chapter 74.09 RCW as the
measure of the requirement for the number of acutely mentally ill,
chronically mentally ill, severely emotionally disturbed children, and
seriously disturbed in accordance with RCW 71.24.035(13)(a). The new
formula shall be phased in over a period of no less than six years.
Furthermore, the department shall increase the medicaid capitation
rates which a regional support network would otherwise receive under
the formula by an amount sufficient to assure that total funding
allocated to the regional support network in fiscal year 2002 increases
by up to 3.5 percent over the amount actually paid to that regional
support network in fiscal year 2001, and by up to an additional 5.0
percent in fiscal year 2003, if total funding to the regional support
network would otherwise increase by less than those percentages under
the new formula, and provided that the nonfederal share of the higher
medicaid payment rate is provided by the regional support network from
local funds.
(f) Within funds appropriated in this subsection, the department
shall contract with the Clark county regional support network for
development and operation of a project demonstrating collaborative
methods for providing intensive mental health services in the school
setting for severely emotionally disturbed children who are medicaid
eligible. Project services are to be delivered by teachers and
teaching assistants who qualify as, or who are under the supervision
of, mental health professionals meeting the requirements of chapter
275-57 WAC. The department shall increase medicaid payments to the
regional support network by the amount necessary to cover the necessary
and allowable costs of the demonstration, not to exceed the upper
payment limit specified for the regional support network in the
department's medicaid waiver agreement with the federal government
after meeting all other medicaid spending requirements assumed in this
subsection. The regional support network shall provide the department
with (i) periodic reports on project service levels, methods, and
outcomes; and (ii) an intergovernmental transfer equal to the state
share of the increased medicaid payment provided for operation of this
project.
(g) The health services account appropriation is provided solely
for implementation of strategies which the department and the affected
regional support networks conclude will best assure continued
availability of community-based inpatient psychiatric services in all
areas of the state. Such strategies may include, but are not limited
to, emergency contracts for continued operation of inpatient facilities
otherwise at risk of closure because of demonstrated uncompensated
care; start-up grants for development of evaluation and treatment
facilities; and increases in the rate paid for inpatient psychiatric
services for medically indigent and/or general assistance for the
unemployed patients. The funds provided in this subsection must be:
(i) Prioritized for use in those areas of the state which are at
greatest risk of lacking sufficient inpatient psychiatric treatment
capacity, rather than being distributed on a formula basis; (ii)
prioritized for use by those hospitals which do not receive low-income
disproportionate share hospital payments as of the date of application
for funding; and (iii) matched on a one-quarter local, three-quarters
state basis by funding from the regional support network or networks in
the area in which the funds are expended. Payments from the amount
provided in this subsection shall not be made to any provider that has
not agreed that, except for prospective rate increases, the payment
shall offset, on a dollar-for-dollar basis, any liability that may be
established against, or any settlement that may be agreed to by the
state, regarding the rate of state reimbursement for inpatient
psychiatric care. The funds provided in this subsection shall not be
considered "available resources" as defined in RCW 71.24.025 and are
not subject to the distribution formula established pursuant to RCW
71.24.035.
(((i))) (h) The department shall assure that each regional support
network increases spending on direct client services in fiscal years
2002 and 2003 by at least the same percentage as the total state,
federal, and local funds allocated to the regional support network in
those years exceeds the amounts allocated to it in fiscal year 2001.
(((j))) (i) The department shall reduce state funding otherwise
payable to a regional support network in fiscal years 2002 and 2003 by
the full amount by which the regional support network's reserves and
fund balances as of December 31, 2001, exceed the required risk reserve
for that regional support network. The required reserve amount shall
be calculated by applying the risk reserve percentage specified in the
department's contract with the regional support network to the total
state and federal revenues for which the regional support network would
otherwise be eligible in accordance with this subsection. As used in
this subsection, "reserves" does not include capital project reserves
established in accordance with state accounting and reporting standards
before January 1, 2002.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $84,878,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($80,784,000))
$89,566,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($139,821,000))
$134,970,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,532,000))
$29,949,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($335,015,000))
$339,363,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The state mental hospitals may use funds appropriated in this
subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group
purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.
(b) The mental health program at Western state hospital shall
continue to use labor provided by the Tacoma prerelease program of the
department of corrections.
(c) The department shall seek to reduce the census of the two state
psychiatric hospitals by 178 beds by April 2003 by arranging and
providing community residential, mental health, and other support
services for long-term state hospital patients whose treatment needs
constitute substantial barriers to community placement and who no
longer require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient hospital
level of care, no longer meet the criteria for inpatient involuntary
commitment, and who are clinically ready for discharge from a state
psychiatric hospital. No such patient is to move from the hospital
until a team of community professionals has become familiar with the
person and their treatment plan; assessed their strengths, preferences,
and needs; arranged a safe, clinically-appropriate, and stable place
for them to live; assured that other needed medical, behavioral, and
social services are in place; and is contracted to monitor the person's
progress on an ongoing basis. The department and the regional support
networks shall endeavor to assure that hospital patients are able to
return to their area of origin, and that placements are not
concentrated in proximity to the hospitals.
(d) For each month subsequent to the month in which a state
hospital bed has been closed in accordance with (c) of this subsection,
the mental health program shall transfer to the medical assistance
program state funds equal to the state share of the monthly per capita
expenditure amount estimated for categorically needy-disabled persons
in the most recent forecast of medical assistance expenditures.
(e) The department shall report to the appropriate committees of
the legislature by November 1, 2001, and by November 1, 2002, on its
plans for and progress toward achieving the objectives set forth in (c)
of this subsection.

(3) CIVIL COMMITMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,267,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,934,000))
$21,320,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($39,201,000))
$39,587,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $1,587,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $2,646,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for operational costs associated
with a less restrictive step-down placement facility on McNeil Island.
(b) $300,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $300,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for mitigation funding for
jurisdictions affected by the placement of less restrictive alternative
facilities for persons conditionally released from the special
commitment center facility being constructed on McNeil Island. Of this
amount, up to $45,000 per year is provided for the city of Lakewood for
police protection reimbursement at Western State Hospital and adjacent
areas, up to $45,000 per year is provided for training police personnel
on chapter 12, Laws of 2001, 2nd sp. sess. (3ESSB 6151), up to $125,000
per year is provided for Pierce county for reimbursement of additional
costs, and the remaining amounts are for other documented costs by
jurisdictions directly impacted by the placement of the secure
community transition facility on McNeil Island. Pursuant to chapter
12, Laws of 2001, 2nd sp. sess (3ESSB 6151), the department shall
continue to work with local jurisdictions towards reaching agreement
for mitigation costs.
(c) By October 1, 2001, the department shall report to the office
of financial management and the fiscal committees of the house of
representatives and senate detailing information on plans for
increasing the efficiency of staffing patterns at the new civil
commitment center facility being constructed on McNeil Island.
(d) $600,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6594 (secure community transition facilities). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2002, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $444,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . $443,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,082,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,969,000

(5) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,104,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,111,000))
$4,691,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,659,000))
$7,241,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,874,000))
$15,036,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $113,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, $125,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003, and $164,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation are
provided solely for the institute for public policy to evaluate the
impacts of chapter 214, Laws of 1999 (mentally ill offenders), chapter
217, Laws of 2000 (atypical anti-psychotic medications), chapter 297,
Laws of 1998 (commitment of mentally ill persons), and chapter 334,
Laws of 2001 (mental health performance audit).
(b) $168,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, $243,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003, and $411,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation are
provided solely for the development and implementation of a uniform
outcome-oriented performance measurement system to be used in
evaluating and managing the community mental health service delivery
system consistent with the recommendations contained in the joint
legislative audit and review committee's audit of the public mental
health system. Once implemented, the use of performance measures will
allow comparison of measurement results to established standards and
benchmarks among regional support networks, service providers, and
against other states. The department shall provide a report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature on the development and
implementation of the use of performance measures by October 2002.
(c) $125,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, $125,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003, and $250,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation are
provided solely for a study of the prevalence of mental illness among
the state's regional support networks. The study shall examine how
reasonable estimates of the prevalence of mental illness relate to the
incidence of persons enrolled in medical assistance programs in each
regional support network area. In conducting this study, the
department shall consult with the joint legislative audit and review
committee, regional support networks, community mental health
providers, and mental health consumer representatives. The department
shall submit a final report on its findings to the fiscal, health care,
and human services committees of the legislature by November 1, 2003.

Sec. 204 2002 c 371 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $233,705,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($255,415,000))
$257,534,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($405,773,000))
$400,676,000
Health Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $903,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($895,796,000))
$892,818,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) (((b))) $10,050,000 of the fiscal year 2003 general fund -- state
appropriation and $3,550,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation
are provided solely for expanded access to community services. A total
of $7,800,000 is provided for additional residential services for
persons on the home and community based waiver. A total of $3,600,000
is provided for family support and high school transition. A total of
$2,700,000 is provided between this subsection and subsection (3) of
this section for staffing and other costs to improve oversight of
quality of care, program management, and fiscal management. New
funding for family support and high school transition along with a
portion of existing funding for these programs shall be provided as
supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental payments. The
legislature finds that providing cash assistance to individuals and
families needing these supports promotes self-determination and
independence. It is the intent of the legislature that the department
shall comply with federal requirements to maintain aggregate funding
for SSI state supplemental payments while promoting self-determination
and independence for persons with developmental disabilities in
families with taxable incomes at or below 150 percent of median family
income. Individuals receiving family support or high school transition
payments shall not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW
74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.
These amounts and the specified expansion of community services are
intended to be the fiscal component of the negotiated settlement in the
pending litigation on developmental disabilities services, ARC v.
Quasim.
(((c))) (b) The health services account appropriation and $904,000
of the general fund -- federal appropriation are provided solely for
health care benefits for home care workers with family incomes below
200 percent of the federal poverty level who are employed through state
contracts for twenty hours per week or more. Premium payments for
individual provider home care workers shall be made only to the
subsidized basic health plan. Home care agencies may obtain coverage
either through the basic health plan or through an alternative plan
with substantially equivalent benefits.
(((d))) (c) $902,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2002, $3,372,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2003, and $4,056,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided solely for community services for residents
of residential habilitation centers (RHCs) who are able to be
adequately cared for in community settings and who choose to live in
those community settings. The department shall ensure that the average
cost per day for all program services other than start-up costs shall
not exceed $280. If the number and timing of residents choosing to
move into community settings is not sufficient to achieve the RHC
cottage consolidation plan assumed in the appropriations in subsection
(2) of this section, the department shall transfer sufficient
appropriations from this subsection to subsection (2) of this section
to cover the added costs incurred in the RHCs. The department shall
report to the appropriate committees of the legislature, within 45 days
following each fiscal year quarter, the number of residents moving into
community settings and the actual expenditures for all community
services to support those residents.
(((e))) (d) $1,153,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2002, $3,054,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2003, and $4,031,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided solely for expanded community services for
persons with developmental disabilities who also have community
protection issues or are diverted or discharged from state psychiatric
hospitals. The department shall ensure that the average cost per day
for all program services other than start-up costs shall not exceed
$275. The department shall report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature, within 45 days following each fiscal year quarter, the
number of persons served with these additional community services,
where they were residing, what kinds of services they were receiving
prior to placement, and the actual expenditures for all community
services to support these clients.
(((f))) (e) The department shall not increase total enrollment in
home and community based waivers for persons with developmental
disabilities except for changes assumed in additional funding provided
in subsections (b), (((d), and (e))) (c) and (d) of this section.
Prior to submitting to the health care financing authority any
additional home and community based waiver request for persons with
developmental disabilities, the department shall submit a summary of
the waiver request to the appropriate committees of the legislature.
The summary shall include eligibility criteria, program description,
enrollment projections and limits, and budget and cost effectiveness
projections that distinguish the requested waiver from other existing
or proposed waivers.
(((g))) (f) $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2002 and $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for employment,
or other day activities and training programs, for young adults with
developmental disabilities who complete their high school curriculum in
2001 or 2002. These services are intended to assist with the
transition to work and more independent living. Funding shall be used
to the greatest extent possible for vocational rehabilitation services
matched with federal funding. In recent years, the state general fund
appropriation for employment and day programs has been underspent.
These surpluses, built into the carry forward level budget, shall be
redeployed for high school transition services.
(((h))) (g) $369,000 of the fiscal year 2002 general fund -- state
appropriation and $369,000 of the fiscal year 2003 general fund -- state
appropriation are provided solely for continuation of the autism pilot
project started in 1999.
(((i))) (h) $4,049,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2002, $1,734,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2003, and $5,369,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided solely to increase compensation by an
average of fifty cents per hour for low-wage workers providing state-funded services to persons with developmental disabilities. These
funds, along with funding provided for vendor rate increases, are
sufficient to raise wages an average of fifty cents and cover the
employer share of unemployment and social security taxes on the amount
of the wage increase. In consultation with the statewide associations
representing such agencies, the department shall establish a mechanism
for testing the extent to which funds have been used for this purpose,
and report the results to the fiscal committees of the legislature by
February 1, 2002.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,375,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($68,203,000))
$69,577,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($145,672,000))
$147,043,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,230,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($294,480,000))
$297,225,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Pursuant to RCW 71A.12.160, if residential
habilitation center capacity is not being used for permanent residents,
the department shall make residential habilitation center vacancies
available for respite care and any other services needed to care for
clients who are not currently being served in a residential
habilitation center and whose needs require staffing levels similar to
current residential habilitation center residents. Providing respite
care shall not impede the department's ability to consolidate cottages,
and maintain expenditures within allotments, as assumed in the
appropriations in this subsection.

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,711,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,007,000))
$2,232,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,612,000))
$2,763,000
Telecommunications Devices for the Hearing and
Speech Impaired Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,767,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,097,000))
$8,473,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $270,000 of the fiscal year 2003 general fund -- state
appropriation and $170,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation
are provided solely for improved fiscal management of the home and
community-based waiver and other community services.
(b) $100,000 of the telecommunications devices for the hearing and
speech impaired account appropriation is provided solely for increasing
the contract amount for the southeast Washington deaf and hard of
hearing services center due to increased workload.

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,995,000

Sec. 205 2002 c 371 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- AGING AND ADULT
SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $505,983,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($513,154,000))
$517,884,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,053,299,000))
$1,056,878,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,803,000))
$11,560,000
Health Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,523,000))
$5,087,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,088,762,000))
$2,097,392,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The entire health services account appropriation, $1,210,000 of
the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $1,423,000
of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and
$6,794,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation are provided
solely for health care benefits for home care workers who are employed
through state contracts for at least twenty hours per week. Premium
payments for individual provider home care workers shall be made only
to the subsidized basic health plan, and only for persons with incomes
below 200 percent of the federal poverty level. Home care agencies may
obtain coverage either through the basic health plan or through an
alternative plan with substantially equivalent benefits.
(2) $1,706,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $1,706,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003, plus the associated vendor rate increase for each
year, are provided solely for operation of the volunteer chore services
program.
(3) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted
average nursing facility payment rate shall be no more than $128.79 for
fiscal year 2002, and no more than $132.58 for fiscal year 2003. For
all facilities, the therapy care, support services, and operations
component rates established in accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW shall
be adjusted for economic trends and conditions by 2.1 percent effective
July 1, 2001, and by an additional 1.5 percent effective July 1, 2002.
For case-mix facilities, direct care component rates established in
accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW shall also be adjusted for economic
trends and conditions by 2.1 percent effective July 1, 2001, and by an
additional 2.3 percent effective July 1, 2002. Additionally, to
facilitate the transition to a fully case-mix based direct care payment
system, the median price per case-mix unit for each of the applicable
direct care peer groups shall be increased on a one-time basis by 2.64
percent effective July 1, 2002.
(4) In accordance with Substitute House Bill No. 2242 (nursing home
rates), the department shall issue certificates of capital
authorization which result in up to $10 million of increased asset
value completed and ready for occupancy in fiscal year 2003; in up to
$27 million of increased asset value completed and ready for occupancy
in fiscal year 2004; and in up to $27 million of increased asset value
completed and ready for occupancy in fiscal year 2005.
(5) Adult day health services shall not be considered a duplication
of services for persons receiving care in long-term care settings
licensed under chapter 18.20, 72.36, or 70.128 RCW.
(6) Within funds appropriated in this section and in section 204 of
this act, the aging and adult services program shall coordinate with
and actively support the efforts of the mental health program and of
the regional support networks to provide stable community living
arrangements for persons with dementia and traumatic brain injuries who
have been long-term residents of the state psychiatric hospitals. The
aging and adult services program shall report to the health care and
fiscal committees of the legislature by November 1, 2001, and by
November 1, 2002, on the actions it has taken to achieve this
objective.
(7) Within funds appropriated in this section and in section 204 of
this act, the aging and adult services program shall devise and
implement strategies in partnership with the mental health program and
the regional support networks to reduce the use of state and local
psychiatric hospitals for the short-term stabilization of persons with
dementia and traumatic brain injuries. Such strategies may include
training and technical assistance to help long-term care providers
avoid and manage behaviors which might otherwise result in psychiatric
hospitalizations; monitoring long-term care facilities to assure
residents are receiving appropriate mental health care and are not
being inappropriately medicated or hospitalized; the development of
diversion beds and stabilization support teams; and the establishment
of systems to track the use of psychiatric hospitals by long-term care
providers. The aging and adult services program shall report to the
health care and fiscal committees of the legislature by November 1,
2001, and by November 1, 2002, on the actions it has taken to achieve
this objective.
(8) In accordance with Substitute House Bill No. 1341, the
department may implement a medicaid waiver program for persons who do
not qualify for such services as categorically needy, subject to
federal approval and the following conditions and limitations:
(a) The waiver program shall include coverage of care in community
residential facilities. Enrollment in the waiver shall not exceed 50
persons by the end of fiscal year 2002, nor 600 persons by the end of
fiscal year 2003.
(b) For each month of waiver service delivered to a person who was
not covered by medicaid prior to their enrollment in the waiver, the
aging and adult services program shall transfer to the medical
assistance program state and federal funds equal to the monthly per
capita expenditure amount, net of drug rebates, estimated for medically
needy-aged persons in the most recent forecast of medical assistance
expenditures.
(c) The department shall identify the number of medically needy
nursing home residents, and enrollment and expenditures on the
medically needy waiver, on monthly management reports.
(d) The department shall track and report to health care and fiscal
committees of the legislature by November 15, 2002, on the types of
long-term care support a sample of waiver participants were receiving
prior to their enrollment in the waiver, how those services were being
paid for, and an assessment of their adequacy.
(9) $50,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $50,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for payments to any nursing
facility licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW which meets all of the
following criteria: (a) The nursing home entered into an arm's length
agreement for a facility lease prior to January 1, 1980; (b) the lessee
purchased the leased nursing home after January 1, 1980; and (c) the
lessor defaulted on its loan or mortgage for the assets of the home
after January 1, 1991, and prior to January 1, 1992. Payments provided
pursuant to this subsection shall not be subject to the settlement,
audit, or rate-setting requirements contained in chapter 74.46 RCW.
(10) $364,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, $364,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003, and $740,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation are
provided solely for payment of exceptional care rates so that persons
with Alzheimer's disease and related dementias who might otherwise
require nursing home or state hospital care can instead be served in
boarding home-licensed facilities which specialize in the care of such
conditions.
(11) From funds appropriated in this section, the department shall
increase compensation for individual and for agency home care
providers. Payments to individual home care providers are to be
increased from $7.18 per hour to $7.68 per hour on July 1, 2001.
Payments to agency providers are to be increased to $13.30 per hour on
July 1, 2001, and to $13.44 per hour on July 1, 2002. All but 18 cents
per hour of the July 1, 2001, increase to agency providers is to be
used to increase wages for direct care workers. The appropriations in
this section also include the funds needed for the employer share of
unemployment and social security taxes on the amount of the wage
increase required by this subsection.
(12) $2,507,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, $2,595,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003, and $5,100,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided solely for prospective rate increases
intended to increase compensation by an average of fifty cents per hour
for low-wage workers in agencies which contract with the state to
provide community residential services for persons with functional
disabilities. In consultation with the statewide associations
representing such agencies, the department shall establish a mechanism
for testing the extent to which funds have been used for this purpose,
and report the results to the fiscal committees of the legislature by
February 1, 2002. The amounts in this subsection also include the
funds needed for the employer share of unemployment and social security
taxes on the amount of the wage increase.
(13) $1,082,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, $1,082,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003, and $2,204,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided solely for prospective rate increases
intended to increase compensation for low-wage workers in nursing homes
which contract with the state. For fiscal year 2002, the department
shall add forty-five cents per patient day to the direct care rate
which would otherwise be paid to each nursing facility in accordance
with chapter 74.46 RCW. For fiscal year 2003, the department shall
increase the median price per case-mix unit for each of the applicable
peer groups by six-tenths of one percent in order to distribute the
available funds. In consultation with the statewide associations
representing nursing facilities, the department shall establish a
mechanism for testing the extent to which funds have been used for this
purpose, and report the results to the fiscal committees of the
legislature by February 1, 2002, and by December 1, 2002.

Sec. 206 2002 c 371 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ECONOMIC SERVICES
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $442,984,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($394,974,000))
$419,475,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,359,505,000))
$1,386,203,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,880,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,231,343,000))
$2,271,564,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $281,035,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2002, $277,231,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2003, $1,254,197,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation, and $31,444,000 of the general fund -- local appropriation
are provided solely for the WorkFirst program and child support
operations. WorkFirst expenditures include TANF grants, diversion
services, subsidized child care, employment and training, other
WorkFirst related services, allocated field services operating costs,
and allocated economic services program administrative costs. Within
the amounts provided in this subsection, the department shall:
(a) Continue to implement WorkFirst program improvements that are
designed to achieve progress against outcome measures specified in RCW
74.08A.410. Valid outcome measures of job retention and wage
progression shall be developed and reported quarterly to appropriate
fiscal and policy committees of the legislature for families who leave
assistance, measured after 12 months, 24 months, and 36 months. An
increased attention to job retention and wage progression is necessary
to emphasize the legislature's goal that the WorkFirst program succeed
in helping recipients gain long-term economic independence and not
cycle on and off public assistance. The wage progression measure shall
report the median percentage increase in quarterly earnings and hourly
wage after 12 months, 24 months, and 36 months. The wage progression
report shall also report the percent with earnings above one hundred
percent and two hundred percent of the federal poverty level. The
report shall compare former WorkFirst participants with similar workers
who did not participate in WorkFirst. The department shall also report
the percentage of families who have returned to temporary assistance
for needy families after 12 months, 24 months, and 36 months.
(b) Develop informational materials that educate families about the
difference between cash assistance and work support benefits. These
materials must explain, among other facts, that the benefits are
designed to support their employment, that there are no time limits on
the receipt of work support benefits, and that immigration or residency
status will not be affected by the receipt of benefits. These
materials shall be posted in all community service offices and
distributed to families. Materials must be available in multiple
languages. When a family leaves the temporary assistance for needy
families program, receives cash diversion assistance, or withdraws a
temporary assistance for needy families application, the department of
social and health services shall educate them about the difference
between cash assistance and work support benefits and offer them the
opportunity to begin or to continue receiving work support benefits, so
long as they are eligible. The department shall provide this
information through in-person interviews, over the telephone, and/or
through the mail. Work support benefits include food stamps, medicaid
for all family members, medicaid or state children's health insurance
program for children, and child care assistance. The department shall
report annually to the legislature the number of families who have had
exit interviews, been reached successfully by phone, and been sent
mail. The report shall also include the percentage of families who
elect to continue each of the benefits and the percentage found
ineligible by each substantive reason code. A substantive reason code
shall not be "other." The report shall identify barriers to informing
families about work support benefits and describe existing and future
actions to overcome such barriers.
(c) From the amounts provided in this subsection, provide $50,000
from the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
$50,000 from the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2003
to the Washington institute for public policy for continuation of the
WorkFirst evaluation database.
(d) Submit a report by December 1, 2001, to the fiscal committees
of the legislature containing a spending plan for the WorkFirst
program. The plan shall identify how spending levels in the 2001-2003
biennium will be adjusted by June 30, 2003, to be sustainable within
available federal grant levels and the carryforward level of state
funds.
(2) (($54,623,000)) $50,285,368 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and (($44,431,000)) $51,356,449 of
the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided
solely for cash assistance and other services to recipients in the
general assistance -- unemployable program. Within these amounts, the
department may expend funds for services that assist recipients to
reduce their dependence on public assistance, provided that
expenditures for these services and cash assistance do not exceed the
funds provided.
(3) $5,632,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $4,032,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for the food assistance program
for legal immigrants. The level of benefits shall be equivalent to the
benefits provided by the federal food stamp program.
(4) $48,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 is provided solely to implement chapter 111, Laws of 2001
(veterans/Philippines).
(5) The department shall apply the provisions of RCW 74.04.005(10)
to simplify resource eligibility policy, make such policy consistent
with other federal public assistance programs, and achieve the
budgetary savings assumed in this section.
(6) It is the intent of the legislature that the department shall
comply with federal requirements to maintain aggregate funding for
supplemental security income (SSI) supplemental payments. Within the
amount remaining in this section, SSI supplemental payments shall be
used for current SSI recipients who have ineligible spouses.

Sec. 207 2002 c 371 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE
ABUSE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,851,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($37,022,000))
$36,575,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($91,549,000))
$91,539,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $723,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,427,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,306,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($230,878,000))
$230,421,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $810,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $1,622,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for expansion of 35 drug and
alcohol treatment beds for persons committed under RCW 70.96A.140.
Patients meeting the commitment criteria of RCW 70.96A.140 but who
voluntarily agree to treatment in lieu of commitment shall also be
eligible for treatment in these additional treatment beds. The
department shall develop specific placement criteria for these expanded
treatment beds to ensure that this new treatment capacity is
prioritized for persons incapacitated as a result of chemical
dependency and who are also high utilizers of hospital services. These
additional treatment beds shall be located in the eastern part of the
state.
(2) $1,000,000 of the public safety and education account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for expansion of treatment for persons
gravely disabled by abuse and addiction to alcohol and other drugs
including methamphetamine.
(3) $1,083,000 of the public safety and education account -- state
appropriation and $75,000 of the violence reduction and drug
enforcement account -- state appropriation are provided solely for adult
and juvenile drug courts that have a net loss of federal grant funding
in state fiscal year 2002 and state fiscal year 2003. This
appropriation is intended to cover approximately one-half of lost
federal funding.
(4) $1,993,000 of the public safety and education account -- state
appropriation and $951,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation
are provided solely for drug and alcohol treatment for SSI clients.
The department shall continue research and post-program evaluation of
these clients to further determine the post-treatment utilization of
medical services and the service effectiveness of consolidation.
(5) $500,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 is provided solely for the
department to provide treatment for pathological gambling or training
for the treatment of pathological gambling under Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6560 (shared game lottery). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2002, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
provided to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 2338 or
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6361 (drug offender sentencing).

Sec. 208 2002 c 371 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,081,150,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,124,758,000))
$1,202,986,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,621,077,000))
$3,718,957,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($211,272,000))
$216,822,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,200,000))
$13,300,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,104,119,000))
$745,804,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,151,576,000))
$6,979,019,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department shall increase its efforts to restrain the
growth of health care costs. The appropriations in this section
anticipate that the department implements a combination of cost
containment and utilization strategies sufficient to reduce general
fund -- state costs by approximately 3 percent below the level projected
for the 2001-03 biennium in the March 2001 forecast. The department
shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by October 1,
2001, on its specific plans and semiannual targets for accomplishing
these savings. The department shall report again to the fiscal
committees by March 1, 2002, and by September 1, 2002, on actual
performance relative to the semiannual targets. If satisfactory
progress is not being made to achieve the targeted savings, the reports
shall include recommendations for additional or alternative measures to
control costs.
(2) The department shall continue to extend medicaid eligibility to
children through age 18 residing in households with incomes below 200
percent of the federal poverty level.
(3) In determining financial eligibility for medicaid-funded
services, the department is authorized to disregard recoveries by
Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds or other assets, as defined
in RCW 48.104.030.
(4) $502,000 of the health services account appropriation, $400,000
of the general fund -- private/local appropriation, and $1,676,000 of the
general fund -- federal appropriation are provided solely for
implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1058 (breast and
cervical cancer treatment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2001, or if private funding is not contributed equivalent to the
general fund -- private/local appropriation, the funds appropriated in
this subsection shall lapse.
(5) $620,000 of the health services account appropriation for
fiscal year 2002, $1,380,000 of the health services account
appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $2,000,000 of the general
fund -- federal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of
a "ticket to work" medicaid buy-in program for working persons with
disabilities, operated in accordance with the following conditions:
(a) To be eligible, a working person with a disability must have
total income which is less than 450 percent of poverty;
(b) Participants shall participate in the cost of the program by
paying (i) a monthly enrollment fee equal to fifty percent of any
unearned income in excess of the medicaid medically needy standard; and
(ii) a monthly premium equal to 5 percent of all unearned income, plus
5 percent of all earned income after disregarding the first sixty-five
dollars of monthly earnings, and half the remainder;
(c) The department shall establish more restrictive eligibility
standards than specified in this subsection to the extent necessary to
operate the program within appropriated funds;
(d) The department may require point-of-service copayments as
appropriate, except that copayments shall not be so high as to
discourage appropriate service utilization, particularly of
prescription drugs needed for the treatment of psychiatric conditions;
and
(e) The department shall establish systems for tracking and
reporting enrollment and expenditures in this program, and the prior
medical assistance eligibility status of new program enrollees. The
department shall additionally survey the prior and current employment
status and approximate hours worked of program enrollees, and report
the results to the fiscal and health care committees of the legislature
by January 15, 2003.
(6) From funds appropriated in this section, the department shall
design, implement, and evaluate pilot projects to assist individuals
with at least three different diseases to improve their health, while
reducing total medical expenditures. The projects shall involve (a)
identifying persons who are seriously or chronically ill due to a
combination of medical, social, and functional problems; and (b)
working with the individuals and their care providers to improve
adherence to state-of-the-art treatment regimens. The department shall
report to the health care and the fiscal committees of the legislature
by January 1, 2002, on the particular disease states, intervention
protocols, and delivery mechanisms it proposes to test.
(7) Sufficient funds are appropriated in this section for the
department to continue full-scope dental coverage, vision coverage, and
podiatry services for medicaid-eligible adults.
(8) The legislature reaffirms that it is in the state's interest
for Harborview medical center to remain an economically viable
component of the state's health care system.
(9) $80,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, $80,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003, and $160,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation are
provided solely for the newborn referral program to provide access and
outreach to reduce infant mortality.
(10) $30,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, $31,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003, and $62,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6020
(dental sealants). If Substitute Senate Bill No. 6020 is not enacted
by June 30, 2001, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(11) In accordance with RCW 74.46.625, (($523,600,000))
$197,179,000 of the health services account appropriation and
(($530,585,000)) $198,447,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided solely for supplemental payments to nursing
homes operated by rural public hospital districts. The payments shall
be conditioned upon (a) a contractual commitment by the association of
public hospital districts and participating rural public hospital
districts to make an intergovernmental transfer to the state treasurer,
for deposit into the health services account, equal to at least ((98))
95 percent of the supplemental payments; and (b) a contractual
commitment by the participating districts to not allow expenditures
covered by the supplemental payments to be used for medicaid nursing
home rate-setting. The participating districts shall retain no more
than a total of $20,000,000 for the 2001-03 biennium. ((If the
medicare upper payment limit revenues referenced in this subsection are
not received in an amount or within a time frame sufficient to support
spending from the health services account, the governor shall take
actions in accordance with RCW 43.88.110(8).))
(12) (($38,766,000)) $25,370,000 of the health services account
appropriation for fiscal year 2002, (($40,494,000)) $14,654,000 of the
health services account appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and
(($79,839,000)) $40,402,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation
are provided solely for additional disproportionate share and medicare
upper payment limit payments to public hospital districts.
The payments shall be conditioned upon a contractual commitment by
the participating public hospital districts to make an
intergovernmental transfer to the health services account equal to at
least 91 percent of the additional payments. ((At least 28 percent of
the amounts retained by the participating hospital districts shall be
allocated to the state's teaching hospitals.)) The state's teaching
hospitals shall retain whichever is less of (a) at least 28 percent of
the amounts retained by hospitals under these programs, or (b) the
maximum allowable under the state teaching hospitals' limits as set
forth under federal rules.
(13) $412,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, $862,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003, and $730,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1162
(small rural hospitals). If Substitute House Bill No. 1162 is not
enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(14) The department may continue to use any federal money available
to continue to provide medicaid matching funds for funds contributed by
local governments for purposes of conducting eligibility outreach to
children and underserved groups. The department shall ensure
cooperation with the anticipated audit of the school districts'
matchable expenditures for this program and advise the appropriate
legislative fiscal committees of the findings.
(15) The department shall coordinate with the health care authority
and with community and migrant health clinics to actively assist
children and immigrant adults not eligible for medicaid to enroll in
the basic health plan.
(16) $8,500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is provided solely
for settlement of Providence St. Peter's Hospital et al. vs. Department
of Social and Health Services.
(17) In consultation and coordination with the department of
health, the department shall establish mechanisms to assure that the
AIDS insurance program operates within budgeted levels. Such
mechanisms shall include a system under which the state's contribution
to the cost of coverage is adjusted on a sliding-scale basis.
(18) The department shall implement an academic detailing program
that educates prescribers on the availability of generic versions of
off-patent brand drugs. To the extent the net cost of generics, after
accounting for rebates, is less than the off-patent drug, generics will
be substituted, with the prescriber's approval, consistent with
criteria developed by the department in consultation with the state
medical association and the state pharmacists association.
(19) Within available resources, the department shall design and
initiate a general assistance medical care management project in two
counties, one in eastern Washington and one in western Washington. In
designing the project, the department shall consult with the mental
health division, migrant and community health centers, and any other
managed care provider that has the capacity to offer coordinated
medical and mental health care. The projects shall be designed in such
a way that a designated provider network is established for general
assistance clients so that care management can be maximized. The
department shall report on the design of the pilot project to the
policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by October 15, 2002.

Sec. 209 2002 c 371 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- VOCATIONAL
REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,135,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,385,000))
$9,371,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($82,235,000))
$82,185,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $360,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($103,115,000))
$103,051,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The division of vocational rehabilitation shall negotiate
cooperative interagency agreements with state and local organizations
to improve and expand employment opportunities for people with severe
disabilities.
(2) The department shall actively assist participants in the
employment support services program to obtain other employment or
training opportunities over the course of fiscal year 2003.

Sec. 210 2002 c 371 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ADMINISTRATION AND
SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,419,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,419,000))
$29,057,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,135,000))
$54,796,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $810,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($100,783,000))
$115,082,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) By November 1, 2001, the secretary shall report to the fiscal
committees of the legislature on the actions the secretary has taken,
or proposes to take, within current funding levels to resolve the
organizational problems identified in the department's February 2001
report to the legislature on current systems for billing third-party
payers for services delivered by the state psychiatric hospitals. The
secretary is authorized to transfer funds from this section to the
mental health program to the extent necessary to achieve the
organizational improvements recommended in that report.
(2) By November 1, 2001, the department shall report to the fiscal
committees of the legislature with the least costly plan for assuring
that billing and accounting technologies in the state psychiatric
hospitals adequately and efficiently comply with standards set by
third-party payers. The plan shall be developed with participation by
and oversight from the office of financial management, the department's
information systems services division, and the department of
information services.
(3) The department shall reconstitute the payment integrity program
to place greater emphasis upon the prevention of future billing errors,
ensure billing and administrative errors are treated in a manner
distinct from allegations of fraud and abuse, and shall rename the
program. In keeping with this revised focus, the department shall also
increase to one thousand dollars the cumulative total of apparent
billing errors allowed before a provider is contacted for repayment.
(4) By September 1, 2001, the department shall report to the fiscal
committees of the legislature results from the payment review program.
The report shall include actual costs recovered and estimated costs
avoided for fiscal year 2001 and the costs incurred by the department
to administer the program. The report shall document criteria and
methodology used for determining avoided costs. In addition, the
department shall seek input from health care providers and consumer
organizations on modifications to the program. The department shall
provide annual updates to the report to the fiscal committees of the
legislature by September 1st of each year for the preceding fiscal
year.
(5) The department shall implement reductions in administrative
expenditures assumed in these appropriations that achieve ongoing
savings, reduce duplicative and redundant work processes, and, where
possible, eliminate entire administrative functions and offices. The
department may transfer amounts among sections and programs to achieve
these savings provided that reductions in direct services to clients
and recipients of the department shall not be counted as administrative
reductions. The department shall report to the appropriate committees
of the legislature a spending plan to achieve these reductions by July
1, 2002, and shall report actual achieved administrative savings and
projected saving for the remainder of the biennium by December 1, 2002.

Sec. 211 2002 c 371 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,655,000
State Health Care Authority Administrative
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,032,000))
$20,215,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($538,828,000))
$515,233,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,240,000))
$3,533,000
((Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000))
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($569,800,000))
$545,636,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $6,551,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $6,550,000 of the health services account -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for health care
services provided through local community clinics.
(2) Within funds appropriated in this section and sections 205 and
206 of this 2001 act, the health care authority shall continue to
provide an enhanced basic health plan subsidy option for foster parents
licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW and workers in state-funded home care
programs. Under this enhanced subsidy option, foster parents and home
care workers with family incomes below 200 percent of the federal
poverty level shall be allowed to enroll in the basic health plan at a
cost of ten dollars per covered worker per month.
(3) The health care authority shall require organizations and
individuals which are paid to deliver basic health plan services and
which choose to sponsor enrollment in the subsidized basic health plan
to pay the following: (i) A minimum of fifteen dollars per enrollee
per month for persons below 100 percent of the federal poverty level;
and (ii) a minimum of twenty dollars per enrollee per month for persons
whose family income is 100 percent to 125 percent of the federal
poverty level.
(4) The health care authority shall solicit information from the
United States office of personnel management, health plans, and other
relevant sources, regarding the cost of implementation of mental health
parity by the federal employees health benefits program in 2001. A
progress report shall be provided to the senate and house of
representatives fiscal committees by July 1, 2002, and a final report
shall be provided to the legislature by November 15, 2002, on the study
findings.
(5) The administrator shall take at least the following actions to
assure that persons participating in the basic health plan are eligible
for the level of assistance they receive: (a) Require submission of
income tax returns and recent pay history from all applicants; (b)
check employment security payroll records at least once every twelve
months on all enrollees; (c) require enrollees whose income as
indicated by payroll records exceeds that upon which their subsidy is
based to document their current income as a condition of continued
eligibility; (d) require enrollees for whom employment security payroll
records cannot be obtained to document their current income at least
once every six months; and (e) pursue repayment and civil penalties
from persons who have received excessive subsidies, as provided in RCW
70.47.060(9).
(6) ((The health services account revenues generated by Initiative
Measure No. 773 which are appropriated in this section shall be used to
subsidize enrollments in excess of the 125,000 per month base
enrollment level as follows:
(a) $20,000,000 is provided solely for)) Enrollment is authorized
in the subsidized basic health plan of persons who, solely by reason of
their immigration status, are not eligible for medicaid coverage of
their nonemergent medical care needs. From July 2002 to October 2002,
opportunities for subsidized coverage will be offered on a phased-in
basis to this group of persons. Any entity or organization may sponsor
subsidized basic health plan enrollment.
(((b) Beginning January 1, 2003, subsidized basic health plan
coverage shall be offered on a phased-in basis to an additional 20,000
enrollees.))
(7) $3,000,000 of the health services account -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2003 is provided solely to increase the number of
persons not eligible for medicaid receiving dental care from nonprofit
community clinics, and for interpreter services to support dental and
medical services for persons for whom interpreters are not available
from any other source.
(8) The health care authority shall report to the fiscal committees
of the legislature on the costs, benefits, and feasibility of
implementing a system no later than January 1, 2004, under which the
state's contribution to the cost of employee medical coverage would be
graduated according to employee salary. Under the graduated system,
employees in higher salary ranges would pay a larger share of the cost
of their medical coverage, while those paid lower salaries would pay a
smaller percentage of their premium. The report shall be prepared in
consultation with the department of personnel and the state-supported
colleges and universities, and shall be submitted to the fiscal
committees no later than December 1, 2002.
(9) In consultation with the department of personnel and with the
state-supported colleges and universities, the health care authority
shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by October 1,
2002, a plan for expanding the availability and use of flexible
spending account plans under which employees may set aside pretax
earnings to cover their out-of-pocket medical costs. The authority is
authorized to proceed with implementation of such a plan to the extent
it can be accomplished within existing state funding levels.
(((10) $685,000 of the health services account appropriation,
$629,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation, and the medical
aid account appropriation are provided solely for implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6368 (prescription drug utilization and
education). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2002, these amounts
shall lapse.))

Sec. 212 2002 c 371 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account --
Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $460,000
Death Investigations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,148,000))
$18,177,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,756,000))
$18,785,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $124,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely to allow the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs to increase the technical and training
support provided to the local criminal justice agencies on the new
incident-based reporting system and the national incident-based
reporting system.
(2) $136,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely to allow the Washington association of
prosecuting attorneys to enhance the training provided to criminal
justice personnel.
(3) $19,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely to increase payment rates for the
criminal justice training commission's contracted food service
provider.
(4) $27,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely to increase payment rates for the
criminal justice training commission's contract with the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs.
(5) $65,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely for regionalized training programs for
school district and local law enforcement officials on school safety
issues.
(6) $450,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely for grants to be distributed by the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs for electronic
mapping of school facilities.

Sec. 213 2002 c 371 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

(1) HEADQUARTERS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,577,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,533,000))
$1,556,000
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,117,000))
$3,140,000

(2) FIELD SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,619,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,580,000))
$2,600,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $310,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,663,000))
$1,665,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,172,000))
$7,194,000

(3) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,765,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,516,000))
$5,629,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,437,000))
$27,529,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,828,000))
$22,898,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($61,546,000))
$61,821,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
terms and conditions: $2,886,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation and $5,639,000 of the general fund -- local appropriation
are provided solely for the department to acquire, establish, and
operate a nursing facility dedicated to serving men and women from
Washington who have served in the nation's armed forces.

Sec. 214 2002 c 371 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE HOME CARE QUALITY AUTHORITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($152,000))
$171,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 is provided for start-up costs of the home care
quality authority, a new state agency established by the enactment of
Initiative Measure No. 775.

Sec. 215 2002 c 371 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,337,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,940,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,520,000))
$28,460,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $297,352,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($82,912,000))
$84,212,000
Hospital Commission Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,305,000
Health Professions Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,374,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,858,000
Safe Drinking Water Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,689,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,376,000
Waterworks Operator Certification -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($622,000))
$743,000
Salmon Recovery Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $182,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,304,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $257,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,809,000
Medical Test Site Licensure Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,801,000
Youth Tobacco Prevention Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,797,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,737,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($653,217,000))
$649,578,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department or any successor agency is authorized to raise
existing fees charged to the drinking water operator certification,
newborn screening, radioactive materials, x-ray compliance, drinking
water plan review, midwifery, hearing and speech, veterinarians,
psychologists, pharmacists, hospitals, podiatrists, home health and
home care, transient accommodations licensing, adult residential
rehabilitation facilities licensing, state institution licensing,
medical test site licensing, alcoholism treatment facilities licensing,
certificate of need, and food handlers programs, in excess of the
fiscal growth factor established by Initiative Measure No. 601, if
necessary, to meet the actual costs of conducting business and the
appropriation levels in this section.
(2) $339,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, $157,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003, and the salmon recovery account appropriation are provided
solely for technical assistance to local governments and special
districts on water conservation and reuse.
(3) $1,675,000 of the general fund -- state fiscal year 2002
appropriation and $1,676,000 of the general fund -- state fiscal year
2003 appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound water work plan and agency action items, DOH-01, DOH-02,
DOH-03, and DOH-04.
(4) The department of health shall not initiate any services that
will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly
authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive,
and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not
anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require
expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts
anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated
unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services
authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides
appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state
moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this
subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the
legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(5) (($19,778,000)) $14,718,000 of the health services account--state appropriation is provided solely for the state's program of
universal access to essential childhood vaccines. The department shall
utilize all available federal funding before expenditure of these
funds.
(6) $85,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $65,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 1365 (infant and child products). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(7) From funds appropriated in this section, the state board of
health shall convene a broadly-based task force to review the available
information on the potential risks and benefits to public and personal
health and safety, and to individual privacy, of emerging technologies
involving human deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA). The board may reimburse
task force members for travel expenses according to RCW 43.03.220. The
task force shall consider information provided to it by interested
persons on: (a) The incidence of discriminatory actions based upon
genetic information; (b) strategies to safeguard civil rights and
privacy related to genetic information; (c) remedies to compensate
individuals for inappropriate use of their genetic information; and (d)
incentives for further research and development on the use of DNA to
promote public health, safety, and welfare. The task force shall
report on its findings and any recommendations to appropriate
committees of the legislature by October 1, 2002.
(8) $533,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $847,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for performance-based contracts
with local jurisdictions to assure the safety of drinking water
provided by small "group B" water systems.
(9) By October 1, 2002, the department shall establish mechanisms
to assure that the HIV early intervention services program operates
within appropriated levels. This shall include a system under which
the state's contribution to the cost of care is adjusted on a sliding-scale basis.
(10) By December 1, 2002, the department shall report to
appropriate committees of the legislature with a feasibility analysis
of implementing an electronic filing system for death certificates.
The study shall be conducted in consultation and cooperation with local
and state registrars, funeral directors, and physicians, and shall
include an analysis of applying an additional fee to death certificates
to cover the cost of developing and operating the electronic system.

Sec. 216 2002 c 371 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
The appropriations to the department of corrections in this act
shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified herein.
However, after May 1, ((2002)) 2003, after approval by the director of
financial management and unless specifically prohibited by this act,
the department may transfer general fund -- state appropriations for
fiscal year ((2002)) 2003 between programs. The director of financial
management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate
and house of representatives in writing prior to approving any
deviations from appropriation levels.

(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,786,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,434,000))
$37,933,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,576,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,254,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($78,050,000))
$79,549,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $4,623,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002, $4,623,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $3,254,000 of the
violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation are
provided solely for the replacement of the department's offender-based
tracking system. This amount is conditioned on the department
satisfying the requirements of section 902 of this act. The department
shall prepare an assessment of the fiscal impact of any changes to the
replacement project. The assessment shall:
(a) Include a description of any changes to the replacement
project;
(b) Provide the estimated costs for each component in the 2001-03
and subsequent biennia;
(c) Include a schedule that provides the time estimated to complete
changes to each component of the replacement project; and
(d) Be provided to the office of financial management, the
department of information services, the information services board, and
the staff of the fiscal committees of the senate and the house of
representatives no later than November 1, 2002.

(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $404,390,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($412,788,000))
$435,665,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,142,000))
$9,936,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,596,000
Public Health Services Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,453,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($829,369,000))
$853,040,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The department may expend funds generated by contractual
agreements entered into for mitigation of severe overcrowding in local
jails. Any funds generated in excess of actual costs shall be
deposited in the state general fund. Expenditures shall not exceed
revenue generated by such agreements and shall be treated as recovery
of costs.
(b) The department shall provide funding for the pet partnership
program at the Washington corrections center for women at a level at
least equal to that provided in the 1995-97 biennium.
(c) The department of corrections shall accomplish personnel
reductions with the least possible impact on correctional custody
staff, community custody staff, and correctional industries. For the
purposes of this subsection, correctional custody staff means employees
responsible for the direct supervision of offenders.
(d) $553,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $956,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely to increase payment rates for
contracted education providers, contracted chemical dependency
providers, and contracted work release facilities.
(e) ((During the 2001-03 biennium, when contracts are established
or renewed for offender pay phone and other telephone services provided
to inmates, the department shall select the contractor or contractors
primarily based on the following factors: (i) The lowest rate charged
to both the inmate and the person paying for the telephone call; and
(ii) the lowest commission rates paid to the department, while
providing reasonable compensation to cover the costs of the department
to provide the telephone services to inmates and provide sufficient
revenues for the activities funded from the institutional welfare
betterment account as of January 1, 2000.)) The Washington state
institute for public policy shall study whether the geographic location
of the department's facilities affects local crime rates. The
institute shall deliver a final report to the governor and the
legislature by December 31, 2003. Within the amounts appropriated
above the department shall allocate up to $30,000 to the institute
during fiscal year 2003 for the study.
(f) For the acquisition of properties and facilities, the
department of corrections is authorized to enter into financial
contracts, paid for from operating resources, for the purposes
indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW.
This authority applies to the following: Lease-develop with the option
to purchase or lease-purchase approximately 50 work release beds in
facilities throughout the state for $3,500,000.
(g) $22,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $76,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6151 (high risk sex offenders in the civil
commitment and criminal justice systems). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2001, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(h) The department may acquire a ferry for no more than $1,000,000
from Washington state ferries. Funds expended for this purpose will be
recovered from the sale of marine assets.
(((j))) (i) Within the amounts appropriated in this section,
funding is provided for the initial implementation of a medical
algorithm practice program within the department's facilities. The
program shall be designed to achieve clinical efficacy and costs
efficiency in the utilization of psychiatric drugs.

(3) COMMUNITY SUPERVISION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $68,097,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($75,720,000))
$79,273,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $870,000
Public Safety and Education
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,493,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($160,180,000))
$163,733,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The department of corrections shall accomplish personnel
reductions with the least possible impact on correctional custody
staff, community custody staff, and correctional industries. For the
purposes of this subsection, correctional custody staff means employees
responsible for the direct supervision of offenders.
(b) $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for the department of corrections
to contract with the institute for public policy for responsibilities
assigned in chapter 196, Laws of 1999 (offender accountability act) and
sections 7 through 12 of chapter 197, Laws of 1999 (drug offender
sentencing).
(c) $16,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $28,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely to increase payment rates for
contracted chemical dependency providers.
(d) $30,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $30,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5118 (interstate compact for adult offender
supervision). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $631,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . $629,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,260,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $110,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and $110,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for
transfer to the jail industries board. The board shall use the amounts
provided only for administrative expenses, equipment purchases, and
technical assistance associated with advising cities and counties in
developing, promoting, and implementing consistent, safe, and efficient
offender work programs.

(5) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,568,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,569,000))
$19,433,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($37,137,000))
$38,001,000

Sec. 217 2002 c 371 s 224 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $180,628,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,119,000
Unemployment Compensation Administration Account --
Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($194,167,000))
$194,011,000
Administrative Contingency Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,514,000))
$13,914,000
Employment Service Administrative Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,001,000))
$21,601,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($440,429,000))
$440,273,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $156,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 2355 (unemployment insurance). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2002, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) Up to $1,600,000 of the administrative contingency account--state appropriation is provided solely for administrative costs related
to the implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 2901 (unemployment
insurance). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2002, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(End of part)

PART III
NATURAL RESOURCES
Sec. 301 2002 c 371 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,404,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,283,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,805,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,351,000
Special Grass Seed Burning Research Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Reclamation Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,935,000
Flood Control Assistance Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,098,000
State Emergency Water Projects Revolving Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $878,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,287,000
State Drought Preparedness Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,575,000
Salmon Recovery Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $587,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,985,000
Wood Stove Education and Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $353,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,288,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,001,000
State Toxics Control Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000
Local Toxics Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,751,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,210,000
Underground Storage Tank Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,682,000
Environmental Excellence Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $504,000
Biosolids Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $764,000
Hazardous Waste Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,308,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,366,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,921,000
Air Operating Permit Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,608,000
Freshwater Aquatic Weeds Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,898,000
Oil Spill Response Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,078,000
Metals Mining Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($536,000))
$564,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account --
Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,802,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($318,877,000))
$318,905,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,874,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, (($3,874,000)) $2,684,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003, $394,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation, $2,070,000 of the oil spill prevention account--state appropriation, $1,190,000 of the state toxics control account,
and $3,686,000 of the water quality permit account -- state appropriation
are provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan
and agency action items DOE-01, DOE-02, DOE-03, DOE-05, DOE-06, DOE-07,
DOE-08, and DOE-09.
(2) $500,000 of the state toxics control account appropriation is
provided for an assessment of the financial assurance requirements of
hazardous waste management facilities. By September 30, 2002, the
department shall provide to the governor and appropriate committees of
the legislature a report that: (a) Evaluates current statutes and
regulations governing hazardous waste management facilities; (b)
analyzes and makes recommendations for improving financial assurance
regulatory control; and (c) makes recommendations for funding financial
assurance regulatory control of hazardous waste management facilities.
(3) $814,000 of the state drought preparedness account -- state
appropriation, $549,000 of the water quality account -- state
appropriation, and $250,000 of the salmon recovery account -- state
appropriation are provided solely for enhanced streamflow monitoring in
critical salmon recovery basins. $640,000 of this amount is provided
solely to implement the Puget Sound work plan and agency action item
DOE-01.
(4) $1,000,000 of the state toxics control account appropriation in
this section is provided solely for the department to work in
cooperation with local jurisdictions to address emerging storm water
management requirements. This work shall include developing a storm
water manual for eastern Washington, technical assistance to local
jurisdictions, and increased implementation of the department's
existing storm water program. $200,000 of this amount is provided
solely for implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency
action item DOE-06.
(5) $383,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $383,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for water conservation plan
review, technical assistance, and project review for water conservation
and reuse projects. By December 1, 2003, the department in cooperation
with the department of health shall report to the governor and
appropriate committees of the legislature on the activities and
achievements related to water conservation and reuse during the past
two biennia. The report shall include an overview of technical
assistance provided, reuse project development activities, and water
conservation achievements.
(6) $3,424,000 of the state toxics control account appropriation is
provided solely for methamphetamine lab clean up activities.
(7)(a) $800,000 of the state toxics control account appropriation
is provided solely to implement the department's persistent,
bioaccumulative toxic chemical strategy.
(b) In developing its persistent bioaccumulative toxic chemical
strategy, the department must:
(i) First develop a planned strategy for the reduction of mercury
from the environment. This strategy will be known as the mercury
chemical action plan. The development of the mercury chemical action
plan will be a model for developing all future chemical action plans;
(ii) Develop a mercury chemical action plan that includes, but is
not limited to: (A) Identifying current mercury uses in Washington;
(B) analyzing current state and federal laws, regulations, rules, and
voluntary measures that can be used to reduce or eliminate mercury; (C)
identifying mercury reduction and elimination options; and (D)
implementing actions to reduce or eliminate mercury uses and releases;
(iii) Involve an advisory committee of up to twelve members
composed of adequate and balanced representation of local government,
business, agriculture, and environmental, public health, and community
groups in the development of the mercury chemical action plan. In
addition, the department must invite and strongly encourage any
interested tribes or federal agencies to participate in the advisory
committee process. The advisory committee must be involved in the
development of the mercury chemical action plan. All information that
will serve as the basis for any decisions in the mercury chemical
action plan's development must be available to the advisory committee
members. The advisory committee has sixty days to provide input to the
department on the elements of the mercury chemical action plan. The
comments and suggestions made by the advisory committee must be
considered by the department; however, consensus of the advisory
committee is not necessary for the department to move forward in the
development of the mercury chemical action plan. All meetings of the
advisory committee are subject to the provisions of chapter 42.30 RCW.
The advisory committee for the mercury chemical action plan must be
established by April 15, 2002;
(iv) By August 31, 2002, develop and issue a draft mercury chemical
action plan in consultation with the advisory committee. Following the
release of the draft plan, the department must allow for a sixty-day
public comment period. The advisory committee, following the comment
period, shall consider the public comments received; and
(v) The department shall finalize the mercury chemical action plan
by December 31, 2002. The final mercury chemical action plan,
developed after considering the public comments and the input of the
advisory committee, must outline actions for the department to take,
including, but not limited to, the development of any rules and
recommending any legislation. Implementation must begin no later than
February 1, 2003.
(8) Up to $11,365,000 of the state toxics control account
appropriation is provided for the remediation of contaminated sites.
Of this amount, up to $2,000,000 may be used to pay existing site
remediation liabilities owed to the federal environmental protection
agency for clean-up work that has been completed. The department shall
carefully monitor actual revenue collections into the state toxics
control account, and is authorized to limit actual expenditures of the
appropriation provided in this section consistent with available
revenue.
(9) $200,000 of the state toxics control account appropriation is
provided to assess the effectiveness of the state's current toxic
pollution prevention and dangerous waste programs and policies. The
department shall work with affected stakeholder groups and the public
to evaluate the performance of existing programs, and identify feasible
methods of reducing the generation of these wastes. The department
shall report its findings to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the legislature by September 30, 2002.
(10) $1,200,000 of the state toxics control account appropriation
is provided solely for the department, in conjunction with affected
local governments, to address emergent areawide soil contamination
problems. The department's efforts will include public involvement
processes and completing assessments of the geographical extent of
toxic contamination including highly contaminated areas.
(11) $170,000 of the oil spill prevention account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of the Puget Sound work plan action
item UW-02 through a contract with the University of Washington's sea
grant program to develop an educational program targeted to small
spills from commercial fishing vessels, ferries, cruise ships, ports,
and marinas.
(12) $1,500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, $1,500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003, and $3,000,000 of the water quality account
appropriation are provided solely to implement chapter 237, Laws of
2001 (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1832, water resources
management) and to support the processing of applications for changes
and transfers of existing water rights.
(13) $9,000,000 of the water quality account -- state appropriation
is provided solely for grants to local governments to conduct watershed
planning and technical assistance. At least $7,000,000 shall be
distributed as grants and shall include $200,000 for facilitation of
the central Puget Sound regional initiative.
(14) $3,114,000 of the water quality account appropriation is
provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1832
(water resources management). Of this amount: (a) $1,200,000 is
provided for grants to local governments for targeted watershed
assessments consistent with Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1832;
and (b) the remainder of the funding is provided solely for development
of a state environmental policy act template to streamline
environmental review, creation of a blue ribbon panel to develop long-term watershed planning implementation funding options, and technical
assistance.
(15) $200,000 of the water quality account appropriation is
provided solely to provide coordination and assistance to groups
established for the purpose of protecting, enhancing, and restoring the
biological, chemical, and physical processes of watersheds. These
groups may include those involved in coordinated resource management,
regional fisheries enhancement groups, conservation districts,
watershed councils, and private nonprofit organizations incorporated
under Title 24 RCW.
(16) $325,000 of the state drought preparedness account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for an environmental impact statement
of the Pine Hollow reservoir project to be conducted in conjunction
with the local irrigation district.
(17) $1,352,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, $700,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003, $700,000 of the water quality account appropriation, and
$280,000 of the oil spill prevention account appropriation are provided
solely for oil spill prevention measures in Puget Sound. Of these
amounts:
(a) The general fund appropriation and the water quality account
appropriation are provided solely for the department of ecology to
provide for charter safety tug services, including the placement of a
dedicated tug at Neah Bay for not less than 200 days in fiscal year
2002 and fiscal year 2003. By January 10, 2002, the department shall
report to the appropriate committees of the legislature regarding the
number of dispatches, response time and distance, and other factors
pertaining to the safety tug services. The general fund -- state
appropriation in this subsection is provided solely for implementation
of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action item DOE-09;
(b) $100,000 of the oil spill prevention account appropriation is
provided solely for the department to conduct a vessel transponder
feasibility study for Washington waters and undertake a trial vessel
tracking program using transponders. In conducting the feasibility
study and trial program, the department of ecology shall consult with
state pilotage authorities, the maritime industry and the United States
coast guard; and
(c) $180,000 of the oil spill prevention account appropriation is
provided solely to acquire vessel incident reporting information.
The governor shall request the federal government to provide
ongoing resources to station a dedicated rescue tug at Neah Bay.
(18) $600,000 of the water quality account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for setting instream flows in six basins not currently
planning under the watershed planning act.
(19) $200,000 of the water quality account appropriation is
provided solely for activities associated with development of the
Willapa River total maximum daily load (TMDL). The activities shall
include but are not limited to: (a) A contract with Pacific county to
complete the oxygen/bacteria and temperature model for the TMDL,
conduct a technical analysis of local options for waste load
allocations, and develop the first draft of the waste load allocation
plan; and (b) a contract for facilitation services for a public process
for the TMDL, assist in reaching consensus between parties involved in
the technical work, help ensure that there is an accurate public
record, and provide a forum for the waste load allocation.
(20) $175,000 of the biosolids permit account is provided solely to
develop a statewide septage strategy. The department shall work with
affected stakeholders to address septage permit requirements, changes
to existing rules, clarification of state and local responsibilities,
and fee structure changes that are necessary to support the program in
future biennia. The department shall report its findings to the
governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30,
2003.
(21) $189,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 is provided solely for facilitation services and the
following activities:
(a)(i) A joint task force is created to study judicial and
administrative alternatives for resolving water disputes. The task
force shall be organized and led by the office of the attorney general.
In addition to the office of the attorney general, members of the task
force shall include:
(A) Representatives of the legislature, including one member from
each caucus appointed by the president of the senate and the speaker of
the house of representatives;
(B) Representatives of the superior courts appointed by the
president of the superior court judges association, and shall include
two judicial officers of the superior court from eastern Washington and
two judicial officers of the superior court from western Washington;
(C) A representative of the state court of appeals appointed by the
chief justice of the state supreme court;
(D) A representative of the environmental hearings office; and
(E) A representative of the department of ecology.
(ii) The objectives of the task force are to:
(A) Examine and characterize the types of water disputes to be
resolved;
(B) Examine the approach of other states to water dispute
resolution;
(C) Recommend one or more methods to resolve water disputes,
including, but not limited to, an administrative resolution process; a
judicial resolution process such as water court; or any combination
thereof; and
(D) Recommend an implementation plan that will address:
(I) A specific administrative structure for each method used to
resolve water disputes;
(II) The cost to implement the plan; and
(III) The changes to statutes and administrative rules necessary to
implement the plan.
(iii) The office of the attorney general shall work with the staff
of the standing committees of the legislature with jurisdiction over
water resources to research and compile information relevant to the
mission of the task force by December 31, 2002.
(iv) The task force shall submit its report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature no later than December 30, 2003.
(b) The department of ecology and the attorney general's office
shall conduct a study to identify possible ways to streamline the water
right general adjudication procedures. By December 1, 2002, the
agencies will report on their findings and recommendations to the
legislature.
(c)(i) The legislature finds that it is in the public interest to
investigate the feasibility of conducting negotiations with other
states and Canada regarding use of water bodies they share with the
state of Washington.
(ii) The governor, or the governor's designee, shall consult with
the states that share water bodies with the state of Washington, with
Canada, and with other states that have conducted similar negotiations,
regarding issues and strategies in those negotiations and shall report
to the standing committees of the legislature having jurisdiction over
water resources by January 1, 2003.
(iii) In conducting the consultations under this subsection (c),
the governor shall give priority consideration to the interstate issues
affecting the Spokane-Rathdrum Prairie aquifer including those issues
affecting a safe and adequate supply of public drinking water, as
provided by municipal governments.
(d) By October 1, 2002, the department of ecology shall provide to
the appropriate standing committees of the legislature, a plan,
schedule, and budget for improving the administration of water right
records held by the department of ecology. The department of ecology
shall work with the department of revenue and with county auditors in
developing recommendations for improving the administration of water
rights ownership information and integrating this information with real
property ownership records. The department of ecology shall evaluate
the need for grants to counties to assist with recording and
information management needs related to water rights ownership and
title.
(22) For applicants that meet eligibility requirements, the
department of ecology shall consider individual stormdrain treatment
systems to be classified as "activity" projects and eligible for grant
funding provided under section 319 the federal Clean Water Act. These
projects shall be prioritized for funding along with other grant
proposals. Receipt of funding shall be based on this prioritization.

Sec. 302 2002 c 371 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,198,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,340,000))
$30,356,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,690,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000
Winter Recreation Program Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,087,000
Off Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $274,000
Snowmobile Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,682,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $337,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,000
Salmon Recovery Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Water Trail Program Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,193,000))
$27,733,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($99,132,000))
$99,688,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Fees approved by the state parks and recreation commission in
the 2001-03 biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor
under RCW 43.135.055.
(2) The state parks and recreation commission, in collaboration
with the office of financial management and legislative staff, shall
develop a cost-effective and readily accessible approach for reporting
revenues and expenditures at each state park. The reporting system
shall be complete and operational by December 1, 2001.
(3) $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003, and $8,000 of the winter recreation program account -- state
appropriation are provided solely for a grant for the operation of the
Northwest avalanche center.
(4) $432,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account
appropriation is provided for the operation of the Silver Lake visitor
center. If a long-term management agreement is not reached with the
U.S. forest service by September 30, 2001, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(5) $189,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan
and agency action item P+RC-02.
(6) The task force on the funding of state parks and outdoor
recreation is hereby created, to consider and develop legislation on
the operation and funding of the state parks and outdoor recreation
programs of the state. The committee shall be composed of fifteen
members, four members of the senate appointed by the president of the
senate and to include two members from each caucus, four members of the
house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives and to include two members from each caucus, three
members appointed by the governor and to include at least one
representative of a broad coalition of users of the state's parks and
outdoor recreation programs, one member appointed by the commissioner
of public lands, one member appointed by the chair of the fish and
wildlife commission, and one member appointed by the chair of the state
parks and recreation commission, and one member appointed by the
interagency committee for outdoor recreation. The task force shall
elect its own officers, shall be staffed by staff of the legislature,
the executive agencies, and the office of the governor, and may appoint
an advisory committee of additional persons and organizations
interested in the operation and funding of state parks and outdoor
recreation. The task force shall specifically review and incorporate
into its work the reports prepared pursuant to budget provisos by the
Washington state parks and recreation commission regarding its
operating budget needs, deferred maintenance backlog, and capital
facilities renovation and replacement requirements. The task force
shall prepare recommendations for improving the operation of state
parks and outdoor recreation programs and for securing adequate funding
on a permanent basis for supporting the needs of the state parks and
outdoor recreation programs of the state, including a legislative
proposal for the implementation of an evergreen recreation pass that
would combine the various permits and licenses of the participating
agencies into a single pass for recreational day use. The
recommendations shall be developed no later than January 1, 2003, and
shall be designed for enactment by the legislature during 2003 for
implementation in the 2005-07 biennium. The task force shall cease to
exist on June 30, 2003.

Sec. 303 2002 c 371 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,375,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($44,334,000))
$44,421,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($37,716,000))
$46,242,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,365,000))
$29,039,000
Off Road Vehicle Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $475,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,133,000))
$5,366,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $574,000
Recreational Fisheries Enhancement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,354,000
Salmon Recovery Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,612,000
Warm Water Game Fish Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,567,000
Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,680,000))
$50,925,000
Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,182,000))
$29,656,000
Wildlife Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,133,000))
$10,459,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,941,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,591,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000
Environmental Excellence Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
Regional Fisheries Salmonid Recovery Account --
Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,750,000
Oil Spill Administration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $963,000
Oyster Reserve Land Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $135,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($285,995,000))
$286,560,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,682,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $1,189,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound work plan and agency action items DFW-01 through DFW-07.
(2) $200,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $200,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for the department to update the
salmon and steelhead stock inventory.
(3) $250,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $250,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for the department to implement a
hatchery endangered species act response. The response shall include
emergency hatchery responses, production, and retrofitting of
hatcheries for salmon recovery.
(4) $600,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $600,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for local salmon recovery
technical assistance.
(5) $250,000 of the salmon recovery account appropriation is
provided solely for a grant to the lower Skykomish River habitat
conservation group for the purpose of developing a salmon recovery
plan, in coordination with the lead entity established under chapter
77.85 RCW for that area. The salmon recovery plan must be consistent
with the regional recovery plans of the Puget Sound shared strategy and
criteria developed by the department for the regional salmon recovery
planning program.
(6) $91,000 of the warm water game fish account appropriation is
provided solely for warm water fish culture at the Rod Meseberg warm
water fish production facility.
(7) $200,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $200,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely to fund three cooperative
compliance programs, both in Western and Eastern Washington. The
cooperative compliance program shall conduct fish screen, fish way, and
fish passage barrier assessments and correction plans for landowners
seeking cooperative compliance agreements with the department.
(8) $1,300,000 of the salmon recovery account appropriation,
$400,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2003,
and $5,000,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation are provided
solely for economic adjustment assistance to fishermen pursuant to the
1999 Pacific salmon treaty agreement.
(9) $810,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, $790,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003, and $250,000 of the wildlife account -- state appropriation
are provided solely for enforcement and biological staff to respond and
take appropriate action to public complaints regarding bear and cougar.
(10) $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 is provided solely to the department to execute an
interagency agreement with the joint legislative audit and review
committee to complete an independent organizational and operational
review of the fish management division of the fish program. This
review shall include:
(a) Identifying those actual functions carried out by the fish
management division, including all expenditures by fund source linked
to those functions, and the agency's rationale for its current staffing
and expenditure levels;
(b) Distinguishing those specific division activities and
expenditures that are mandated by court decisions, federal laws or
treaties, federal contracts, state laws, and fish and wildlife
commission directives, as apart from department discretionary policies;
(c) Reviewing the extent to which division activities and related
program expenditures contribute to meeting legislative intent, agency
goals, and programmatic objectives; and
(d) Evaluating how performance in meeting intent, goals, and
objectives through program activities is measured, reported, and
improved.
The committee shall provide a status report on this review to the
appropriate legislative policy and fiscal committees by November 1,
2002, and a final report by December 1, 2003.
(11) The department shall implement a lands program manager
consolidation program. The consolidation program shall target the
department's south central region. The savings from this consolidation
shall be used by the department for additional maintenance on agency
lands within the south central region.
(12) The department shall implement a survey of all agency lands to
evaluate whether agency lands support the agency's strategic plan and
goals. The department shall submit a report to the governor and
legislature by September 1, 2002, identifying those lands not
conforming with the agency's strategic plan and which should be
divested.
(13) $388,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $388,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely to implement the forests and fish
agreement and includes funding to continue statewide coordination and
implementation of the forests and fish rules, integration of portions
of the hydraulic code into the forest practices rules to provide permit
streamlining, and sharing the responsibility of developing and
implementing the required forests and fish agreement monitoring and
adaptive management program.
(14) $194,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $195,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for staff to represent the state's
fish and wildlife interests in hydroelectric project relicensing
processes by the federal energy regulatory commission.
(15) $156,000 of the wildlife account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for a youth fishing coordinator to develop partnerships
with local communities, and to identify, develop, fund, and promote
youth fishing events and opportunities. Event coordination and
promotion services shall be contracted to a private consultant.
(16) $135,000 of the oyster reserve land account appropriation is
provided solely to implement chapter 273, Laws of 2001, Engrossed
Second Substitute House Bill No. 1658 (state oyster reserve lands).
(17) $43,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $42,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for staffing and operation of the
Tennant Lake interpretive center.
(18) $32,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $33,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely to support the activities of the
aquatic nuisance species coordination committee to foster state,
federal, tribal, and private cooperation on aquatic nuisance species
issues. The committee shall strive to prevent the introduction of
nonnative aquatic species and to minimize the spread of species that
are introduced.
(19) $25,000 of the wildlife account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the WildWatchCam program to provide internet
transmission of live views of wildlife.
(20) $8,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $7,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for the payment of the
department's share of approved lake management district assessments.
By December 15, 2001, the department shall provide the legislature a
summary of its activities related to lake management districts as well
as recommendations for establishing equitable lake management district
assessments.
(21) The department shall emphasize enforcement of laws related to
protection of fish habitat and the illegal harvest of salmon and
steelhead. Within the amount provided for the agency, the department
shall provide support to the department of health to enforce state
shellfish harvest laws.
(22) The fish and wildlife commission shall evaluate the adequacy,
structure, and amount of fees for hunting and fishing licenses and make
recommendations for revision of the fee structure and schedule as
appropriate. The evaluation shall consider, but is not limited to:
Assessment of the fish and wildlife resource management needs, fees in
adjacent states and countries, and efficiencies made possible through
automation. The commission shall report to the legislature and the
office of financial management by November 1, 2002.
(23) The department shall establish a hydraulic project approval
program technical review task force. The task force shall be composed
of a balanced representation of both hydraulic project proponents and
conservation interests. The task force shall conduct a thorough
evaluation of the hydraulic project approval program and make
recommendations to the legislature by November 30, 2002, based upon its
evaluation. The task force recommendations shall include a potential
fee structure and schedule for hydraulic project approval permits.

Sec. 304 2002 c 371 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,949,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,465,000))
$47,045,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,936,000))
$20,593,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,265,000
Forest Development Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,088,000
Off Road Vehicle Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,684,000
Surveys and Maps Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,689,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,923,000
Resources Management Cost Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $79,156,000
Surface Mining Reclamation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,416,000
Salmon Recovery Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $625,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,900,000
Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,056,000
Natural Resource Conservation Areas Stewardship
Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $209,000
State Toxics Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,865,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $629,000
Metals Mining Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,000
Agricultural College Trust Management Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,790,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($89,000))
$289,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($230,798,000))
$257,235,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $18,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, $18,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003, and $998,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account
appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the Puget
Sound work plan and agency action items DNR-01, DNR-02, and DNR-04.
(2)(a) $625,000 of the salmon recovery account appropriation,
$1,250,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year
2002, $1,250,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003, and $2,900,000 of the water quality account -- state
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of chapter 4, Laws
of 1999 sp. sess. (forest practices and salmon recovery).
(b) $250,000 of the salmon recovery account appropriation is
provided solely for and shall be expended to develop a small forest
landowner data base in ten counties. $150,000 of the amount in this
subsection shall be used to purchase the data. $100,000 of the amount
in this subsection shall purchase contracted analysis of the data.
(3) $2,000,000 of the forest development account appropriation is
provided solely for road decommissioning, maintenance, and repair in
the Lake Whatcom watershed.
(4) $543,000 of the forest fire protection assessment account
appropriation, $22,000 of the forest development account appropriation,
and $76,000 of the resource management cost account appropriation are
provided solely to implement chapter 279, Laws of 2001, Substitute
House Bill No. 2104, (modifying forest fire protection assessments).
(5) $354,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $895,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 shall be transferred to the agricultural college trust
management account and are provided solely to manage approximately
70,700 acres of Washington State University's agricultural college
trust lands.
(6) $4,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year
2002 and $4,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 are provided solely to compensate the forest board trust for
a portion of the lease to the Crescent television improvement district
consistent with RCW 79.12.055.
(7) $828,000 of the surface mine reclamation account appropriation
is provided to implement Engrossed House Bill No. 1845 (surface mining
fees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2001, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $800,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation
and $200,000 of the resources management cost account appropriation are
provided solely to improve asset management on state-owned aquatic
lands. The department shall streamline the use authorization process
for businesses operating on state-owned aquatic lands and issue
decisions on 325 pending lease applications by June 30, 2003. The
department, in consultation with the attorney general, shall develop a
strategic program to resolve claims related to contaminated sediments
on state-owned aquatic lands.
(9) $246,000 of the resource management cost account appropriation
is provided to the department for continuing control of spruce budworm.
(10) $100,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account is provided
solely for the development and initial implementation of a statewide
management plan for marine reserves.
(11) $7,657,859 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and (($4,153,859)) $20,733,859 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for emergency
fire suppression.
(12) $7,216,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $6,584,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for fire protection activities and
to implement provisions of the 1997 tridata fire program review.
(13) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, $550,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account -- state
appropriation, and $209,000 of the natural resources conservation areas
stewardship account -- state appropriation are provided solely to the
department for planning, management, and stewardship of natural area
preserves and natural resources conservation areas.
(14) $187,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $188,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely to the department for maintenance
and stewardship of public lands.
(15) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003, and $400,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account
appropriation are provided solely for spartina control.
(16) Fees approved by the board of natural resources for filing and
recording surveys are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor
under RCW 43.135.055 for 2002.
(17) The entire state toxics control account appropriation is
provided solely for the department to meet its settlement obligation
with the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency for the clean-up of the
Thea Foss Waterway.
(((19))) (18) $250,000 of the resource management cost account--state appropriation and $250,000 of the forest development account--
state appropriation are deposited in the contract harvesting revolving
account -- nonappropriated to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 6257
(contract harvesting). If Substitute Senate Bill No. 6257 is not
enacted the deposit in this subsection shall not occur.
(((20))) (19) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the
department shall review the current procedures used to mobilize
resources to fight forest fires under the state mobilization plan and
through the department of natural resources. The review must include
recommendations to ensure that the people closest to a fire are called
first, to allow private contractors to be mobilized under the state
mobilization plan, and to identify other efficiencies. The department
shall review recent studies regarding ways to improve forest fire
fighting in the state. The department shall consult with
representatives of private contractors, fire districts, municipal fire
departments, the state fire marshal, appropriate federal agencies, and
other interested groups in developing the recommendations. The
department shall report their findings and recommendations to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2003.
(((21))) (20) $4,000,000 of the resource management cost account
appropriation is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 79.64.020 and
is contingent upon the establishment, management, and protection of the
following marine reserves: Tidelands and bedlands adjacent to Cherry
Point in Whatcom county; tidelands and bedlands surrounding Maury
Island in King county; tidelands, bedlands, harbor areas, and waterways
adjacent to the Puyallup River delta, within Commencement Bay in Pierce
county; tidelands and bedlands surrounding Cypress Island in Skagit
county; and tidelands and bedlands within Fidalgo Bay in Skagit county.
(((22))) (21) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the
department shall update the Washington State University asset
diversification plan to diversify at least ten percent of the
commercial forest land base within ten years and report recommendations
for implementing the plan to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2002.

Sec. 305 2002 c 371 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,815,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,434,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,441,000
General fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,110,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,304,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,917,000))
$2,484,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,021,000))
$28,588,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $36,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $37,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for implementation of the Puget
Sound work plan and agency action item DOA-01.
(2) $1,077,000 of the state toxics control account appropriation
and $298,000 of the agricultural local account are provided solely to
establish a program to monitor pesticides in surface water, sample and
analyze surface waters for pesticide residues, evaluate pesticide
exposure on salmon species listed under the provisions of the
endangered species act, and implement actions needed to protect
salmonids.
(3) $1,480,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account
appropriation is provided solely to initiate a plan to eradicate
infestations of spartina in Puget Sound, Hood Canal, and Grays Harbor
and begin the reduction in spartina infestations in Willapa Bay.
(4) $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003, and $150,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation are
provided solely to the small farm and direct marketing program to
support small farms in complying with federal, state, and local
regulations, facilitating access to food processing centers, and
assisting with grant funding requests.
(5) $700,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation and
$700,000 of the general fund -- private/local appropriation are provided
solely to implement chapter 324, Laws of 2001 (Substitute House Bill
No. 1891, marketing of agriculture).
(6) (($450,000)) $242,000 of the state toxics control account--state appropriation is provided solely for deposit in the agricultural
local nonappropriated account for the plant pest account to reimburse
county horticultural pest and disease boards for the costs of pest
control activities, including tree removal, conducted under their
existing authorities in chapters 15.08 and 15.09 RCW.
(7) The district manager for district two as defined in WAC 16-458-075 shall transfer four hundred fifty thousand dollars from the fruit
and vegetable district fund to the plant pest account within the
agricultural local fund. The amount transferred must be derived from
fees collected for state inspections of tree fruits and shall be used
solely to reimburse county horticultural pest and disease boards in
district two for the cost of pest control activities, including tree
removal, conducted under their existing authority in chapters 15.08 and
15.09 RCW. The transfer of funds shall occur by July 1, 2001. On June
30, 2003, any unexpended portion of the four hundred fifty thousand
dollars shall be returned to the fruit and vegetable district fund.

(End of part)

PART IV
TRANSPORTATION
Sec. 401 2002 c 371 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,366,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,300,000))
$5,417,000
Architects' License Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($684,000))
$688,000
Cemetery Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($200,000))
$203,000
Professional Engineers' Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,102,000))
$3,123,000
Real Estate Commission -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,837,000))
$6,895,000
Master License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,278,000))
$8,314,000
Uniform Commercial Code Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,900,000))
$2,916,000
Real Estate Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $276,000
Funeral Directors and Embalmers Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($459,000))
$461,000
Washington Real Estate Research Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $307,000
Geologists' Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Data Processing Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $86,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,818,000))
$34,077,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: In accordance with RCW 43.24.086, it is
the policy of the state of Washington that the cost of each
professional, occupational, or business licensing program be fully
borne by the members of that profession, occupation, or business. For
each licensing program covered by RCW 43.24.086, the department shall
set fees at levels sufficient to fully cover the cost of administering
the licensing program, including any costs associated with policy
enhancements funded in the 2001-03 fiscal biennium. Pursuant to RCW
43.135.055, during the 2001-03 fiscal biennium, the department may
increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor if the increases
are necessary to fully fund the costs of the licensing programs.

Sec. 402 2002 c 371 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PATROL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,567,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,933,000))
$8,370,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,178,000))
$4,818,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $369,000
Death Investigations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,024,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,769,000))
$14,810,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,870,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,367,000
Fire Service Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000
Fire Service Training Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,328,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $461,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $274,000
Fingerprint Identification Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,316,000))
$6,028,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($69,581,000))
$71,411,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $354,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely for additional law enforcement and
security coverage on the west capitol campus.
(2) When a program within the agency is supported by more than one
fund and one of the funds is the state general fund, the agency shall
charge its expenditures in such a manner as to ensure that each fund is
charged in proportion to its support of the program. The agency may
adopt guidelines for the implementation of this subsection. The
guidelines may account for federal matching requirements, budget
provisos, or other requirements to spend other moneys in a particular
manner.
(3) $100,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5896 (DNA testing of evidence). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2001, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(4) $1,419,000 of the public safety and education account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for combating the proliferation of
methamphetamine labs. The amounts in this subsection are provided
solely for the following activities: (a) The establishment of a
regional methamphetamine enforcement, training, and education program;
(b) additional members for the statewide methamphetamine incident
response team; and (c) two forensic scientists with the necessary
equipment to perform lab analysis in the crime laboratory division.
(5) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
provided to implement Substitute House Bill No. 2468 (offender DNA
database).

(End of part)

PART V
EDUCATION
Sec. 501 2002 c 371 s 501 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

(1) STATE AGENCY OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,302,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($53,760,000))
$15,248,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($78,062,000))
$39,550,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $11,385,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $11,101,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of
the office of the superintendent of public instruction. Of this
amount, a maximum of $350,000 is provided in each fiscal year for
upgrading information systems including the general apportionment and
student information systems.
(b) $486,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $481,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of
the state board of education, including basic education assistance
activities. Of the general fund -- state appropriation, $100,000 is
provided solely for certificate of mastery development and validation.
(c) $431,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $418,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of
the Washington professional educator standards board.
(d) $49,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2003 is provided solely to support the joint task force on local
effort assistance created by House Bill No. 3011.

(2) STATEWIDE PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,280,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,990,000))
$9,898,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($85,395,000))
$139,140,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($112,665,000))
$166,318,000

The appropriations in this subsection are provided solely for the
statewide programs specified in this subsection and are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(a) HEALTH AND SAFETY
(i) A maximum of $150,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2002 is provided for alcohol and drug prevention
programs pursuant to RCW 66.08.180.
(ii) A maximum $2,621,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2002 and a maximum of $2,542,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided for a corps of
nurses located at educational service districts, as determined by the
superintendent of public instruction, to be dispatched to the most
needy schools to provide direct care to students, health education, and
training for school staff.
(iii) A maximum of $100,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and a maximum of $97,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided to
create a school safety center subject to the following conditions and
limitations.
(A) The safety center shall: Disseminate successful models of
school safety plans and cooperative efforts; provide assistance to
schools to establish a comprehensive safe school plan; select models of
cooperative efforts that have been proven successful; act as an
information dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs
in a school district either in Washington or in another state;
coordinate activities relating to school safety; review and approve
manuals and curricula used for school safety models and training; and
develop and maintain a school safety information web site.
(B) The school safety center shall be established in the office of
the superintendent of public instruction. The superintendent of public
instruction shall participate in a school safety center advisory
committee that includes representatives of educators, classified staff,
principals, superintendents, administrators, the American society for
industrial security, the state criminal justice training commission,
and others deemed appropriate and approved by the school safety center
advisory committee. Members of the committee shall be chosen by the
groups they represent. In addition, the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs shall appoint representatives of law
enforcement to participate on the school safety center advisory
committee. The advisory committee shall select a chair.
(C) The school safety center advisory committee shall develop a
training program, using the best practices in school safety, for all
school safety personnel.
(iv) A maximum of $113,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2002 and a maximum of $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided for a school
safety training program provided by the criminal justice training
commission subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(A) The criminal justice training commission with assistance of the
school safety center advisory committee established in section
2(b)(iii) of this section shall develop manuals and curricula for a
training program for all school safety personnel.
(B) The Washington state criminal justice training commission, in
collaboration with the advisory committee, shall provide the school
safety training for all school administrators and school safety
personnel, including school safety personnel hired after the effective
date of this section.
(v) A maximum of $250,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2002 and a maximum of $243,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided for training in
school districts regarding the prevention of bullying and harassment.
The superintendent of public instruction shall use the funds to develop
a model bullying and harassment prevention policy and training
materials for school and educational service districts. The
information may be disseminated in a variety of ways, including
workshops and other staff development activities such as videotape or
broadcasts.
(vi) A maximum of $6,048,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided for a safety allocation
to districts subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(A) The funds shall be allocated at a maximum rate of $6.36 per
year per full-time equivalent K-12 student enrolled in each school
district in the prior school year.
(B) Districts shall expend funds allocated under this section to
develop and implement strategies identified in a comprehensive safe
school plan pursuant to House Bill No. 1818 (student safety) or Senate
Bill No. 5543 (student safety). If neither bill is enacted by June 30,
2001, expenditures of the safety allocation shall be subject to (i),
(ii), and (iii) of this subsection (a)(vi)(B).
(i) School districts shall use the funds for school safety purposes
and are encouraged to prioritize the use of funds allocated under this
section for the development, by September 1, 2002, of school-based
comprehensive safe school plans that include prevention, intervention,
all-hazards/crisis response, and post crisis recovery components. When
developing comprehensive safe school plans, school districts are
encouraged to use model school safety plans as developed by the school
safety center. Implementation of comprehensive safe school plans may
include, but is not limited to, employing or contracting for building
security monitors in schools during school hours and school events;
research-based early prevention and intervention programs; training for
school staff, including security personnel; equipment; school safety
hotlines; before, during, and after-school student and staff safety;
minor building renovations related to student and staff safety and
security; and other purposes identified in the comprehensive safe
school plan.
(ii) Each school may conduct an evaluation of its comprehensive
safe school plan and conduct reviews, drills, or simulated practices in
coordination with local fire, law enforcement, and medical emergency
management agencies.
(iii) By September 1, 2002, school districts shall provide the
superintendent of public instruction information regarding the purposes
for which the safety allocation funding was used and the status of the
comprehensive safe school plans for the schools in the school district.
(vii) A maximum of $200,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002, a maximum of $194,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2003, and $400,000 of
the general fund -- federal appropriation transferred from the department
of health are provided for a program that provides grants to school
districts for media campaigns promoting sexual abstinence and
addressing the importance of delaying sexual activity, pregnancy, and
childbearing until individuals are ready to nurture and support their
children. Grants to the school districts shall be for projects that
are substantially designed and produced by students. The grants shall
require a local private sector match equal to one-half of the state
grant, which may include in-kind contribution of technical or other
assistance from consultants or firms involved in public relations,
advertising, broadcasting, and graphics or video production or other
related fields.
(viii) A maximum of $150,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and a maximum of $145,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided for
a nonviolence and leadership training program provided by the institute
for community leadership. The program shall provide the following:
(A) Statewide nonviolence leadership coaches training program for
certification of educational employees and community members in
nonviolence leadership workshops;
(B) Statewide leadership nonviolence student exchanges, training,
and speaking opportunities for student workshop participants; and
(C) A request for proposal process, with up to 80 percent funding,
for nonviolence leadership workshops serving at least 12 school
districts with direct programming in 36 elementary, middle, and high
schools throughout Washington state.
(ix) A maximum of $1,500,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided for school district
petitions to juvenile court for truant students as provided in RCW
28A.225.030 and 28A.225.035. Allocation of this money to school
districts shall be based on the number of petitions filed.
(b) TECHNOLOGY
(i) A maximum of $2,000,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and a maximum of $1,940,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided for
K-20 telecommunications network technical support in the K-12 sector to
prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school utilization
of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the
network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced
technical support for the network. A maximum of $650,000 of this
amount may be expended for state-level administration and staff
training on the K-20 network.
(ii) A maximum of $617,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2002 and a maximum of $1,079,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided for the
Washington state leadership assistance for science education reform
(LASER) regional partnership coordinated at the Pacific Science Center.
(c) GRANTS AND ALLOCATIONS
(i) A maximum of $25,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2002 and a maximum of $1,916,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided for Senate Bill
No. 5695 (alternative certification routes). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2001, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse. The stipend allocation per teacher candidate and mentor pair
shall not exceed $28,300. The professional educator standards board
shall report to the education committees of the legislature by December
15, 2002, on the districts applying for partnership grants, the
districts receiving partnership grants, and the number of interns per
route enrolled in each district.
(ii) A maximum of $31,500 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2002 and a maximum of $31,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided for operation of
the Cispus environmental learning center.
(iii) A maximum of $150,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and a maximum of $146,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided for
the Washington civil liberties education program.
(iv) A maximum of $2,150,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided for complex need grants.
The maximum grants for eligible districts are specified in LEAP
Document 30C as developed on April 27, 1997, at 03:00 hours.
(v) A maximum of $1,377,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002 is provided for educational centers,
including state support activities. $50,000 of this amount for fiscal
year 2002 is provided to help stabilize funding through distribution
among existing education centers that are currently funded by the state
at an amount less than $50,000 a fiscal year.
(vi) A maximum of $50,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2002 is provided for an organization in southwest
Washington that received funding from the Spokane educational center in
the 1995-97 biennium and provides educational services to students who
have dropped out of school.
(vii) A maximum of $1,262,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and a maximum of $1,224,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided for
in-service training and educational programs conducted by the Pacific
Science Center.
(viii) A maximum of $100,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and a maximum of $97,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided to
support vocational student leadership organizations.
(ix) (($9,900,000)) $13,955,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation is provided for the Washington Reads project to enhance
high quality reading instruction and school programs.
(x) A maximum of $150,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2002 and a maximum of $146,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided for the World War
II oral history project.
(xi) $13,942,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for school renovation grants for school districts with urgent
school renovation needs, special education-related renovations, and
technology related renovations.
(xii) (($4,962,000)) $4,698,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation is provided for LINKS technology challenge grants to
integrate educational reform with state technology systems and
development of technology products that enhance professional
development and classroom instruction.
(xiii) (($536,000)) $1,763,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation is provided for the advanced placement fee program to
increase opportunities for low-income students and under-represented
populations to participate in advanced placement courses and to
increase the capacity of schools to provide advanced placement courses
to students.
(xiv) (($12,318,000)) $8,197,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation is provided for comprehensive school reform demonstration
projects to provide grants to low-income schools for improving student
achievement through adoption and implementation of research-based
curricula and instructional programs.
(xv) (($2,612,000)) $2,473,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation is provided for teacher quality enhancement through
provision of consortia grants to school districts and higher education
institutions to improve teacher preparation and professional
development.

Sec. 502 2002 c 371 s 502 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR GENERAL APPORTIONMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,786,124,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,711,897,000))
$3,719,663,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,498,021,000))
$7,505,787,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) Allocations for certificated staff salaries for the 2001-02 and
2002-03 school years shall be determined using formula-generated staff
units calculated pursuant to this subsection. Staff allocations for
small school enrollments in (d) through (f) of this subsection shall be
reduced for vocational full-time equivalent enrollments. Staff
allocations for small school enrollments in grades K-6 shall be the
greater of that generated under (a) of this subsection, or under (d)
and (e) of this subsection. Certificated staffing allocations shall be
as follows:
(a) On the basis of each 1,000 average annual full-time equivalent
enrollments, excluding full-time equivalent enrollment otherwise
recognized for certificated staff unit allocations under (c) through
(f) of this subsection:
(i) Four certificated administrative staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-12;
(ii) 49 certificated instructional staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-3;
(iii) Forty-six certificated instructional staff units per thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades 4-12; and
(iv) An additional 4.2 certificated instructional staff units for
grades K-3 and an additional 7.2 certificated instructional staff units
for grade 4. Any funds allocated for the additional certificated units
provided in this subsection (iv) shall not be considered as basic
education funding;
(v) For class size reduction and expanded learning opportunities
under the better schools program, an additional 2.2 certificated
instructional staff units for the 2001-02 school year and an additional
0.8 certificated instructional staff units for the 2002-03 school year
for grades K-4 per thousand full-time equivalent students. Funds
allocated for these additional certificated units shall not be
considered as basic education funding. The allocation may be used for
reducing class sizes in grades K-4 or to provide additional classroom
contact hours for kindergarten, before-and-after-school programs,
weekend school programs, summer school programs, and intercession
opportunities to assist elementary school students in meeting the
essential academic learning requirements and student assessment
performance standards. For purposes of this subsection, additional
classroom contact hours provided by teachers beyond the normal school
day under a supplemental contract shall be converted to a certificated
full-time equivalent by dividing the classroom contact hours by 900.
(A) Funds provided under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) and (v) in
excess of the amount required to maintain the statutory minimum ratio
established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b) shall be allocated only if the
district documents an actual ratio in grades K-4 equal to or greater
than 55.4 certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time
equivalent students in the 2001-02 school year and 54.0 certificated
instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent students in the
2002-03 school year. For any school district documenting a lower
certificated instructional staff ratio, the allocation shall be based
on the district's actual grades K-4 certificated instructional staff
ratio achieved in that school year, or the statutory minimum ratio
established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b), if greater;
(B) Districts at or above 51.0 certificated instructional staff per
one thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-4 may dedicate
up to 1.3 of the 55.4 funding ratio in the 2001-02 school year, and up
to 1.3 of the 54.0 funding ratio in the 2002-03 school year, to employ
additional classified instructional assistants assigned to basic
education classrooms in grades K-4. For purposes of documenting a
district's staff ratio under this section, funds used by the district
to employ additional classified instructional assistants shall be
converted to a certificated staff equivalent and added to the
district's actual certificated instructional staff ratio. Additional
classified instructional assistants, for the purposes of this
subsection, shall be determined using the 1989-90 school year as the
base year;
(C) Any district maintaining a ratio in grades K-4 equal to or
greater than 55.4 certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent students in the 2001-02 school year, and a ratio equal
to or greater than 54.0 certificated instructional staff per thousand
full-time equivalent students in the 2002-03 school year, may use
allocations generated under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) and (v) in
excess of that required to maintain the minimum ratio established under
RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b) to employ additional basic education certificated
instructional staff or classified instructional assistants in grades 5-6. Funds allocated under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) and (v) shall only
be expended to reduce class size in grades K-6. No more than 1.3 of
the certificated instructional funding ratio amount may be expended for
provision of classified instructional assistants;
(b) For school districts with a minimum enrollment of 250 full-time
equivalent students whose full-time equivalent student enrollment count
in a given month exceeds the first of the month full-time equivalent
enrollment count by 5 percent, an additional state allocation of 110
percent of the share that such increased enrollment would have
generated had such additional full-time equivalent students been
included in the normal enrollment count for that particular month;
(c)(i) On the basis of full-time equivalent enrollment in:
(A) Vocational education programs approved by the superintendent of
public instruction, a maximum of 0.92 certificated instructional staff
units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units for each 19.5
full-time equivalent vocational students; and
(B) Skills center programs meeting the standards for skills center
funding established in January 1999 by the superintendent of public
instruction, 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08
certificated administrative units for each 16.67 full-time equivalent
vocational students;
(ii) Vocational full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported
on the same monthly basis as the enrollment for students eligible for
basic support, and payments shall be adjusted for reported vocational
enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for
enrollment for students eligible for basic support; and
(iii) For the 2002-03 school year, indirect cost charges by a
school district to vocational-secondary programs shall not exceed 15
percent of the combined basic education and vocational enhancement
allocations of state funds;
(d) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small
school plants within any school district which have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the state board of education and enroll not
more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in
grades K-8:
(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76
certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit
for each additional student enrolled; and
(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68
certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for
each additional student enrolled;
(e) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than
twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within
any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual
full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the state board of education:
(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and
(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;
(f) For districts operating no more than two high schools with
enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school,
other than alternative schools:
(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any
grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated
instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated
administrative staff unit;
(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine
certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated
administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full time
equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of
0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated
administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half
average annual full time equivalent students.
Units calculated under (f)(ii) of this subsection shall be reduced
by certificated staff units at the rate of forty-six certificated
instructional staff units and four certificated administrative staff
units per thousand vocational full-time equivalent students;
(g) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades
1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit; and
(h) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades
1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit.
(3) Allocations for classified salaries for the 2001-02 and 2002-03
school years shall be calculated using formula-generated classified
staff units determined as follows:
(a) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit allocations
under subsection (2)(d) through (h) of this section, one classified
staff unit for each three certificated staff units allocated under such
subsections;
(b) For all other enrollment in grades K-12, including vocational
full-time equivalent enrollments, one classified staff unit for each
sixty average annual full-time equivalent students; and
(c) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified
staff unit.
(4) Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of
10.76 percent in the 2001-02 school year and 9.57 percent in the 2002-03 school year for certificated salary allocations provided under
subsection (2) of this section, and a rate of 12.73 percent in the
2001-02 school year and 12.36 percent in the 2002-03 school year for
classified salary allocations provided under subsection (3) of this
section.
(5) Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the
maintenance rate specified in section 504(3) of this act, based on the
number of benefit units determined as follows:
(a) The number of certificated staff units determined in subsection
(2) of this section; and
(b) The number of classified staff units determined in subsection
(3) of this section multiplied by 1.152. This factor is intended to
adjust allocations so that, for the purposes of distributing insurance
benefits, full-time equivalent classified employees may be calculated
on the basis of 1440 hours of work per year, with no individual
employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent.
(6)(a) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(a), (b), and (d)
through (h) of this section, there shall be provided a maximum of
$8,519 per certificated staff unit in the 2001-02 school year and a
maximum of $8,604 per certificated staff unit in the 2002-03 school
year.
(b) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(A) of this
section, there shall be provided a maximum of $20,920 per certificated
staff unit in the 2001-02 school year and a maximum of $21,129 per
certificated staff unit in the 2002-03 school year.
(c) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(B) of this
section, there shall be provided a maximum of $16,233 per certificated
staff unit in the 2001-02 school year and a maximum of $16,395 per
certificated staff unit in the 2002-03 school year.
(7) Allocations for substitute costs for classroom teachers shall
be distributed at a maintenance rate of $494.34 for the 2001-02 and
2002-03 school years per allocated classroom teachers exclusive of
salary increase amounts provided in section 504 of this act. Solely
for the purposes of this subsection, allocated classroom teachers shall
be equal to the number of certificated instructional staff units
allocated under subsection (2) of this section, multiplied by the ratio
between the number of actual basic education certificated teachers and
the number of actual basic education certificated instructional staff
reported statewide for the prior school year.
(8) Any school district board of directors may petition the
superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution
adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic
education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public
instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair
the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more
than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on
levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance
pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.
(9) The superintendent may distribute a maximum of $6,424,000
outside the basic education formula during fiscal years 2002 and 2003
as follows:
(a) For fire protection for school districts located in a fire
protection district as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter
52.04 RCW, a maximum of $480,000 may be expended in fiscal year 2002
and a maximum of $485,000 may be expended in fiscal year 2003;
(b) For summer vocational programs at skills centers, a maximum of
$2,098,000 may be expended for the 2001-02 fiscal year and a maximum of
$2,035,000 for the 2003 fiscal year;
(c) A maximum of $341,000 may be expended for school district
emergencies; and
(d) A maximum of $500,000 for fiscal year 2002 and $485,000 for
fiscal year 2003 may be expended for programs providing skills training
for secondary students who are enrolled in extended day school-to-work
programs, as approved by the superintendent of public instruction. The
funds shall be allocated at a rate not to exceed $500 per full-time
equivalent student enrolled in those programs.
(10) For purposes of RCW 84.52.0531, the increase per full-time
equivalent student in state basic education appropriations provided
under this act, including appropriations for salary and benefits
increases, is 2.5 percent from the 2000-01 school year to the 2001-02
school year.
(11) For purposes of RCW 84.52.0531, the increase in appropriations
per full-time equivalent student provided in this act, including
appropriations for salary and benefits increases, is 2.9 percent from
the 2001-02 school year to the 2002-03 school year.
(12) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district
was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant
to subsection (2)(b) through (h) of this section, the following shall
apply:
(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of
basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number
of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the
school year prior to the consolidation; and
(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following
consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff
units received by the districts for the school year prior to
consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after
consolidation pursuant to subsection (2)(a) through (h) of this section
shall be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.

Sec. 503 2002 c 371 s 504 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE
COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $124,903,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($255,910,000))
$255,997,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($191,000))
$257,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($381,004,000))
$381,157,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) A total of (($329,316,000)) $329,457,000 is provided for a cost
of living adjustment for state formula staff units of 3.7 percent
effective September 1, 2001, and 3.6 percent effective on September 1,
2002, consistent with the provisions of chapter 4, Laws of 2001
(Initiative Measure No. 732). The appropriations include associated
incremental fringe benefit allocations at rates of 10.12 percent for
school year 2001-02 and 8.93 percent for school year 2002-03 for
certificated staff and 9.23 percent for school year 2001-02 and 8.86
for school year 2002-03 for classified staff.
(a) The appropriations in this section include the increased
portion of salaries and incremental fringe benefits for all relevant
state-funded school programs in part V of this act, in accordance with
chapter 4, Laws of 2001 (Initiative Measure No. 732). Salary
adjustments for state employees in the office of superintendent of
public instruction and the education reform program are provided in
part VII of this act. Increases for general apportionment (basic
education) are based on the salary allocation schedules and methodology
in section 502 of this act. Increases for special education result
from increases in each district's basic education allocation per
student. Increases for educational service districts and institutional
education programs are determined by the superintendent of public
instruction using the methodology for general apportionment salaries
and benefits in section 502 of this act.
(b) The appropriations in this section provide cost-of-living and
incremental fringe benefit allocations based on formula adjustments as
follows:

School Year

2001-02 2002-03

Pupil Transportation (per weighted pupil mile) $0.77 $1.54

Highly Capable (per formula student) $8.71 $16.70

Transitional Bilingual Education (per eligible bilingual student) $22.63 $44.74

Learning Assistance (per entitlement unit) $11.19 $22.26

Substitute Teacher (allocation per teacher, section 502(7)) $18.29 $36.75

(2) This act appropriates general fund -- state funds and other funds
for the purpose of providing the annual salary cost-of-living increase
required by section 2, chapter 4, Laws of 2001 (Initiative Measure No.
732) for teachers and other school district employees in the state-funded salary base. For employees not included in the state-funded
salary base, the annual salary cost-of-living increase may be provided
by school districts from the federal funds appropriated in this act and
local revenues, including the adjusted levy base as provided in RCW
84.52.053 and section 502 of this act, and state discretionary funds
provided under this act.
(3) (($51,688,000)) $51,700,000 is provided for adjustments to
insurance benefit allocations. The maintenance rate for insurance
benefit allocations is $427.73 per month for the 2001-02 and 2002-03
school years. The appropriations in this section provide for a rate
increase to $455.27 per month for the 2001-02 school year and $457.07
per month for the 2002-03 school year at the following rates:

School Year

2001-02 2002-03

Pupil Transportation (per weighted pupil mile) $0.25 $0.27

Highly Capable (per formula student) $1.74 $1.81

Transitional Bilingual Education (per eligible bilingual student) $4.46 $4.75

Learning Assistance (per entitlement unit) $3.51 $3.73

(4) The rates specified in this section are subject to revision
each year by the legislature.

Sec. 504 2002 c 371 s 505 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $192,402,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($193,293,000))
$209,831,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($385,695,000))
$402,233,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) A maximum of $767,000 of this fiscal year 2002 appropriation
and a maximum of $752,000 of the fiscal year 2003 appropriation may be
expended for regional transportation coordinators and related
activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure that data
submitted by school districts for state transportation funding shall,
to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation
activity of each district.
(3) $5,000 of the fiscal year 2002 appropriation and $5,000 of the
fiscal year 2003 appropriation are provided solely for the
transportation of students enrolled in "choice" programs.
Transportation shall be limited to low-income students who are
transferring to "choice" programs solely for educational reasons.
(4) Allocations for transportation of students shall be based on
reimbursement rates of $37.07 per weighted mile in the 2001-02 school
year and $37.12 per weighted mile in the 2002-03 school year exclusive
of salary and benefit adjustments provided in section 504 of this act.
Allocations for transportation of students transported more than one
radius mile shall be based on weighted miles as determined by
superintendent of public instruction multiplied by the per mile
reimbursement rates for the school year pursuant to the formulas
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction. Allocations for
transportation of students living within one radius mile shall be based
on the number of enrolled students in grades kindergarten through five
living within one radius mile of their assigned school multiplied by
the per mile reimbursement rate for the school year multiplied by 1.29.

Sec. 505 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 506 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE
PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,100,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,100,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($225,630,000))
$236,435,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($231,830,000))
$242,635,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $3,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided for state matching money for federal
child nutrition programs.
(2) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $100,000 of the 2003 fiscal year appropriation are
provided for summer food programs for children in low-income areas.

Sec. 506 2002 c 371 s 506 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION
PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $420,165,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($408,761,000))
$408,933,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($256,407,000))
$295,188,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,085,333,000))
$1,124,286,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess
cost basis, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure
that special education students as a class receive their full share of
the general apportionment allocation accruing through sections 502 and
504 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an
appropriate education for special education students under chapter
28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall
provide services through the special education excess cost allocation
funded in this section.
(2)(a) Effective with the 2001-02 school year, the superintendent
of public instruction shall change the S-275 personnel reporting system
and all related accounting requirements to ensure that:
(i) Special education students are basic education students first;
(ii) As a class, special education students are entitled to the
full basic education allocation; and
(iii) Special education students are basic education students for
the entire school day.
(b) Effective with the 2001-02 school year, the S-275 and
accounting changes shall supercede any prior excess cost methodologies
and shall be required of all school districts.
(3) Each fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are
necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for
prior fiscal year adjustments.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute state
funds to school districts based on two categories: The optional birth
through age two program for special education eligible developmentally
delayed infants and toddlers, and the mandatory special education
program for special education eligible students ages three to twenty-one. A "special education eligible student" means a student receiving
specially designed instruction in accordance with a properly formulated
individualized education program.
(5)(a) For the 2001-02 and 2002-03 school years, the superintendent
shall make allocations to each district based on the sum of:
(i) A district's annual average headcount enrollment of
developmentally delayed infants and toddlers ages birth through two,
multiplied by the district's average basic education allocation per
full-time equivalent student, multiplied by 1.15; and
(ii) A district's annual average full-time equivalent basic
education enrollment multiplied by the funded enrollment percent
determined pursuant to subsection (6)(b) of this section, multiplied by
the district's average basic education allocation per full-time
equivalent student multiplied by 0.9309.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "average basic education
allocation per full-time equivalent student" for a district shall be
based on the staffing ratios required by RCW 28A.150.260 and shall not
include enhancements, secondary vocational education, or small schools.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Annual average full-time equivalent basic education
enrollment" means the resident enrollment including students enrolled
through choice (RCW 28A.225.225) and students from nonhigh districts
(RCW 28A.225.210) and excluding students residing in another district
enrolled as part of an interdistrict cooperative program (RCW
28A.225.250).
(b) "Enrollment percent" means the district's resident special
education annual average enrollment, excluding the birth through age
two enrollment, as a percent of the district's annual average full-time
equivalent basic education enrollment.
(i) For the 2001-02 school year, each district's funded enrollment
percent shall be the lesser of the district's actual enrollment percent
or 12.7 percent.
(ii) For the 2002-03 school year, each district's general fund--state funded special education enrollment shall be the lesser of the
district's actual enrollment percent or 12.7 percent. Increases in
enrollment percent from 12.7 percent to 13.0 percent shall be funded
from the general fund -- federal appropriation.
(7) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15
districts in which all excess cost services for special education
students of the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum
enrollment percent shall be calculated in accordance with subsection
(6)(b) of this section, and shall be calculated in the aggregate rather
than individual district units. For purposes of this subsection, the
average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student
shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district
units.
(8) Safety net funding shall be awarded by the state safety net
oversight committee subject to the following conditions and
limitations:
(a) A maximum of $8,500,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation and a maximum of $3,500,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation for fiscal year 2002 are provided as safety net funding
for districts with demonstrated needs for state special education
funding beyond the amounts provided in subsection (5) of this section.
(b) The safety net oversight committee shall first consider the
needs of districts adversely affected by the 1995 change in the special
education funding formula. Awards shall be based on the lesser of the
amount required to maintain the 1994-95 state special education excess
cost allocation to the school district in aggregate or on a dollar per
funded student basis.
(c) The committee shall then consider unmet needs for districts
that can convincingly demonstrate that all legitimate expenditures for
special education exceed all available revenues from state funding
formulas. In the determination of need, the committee shall also
consider additional available revenues from federal and local sources.
Differences in program costs attributable to district philosophy,
service delivery choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate
basis for safety net awards.
(d) The maximum allowable indirect cost for calculating safety net
eligibility may not exceed the federal restricted indirect cost rate
for the district plus one percent.
(e) Safety net awards shall be adjusted based on the percent of
potential medicaid eligible students billed as calculated by the
superintendent in accordance with chapter 318, Laws of 1999.
(f) Safety net awards must be adjusted for any audit findings or
exceptions related to special education funding.
(g) The superintendent may expend up to $120,000 of the amounts
provided in this subsection (8) to provide staff assistance to the
committee in analyzing applications for safety net funds received by
the committee.
(9) For fiscal year 2003 to the extent necessary, $12,873,000 of
the general fund -- federal appropriation is provided for safety net
awards for districts with demonstrated needs for state special
education funding beyond the amounts provided in subsection (5) of this
section. If safety net awards exceed the amount appropriated in this
subsection (9), the superintendent shall expend all available federal
discretionary funds necessary to meet this need. Safety net funds
shall be awarded by the state safety net oversight committee subject to
the following conditions and limitations:
(a) The committee shall consider unmet needs for districts that can
convincingly demonstrate that all legitimate expenditures for special
education exceed all available revenues from state funding formulas.
In the determination of need, the committee shall also consider
additional available revenues from federal and local sources.
Differences in program costs attributable to district philosophy,
service delivery choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate
basis for safety net awards.
(b) The committee shall then consider the extraordinary high cost
needs of one or more individual special education students.
Differences in costs attributable to district philosophy, service
delivery choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate basis for
safety net awards.
(c) The maximum allowable indirect cost for calculating safety net
eligibility may not exceed the federal restricted indirect cost rate
for the district plus one percent.
(d) Safety net awards shall be adjusted based on the percent of
potential medicaid eligible students billed as calculated by the
superintendent in accordance with chapter 318, Laws of 1999.
(e) Safety net awards must be adjusted for any audit findings or
exceptions related to special education funding.
(f) The superintendent may expend up to $120,000 of the amount
provided from the general fund -- federal appropriation in this
subsection (9) to provide staff assistance to the committee in
analyzing applications for safety net funds received by the committee.
(10) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt such rules
and procedures as are necessary to administer the special education
funding and safety net award process. Prior to revising any standards,
procedures, or rules, the superintendent shall consult with the office
of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature.
(11) The safety net oversight committee appointed by the
superintendent of public instruction shall consist of:
(a) One staff from the office of superintendent of public
instruction;
(b) Staff of the office of the state auditor;
(c) Staff of the office of the financial management; and
(d) One or more representatives from school districts or
educational service districts knowledgeable of special education
programs and funding.
(12) To the extent necessary, in fiscal year 2002, $2,250,000 of
the general fund -- federal appropriation shall be expended for safety
net funding to meet the extraordinary needs of one or more individual
special education students. If safety net awards to meet the
extraordinary needs exceed $2,250,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation, the superintendent shall expend all available federal
discretionary funds necessary to meet this need. General fund -- state
funds shall not be expended for this purpose.
(13) A maximum of $678,000 may be expended from the general fund--state appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1
full-time equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and
medical center. This amount is in lieu of money provided through the
home and hospital allocation and the special education program.
(14) $1,000,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for projects to provide special education students with
appropriate job and independent living skills, including work
experience where possible, to facilitate their successful transition
out of the public school system. The funds provided by this subsection
shall be from federal discretionary grants.
(15) The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal
flow-through to school districts at 85 percent for the 2001-02 school
year. For the 2002-03 school year, the superintendent shall allocate
the federal funds as specified in this section and shall adjust federal
flow-through funds accordingly. In addition to other purposes, school
districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for
purchasing regional special education services from educational service
districts, and for staff development activities particularly relating
to inclusion issues.
(16) A maximum of $1,200,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation may be expended by the superintendent for projects
related to use of inclusion strategies by school districts for
provision of special education services. The superintendent shall
prepare an information database on laws, best practices, examples of
programs, and recommended resources. The information may be
disseminated in a variety of ways, including workshops and other staff
development activities.
(17) A school district may carry over from one year to the next
year up to 10 percent of general fund -- state funds allocated under this
program; however, carry over funds shall be expended in the special
education program.
(18) The superintendent of public instruction shall implement the
recommendations of the joint legislative audit and review committee
study on special education (report 01-11) only to the extent that funds
have been specifically provided therefor.

Sec. 507 2002 c 371 s 507 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR TRAFFIC SAFETY
EDUCATION PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,765,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($512,000))
$613,000
((Public Safety and Education Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,567,000))
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,844,000))
$4,378,000

(((1))) The general fund -- state appropriations in this section are
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(((a))) (1) The appropriations include such funds as are necessary
to complete the school year ending in each fiscal year and for prior
fiscal year adjustments.
(((b))) (2) A maximum of $253,000 of the fiscal year 2002 general
fund appropriation may be expended for regional traffic safety
education coordinators.
(((c))) (3) Allocations to provide tuition assistance for students
eligible for free and reduced price lunch who complete the program
shall be a maximum of $203.97 per eligible student in the 2001-02
school year.
(((2) The public safety and education account appropriation in this
section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) The public safety and education account appropriation shall
lapse if House Bill No. 2573 (traffic safety education) is not enacted
by June 30, 2002.
(b) If House Bill No. 2573 is enacted by June 30, 2002, districts
shall receive the following allocations:
(i) The maximum basic state allocation per student completing the
program shall be $148.00 in the 2002-03 school year.
(ii) Additional allocations to provide tuition assistance for
students eligible for free and reduced price lunch who complete the
program shall be a maximum of $71.00 per eligible student in the 2002-03 school year.
(c) A maximum of $254,000 may be expended for regional traffic
safety education coordinators.))

Sec. 508 2002 c 371 s 509 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR LOCAL EFFORT
ASSISTANCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,932,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($154,931,000))
$155,788,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($295,863,000))
$296,720,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
Calendar year 2003 local effort assistance calculations under
chapter 28A.500 RCW shall be adjusted by multiplying allocations and
maximum eligibility for each district by 0.99 as authorized by House
Bill No. 3011.

Sec. 509 2002 c 371 s 510 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR INSTITUTIONAL
EDUCATION PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,073,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,658,000))
$17,986,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,548,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($46,279,000))
$45,607,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund -- state fiscal year appropriation includes
such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the
fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) State funding provided under this section is based on salaries
and other expenditures for a 220-day school year. The superintendent
of public instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans
for institutional education programs to ensure that districts plan for
a full-time summer program.
(3) State funding for each institutional education program shall be
based on the institution's annual average full-time equivalent student
enrollment. Staffing ratios for each category of institution shall
remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97 biennium.
(4) The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles
age 18 or less in department of corrections facilities shall be the
same as those provided in the 1997-99 biennium.
(5) $141,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and (($139,000)) $182,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely to maintain at
least one certificated instructional staff and related support services
at an institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not sufficient to
support one full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff to
furnish the educational program. The following types of institutions
are included: Residential programs under the department of social and
health services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for
juveniles under the department of corrections, and programs for
juveniles under the juvenile rehabilitation administration.
(6) Ten percent of the funds allocated for each institution may be
carried over from one year to the next.

Sec. 510 2002 c 371 s 511 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY
CAPABLE STUDENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,470,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,229,000))
$6,244,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,699,000))
$12,714,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) Allocations for school district programs for highly capable
students shall be distributed at a maximum rate of $327.22 per funded
student for the 2001-02 school year and (($313.07)) $313.11 per funded
student for the 2002-03 school year, exclusive of salary and benefit
adjustments pursuant to section 504 of this act. The number of funded
students shall be a maximum of two percent of each district's full-time
equivalent basic education enrollment.
(3) $175,000 of the fiscal year 2002 appropriation and $170,000 of
the fiscal year 2003 appropriation are provided for the centrum program
at Fort Worden state park.
(4) $93,000 of the fiscal year 2002 appropriation and $90,000 of
the fiscal year 2003 appropriation are provided for the Washington
imagination network and future problem-solving programs.

Sec. 511 2002 c 371 s 512 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR MISCELLANEOUS
PURPOSES UNDER THE ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY SCHOOL IMPROVEMENT ACT AND
THE NO CHILD LEFT BEHIND ACT
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($201,737,000))
$199,660,000

Sec. 512 2002 c 371 s 513 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- EDUCATION REFORM
PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,880,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,150,000))
$30,269,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,571,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($127,601,000))
$127,720,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $322,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $312,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for the academic achievement and
accountability commission.
(2) $12,209,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, $8,872,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003, and $4,000,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided for development and implementation of the
Washington assessments of student learning. Up to $689,000 of the
appropriation may be expended for data analysis and data management of
test results.
(3) $1,095,000 of the fiscal year 2002 general fund -- state
appropriation and $548,000 of the fiscal year 2003 general fund -- state
appropriation are provided solely for training of paraprofessional
classroom assistants and certificated staff who work with classroom
assistants as provided in RCW 28A.415.310.
(4) $4,695,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $2,348,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for mentor teacher assistance,
including state support activities, under RCW 28A.415.250 and
28A.415.260, and for a mentor academy. Up to $200,000 of the amount in
this subsection may be used each fiscal year to operate a mentor
academy to help districts provide effective training for peer mentors.
Funds for the teacher assistance program shall be allocated to school
districts based on the number of first year beginning teachers.
(a) A teacher assistance program is a program that provides to a
first year beginning teacher peer mentor services that include but are
not limited to:
(i) An orientation process and individualized assistance to help
beginning teachers who have been hired prior to the start of the school
year prepare for the start of a school year;
(ii) The assignment of a peer mentor whose responsibilities to the
beginning teacher include but are not limited to constructive feedback,
the modeling of instructional strategies, and frequent meetings and
other forms of contact;
(iii) The provision by peer mentors of strategies, training, and
guidance in critical areas such as classroom management, student
discipline, curriculum management, instructional skill, assessment,
communication skills, and professional conduct. A district may provide
these components through a variety of means including one-on-one
contact and workshops offered by peer mentors to groups, including
cohort groups, of beginning teachers;
(iv) The provision of release time, substitutes, mentor training in
observation techniques, and other measures for both peer mentors and
beginning teachers, to allow each an adequate amount of time to observe
the other and to provide the classroom experience that each needs to
work together effectively;
(v) Assistance in the incorporation of the essential academic
learning requirements into instructional plans and in the development
of complex teaching strategies, including strategies to raise the
achievement of students with diverse learning styles and backgrounds;
and
(vi) Guidance and assistance in the development and implementation
of a professional growth plan. The plan shall include a professional
self-evaluation component and one or more informal performance
assessments. A peer mentor may not be involved in any evaluation under
RCW 28A.405.100 of a beginning teacher whom the peer mentor has
assisted through this program.
(b) In addition to the services provided in (a) of this subsection,
an eligible peer mentor program shall include but is not limited to the
following components:
(i) Strong collaboration among the peer mentor, the beginning
teacher's principal, and the beginning teacher;
(ii) Stipends for peer mentors and, at the option of a district,
for beginning teachers. The stipends shall not be deemed compensation
for the purposes of salary lid compliance under RCW 28A.400.200 and are
not subject to the continuing contract provisions of Title 28A RCW; and
(iii) To the extent that resources are available for this purpose
and that assistance to beginning teachers is not adversely impacted,
the program may serve second year and more experienced teachers who
request the assistance of peer mentors.
(5) $2,025,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $1,964,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided for improving technology infrastructure,
monitoring and reporting on school district technology development,
promoting standards for school district technology, promoting statewide
coordination and planning for technology development, and providing
regional educational technology support centers, including state
support activities, under chapter 28A.650 RCW. The superintendent of
public instruction shall coordinate a process to facilitate the
evaluation and provision of online curriculum courses to school
districts which includes the following: Creation of a general listing
of the types of available online curriculum courses; a survey conducted
by each regional educational technology support center of school
districts in its region regarding the types of online curriculum
courses desired by school districts; a process to evaluate and
recommend to school districts the best online courses in terms of
curriculum, student performance, and cost; and assistance to school
districts in procuring and providing the courses to students.
(6) $3,600,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $3,600,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided for grants to school districts to provide
a continuum of care for children and families to help children become
ready to learn. Grant proposals from school districts shall contain
local plans designed collaboratively with community service providers.
If a continuum of care program exists in the area in which the school
district is located, the local plan shall provide for coordination with
existing programs to the greatest extent possible. Grant funds shall
be allocated pursuant to RCW 70.190.040.
(7) $2,500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $2,500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for the meals for kids program
under RCW 28A.235.145 through 28A.235.155.
(8) $1,409,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $705,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for the leadership internship
program for superintendents, principals, and program administrators.
(9) $1,828,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $1,773,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for the mathematics helping corps
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) In order to increase the availability and quality of technical
mathematics assistance statewide, the superintendent of public
instruction shall employ mathematics school improvement specialists to
provide assistance to schools and districts. The specialists shall be
hired by and work under the direction of a statewide school improvement
coordinator. The mathematics improvement specialists shall serve on a
rotating basis from one to three years and shall not be permanent
employees of the superintendent of public instruction.
(b) The school improvement specialists shall provide the following:
(i) Assistance to schools to disaggregate student performance data
and develop improvement plans based on those data;
(ii) Consultation with schools and districts concerning their
performance on the Washington assessment of student learning and other
assessments emphasizing the performance on the mathematics assessments;
(iii) Consultation concerning curricula that aligns with the
essential academic learning requirements emphasizing the academic
learning requirements for mathematics, the Washington assessment of
student learning, and meets the needs of diverse learners;
(iv) Assistance in the identification and implementation of
research-based instructional practices in mathematics;
(v) Staff training that emphasizes effective instructional
strategies and classroom-based assessment for mathematics;
(vi) Assistance in developing and implementing family and community
involvement programs emphasizing mathematics; and
(vii) Other assistance to schools and school districts intended to
improve student mathematics learning.
(10) A maximum of $500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2002 and a maximum of $485,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided for summer
accountability institutes offered by the superintendent of public
instruction and the academic achievement and accountability commission.
The institutes shall provide school district staff with training in the
analysis of student assessment data, information regarding successful
district and school teaching models, research on curriculum and
instruction, and planning tools for districts to improve instruction in
reading, mathematics, language arts, and guidance and counseling.
(11) $3,930,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $3,714,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for the Washington reading corps
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) Grants shall be allocated to schools and school districts to
implement proven, research-based mentoring and tutoring programs in
reading for low-performing students in grades K-6. If the grant is
made to a school district, the principals of schools enrolling targeted
students shall be consulted concerning design and implementation of the
program.
(b) The programs may be implemented before, after, or during the
regular school day, or on Saturdays, summer, intercessions, or other
vacation periods.
(c) Two or more schools may combine their Washington reading corps
programs.
(d) A program is eligible for a grant if it meets the following
conditions:
(i) The program employs methods of teaching and student learning
based on reliable reading/literacy research and effective practices;
(ii) The program design is comprehensive and includes instruction,
on-going student assessment, professional development,
parental/community involvement, and program management aligned with the
school's reading curriculum;
(iii) It provides quality professional development and training for
teachers, staff, and volunteer mentors and tutors;
(iv) It has measurable goals for student reading aligned with the
essential academic learning requirements; and
(v) It contains an evaluation component to determine the
effectiveness of the program.
(e) Funding priority shall be given to low-performing schools.
(f) Beginning and end-of-program testing data shall be available to
determine the effectiveness of funded programs and practices. Common
evaluative criteria across programs, such as grade-level improvements
shall be available for each reading corps program. The superintendent
of public instruction shall provide program evaluations to the governor
and the appropriate committees of the legislature. Administrative and
evaluation costs may be assessed from the annual appropriation for the
program.
(g) Grants provided under this section may be used by schools and
school districts for expenditures from September 2001 through August
31, 2003.
(12) $375,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and (($725,000)) $844,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for salary
bonuses for teachers who attain certification by the national board for
professional teaching standards, subject to the following conditions
and limitations:
(a) Teachers who have attained certification by the national board
shall receive an annual bonus not to exceed $3,500.
(b) The annual bonus shall be paid in a lump sum amount and shall
not be included in the definition of "earnable compensation" under RCW
41.32.010(10).
(c) It is the intent of the legislature that teachers achieving
certification by the national board of professional teaching standards
will receive no more than four annual bonus payments for attaining
certification by the national board.
(13) $625,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $313,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided for a principal support program. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction may contract with an
independent organization to administer the program. The program shall
include: (a) Development of an individualized professional growth plan
for a new principal or principal candidate; and (b) participation of a
mentor principal who works over a period of between one and three years
with the new principal or principal candidate to help him or her build
the skills identified as critical to the success of the professional
growth plan.
(14) $71,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $71,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for the second grade reading test.
The funds shall be expended for assessment training for new second
grade teachers and replacement of assessment materials.
(15) $384,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $372,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided for the superintendent to assist schools
in implementing high academic standards, aligning curriculum with these
standards, and training teachers to use assessments to improve student
learning. Funds may also be used to increase community and parental
awareness of education reform.
(16) $130,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $126,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided for the development and posting of web-based instructional tools, assessment data, and other information that
assists schools and teachers implementing higher academic standards.
(17) $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $1,746,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for focused assistance. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall conduct
educational audits of low-performing schools and enter into performance
agreements between school districts and the office to implement the
recommendations of the audit and the community. Of the amounts
provided, $219,000 of the fiscal year 2002 appropriation and $201,000
of the fiscal year 2003 appropriation are provided to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for the administrative duties
arising under this subsection. Each educational audit shall include
recommendations for best practices and ways to address identified needs
and shall be presented to the community in a public meeting to seek
input on ways to implement the audit and its recommendations.
(18) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 is provided solely for grants to school districts to adopt or
revise district-wide and school-level plans to achieve performance
improvement goals established under RCW 28A.655.030, and to post a
summary of the improvement plans on district websites using a common
format provided by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.
(19) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 is provided solely for recognition plaques for schools that
successfully met the fourth grade reading improvement goal established
under RCW 28A.655.050.
(20) $46,554,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for preparing, training, and recruiting high quality teachers
and principals under Title II of the no child left behind act.
(21) $6,591,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for the reading first program under Title I of the no child
left behind act.
(22) In addition to amounts provided in subsection (2) of this
section, $3,426,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for the development of state assessments as required under
Title VI of the no child left behind act.

Sec. 513 2002 c 371 s 514 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR TRANSITIONAL
BILINGUAL PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,767,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($44,734,000))
$44,083,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,280,000))
$19,755,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($107,781,000))
$106,605,000

(1) The general fund -- state appropriations in this section are
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(b) The superintendent shall distribute a maximum of $684.36 per
eligible bilingual student in the 2001-02 school year and $674.69 in
the 2002-03 school year, exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments
provided in section 504 of this act.
(c) The superintendent may withhold up to $295,000 in school year
2001-02 and up to $700,000 in school year 2002-03, and adjust the per
eligible pupil rates in subsection (2) of this section accordingly, for
the central provision of assessments as provided in section 2(1) and
(2) of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2025.
(d) $70,000 of the amounts appropriated in this section are
provided solely to develop a system for the tracking of current and
former transitional bilingual program students.
(e) Sufficient funding is provided to implement Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2025 (schools/bilingual instruction).
(2) The general fund -- federal appropriation in this section is
provided for migrant education, English language acquisition, and
language enhancement grants under Title III of the no child left behind
act.

Sec. 514 2002 c 371 s 515 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR THE LEARNING
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,342,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($64,614,000))
$63,694,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . $130,631,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($266,587,000))
$265,667,000

(1) The general fund -- state appropriations in this section are
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) Each general fund -- state fiscal year appropriation includes
such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the
fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(b) Funding for school district learning assistance programs shall
be allocated at maximum rates of $407.39 per funded unit for the 2001-02 school year and $404.78 per funded unit for the 2002-03 school year
exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments provided under section 504
of this act.
(c) For purposes of this section, "test results" refers to the
district results from the norm-referenced test administered in the
specified grade level. The norm-referenced test results used for the
third and sixth grade calculations shall be consistent with the third
and sixth grade tests required under RCW 28A.230.190 and 28A.230.193.
(d) A school district's general fund -- state funded units for the
2001-02 school year shall be the sum of the following:
(i) The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-6,
multiplied by the 5-year average 4th grade lowest quartile test results
as adjusted for funding purposes in the school years prior to 1999-2000, multiplied by 0.92. As the 3rd grade test becomes available, it
shall be phased into the 5-year average on a 1-year lag; and
(ii) The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades 7-9,
multiplied by the 5-year average 8th grade lowest quartile test results
as adjusted for funding purposes in the school years prior to 1999-2000, multiplied by 0.92. As the 6th grade test becomes available, it
shall be phased into the 5-year average for these grades on a 1-year
lag; and
(iii) The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades 10-11 multiplied by the 5-year average 11th grade lowest quartile test
results, multiplied by 0.92. As the 9th grade test becomes available,
it shall be phased into the 5-year average for these grades on a 1-year
lag; and
(iv) If, in the prior school year, the district's percentage of
October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free and
reduced price lunch exceeded the state average, subtract the state
average percentage of students eligible for free and reduced price
lunch from the district's percentage and multiply the result by the
district's K-12 annual average full-time equivalent enrollment for the
current school year multiplied by 22.3 percent.
(e)(i) A school district's general fund -- state funded units for the
2002-03 school year shall be the sum of the following:
(A) The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-6,
multiplied by the 5-year average 4th grade lowest quartile test results
as adjusted for funding purposes in the school years prior to 1999-2000, multiplied by 0.82. As the 3rd grade test becomes available, it
shall be phased into the 5-year average on a 1-year lag;
(B) The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades 7-9,
multiplied by the 5-year average 8th grade lowest quartile test results
as adjusted for funding purposes in the school years prior to 1999-2000, multiplied by 0.82. As the 6th grade test becomes available, it
shall be phased into the 5-year average for these grades on a 1-year
lag; and
(C) The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades 10-11
multiplied by the 5-year average 11th grade lowest quartile test
results, multiplied by 0.82. As the 9th grade test becomes available,
it shall be phased into the 5-year average for these grades on a 1-year
lag; and
(D) If, in the prior school year, the district's percentage of
October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free and
reduced price lunch exceeded the state average, subtract the state
average percentage of students eligible for free and reduced price
lunch from the district's percentage and multiply the result by the
district's K-12 annual average full-time equivalent enrollment for the
current school year multiplied by 22.3 percent.
(ii) In addition to amounts allocated under (a) of this subsection,
the superintendent shall provide additional amounts as follows:
(A) For school districts receiving less than a 3.0 percent increase
in federal Title I Part A (basic program) funds, the multiplier in
(i)(A), (B), and (C) of this subsection (e) shall be .92;
(B) For school districts not eligible for additional funds under
(b)(i) of this subsection, and whose effective increase in federal
Title I Part A (basic program) funds is less than 3.0 percent after
taking into account the change in the multiplier from .92 to .82, an
additional amount to provide a 3.0 percent increase.
(f) School districts may carry over from one year to the next up to
10 percent of general fund -- state funds allocated under this program;
however, carryover funds shall be expended for the learning assistance
program.
(2) The general fund -- federal appropriation in this section is
provided for Title I Part A allocations of the no child left behind act
of 2001.

Sec. 515 2002 c 371 s 516 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- LOCAL ENHANCEMENT FUNDS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,663,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,541,000))
$3,534,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,204,000))
$23,197,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) Funds are provided for local education program enhancements to
meet educational needs as identified by the school district, including
alternative education programs.
(3) Allocations for the 2001-02 school year shall be at a maximum
annual rate of $18.48 per full-time equivalent student. Allocations
shall be made on the monthly apportionment payment schedule provided in
RCW 28A.510.250 and shall be based on school district annual average
full-time equivalent enrollment in grades kindergarten through twelve:
PROVIDED, That for school districts enrolling not more than one hundred
average annual full-time equivalent students, and for small school
plants within any school district designated as remote and necessary
schools, the allocations shall be as follows:
(a) Enrollment of not more than sixty average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades kindergarten through six shall generate
funding based on sixty full-time equivalent students;
(b) Enrollment of not more than twenty average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades seven and eight shall generate funding
based on twenty full-time equivalent students; and
(c) Enrollment of not more than sixty average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades nine through twelve shall generate
funding based on sixty full-time equivalent students.
(4) Funding provided pursuant to this section does not fall within
the definition of basic education for purposes of Article IX of the
state Constitution and the state's funding duty thereunder.
(5) The superintendent shall not allocate up to one-fourth of a
district's funds under this section if:
(a) The district is not maximizing federal matching funds for
medical services provided through special education programs, pursuant
to RCW 74.09.5241 through 74.09.5256 (Title XIX funding); or
(b) The district is not in compliance in filing truancy petitions
as required under chapter 312, Laws of 1995 and RCW 28A.225.030.

Sec. 516 2002 c 371 s 518 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT
PROGRAM
Student Achievement Fund -- State
Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $180,837,000
Student Achievement Fund -- State
Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($210,312,000))
$210,376,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($391,149,000))
$391,213,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is allocated for the following uses as
specified in chapter 28A.505 RCW as amended by chapter 3, Laws of 2001
(Initiative Measure No. 728):
(a) To reduce class size by hiring certificated elementary
classroom teachers in grades K-4 and paying nonemployee-related costs
associated with those new teachers;
(b) To make selected reductions in class size in grades 5-12, such
as small high school writing classes;
(c) To provide extended learning opportunities to improve student
academic achievement in grades K-12, including, but not limited to,
extended school year, extended school day, before-and-after-school
programs, special tutoring programs, weekend school programs, summer
school, and all-day kindergarten;
(d) To provide additional professional development for educators
including additional paid time for curriculum and lesson redesign and
alignment, training to ensure that instruction is aligned with state
standards and student needs, reimbursement for higher education costs
related to enhancing teaching skills and knowledge, and mentoring
programs to match teachers with skilled, master teachers. The funding
shall not be used for salary increases or additional compensation for
existing teaching duties, but may be used for extended year and extend
day teaching contracts;
(e) To provide early assistance for children who need
prekindergarten support in order to be successful in school; or
(f) To provide improvements or additions to school building
facilities which are directly related to the class size reductions and
extended learning opportunities under (a) through (c) of this
subsection.
(2) Funding for school district student achievement programs shall
be allocated at a maximum rate of $190.19 per FTE student for the 2001-02 school year and (($219.84)) $220.00 per FTE student for the 2002-03
school year. For the purposes of this section and in accordance with
RCW 84.52.068, FTE student refers to the annual average full-time
equivalent enrollment of the school district in grades kindergarten
through twelve for the prior school year.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
distribute ten percent of the annual allocation to districts each month
for the months of September through June.

(End of part)

PART VII
SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 701 2002 c 371 s 701 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND
REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT LIMIT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $576,097,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($622,540,000))
$582,500,000
State Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,999,000))
$3,882,000
Debt-Limit General Fund Bond Retirement Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Debt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retire Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,591,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($496,000))
$59,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,209,723,000))
$1,165,529,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for
deposit into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account. The
appropriation for fiscal year 2002 shall be deposited in the debt-limit
general fund bond retirement account by June 30, 2002.

Sec. 702 2002 c 371 s 703 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND
REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE
REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,542,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,706,000
Capitol Historic District Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($454,000))
$108,000
Higher Education Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($499,000))
$330,000
State Higher Education Construction Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,000))
$33,000
State Vehicle Parking Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($100,000))
$1,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($128,043,000))
$124,199,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($180,394,000))
$175,919,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriation is for
deposit into the nondebt-limit general fund bond retirement account.

Sec. 703 2002 c 371 s 704 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND
REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $567,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . $658,000
Higher Education Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($77,000))
$54,000
State Higher Education Construction Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($42,000))
$5,000
State Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,488,000))
$667,000
State Vehicle Parking Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,000))
$1,000
Capitol Historic District Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($130,000))
$22,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,000))
$51,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,022,000))
$2,025,000

Sec. 704 2002 c 371 s 712 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS -- CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT
SYSTEMS. The appropriations in this section are subject to the
following conditions and limitations: The appropriations for the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system shall be
made on a monthly basis beginning July 1, 2001, consistent with chapter
41.45 RCW, and the appropriations for the judges and judicial
retirement systems shall be made on a quarterly basis consistent with
chapters 2.10 and 2.12 RCW.

(1) There is appropriated for state contributions to the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system:
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,437,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,208,000))
$16,440,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations include reductions to
reflect savings resulting from the implementation of state pension
contribution rates effective April 1, 2002, as provided in House Bill
No. 2782.

(2) There is appropriated for contributions to the judicial
retirement system:
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

(3) There is appropriated for contributions to the judges
retirement system:
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($44,145,000))
$44,377,000

Sec. 705 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 730 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE LIABILITY ACCOUNT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,392,000))
$31,392,000
((State Surplus Assets Reserve Fund -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,392,000))

The appropriation((s)) in this section ((are)) is provided solely
for deposit in the liability account.

Sec. 706 2002 c 371 s 726 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR SUNDRY CLAIMS. The following sums, or so much thereof as may
be necessary, are appropriated from the general fund, unless otherwise
indicated, for relief of various individuals, firms, and corporations
for sundry claims. These appropriations are to be disbursed on
vouchers approved by the director of general administration, except as
otherwise provided, as follows:
(1) Reimbursement of criminal defendants acquitted on the basis of
self-defense, pursuant to RCW 9A.16.110:
(a) Eythor Westman, claim number SCJ 02-01 . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000
(b) Stacey Julian, claim number SCJ 02-02 . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,136
(c) Christopher Denney, claim number SCJ 02-03 . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,598
(d) Onofre Vazquez, claim number SCJ 02-04 . . . . . . . . . . . . $200
(e) William Voorhies, claim number SCJ 02-05 . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,694
(f) Glenn Rowlison, claim number SCJ 02-06 . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,395
(g) Frankie Doerr, claim number SCJ 02-07 . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,100
(h) Ralph Howard, claim number SCJ 00-09 . . . . . . . . . . . . $99,497
(i) Johnny Adams, claim number SCJ 01-17 . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,916
(j) Shane Mathus, claim number SCJ 02-08 . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,043
(k) Timothy Farnam, claim number SCJ 02-09 . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,822
(l) Rebecca Williams, claim number SCJ 02-10 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,241
(m) Stewart Bailey, claim number SCJ 02-11 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,186
(n) Aaron Knaack, claim number SCJ 02-13 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,330
(o) Jacob Clark, claim number SCJ 02-14 . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,613
(p) Victor Stanculescu, claim number SCJ 03-01 . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,696
(q) Darin Tidball, claim number SCJ 03-02 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,125
(r) Keith Dusky, claim number SCJ 03-03 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,065
(s) Carmen Cornell, claim number SCJ 03-04 . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,128
(t) Wesley Roggenkamp, claim number SCJ 03-05 . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,918
(u) Philip Athanas, claim number SCJ 03-06 . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,810
(2) Payment from the state wildlife account for damage to crops by
wildlife, pursuant to RCW 77.36.050:
(a) Ronald Palmer, claim number SCG 02-01 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,522
(b) Keith Morris, claim number SCG 02-02 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,315
(c) Edgar Roush, claim number SCG 02-03 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,459
(d) Keith Nelson, claim number SCG 03-01 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,765
(e) Alton Haymaker, claim number SCG 03-02 . . . . . . . . . . . . $40
(f) Circle S Landscape Supplies, SCG 03-04 . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,037
(3) Payment from the state general fund for death benefit claims to
the estate of an employee of any state agency or higher education
institution not otherwise provided a death benefit through coverage
under their enrolled retirement system, pursuant to section 715,
chapter 7, Laws of 2001:
(a) Ok Chin Erdman, claim number SCO 03-08 . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
(b) Baardson Estate, claim number SCO 03-10 . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 707 A new section is added to 2001 2nd sp.s.
c 7 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE HEALTH SERVICES ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,000,000

The appropriation in this section is provided solely for deposit in
the health services account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 708 A new section is added to 2001 2nd sp.s.
c 7 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES AND TRAUMA CARE SYSTEM TRUST
ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,571,000

The appropriation in this section is provided solely for deposit in
the emergency medical services and trauma care system trust account.

(End of part)

PART VIII
OTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 801 2002 c 371 s 802 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS
For transfers in this section to the state general fund, pursuant
to RCW 43.135.035(5), the state expenditure limit shall be increased by
the amount of the transfer. The increase shall occur in the fiscal
year in which the transfer occurs.

Public Facilities Construction Loan and
Grant Revolving Account: For transfer
to the digital government revolving account
on or before December 31, 2001 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,418,456
Financial Services Regulation Fund: To be
transferred from the financial services
regulation fund to the digital government
revolving account during the period
between July 1, 2001, and December 31,
2001 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Local Toxics Control Account: For transfer
to the state toxics control account.
Transferred funds will be utilized
for methamphetamine lab cleanup, to
address areawide soil contamination
problems, and clean up contaminated
sites as part of the clean sites
initiative . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
State Toxics Control Account: For transfer
to the water quality account for water
quality related projects funded in the
capital budget . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000
General Fund: For transfer to the flood
control assistance account . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Water Quality Account: For transfer to the
water pollution control account. Transfers
shall be made at intervals coinciding with
deposits of federal capitalization grant
money into the account. The amounts
transferred shall not exceed the match
required for each federal deposit . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,564,487
Health Services Account: For transfer
to the water quality account . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,447,500
State Treasurer's Service Account: For
transfer to the general fund on or
before June 30, 2003, an amount in excess
of the cash requirements of the state
treasurer's service account. Pursuant to
RCW 43.135.035(5), the state expenditure
limit shall be increased by $4,000,000 in
fiscal year 2002 and by $8,393,000 in fiscal
year 2003 to reflect this transfer . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,393,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For
transfer to the drinking water
assistance account . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,700,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer
to the health services account, in an
amount not to exceed the actual balance
of the tobacco settlement account . . . . . . . . . . . . $256,700,000
General Fund: For transfer to the water quality
account . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,821,172
Health Services Account: For
transfer to the state general fund
by June 30, 2002. Pursuant to RCW
43.135.035(5), the state expenditure
limit shall be increased in fiscal
year 2002 to reflect this transfer . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000,000
Multimodal Transportation Account: For
transfer to the state general fund
by June 30, 2002. Pursuant to RCW
43.135.035(5), the state expenditure
limit shall be increased in fiscal
year 2002 to reflect this transfer . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,000,000
Health Service Account: For transfer
to the violence reduction and drug
enforcement account . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,497,500
Gambling Revolving Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
for fiscal year 2002 and $450,000 for
fiscal year 2003 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,450,000
((Horticultural Districts Account: For transfer
to the fruit and vegetable inspection
account . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,075,000
Agricultural Local Account: For
transfer to the fruit and vegetable
inspection account . . . . . . . . . . . . $605,000))
Nisqually Earthquake Account: For transfer to
the disaster response account for fire
suppression and mobilization costs . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,802,000
Enhanced 911 Account: For transfer to
the state general fund for fiscal
year 2003 . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
Clarke-McNary Fund: For transfer to the
state general fund for fiscal year 2002 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
State Drought Preparedness Account: For
transfer to the state general fund for
fiscal year 2002 . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Financial Services Regulation Fund: For
transfer to the state general fund,
$2,250,000 for fiscal year 2002 and
$357,000 for fiscal year 2003 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,607,000
Industrial Insurance Premium Refund Account:
For transfer to the state general fund
for fiscal year 2002 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Liquor Control Board Construction and
Maintenance Account: For transfer
to the state general fund for fiscal
year 2003 . . . . . . . . . . . . $504,000
Liquor Revolving Account: For transfer
to the state general fund for fiscal
year 2003 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,059,000
Lottery Administrative Account: For transfer
to the state general fund for fiscal
year 2003 . . . . . . . . . . . . $335,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care
System Trust Account: For transfer
to the state general fund for fiscal
year 2002 . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
Public Service Revolving Account: For transfer
to the state general fund for fiscal
year 2003 . . . . . . . . . . . . $406,000
Local Leasehold Excise Tax Account: For transfer
of interest to the state general fund by
June 1, 2002, for fiscal year 2002 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Insurance Commissioner's Regulatory Account:
For transfer to the state general fund
for fiscal year 2003 . . . . . . . . . . . . $366,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the
tobacco prevention and control account . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,980,000
From the Emergency Reserve Fund: For transfer
to the state general fund:
On June 28, 2002 . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000,000
On June 28, 2003 . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000
Tobacco Securitization Trust Account: For
transfer to the state general fund for
fiscal year 2003 . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000,000

(End of part)

PART IX
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of part)

INDEX PAGE #

ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
ATTORNEY GENERAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
COURT OF APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 68
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 99
DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 73
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 79
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 90
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 70
DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING . . . . . . . . . . . . 102
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 95
DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS
CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 149
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 63
AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 49
ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 56
CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 44
ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 53
JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 32
MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 58
MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 37
VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 63
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 69
EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES AND TRAUMA CARE SYSTEM TRUST ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 151
EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 77
GROWTH PLANNING HEARINGS BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 25
HEALTH SERVICES ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 151
HOME CARE QUALITY AUTHORITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 70
LAW LIBRARY . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
LIABILITY ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 150
LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
SECRETARY OF STATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 25
STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 65
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 88
STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 103
STATE TREASURER
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST . . . . . . . . . . . . 147, 148
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 152
SUNDRY CLAIMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 150
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 105
EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 132
GENERAL APPORTIONMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 112
INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 130
LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 141
LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 130
LOCAL ENHANCEMENT FUNDS . . . . . . . . . . . . 143
MISCELLANEOUS PURPOSES . . . . . . . . . . . . 132
PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 131
PUPIL TRANSPORTATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 121
SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 120
SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 123
SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 123
STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 144
TRAFFIC SAFETY EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 129
TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 140
SUPREME COURT . . . . . . . . . . . . 1

--- END ---