BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.34.115 and 2000 c 122 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
All hearings may be conducted at any time or place within the
limits of the county((, and such cases may not be heard in conjunction
with other business of any other division of the superior court)). The
public shall not be excluded((, and only such persons may be admitted
who are found by the judge to have a direct interest in the case or in
the work of the court)) except if the judge finds that excluding the
public is in the best interest of the child and states on the record
the reasons for excluding the public. ((Unless the court states on the
record the reasons to disallow attendance,)) Regardless of whether the
public is excluded, unless the judge finds it is not in the best
interest of the child: (1) The court shall allow a child's relatives
and, if a child resides in foster care, the child's foster parent, to
attend all hearings and proceedings pertaining to the child ((for the
sole purpose of providing oral and written information about the child
and the child's welfare to the court)); and (2) anyone may attend the
hearings or proceedings at the request of the parent.
Stenographic notes or any device which accurately records the
proceedings may be required as provided in other civil cases pursuant
to RCW 2.32.200.

--- END ---