BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) There is created a legislative task
force to study and make recommendations regarding geoduck management
and harvest rules. The task force is composed of the following
members:
(a) Two members of the house of representatives appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives to include one member from each
of the two largest political caucuses;
(b) Two members of the senate appointed by the president of the
senate to include one member from each of the two largest political
caucuses;
(c) The chair of the house of representatives' fisheries, ecology
and parks committee and the chair of the house of representatives'
agriculture and natural resources committee; and
(d) The chair of the senate parks, fish, and wildlife committee and
the senate natural resources, energy, and water committee.
(2) The task force must elect a chair and agree upon procedures for
conducting the business of the task force. The task force may
establish an advisory committee of stakeholders including but not
limited to representatives from treaty Indian tribes, the aquaculture
industry, geoduck divers, private shoreline property owners, the
department of fish and wildlife, the department of natural resources,
the department of health, the department of agriculture, local
government, or other affected stakeholders. Staff support for the task
force must be provided by the house of representatives' office of
program research and senate committee services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 By December 1, 2003, the task force
established in section 1 of this act must report to the legislature
with recommendations concerning the following issues:
(1) Improvements for the coordinated management of the geoduck
resource;
(2) The costs and benefits of implementing a limited entry geoduck
diver license;
(3) Improvements for compliance and enforcement with geoduck
harvest rules on state and nonstate-owned lands;
(4) Improvements to state rules for geoduck harvesting; and
(5) The state's potential role in aquaculture and reseeding of
geoduck clams.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires January 1, 2004.

--- END ---