BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature recognizes that:
(1) Biodiesel is less polluting than petroleum diesel;
(2) Using biodiesel in neat form or blended with petroleum diesel
significantly reduces air toxics and cancer-causing compounds as well
as the soot associated with petroleum diesel exhaust;
(3) Biodiesel degrades much faster than petroleum diesel;
(4) Biodiesel is less toxic than petroleum fuels;
(5) The United States environmental protection agency's new
emission standards for petroleum diesel that take effect June 1, 2006,
will require the addition of a lubricant to ultra-low sulfur diesel to
counteract premature wear of injection pumps;
(6) Biodiesel provides the needed lubricity to ultra-low sulfur
diesel;
(7) Biodiesel use in state-owned diesel-powered vehicles provides
a means for the state to comply with the alternative fuel vehicle
purchase requirements of the energy policy act of 1992, P.L. 102-486;
and
(8) The state is in a position to set an example of large scale use
of biodiesel in diesel-powered vehicles and equipment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All state agencies are encouraged to use a fuel blend of twenty
percent biodiesel and eighty percent petroleum diesel for use in
diesel-powered vehicles and equipment.
(2) Effective June 1, 2006, for agencies complying with the ultra-low sulfur diesel mandate of the United States environmental protection
agency for on-highway diesel fuel, agencies shall use biodiesel as an
additive to ultra-low sulfur diesel for lubricity, provided that the
use of a lubricity additive is warranted and that the use of biodiesel
is comparable in performance and cost with other available lubricity
additives. The amount of biodiesel added to the ultra-low sulfur
diesel fuel shall be not less than two percent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout sections 1 and 2
of this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Biodiesel" means a mono alkyl ester of long chain fatty acids
derived from vegetable oils or animal fats for use in compression-ignition engines and that meets the requirements of the American
society of testing and materials specification D 6751 in effect as of
January 1, 2003.
(2) "Ultra-low sulfur diesel" means petroleum diesel in which the
sulfur content is not more than thirty parts per million.

--- END ---