BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.160
RCW to read as follows:
The legislature recognizes that:
(1) The use of motor vehicles has a significant impact on the
environment and public health of the state of Washington. Motor
vehicles account for more than half of all air pollutants, almost sixty
percent of total carbon dioxide emissions, and a significant portion of
toxic contaminants in Washington state;
(2) Diesel exhaust, in particular, is likely to cause lung cancer
in humans, chronic and acute bronchitis, asthma attacks, and
respiratory illnesses. Children are particularly at risk. One out of
every ten children in our state suffers from asthma. Over four hundred
thousand students in the state risk their health breathing exhaust from
riding diesel-powered buses to school every day;
(3) Although stringent standards established by the United States
environmental protection agency for new diesel engine technology will
take effect with the 2007 model year, a significant majority of diesel-powered school buses now in use in the state will continue to be used
for the next thirteen or more years;
(4) Using biodiesel in place of, or blended with, petroleum diesel
reduces emissions of carbon monoxide, hydrocarbon, particulates, and
air toxics from new or existing diesel engines;
(5) Using ultra low sulfur diesel, along with after-market
emissions control devices, significantly reduces fine-particle,
hydrocarbon, and nitrogen oxide emissions from existing diesel engines;
(6) The United States environmental protection agency's new
emission standards requiring the use of ultra low sulfur diesel take
effect June 1, 2006, and ultra low sulfur diesel requires the addition
of a lubricant to counteract premature wear of injection pumps;
(7) Biodiesel provides the needed lubricity to ultra low sulfur
diesel, in addition to reducing harmful emissions;
(8) It is the intent of the legislature to study the effects of
using ultra low sulfur diesel with biodiesel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.160
RCW to read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall conduct a pilot
project on the use of biodiesel with ultra low sulfur diesel in school
buses powered by compression-ignition engines. The pilot project must
begin in September of 2003.
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall select two
school districts to participate in the project. School districts
located in a geographic area listed by the environmental protection
agency as an area of concern for pollution emissions must receive first
consideration for the project.
(2) The pilot project shall meet the following requirements:
(a) During the 2003 school year, at least one of the participating
school districts shall have at least twenty-five percent of the school
bus fleet, or a total of not less than ten buses, fueled with ultra low
sulfur diesel. Emissions testing must be conducted before using ultra
low sulfur diesel, and again after ultra low sulfur diesel has been in
use for at least six months.
(b) During the 2004 school year, not less than seventy percent, or
a total of not less than seven, of the buses fueled with ultra low
sulfur diesel during the 2003 school year must be fueled with a blend
of eighty percent ultra low sulfur diesel, by volume, and twenty
percent biodiesel, by volume. Emissions testing must be conducted not
less than six months after adding biodiesel to the ultra low sulfur
diesel.
(c) A maximum of one of the participating school districts may, for
the duration of the project, use a blend of twenty percent biodiesel,
by volume, with eighty percent highway diesel, by volume, in at least
seventy-five percent of the school bus fleet, or a total of not less
than ten buses. Emissions testing must be conducted before use of the
biodiesel blend, again not less than six months after the biodiesel
blend has been is use, and again at the conclusion of the project.
(d) Issues related to the maintenance, including but not limited to
fuel economy, changes in fuel filters, and other maintenance issues
related to the use of ultra low sulfur diesel and biodiesel must be
recorded.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall submit a report
of findings to the legislature by September 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.160
RCW to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout sections 1 and 2
of this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Biodiesel" means a mono alkyl ester of long chain fatty acids
derived from vegetable oils or animal fats for use in compression-ignition engines and that meets the requirements of the American
society of testing and materials specification D 6751 in effect as of
January 1, 2003.
(2) "Ultra low sulfur diesel" means petroleum diesel in which the
sulfur content is not more than thirty parts per million.
(3) "Highway diesel" means petroleum diesel in which the sulfur
content is not more than five hundred parts per million.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4 It is the intent of the legislature that
implementation of this pilot project will not produce a significant
financial burden on participating school districts or the state. The
legislature calls upon the superintendent of public instruction, the
office of community, trade, and economic development, and the
department of ecology to explore alternative means of funding this
pilot project including the use of state or federal grants but
excluding the use of money from the state general fund. In the event
of the inability of the participating school districts to fund this
project, either from their own operating budget, grants, or other local
funding or a combination thereof, the implementation of this act shall
be dependent on securing funds that are not from the state general
fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act expire
September 1, 2005.

--- END ---