BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares:
(1) The national board for professional teaching standards has
established high and rigorous standards for what highly accomplished
teachers should know and be able to do in order to increase student
learning results;
(2) The national board certifies teachers who meet these standards
through a rigorous, performance-based assessment process;
(3) A certificate awarded by the national board attests that a
teacher has met high and rigorous standards and has demonstrated the
ability to make sound professional judgments about how to best meet
students' learning needs and effectively help students meet challenging
academic standards; and
(4) Teachers who attain national board certification should be
acknowledged and rewarded in order to encourage more teachers to pursue
certification for the benefit of Washington students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.405
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Certificated instructional staff who have attained
certification from the national board for professional teaching
standards shall receive a bonus each year in which they maintain
certification from such national board. The bonus for national board
certification is provided in addition to compensation received under a
district's salary schedule adopted in accordance with RCW 28A.405.200
and shall not be included in calculations of a district's average
salary and associated salary limitations under RCW 28A.400.200. The
bonus shall be calculated as follows:
(a) The annual bonus shall be three thousand five hundred dollars,
or a pro rata share of that amount subject to the conditions of
subsection (2) of this section; and
(b) State appropriations for this bonus may be limited to the
amount of funding required to provide a three thousand five hundred
dollar bonus to five percent of the certificated instructional staff
who are eligible to receive certification from the national board for
professional teaching standards. If the percentage of certificated
instructional staff who attain certification from the national board
for professional teaching standards exceeds five percent of those
eligible to attain such certification, and if providing a full bonus to
all eligible certificated instructional staff will exceed the amount of
funding appropriated by the legislature for the bonuses, each eligible
certificated instructional staff shall receive a pro rata share of the
amount provided.
(2) By August 1, 2006, the Washington professional educator
standards board shall review the national board certification standards
to determine whether the standards are sufficiently rigorous and
aligned to student achievement. The board shall also determine whether
additional requirements are needed to ensure that the national
standards meet the needs of Washington's students.
(3) By December 15, 2008, the Washington professional educator
standards board shall report to the appropriate house of
representatives and senate committees on the results and
accomplishments of the salary bonuses. The report may include
recommendations for the continuation, modification, or elimination of
the bonuses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires July 1, 2009.

--- END ---