BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that it is in the best
interest of the trust beneficiaries to capture additional revenues
while providing for additional environmental protection on timber
sales. Further, the legislature finds that contract harvesting is one
method to achieve these desired outcomes. Therefore, the legislature
directs the department of natural resources to establish and implement
contract harvesting where there exists the ability to increase revenues
for the beneficiaries of the trusts while obtaining increases in
environmental protection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of public lands.
(2) "Contract harvesting" means a timber operation occurring on
state forest lands, in which the department contracts with a firm or
individual to perform all the necessary harvesting work to process
trees into logs sorted by department specifications. The department
then sells the individual log sorts.
(3) "Department" means the department of natural resources.
(4) "Harvesting costs" are those expenses related to the production
of log sorts from a stand of timber. These expenses typically involve
road building, labor for felling, bucking, and yarding, as well as the
transporting of sorted logs to the forest product purchasers.
(5) "Net proceeds" means gross proceeds from a contract harvesting
sale less harvesting costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department may establish a contract
harvesting program by directly contracting for the removal of timber
and other valuable materials from state lands.
(2) The contract requirements must be compatible with the office of
financial management's guide to public service contracts.
(3) The department may not use contract harvesting for more than
ten percent of the total annual volume of timber offered for sale.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The contract harvesting revolving account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the
gross proceeds of the sale of logs from a contract harvesting must be
deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for the payment of harvesting costs incurred on contract
harvesting sales. Only the commissioner or the commissioner's designee
may authorize expenditures from the account. The board of natural
resources has oversight of the account, and the commissioner must
periodically report to the board of natural resources as to the status
of the account, its disbursement, and receipts. The account is subject
to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation
is not required for expenditures.
When the logs from a contract harvesting sale are sold, the gross
proceeds must be deposited into the contract harvesting revolving
account. Moneys equal to the harvesting costs must be retained in the
account and be deducted from the gross proceeds to determine the net
proceeds. The net proceeds from the sale of the logs must be
distributed in accordance with RCW 43.85.130(1)(b). The final receipt
of gross proceeds on a contract harvesting sale must be retained in the
contract harvesting revolving account until all required costs for that
sale have been paid. The contract harvesting revolving account is an
interest-bearing account and the interest must be credited to the
account. The account balance may not exceed one million dollars at the
end of each fiscal year. Moneys in excess of one million dollars must
be disbursed according to RCW 76.12.030, 76.12.120, and 79.64.040. If
the department permanently discontinues the use of contract harvesting
sales, any sums remaining in the contract harvesting revolving account
must be returned to the resource management cost account and the forest
development account in proportion to each account's contribution to the
initial balance of the contract harvesting revolving account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The board of natural resources must
determine whether any special appraisal practices are necessary for
logs sold by the contract harvesting processes, and if so, must adopt
the special appraisal practices or procedures. In its consideration of
special appraisal practices, the board of natural resources must
consider and adopt procedures to rapidly market and sell any log sorts
that failed to receive the required minimum bid at the original
auction, which may include allowing the department to set a new
appraised value for the unsold sort.
The board of natural resources must establish and adopt policy and
procedures by which the department evaluates and selects certified
contract harvesters. The procedures must include a method whereby a
certified contract harvester may appeal a decision by the department or
board of natural resources to not include the certified contract
harvester on the list of approved contract harvesters.

Sec. 6 RCW 76.12.030 and 1997 c 370 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
If any land acquired by a county through foreclosure of tax liens,
or otherwise, comes within the classification of land described in RCW
76.12.020 and can be used as state forest land and if the department
deems such land necessary for the purposes of this chapter, the county
shall, upon demand by the department, deed such land to the department
and the land shall become a part of the state forest lands.
Such land shall be held in trust and administered and protected by
the department as other state forest lands. Any moneys derived from
the lease of such land or from the sale of forest products, oils,
gases, coal, minerals, or fossils therefrom, shall be distributed as
follows:
(1) The expense incurred by the state for administration,
reforestation, and protection, not to exceed twenty-five percent, which
rate of percentage shall be determined by the board of natural
resources, shall be returned to the forest development account in the
state general fund.
(2) Any balance remaining shall be paid to the county in which the
land is located to be paid, distributed, and prorated, except as
hereinafter provided, to the various funds in the same manner as
general taxes are paid and distributed during the year of payment:
PROVIDED, That any such balance remaining paid to a county with a
population of less than sixteen thousand shall first be applied to the
reduction of any indebtedness existing in the current expense fund of
such county during the year of payment.
In the event that the department sells logs using the contract
harvesting process described in chapter 79.-- RCW (sections 2 through
5 of this act), the moneys derived subject to this section are the net
proceeds from the contract harvesting sale.

Sec. 7 RCW 76.12.120 and 2000 c 148 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 76.12.125, all land, acquired or
designated by the department as state forest land, shall be forever
reserved from sale, but the timber and other products thereon may be
sold or the land may be leased in the same manner and for the same
purposes as is authorized for state granted land if the department
finds such sale or lease to be in the best interests of the state and
approves the terms and conditions thereof.
Except as provided in RCW 79.12.035, all money derived from the
sale of timber or other products, or from lease, or from any other
source from the land, except where the Constitution of this state or
RCW 76.12.030 requires other disposition, shall be disposed of as
follows:
(1) Fifty percent shall be placed in the forest development
account.
(2) Fifty percent shall be prorated and distributed to the state
general fund, to be dedicated for the benefit of the public schools,
and the county in which the land is located according to the relative
proportions of tax levies of all taxing districts in the county. The
portion to be distributed to the state general fund shall be based on
the regular school levy rate under RCW 84.52.065 as now or hereafter
amended and the levy rate for any maintenance and operation special
school levies. With regard to the portion to be distributed to the
counties, the department shall certify to the state treasurer the
amounts to be distributed within seven working days of receipt of the
money. The state treasurer shall distribute funds to the counties four
times per month, with no more than ten days between each payment date.
The money distributed to the county shall be paid, distributed, and
prorated to the various other funds in the same manner as general taxes
are paid and distributed during the year of payment.
In the event that the department sells logs using the contract
harvesting process described in chapter 79.-- RCW (sections 2 through
5 of this act), the moneys received subject to this section are the net
proceeds from the contract harvesting sale.

Sec. 8 RCW 79.64.040 and 2001 c 250 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall determine the amount deemed necessary in order to
achieve the purposes of this chapter and shall provide by rule for the
deduction of this amount from the moneys received from all leases,
sales, contracts, licenses, permits, easements, and rights of way
issued by the department and affecting public lands, provided that no
deduction shall be made from the proceeds from agricultural college
lands. Moneys received as deposits from successful bidders, advance
payments, and security under RCW 79.01.132 and 79.01.204 prior to
December 1, 1981, which have not been subjected to deduction under this
section are not subject to deduction under this section. The
deductions authorized under this section shall in no event exceed
twenty-five percent of the moneys received by the department in
connection with any one transaction pertaining to public lands other
than second class tide and shore lands and the beds of navigable
waters, and fifty percent of the moneys received by the department
pertaining to second class tide and shore lands and the beds of
navigable waters.
In the event that the department sells logs using the contract
harvesting process described in chapter 79.-- RCW (sections 2 through
5 of this act), the moneys received subject to this section are the net
proceeds from the contract harvesting sale.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.85.130 and 1981 2nd ex.s. c 4 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall deposit daily all moneys and fees
collected or received by the commissioner of public lands and the
department of natural resources in the discharge of official duties as
follows:
(a) The department shall pay moneys received as advance payments,
deposits, and security from successful bidders under RCW 79.01.132 and
79.01.204 to the state treasurer for deposit under subsection (1)(b) of
this section. Moneys received from unsuccessful bidders shall be
returned as provided in RCW 79.01.204;
(b) The department shall pay all moneys received on behalf of a
trust fund or account to the state treasurer for deposit in the trust
fund or account after making the deduction authorized under RCW
76.12.030, 76.12.120, ((and)) 79.64.040, and section 4 of this act;
(c) The natural resources deposit fund is hereby created. The
state treasurer is the custodian of the fund. All moneys or sums which
remain in the custody of the commissioner of public lands awaiting
disposition or where the final disposition is not known shall be
deposited into the natural resources deposit fund. Disbursement from
the fund shall be on the authorization of the commissioner or the
commissioner's designee, without necessity of appropriation;
(d) If it is required by law that the department repay moneys
disbursed under subsections (1)(a) and (1)(b) of this section the state
treasurer shall transfer such moneys, without necessity of
appropriation, to the department upon demand by the department from
those trusts and accounts originally receiving the moneys.
(2) Money shall not be deemed to have been paid to the state upon
any sale or lease of land until it has been paid to the state
treasurer.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2002 c 322 s 5, 2002 c 204 s 7, and
2002 c 61 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
Washington state combined fund drive account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund,
the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the game farm alternative
account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile
accountability incentive account, the contract harvesting revolving
account, the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition
center account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, and the
children's trust fund. However, the earnings to be distributed shall
first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service
fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 11 RCW 84.33.078 and 1986 c 65 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
When any timber standing on public land, other than federally owned
land, is sold separate from the land, the department of natural
resources or other governmental unit, as appropriate, shall state in
its notice of the sale or prospectus that timber sold separate from the
land is subject to property tax and that the amount of the tax paid may
be used as a credit against any tax imposed with respect to business of
harvesting timber from publicly owned land under RCW 84.33.041. If the
timber from public land is harvested by the state, its departments and
institutions and political subdivisions, or any municipal corporation
therein, the governmental unit, or governmental units, that harvest or
market the timber must provide the harvester purchasing the timber with
its harvesting and marketing costs as defined in RCW 84.33.035(7).

Sec. 12 RCW 84.33.035 and 2001 c 249 s 1 and 2001 c 97 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Agricultural methods" means the cultivation of trees that are
grown on land prepared by intensive cultivation and tilling, such as
irrigating, plowing, or turning over the soil, and on which all
unwanted plant growth is controlled continuously for the exclusive
purpose of raising trees such as Christmas trees and short-rotation
hardwoods.
(2) "Average rate of inflation" means the annual rate of inflation
as determined by the department averaged over the period of time as
provided in RCW 84.33.220 (1) and (2). This rate shall be published in
the state register by the department not later than January 1st of each
year for use in that assessment year.
(3) "Composite property tax rate" for a county means the total
amount of property taxes levied upon forest lands by all taxing
districts in the county other than the state, divided by the total
assessed value of all forest land in the county.
(4) "Forest land" is synonymous with "designated forest land" and
means any parcel of land that is twenty or more acres or multiple
parcels of land that are contiguous and total twenty or more acres that
is or are devoted primarily to growing and harvesting timber.
Designated forest land means the land only and does not include a
residential homesite. The term includes land used for incidental uses
that are compatible with the growing and harvesting of timber but no
more than ten percent of the land may be used for such incidental uses.
It also includes the land on which appurtenances necessary for the
production, preparation, or sale of the timber products exist in
conjunction with land producing these products.
(5) "Harvested" means the time when in the ordinary course of
business the quantity of timber by species is first definitely
determined. The amount harvested shall be determined by the Scribner
Decimal C Scale or other prevalent measuring practice adjusted to
arrive at substantially equivalent measurements, as approved by the
department.
(6) "Harvester" means every person who from the person's own land
or from the land of another under a right or license granted by lease
or contract, either directly or by contracting with others for the
necessary labor or mechanical services, fells, cuts, or takes timber
for sale or for commercial or industrial use. When the United States
or any instrumentality thereof, the state, including its departments
and institutions and political subdivisions, or any municipal
corporation therein so fells, cuts, or takes timber for sale or for
commercial or industrial use, the harvester is the first person other
than the United States or any instrumentality thereof, the state,
including its departments and institutions and political subdivisions,
or any municipal corporation therein, who acquires title to or a
possessory interest in the timber. The term "harvester" does not
include persons performing under contract the necessary labor or
mechanical services for a harvester.
(7) "Harvesting and marketing costs" means only those costs
directly associated with harvesting the timber from the land and
delivering it to the buyer and may include the costs of disposing of
logging residues. Any other costs that are not directly and
exclusively related to harvesting and marketing of the timber, such as
costs of permanent roads or costs of reforesting the land following
harvest, are not harvesting and marketing costs.
(8) "Incidental use" means a use of designated forest land that is
compatible with its purpose for growing and harvesting timber. An
incidental use may include a gravel pit, a shed or land used to store
machinery or equipment used in conjunction with the timber enterprise,
and any other use that does not interfere with or indicate that the
forest land is no longer primarily being used to grow and harvest
timber.
(9) "Local government" means any city, town, county, water-sewer
district, public utility district, port district, irrigation district,
flood control district, or any other municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or other political subdivision authorized to
levy special benefit assessments for sanitary or storm sewerage
systems, domestic water supply or distribution systems, or road
construction or improvement purposes.
(10) "Local improvement district" means any local improvement
district, utility local improvement district, local utility district,
road improvement district, or any similar unit created by a local
government for the purpose of levying special benefit assessments
against property specially benefited by improvements relating to the
districts.
(11) "Owner" means the party or parties having the fee interest in
land, except where land is subject to a real estate contract "owner"
means the contract vendee.
(12) "Primarily" or "primary use" means the existing use of the
land is so prevalent that when the characteristic use of the land is
evaluated any other use appears to be conflicting or nonrelated.
(13) "Short-rotation hardwoods" means hardwood trees, such as but
not limited to hybrid cottonwoods, cultivated by agricultural methods
in growing cycles shorter than fifteen years.
(14) "Small harvester" means every person who from his or her own
land or from the land of another under a right or license granted by
lease or contract, either directly or by contracting with others for
the necessary labor or mechanical services, fells, cuts, or takes
timber for sale or for commercial or industrial use in an amount not
exceeding two million board feet in a calendar year. When the United
States or any instrumentality thereof, the state, including its
departments and institutions and political subdivisions, or any
municipal corporation therein so fells, cuts, or takes timber for sale
or for commercial or industrial use, not exceeding these amounts, the
small harvester is the first person other than the United States or any
instrumentality thereof, the state, including its departments and
institutions and political subdivisions, or any municipal corporation
therein, who acquires title to or a possessory interest in the timber.
Small harvester does not include persons performing under contract the
necessary labor or mechanical services for a harvester, and it does not
include the harvesters of Christmas trees or short-rotation hardwoods.
(15) "Special benefit assessments" means special assessments levied
or capable of being levied in any local improvement district or
otherwise levied or capable of being levied by a local government to
pay for all or part of the costs of a local improvement and which may
be levied only for the special benefits to be realized by property by
reason of that local improvement.
(16) "Stumpage value of timber" means the appropriate stumpage
value shown on tables prepared by the department under RCW 84.33.091,
provided that for timber harvested from public land and sold under a
competitive bidding process, stumpage value shall mean the actual
amount paid to the seller in cash or other consideration. The stumpage
value of timber from public land does not include harvesting and
marketing costs if the timber from public land is harvested by, or
under contract for, the United States or any instrumentality of the
United States, the state, including its departments and institutions
and political subdivisions, or any municipal corporation therein.
Whenever payment for the stumpage includes considerations other than
cash, the value shall be the fair market value of the other
consideration. If the other consideration is permanent roads, the
value of the roads shall be the appraised value as appraised by the
seller.
(17) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or
publicly owned land, and except as provided in RCW 84.33.170 includes
Christmas trees and short-rotation hardwoods.
(18) "Timber assessed value" for a county means a value, calculated
by the department before October 1st of each year, equal to the total
stumpage value of timber harvested from privately owned land in the
county during the most recent four calendar quarters for which the
information is available multiplied by a ratio. The numerator of the
ratio is the rate of tax imposed by the county under RCW 84.33.051 for
the year of the calculation. The denominator of the ratio is the
composite property tax rate for the county for taxes due in the year of
the calculation, expressed as a percentage of assessed value.
(19) "Timber assessed value" for a taxing district means the timber
assessed value for the county multiplied by a ratio. The numerator of
the ratio is the total assessed value of forest land in the taxing
district. The denominator is the total assessed value of forest land
in the county. As used in this section, "assessed value of forest
land" means the assessed value of forest land for taxes due in the year
the timber assessed value for the county is calculated.
(20) "Timber management plan" means a plan prepared by a trained
forester, or any other person with adequate knowledge of timber
management practices, concerning the use of the land to grow and
harvest timber. Such a plan includes:
(a) A legal description of the forest land;
(b) A statement that the forest land is held in contiguous
ownership of twenty or more acres and is primarily devoted to and used
to grow and harvest timber;
(c) A brief description of the timber on the forest land or, if the
timber on the land has been harvested, the owner's plan to restock the
land with timber;
(d) A statement about whether the forest land is also used to graze
livestock;
(e) A statement about whether the land has been used in compliance
with the restocking, forest management, fire protection, insect and
disease control, and forest debris provisions of Title 76 RCW; and
(f) If the land has been recently harvested or supports a growth of
brush and noncommercial type timber, a description of the owner's plan
to restock the forest land within three years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The department of natural resources must
provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature
concerning the costs and effectiveness of the contract harvesting
program. The report must be submitted by December 31, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 2 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 79 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---