BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79.92.030 and 1989 c 79 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission on harbor lines is hereby authorized to change,
relocate, or reestablish harbor lines ((in Guemes Channel and Fidalgo
Bay in front of the city of Anacortes, Skagit county; in Grays Harbor
in front of the cities of Aberdeen, Hoquiam, and Cosmopolis, Grays
Harbor county; Bellingham Bay in front of the city of Bellingham,
Whatcom county; in Elliott Bay, Puget Sound and Lake Union within, and
in front of the city of Seattle, King county, and within one mile of
the limits of such city; Port Angeles harbor in front of the city of
Port Angeles, Clallam county; in Lake Washington in front of the cities
of Renton and Lake Forest Park, King county; Commencement Bay in front
of the city of Tacoma, Pierce county; and within one mile of the limits
of such city; Budd Inlet in front of the city of Olympia, Thurston
county; the Columbia river in front of the city of Kalama, Cowlitz
county; Port Washington Narrows and Sinclair Inlet in front of the city
of Bremerton, Kitsap county; Sinclair Inlet in front of the city of
Port Orchard, Kitsap county; in Liberty Bay in front of the city of
Poulsbo, King county; the Columbia river in front of the city of
Vancouver, Clark county; Port Townsend Bay in front of the city of Port
Townsend, Jefferson county; the Swinomish Channel in front of the city
of La Conner, Skagit county; and Port Gardner Bay in front of the city
of Everett, Snohomish county, except no harbor lines shall be
established west of the easterly shoreline of Jetty Island as presently
situated or west of a line extending S 37° 09' 38" W from the Snohomish
River Light (5); in Oakland Bay in front of the city of Shelton, Mason
county; and within one mile of the limits of such city; in Gig Harbor
in front of the city of Gig Harbor, Pierce county; and within one mile
of the limits of such city)).

--- END ---