BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.30.130 and 1965 c 8 s 43.30.130 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall exercise all of the powers, duties, and
functions now vested in the commissioner of public lands and such
powers, duties, and functions are hereby transferred to the
department((: PROVIDED, That)). However, nothing ((herein)) contained
in this section shall effect ((his)) the commissioner's ex officio
membership on any committee provided by law.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, and subject to
the limitations of RCW 4.24.115, the department, in the exercise of any
of its powers, may include in any authorized contract a provision for
indemnifying the other contracting party against loss or damages.
(b) When executing a right of way or easement contract over private
land that involves forest management activities, the department shall
indemnify the private landowner if the landowner does not receive a
direct benefit from the contract.

--- END ---