BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79.90.480 and 1998 c 185 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, annual rent rates for
the lease of state-owned aquatic lands for water-dependent uses shall
be determined as follows:
(1)(a) The assessed land value, exclusive of improvements, as
determined by the county assessor, of the upland tax parcel used in
conjunction with the leased area or, if there are no such uplands, of
the nearest upland tax parcel used for water-dependent purposes divided
by the parcel area equals the upland value.
(b) The upland value times the area of leased aquatic lands times
thirty percent equals the aquatic land value.
(2) As of July 1, 1989, and each July 1st thereafter, the
department shall determine the real capitalization rate to be applied
to water-dependent aquatic land leases commencing or being adjusted
under subsection (3)(a) of this section in that fiscal year. The real
capitalization rate shall be the real rate of return, except that until
June 30, 1989, the real capitalization rate shall be five percent and
thereafter it shall not change by more than one percentage point in any
one year or be more than seven percent or less than three percent.
(3) The annual rent shall be:
(a) Determined initially, and redetermined every four years or as
otherwise provided in the lease, by multiplying the aquatic land value
times the real capitalization rate; and
(b) Adjusted by the inflation rate each year in which the rent is
not determined under subsection (3)(a) of this section.
(4) If the upland parcel used in conjunction with the leased area
is not assessed or has an assessed value inconsistent with the purposes
of the lease, the nearest comparable upland parcel used for similar
purposes shall be substituted and the lease payment determined in the
same manner as provided in this section.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "upland tax parcel" is a tax
parcel, some portion of which has upland characteristics. Filled
tidelands or shorelands with upland characteristics which abut state-owned aquatic land shall be considered as uplands in determining
aquatic land values.
(6) The annual rent for filled state-owned aquatic lands that have
the characteristics of uplands shall be determined in accordance with
RCW 79.90.500 in those cases in which the state owns the fill and has
a right to charge for the fill.
(7) For leases for marina uses only, ((beginning on June 11, 1998))
as of January 1, 2004, the annual rental rates ((in effect on December
31, 1997, shall remain in effect until July 1, 1999, at which time the
annual water-dependent rent)) shall be determined by the ((method in
effect at that time. In order to be eligible for the rate to remain at
this level, a marina lease must be in good standing, meaning that the
lessee must be current with payment of rent, the lease not expired or
in approved holdover status, and the lessee not in breach of other
terms of the agreement)) marina rent formula developed by the
department pursuant to subsection (8) of this section.
(8)(a) On January 1, 2004, consistent with the provisions of this
subsection (8), the lease rates for a marina are a percentage of the
annual gross revenues generated by that marina. Lease rates must be
recalculated annually based upon the marina's gross revenues from the
previous year, as reported to the department consistent with this
subsection (8).
(b) By January 1, 2004, the department must develop a formula for
calculating marina rents consistent with this subsection (8). The
formula prepared and implemented by the department must at a minimum
include the percentage of gross revenues that will serve as the basis
for a marina's rent and a designation of revenue sources that will be
considered for rent calculation purposes. In developing a percentage
of gross revenues, the department must ensure, given the available
information, that the rent formula is initially calculated to at least
maintain state proceeds from marina rents as of July 1, 2003, and that
if the department does not receive ninety percent of the income
reporting forms required to be delivered under (d) of this subsection,
the department may determine the initial percentage of revenue
consistent with the goals of this section. In addition to the percent
of marina income, the department shall determine the administrative
costs of the department to calculate, audit, execute, and monitor
marina leases. All administrative costs recovered by the department
must be deposited into the resource management cost account created in
RCW 79.64.020.
(c) When developing a marina lease formula consistent with this
subsection (8), the department shall ensure that the percentage of
revenue established is applied to the income of the direct lessee, as
well as to the income of any person or entity that subleases, or
contracts to operate the marina, with the direct lessee, less the
amount paid by the sublease to the direct lessee.
(d) All marina operators under lease with the department must
return to the department an income reporting form, provided by the
department, and all state and federal tax information before July 1,
2003, and again annually on a date set by the department. On the
income reporting form, the department may require a marina to disclose
to the department any information about income from all marina related
sources, excluding restaurants and bars. All income reports submitted
to the department are subject to audit and revision by the department
and the department may inspect all of the lessee's books, records, and
documents relating to the operation of the leased aquatic lands at all
reasonable times. If the lessee fails to submit the required income
information, the department may conduct an audit at the lessee's
expense or cancel the lease.
(e) Initially, the marina rent formula developed by the department
pursuant to (b) of this subsection will be applied to each marina on
its 2004 anniversary date, and will be based on that marina's 2003
income information.
(f) No marina lease may be for less than five hundred dollars, plus
any administrative costs required to reimburse the department for the
cost of establishing new marina leases.
(9) For all new leases for ((marinas, or any)) other water-dependent uses, issued after December 31, 1997, the initial annual
water-dependent rent shall be determined by the methods in subsections
(1) through (6) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---