BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 76.06.010 and 1951 c 233 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds and declares that:
(1) Forest insects and forest tree diseases which threaten the
permanent timber production of the forested areas of the state of
Washington are ((hereby declared to be)) a public nuisance.
(2) Exotic forest insects or diseases, even in small numbers, can
constitute serious threats to native forests. Native tree species may
lack natural immunity. There are often no natural control agents such
as diseases, predators, or parasites to limit populations of exotic
forest insects or diseases. Exotic forest insects or diseases can also
outcompete, displace, or destroy habitat of native species. It is in
the public interest to identify, control, and eradicate outbreaks of
exotic forest insects or diseases that threaten the diversity,
abundance, and survivability of native forest trees and the
environment.

Sec. 2 RCW 76.06.020 and 2000 c 11 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((As used in)) The definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter((:)) unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agent" means the recognized legal representative,
representatives, agent, or agents for any owner((;)).
(2) "Department" means the department of natural resources((;)).
(3) "Owner" means and includes ((individuals, partnerships,
corporations, and associations;)) persons or their agents.
(4) "Timber land" means any land on which there is a sufficient
number of trees, standing or down, to constitute, in the judgment of
the department, a forest insect or forest disease breeding ground of a
nature to constitute a menace, injurious and dangerous to permanent
forest growth in the district under consideration.
(5) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of public lands.
(6) "Exotic" means not native to forest lands in Washington state.
(7) "Forest land" means any land on which there are sufficient
numbers and distribution of trees and associated species to, in the
judgment of the department, contribute to the spread of forest insect
or forest disease outbreaks that could be injurious to forest health.
(8) "Forest health" means the condition of a forest being sound in
ecological function, sustainable, resilient, and resistant to insects,
diseases, fire, and other disturbance, and having the capacity to meet
landowner objectives.
(9) "Forest health emergency" means the introduction of, or an
outbreak of, an exotic forest insect or disease that poses an imminent
danger of damage to the environment by threatening the survivability of
native tree species.
(10) "Forest insect or disease" means a living stage of an insect,
other invertebrate animal, or disease-causing organism or agent that
can directly or indirectly injure or cause disease or damage in trees,
or parts of trees, or in processed or manufactured wood, or other
products of trees.
(11) "Integrated pest management" means a strategy that uses
various combinations of pest control methods, including biological,
cultural, and chemical methods, in a compatible manner to achieve
satisfactory control and ensure favorable economic and environmental
consequences.
(12) "Native" means having populated Washington's forested lands
prior to European settlement.
(13) "Outbreak" means a rapidly expanding population of insects or
diseases with potential to spread.
(14) "Person" means any individual, partnership, private, public,
or municipal corporation, county, federal, state, or local governmental
agency, tribes, or association of individuals of whatever nature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 76.06 RCW
to read as follows:
The department is authorized to contribute resources and expertise
to assist the department of agriculture in control or eradication
efforts authorized under chapter 17.24 RCW in order to protect forest
lands of the state.
If either the department of agriculture has not taken action under
chapter 17.24 RCW or the commissioner finds that additional efforts are
required to control or prevent an outbreak of an exotic forest insect
or disease which has not become so habituated that it can no longer be
eradicated and that poses an imminent danger of damage to the forested
environment by threatening the diversity, abundance, and survivability
of native tree species, or both, the commissioner may declare a forest
health emergency.
Upon declaration of a forest health emergency, the department must
delineate the area at risk and determine the most appropriate
integrated pest management methods to control the outbreak, in
consultation with other interested agencies, tribes, and affected
forest landowners. The department must notify affected forest
landowners of its intent to conduct control operations.
Upon declaration of a forest health emergency by the commissioner,
the department is authorized to enter into agreements with forest
landowners, companies, individuals, tribal entities, and federal,
state, and local agencies to accomplish control of exotic forest
insects or diseases on any affected forest lands using such funds as
have been, or may be, made available.
The department must proceed with the control of the exotic forest
insects or diseases on affected nonfederal and nontribal forest lands
with or without the cooperation of the owner. The department may
reimburse cooperating forest landowners and agencies for actual cost of
equipment, labor, and materials utilized in cooperative exotic forest
insect or disease control projects, as agreed to by the department.
A forest health emergency no longer exists when the department
finds that the exotic forest insect or disease has been controlled or
eradicated, that the imminent threat no longer exists, or that there is
no longer good likelihood of effective control.
Nothing under this chapter diminishes the authority and
responsibility of the department of agriculture under chapter 17.24
RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 76.09.050 and 2002 c 121 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall establish by rule which forest practices shall
be included within each of the following classes:
Class I: Minimal or specific forest practices that have no direct
potential for damaging a public resource and that may be conducted
without submitting an application or a notification except that when
the regulating authority is transferred to a local governmental entity,
those Class I forest practices that involve timber harvesting or road
construction within "urban growth areas," designated pursuant to
chapter 36.70A RCW, are processed as Class IV forest practices, but are
not subject to environmental review under chapter 43.21C RCW;
Class II: Forest practices which have a less than ordinary
potential for damaging a public resource that may be conducted without
submitting an application and may begin five calendar days, or such
lesser time as the department may determine, after written notification
by the operator, in the manner, content, and form as prescribed by the
department, is received by the department. However, the work may not
begin until all forest practice fees required under RCW 76.09.065 have
been received by the department. Class II shall not include forest
practices:
(a) On lands platted after January 1, 1960, as provided in chapter
58.17 RCW or on lands that have or are being converted to another use;
(b) Which require approvals under the provisions of the hydraulics
act, RCW 77.55.100;
(c) Within "shorelines of the state" as defined in RCW 90.58.030;
(d) Excluded from Class II by the board; or
(e) Including timber harvesting or road construction within "urban
growth areas," designated pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW, which are
Class IV;
Class III: Forest practices other than those contained in Class I,
II, or IV. A Class III application must be approved or disapproved by
the department within thirty calendar days from the date the department
receives the application. However, the applicant may not begin work on
that forest practice until all forest practice fees required under RCW
76.09.065 have been received by the department;
Class IV: Forest practices other than those contained in Class I
or II: (a) On lands platted after January 1, 1960, as provided in
chapter 58.17 RCW, (b) on lands that have or are being converted to
another use, (c) on lands which, pursuant to RCW 76.09.070 as now or
hereafter amended, are not to be reforested because of the likelihood
of future conversion to urban development, (d) involving timber
harvesting or road construction on lands that are contained within
"urban growth areas," designated pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW, except
where the forest landowner provides: (i) A written statement of intent
signed by the forest landowner not to convert to a use other than
commercial forest product operations for ten years, accompanied by
either a written forest management plan acceptable to the department or
documentation that the land is enrolled under the provisions of chapter
84.33 RCW; or (ii) a conversion option harvest plan approved by the
local governmental entity and submitted to the department as part of
the application, and/or (e) which have a potential for a substantial
impact on the environment and therefore require an evaluation by the
department as to whether or not a detailed statement must be prepared
pursuant to the state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW.
Such evaluation shall be made within ten days from the date the
department receives the application: PROVIDED, That nothing herein
shall be construed to prevent any local or regional governmental entity
from determining that a detailed statement must be prepared for an
action pursuant to a Class IV forest practice taken by that
governmental entity concerning the land on which forest practices will
be conducted. A Class IV application must be approved or disapproved
by the department within thirty calendar days from the date the
department receives the application, unless the department determines
that a detailed statement must be made, in which case the application
must be approved or disapproved by the department within sixty calendar
days from the date the department receives the application, unless the
commissioner of public lands, through the promulgation of a formal
order, determines that the process cannot be completed within such
period. However, the applicant may not begin work on that forest
practice until all forest practice fees required under RCW 76.09.065
have been received by the department.
Forest practices under Classes I, II, and III are exempt from the
requirements for preparation of a detailed statement under the state
environmental policy act.
(2) Except for those forest practices being regulated by local
governmental entities as provided elsewhere in this chapter, no Class
II, Class III, or Class IV forest practice shall be commenced or
continued after January 1, 1975, unless the department has received a
notification with regard to a Class II forest practice or approved an
application with regard to a Class III or Class IV forest practice
containing all information required by RCW 76.09.060 as now or
hereafter amended. However, in the event forest practices regulations
necessary for the scheduled implementation of this chapter and RCW
90.48.420 have not been adopted in time to meet such schedules, the
department shall have the authority to regulate forest practices and
approve applications on such terms and conditions consistent with this
chapter and RCW 90.48.420 and the purposes and policies of RCW
76.09.010 until applicable forest practices regulations are in effect.
(3) Except for those forest practices being regulated by local
governmental entities as provided elsewhere in this chapter, if a
notification or application is delivered in person to the department by
the operator or the operator's agent, the department shall immediately
provide a dated receipt thereof. In all other cases, the department
shall immediately mail a dated receipt to the operator.
(4) Except for those forest practices being regulated by local
governmental entities as provided elsewhere in this chapter, forest
practices shall be conducted in accordance with the forest practices
regulations, orders and directives as authorized by this chapter or the
forest practices regulations, and the terms and conditions of any
approved applications.
(5) Except for those forest practices being regulated by local
governmental entities as provided elsewhere in this chapter, the
department of natural resources shall notify the applicant in writing
of either its approval of the application or its disapproval of the
application and the specific manner in which the application fails to
comply with the provisions of this section or with the forest practices
regulations. Except as provided otherwise in this section, if the
department fails to either approve or disapprove an application or any
portion thereof within the applicable time limit, the application shall
be deemed approved and the operation may be commenced: PROVIDED, That
this provision shall not apply to applications which are neither
approved nor disapproved pursuant to the provisions of subsection (7)
of this section: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That if seasonal field conditions
prevent the department from being able to properly evaluate the
application, the department may issue an approval conditional upon
further review within sixty days: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the
department shall have until April 1, 1975, to approve or disapprove an
application involving forest practices allowed to continue to April 1,
1975, under the provisions of subsection (2) of this section. Upon
receipt of any notification or any satisfactorily completed application
the department shall in any event no later than two business days after
such receipt transmit a copy to the departments of ecology and fish and
wildlife, and to the county, city, or town in whose jurisdiction the
forest practice is to be commenced. Any comments by such agencies
shall be directed to the department of natural resources.
(6) For those forest practices regulated by the board and the
department, if the county, city, or town believes that an application
is inconsistent with this chapter, the forest practices regulations, or
any local authority consistent with RCW 76.09.240 as now or hereafter
amended, it may so notify the department and the applicant, specifying
its objections.
(7) For those forest practices regulated by the board and the
department, the department shall not approve portions of applications
to which a county, city, or town objects if:
(a) The department receives written notice from the county, city,
or town of such objections within fourteen business days from the time
of transmittal of the application to the county, city, or town, or one
day before the department acts on the application, whichever is later;
and
(b) The objections relate to lands either:
(i) Platted after January 1, 1960, as provided in chapter 58.17
RCW; or
(ii) On lands that have or are being converted to another use.
The department shall either disapprove those portions of such
application or appeal the county, city, or town objections to the
appeals board. If the objections related to subparagraphs (b)(i) and
(ii) of this subsection are based on local authority consistent with
RCW 76.09.240 as now or hereafter amended, the department shall
disapprove the application until such time as the county, city, or town
consents to its approval or such disapproval is reversed on appeal.
The applicant shall be a party to all department appeals of county,
city, or town objections. Unless the county, city, or town either
consents or has waived its rights under this subsection, the department
shall not approve portions of an application affecting such lands until
the minimum time for county, city, or town objections has expired.
(8) For those forest practices regulated by the board and the
department, in addition to any rights under the above paragraph, the
county, city, or town may appeal any department approval of an
application with respect to any lands within its jurisdiction. The
appeals board may suspend the department's approval in whole or in part
pending such appeal where there exists potential for immediate and
material damage to a public resource.
(9) For those forest practices regulated by the board and the
department, appeals under this section shall be made to the appeals
board in the manner and time provided in RCW 76.09.220(8). In such
appeals there shall be no presumption of correctness of either the
county, city, or town or the department position.
(10) For those forest practices regulated by the board and the
department, the department shall, within four business days notify the
county, city, or town of all notifications, approvals, and disapprovals
of an application affecting lands within the county, city, or town,
except to the extent the county, city, or town has waived its right to
such notice.
(11) For those forest practices regulated by the board and the
department, a county, city, or town may waive in whole or in part its
rights under this section, and may withdraw or modify any such waiver,
at any time by written notice to the department.
(12) Notwithstanding subsections (2) through (5) of this section,
forest practices applications or notifications are not required for
exotic insect and disease control operations conducted in accordance
with RCW 76.09.060(8) where eradication can reasonably be expected.

Sec. 5 RCW 76.09.060 and 1997 c 290 s 3 and 1997 c 173 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The following shall apply to those forest practices administered
and enforced by the department and for which the board shall promulgate
regulations as provided in this chapter:
(1) The department shall prescribe the form and contents of the
notification and application. The forest practices rules shall specify
by whom and under what conditions the notification and application
shall be signed or otherwise certified as acceptable. The application
or notification shall be delivered in person to the department, sent by
first class mail to the department or electronically filed in a form
defined by the department. The form for electronic filing shall be
readily convertible to a paper copy, which shall be available to the
public pursuant to chapter 42.17 RCW. The information required may
include, but is not limited to:
(a) Name and address of the forest landowner, timber owner, and
operator;
(b) Description of the proposed forest practice or practices to be
conducted;
(c) Legal description and tax parcel identification numbers of the
land on which the forest practices are to be conducted;
(d) Planimetric and topographic maps showing location and size of
all lakes and streams and other public waters in and immediately
adjacent to the operating area and showing all existing and proposed
roads and major tractor roads;
(e) Description of the silvicultural, harvesting, or other forest
practice methods to be used, including the type of equipment to be used
and materials to be applied;
(f) Proposed plan for reforestation and for any revegetation
necessary to reduce erosion potential from roadsides and yarding roads,
as required by the forest practices rules;
(g) Soil, geological, and hydrological data with respect to forest
practices;
(h) The expected dates of commencement and completion of all forest
practices specified in the application;
(i) Provisions for continuing maintenance of roads and other
construction or other measures necessary to afford protection to public
resources;
(j) An affirmation that the statements contained in the
notification or application are true; and
(k) All necessary application or notification fees.
(2) Long range plans may be submitted to the department for review
and consultation.
(3) The application for a forest practice or the notification of a
Class II forest practice is subject to the three-year reforestation
requirement.
(a) If the application states that any such land will be or is
intended to be so converted:
(i) The reforestation requirements of this chapter and of the
forest practices rules shall not apply if the land is in fact so
converted unless applicable alternatives or limitations are provided in
forest practices rules issued under RCW 76.09.070 as now or hereafter
amended;
(ii) Completion of such forest practice operations shall be deemed
conversion of the lands to another use for purposes of chapters 84.33
and 84.34 RCW unless the conversion is to a use permitted under a
current use tax agreement permitted under chapter 84.34 RCW;
(iii) The forest practices described in the application are subject
to applicable county, city, town, and regional governmental authority
permitted under RCW 76.09.240 as now or hereafter amended as well as
the forest practices rules.
(b) Except as provided elsewhere in this section, if the
application or notification does not state that any land covered by the
application or notification will be or is intended to be so converted:
(i) For six years after the date of the application the county,
city, town, and regional governmental entities shall deny any or all
applications for permits or approvals, including building permits and
subdivision approvals, relating to nonforestry uses of land subject to
the application;
(A) The department shall submit to the local governmental entity a
copy of the statement of a forest landowner's intention not to convert
which shall represent a recognition by the landowner that the six-year
moratorium shall be imposed and shall preclude the landowner's ability
to obtain development permits while the moratorium is in place. This
statement shall be filed by the local governmental entity with the
county recording officer, who shall record the documents as provided in
chapter 65.04 RCW, except that lands designated as forest lands of
long-term commercial significance under chapter 36.70A RCW shall not be
recorded due to the low likelihood of conversion. Not recording the
statement of a forest landowner's conversion intention shall not be
construed to mean the moratorium is not in effect.
(B) The department shall collect the recording fee and reimburse
the local governmental entity for the cost of recording the
application.
(C) When harvesting takes place without an application, the local
governmental entity shall impose the six-year moratorium provided in
(b)(i) of this subsection from the date the unpermitted harvesting was
discovered by the department or the local governmental entity.
(D) The local governmental entity shall develop a process for
lifting the six-year moratorium, which shall include public
notification, and procedures for appeals and public hearings.
(E) The local governmental entity may develop an administrative
process for lifting or waiving the six-year moratorium for the purposes
of constructing a single-family residence or outbuildings, or both, on
a legal lot and building site. Lifting or waiving of the six-year
moratorium is subject to compliance with all local ordinances.
(F) The six-year moratorium shall not be imposed on a forest
practices application that contains a conversion option harvest plan
approved by the local governmental entity unless the forest practice
was not in compliance with the approved forest practice permit. Where
not in compliance with the conversion option harvest plan, the six-year
moratorium shall be imposed from the date the application was approved
by the department or the local governmental entity;
(ii) Failure to comply with the reforestation requirements
contained in any final order or decision shall constitute a removal of
designation under the provisions of RCW 84.33.140, and a change of use
under the provisions of RCW 84.34.080, and, if applicable, shall
subject such lands to the payments and/or penalties resulting from such
removals or changes; and
(iii) Conversion to a use other than commercial forest product
operations within six years after approval of the forest practices
without the consent of the county, city, or town shall constitute a
violation of each of the county, municipal city, town, and regional
authorities to which the forest practice operations would have been
subject if the application had so stated.
(c) The application or notification shall be signed by the forest
landowner and accompanied by a statement signed by the forest landowner
indicating his or her intent with respect to conversion and
acknowledging that he or she is familiar with the effects of this
subsection.
(4) Whenever an approved application authorizes a forest practice
which, because of soil condition, proximity to a water course or other
unusual factor, has a potential for causing material damage to a public
resource, as determined by the department, the applicant shall, when
requested on the approved application, notify the department two days
before the commencement of actual operations.
(5) Before the operator commences any forest practice in a manner
or to an extent significantly different from that described in a
previously approved application or notification, there shall be
submitted to the department a new application or notification form in
the manner set forth in this section.
(6) Except as provided in RCW 76.09.350(4), the notification to or
the approval given by the department to an application to conduct a
forest practice shall be effective for a term of two years from the
date of approval or notification and shall not be renewed unless a new
application is filed and approved or a new notification has been filed.
At the option of the applicant, an application or notification may be
submitted to cover a single forest practice or a number of forest
practices within reasonable geographic or political boundaries as
specified by the department. An application or notification that
covers more than one forest practice may have an effective term of more
than two years. The board shall adopt rules that establish standards
and procedures for approving an application or notification that has an
effective term of more than two years. Such rules shall include
extended time periods for application or notification approval or
disapproval. On an approved application with a term of more than two
years, the applicant shall inform the department before commencing
operations.
(7) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no prior
application or notification shall be required for any emergency forest
practice necessitated by fire, flood, windstorm, earthquake, or other
emergency as defined by the board, but the operator shall submit an
application or notification, whichever is applicable, to the department
within forty-eight hours after commencement of such practice or as
required by local regulations.
(8) Forest practices applications or notifications are not required
for forest practices conducted to control exotic forest insect or
disease outbreaks, when conducted by or under the direction of the
department of agriculture in carrying out an order of the governor or
director of the department of agriculture to implement pest control
measures as authorized under chapter 17.24 RCW, and are not required
when conducted by or under the direction of the department in carrying
out emergency measures under a forest health emergency declaration by
the commissioner of public lands as provided in section 3 of this act.
(a) For the purposes of this subsection, exotic forest insect or
disease has the same meaning as defined in RCW 76.06.020.
(b) In order to minimize adverse impacts to public resources,
control measures must be based on integrated pest management, as
defined in RCW 17.15.010, and must follow forest practices rules
relating to road construction and maintenance, timber harvest, and
forest chemicals, to the extent possible without compromising control
objectives.
(c) Agencies conducting or directing control efforts must provide
advance notice to the appropriate regulatory staff of the department of
the operations that would be subject to exemption from forest practices
application or notification requirements.
(d) When the appropriate regulatory staff of the department are
notified under (c) of this subsection, they must consult with the
landowner and other interested agencies, including the department of
ecology and affected tribes, and assist the notifying agencies in the
development of integrated pest management plans that comply with forest
practices rules as required under (b) of this subsection.
(e) Nothing under this subsection relieves agencies conducting or
directing control efforts from requirements of the federal clean water
act as administered by the department of ecology under RCW 90.48.260.
(f) Forest lands where trees have been cut as part of an exotic
forest insect or disease control effort under this subsection are
subject to reforestation requirements under RCW 76.09.070.
(g) The exemption from obtaining approved forest practices
applications or notifications does not apply to forest practices
conducted after the governor, the director of the department of
agriculture, or the commissioner of public lands have declared that an
emergency no longer exists because control objectives have been met,
that there is no longer an imminent threat, or that there is no longer
a good likelihood of control.

Sec. 6 RCW 17.24.171 and 1991 c 257 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the director determines that there exists an imminent danger
of an infestation of plant pests or plant diseases that seriously
endangers the agricultural or horticultural industries of the state, or
that seriously threatens life, health, ((or)) economic well-being, or
the environment, the director shall request the governor to order
emergency measures to control the pests or plant diseases under RCW
43.06.010(((14))) (13). The director's findings shall contain an
evaluation of the affect of the emergency measures on public health.
(2) If an emergency is declared pursuant to RCW 43.06.010(((14)))
(13), the director may appoint a committee to advise the governor
through the director and to review emergency measures necessary under
the authority of RCW 43.06.010(((14))) (13) and this section and make
subsequent recommendations to the governor. The committee shall
include representatives of the agricultural industries, state and local
government, public health interests, technical service providers, and
environmental organizations.
(3) Upon the order of the governor of the use of emergency
measures, the director is authorized to implement the emergency
measures to prevent, control, or eradicate plant pests or plant
diseases that are the subject of the emergency order. Such measures,
after thorough evaluation of all other alternatives, may include the
aerial application of pesticides.
(4) Upon the order of the governor of the use of emergency
measures, the director is authorized to enter into agreements with
individuals ((or)), companies, or ((both)) agencies, to accomplish the
prevention, control, or eradication of plant pests or plant diseases,
notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 15.58 or 17.21 RCW, or any
other statute.
(5) The director shall continually evaluate the emergency measures
taken and report to the governor at intervals of not less than ten
days. The director shall immediately advise the governor if he or she
finds that the emergency no longer exists or if certain emergency
measures should be discontinued.

--- END ---