BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.29.005 and 1969 c 47 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The term)) The definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the board of dental hygiene created in section 9
of this act.
(2) "Dental hygiene diagnosis" means the identification of, and the
discrimination between, a person's physical and oral signs and symptoms
that are essential to effective execution and management of the dental
hygiene care regimen.
(3) "Department" means the department of health.
(4) "Licensed dental hygienist" means a preventive oral health
professional who has graduated from an institute of higher education's
accredited dental hygiene program and is licensed under this chapter.
(5) "Licensed dental hygienist--advanced practice" means a
preventive oral health professional licensed under this chapter with a
baccalaureate degree in dental hygiene from an institute of higher
education approved by the board, or a preventive oral health
professional licensed under this chapter with a baccalaureate degree in
a related field from an institute of higher education approved by the
board.
(6) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.
(7) "Surfaces of the teeth" ((as used in this chapter)) means the
portions of the crown and root surface to which there is no periodontal
membrane attached.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.29.050 and 1997 c 37 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person licensed as a licensed dental hygienist in this state
may remove deposits and stains from the surfaces of the teeth, may
apply topical preventive or prophylactic agents, may polish and smooth
restorations, may perform root planing and soft-tissue curettage, may
administer local anesthetic and nitrous oxide analgesia under the
general supervision of a licensed dentist, may place restorations into
the cavity prepared by the licensed dentist, may carve, contour, and
adjust contacts and occlusion of the restoration under the close
supervision of a licensed dentist, and may perform other dental
operations and services delegated to them by a licensed dentist:
PROVIDED HOWEVER, That licensed dental hygienists shall in no event
perform the following dental operations or services:
(1) Any surgical removal of tissue of the oral cavity;
(2) Any prescription of drugs or medications requiring the written
order or prescription of a licensed dentist or physician;
(3) Any dental diagnosis for treatment or treatment planning; or
(4) The taking of any impression of the teeth or jaw, or the
relationships of the teeth or jaws, for the purpose of fabricating any
intra-oral restoration, appliance, or prosthesis.
Such licensed dental hygienists may perform dental operations and
services only under the general supervision except where otherwise
provided in this section, of a licensed dentist, and under such
supervision may be employed by hospitals, boards of education of public
or private schools, county boards, boards of health, or public or
charitable institutions, or in dental offices.
For the purposes of this section, dental hygienists may delegate
certain functions to unlicensed persons as established by the board by
rule. The unlicensed person may only perform the delegated function
under the close supervision of a dental hygienist.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.29 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A licensed dental hygienist--advanced practice may perform all
dental operations and services authorized under RCW 18.29.050 without
dental supervision. A licensed dental hygienist--advanced practice may
also perform the following authorized dental hygiene operations and
services without dental supervision, regardless of setting: Removing
deposits and stains from the surfaces of the teeth, applying topical
preventive or prophylactic agents, polishing and smoothing
restorations, performing root planning, soft-tissue curettage, and
applying temporary cementation.
(2) For the purposes of this section, licensed dental hygienists--advanced practice may, under close supervision delegate certain
functions to unlicensed persons as established by the board by rule.
(3) For the purposes of this section, licensed dental hygienists--advanced practice may place permanent antimicrobials and antibiotics.
(4) The board may authorize advanced practice designation for
licensed dental hygienists practicing in identified critical shortage
areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The legislature recognizes that while
Washington state licenses dental hygienists, the majority of the states
and professional organizations still refer to dental hygienists as
"registered dental hygienists." Section 5 of this act takes cognizance
of this fact, and requires persons licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW to
wear name badges that refer to their status "registered dental
hygienists," or "R.D.H."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 18.29 RCW
to read as follows:
A person licensed under this chapter must wear a name badge that
identifies the licensee as an "R.D.H." when practicing dental hygiene.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.29.021 and 1996 c 191 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((department)) secretary shall issue a license to any
applicant who((, as determined by the secretary)):
(a) Has successfully completed an educational program approved by
the ((secretary)) board. This educational program shall include course
work encompassing the subject areas within the scope of the license to
practice dental hygiene in the state of Washington;
(b) Has successfully completed an examination administered or
approved by the ((dental hygiene examining committee)) board; and
(c) Has not engaged in unprofessional conduct or is not unable to
practice with reasonable skill and safety as a result of a physical or
mental impairment.
(2) Applications for licensure must comply with administrative
procedures, administrative requirements, and fees established according
to RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.29.045 and 1991 c 3 s 47 are each amended to read
as follows:
An applicant holding a valid license and currently engaged in
practice in another state may be granted a license without examination
required by this chapter, on the payment of any required fees, if the
secretary in consultation with the ((advisory committee)) board
determines that the other state's licensing standards are substantively
equivalent to the standards in this state: PROVIDED, That the
secretary in consultation with the ((advisory committee)) board may
require the applicant to: (1) File with the secretary documentation
certifying the applicant is licensed to practice in another state; and
(2) provide information as the secretary deems necessary pertaining to
the conditions and criteria of the uniform disciplinary act, chapter
18.130 RCW and to demonstrate to the secretary a knowledge of
Washington law pertaining to the practice of dental hygiene.

Sec. 8 RCW 18.29.071 and 1996 c 191 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((secretary)) board shall establish the administrative
procedures, administrative requirements, and fees for renewal of
licenses as provided in this chapter and in RCW 43.70.250 and
43.70.280.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 18.29 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board of dental hygiene is created. The board consists of
five members who shall be appointed by the governor. Of the initial
appointments, two shall be appointed for a term of two years, two for
a term of three years, and one for a term of four years. Thereafter,
all appointments shall be for terms of four years. Four members of the
board shall be dental hygienists licensed under this chapter and
residing in this state, shall have not less than five years' experience
in the practice of dental hygiene, and shall be actively engaged in
practice within two years of appointment. The fifth member shall be
appointed from the public at large, shall have an interest in the
rights of consumers of dental services, and shall not be or have been
a member of any other licensing board, a licensee of any dental related
board, an employee of any dental services facility, nor derive his or
her primary livelihood from the provision of dental services at any
level of responsibility. In the event that a member of the board
cannot complete his or her term of office, another appointment shall be
made by the governor in accordance with the procedure stated in this
subsection to fill the remainder of the term. No member may serve for
more than two successive four-year terms.
(2) The secretary of health shall furnish such secretarial,
clerical, and other assistance as the board may require. Each member
of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240, and
be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 18.29 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to other duties specified in this chapter, the board
has the following powers and duties:
(1) To develop and administer, or approve, or both, examinations to
applicants for licensure under this chapter;
(2) To pass upon the qualifications of applicants for a license and
to certify to the secretary duly qualified applicants;
(3) To adopt rules not inconsistent with the laws of this state as
may be deemed necessary or proper to carry out the purposes of this
chapter;
(4) To establish and administer requirements for continuing
competency, which shall be a prerequisite to renewing a license under
this chapter;
(5) To keep an official record of all board proceedings, which
record shall be evidence of all proceedings of the board that are set
forth in the official record; and
(6) To adopt rules not inconsistent with the laws of this state,
when it deems appropriate, in response to questions put to it by
professional dental related associations, dental hygienists, and
consumers in this state concerning the authority of dental hygienists
to perform certain acts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 18.29 RCW
to read as follows:
The board shall elect from its members a chair and vice-chair/secretary, who shall serve for one year or until their successors
are elected. The board shall meet at least once a year and upon the
call of the chair at such times and places as the chair designates.
Three members constitute a quorum of the full board for the transaction
of any business. Meetings of the board shall be open and public,
except the board may hold executive sessions to the extent permitted by
chapter 42.30 RCW.

Sec. 12 RCW 18.29.120 and 1995 c 198 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((secretary in consultation with the Washington dental hygiene
examining committee)) board shall:
(1) Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to
prepare and conduct examinations for dental hygiene licensure;
(2) Require an applicant for licensure to pass an examination
consisting of written and practical tests upon such subjects and of
such scope as the ((committee)) board determines;
(3) Set the standards for passage of the examination;
(4) Administer at least two examinations each calendar year.
Additional examinations may be given as necessary; and
(5) Establish by rule the procedures for an appeal of an
examination failure.

Sec. 13 RCW 18.29.140 and 1991 c 3 s 54 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((secretary)) board shall establish by rule the standards and
procedures for approval of educational programs and may contract with
individuals or organizations having expertise in the profession or in
education to report to the ((secretary)) board information necessary
for the ((secretary)) board to evaluate the educational programs. The
((secretary)) board may establish a fee for educational program
evaluation. The fee shall be set to defray the administrative costs
for evaluating the educational program, including, but not limited to,
costs for site evaluation.

Sec. 14 RCW 18.29.150 and 1991 c 3 s 55 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((secretary)) board shall establish the date and location
of the examination. Applicants who meet the education requirements for
licensure shall be scheduled for the next examination following the
filing of the application. The ((secretary)) board shall establish by
rule the examination application deadline.
(2) The examination shall contain subjects appropriate to the scope
of practice and on laws in the state of Washington regulating dental
hygiene practice.
(3) The ((committee)) board shall establish by rule the
requirements for a reexamination if the applicant has failed the
examination.
(4) The ((committee)) board may approve an examination prepared or
administered by a private testing agency or association of licensing
authorities.

Sec. 15 RCW 18.29.160 and 1991 c 3 s 56 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary, members of the ((committee)) board, and individuals
acting on their behalf are immune from suit in any action, civil or
criminal, based on any acts performed in the course of their duties.

Sec. 16 RCW 18.29.190 and 1993 c 323 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall issue a temporary license without the
examination required by this chapter to any applicant who, as
determined by the ((secretary)) board:
(a) Holds a valid license in another state that allows the scope of
practice in subsection (3)(a) through (j) of this section;
(b) Is currently engaged in active practice in another state. For
the purposes of this section, "active practice" means five hundred
sixty hours of practice in the preceding twenty-four months;
(c) Files with the ((secretary)) board documentation certifying
that the applicant:
(i) Has graduated from an accredited dental hygiene school approved
by the ((secretary)) board;
(ii) Has successfully completed the dental hygiene national board
examination; and
(iii) Is licensed to practice in another state;
(d) Provides information as the ((secretary)) board deems necessary
pertaining to the conditions and criteria of the uniform disciplinary
act, chapter 18.130 RCW;
(e) Demonstrates to the ((secretary)) board a knowledge of
Washington state law pertaining to the practice of dental hygiene,
including the administration of legend drugs;
(f) Pays any required fees; and
(g) Meets requirements for AIDS education.
(2) The term of the temporary license issued under this section is
eighteen months ((and it is)). An applicant may renew the temporary
license for an additional eighteen months solely for the purpose of
completing the licensing requirements in restorative procedures,
otherwise the temporary license is nonrenewable.
(3) A person practicing with a temporary license granted under this
section has the authority to perform hygiene procedures that are
limited to:
(a) Oral inspection and measuring of periodontal pockets;
(b) Patient education in oral hygiene;
(c) Taking intra-oral and extra-oral radiographs;
(d) Applying topical preventive or prophylactic agents;
(e) Polishing and smoothing restorations;
(f) Oral prophylaxis and removal of deposits and stains from the
surface of the teeth;
(g) Recording health histories;
(h) Taking and recording blood pressure and vital signs;
(i) Performing subgingival and supragingival scaling; and
(j) Performing root planing.
(4)(a) A person practicing with a temporary license granted under
this section may not perform the following dental hygiene procedures
unless authorized in (b) or (c) of this subsection:
(i) Give injections of local anesthetic;
(ii) Place restorations into the cavity prepared by a licensed
dentist and afterwards carve, contour, and adjust contacts and
occlusion of the restoration;
(iii) Soft tissue curettage; or
(iv) Administer nitrous oxide/oxygen analgesia.
(b) A person licensed in another state who can demonstrate
substantively equivalent licensing standards in the administration of
local anesthetic may receive a temporary endorsement to administer
local anesthesia.
(c) A person licensed in another state who can demonstrate
substantively equivalent licensing standards in restorative procedures
may receive a temporary endorsement for restorative procedures.

Sec. 17 RCW 18.29.210 and 1993 c 323 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((secretary in consultation with the dental hygiene examining
committee)) board shall develop rules and definitions to implement this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 18.29.110 (Dental hygiene examining committee--Generally)
and 1991 c 3 s 51 & 1989 c 202 s 3;
(2) RCW 18.29.130 (Secretary's authority--Generally--Continuing
education) and 1991 c 3 s 53 & 1989 c 202 s 5;
(3) RCW 18.29.170 (Committee meetings--Quorum--Effect of vacancy)
and 1989 c 202 s 9;
(4) RCW 18.29.190 (Temporary licenses) and 1993 c 323 s 2; and
(5) RCW 18.29.200 (Temporary licensees--Requirements for regular
examination) and 1993 c 323 s 3.

--- END ---