BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that a professionally managed and
regulated trapping program is not only vital to the health of
Washington's wildlife populations, but is also consistent with the
state's obligations under the public trust doctrine to manage all
natural resources for the common good of all citizens.
(2) The legislature further finds that it is in the interest of all
of the citizens of Washington to ensure that all trapping is done in
accordance with sound scientific wildlife management principles using
humane methods as set forth in this act. It is the legislature's
intent to reinstate a sound furbearer management program, administered
using sound science by the department of fish and wildlife, that
addresses mammal population dynamics and animal damage issues.
(3) The legislature further finds that humanely regulated trapping
practices contribute positively to the economic well-being of the
agricultural and timber industries of Washington, to public health and
welfare by assisting to control the spread of animal-borne disease, and
to the protection of private and public property from damage resulting
from uncontrolled animal populations.
(4) The legislature further finds that trapping is a valuable
commercial activity and not a recreational hobby. As such, a sound
furbearer management program will result in commerce of the pelts of
harvested mammals, thus benefiting the economy of the state of
Washington.
(5) The legislature recognizes that among the choices available for
the trapping of animals, some may cause pain and suffering in the
animals captured. The legislature further recognizes that some
trapping methods can capture animals that are not targeted, including
pets. It is the policy of the state of Washington to minimize the use
of all indiscriminate or painful traps when practical alternatives
exist, and when none do, to use traps when necessary in the most humane
way possible. When lethal trapping methods are used, such methods must
be used in the most humane way that accomplishes the goals of the
wildlife management program. All trappers in the state should use all
practicable means necessary to avoid the capture of a nontargeted
animal.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.15.192 and 2001 c 1 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 77.15.194
through 77.15.198.
(1) (("Animal" means any nonhuman vertebrate.
(2))) "Prohibited body-gripping trap" means a steel trap that grips
an animal's body or body part with teeth or serrated edges. ((Body-gripping trap includes, but is not limited to, steel-jawed leghold
traps, padded-jaw leghold traps, Conibear traps, neck snares, and
nonstrangling foot snares. Cage and box traps, suitcase-type live
beaver traps, and common rat and mouse traps are not considered body-gripping traps.
(3))) (2) "Person" means a human being and, where appropriate, a
public or private corporation, an unincorporated association, a
partnership, a government, or a governmental instrumentality.
(((4))) (3) "Raw fur" means a pelt that has not been processed for
purposes of retail sale.
(((5))) (4) "Animal problem" means any ((animal)) classified
furbearing mammal or unclassified mammal that threatens or damages
timber, publicly owned or private property, or threatens or injures
livestock, human health or safety, or any other domestic animal or
wildlife population.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.15.194 and 2001 c 1 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
It is the duty of every trapper to ensure that all trapping is done
in the most humane way possible. To ensure that this goal is met, all
trappers must abide by the following:
(1) It is unlawful to use or authorize the use of any steel-jawed
((leghold)) foothold trap, neck snare, foot snare, or other prohibited
body-gripping trap to capture any mammal for ((recreation or commerce
in fur)) a purpose other than to address an animal problem or for
mammal population management.
(2) It is unlawful to knowingly buy, sell, barter, or otherwise
exchange, or offer to buy, sell, barter, or otherwise exchange the raw
fur of a mammal or a mammal that has been trapped in ((this state with
a steel-jawed leghold trap or any other body-gripping trap, whether or
not pursuant to permit.
(3) It is unlawful to use or authorize the use of any steel-jawed
leghold trap or any other body-gripping trap to capture any animal,
except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section.
(4) Nothing in this section prohibits the use of a Conibear trap in
water, a padded leghold trap, or a nonstrangling type foot snare with
a special permit granted by [the] director under (a) through (d) of
this subsection. Issuance of the special permits shall be governed by
rules adopted by the department and in accordance with the requirements
of this section. Every person granted a special permit to use a trap
or device listed in this subsection shall check the trap or device at
least every twenty-four hours.
(a) Nothing in this section prohibits the director, in consultation
with the department of social and health services or the United States
department of health and human services from granting a permit to use
traps listed in this subsection for the purpose of protecting people
from threats to their health and safety.
(b) Nothing in this section prohibits the director from granting a
special permit to use traps listed in this subsection to a person who
applies for such a permit in writing, and who establishes that there
exists on a property an animal problem that has not been and cannot be
reasonably abated by the use of nonlethal control tools, including but
not limited to guard animals, electric fencing, or box and cage traps,
or if such nonlethal means cannot be reasonably applied. Upon making
a finding in writing that the animal problem has not been and cannot be
reasonably abated by nonlethal control tools or if the tools cannot be
reasonably applied, the director may authorize the use, setting,
placing, or maintenance of the traps for a period not to exceed thirty
days.
(c) Nothing in this section prohibits the director from granting a
special permit to department employees or agents to use traps listed in
this subsection where the use of the traps is the only practical means
of protecting threatened or endangered species as designated under RCW
77.08.010.
(d) Nothing in this section prohibits the director from issuing a
permit to use traps listed in this subsection, excluding Conibear
traps, for the conduct of legitimate wildlife research.
(5) Nothing in this section prohibits the United States fish and
wildlife service, its employees or agents, from using a trap listed in
subsection (4) of this section where the fish and wildlife service
determines, in consultation with the director, that the use of such
traps is necessary to protect species listed as threatened or
endangered under the federal endangered species act (16 U.S.C. Sec.
1531 et seq.))) violation of subsection (1) of this section. Nothing
in this section prohibits the donation of an animal carcass or pelt for
scientific research and public health training.
(3)(a) All trapping of wild animals may only be conducted by
trappers licensed by the department under RCW 77.65.450 for the
management of animal problems or for mammal population management and
in accordance with the rules developed by the commission as they relate
to wildlife trapping. However, nothing in this section prohibits the
use of commonly used traps by property owners or their agents to
control nuisance wildlife including, but not limited to, moles, mice,
rats, and gophers.
(b) Furbearing mammals may not be taken from the wild and held
alive for sale or personal use. All trapping must be conducted in
furtherance of a wildlife trapping program being implemented by the
department for an animal problem, as that term is defined in RCW
77.15.192, or for mammal population management.
(c) Wildlife trapped for a purpose other than to manage animal
problems or mammal population management must, if possible, be released
unharmed immediately upon discovery. The commission may adopt by rule
or guideline procedures for the handling of any animal that is unable
to be released unharmed.
(d) Lawfully trapped wild animals must be humanely dispatched or
immediately released. The commission may adopt by rule or guideline
procedures for the humane dispatch of captured animals.
(4)(a) It is unlawful for a licensed trapper to fail to complete
and submit to the department a report of catch postmarked on or before
April 20th of each year. The report must be submitted to the
department regardless of trapping success, and indicate the number,
general location, and species of all animals captured, including those
animals captured that were not part of an animal problem or mammal
population control. Trappers who fail to submit an accurate report of
catch shall have their trapping privileges suspended for one year.
False reports are considered failure to report. It is the
responsibility of each licensed trapper to obtain and submit a report
of catch on forms provided by the department.
(b) The department shall maintain and analyze all catch reports
received pursuant to (a) of this subsection. Data collected on catch
reports must be presented to the appropriate legislative committees by
November 30th of each year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The commission shall adopt appropriate rules regarding the types of
traps and bait for use in capturing wildlife to ensure the humane
treatment of captured animals. In adopting these rules, the commission
may take into consideration the effectiveness of various trap sizes,
approved best management practices, and the habitats in which the traps
may be used. These rules must address the time intervals during which
specific traps must be checked and animals removed. These rules may
not allow for the use of a prohibited body-gripping trap, as that term
is defined in RCW 77.15.192, or a neck or body snare attached to a
spring pole or any spring pole type device. The commission must also
adopt rules for the appropriate disposal of carcasses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall institute a furbearer management program that
addresses mammal population dynamics and problem animals, and shall
only issue trapping licenses and propose rules consistent with the
program.

Sec. 6 RCW 77.65.450 and 1991 sp.s. c 7 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
A state trapping license allows the holder to trap fur-bearing
animals throughout the state in accordance with the rules adopted by
the commission under section 4 of this act; however, a trapper may not
place traps on private property without permission of the owner,
lessee, or tenant where the land is improved and apparently used, or
where the land is fenced or enclosed in a manner designed to exclude
intruders or to indicate a property boundary line, or where notice is
given by posting in a conspicuous manner. A state trapping license is
void on April 1st following the date of issuance. The fee for this
license is thirty-six dollars for residents sixteen years of age or
older, fifteen dollars for residents under sixteen years of age, and
one hundred eighty dollars for nonresidents. The department may only
issue trapping licenses for the control of animal problems, as that
term is defined in RCW 77.15.192, for scientific purposes, and for
mammal population management.

Sec. 7 RCW 77.65.460 and 1987 c 506 s 82 are each amended to read
as follows:
Persons purchasing a state trapping license for the first time
shall present certification of completion of a course of instruction in
safe, humane, and proper trapping techniques or pass an examination to
establish that the applicant has the requisite knowledge.
The director shall establish a program for training persons in
trapping techniques and responsibilities in urban, suburban, and rural
settings, including the use of trapping devices designed to painlessly
capture or instantly kill. The director shall cooperate with
((national and)) Washington state animal, humane, hunter education, and
trapping organizations in the development of a curriculum. Upon
successful completion of the course, trainees shall receive a trapper's
training certificate signed by an authorized instructor. This
certificate is evidence of compliance with this section.

Sec. 8 RCW 77.32.545 and 1998 c 190 s 121 are each amended to
read as follows:
A property owner, lessee, or tenant may remove a trap placed on the
owner's, lessee's, or tenant's posted or fenced property by a trapper.
A property owner, lessee, or tenant who discovers a trap placed on any
portion of his or her property that is not authorized by the owner,
lessee, or tenant, must report the finding to the department, including
whether a live animal is captured in the trap. The commission may
adopt by rule or guideline procedures for the handling of live animals
discovered in such traps.
Trappers shall attach to the chain of their traps or devices a
legible metal tag with either the department identification number of
the trapper or the name and address of the trapper in English letters
not less than one-eighth inch in height.
When a property owner, lessee, or tenant presents a trapper
identification number to the department for a trap found upon the
property of the owner, lessee, or tenant and requests identification of
the trapper, the department shall provide the requestor with the name
and address of the trapper. Prior to disclosure of the trapper's name
and address, the department shall obtain the name and address of the
requesting individual in writing and after disclosing the trapper's
name and address to the requesting individual, the requesting
individual's name and address shall be disclosed in writing to the
trapper whose name and address was disclosed.

Sec. 9 RCW 77.15.198 and 2001 c 1 s 5 are each amended to read as
follows:
Any person who violates RCW 77.15.194 or 77.15.196 is guilty of a
gross misdemeanor. In addition to appropriate criminal penalties, the
director shall revoke the trapping license of any person convicted of
a repeat violation of RCW 77.15.194 or 77.15.196. The director shall
not issue the violator a trapping license for a period of five years
following the revocation. ((Following a subsequent conviction for a
violation of RCW 77.15.194 or 77.15.196 by the same person, the
director shall not issue a trapping license to the person at any time))
A person may not be granted a new trapping license following a
revocation under this section unless that person completes the
education program outlined in RCW 77.65.460 not more than one year
before a new license is granted.

--- END ---