BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.290 and 1999 c 281 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any microbrewer or domestic brewery or beer distributor
licensed under this title may sell and deliver beer to holders of
authorized licenses direct, but to no other person, other than the
board; and every such brewery or beer distributor shall report all
sales to the board monthly, pursuant to the regulations, and shall pay
to the board as an added tax for the privilege of manufacturing and
selling the beer within the state a tax of one dollar and thirty cents
per barrel of thirty-one gallons on sales to licensees within the state
and on sales to licensees within the state of bottled and canned beer
shall pay a tax computed in gallons at the rate of ((one dollar and
thirty)) two dollars and sixty cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons.
Any brewery or beer distributor whose applicable tax payment is not
postmarked by the twentieth day following the month of sale will be
assessed a penalty at the rate of two percent per month or fraction
thereof. Beer shall be sold by breweries and distributors in sealed
barrels or packages. The moneys collected under this subsection shall
be distributed as follows: (a) Three-tenths of a percent shall be
distributed to border areas under RCW 66.08.195; and (b) of the
remaining moneys: (i) Twenty percent shall be distributed to counties
in the same manner as under RCW 66.08.200; and (ii) eighty percent
shall be distributed to incorporated cities and towns in the same
manner as under RCW 66.08.210.
(2) An additional tax is imposed on all beer subject to tax under
subsection (1) of this section. The additional tax is equal to ((two
dollars)) twenty-four dollars and thirty-six cents per barrel of
thirty-one gallons. All revenues collected during any month from this
additional tax shall be deposited in the violence reduction and drug
enforcement account under RCW 69.50.520 by the twenty-fifth day of the
following month.
(3)(a) An additional tax is imposed on all beer subject to tax
under subsection (1) of this section. The additional tax is equal to
ninety-six cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons through June 30,
1995, two dollars and thirty-nine cents per barrel of thirty-one
gallons for the period July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1997, and four
dollars and seventy-eight cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons
thereafter.
(b) The additional tax imposed under this subsection does not apply
to the sale of the first sixty thousand barrels of beer each year by
breweries that are entitled to a reduced rate of tax under 26 U.S.C.
Sec. 5051, as existing on July 1, 1993, or such subsequent date as may
be provided by the board by rule consistent with the purposes of this
exemption.
(c) All revenues collected from the additional tax imposed under
this subsection (3) shall be deposited in the health services account
under RCW 43.72.900.
(4) An additional tax is imposed on all beer that is subject to tax
under subsection (1) of this section that is in the first sixty
thousand barrels of beer by breweries that are entitled to a reduced
rate of tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 5051, as existing on July 1, 1993, or
such subsequent date as may be provided by the board by rule consistent
with the purposes of the exemption under subsection (3)(b) of this
section. The additional tax is equal to one dollar and forty-eight and
two-tenths cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons. By the twenty-fifth
day of the following month, three percent of the revenues collected
from this additional tax shall be distributed to border areas under RCW
66.08.195 and the remaining moneys shall be transferred to the state
general fund.
(5) The board may make refunds for all taxes paid on beer exported
from the state for use outside the state.
(6) The board may require filing with the board of a bond to be
approved by it, in such amount as the board may fix, securing the
payment of the tax. If any licensee fails to pay the tax when due, the
board may forthwith suspend or cancel his or her license until all
taxes are paid.
(7) The tax imposed under this section shall not apply to "strong
beer" as defined in this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect October 1, 2003.

--- END ---