BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 71.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a resident leaves a secure community transition facility
for appointments, employment, or other approved activities, the
department shall develop a transportation route plan for the location
of each activity. Each plan must contain:
(a) A description of the primary route to be taken to and from the
location of the activity;
(b) A description of at least three alternate routes to the
location of the activity, whenever feasible;
(c) A list of any risk potential activities along the primary and
alternate routes;
(d) The dates and times when the resident will be transported to
and from the activity;
(e) A list of any locations along the primary and alternate routes
where the resident may stop. The list may not contain locations within
the line of sight, as defined in RCW 71.09.285(2), of any risk
potential activities; and
(f) A copy of the court's order of conditional release.
(2) A resident may not leave a secure community transition facility
for appointments, employment, or other approved activities without a
transportation route plan developed under subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) The department shall provide law enforcement agencies in the
counties and cities in which the resident will participate in
appointments, employment, or other approved activities, or through
which the resident is regularly transported, with a copy of all
applicable transportation route plans developed under subsection (1) of
this section no later than forty-eight hours before the resident leaves
the secure community transition facility.
(4) Before deviating from a transportation route plan, an escort
shall make a good faith effort to notify the local law enforcement
agencies who were furnished a copy of the transportation route plan
under subsection (3) of this section of the deviation.
(5) An escort failing to meet the requirements of subsection (4) of
this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(6) If the department discovers any deviations from a
transportation route plan, it shall immediately notify the local law
enforcement agencies who were furnished a copy of the transportation
route plan under subsection (3) of this section of the deviations. A
county prosecutor may levy a fine of five thousand dollars per
deviation against the department if it fails to notify local law
enforcement agencies in the manner required by this subsection. The
department shall pay the fine in equal proportions to the law
enforcement agencies that the department failed to notify.

--- END ---