BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.21C.037 and 1997 c 173 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Decisions pertaining to ((applications for Class I, II, and III
forest practices, as defined by rule of the forest practices board
under RCW 76.09.050,)) the following are not subject to the
requirements of RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c) as now or hereafter amended:
(a) Applications for class I, II, and III forest practices, as
defined by rule of the forest practices board under RCW 76.09.050; and
(b) Individual sales of timber from state trust lands, including
federally granted trust lands, forest board transfer lands, forest
board purchase lands, and community college reserve trust lands, that
are harvested under a class I, II, or III forest practices application,
if a programmatic detailed environmental impact statement has been
finalized for the ten-year sustained yield plan required under chapter
79.68 RCW.
(2) When the applicable county, city, or town requires a license in
connection with any proposal involving forest practices (a) on lands
platted after January 1, 1960, as provided in chapter 58.17 RCW, (b) on
lands that have or are being converted to another use, or (c) on lands
which, pursuant to RCW 76.09.070 as now or hereafter amended, are not
to be reforested because of the likelihood of future conversion to
urban development, then the local government, rather than the
department of natural resources, is responsible for any detailed
statement required under RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c).
(3) Those forest practices determined by rule of the forest
practices board to have a potential for a substantial impact on the
environment, and thus to be Class IV practices, require an evaluation
by the department of natural resources as to whether or not a detailed
statement must be prepared pursuant to this chapter. The evaluation
shall be made within ten days from the date the department receives the
application. A Class IV forest practice application must be approved
or disapproved by the department within thirty calendar days from the
date the department receives the application, unless the department
determines that a detailed statement must be made, in which case the
application must be approved or disapproved by the department within
sixty days from the date the department receives the application,
unless the commissioner of public lands, through the promulgation of a
formal order, determines that the process cannot be completed within
such period. This section shall not be construed to prevent any local
or regional governmental entity from determining that a detailed
statement must be prepared for an action regarding a Class IV forest
practice taken by that governmental entity concerning the land on which
forest practices will be conducted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 79.01 RCW
to read as follows:
Individual sales of timber from state trust lands, including
federally granted trust lands, forest board transfer lands, forest
board purchase lands, and community college reserve trust lands, that
are harvested under a class I, II, or III forest practices application,
are not subject to the requirements of RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c) if a
programmatic detailed environmental impact statement has been finalized
for the ten-year sustained yield plan required under chapter 79.68 RCW.

--- END ---