BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.400.210 and 2000 c 231 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every school district board of directors may, in accordance with
chapters 41.56 and 41.59 RCW, establish an attendance incentive program
for all certificated and classified employees in the following manner,
including covering persons who were employed during the 1982-'83 school
year:
(1) In January of the year following any year in which a minimum of
sixty days of leave for illness or injury is accrued, and each January
thereafter, any eligible employee may exercise an option to receive
remuneration for unused leave for illness or injury accumulated in the
previous year at a rate equal to one day's monetary compensation of the
employee for each four full days of accrued leave for illness or injury
in excess of sixty days. Leave for illness or injury for which
compensation has been received shall be deducted from accrued leave for
illness or injury at the rate of four days for every one day's monetary
compensation. No employee may receive compensation under this section
for any portion of leave for illness or injury accumulated at a rate in
excess of one day per month.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 28A.400.212, ((at the time of
separation from school district employment an eligible employee or the
employee's estate shall receive remuneration at a rate equal to one
day's current monetary compensation of the employee for each four full
days accrued leave for illness or injury. For purposes of this
subsection, "eligible employee" means (a) employees who separate from
employment due to retirement or death; (b) employees who separate from
employment and who are at least age fifty-five and have at least ten
years of service under the teachers' retirement system plan 3 as
defined in RCW 41.32.010(40), or under the Washington school employees'
retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010(31); or (c)
employees who separate from employment and who are at least age fifty-five and have at least fifteen years of service under the teachers'
retirement system plan 2 as defined in RCW 41.32.010(39), under the
Washington school employees' retirement system plan 2 as defined in RCW
41.35.010(30), or under the public employees' retirement system plan 2
as defined in RCW 41.40.010(34).)) if for any reason an employee
separates from school district employment, the employee may receive (a)
remuneration at a rate equal to one day's current monetary compensation
of the employee for each four full days accrued leave for illness or
injury that was earned while employed by that school district, or (b)
the amount in the then current negotiated agreement, whichever is less.
Upon reemployment the employee may buy the unused sick days from the
new district at the same rate as the remuneration received at
separation, subject to the then current negotiated agreement, or begin
anew to accrue sick leave.
(3) In lieu of remuneration for unused leave for illness or injury
as provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, a school
district board of directors may, with equivalent funds, provide
eligible employees a benefit plan that provides reimbursement for
medical expenses. Any benefit plan adopted after July 28, 1991, shall
require, as a condition of participation under the plan, that the
employee sign an agreement with the district to hold the district
harmless should the United States government find that the district or
the employee is in debt to the United States as a result of the
employee not paying income taxes due on the equivalent funds placed
into the plan, or as a result of the district not withholding or
deducting any tax, assessment, or other payment on such funds as
required under federal law.
Moneys or benefits received under this section shall not be
included for the purposes of computing a retirement allowance under any
public retirement system in this state.
The superintendent of public instruction in its administration
hereof, shall promulgate uniform rules and regulations to carry out the
purposes of this section.
Should the legislature revoke any benefits granted under this
section, no affected employee shall be entitled thereafter to receive
such benefits as a matter of contractual right.

--- END ---