BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.51.010 and 1983 c 236 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) "Nursing home" means any home, place or institution which
operates or maintains facilities providing convalescent or chronic
care, or both, for a period in excess of twenty-four consecutive hours
for three or more patients not related by blood or marriage to the
operator, who by reason of illness or infirmity, are unable properly to
care for themselves. Convalescent and chronic care may include but not
be limited to any or all procedures commonly employed in waiting on the
sick, such as administration of medicines, preparation of special
diets, giving of bedside nursing care, application of dressings and
bandages, and carrying out of treatment prescribed by a duly licensed
practitioner of the healing arts. It may also include care of mentally
incompetent persons. It may also include community-based care.
Nothing in this definition shall be construed to include general
hospitals or other places which provide care and treatment for the
acutely ill and maintain and operate facilities for major surgery or
obstetrics, or both. Nothing in this definition shall be construed to
include any boarding home, guest home, hotel or related institution
which is held forth to the public as providing, and which is operated
to give only board, room and laundry to persons not in need of medical
or nursing treatment or supervision except in the case of temporary
acute illness. The mere designation by the operator of any place or
institution as a hospital, sanitarium, or any other similar name, which
does not provide care for the acutely ill and maintain and operate
facilities for major surgery or obstetrics, or both, shall not exclude
such place or institution from the provisions of this chapter:
PROVIDED, That any nursing home providing psychiatric treatment shall,
with respect to patients receiving such treatment, comply with the
provisions of RCW 71.12.560 and 71.12.570.
(2) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation,
company, association, or joint stock association, and the legal
successor thereof.
(3) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of ((social
and health services)) health.
(4) "Department" means the state department of ((social and health
services)) health.
(5) "Community-based care" means but is not limited to the
following:
(a) Home delivered nursing services;
(b) Personal care;
(c) Day care;
(d) Nutritional services, both in-home and in a communal dining
setting;
(e) Habilitation care; and
(f) Respite care.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.42.010 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 750 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Department" means the department of ((social and health
services)) health and the department's employees.
(2) "Facility" refers to a nursing home as defined in RCW
18.51.010.
(3) "Licensed practical nurse" means a person licensed to practice
practical nursing under chapter 18.79 RCW.
(4) "Medicaid" means Title XIX of the Social Security Act enacted
by the social security amendments of 1965 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396; 79
Stat. 343), as amended.
(5) "Nursing care" means that care provided by a registered nurse,
an advanced registered nurse practitioner, a licensed practical nurse,
or a nursing assistant in the regular performance of their duties.
(6) "Qualified therapist" means:
(a) An activities specialist who has specialized education,
training, or experience specified by the department.
(b) An audiologist who is eligible for a certificate of clinical
competence in audiology or who has the equivalent education and
clinical experience.
(c) A mental health professional as defined in chapter 71.05 RCW.
(d) A mental retardation professional who is a qualified therapist
or a therapist approved by the department and has specialized training
or one year experience in treating or working with the mentally
retarded or developmentally disabled.
(e) An occupational therapist who is a graduate of a program in
occupational therapy or who has equivalent education or training.
(f) A physical therapist as defined in chapter 18.74 RCW.
(g) A social worker who is a graduate of a school of social work.
(h) A speech pathologist who is eligible for a certificate of
clinical competence in speech pathology or who has equivalent education
and clinical experience.
(7) "Registered nurse" means a person licensed to practice
registered nursing under chapter 18.79 RCW.
(8) "Resident" means an individual residing in a nursing home, as
defined in RCW 18.51.010.
(9) "Physician assistant" means a person practicing pursuant to
chapters 18.57A and 18.71A RCW.
(10) "Nurse practitioner" means a person licensed to practice
advanced registered nursing under chapter 18.79 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.42.600 and 1995 c 282 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the inspection required by chapter 18.51 RCW,
the department shall inspect the facility for compliance with resident
rights and direct care standards of this chapter. The department may
inspect any and all other provisions randomly, by exception profiles,
or during complaint investigations.
(2) If the facility has not complied with all the requirements of
this chapter, the department shall notify the facility in writing that
the facility is in noncompliance and describe the reasons for the
facility's noncompliance and the department may impose penalties in
accordance with RCW 18.51.060.
(((3) To avoid unnecessary duplication in inspections, the
department shall coordinate with the department of health when
inspecting medicaid-certified or medicare-certified, or both, long-term
care beds in hospitals for compliance with Title XVIII or XIX of the
social security act.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) All powers, duties, and functions of the
department of social and health services pertaining to nursing homes
are transferred to the department of health. All references to the
director or the department of social and health services in the Revised
Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the director or the
department of health when referring to the functions transferred in
this section.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the department of
social and health services pertaining to the powers, functions, and
duties transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the department
of health. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles,
and other tangible property employed by the department of social and
health services in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be made available to the department of health. All
funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with the powers,
functions, and duties transferred shall be assigned to the department
of health.
(b) Any appropriations made to the department of social and health
services for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall, on the effective date of this section, be transferred and
credited to the department of health.
(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any
personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment,
or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers
and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the
director of financial management shall make a determination as to the
proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the department of social and health services
engaged in performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred are
transferred to the jurisdiction of the department of health. All
employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service
law, are assigned to the department of health to perform their usual
duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights,
subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance
with the laws and rules governing state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the department of
social and health services pertaining to the powers, functions, and
duties transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the department
of health. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full
force and shall be performed by the department of health.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the department of social and health services shall not affect the
validity of any act performed before the effective date of this
section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the personnel
resources board as provided by law.

--- END ---