BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 58.17.020 and 2002 c 262 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context or subject matter
clearly requires otherwise, the words or phrases defined in this
section shall have the indicated meanings.
(1) "Subdivision" is the division or redivision of land into five
or more lots, tracts, parcels, sites, or divisions for the purpose of
sale, lease, or transfer of ownership, except as provided in subsection
(6) of this section.
(2) "Plat" is a map or representation of a subdivision, showing
thereon the division of a tract or parcel of land into lots, blocks,
streets and alleys, or other divisions and dedications.
(3) "Dedication" is the deliberate appropriation of land by an
owner for any general and public uses, reserving to himself or herself
no other rights than such as are compatible with the full exercise and
enjoyment of the public uses to which the property has been devoted.
The intention to dedicate shall be evidenced by the owner by the
presentment for filing of a final plat or short plat showing the
dedication thereon; and, the acceptance by the public shall be
evidenced by the approval of such plat for filing by the appropriate
governmental unit.
A dedication of an area of less than two acres for use as a public
park may include a designation of a name for the park, in honor of a
deceased individual of good character.
(4) "Preliminary plat" is a neat and approximate drawing of a
proposed subdivision showing the general layout of streets and alleys,
lots, blocks, and other elements of a subdivision consistent with the
requirements of this chapter. The preliminary plat shall be the basis
for the approval or disapproval of the general layout of a subdivision.
(5) "Final plat" is the final drawing of the subdivision and
dedication prepared for filing for record with the county auditor and
containing all elements and requirements set forth in this chapter and
in local regulations adopted under this chapter.
(6) "Short subdivision" is the division or redivision of land into
four or fewer lots, tracts, parcels, sites, or divisions for the
purpose of sale, lease, or transfer of ownership. However, the
legislative authority of any city or town may by local ordinance
increase the number of lots, tracts, or parcels to be regulated as
short subdivisions to a maximum of nine. The legislative authority of
any county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 that has adopted a
comprehensive plan and development regulations in compliance with
chapter 36.70A RCW may by ordinance increase the number of lots,
tracts, or parcels to be regulated as short subdivisions to a maximum
of nine in any urban growth area.
(7) "Binding site plan" means a drawing to a scale specified by
local ordinance which: (a) Identifies and shows the areas and
locations of all streets, roads, improvements, utilities, open spaces,
and any other matters specified by local regulations; (b) contains
inscriptions or attachments setting forth such appropriate limitations
and conditions for the use of the land as are established by the local
government body having authority to approve the site plan; and (c)
contains provisions making any development be in conformity with the
site plan.
(8) "Short plat" is the map or representation of a short
subdivision.
(9) "Lot" is a fractional part of divided lands having fixed
boundaries, being of sufficient area and dimension to meet minimum
zoning requirements for width and area. The term shall include tracts
or parcels.
(10) "Block" is a group of lots, tracts, or parcels within well
defined and fixed boundaries.
(11) "County treasurer" shall be as defined in chapter 36.29 RCW or
the office or person assigned such duties under a county charter.
(12) "County auditor" shall be as defined in chapter 36.22 RCW or
the office or person assigned such duties under a county charter.
(13) "County road engineer" shall be as defined in chapter 36.40
RCW or the office or person assigned such duties under a county
charter.
(14) "Planning commission" means that body as defined in chapter
36.70, 35.63, or 35A.63 RCW as designated by the legislative body to
perform a planning function or that body assigned such duties and
responsibilities under a city or county charter.
(15) "County commissioner" shall be as defined in chapter 36.32 RCW
or the body assigned such duties under a county charter.
(16) "Nonmineral ownership interest" means any ownership interest
in a parcel of land that is not exclusively limited to the ownership of
the parcel's mineral rights.

Sec. 2 RCW 58.17.165 and 1981 c 293 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every final plat or short plat of a subdivision or short
subdivision filed for record must contain a certificate giving a full
and correct description of the lands divided as they appear on the plat
or short plat, including a statement that the subdivision or short
subdivision has been made with the free consent and in accordance with
the desires of the owner or owners of all nonmineral ownership
interests.
If the plat or short plat is subject to a dedication, the
certificate or a separate written instrument shall contain the
dedication of all streets and other areas to the public, and individual
or individuals, religious society or societies or to any corporation,
public or private as shown on the plat or short plat and a waiver of
all claims for damages against any governmental authority which may be
occasioned to the adjacent land by the established construction,
drainage and maintenance of said road. Said certificate or instrument
of dedication shall be signed and acknowledged before a notary public
by all parties having any nonmineral ownership interest in the lands
subdivided and recorded as part of the final plat.
Every plat and short plat containing a dedication filed for record
must be accompanied by a title report confirming that the title of the
lands as described and shown on said plat is in the name of the owners
signing the certificate or instrument of dedication.
An offer of dedication may include a waiver of right of direct
access to any street from any property, and if the dedication is
accepted, any such waiver is effective. Such waiver may be required by
local authorities as a condition of approval. Roads not dedicated to
the public must be clearly marked on the face of the plat. Any
dedication, donation or grant as shown on the face of the plat shall be
considered to all intents and purposes, as a quitclaim deed to the said
donee or donees, grantee or grantees for his, her or their use for the
purpose intended by the donors or grantors as aforesaid.

Sec. 3 RCW 58.17.212 and 1987 c 354 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever any person is interested in the vacation of any
subdivision or portion thereof, or any area designated or dedicated
for public use, that person shall file an application for vacation with
the legislative authority of the city, town, or county in which the
subdivision is located. The application shall set forth the reasons
for vacation and shall contain signatures of all parties having ((an))
a nonmineral ownership interest in that portion of the subdivision
subject to vacation. If the subdivision is subject to restrictive
covenants which were filed at the time of the approval of the
subdivision, and the application for vacation would result in the
violation of a covenant, the application shall contain an agreement
signed by all parties subject to the covenants providing that the
parties agree to terminate or alter the relevant covenants to
accomplish the purpose of the vacation of the subdivision or portion
thereof.
When the vacation application is specifically for a county road or
city or town street, the procedures for road vacation or street
vacation in chapter 36.87 or 35.79 RCW shall be utilized for the road
or street vacation. When the application is for the vacation of the
plat together with the roads and/or streets, the procedure for vacation
in this section shall be used, but vacations of streets abutting bodies
of water may not be made that are prohibited under RCW ((35.79.030))
35.79.035, and vacations of roads may not be made that are prohibited
under RCW 36.87.130.
The legislative authority of the city, town, or county shall give
notice as provided in RCW 58.17.080 and 58.17.090 and shall conduct a
public hearing on the application for a vacation and may approve or
deny the application for vacation of the subdivision after determining
the public use and interest to be served by the vacation of the
subdivision. If any portion of the land contained in the subdivision
was dedicated to the public for public use or benefit, such land, if
not deeded to the city, town, or county, shall be deeded to the city,
town, or county unless the legislative authority shall set forth
findings that the public use would not be served in retaining title to
those lands.
Title to the vacated property shall vest with the rightful owner as
shown in the county records. If the vacated land is land that was
dedicated to the public, for public use other than a road or street,
and the legislative authority has found that retaining title to the
land is not in the public interest, title thereto shall vest with the
person or persons owning the property on each side thereof, as
determined by the legislative authority. When the road or street that
is to be vacated was contained wholly within the subdivision and is
part of the boundary of the subdivision, title to the vacated road or
street shall vest with the owner or owners of property contained within
the vacated subdivision.
This section shall not be construed as applying to the vacation of
any plat of state-granted tide or shore lands.

--- END ---