BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to make
funding for cities, counties, and public health districts a priority.
The legislature intends to ensure that local governments and health
districts have adequate funding in order to carry out the essential
functions of government which are public safety and public health. The
current structure for the funding of these services is inadequate and
jeopardizes the health and safety of our citizens.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.05.125 and 1998 c 266 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The county public health account is created in the state
treasury. Funds deposited in the county public health account shall be
distributed by the state treasurer to each local public health
jurisdiction based upon amounts certified to it by the department of
community, trade, and economic development in consultation with the
Washington state association of counties. The account shall include
funds distributed under ((RCW 82.44.110)) section 8(1) of this act and
RCW 82.14.200(8) and such funds as are appropriated to the account from
the health services account under RCW 43.72.900, the public health
services account under RCW 43.72.902, and such other funds as the
legislature may appropriate to it.
(2)(a) The director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development shall certify the amounts to be distributed to
each local public health jurisdiction using 1995 as the base year of
actual city contributions to local public health.
(b) Only if funds are available and in an amount no greater than
available funds under RCW 82.14.200(8), the department of community,
trade, and economic development shall adjust the amount certified under
(a) of this subsection to compensate for any annexation of an area with
fifty thousand residents or more to any city as a result of a petition
during calendar year 1996 or 1997, or for any city that became newly
incorporated as a result of an election during calendar year 1994 or
1995. The amount to be adjusted shall be equal to the amount which
otherwise would have been lost to the health jurisdiction due to the
annexation or incorporation as calculated using the jurisdiction's 1995
funding formula.
(c) The county treasurer shall certify the actual 1995 city
contribution to the department. Funds in excess of the base shall be
distributed proportionately among the health jurisdictions based on
incorporated population figures as last determined by the office of
financial management.
(3) Moneys distributed under this section shall be expended
exclusively for local public health purposes.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.14.200 and 1998 c 321 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is created in the state treasury a special account to be
known as the "county sales and use tax equalization account." Into
this account shall be placed a portion of all ((motor vehicle excise
tax receipts as provided in RCW 82.44.110)) sales and use tax receipts
as provided in section 8(2) of this act. Funds in this account shall
be allocated by the state treasurer according to the following
procedure:
(1) Prior to April 1st of each year the director of revenue shall
inform the state treasurer of the total and the per capita levels of
revenues for the unincorporated area of each county and the statewide
weighted average per capita level of revenues for the unincorporated
areas of all counties imposing the sales and use tax authorized under
RCW 82.14.030(1) for the previous calendar year.
(2) ((At such times as distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150))
On the first day of the months of January, April, July, and October of
each year, the state treasurer shall apportion to each county imposing
the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(1) at the maximum rate and
receiving less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars from the tax for
the previous calendar year, an amount from the county sales and use tax
equalization account sufficient, when added to the amount of revenues
received the previous calendar year by the county, to equal one hundred
fifty thousand dollars.
The department of revenue shall establish a governmental price
index as provided in this subsection. The base year for the index
shall be the end of the third quarter of 1982. Prior to November 1,
1983, and prior to each November 1st thereafter, the department of
revenue shall establish another index figure for the third quarter of
that year. The department of revenue may use the implicit price
deflators for state and local government purchases of goods and
services calculated by the United States department of commerce to
establish the governmental price index. Beginning on January 1, 1984,
and each January 1st thereafter, the one hundred fifty thousand dollar
base figure in this subsection shall be adjusted in direct proportion
to the percentage change in the governmental price index from 1982
until the year before the adjustment. Distributions made under this
subsection for 1984 and thereafter shall use this adjusted base amount
figure.
(3) On the first day of the months of January, April, July, and
October of each year, subsequent to the distributions under subsection
(2) of this section ((and at such times as distributions are made under
RCW 82.44.150)), the state treasurer shall apportion to each county
imposing the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(1) at the maximum
rate and receiving less than seventy percent of the statewide weighted
average per capita level of revenues for the unincorporated areas of
all counties as determined by the department of revenue under
subsection (1) of this section, an amount from the county sales and use
tax equalization account sufficient, when added to the per capita level
of revenues for the unincorporated area received the previous calendar
year by the county, to equal seventy percent of the statewide weighted
average per capita level of revenues for the unincorporated areas of
all counties determined under subsection (1) of this section, subject
to reduction under subsections (6) and (7) of this section. When
computing distributions under this section, any distribution under
subsection (2) of this section shall be considered revenues received
from the tax imposed under RCW 82.14.030(1) for the previous calendar
year.
(4) On the first day of the months of January, April, July, and
October of each year, subsequent to the distributions under subsection
(3) of this section ((and at such times as distributions are made under
RCW 82.44.150)), the state treasurer shall apportion to each county
imposing the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) at the maximum
rate and receiving a distribution under subsection (2) of this section,
a third distribution from the county sales and use tax equalization
account. The distribution to each qualifying county shall be equal to
the distribution to the county under subsection (2) of this section,
subject to the reduction under subsections (6) and (7) of this section.
To qualify for the total distribution under this subsection, the county
must impose the tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) for the entire calendar
year. Counties imposing the tax for less than the full year shall
qualify for prorated allocations under this subsection proportionate to
the number of months of the year during which the tax is imposed.
(5) On the first day of the months of January, April, July, and
October of each year, subsequent to the distributions under subsection
(4) of this section ((and at such times as distributions are made under
RCW 82.44.150)), the state treasurer shall apportion to each county
imposing the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) at the maximum
rate and receiving a distribution under subsection (3) of this section,
a fourth distribution from the county sales and use tax equalization
account. The distribution to each qualifying county shall be equal to
the distribution to the county under subsection (3) of this section,
subject to the reduction under subsections (6) and (7) of this section.
To qualify for the distributions under this subsection, the county must
impose the tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) for the entire calendar year.
Counties imposing the tax for less than the full year shall qualify for
prorated allocations under this subsection proportionate to the number
of months of the year during which the tax is imposed.
(6) Revenues distributed under subsections (2) through (5) of this
section in any calendar year shall not exceed an amount equal to
seventy percent of the statewide weighted average per capita level of
revenues for the unincorporated areas of all counties during the
previous calendar year. If distributions under subsections (3) through
(5) of this section cannot be made because of this limitation, then
distributions under subsections (3) through (5) of this section shall
be reduced ratably among the qualifying counties.
(7) If inadequate revenues exist in the county sales and use tax
equalization account to make the distributions under subsections (3)
through (5) of this section, then the distributions under subsections
(3) through (5) of this section shall be reduced ratably among the
qualifying counties. At such time during the year as additional funds
accrue to the county sales and use tax equalization account, additional
distributions shall be made under subsections (3) through (5) of this
section to the counties.
(8) If the level of revenues in the county sales and use tax
equalization account exceeds the amount necessary to make the
distributions under subsections (2) through (5) of this section, ((at
such times as distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150)) on the first
day of the months of January, April, July, and October of each year,
the state treasurer shall apportion an amount to the county public
health account created in RCW 70.05.125 equal to the adjustment under
RCW 70.05.125(2)(b).
(9) If the level of revenues in the county sales and use tax
equalization account exceeds the amount necessary to make the
distributions under subsections (2) through (5) and (8) of this
section, then the additional revenues shall be credited and transferred
as follows:
(a) Fifty percent to the public facilities construction loan
revolving account under RCW 43.160.080; and
(b) Fifty percent to the distressed county public facilities
construction loan account under RCW 43.160.220, or so much thereof as
will not cause the balance in the account to exceed twenty-five million
dollars. Any remaining funds shall be deposited into the public
facilities construction loan revolving account.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.14.210 and 1996 c 64 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is created in the state treasury a special account to be
known as the "municipal sales and use tax equalization account." Into
this account shall be placed such revenues as are provided under ((RCW
82.44.110(1)(e))) section 8(3) of this act. Funds in this account
shall be allocated by the state treasurer according to the following
procedure:
(1) Prior to ((January)) April 1st of each year the department of
revenue shall determine the total and the per capita levels of revenues
for each city and the statewide weighted average per capita level of
revenues for all cities imposing the sales and use tax authorized under
RCW 82.14.030(1) for the previous calendar year.
(2) ((At such times as distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150,
the state treasurer shall apportion to each city not imposing the sales
and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) an amount from the municipal sales
and use tax equalization account equal to the amount distributed to the
city under RCW 82.44.155, multiplied by forty-five fifty-fifths.)) On
the first day of the months of January, April, July, and October of
each year, the state treasurer shall distribute to cities and towns not
imposing the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) an amount equal
to four and two-tenths of one percent of the amount deposited into the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account under section 8(3) of
this act during the previous calendar year. The amount to be
distributed to each city shall be made ratably on the basis of
population as last determined by the office of financial management.
(3) On the first day of the months of January, April, July, and
October of each year, subsequent to the distributions under subsection
(2) of this section, ((and at such times as distributions are made
under RCW 82.44.150,)) the state treasurer shall apportion to each city
imposing the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(1) at the maximum
rate and receiving less than seventy percent of the statewide weighted
average per capita level of revenues for all cities as determined by
the department of revenue under subsection (1) of this section, an
amount from the municipal sales and use tax equalization account
sufficient, when added to the per capita level of revenues received the
previous calendar year by the city, to equal seventy percent of the
statewide weighted average per capita level of revenues for all cities
determined under subsection (1) of this section, subject to reduction
under subsection (6) of this section.
(4) On the first day of the months of January, April, July, and
October of each year, subsequent to the distributions under subsection
(3) of this section, ((and at such times as distributions are made
under RCW 82.44.150,)) the state treasurer shall apportion to each city
imposing the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) at the maximum
rate and receiving a distribution under subsection (3) of this section,
a third distribution from the municipal sales and use tax equalization
account. The distribution to each qualifying city shall be equal to
the distribution to the city under subsection (3) of this section,
subject to the reduction under subsection (6) of this section. To
qualify for the distributions under this subsection, the city must
impose the tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) for the entire calendar year.
Cities imposing the tax for less than the full year shall qualify for
prorated allocations under this subsection proportionate to the number
of months of the year during which the tax is imposed.
(5) For a city with an official incorporation date after January 1,
1990, municipal sales and use tax equalization distributions shall be
made according to the procedures in this subsection. Municipal sales
and use tax equalization distributions to eligible new cities shall be
made at the same time as distributions are made under subsections (3)
and (4) of this section. The department of revenue shall follow the
estimating procedures outlined in this subsection until the new city
has received a full year's worth of revenues under RCW 82.14.030(1) as
of the January municipal sales and use tax equalization distribution.
(a) Whether a newly incorporated city determined to receive funds
under this subsection receives its first equalization payment at the
January, April, July, or October municipal sales and use tax
equalization distribution shall depend on the date the city first
imposes the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1).
(i) A newly incorporated city imposing the tax authorized under RCW
82.14.030(1) effective as of January 1st shall be eligible to receive
funds under this subsection beginning with the April municipal sales
and use tax equalization distribution of that year.
(ii) A newly incorporated city imposing the tax authorized under
RCW 82.14.030(1) effective as of February 1st, March 1st, or April 1st
shall be eligible to receive funds under this subsection beginning with
the July municipal sales and use tax equalization distribution of that
year.
(iii) A newly incorporated city imposing the tax authorized under
RCW 82.14.030(1) effective as of May 1st, June 1st, or July 1st shall
be eligible to receive funds under this subsection beginning with the
October municipal sales and use tax equalization distribution of that
year.
(iv) A newly incorporated city imposing the tax authorized under
RCW 82.14.030(1) effective as of August 1st, September 1st, or October
1st shall be eligible to receive funds under this subsection beginning
with the January municipal sales and use tax equalization distribution
of the next year.
(v) A newly incorporated city imposing the tax authorized under RCW
82.14.030(1) effective as of November 1st or December 1st shall be
eligible to receive funds under this subsection beginning with the
April municipal sales and use tax equalization distribution of the next
year.
(b) For purposes of calculating the amount of funds the new city
should receive under this subsection, the department of revenue shall:
(i) Estimate the per capita amount of revenues from the tax
authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) that the new city would have received
had the city received revenues from the tax the entire calendar year;
(ii) Calculate the amount provided under subsection (3) of this
section based on the per capita revenues determined under (b)(i) of
this subsection;
(iii) Prorate the amount determined under (b)(ii) of this
subsection by the number of months the tax authorized under RCW
82.14.030(1) is imposed.
(c) A new city imposing the tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) at the
maximum rate and receiving a distribution calculated under (b) of this
subsection shall receive another distribution from the municipal sales
and use tax equalization account. This distribution shall be equal to
the calculation made under (b)(ii) of this subsection, prorated by the
number of months the city imposes the tax authorized under RCW
82.14.030(2) at the full rate.
(d) The department of revenue shall advise the state treasurer of
the amounts calculated under (b) and (c) of this subsection and the
state treasurer shall distribute these amounts to the new city from the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account subject to the
limitations imposed in subsection (6) of this section.
(e) Revenues estimated under this subsection shall not affect the
calculation of the statewide weighted average per capita level of
revenues for all cities made under subsection (1) of this section.
(6) If inadequate revenues exist in the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account to make the distributions under subsection (3),
(4), or (5) of this section, then the distributions under subsections
(3), (4), and (5) of this section shall be reduced ratably among the
qualifying cities. At such time during the year as additional funds
accrue to the municipal sales and use tax equalization account,
additional distributions shall be made under subsections (3), (4), and
(5) of this section to the cities.
(7) If the level of revenues in the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account exceeds the amount necessary to make the
distributions under subsections (2) through (5) of this section, then
the additional revenues shall be apportioned among the several cities
within the state ratably on the basis of population as last determined
by the office of financial management: PROVIDED, That no such
distribution shall be made to those cities receiving a distribution
under subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.14.310 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 915 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The county criminal justice assistance account is created in
the state treasury. Beginning in fiscal year 2000, the state treasurer
shall transfer into the county criminal justice assistance account from
the general fund the sum of twenty-three million two hundred thousand
dollars divided into four equal deposits occurring on July 1, October
1, January 1, and April 1. For each fiscal year thereafter, the state
treasurer shall increase the total transfer by the fiscal growth
factor, as defined in RCW 43.135.025, forecast for that fiscal year by
the office of financial management in November of the preceding year.
(2) The moneys deposited in the county criminal justice assistance
account for distribution under this section, including deposits made
under section 8(4) of this act, less any moneys appropriated for
purposes under subsection (4) of this section, shall be distributed
((at such times as distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150)) on
January 1st, April 1st, July 1st, and October 1st of each year and on
the relative basis of each county's funding factor as determined under
this subsection.
(a) A county's funding factor is the sum of:
(i) The population of the county, divided by one thousand, and
multiplied by two-tenths;
(ii) The crime rate of the county, multiplied by three-tenths; and
(iii) The annual number of criminal cases filed in the county
superior court, for each one thousand in population, multiplied by
five-tenths.
(b) Under this section and RCW 82.14.320 and 82.14.330:
(i) The population of the county or city shall be as last
determined by the office of financial management;
(ii) The crime rate of the county or city is the annual occurrence
of specified criminal offenses, as calculated in the most recent annual
report on crime in Washington state as published by the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs, for each one thousand in
population;
(iii) The annual number of criminal cases filed in the county
superior court shall be determined by the most recent annual report of
the courts of Washington, as published by the office of the
administrator for the courts;
(iv) Distributions and eligibility for distributions in the 1989-91
biennium shall be based on 1988 figures for both the crime rate as
described under (ii) of this subsection and the annual number of
criminal cases that are filed as described under (iii) of this
subsection. Future distributions shall be based on the most recent
figures for both the crime rate as described under (ii) of this
subsection and the annual number of criminal cases that are filed as
described under (iii) of this subsection.
(3) Moneys distributed under this section shall be expended
exclusively for criminal justice purposes and shall not be used to
replace or supplant existing funding. Criminal justice purposes are
defined as activities that substantially assist the criminal justice
system, which may include circumstances where ancillary benefit to the
civil or juvenile justice system occurs, and which includes (a)
domestic violence services such as those provided by domestic violence
programs, community advocates, and legal advocates, as defined in RCW
70.123.020, and (b) during the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, juvenile
dispositional hearings relating to petitions for at-risk youth,
truancy, and children in need of services. Existing funding for
purposes of this subsection is defined as calendar year 1989 actual
operating expenditures for criminal justice purposes. Calendar year
1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal justice purposes
exclude the following: Expenditures for extraordinary events not
likely to reoccur, changes in contract provisions for criminal justice
services, beyond the control of the local jurisdiction receiving the
services, and major nonrecurring capital expenditures.
(4) Not more than five percent of the funds deposited to the county
criminal justice assistance account shall be available for
appropriations for enhancements to the state patrol crime laboratory
system and the continuing costs related to these enhancements. Funds
appropriated from this account for such enhancements shall not supplant
existing funds from the state general fund.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.14.320 and 1998 c 321 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The municipal criminal justice assistance account is created in
the state treasury. Beginning in fiscal year 2000, the state treasurer
shall transfer into the municipal criminal justice assistance account
for distribution under this section from the general fund the sum of
four million six hundred thousand dollars divided into four equal
deposits occurring on July 1, October 1, January 1, and April 1. For
each fiscal year thereafter, the state treasurer shall increase the
total transfer by the fiscal growth factor, as defined in RCW
43.135.025, forecast for that fiscal year by the office of financial
management in November of the preceding year.
(2) No city may receive a distribution under this section from the
municipal criminal justice assistance account unless:
(a) The city has a crime rate in excess of one hundred twenty-five
percent of the statewide average as calculated in the most recent
annual report on crime in Washington state as published by the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs;
(b) The city has levied the tax authorized in RCW 82.14.030(2) at
the maximum rate or the tax authorized in RCW 82.46.010(3) at the
maximum rate; and
(c) The city has a per capita yield from the tax imposed under RCW
82.14.030(1) at the maximum rate of less than one hundred fifty percent
of the statewide average per capita yield for all cities from such
local sales and use tax.
(3) The moneys deposited in the municipal criminal justice
assistance account for distribution under this section, including
deposits made under section 8(5) of this act, less any moneys
appropriated for purposes under subsection (7) of this section, shall
be distributed ((at such times as distributions are made under RCW
82.44.150)) on January 1st, April 1st, July 1st, and October 1st of
each year. The distributions shall be made as follows:
(a) Unless reduced by this subsection, thirty percent of the moneys
shall be distributed ratably based on population as last determined by
the office of financial management to those cities eligible under
subsection (2) of this section that have a crime rate determined under
subsection (2)(a) of this section which is greater than one hundred
seventy-five percent of the statewide average crime rate. No city may
receive more than fifty percent of any moneys distributed under this
subsection (a) but, if a city distribution is reduced as a result of
exceeding the fifty percent limitation, the amount not distributed
shall be distributed under (b) of this subsection.
(b) The remainder of the moneys, including any moneys not
distributed in subsection (2)(a) of this section, shall be distributed
to all cities eligible under subsection (2) of this section ratably
based on population as last determined by the office of financial
management.
(4) No city may receive more than thirty percent of all moneys
distributed under subsection (3) of this section.
(5) Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, the
distributions to any city that substantially decriminalizes or repeals
its criminal code after July 1, 1990, and that does not reimburse the
county for costs associated with criminal cases under RCW 3.50.800 or
3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in which the city is located.
(6) Moneys distributed under this section shall be expended
exclusively for criminal justice purposes and shall not be used to
replace or supplant existing funding. Criminal justice purposes are
defined as activities that substantially assist the criminal justice
system, which may include circumstances where ancillary benefit to the
civil justice system occurs, and which includes domestic violence
services such as those provided by domestic violence programs,
community advocates, and legal advocates, as defined in RCW 70.123.020,
and publications and public educational efforts designed to provide
information and assistance to parents in dealing with runaway or at-risk youth. Existing funding for purposes of this subsection is
defined as calendar year 1989 actual operating expenditures for
criminal justice purposes. Calendar year 1989 actual operating
expenditures for criminal justice purposes exclude the following:
Expenditures for extraordinary events not likely to reoccur, changes in
contract provisions for criminal justice services, beyond the control
of the local jurisdiction receiving the services, and major
nonrecurring capital expenditures.
(7) Not more than five percent of the funds deposited to the
municipal criminal justice assistance account shall be available for
appropriations for enhancements to the state patrol crime laboratory
system and the continuing costs related to these enhancements. Funds
appropriated from this account for such enhancements shall not supplant
existing funds from the state general fund.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.14.330 and 1998 c 321 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning in fiscal year 2000, the state treasurer shall
transfer into the municipal criminal justice assistance account for
distribution under this section from the general fund the sum of four
million six hundred thousand dollars divided into four equal deposits
occurring on July 1, October 1, January 1, and April 1. For each
fiscal year thereafter, the state treasurer shall increase the total
transfer by the fiscal growth factor, as defined in RCW 43.135.025,
forecast for that fiscal year by the office of financial management in
November of the preceding year. The moneys deposited in the municipal
criminal justice assistance account for distribution under this
section, including deposits made under section 8(6) of this act, less
any moneys appropriated for purposes under subsection (4) of this
section, shall be distributed to the cities of the state as follows:
(a) Twenty percent appropriated for distribution shall be
distributed to cities with a three-year average violent crime rate for
each one thousand in population in excess of one hundred fifty percent
of the statewide three-year average violent crime rate for each one
thousand in population. The three-year average violent crime rate
shall be calculated using the violent crime rates for each of the
preceding three years from the annual reports on crime in Washington
state as published by the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs. Moneys shall be distributed under this subsection (1)(a)
ratably based on population as last determined by the office of
financial management, but no city may receive more than one dollar per
capita. Moneys remaining undistributed under this subsection at the
end of each calendar year shall be distributed to the criminal justice
training commission to reimburse participating city law enforcement
agencies with ten or fewer full-time commissioned patrol officers the
cost of temporary replacement of each officer who is enrolled in basic
law enforcement training, as provided in RCW 43.101.200.
(b) Sixteen percent shall be distributed to cities ratably based on
population as last determined by the office of financial management,
but no city may receive less than one thousand dollars.
The moneys deposited in the municipal criminal justice assistance
account for distribution under this subsection shall be distributed
((at such times as distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150)) on
January 1st, April 1st, July 1st, and October 1st of each year.
Moneys distributed under this subsection shall be expended
exclusively for criminal justice purposes and shall not be used to
replace or supplant existing funding. Criminal justice purposes are
defined as activities that substantially assist the criminal justice
system, which may include circumstances where ancillary benefit to the
civil justice system occurs, and which includes domestic violence
services such as those provided by domestic violence programs,
community advocates, and legal advocates, as defined in RCW 70.123.020.
Existing funding for purposes of this subsection is defined as calendar
year 1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal justice purposes.
Calendar year 1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal justice
purposes exclude the following: Expenditures for extraordinary events
not likely to reoccur, changes in contract provisions for criminal
justice services, beyond the control of the local jurisdiction
receiving the services, and major nonrecurring capital expenditures.
(2) In addition to the distributions under subsection (1) of this
section:
(a) Fourteen percent shall be distributed to cities that have
initiated innovative law enforcement strategies, including alternative
sentencing and crime prevention programs. No city may receive more
than one dollar per capita under this subsection (2)(a).
(b) Twenty percent shall be distributed to cities that have
initiated programs to help at-risk children or child abuse victim
response programs. No city may receive more than fifty cents per
capita under this subsection (2)(b).
(c) Twenty percent shall be distributed to cities that have
initiated programs designed to reduce the level of domestic violence
within their jurisdictions or to provide counseling for domestic
violence victims. No city may receive more than fifty cents per capita
under this subsection (2)(c).
(d) Ten percent shall be distributed to cities that contract with
another governmental agency for a majority of the city's law
enforcement services.
Moneys distributed under this subsection shall be distributed to
those cities that submit funding requests under this subsection to the
department of community, trade, and economic development based on
criteria developed under RCW 82.14.335. Allocation of funds shall be
in proportion to the population of qualified jurisdictions, but the
distribution to a city shall not exceed the amount of funds requested.
Cities shall submit requests for program funding to the department of
community, trade, and economic development by November 1 of each year
for funding the following year. The department shall certify to the
state treasurer the cities eligible for funding under this subsection
and the amount of each allocation.
The moneys deposited in the municipal criminal justice assistance
account for distribution under this subsection, less any moneys
appropriated for purposes under subsection (4) of this section, shall
be distributed ((at the times as distributions are made under RCW
82.44.150)) on January 1st, April 1st, July 1st, and October 1st of
each year. Moneys remaining undistributed under this subsection at the
end of each calendar year shall be distributed to the criminal justice
training commission to reimburse participating city law enforcement
agencies with ten or fewer full-time commissioned patrol officers the
cost of temporary replacement of each officer who is enrolled in basic
law enforcement training, as provided in RCW 43.101.200.
If a city is found by the state auditor to have expended funds
received under this subsection in a manner that does not comply with
the criteria under which the moneys were received, the city shall be
ineligible to receive future distributions under this subsection until
the use of the moneys are justified to the satisfaction of the director
or are repaid to the state general fund. The director may allow
noncomplying use of moneys received under this subsection upon a
showing of hardship or other emergent need.
(3) Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, the
distributions to any city that substantially decriminalizes or repeals
its criminal code after July 1, 1990, and that does not reimburse the
county for costs associated with criminal cases under RCW 3.50.800 or
3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in which the city is located.
(4) Not more than five percent of the funds deposited to the
municipal criminal justice assistance account shall be available for
appropriations for enhancements to the state patrol crime laboratory
system and the continuing costs related to these enhancements. Funds
appropriated from this account for such enhancements shall not supplant
existing funds from the state general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An amount equal to four hundred fifty-four one-thousandths of
one percent of all sales and use taxes paid under chapters 82.08 and
82.12 RCW shall be deposited into the county public health account
under RCW 70.05.125.
(2) An amount equal to two hundred thirty-five one-thousandths of
one percent of all sales and use taxes paid under chapters 82.08 and
82.12 RCW shall be deposited into the county sales and use tax
equalization account under RCW 82.14.200.
(3) An amount equal to seven hundred seventy-three one-thousandths
of one percent of all sales and use taxes paid under chapters 82.08 and
82.12 RCW shall be deposited into the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account under RCW 82.14.210.
(4) An amount equal to five hundred thirty-five one-thousandths of
one percent of all sales and use taxes paid under chapters 82.08 and
82.12 RCW shall be deposited into the county criminal justice
assistance account for distribution under RCW 82.14.310.
(5) An amount equal to one hundred seven one-thousandths of one
percent of all sales and use taxes paid under chapters 82.08 and 82.12
RCW shall be deposited into the municipal criminal justice assistance
account for distribution under RCW 82.14.320.
(6) An amount equal to one hundred seven one-thousandths of one
percent of all sales and use taxes paid under chapters 82.08 and 82.12
RCW shall be deposited into the municipal criminal justice assistance
account for distribution under RCW 82.14.330.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---