BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the orca whale is
a significant cultural and economic resource in the northwest and its
presence represents a key indicator of a healthy marine environment.
The legislature also finds that orca populations in Washington waters,
also known as the southern resident killer whale population, have
declined by twenty percent in the past five years. The legislature
further finds that, while current research points to several risk
factors that may be impacting orca populations, including availability
of prey, environmental contaminants, disease, whale watching, and other
factors, more research and coordination of recovery efforts are
required to successfully recover orca whale populations. The
legislature recognizes that the national marine fisheries service
anticipates proposing regulations to designate this population of orcas
as a depleted stock under the marine mammal protection act. The
legislature also recognizes that the department may review the status
of the southern resident population to determine if a state threatened
or endangered species listing is warranted. However, the legislature
finds that, in addition to measures undertaken by the state and federal
governments, a community-based recovery effort that involves a variety
of interest groups and private individuals should be formed to assist
in recovery of orca populations in Washington. Therefore, the
legislature finds that it is in the best interest of the state to
encourage the development of a nonprofit orca research and conservation
association to coordinate orca research and recovery efforts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The state legislature authorizes the
establishment of an independent, nonprofit organization known as the
orca research and conservation association to coordinate orca research
and recovery efforts.
(2) The orca research and conservation association shall seek to:
(a) Conduct orca research activities to further scientific
knowledge regarding orca populations, habitat needs, migration, and
other factors impacting orca survival; and
(b) Coordinate state orca recovery efforts by working with state
and federal stakeholders participating in orca recovery, including but
not limited to the national marine fisheries service, the Puget Sound
action team, the department of ecology, the department, and private
organizations to ensure that private and government resources are used
efficiently and effectively to recover orca populations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The orca research and conservation
association should allow any interested person or group to become a
member of the association.
(2) The association should attempt to have representation on its
board of directors and within its membership from all groups with an
interest in orca recovery. The association also should attempt to have
representation on its board of directors and within its membership from
the citizens of the state. The association should encourage
participation in the association by federal, state, and local agencies
involved in water quality, marine protection, and species recovery
research and activities.
(3) The association is encouraged to consider establishing a
technical advisory committee to provide scientific and technical
expertise to the association and to make recommendations to the
association's board of directors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The orca research and conservation account
is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from
federal funds provided for orca research and recovery, private
donations, and other moneys appropriated to the account by the
legislature must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the
account may be used only for orca research and recovery efforts. Only
the director of the department or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.21A RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall provide technical assistance to the orca
research and conservation association created in section 2 of this act.
The department's technical assistance must include assisting in
research, recovery plan development, and other activities to address
the decline of orca populations in Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall provide technical assistance to the orca
research and conservation association created in section 2 of this act.
The department's technical assistance must include assisting in
research, recovery plan development, and other activities to address
the decline of orca populations in Washington.

Sec. 7 RCW 90.71.050 and 1998 c 246 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Each biennium, the action team shall prepare a Puget Sound
work plan and budget for inclusion in the governor's biennial budget.
The work plan shall prescribe the necessary federal, state, and local
actions to maintain and enhance Puget Sound water quality, including
but not limited to, enhancement of recreational opportunities, and
restoration of a balanced population of indigenous shellfish, fish, and
wildlife. The work plan and budget shall include specific actions and
projects pertaining to salmon recovery plans and orca recovery plans
developed by the orca research and conservation association created in
section 2 of this act.
(b) In developing a work plan, the action team shall meet the
following objectives:
(i) Use the plan elements of the Puget Sound management plan to
prioritize local and state actions necessary to restore and protect the
biological health and diversity of Puget Sound;
(ii) Consider the problems and priorities identified in local
plans; and
(iii) Coordinate the work plan activities with other relevant
activities, including but not limited to, agencies' activities that
have not been funded through the plan, local plans, and governmental
and nongovernmental watershed restoration activities.
(c) In developing a budget, the action team shall identify:
(i) The total funds to implement local projects originating from
the planning process developed for nonpoint pollution; and
(ii) The total funds to implement any other projects designed
primarily to restore salmon habitat.
(2) In addition to the requirements identified under RCW
90.71.020(2)(a), the work plan and budget shall:
(a) Identify and prioritize the local and state actions necessary
to address the water quality problems in the following locations:
(i) Area 1: Island and San Juan counties;
(ii) Area 2: Skagit and Whatcom counties;
(iii) Area 3: Clallam and Jefferson counties;
(iv) Area 4: Snohomish, King, and Pierce counties; and
(v) Area 5: Kitsap, Mason, and Thurston counties;
(b) Provide sufficient funding to characterize local watersheds,
provide technical assistance, and implement state responsibilities
identified in the work plan. The number and qualifications of staff
assigned to each region shall be determined by the types of problems
identified pursuant to (a) of this subsection;
(c) Provide sufficient funding to implement and coordinate the
Puget Sound ambient monitoring plan pursuant to RCW 90.71.060;
(d) Provide funds to assist local jurisdictions to implement
elements of the work plan assigned to local governments and to develop
and implement local plans;
(e) Provide sufficient funding to provide support staff for the
action team; and
(f) Describe any proposed amendments to the Puget Sound management
plan.
(3) The work plan shall be submitted to the appropriate policy and
fiscal committees of the legislature by December 20th of each even-numbered year.
(4) The work plan shall be implemented consistent with the
legislative provisos of the biennial appropriation acts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 77 RCW.

--- END ---