BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Competitive pressures that force
efficiencies in the private sector to ensure they provide useful and
quality products and services at a reasonable cost do not apply to the
public sector. This act is intended to create a mechanism whereby
conscientious public employees and concerned citizens can work together
to improve state government. Performance audits are a powerful
management and decision-making tool that can be utilized to achieve and
maintain efficient government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state auditor shall undertake ongoing independent,
objective, and comprehensive performance audits of state government,
which shall be performed in accordance with government auditing
standards and funded by the general fund.
(2) For the purposes of this act, "government auditing standards"
means the generally accepted government auditing standards as published
by the comptroller general of the United States general accounting
office.
(3) For the purposes of this act, "state government" or "state
agency" or "state agencies" includes any agencies, boards, commissions,
departments, committees, offices, programs, or services within the
executive branch of state government, including any institution of
higher education.
(4) The performance audit report must include:
(a) Identification of potential cost savings in state agencies,
programs, and services;
(b) Identification of funding to state agencies, programs, and
services that can be eliminated or reduced;
(c) Identification of state agencies, programs, and services that
can be eliminated, reduced, or transferred to the private sector;
(d) Analysis of gaps and overlaps in state agencies, programs, and
services and recommendations for improving, dropping, blending, or
separating functions to correct gaps or overlaps;
(e) Analysis and recommendations for pooling information technology
systems across agency lines;
(f) Analysis of the roles and functions of state agencies,
programs, and services and their compliance with statutory authority
and recommendations for eliminating or changing those roles and
functions and ensuring compliance with statutory authority;
(g) Recommendations for eliminating or changing statutes, rules,
and policy directives as may be necessary to ensure state agencies
carry out reasonably and properly those functions expressly vested in
state agencies by statute;
(h) Verification of the reliability and validity of individual or
multiple agency performance data, self-assessments, and performance
measurement systems as required under RCW 43.88.090; and
(i) Identification and recognition of best practices.
(5) The state auditor may require any state agency to provide all
information required for completion of any audit, and each state agency
shall fully and completely cooperate with the state auditor for the
purposes of this section. The costs of complying with these
requirements are paid for by the agency.
(6) The state auditor shall contract with private sector
professional and technical experts for conducting performance audits
and shall provide oversight of such audits and employees within the
state auditor's office, if available and qualified, may assist such
audits. The state auditor shall create and maintain a list of
qualified private sector professional and technical experts who shall
be selected to conduct performance audits either by lot or on a
rotating basis.
(7) The state auditor shall solicit suggestions for improving
government performance from both front-line public employees,
government service recipients, and the public at large in the conduct
of each audit. The state auditor shall establish a toll-free telephone
number at which the public may make suggestions, report government
waste, and note government innovation. The state auditor shall compile
the information acquired and make it available upon request and may
provide comments regarding the information acquired.
(8)(a) The state auditor shall perform preliminary performance
assessments and establish initial scoring for state agencies, programs,
and services and present an audit work plan to the citizens' advisory
committee created in section 6 of this act and the joint legislative
audit and review committee within sixty days after the effective date
of this act for their review and comment. The citizens' advisory
committee and the joint legislative audit and review committee shall
present their respective comments in writing within thirty days after
they receive the audit work plan from the auditor. Within sixty days
after the state auditor has completed a performance audit of a state
agency, program, or service, the auditor shall present the final
performance audit report to the legislature and the governor and make
the report available to the public upon request and on its web site.
(b) The state auditor shall create subsequent auditing schedules
for all state agencies and present subsequent audit work plans to the
citizens' advisory committee and the joint legislative audit and review
committee within thirty days after each plan is created for their
review and comment. The citizens' advisory committee and the joint
legislative audit and review committee shall present their respective
comments in writing within thirty days after they receive a subsequent
audit work plan from the auditor. Within sixty days after the state
auditor has completed a subsequent performance audit of a state agency,
program, or service, the auditor shall present its final performance
audit report to the legislature and the governor and make the report
available to the public upon request and on its web site.
(9) The state auditor, the joint legislative audit and review
committee, and the citizens' advisory committee shall strive to
cooperate and collaborate between and among themselves to the fullest
extent possible in order to maximize the intent of this act and to
ensure government efficiencies are achieved through performance audits
authorized by this act.
(10) The office of the economic and revenue forecast council shall
establish a peer group rating system using as benchmarks only those
states having the same number of electoral votes as Washington or
having plus or minus one electoral vote as does Washington and shall
issue a budgeting and economic climate report based on the peer group
rating system. The report shall include an analysis of any peer group
state performance audits of state agencies and the effects on each
state's budgeting and economic climate. The office of the economic and
revenue forecast council shall submit its budgeting and economic
climate report to the legislature, the governor, and the state auditor
no later than December 31, 2003, and shall, thereafter, make the report
available to the public upon request and on its web site. The office
of the economic and revenue forecast council shall update its budgeting
and economic climate each year and submit each year's report to the
legislature, the governor, and the state auditor no later than December
31st of each year and shall make each year's report available to the
public upon request and on its web site. The legislature shall use the
budgeting and economic report as submitted from the office of the
economic and revenue forecast council as the basis for determining
Washington state's competitive economic standing in relation to the
other states within the peer group.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.88.160 and 2002 c 260 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
This section sets forth the major fiscal duties and
responsibilities of officers and agencies of the executive branch. The
regulations issued by the governor pursuant to this chapter shall
provide for a comprehensive, orderly basis for fiscal management and
control, including efficient accounting and reporting therefor, for the
executive branch of the state government and may include, in addition,
such requirements as will generally promote more efficient public
management in the state.
(1) Governor; director of financial management. The governor,
through the director of financial management, shall devise and
supervise a modern and complete accounting system for each agency to
the end that all revenues, expenditures, receipts, disbursements,
resources, and obligations of the state shall be properly and
systematically accounted for. The accounting system shall include the
development of accurate, timely records and reports of all financial
affairs of the state. The system shall also provide for central
accounts in the office of financial management at the level of detail
deemed necessary by the director to perform central financial
management. The director of financial management shall adopt and
periodically update an accounting procedures manual. Any agency
maintaining its own accounting and reporting system shall comply with
the updated accounting procedures manual and the rules of the director
adopted under this chapter. An agency may receive a waiver from
complying with this requirement if the waiver is approved by the
director. Waivers expire at the end of the fiscal biennium for which
they are granted. The director shall forward notice of waivers granted
to the appropriate legislative fiscal committees. The director of
financial management may require such financial, statistical, and other
reports as the director deems necessary from all agencies covering any
period.
(2) Except as provided in chapter 43.88C RCW, the director of
financial management is responsible for quarterly reporting of primary
operating budget drivers such as applicable workloads, caseload
estimates, and appropriate unit cost data. These reports shall be
transmitted to the legislative fiscal committees or by electronic means
to the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee.
Quarterly reports shall include actual monthly data and the variance
between actual and estimated data to date. The reports shall also
include estimates of these items for the remainder of the budget
period.
(3) The director of financial management shall report at least
annually to the appropriate legislative committees regarding the status
of all appropriated capital projects, including transportation
projects, showing significant cost overruns or underruns. If funds are
shifted from one project to another, the office of financial management
shall also reflect this in the annual variance report. Once a project
is complete, the report shall provide a final summary showing estimated
start and completion dates of each project phase compared to actual
dates, estimated costs of each project phase compared to actual costs,
and whether or not there are any outstanding liabilities or unsettled
claims at the time of completion.
(4) In addition, the director of financial management, as agent of
the governor, shall:
(a) Develop and maintain a system of internal controls and internal
audits comprising methods and procedures to be adopted by each agency
that will safeguard its assets, check the accuracy and reliability of
its accounting data, promote operational efficiency, and encourage
adherence to prescribed managerial policies for accounting and
financial controls. The system developed by the director shall include
criteria for determining the scope and comprehensiveness of internal
controls required by classes of agencies, depending on the level of
resources at risk.
Each agency head or authorized designee shall be assigned the
responsibility and authority for establishing and maintaining internal
audits following the standards of internal auditing of the institute of
internal auditors;
(b) Make surveys and analyses of agencies with the object of
determining better methods and increased effectiveness in the use of
manpower and materials; and the director shall authorize expenditures
for employee training to the end that the state may benefit from
training facilities made available to state employees;
(c) Establish policies for allowing the contracting of child care
services;
(d) Report to the governor with regard to duplication of effort or
lack of coordination among agencies;
(e) Review any pay and classification plans, and changes
thereunder, developed by any agency for their fiscal impact: PROVIDED,
That none of the provisions of this subsection shall affect merit
systems of personnel management now existing or hereafter established
by statute relating to the fixing of qualifications requirements for
recruitment, appointment, or promotion of employees of any agency. The
director shall advise and confer with agencies including appropriate
standing committees of the legislature as may be designated by the
speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate
regarding the fiscal impact of such plans and may amend or alter the
plans, except that for the following agencies no amendment or
alteration of the plans may be made without the approval of the agency
concerned: Agencies headed by elective officials;
(f) Fix the number and classes of positions or authorized employee
years of employment for each agency and during the fiscal period amend
the determinations previously fixed by the director except that the
director shall not be empowered to fix the number or the classes for
the following: Agencies headed by elective officials;
(g) Adopt rules to effectuate provisions contained in (a) through
(f) of this subsection.
(5) The treasurer shall:
(a) Receive, keep, and disburse all public funds of the state not
expressly required by law to be received, kept, and disbursed by some
other persons: PROVIDED, That this subsection shall not apply to those
public funds of the institutions of higher learning which are not
subject to appropriation;
(b) Receive, disburse, or transfer public funds under the
treasurer's supervision or custody;
(c) Keep a correct and current account of all moneys received and
disbursed by the treasurer, classified by fund or account;
(d) Coordinate agencies' acceptance and use of credit cards and
other payment methods, if the agencies have received authorization
under RCW 43.41.180;
(e) Perform such other duties as may be required by law or by
regulations issued pursuant to this law.
It shall be unlawful for the treasurer to disburse public funds in
the treasury except upon forms or by alternative means duly prescribed
by the director of financial management. These forms or alternative
means shall provide for authentication and certification by the agency
head or the agency head's designee that the services have been rendered
or the materials have been furnished; or, in the case of loans or
grants, that the loans or grants are authorized by law; or, in the case
of payments for periodic maintenance services to be performed on state
owned equipment, that a written contract for such periodic maintenance
services is currently in effect; and the treasurer shall not be liable
under the treasurer's surety bond for erroneous or improper payments so
made. When services are lawfully paid for in advance of full
performance by any private individual or business entity other than
equipment maintenance providers or as provided for by RCW 42.24.035,
such individual or entity other than central stores rendering such
services shall make a cash deposit or furnish surety bond coverage to
the state as shall be fixed in an amount by law, or if not fixed by
law, then in such amounts as shall be fixed by the director of the
department of general administration but in no case shall such required
cash deposit or surety bond be less than an amount which will fully
indemnify the state against any and all losses on account of breach of
promise to fully perform such services. No payments shall be made in
advance for any equipment maintenance services to be performed more
than twelve months after such payment. Any such bond so furnished
shall be conditioned that the person, firm or corporation receiving the
advance payment will apply it toward performance of the contract. The
responsibility for recovery of erroneous or improper payments made
under this section shall lie with the agency head or the agency head's
designee in accordance with regulations issued pursuant to this
chapter. Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit a public
body to advance funds to a private service provider pursuant to a grant
or loan before services have been rendered or material furnished.
(6) The state auditor shall:
(a) Report to the legislature the results of current post audits
that have been made of the financial transactions of each agency; to
this end the auditor may, in the auditor's discretion, examine the
books and accounts of any agency, official, or employee charged with
the receipt, custody, or safekeeping of public funds. Where feasible
in conducting examinations, the auditor shall utilize data and findings
from the internal control system prescribed by the office of financial
management. The current post audit of each agency may include a
section on recommendations to the legislature as provided in (((c)))
(d) of this subsection.
(b) Give information to the legislature, whenever required, upon
any subject relating to the financial affairs of the state.
(c) Make the auditor's official report on or before the thirty-first of December which precedes the meeting of the legislature. The
report shall be for the last complete fiscal period and shall include
determinations as to whether agencies, in making expenditures, complied
with the laws of this state. ((The state auditor is authorized to))
(d) Perform or participate in performance ((verifications and
performance)) audits ((as expressly authorized by the legislature in
the omnibus biennial appropriations acts or in the performance audit
work plan approved by the joint legislative audit and review
committee)). A performance audit for the purpose of this section is an
objective and systematic examination of evidence for the purpose of
providing an independent assessment of the performance of a state
agency, program, or service in order to provide information for
improving public accountability and facilitating decision making by
those who have the responsibility to initiate or oversee corrective
action. Performance audits include economy, efficiency, and program
audits.
(i) Economy and efficiency audits include determining whether the
state agency is acquiring, protecting, and using its resources, such as
personnel, property, and space, economically and efficiently; the
causes of uneconomical or inefficient practices; and whether the agency
has complied with laws and rules on matters of economy and efficiency.
(ii) Program audits include determining the extent to which the
desired results or benefits established by the legislature or other
authorizing body are being achieved by the state agency; the
effectiveness of agencies, programs, and services; and whether the
agency complied with laws and rules applicable to the program.
The state auditor, upon completing an audit for legal and financial
compliance under chapter 43.09 RCW ((or a performance verification)),
may report to the joint legislative audit and review committee or other
appropriate committees of the legislature, in a manner prescribed by
the joint legislative audit and review committee, on facts relating to
the management or performance of governmental programs ((where such
facts are discovered incidental to the legal and financial audit or
performance verification. The auditor may make such a report to a
legislative committee only if the auditor has determined that the
agency has been given an opportunity and has failed to resolve the
management or performance issues raised by the auditor. If the auditor
makes a report to a legislative committee, the agency may submit to the
committee a response to the report. This subsection (6) shall not be
construed to authorize the auditor to allocate other than de minimis
resources to performance audits except as expressly authorized in the
appropriations acts or in the performance audit work plan. The results
of a performance audit conducted by the state auditor that has been
requested by the joint legislative audit and review committee must only
be transmitted to the joint legislative audit and review committee)).
(((d))) (e) Be empowered to take exception to specific expenditures
that have been incurred by any agency or to take exception to other
practices related in any way to the agency's financial transactions and
to cause such exceptions to be made a matter of public record,
including disclosure to the agency concerned and to the director of
financial management. It shall be the duty of the director of
financial management to cause corrective action to be taken within six
months, such action to include, as appropriate, the withholding of
funds as provided in RCW 43.88.110. The director of financial
management shall annually report by December 31st the status of audit
resolution to the appropriate committees of the legislature, the state
auditor, and the attorney general. The director of financial
management shall include in the audit resolution report actions taken
as a result of an audit including, but not limited to, types of
personnel actions, costs and types of litigation, and value of recouped
goods or services.
(((e))) (f) Promptly report any irregularities to the attorney
general.
(((f))) (g) Investigate improper governmental activity under
chapter 42.40 RCW.
(7) The joint legislative audit and review committee may:
(a) Make post audits of the financial transactions of any agency
and management surveys and program reviews as provided for in chapter
44.28 RCW as well as performance audits and program evaluations. To
this end the joint committee may in its discretion examine the books,
accounts, and other records of any agency, official, or employee.
(b) Give information to the legislature or any legislative
committee whenever required upon any subject relating to the
performance and management of state agencies.
(c) Make a report to the legislature which shall include at least
the following:
(i) Determinations as to the extent to which agencies in making
expenditures have complied with the will of the legislature and in this
connection, may take exception to specific expenditures or financial
practices of any agencies; and
(ii) Such plans as it deems expedient for the support of the
state's credit, for lessening expenditures, for promoting frugality and
economy in agency affairs, and generally for an improved level of
fiscal management.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.88.090 and 1997 c 372 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of developing budget proposals to the legislature,
the governor shall have the power, and it shall be the governor's duty,
to require from proper agency officials such detailed estimates and
other information in such form and at such times as the governor shall
direct. The estimates for the legislature and the judiciary shall be
transmitted to the governor and shall be included in the budget without
revision. The estimates for state pension contributions shall be based
on the rates provided in chapter 41.45 RCW. Copies of all such
estimates shall be transmitted to the standing fiscal committees ((on
ways and means)) of the house of representatives and senate at the same
time as they are filed with the governor and the office of financial
management.
The estimates shall include statements or tables which indicate, by
agency, the state funds which are required for the receipt of federal
matching revenues. The estimates shall be revised as necessary to
reflect legislative enactments and adopted appropriations and shall be
included with the initial biennial allotment submitted under RCW
43.88.110. The estimates must reflect that the agency considered any
alternatives to reduce costs or improve service delivery identified in
the findings of ((a)) any performance audit of the agency by the state
auditor or the joint legislative audit and review committee. Nothing
in this subsection requires performance audit findings to be published
as part of the budget.
(2) Each state agency shall define its mission and establish
measurable goals for achieving desirable results for those who receive
its services and the taxpayers who pay for those services. Each agency
shall also develop clear strategies and timelines to achieve its goals.
This section does not require an agency to develop a new mission or
goals in place of identifiable missions or goals that meet the intent
of this section. The mission and goals of each agency must conform to
statutory direction and limitations.
(3) For the purpose of assessing program performance, each state
agency shall establish program objectives for each major program in its
budget. The objectives must be consistent with the missions and goals
developed under this section. The objectives must be expressed to the
extent practicable in outcome-based, objective, and measurable form
unless an exception to adopt a different standard is granted by the
office of financial management and approved by the legislative
committee on performance review. The office of financial management
shall provide necessary professional and technical assistance to assist
state agencies in the development of strategic plans that include the
mission of the agency and its programs, measurable goals, strategies,
and performance measurement systems.
(4) Each state agency shall adopt procedures for continuous self-assessment of each program and activity, using the mission, goals,
objectives, and measurements required under subsections (2) and (3) of
this section.
(5) It is the policy of the legislature that each agency's budget
proposals must be directly linked to the agency's stated mission and
program goals and objectives. Consistent with this policy, agency
budget proposals must include integration of performance measures that
allow objective determination of a program's success in achieving its
goals. The office of financial management shall develop a plan to
merge the budget development process with agency performance assessment
procedures. The plan must include a schedule to integrate agency
strategic plans and performance measures into agency budget requests
and the governor's budget proposal over three fiscal biennia. The plan
must identify those agencies that will implement the revised budget
process in the 1997-1999 biennium, the 1999-2001 biennium, and the
2001-2003 biennium. In consultation with the legislative fiscal
committees, the office of financial management shall recommend
statutory and procedural modifications to the state's budget,
accounting, and reporting systems to facilitate the performance
assessment procedures and the merger of those procedures with the state
budget process. The plan and recommended statutory and procedural
modifications must be submitted to the legislative fiscal committees by
September 30, 1996.
(6) In the year of the gubernatorial election, the governor shall
invite the governor-elect or the governor-elect's designee to attend
all hearings provided in RCW 43.88.100; and the governor shall furnish
the governor-elect or the governor-elect's designee with such
information as will enable the governor-elect or the governor-elect's
designee to gain an understanding of the state's budget requirements.
The governor-elect or the governor-elect's designee may ask such
questions during the hearings and require such information as the
governor-elect or the governor-elect's designee deems necessary and may
make recommendations in connection with any item of the budget which,
with the governor-elect's reasons therefor, shall be presented to the
legislature in writing with the budget document. Copies of all such
estimates and other required information shall also be submitted to the
standing committees on ways and means of the house and senate.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.09.050 and 1992 c 118 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The auditor shall:
(1) Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, audit the
accounts of all collectors of the revenue and other holders of public
money required by law to pay the same into the treasury;
(2) In his or her discretion, inspect the books of any person
charged with the receipt, safekeeping, and disbursement of public
moneys;
(3) Investigate improper governmental activity under chapter 42.40
RCW;
(4) Inform the attorney general in writing of the necessity for the
attorney general to direct prosecutions in the name of the state for
all official delinquencies in relation to the assessment, collection,
and payment of the revenue, against all persons who, by any means,
become possessed of public money or property, and fail to pay over or
deliver the same, and against all debtors of the state;
(5) Give information in writing to the legislature, whenever
required, upon any subject relating to the financial affairs of the
state, or touching any duties of his or her office;
(6) Report to the director of financial management in writing the
names of all persons who have received any moneys belonging to the
state, and have not accounted therefor;
(7) Authenticate with his or her official seal papers issued from
his or her office;
(8) Make his or her official report annually on or before the 31st
of December; and
(9) Undertake ongoing independent, objective, and comprehensive
performance audits of state agencies, which shall be performed in
accordance with government auditing standards and funded by the general
fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The citizens' oversight committee for government
accountability is established as a panel composed of five citizen
members appointed by the leadership of the house of representatives who
are not affiliated with the party of the state auditor. The members of
the citizens' oversight committee shall select a chair from one of the
five citizen members. The committee may create subcommittees and
advisory panels to assist in its deliberations and may contract for
specialized expertise.
(b) Members of the citizens' oversight committee for government
accountability shall have verifiable experience and expertise in
private sector financial management, accounting, or auditing in order
to qualify for appointment to the committee.
(c) The committee may solicit charitable gifts, grants, and
donations that are placed into the citizens' oversight committee for
government accountability account, created in the custody of the state
treasurer, and used to offset general fund moneys appropriated for such
purposes. The treasurer shall transfer money from the account to the
general fund, when money is available in the account.
(2)(a) The citizens' oversight committee for government
accountability shall submit reports and recommendations to the state
auditor regarding the initiation, scope, compliance, and accountability
of performance audits, and for achieving, increasing, and improving
state government efficiency, effectiveness, organization, operations,
accountability, and cost savings. The committee shall provide
recommendations regarding funding for future audits.
(b) The state auditor shall designate a coordinator from within the
auditor's office who shall provide logistical and staffing assistance
to the committee as necessary.
(3) The citizens' oversight committee shall be appointed within
thirty days after the effective date of this act. A new citizens'
oversight committee shall be formed and members appointed within sixty
days after future elections of the state auditor.
(4) All members of the citizens' oversight committee shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in the performance of duties of
the citizens' oversight committee in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060. All members shall receive a per diem of seventy dollars per
day when performing duties of the citizens' oversight committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 One-half of one percent of the funds
appropriated for the current biennium for each state agency or
institution shall be dedicated towards the cost of auditing that agency
or institution. Any excess funds held by an agency at the end of the
biennium shall be available to the state auditor for audits of other
agencies on a case-by-case basis as needed. Each agency shall report
to the legislature no later than December 31st of each year the funds
remaining in its performance audit account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act shall be liberally construed so as
to effectuate its purposes and the state auditor and the joint
legislative audit and review committee shall exercise the authority
provided under this act to the fullest extent possible in order to
maximize the intent of this act and to ensure government efficiencies
are achieved through performance audits authorized by this act within
the funds available for such exercise.

--- END ---