BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
ensure that the state's considerable investment in radio communications
facilities, and the radio spectrum that is licensed to government
entities in the state, are managed in a way that promotes to the
maximum extent the health and safety of the state's citizens and the
economic efficiencies of coordinated planning, development, management,
maintenance, accountability, and performance. The legislature finds
that such coordination is essential for disaster preparedness,
emergency management, and public safety, and that such coordination
will result in more cost-effective use of state resources and improved
government services.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.105.020 and 1999 c 285 s 1 and 1999 c 80 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise,
the following definitions shall apply:
(1) "Department" means the department of information services;
(2) "Board" means the information services board;
(3) "Committee" means the state interoperability executive
committee;
(4) "Local governments" includes all municipal and quasi municipal
corporations and political subdivisions, and all agencies of such
corporations and subdivisions authorized to contract separately;
(((4))) (5) "Director" means the director of the department;
(((5))) (6) "Purchased services" means services provided by a
vendor to accomplish routine, continuing, and necessary functions.
This term includes, but is not limited to, services acquired for
equipment maintenance and repair, operation of a physical plant,
security, computer hardware and software installation and maintenance,
telecommunications installation and maintenance, data entry, keypunch
services, programming services, and computer time-sharing;
(((6))) (7) "Backbone network" means the shared high-density
portions of the state's telecommunications transmission facilities. It
includes specially conditioned high-speed communications carrier lines,
multiplexors, switches associated with such communications lines, and
any equipment and software components necessary for management and
control of the backbone network;
(((7))) (8) "Telecommunications" means the transmission of
information by wire, radio, optical cable, electromagnetic, or other
means;
(((8))) (9) "Information" includes, but is not limited to, data,
text, voice, and video;
(10) "Information processing" means the electronic capture,
collection, storage, manipulation, transmission, retrieval, and
presentation of information in the form of data, text, voice, or image
and includes telecommunications and office automation functions;
(((9))) (11) "Information services" means data processing,
telecommunications, ((and)) office automation, and computerized
information systems;
(((10))) (12) "Equipment" means the machines, devices, and
transmission facilities used in information processing, such as
computers, word processors, terminals, telephones, ((and)) wireless
communications system facilities, cables, and any physical facility
necessary for the operation of such equipment;
(((11))) (13) "Information technology portfolio" or "portfolio"
means a strategic management process documenting relationships between
agency missions and information technology and telecommunications
investments;
(((12))) (14) "Oversight" means a process of comprehensive risk
analysis and management designed to ensure optimum use of information
technology resources and telecommunications;
(((13))) (15) "Proprietary software" means that software offered
for sale or license;
(((14))) (16) "Video telecommunications" means the electronic
interconnection of two or more sites for the purpose of transmitting
and/or receiving visual and associated audio information. Video
telecommunications shall not include existing public television
broadcast stations as currently designated by the department of
community, trade, and economic development under chapter 43.330 RCW;
(((15))) (17) "K-20 educational network board" or "K-20 board"
means the K-20 educational network board created in RCW 43.105.800;
(((16))) (18) "K-20 network technical steering committee" or
"committee" means the K-20 network technical steering committee created
in RCW 43.105.810;
(((17))) (19) "K-20 network" means the network established in RCW
43.105.820;
(((18))) (20) "Educational sectors" means those institutions of
higher education, school districts, and educational service districts
that use the network for distance education, data transmission, and
other uses permitted by the K-20 board.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.105.041 and 1999 c 285 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall have the following powers and duties related to
information services:
(a) To develop standards and procedures governing the acquisition
and disposition of equipment, proprietary software and purchased
services, licensing of the radio spectrum by or on behalf of state
agencies, and confidentiality of computerized data;
(b) To purchase, lease, rent, or otherwise acquire, dispose of, and
maintain equipment, proprietary software, and purchased services, or to
delegate to other agencies and institutions of state government, under
appropriate standards, the authority to purchase, lease, rent, or
otherwise acquire, dispose of, and maintain equipment, proprietary
software, and purchased services: PROVIDED, That, agencies and
institutions of state government are expressly prohibited from
acquiring or disposing of equipment, proprietary software, and
purchased services without such delegation of authority. The
acquisition and disposition of equipment, proprietary software, and
purchased services is exempt from RCW 43.19.1919 and, as provided in
RCW 43.19.1901, from the provisions of RCW 43.19.190 through 43.19.200.
This subsection (1)(b) does not apply to the legislative branch;
(c) To develop statewide or interagency technical policies,
standards, and procedures;
(d) To review and approve standards and common specifications for
new or expanded telecommunications networks proposed by agencies,
public postsecondary education institutions, educational service
districts, or statewide or regional providers of K-12 information
technology services, and to assure the cost-effective development and
incremental implementation of a statewide video telecommunications
system to serve: Public schools; educational service districts;
vocational-technical institutes; community colleges; colleges and
universities; state and local government; and the general public
through public affairs programming;
(e) To provide direction concerning strategic planning goals and
objectives for the state. The board shall seek input from the
legislature and the judiciary;
(f) To develop and implement a process for the resolution of
appeals by:
(i) Vendors concerning the conduct of an acquisition process by an
agency or the department; or
(ii) A customer agency concerning the provision of services by the
department or by other state agency providers;
(g) To establish policies for the periodic review by the department
of agency performance which may include but are not limited to analysis
of:
(i) Planning, management, control, and use of information services;
(ii) Training and education; and
(iii) Project management;
(h) To set its meeting schedules and convene at scheduled times, or
meet at the request of a majority of its members, the chair, or the
director; and
(i) To review and approve that portion of the department's budget
requests that provides for support to the board.
(2) Statewide technical standards to promote and facilitate
electronic information sharing and access are an essential component of
acceptable and reliable public access service and complement content-related standards designed to meet those goals. The board shall:
(a) Establish technical standards to facilitate electronic access
to government information and interoperability of information systems,
including wireless communications systems. Local governments are
strongly encouraged to follow the standards established by the board;
and
(b) Require agencies to consider electronic public access needs
when planning new information systems or major upgrades of systems.
In developing these standards, the board is encouraged to include
the state library, state archives, and appropriate representatives of
state and local government.
(3)(a) The board, in consultation with the K-20 board, has the duty
to govern, operate, and oversee the technical design, implementation,
and operation of the K-20 network including, but not limited to, the
following duties: Establishment and implementation of K-20 network
technical policy, including technical standards and conditions of use;
review and approval of network design; procurement of shared network
services and equipment; and resolving user/provider disputes concerning
technical matters. The board shall delegate general operational and
technical oversight to the K-20 network technical steering committee as
appropriate.
(b) The board has the authority to adopt rules under chapter 34.05
RCW to implement the provisions regarding the technical operations and
conditions of use of the K-20 network.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board shall appoint a state interoperability executive
committee, the membership of which must include, but not be limited to,
representatives of the military department, the Washington state
patrol, the department of transportation, the department of information
services, the department of natural resources, city and county
governments, state and local fire chiefs, police chiefs, and sheriffs,
and state and local emergency management directors. The chair and
legislative members of the board will serve as nonvoting ex officio
members of the committee. Voting membership may not exceed fifteen
members.
(2) The chair of the board shall appoint the chair of the committee
from among the voting members of the committee.
(3) The strategic interoperability executive committee has the
following responsibilities:
(a) Develop policies and make recommendations to the board for
technical standards for state wireless radio communications systems,
including emergency communications systems. The standards must
address, among other things, the interoperability of systems, taking
into account both existing and future systems and technologies;
(b) Coordinate and manage on behalf of the board the licensing and
use of state-designated and state-licensed radio frequencies, including
the spectrum used for public safety and emergency communications, and
serve as the point of contact with the Federal Communications
Commission on matters relating to allocation, use, and licensing of
radio spectrum;
(c) Seek support, including possible federal or other funding, for
state-sponsored wireless communications systems;
(d) Develop recommendations for legislation that may be required to
promote interoperability of state wireless communications systems;
(e) Foster cooperation and coordination among public safety and
emergency response organizations;
(f) Work with wireless communications groups and associations to
ensure interoperability among all public safety and emergency response
wireless communications systems; and
(g) Perform such other duties as may be assigned by the board to
promote interoperability of wireless communications systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state interoperability executive committee shall take
inventory of and evaluate all state and local government-owned public
safety communications systems, and prepare a statewide public safety
communications plan. The plan must set forth recommendations for
executive and legislative action to insure that public safety
communications systems can communicate with one another and conform to
federal law and regulations governing emergency communications systems
and spectrum allocation. The plan must include specific goals for
improving interoperability of public safety communications systems and
identifiable benchmarks for achieving those goals.
(2) The committee shall present the inventory and plan required in
subsection (1) of this section to the board and appropriate legislative
committees as follows:
(a) By December 31, 2003, an inventory of state government-operated
public safety communications systems;
(b) By July 31, 2004, an inventory of all public safety
communications systems in the state;
(c) By March 31, 2004, an interim statewide public safety
communications plan; and
(d) By December 31, 2004, a final statewide public safety
communications plan.
(3) The committee shall consult regularly with the joint
legislative audit and review committee and the legislative evaluation
and accounting program committee while developing the inventory and
plan under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---