BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the social and
health care delivery systems maintained by the department of social and
health services operate as distinct funding sources for services
delivered at the community level. This results in local government
establishing separate and distinct administrative organizations arrayed
around the source of funding provided by the state. The legislature
intends to support local initiatives that attempt to integrate social
and health services, streamline and reduce administrative costs, and
establish new organizational entities that provide faster, smarter, and
more efficient social and health services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.20A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services shall issue a
request for proposal to counties or groups of counties to design a new
administrative and service delivery infrastructure for supporting and
managing social and health services at the local level. The proposal
shall be for a five-year pilot project. The proposal must include an
integrated total population management system utilizing a public
service corporation or a nonprofit corporation as the administrative
service organization responsible for the organization of local
services. The services to be included in the pilot project may
include, but are not limited to, mental health, substance abuse, and
developmental disabilities.
(2) The request for proposal shall require a county or group of
counties to address regulatory oversight, risks management, compliance
monitoring, service authorization, and care management. It shall also
cover the following administrative functions:
(a) Provider network development and management;
(b) Access to care;
(c) Appeals and grievance management;
(d) Adequate social service array;
(e) Customer service;
(f) Quality management;
(g) Information system management; and
(h) Fiscal management.
(3) The department of social and health services shall submit
proposed changes in statute and operating budget procedures to the
legislature by January 15, 2004, to implement the proposals solicited
under this section.

--- END ---