BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An individual licensed under this chapter shall provide a
patient with information on the controversy surrounding mercury amalgam
and seek the patient's informed consent prior to the use of mercury
amalgam dental restorative materials.
(2) The commission shall produce a fact sheet on the controversy
surrounding the use of mercury amalgam dental restorative materials and
distribute it to each individual licensed under this chapter.

--- END ---