BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 FINDING--INTENT. The legislature finds that
financially needy students, especially those with dependents, are
finding it increasingly difficult to stay in school due to the high
costs of caring for their dependent children.
The legislature intends to establish an educational assistance
grant program, funded through gifts, grants, or endowments from private
sources, for students with dependents who have additional financial
needs due to the care they provide for their dependents eighteen years
of age or younger.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 PROGRAM CREATED. The
educational assistance
grant program for students with dependents is hereby created, subject
to the availability of receipts of gifts, grants, or endowments from
private sources. The program is created to serve financially needy
students with dependents eighteen years of age or younger, by assisting
them directly through a grant program to pursue a degree or certificate
at public or private institutions of higher education, as defined in
RCW 28B.10.802, that participate in the state need grant program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 DEFINITION -- ELIGIBILITY. To be eligible for
the educational assistance grant program for students with dependents,
applicants shall: (1) Be residents of the state of Washington; (2) be
needy students as defined in RCW 28B.10.802(3); (3) be eligible to
participate in the state need grant program as set forth under RCW
28B.10.810; and (4) have dependents eighteen years of age or younger
who are under their care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 ACCOUNT CREATION. (1) The students with
dependents grant account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All receipts from the program shall be deposited into the
account. Only the higher education coordinating board, or its
designee, may authorize expenditures from the account. Disbursements
from the account are exempt from appropriations and the allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.
(2) The board may solicit and receive gifts, grants, or endowments
from private sources that are made from time to time, in trust or
otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of the educational
assistance grant program. The executive director, or the executive
director's designee, may spend gifts, grants, or endowments or income
from the private sources according to their terms unless the receipt of
the gifts, grants, or endowments violates RCW 42.17.710.
(3) The earnings on the account shall be used solely for the
purposes in section 2 of this act, except when the terms of a
conditional gift of private moneys in the account require that a
portion of earnings on such moneys be reinvested in the account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 ADMINISTRATION OF PROGRAM -- PAYMENTS TO
PARTICIPANTS. The higher education coordinating board shall develop
and
administer the educational assistance grant program for students
with dependents. In administering the program, once the balance in the
students with dependents grant account is five hundred thousand
dollars, the board's powers and duties shall include but not be limited
to:
(1) Adopting necessary rules and guidelines;
(2) Publicizing the program;
(3) Accepting and depositing donations into the grant account
established in section 4 of this act; and
(4) Soliciting and accepting grants and donations from private
sources for the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 USE OF GRANTS. The educational assistance
grant program for students with dependents grants may be used by
eligible participants to attend any public or private college or
university in the state of Washington as defined in RCW 28B.10.802.
Each participating student may receive an amount to be determined by
the higher education coordinating board, with a minimum amount of one
thousand dollars per academic year, not to exceed the student's
documented financial need for the course of study as determined by the
institution.
Educational assistance grants for students with dependents are not
intended to supplant any grant scholarship or tax program related to
postsecondary education. If the higher education coordinating board
finds that the educational assistance grants for students with
dependents supplant or reduce any grant, scholarship, or tax program
for categories of students, then the higher education coordinating
board shall adjust the financial eligibility criteria or the amount of
the grant to the level necessary to avoid supplanting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This chapter may be known and cited as the
gaining independence for students with dependents program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 74.04 RCW
to read as follows:
For purposes of RCW 74.04.005 (10) and (11), "resource" and
"income" do not include educational assistance awarded under the
gaining independence for students with dependents program as defined in
this act for recipients of temporary assistance for needy families.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 7 and 9 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

Sec. 11 RCW 28B.10.801 and 1999 c 345 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the higher education coordinating
board, in consultation with the higher education community, has
completed a review of the state need grant program. It is the intent
of the legislature to endorse the board's proposed changes to the state
need grant program, including:
(a) Reaffirmation that the primary purpose of the state need grant
program is to assist low-income, needy, and disadvantaged Washington
residents attending institutions of higher education;
(b) A goal that the base state need grant amount over time be
increased to be equivalent to the rate of tuition charged to resident
undergraduate students attending Washington state public colleges and
universities;
(c) State need grant recipients be required to contribute a portion
of the total cost of their education through self-help;
(d) State need grant recipients be required to document their need
for dependent care assistance after taking into account other public
funds provided for like purposes; and
(e) Institutional aid administrators be allowed to determine
whether a student eligible for a state need grant in a given academic
year may remain eligible for the ensuing year if the student's family
income increases by no more than a marginal amount except for funds
provided through the educational assistance grant program for students
with dependents.
(2) The legislature further finds that the higher education
coordinating board, under its authority to implement the proposed
changes in subsection (1) of this section, should do so in a timely
manner.
(3) The legislature also finds that:
(a) In most circumstances, need grant eligibility should not extend
beyond five years or one hundred twenty-five percent of the published
length of the program in which the student is enrolled or the credit or
clock-hour equivalent; and
(b) State financial aid programs should continue to adhere to the
principle that funding follows resident students to their choice of
institution of higher education.

Sec. 12 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2002 c 322 s 5, 2002 c 204 s 7, and
2002 c 61 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the students with dependents grant account, the basic health plan
self-insurance reserve account, the Washington state combined fund
drive account, the Washington international exchange scholarship
endowment fund, the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund,
the energy account, the fair fund, the fruit and vegetable inspection
account, the game farm alternative account, the grain inspection
revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive account, the
rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center
account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, and the
children's trust fund. However, the earnings to be distributed shall
first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service
fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

--- END ---