BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.40.040 and 2001 c 187 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
The assessor shall begin the preliminary work for each assessment
not later than the first day of December of each year in all counties
in the state. The assessor shall also complete the duties of listing
and placing valuations on all property by May 31st of each year, except
that the listing and valuation of construction and mobile homes under
RCW 36.21.080 and 36.21.090 shall be completed by August 31st of each
year, and in the following manner, to wit:
The assessor shall actually determine as nearly as practicable the
true and fair value of each tract or lot of land listed for taxation
and of each improvement located thereon and shall enter one hundred
percent of the true and fair value of such land and value of such
improvements, together with the total of such one hundred percent
valuations, opposite each description of property on the assessment
list and tax roll.
The assessor shall make an alphabetical list of the names of all
persons in the county liable to assessment of personal property, and
require each person to make a correct list and statement of such
property according to the standard form prescribed by the department of
revenue, which statement and list shall include, if required by the
form, the year of acquisition and total original cost of personal
property in each category of the prescribed form((, and shall be signed
and verified under penalty of perjury by the person listing the
property: PROVIDED, That)). However, the assessor may list and value
improvements on publicly owned land in the same manner as real property
is listed and valued, including conformance with the revaluation
program required under chapter 84.41 RCW. Such list and statement
shall be filed on or before the last day of April. The assessor shall
on or before the 1st day of January of each year mail, or
electronically transmit, a notice to all such persons at their last
known address that such statement and list is required((, such)). This
notice ((to)) must be accompanied by the form on which the statement or
list is to be made((: PROVIDED, That)). The notice mailed, or
electronically transmitted, by the assessor to each taxpayer each year
shall, if practicable, include the statement and list of personal
property of the taxpayer for the preceding year. Upon receipt of such
statement and list the assessor shall thereupon determine the true and
fair value of the property included in such statement and enter one
hundred percent of the same on the assessment roll opposite the name of
the party assessed; and in making such entry in the assessment list,
the assessor shall give the name and post office address of the party
listing the property, and if the party resides in a city the assessor
shall give the street and number or other brief description of the
party's residence or place of business. The assessor may, after giving
written notice of the action to the person to be assessed, add to the
assessment list any taxable property which should be included in such
list.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.40.060 and 1988 c 222 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon receipt of the ((verified)) statement of personal property,
the assessor shall assess the value of such property((: PROVIDED,)).
If any property is listed or assessed on or after the 31st day of May,
the same shall be legal and binding as if listed and assessed before
that time((: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That any statement of taxable property
which is not signed by the person listing the property and which is not
verified under penalty of perjury shall not be accepted by the assessor
nor shall it be considered in any way to constitute compliance, or an
attempt at compliance, with the listing requirements of this chapter)).

Sec. 3 RCW 84.40.070 and 1961 c 15 s 84.40.070 are each amended
to read as follows:
The president, secretary or principal accounting officer or agent
of any company or association, whether incorporated or unincorporated,
except as otherwise provided for in this title, shall make out and
deliver to the assessor a ((sworn)) statement of its property, setting
forth particularly(( -- First,)) (1) the name and location of the company
or association; ((second,)) (2) the real property of the company or
association, and where situated; ((third,)) and (3) the nature and
value of its personal property. The real and personal property of such
company or association shall be assessed the same as other real and
personal property. In all cases of failure or refusal of any person,
officer, company, or association to make such return or statement, it
shall be the duty of the assessor to make such return or statement from
the best information he can obtain.

Sec. 4 RCW 84.40.190 and 2001 c 185 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every person required by this title to list property shall make out
and deliver to the assessor, or to the department as required by RCW
84.40.065, either in person, by mail, or by electronic transmittal if
available, a statement((, verified under penalty of perjury,)) of all
the personal property in his or her possession or under his or her
control, and which, by the provisions of this title, he or she is
required to list for taxation, either as owner or holder thereof.
((Each list, schedule or statement required by this chapter shall be
signed by the individual if the person required to make the same is an
individual; by the president, vice-president, treasurer, assistant
treasurer, chief accounting officer or any other officer duly
authorized to so act if the person required to make the same is a
corporation; by a responsible and duly authorized member or officer
having knowledge of its affairs, if the person required to make the
same is a partnership or other unincorporated organization; or by the
fiduciary, if the person required to make the same is a trust or
estate. The list, schedule, or statement may be made and signed for
the person required to make the same by an agent who is duly authorized
to do so by a power of attorney filed with and approved by the
assessor.)) When any list, schedule, or statement is made ((and signed
by such agent)), the principal required to make out and deliver the
same shall be responsible for the contents and the filing thereof and
shall be liable for the penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 84.40.130.
No person shall be required to list for taxation in his statement to
the assessor any share or portion of the capital stock, or of any of
the property of any company, association or corporation, which such
person may hold in whole or in part, where such company, being required
so to do, has listed for assessment and taxation its capital stock and
property with the department of revenue, or as otherwise required by
law.

Sec. 5 RCW 84.40.335 and 1967 ex.s. c 149 s 42 are each amended
to read as follows:
Except for personal property under RCW 84.40.190, any list,
schedule or statement required by this chapter shall contain a written
declaration that any person signing the same and knowing the same to be
false shall be subject to the penalties of perjury.

Sec. 6 RCW 84.36.310 and 1969 ex.s. c 124 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person claiming the exemption provided for in RCW 84.36.300
shall file such claim with his or her listing of personal property as
provided by RCW 84.40.040. The claim shall be in the form prescribed
by the department of revenue, and shall require such information as the
department deems necessary to substantiate the claim. ((The claim
shall be signed and verified by the same person and in the same manner
as the listing of personal property filed pursuant to RCW 84.40.040.))

Sec. 7 RCW 84.36.630 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 24 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) All machinery and equipment owned by a farmer that is personal
property is exempt from property taxes levied for any state purpose if
it is used exclusively in growing and producing agricultural products
during the calendar year for which the claim for exemption is made.
(2) "Farmer" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 82.04.213.
(3) A claim for exemption under this section shall be filed with
the county assessor together with the ((verified)) statement required
under RCW 84.40.190, for exemption from taxes payable the following
year. The claim shall be made solely upon forms as prescribed and
furnished by the department of revenue.

--- END ---