BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.10.022 and 2002 c 151 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The boards of regents of the state universities and the boards
of trustees of the regional universities, The Evergreen State College,
and the state board for community and technical colleges, are severally
authorized to enter into financing contracts as provided in chapter
39.94 RCW. Except as provided in ((this section)) subsection 2 of this
section, financing contracts shall be subject to the approval of the
state finance committee. ((Except for facilities financed under
chapter 28B.140 RCW,))
(2) The board of regents of a state university may enter into
financing contracts which are payable solely from and secured by all or
any component of the fees and revenues of the university derived from
its ownership and operation of its facilities not subject to
appropriation by the legislature and not constituting "general state
revenues," as defined in Article VIII, section 1 of the state
Constitution, without the prior approval of the state finance
committee.
(3) Except for financing contracts for facilities or equipment
described under chapter 28B.140 RCW, the board of regents shall notify
the state finance committee at least sixty days prior to entering into
such contract and provide information relating to such contract as
requested by the state finance committee.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.94.040 and 2002 c 151 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 28B.10.022 ((and chapter 28B.140
RCW)), the state may not enter into any financing contract for itself
if the aggregate principal amount payable thereunder is greater than an
amount to be established from time to time by the state finance
committee or participate in a program providing for the issuance of
certificates of participation, including any contract for credit
enhancement, without the prior approval of the state finance committee.
Except as provided in RCW 28B.10.022, the state finance committee shall
approve the form of all financing contracts or a standard format for
all financing contracts. The state finance committee also may:
(a) Consolidate existing or potential financing contracts into
master financing contracts with respect to property acquired by one or
more agencies, departments, instrumentalities of the state, the state
board for community and technical colleges, or a state institution of
higher learning; or to be acquired by an other agency;
(b) Approve programs providing for the issuance of certificates of
participation in master financing contracts for the state or for other
agencies;
(c) Enter into agreements with trustees relating to master
financing contracts; and
(d) Make appropriate rules for the performance of its duties under
this chapter.
(2) In the performance of its duties under this chapter, the state
finance committee may consult with representatives from the department
of general administration, the office of financial management, and the
department of information services.
(3) With the approval of the state finance committee, the state
also may enter into agreements with trustees relating to financing
contracts and the issuance of certificates of participation.
(4) Except for financing contracts for real property used for the
purposes described under chapter 28B.140 RCW, the state may not enter
into any financing contract for real property of the state without
prior approval of the legislature.
(5) The state may not enter into any financing contract on behalf
of an other agency without the approval of such a financing contract by
the governing body of the other agency.

--- END ---