BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that some people may
have difficulty gaining access to the political process and that the
process can be improved by providing alternative mechanisms for
participation by the citizens of the state. The legislature intends to
establish a self-funding pilot process by which citizens can receive
information about public issues and provide input to their elected
officials.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Any person who lives or works in
Washington may volunteer to act as a citizen councilor by sending a
letter of application to the state auditor and paying a fee as set by
the state auditor to recover the costs of the citizen councilor
program.
(2) Citizen councilors shall act collectively as advisors for the
legislature. Conveners of citizen councilor groups shall be those
designated by the citizen councilor coordinator or deputy citizen
councilor coordinator under section 3 of this act from among citizen
councilors who volunteer to host a group.
(3) Citizen councilor groups shall:
(a) Gather information and study issues determined to be important
to the citizens of the state;
(b) Solicit input, comments, and suggestions from citizens and
groups throughout the state; and
(c) By December 1st of each calendar year, file a written report of
the groups' activities, including the subjects addressed by the group
and the conclusions and collective advice from the group, with the
citizen councilor coordinator.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The positions of citizen councilor
coordinator and deputy citizen councilor coordinator are created within
the office of the state auditor. The state auditor shall appoint the
citizen councilor coordinator and deputy citizen councilor coordinator
who shall serve at the pleasure of the state auditor and shall be
volunteers serving without compensation.
(2) The citizen councilor coordinator and deputy citizen councilor
coordinator shall:
(a) Promote to the citizens of the state the citizen councilor
program and its contribution to public planning processes;
(b) Actively encourage citizen councilor groups to form throughout
the state;
(c) Appoint conveners of citizen councilor groups;
(d) Oversee preparation, tabulation, summarization, and
dissemination of data and information;
(e) Solicit volunteers to assist in administering the program from
community service, educational, civic, business, and other
organizations;
(f) Distribute informational materials to citizen councilors;
(g) Maintain data and documents generated by citizen councilor
groups in the state auditor's office; and
(h) By January 1st of each year, forward the written reports
submitted by the citizen councilor groups under section 2 of this act
to the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 2 and 3 of this act are each added
to chapter 43.09 RCW.

--- END ---