BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.32.470 and 1998 c 191 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A personal use saltwater, freshwater, combination, temporary,
or family fishing weekend license is required for all persons fifteen
years of age or older to fish for or possess fish taken for personal
use from state waters or offshore waters.
(2) The fees for annual personal use saltwater, freshwater, or
combination licenses are as follows:
(a) A combination license allows the holder to fish for or possess
fish, shellfish, and seaweed from state waters or offshore waters. The
fee for this license is thirty-six dollars for residents, seventy-two
dollars for nonresidents, and five dollars for youth.
(b) A saltwater license allows the holder to fish for or possess
fish taken from saltwater areas. The fee for this license is eighteen
dollars for residents, thirty-six dollars for nonresidents, and five
dollars for resident seniors.
(c) A freshwater license allows the holder to fish for, take, or
possess food fish or game fish species in all freshwater areas. The
fee for this license is twenty dollars for residents, forty dollars for
nonresidents, and five dollars for resident seniors.
(3) A temporary fishing license is valid for two consecutive days
and allows the holder to fish for or possess fish taken from state
waters or offshore waters. The fee for this temporary fishing license
is six dollars for both residents and nonresidents. Except for active
duty military personnel serving in any branch of the United States
armed forces, this license is not valid on game fish species for an
eight-consecutive-day period beginning on the opening day of the
lowland lake fishing season.
(4) A family fishing weekend license allows for a maximum of six
anglers: One resident and five youth; two residents and four youth; or
one resident, one nonresident, and four youth. This license allows the
holders to fish for or possess fish taken from state waters or offshore
waters. The fee for this license is twenty dollars. This license is
only valid during periods as specified by rule of the department.
(5) The commission may adopt rules to create and sell combination
licenses for all hunting and fishing activities at or below a fee equal
to the total cost of the individual license contained within any
combination.

--- END ---