BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.29 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) At the time of filing an application for a title insurance
agent license, or any renewal or reinstatement of a title insurance
agent license, the applicant shall provide satisfactory evidence to the
commissioner of having obtained the following as evidence of financial
responsibility:
(a) A fidelity bond or fidelity insurance providing coverage in the
aggregate amount of two hundred thousand dollars with a deductible no
greater than ten thousand dollars covering the applicant and each
corporate officer, partner, escrow officer, and employee of the
applicant conducting the business of an escrow agent as defined in RCW
18.44.011 and exempt from licensing under RCW 18.44.021(6); and
(b) A surety bond in the amount of ten thousand dollars executed by
the applicant as obligor and by a surety company authorized to do a
surety business in this state as surety, unless the fidelity bond or
fidelity insurance obtained by the licensee to satisfy the requirement
in (a) of this subsection does not have a deductible. The bond shall
run to the state of Washington as obligee, and shall run to the benefit
of the state and any person or persons who suffer loss by reason of the
applicant's or its employee's violation of this chapter. The bond
shall be conditioned that the obligor as licensee will faithfully
conform to and abide by this chapter and all rules adopted under this
chapter, and shall reimburse all persons who suffer loss by reason of
a violation of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter. The
bond shall be continuous and may be canceled by the surety upon the
surety giving written notice to the commissioner of its intent to
cancel the bond. The cancellation shall be effective thirty days after
the notice is received by the commissioner. Whether or not the bond is
renewed, continued, reinstated, reissued, or otherwise extended,
replaced, or modified, including increases or decreases in the penal
sum, it shall be considered one continuous obligation, and the surety
upon the bond shall not be liable in an aggregate amount exceeding the
penal sum set forth on the face of the bond. In no event shall the
penal sum, or any portion thereof, at two or more points in time be
added together in determining the surety's liability. The bond is not
liable for any penalties imposed on the licensee, including but not
limited to, any increased damages or attorneys' fees, or both, awarded
under RCW 19.86.090.
(2) For the purposes of this section, a "fidelity bond" means a
primary commercial blanket bond or its equivalent satisfactory to the
commissioner and written by an insurer authorized to transact this line
of business in the state of Washington. The bond shall provide
fidelity coverage for any fraudulent or dishonest acts committed by any
one or more of the employees, officers, or owners as defined in the
bond, acting alone or in collusion with others. The bond shall be for
the sole benefit of the title insurance agent and under no
circumstances whatsoever shall the bonding company be liable under the
bond to any other party. The bond shall name the title insurance agent
as obligee and shall protect the obligee against the loss of money or
other real or personal property belonging to the obligee, or in which
the obligee has a pecuniary interest, or for which the obligee is
legally liable or held by the obligee in any capacity, whether the
obligee is legally liable therefor or not. The bond may be canceled by
the insurer upon delivery of thirty days' written notice to the
commissioner and to the title insurance agent.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "fidelity insurance" means
employee dishonesty insurance or its equivalent satisfactory to the
commissioner and written by an insurer authorized to transact this line
of business in the state of Washington. The insurance shall provide
coverage for any fraudulent or dishonest acts committed by any one or
more of the employees, officers, or owners as defined in the policy of
insurance, acting alone or in collusion with others. The insurance
shall be for the sole benefit of the title insurance agent and under no
circumstances whatsoever shall the insurance company be liable under
the insurance to any other party. The insurance shall name the title
insurance agent as the named insured and shall protect the named
insured against the loss of money or other real or personal property
belonging to the named insured, or in which the named insured has a
pecuniary interest, or for which the named insured is legally liable or
held by the named insured in any capacity, whether the named insured is
legally liable therefore or not. The insurance coverage may be
canceled by the insurer upon delivery of thirty days' written notice to
the commissioner and to the title insurance agent.
(4) The fidelity bond or fidelity insurance and the surety bond
shall be kept in full force and effect as a condition precedent to the
title insurance agent's authority to transact business in this state,
and the title insurance agent shall supply the commissioner with
satisfactory evidence thereof upon request.

--- END ---