BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.08.062 and 1998 c 270 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be in the county of Chelan four judges of the superior
court; in the county of Douglas one judge of the superior court; in the
county of Clark ((eight)) ten judges of the superior court; in the
county of Grays Harbor three judges of the superior court; in the
county of Kitsap ((seven)) eight judges of the superior court; in the
county of Kittitas ((one)) two judges of the superior court; in the
county of Lewis three judges of the superior court.

Sec. 2 RCW 2.08.064 and 1997 c 347 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be in the counties of Benton and Franklin jointly,
((five)) six judges of the superior court; in the county of Clallam,
two judges of the superior court; in the county of Jefferson, one judge
of the superior court; in the county of Snohomish, fifteen judges of
the superior court; in the counties of Asotin, Columbia and Garfield
jointly, one judge of the superior court; in the county of Cowlitz,
four judges of the superior court; in the counties of Klickitat and
Skamania jointly, one judge of the superior court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The additional judicial positions
created by sections 1 and 2 of this act in Clark county, Kitsap county,
Kittitas county, and Benton and Franklin counties shall be effective
only if each county through its duly constituted legislative authority
documents its approval of any additional positions and its agreement
that it will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the
state, the expenses of such additional judicial positions as provided
by statute.
(2)(a) The additional judicial positions created by section 1 of
this act for the county of Clark take effect as follows: One
additional judicial position shall be effective no earlier than the
second Monday in January 2004, and one additional position shall be
effective no earlier than the second Monday in January 2005. The
actual starting dates for the positions may be established by the Clark
county legislative authority upon request of the superior court and by
recommendation of the Clark county executive authority, if any.
(b) The additional judicial position created by section 1 of this
act for the county of Kitsap shall be effective no earlier than the
second Monday in January 2005. The actual starting date for the
position may be established by the Kitsap county legislative authority
upon request of the superior court and by recommendation of the Kitsap
county executive authority, if any.
(c) The additional judicial position created by section 1 of this
act for the county of Kittitas shall be effective no earlier than the
second Monday in January 2004. The actual starting date for the
position may be established by the Kittitas county legislative
authority upon request of the superior court and by recommendation of
the Kittitas county executive authority, if any.
(d) The additional judicial position created by section 2 of this
act jointly for the counties of Benton and Franklin shall be effective
no earlier than July 1, 2003. The actual starting date for the
position may be established by the Benton and Franklin county
legislative authorities upon request of the superior court and by
recommendation of the Benton and Franklin county executive authorities,
if any.

--- END ---