BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.230 and 1992 c 7 s 41 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall furnish to all persons making satisfactory
application for vehicle license as provided by law, two identical
vehicle license number plates each containing the vehicle license
number to be displayed on such vehicle as by law required: PROVIDED,
That if the vehicle to be licensed is a trailer, semitrailer, or
motorcycle only one vehicle license number plate shall be issued for
each thereof. The number and plate shall be of such size and color and
shall contain such symbols indicative of the registration period for
which the same is issued and of the state of Washington, as shall be
determined and prescribed by the director. Any vehicle license number
plate or plates issued to a dealer shall contain thereon a sufficient
and satisfactory indication that such plates have been issued to a
dealer in vehicles. All vehicle license number plates may be obtained
by the director from the metal working plant of a state correctional
facility or from any source in accordance with existing state of
Washington purchasing procedures.
(2) Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, the
director may, in his or her discretion and under such rules and
regulations as he or she may prescribe, adopt a type of vehicle license
number plates whereby the same shall be used as long as legible on the
vehicle for which issued, with provision for tabs or emblems to be
attached thereto or elsewhere on the vehicle to signify renewals, in
which event the term "vehicle license number plate" as used in any
enactment shall be deemed to include in addition to such plate the tab
or emblem signifying renewal except when such plate contains the
designation of the current year without reference to any tab or emblem.
Renewals shall be effected by the issuance and display of such tab or
emblem.
(3) The department shall solicit a request for proposal for
implementing a flat, digitally printed license plate system. The
department must report back to the legislature by December 2003 on the
results of the request for proposal process. The report must, at a
minimum, inform the legislature on who responded to the request for
proposal, the specifications of each proposal and the associated costs,
and the department's recommendation on which proposal is preferred,
accompanied with a proposed implementation plan. The department may
not proceed with implementation of a flat, digitally printed license
plate system until it has received legislative approval.

--- END ---