BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.71.040 and 1991 c 3 s 160 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every applicant for a ((certificate)) license to practice medicine
and surgery shall pay a fee determined by the secretary as provided in
RCW 43.70.250.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.130.040 and 2002 c 223 s 6 and 2002 c 216 s 11 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) This chapter applies only to the secretary and the boards and
commissions having jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed
under the chapters specified in this section. This chapter does not
apply to any business or profession not licensed under the chapters
specified in this section.
(2)(a) The secretary has authority under this chapter in relation
to the following professions:
(i) Dispensing opticians licensed and designated apprentices under
chapter 18.34 RCW;
(ii) Naturopaths licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;
(iii) Midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW;
(iv) Ocularists licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;
(v) Massage operators and businesses licensed under chapter 18.108
RCW;
(vi) Dental hygienists licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;
(vii) Acupuncturists licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW;
(viii) Radiologic technologists certified and X-ray technicians
registered under chapter 18.84 RCW;
(ix) Respiratory care practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89
RCW;
(x) Persons registered under chapter 18.19 RCW;
(xi) Persons licensed as mental health counselors, marriage and
family therapists, and social workers under chapter 18.225 RCW;
(xii) Persons registered as nursing pool operators under chapter
18.52C RCW;
(xiii) Nursing assistants registered or certified under chapter
18.88A RCW;
(xiv) Health care assistants certified under chapter 18.135 RCW;
(xv) Dietitians and nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138
RCW;
(xvi) Chemical dependency professionals certified under chapter
18.205 RCW;
(xvii) Sex offender treatment providers certified under chapter
18.155 RCW;
(xviii) Persons licensed and certified under chapter 18.73 RCW or
RCW 18.71.205;
(xix) Denturists licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW;
(xx) Orthotists and prosthetists licensed under chapter 18.200 RCW;
(xxi) Surgical technologists registered under chapter 18.215 RCW;
and
(xxii) Recreational therapists.
(b) The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter
are as follows:
(i) The podiatric medical board as established in chapter 18.22
RCW;
(ii) The chiropractic quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.25 RCW;
(iii) The dental quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.32 RCW;
(iv) The board of hearing and speech as established in chapter
18.35 RCW;
(v) The board of examiners for nursing home administrators as
established in chapter 18.52 RCW;
(vi) The optometry board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapter 18.53 RCW;
(vii) The board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as established
in chapter 18.57 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and
18.57A RCW;
(viii) The board of pharmacy as established in chapter 18.64 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;
(ix) The medical quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.71 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW;
(x) The board of physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74
RCW;
(xi) The board of occupational therapy practice as established in
chapter 18.59 RCW;
(xii) The nursing care quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.79 RCW governing licenses issued under that chapter;
(xiii) The examining board of psychology and its disciplinary
committee as established in chapter 18.83 RCW; and
(xiv) The veterinary board of governors as established in chapter
18.92 RCW.
(3) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the
disciplining authority has the authority to grant or deny licenses
based on the conditions and criteria established in this chapter and
the chapters specified in subsection (2) of this section. This chapter
also governs any investigation, hearing, or proceeding relating to
denial of licensure or issuance of a license conditioned on the
applicant's compliance with an order entered pursuant to RCW 18.130.160
by the disciplining authority.
(4) All disciplining authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure
substantially consistent application of this chapter, the Uniform
Disciplinary Act, among the disciplining authorities listed in
subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.127.040 and 2000 c 175 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following are not subject to regulation for the purposes of
this chapter:
(1) A family member providing home health, hospice, or home care
services;
(2) A person who provides only meal services in an individual's
permanent or temporary residence;
(3) An individual providing home care through a direct agreement
with a recipient of care in an individual's permanent or temporary
residence;
(4) A person furnishing or delivering home medical supplies or
equipment that does not involve the provision of services beyond those
necessary to deliver, set up, and monitor the proper functioning of the
equipment and educate the user on its proper use;
(5) A person who provides services through a contract with a
licensed agency;
(6) An employee or volunteer of a licensed agency who provides
services only as an employee or volunteer;
(7) Facilities and institutions, including but not limited to
nursing homes under chapter 18.51 RCW, hospitals under chapter 70.41
RCW, adult family homes under chapter 70.128 RCW, boarding homes under
chapter 18.20 RCW, developmental disability residential programs under
chapter ((71.12)) 71A.12 RCW, other entities licensed under chapter
((71.12)) 71A.12 RCW, or other licensed facilities and institutions,
only when providing services to persons residing within the facility or
institution;
(8) Local and combined city-county health departments providing
services under chapters 70.05 and 70.08 RCW;
(9) An individual providing care to ill, disabled, infirm, or
vulnerable individuals through a contract with the department of social
and health services;
(10) Nursing homes, hospitals, or other institutions, agencies,
organizations, or persons that contract with licensed home health,
hospice, or home care agencies for the delivery of services;
(11) In-home assessments of an ill, disabled, vulnerable, or infirm
individual that does not result in regular ongoing care at home;
(12) Services conducted by and for the adherents of a church or
religious denomination that rely upon spiritual means alone through
prayer for healing in accordance with the tenets and practices of such
church or religious denomination and the bona fide religious beliefs
genuinely held by such adherents;
(13) A medicare-approved dialysis center operating a medicare-approved home dialysis program;
(14) A person providing case management services. For the purposes
of this subsection, "case management" means the assessment,
coordination, authorization, planning, training, and monitoring of home
health, hospice, and home care, and does not include the direct
provision of care to an individual;
(15) Pharmacies licensed under RCW 18.64.043 that deliver
prescription drugs and durable medical equipment that does not involve
the use of professional services beyond those authorized to be
performed by licensed pharmacists pursuant to chapter 18.64 RCW and
those necessary to set up and monitor the proper functioning of the
equipment and educate the person on its proper use;
(16) A volunteer hospice complying with the requirements of RCW
70.127.050; and
(17) A person who provides home care services without compensation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 2 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect July 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 RCW 69.41.270 (Maintenance of records--Inspection by board) and 1989 c 352 s 5 are each repealed.

--- END ---