BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.27.015 and 1996 c 157 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "City" means a city or town;
(2) "Multifamily residential building" means common wall
residential buildings that ((consist of four or fewer units, that do
not exceed two)) are less than three stories in height, as defined by
the International Building Code, that are less than ((five)) ten
thousand square feet in area and consist of ten units or less, and
((that)) have a one-hour fire-resistive occupancy separation between
units; and
(3) "Temporary growing structure" means a structure that has the
sides and roof covered with polyethylene, polyvinyl, or similar
flexible synthetic material and is used to provide plants with either
frost protection or increased heat retention.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.27.031 and 1995 c 343 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Except as otherwise provided in this chapter,)) There shall be in
effect in all counties and cities the state building code which shall
consist of the following codes which are hereby adopted by reference:
(1) ((Uniform)) The International Building Code and ((Uniform
Building Code Standards)) the International Residential Code, published
by the International ((Conference of Building Officials)) Code Council,
Inc.;
(2) ((Uniform)) The International Mechanical Code and International
Fuel Gas Code, ((including Chapter 13, Fuel Gas Piping, Appendix B,))
published by the International ((Conference of Building Officials))
Code Council, Inc.;
(3) The ((Uniform)) International Fire Code ((and Uniform Fire Code
Standards)), published by the International ((Fire Code Institute))
Code Council, Inc.: PROVIDED, That, notwithstanding any wording in
this code, participants in religious ceremonies shall not be precluded
from carrying hand-held candles;
(4) Except as provided in RCW 19.27.170, the Uniform Plumbing Code
and Uniform Plumbing Code Standards, published by the International
Association of Plumbing and Mechanical Officials: PROVIDED, That
chapters 11 and 12 of such code are not adopted; and
(5) The rules ((and regulations)) adopted by the council
establishing standards for making buildings and facilities accessible
to and usable by the physically handicapped or elderly persons as
provided in RCW 70.92.100 through 70.92.160.
In case of conflict among the codes enumerated in subsections (1),
(2), (3), and (4) of this section, the first named code shall govern
over those following.
The codes and the objectives enumerated in RCW 19.27.020 and this
section affecting single-family and multifamily residences may not be
increased by any state, county, or city amendments without adoption by
the International Code Council, Inc.
The codes enumerated in this section shall be adopted by the
council as provided in RCW 19.27.074.
The council may issue opinions relating to the codes at the request
of a local official charged with the duty to enforce the enumerated
codes.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.27.040 and 1990 c 2 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
The governing body of each county or city is authorized to amend
the state building code as it applies within the jurisdiction of the
county or city. The ((minimum)) performance standards of the codes and
the objectives enumerated in RCW 19.27.020 affecting single-family and
multifamily residences shall not be ((diminished)) increased by any
county or city amendments without adoption by the International Code
Council, Inc.
Nothing in this chapter shall authorize any modifications of the
requirements of chapter 70.92 RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.27.060 and 2002 c 135 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governing bodies of counties and cities may amend the codes
enumerated in RCW 19.27.031 as ((amended and)) adopted by the state
building code council as they apply within their respective
jurisdictions, ((but the amendments shall not result in a code that is
less than the minimum performance standards and objectives contained in
the state building code.)) subject to the following:
(a) No amendment increasing performance and prescriptive codes and
standards to a code enumerated in RCW 19.27.031 as amended and adopted
by the state building code council that affects single-family or
multifamily residential buildings shall be effective unless the
amendment is ((approved)) adopted by the ((building)) International
Code Council, Inc. under ((RCW 19.27.074(1))) (b) of this subsection.
(b) ((Any county or city amendment to a code enumerated in RCW
19.27.031 which is approved under RCW 19.27.074(1)(b) shall continue to
be effective after any action is taken under RCW 19.27.074(1)(a)
without necessity of reapproval under RCW 19.27.074(1)(b) unless the
amendment is declared null and void by the council at the time any
action is taken under RCW 19.27.074(1)(a) because such action in any
way altered the impact of the amendment.)) After the effective date of
this section, all local amendments of a county or city and all state
amendments that increase the performance and prescriptive codes and
standards for single-family or multifamily residential buildings beyond
those contained in the state building code must be adopted by the
International Code Council, Inc. If the local amendment or state
amendment affecting single-family and multifamily residences is not
adopted by the International Code Council, Inc. the proposed amendment
is null and void as against public policy.
(2) Except as permitted or provided otherwise under this section,
the state building code shall be applicable to all buildings and
structures including those owned by the state or by any governmental
subdivision or unit of local government.
(3) The governing body of each county or city may limit the
application of any portion of the state building code to exclude
specified classes or types of buildings or structures according to use
other than single-family or multifamily residential buildings.
However, in no event shall fruits or vegetables of the tree or vine
stored in buildings or warehouses constitute combustible stock for the
purposes of application of the uniform fire code. A governing body of
a county or city may inspect facilities used for temporary storage and
processing of agricultural commodities.
(4) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to any building
four or more stories high ((with a B occupancy as defined by the
uniform building code, 1982 edition,)) and with a city fire insurance
rating of 1, 2, or 3 as defined by a recognized fire rating bureau or
organization.
(5) No provision of the uniform fire code concerning roadways shall
be part of the state building code: PROVIDED, That this subsection
shall not limit the authority of a county or city to adopt street,
road, or access standards.
(6) The provisions of the state building code may be preempted by
any city or county to the extent that the code provisions relating to
the installation or use of sprinklers in jail cells conflict with the
secure and humane operation of jails.
(7)(a) Effective one year after July 23, 1989, the governing bodies
of counties and cities may adopt an ordinance or resolution to exempt
from permit requirements certain construction or alteration of either
group R, division 3, or group M, division 1 occupancies, or both, as
defined in the uniform building code, 1988 edition, for which the total
cost of fair market value of the construction or alteration does not
exceed fifteen hundred dollars. The permit exemption shall not
otherwise exempt the construction or alteration from the substantive
standards of the codes enumerated in RCW 19.27.031, as amended and
maintained by the state building code council under RCW 19.27.070.
(b) Prior to July 23, 1989, the state building code council shall
adopt by rule, guidelines exempting from permit requirements certain
construction and alteration activities under (a) of this subsection.

Sec. 5 RCW 19.27.074 and 1989 c 266 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state building code council shall:
(a) Adopt and maintain the codes to which reference is made in RCW
19.27.031 in a status which is consistent with the state's interest as
set forth in RCW 19.27.020. In maintaining these codes, the council
shall regularly review updated versions of the codes referred to in RCW
19.27.031 and other pertinent information and shall amend the codes
((as deemed appropriate by the council)) consistent with the provisions
of RCW 19.27.060;
(b) ((Approve or deny all county or city amendments to any code
referred to in RCW 19.27.031 to the degree the amendments apply to
single family or multifamily residential buildings;
(c))) As required by the legislature, develop and adopt any codes
relating to buildings; and
(((d))) (c) Propose a budget for the operation of the state
building code council to be submitted to the office of financial
management pursuant to RCW 43.88.090.
(2) The state building code council may:
(a) Appoint technical advisory committees which may include members
of the council;
(b) Employ permanent and temporary staff and contract for services;
and
(c) Conduct research into matters relating to any code or codes
referred to in RCW 19.27.031 or any related matter.
All meetings of the state building code council shall be open to
the public under the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW. All
actions of the state building code council which adopt or amend any
code of statewide applicability shall be pursuant to the administrative
procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
All council decisions relating to the codes enumerated in RCW
19.27.031 shall require approval by at least a majority of the members
of the council.
All decisions to adopt or amend codes of statewide application
shall be made prior to December 1st of any year and shall not take
effect before the end of the regular legislative session in the next
year.

--- END ---