BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.65.480 and 1991 sp.s. c 7 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A taxidermy license allows the holder to practice taxidermy for
profit. The fee for this license is one hundred eighty dollars.
(2) A fur dealer's license allows the holder to purchase, receive,
or resell raw furs for profit. ((The)) There is no fee for this
license ((is one hundred eighty dollars)).
(3) A fishing guide license allows the holder to offer or perform
the services of a professional guide in the taking of game fish. The
fee for this license is one hundred eighty dollars for a resident and
six hundred dollars for a nonresident.
(4) A game farm license allows the holder to operate a game farm to
acquire, breed, grow, keep, and sell wildlife under conditions
prescribed by the rules adopted pursuant to this title. The fee for
this license is seventy-two dollars for the first year and forty-eight
dollars for each following year.
(5) A game fish stocking permit allows the holder to release game
fish into the waters of the state as prescribed by rule of the
commission. The fee for this permit is twenty-four dollars.
(6) A fishing or field trial permit allows the holder to promote,
conduct, hold, or sponsor a fishing or field trial contest in
accordance with rules of the commission. The fee for a fishing contest
permit is twenty-four dollars. The fee for a field trial contest
permit is twenty-four dollars.
(7) An anadromous game fish buyer's license allows the holder to
purchase or sell steelhead trout and other anadromous game fish
harvested by Indian fishermen lawfully exercising fishing rights
reserved by federal statute, treaty, or executive order, under
conditions prescribed by rule of the director. The fee for this
license is one hundred eighty dollars.

--- END ---