BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that employers are
becoming increasingly discouraged from disclosing job reference
information. The legislature further finds that full disclosure of
such information will increase productivity, enhance the safety of the
workplace, and provide greater opportunities to disadvantaged groups
who may not have the educational background or resumes of other
workers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
An employer who discloses information about a former or current
employee's job performance, conduct, or other work-related information
to a prospective employer, or employment agency as defined by RCW
49.60.040, at the specific request of that individual employer or
employment agency, is presumed to be acting in good faith and is immune
from civil liability for such disclosure or its consequences. For
purposes of this section, the presumption of good faith may only be
rebutted upon a showing by clear and convincing evidence that the
information disclosed by the employer was knowingly false or
deliberately misleading.

--- END ---