BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An agency may not adopt a proposed rule unless the legislature
has had the opportunity to consider the proposed rule during a regular
session or special legislative session as defined in Article II,
section 12 of the state Constitution. For purposes of this section,
the legislature has had the opportunity to consider a proposed rule
after the adjournment of:
(a) For proposed rules published in the state register on or before
the first day of November in a calendar year, the regular session and
any special legislative session in the calendar year after the year in
which the rule was published; or
(b) For proposed rules published in the state register after the
first day of November in a calendar year, the regular session and any
special legislative session in the second calendar year after the year
in which the rule was published.
(2) An agency seeking to adopt a proposed rule shall submit a copy
of the rule, along with the summary and responses required by RCW
34.05.325(6), to the chief clerk of the house of representatives and
the secretary of the senate no later than the fifteenth day of January
after the convening of the regular session in the calendar year
required by subsection (1) of this section.
(3) This section does not apply to:
(a) Emergency rules adopted in accordance with RCW 34.05.350; and
(b) Rules adopted by the department of fish and wildlife
establishing hunting and fishing seasons under RCW 77.12.047 and
77.12.150.
(4) This section applies only to proposed rules that are published
in the state register after the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW
to read as follows:
When delegating authority to an agency through legislation, the
legislature, unless it specifically states otherwise, limits its
delegation of authority to:
(1) The minimum delegation necessary to administer the
legislation's clear and unambiguous directives; and
(2) The administration of circumstances and behaviors foreseeable
at the time of the legislation's enactment.

Sec. 3 RCW 34.05.570 and 1995 c 403 s 802 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Generally. Except to the extent that this chapter or another
statute provides otherwise:
(a) The burden of demonstrating the invalidity of agency action is
on the party asserting invalidity except that the agency bears the
burden of demonstrating that an agency action was authorized by law;
(b) The validity of agency action shall be determined in accordance
with the standards of review provided in this section, as applied to
the agency action at the time it was taken;
(c) The court shall make a separate and distinct ruling on each
material issue on which the court's decision is based; and
(d) The court shall grant relief only if it determines that a
person seeking judicial relief has been substantially prejudiced by the
action complained of.
(2) Review of rules. (a) A rule may be reviewed by petition for
declaratory judgment filed pursuant to this subsection or in the
context of any other review proceeding under this section. In an
action challenging the validity of a rule, the agency shall be made a
party to the proceeding.
(b) The validity of any rule may be determined upon petition for a
declaratory judgment addressed to the superior court of ((Thurston))
any county, when it appears that the rule, or its threatened
application, interferes with or impairs or immediately threatens to
interfere with or impair the legal rights or privileges of the
petitioner. The declaratory judgment order may be entered whether or
not the petitioner has first requested the agency to pass upon the
validity of the rule in question.
(c) In a proceeding involving review of a rule, the court shall
declare the rule invalid only if it finds that: The rule violates
constitutional provisions; the rule exceeds the statutory authority of
the agency; the rule was adopted without compliance with statutory
rule-making procedures; or the rule is arbitrary and capricious. For
purposes of this subsection, in determining whether a rule exceeds the
agency's statutory authority, the court must also consider whether the
rule exceeds the limited delegation under section 2 of this act.
(3) Review of agency orders in adjudicative proceedings. The court
shall grant relief from an agency order in an adjudicative proceeding
only if it determines that:
(a) The order, or the statute or rule on which the order is based,
is in violation of constitutional provisions on its face or as applied;
(b) The order is outside the statutory authority or jurisdiction of
the agency conferred by any provision of law;
(c) The agency has engaged in unlawful procedure or decision-making
process, or has failed to follow a prescribed procedure;
(d) The agency has erroneously interpreted or applied the law;
(e) The order is not supported by evidence that is substantial when
viewed in light of the whole record before the court, which includes
the agency record for judicial review, supplemented by any additional
evidence received by the court under this chapter;
(f) The agency has not decided all issues requiring resolution by
the agency;
(g) A motion for disqualification under RCW 34.05.425 or 34.12.050
was made and was improperly denied or, if no motion was made, facts are
shown to support the grant of such a motion that were not known and
were not reasonably discoverable by the challenging party at the
appropriate time for making such a motion;
(h) The order is inconsistent with a rule of the agency unless the
agency explains the inconsistency by stating facts and reasons to
demonstrate a rational basis for inconsistency; or
(i) The order is arbitrary or capricious.
(4) Review of other agency action.
(a) All agency action not reviewable under subsection (2) or (3) of
this section shall be reviewed under this subsection.
(b) A person whose rights are violated by an agency's failure to
perform a duty that is required by law to be performed may file a
petition for review pursuant to RCW 34.05.514, seeking an order
pursuant to this subsection requiring performance. Within twenty days
after service of the petition for review, the agency shall file and
serve an answer to the petition, made in the same manner as an answer
to a complaint in a civil action. The court may hear evidence,
pursuant to RCW 34.05.562, on material issues of fact raised by the
petition and answer.
(c) Relief for persons aggrieved by the performance of an agency
action, including the exercise of discretion, or an action under (b) of
this subsection can be granted only if the court determines that the
action is:
(i) Unconstitutional;
(ii) Outside the statutory authority of the agency or the authority
conferred by a provision of law;
(iii) Arbitrary or capricious; or
(iv) Taken by persons who were not properly constituted as agency
officials lawfully entitled to take such action.

--- END ---