BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.92.010 and 1986 c 126 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person or corporation having any claim against the state of
Washington shall have a right of action against the state in the
superior court.
The venue for such actions shall be as follows:
(1) The county of the residence or principal place of business of
one or more of the plaintiffs;
(2) The county where the cause of action arose;
(3) The county in which the real property that is the subject of
the action is situated; or
(4) The county where the action may be properly commenced by reason
of the joinder of an additional defendant((; or
(5) Thurston county)).
Actions shall be subject to change of venue in accordance with
statute, rules of court, and the common law as the same now exist or
may hereafter be amended, adopted, or altered.
Actions shall be tried in the county in which they have been
commenced in the absence of a seasonable motion by or in behalf of the
state to change the venue of the action.

--- END ---