BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW
to read as follows:
No agency may adopt a rule that exceeds a federal standard without
specific legislative authority. The legislature may grant such
authority pursuant to a request by an agency. A requesting agency
shall present to the appropriate standing committees of the house of
representatives and the senate:
(1) A written justification detailing the unique reasons why
Washington state policy must exceed federal policy; and
(2) A cost-benefit analysis that clearly outlines the economic
impacts for Washington's business or other regulated entities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW
to read as follows:
By July 1, 2004, each state agency must review existing rules that
exceed federal standards and prepare a report for the office of
financial management and the joint administrative rules review
committee that outlines the grant of authority used to exceed those
standards. If the agency has relied on a general grant of authority in
adopting the rules, the agency shall either repeal the rules or seek
specific authority from the legislature as allowed under section 1 of
this act. If specific authority is not obtained by July 1, 2006, the
agency shall repeal the rule.

--- END ---