BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
replace a public utility tax system that automatically increases in a
percentage equal to an increase in price with a system that the
taxpayer controls through consumption.
It is the further intent of the legislature to replace a public
utility tax system that gives a competitive advantage to electricity
providers outside the state of Washington with one that creates a more
equitable tax base that is competitively fair.
It is the further intent of the legislature to replace a utility
tax system that gives a competitive advantage to some electricity
providers inside the state of Washington with one that creates a more
equitable tax system that is competitively fair.

--- END ---