BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.34.042 and 1998 c 296 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A minor ((thirteen)) sixteen years or older may admit himself
or herself to an evaluation and treatment facility for inpatient mental
treatment, without parental consent. The admission shall occur only if
the professional person in charge of the facility concurs with the need
for inpatient treatment.
(2) When, in the judgment of the professional person in charge of
an evaluation and treatment facility, there is reason to believe that
a minor is in need of inpatient treatment because of a mental disorder,
and the facility provides the type of evaluation and treatment needed
by the minor, and it is not feasible to treat the minor in any less
restrictive setting or the minor's home, the minor may be admitted to
an evaluation and treatment facility.
(3) Written renewal of voluntary consent must be obtained from the
applicant no less than once every twelve months. The minor's need for
continued inpatient treatments shall be reviewed and documented no less
than every one hundred eighty days.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.34.046 and 1998 c 296 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any minor ((thirteen)) sixteen years or older voluntarily
admitted to an evaluation and treatment facility under RCW 71.34.042
may give notice of intent to leave at any time. The notice need not
follow any specific form so long as it is written and the intent of the
minor can be discerned.
(2) The staff member receiving the notice shall date it
immediately, record its existence in the minor's clinical record, and
send copies of it to the minor's attorney, if any, the county-designated mental health professional, and the parent.
(3) The professional person shall discharge the minor, ((thirteen))
sixteen years or older, from the facility upon receipt of the minor's
notice of intent to leave.

Sec. 3 RCW 71.34.052 and 1998 c 296 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A parent may bring, or authorize the bringing of, his or her
minor child, age sixteen or older, to an evaluation and treatment
facility and request that the professional person examine the minor to
determine whether the minor has a mental disorder and is in need of
inpatient treatment.
(2) The consent of the minor is not required for admission,
evaluation, and treatment if the parent brings the minor to the
facility.
(3) An appropriately trained professional person may evaluate
whether the minor has a mental disorder. The evaluation shall be
completed within twenty-four hours of the time the minor was brought to
the facility, unless the professional person determines that the
condition of the minor necessitates additional time for evaluation. In
no event shall a minor be held longer than seventy-two hours for
evaluation. If, in the judgment of the professional person, it is
determined it is a medical necessity for the minor to receive inpatient
treatment, the minor may be held for treatment. The facility shall
limit treatment to that which the professional person determines is
medically necessary to stabilize the minor's condition until the
evaluation has been completed. Within twenty-four hours of completion
of the evaluation, the professional person shall notify the department
if the child is held for treatment and of the date of admission.
(4) No provider is obligated to provide treatment to a minor under
the provisions of this section. No provider may admit a minor to
treatment under this section unless it is medically necessary.
(5) No minor receiving inpatient treatment under this section may
be discharged from the facility based solely on his or her request.
(6) Prior to the review conducted under RCW 71.34.025, the
professional person shall notify the minor of his or her right to
petition superior court for release from the facility.
(7) For the purposes of this section "professional person" does not
include a social worker, unless the social worker is ((certified under
RCW 18.19.110 and appropriately trained and qualified by education and
experience, as defined by the department, in psychiatric social work))
a licensed independent clinical social worker who is licensed under RCW
18.225.090.

Sec. 4 RCW 71.34.270 and 1985 c 354 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
No public or private agency or governmental entity, nor officer of
a public or private agency, nor the superintendent, or professional
person in charge, his or her professional designee or attending staff
of any such agency, nor any public official performing functions
necessary to the administration of this chapter, nor peace officer
responsible for detaining a person under this chapter, nor any county
designated mental health professional, nor professional person, nor
evaluation and treatment facility, shall be civilly or criminally
liable for performing his or her duties under this chapter with regard
to the decision of whether to admit, release, or detain a person for
evaluation and treatment: PROVIDED, That such duties were performed in
good faith and without gross negligence.

--- END ---