BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.36.010 and 1998 c 179 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All property belonging exclusively to the United States, the
state, or any county or municipal corporation((,)); all property
belonging exclusively to any federally recognized Indian tribe located
in the state, if that property is used exclusively for essential
government services; all state route number 16 corridor transportation
systems and facilities constructed under chapter 47.46 RCW((,)); and
all property under a financing contract pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
or recorded agreement granting immediate possession and use to ((said))
the public bodies listed in this section or under an order of immediate
possession and use pursuant to RCW 8.04.090((, shall be)); is exempt
from taxation. All property belonging exclusively to a foreign
national government ((shall be)) is exempt from taxation if ((such))
that property is used exclusively as an office or residence for a
consul or other official representative of ((such)) the foreign
national government, and if the consul or other official representative
is a citizen of ((such)) that foreign nation.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "essential government
services" means services such as tribal administration, public
facilities, fire, police, public health, education, sewer, water,
environmental and land use, transportation, and utility services.

--- END ---