BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW
to read as follows:
As of January 1, 2003, the department shall not adopt, or cause to
be adopted, any new rules affecting boarding homes until and unless the
legislature has appropriated adequate funding to cover the medicaid
portion of the rule implementation costs. To this extent, this section
applies retroactively.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---