BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.46.020 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Accrual method of accounting" means a method of accounting in
which revenues are reported in the period when they are earned,
regardless of when they are collected, and expenses are reported in the
period in which they are incurred, regardless of when they are paid.
(2) "Anticipated resident day level" means the average number of
patient days expected as a result of increasing or decreasing the
licensed bed capacity of a facility. If the licensed bed capacity of
a facility increases or decreases, then the anticipated resident day
level shall be not less than eighty-five percent of the new licensed
bed capacity or the actual average census from the prior six months,
whichever is greater; but in no case shall the anticipated resident day
level exceed ninety-five percent of the new licensed bed capacity.
(3) "Appraisal" means the process of estimating the fair market
value or reconstructing the historical cost of an asset acquired in a
past period as performed by a professionally designated real estate
appraiser with no pecuniary interest in the property to be appraised.
It includes a systematic, analytic determination and the recording and
analyzing of property facts, rights, investments, and values based on
a personal inspection and inventory of the property.
(((3))) (4) "Arm's-length transaction" means a transaction
resulting from good-faith bargaining between a buyer and seller who are
not related organizations and have adverse positions in the market
place. Sales or exchanges of nursing home facilities among two or more
parties in which all parties subsequently continue to own one or more
of the facilities involved in the transactions shall not be considered
as arm's-length transactions for purposes of this chapter. Sale of a
nursing home facility which is subsequently leased back to the seller
within five years of the date of sale shall not be considered as an
arm's-length transaction for purposes of this chapter.
(((4))) (5) "Assets" means economic resources of the contractor,
recognized and measured in conformity with generally accepted
accounting principles.
(((5))) (6) "Audit" or "department audit" means an examination of
the records of a nursing facility participating in the medicaid payment
system, including but not limited to: The contractor's financial and
statistical records, cost reports and all supporting documentation and
schedules, receivables, and resident trust funds, to be performed as
deemed necessary by the department and according to department rule.
(((6))) (7) "Bad debts" means amounts considered to be
uncollectible from accounts and notes receivable.
(((7))) (8) "Beneficial owner" means:
(a) Any person who, directly or indirectly, through any contract,
arrangement, understanding, relationship, or otherwise has or shares:
(i) Voting power which includes the power to vote, or to direct the
voting of such ownership interest; and/or
(ii) Investment power which includes the power to dispose, or to
direct the disposition of such ownership interest;
(b) Any person who, directly or indirectly, creates or uses a
trust, proxy, power of attorney, pooling arrangement, or any other
contract, arrangement, or device with the purpose or effect of
divesting himself or herself of beneficial ownership of an ownership
interest or preventing the vesting of such beneficial ownership as part
of a plan or scheme to evade the reporting requirements of this
chapter;
(c) Any person who, subject to (b) of this subsection, has the
right to acquire beneficial ownership of such ownership interest within
sixty days, including but not limited to any right to acquire:
(i) Through the exercise of any option, warrant, or right;
(ii) Through the conversion of an ownership interest;
(iii) Pursuant to the power to revoke a trust, discretionary
account, or similar arrangement; or
(iv) Pursuant to the automatic termination of a trust,
discretionary account, or similar arrangement;
except that, any person who acquires an ownership interest or power
specified in (c)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this subsection with the purpose
or effect of changing or influencing the control of the contractor, or
in connection with or as a participant in any transaction having such
purpose or effect, immediately upon such acquisition shall be deemed to
be the beneficial owner of the ownership interest which may be acquired
through the exercise or conversion of such ownership interest or power;
(d) Any person who in the ordinary course of business is a pledgee
of ownership interest under a written pledge agreement shall not be
deemed to be the beneficial owner of such pledged ownership interest
until the pledgee has taken all formal steps necessary which are
required to declare a default and determines that the power to vote or
to direct the vote or to dispose or to direct the disposition of such
pledged ownership interest will be exercised; except that:
(i) The pledgee agreement is bona fide and was not entered into
with the purpose nor with the effect of changing or influencing the
control of the contractor, nor in connection with any transaction
having such purpose or effect, including persons meeting the conditions
set forth in (b) of this subsection; and
(ii) The pledgee agreement, prior to default, does not grant to the
pledgee:
(A) The power to vote or to direct the vote of the pledged
ownership interest; or
(B) The power to dispose or direct the disposition of the pledged
ownership interest, other than the grant of such power(s) pursuant to
a pledge agreement under which credit is extended and in which the
pledgee is a broker or dealer.
(((8))) (9) "Capitalization" means the recording of an expenditure
as an asset.
(((9))) (10) "Case mix" means a measure of the intensity of care
and services needed by the residents of a nursing facility or a group
of residents in the facility.
(((10))) (11) "Case mix index" means a number representing the
average case mix of a nursing facility.
(((11))) (12) "Case mix weight" means a numeric score that
identifies the relative resources used by a particular group of a
nursing facility's residents.
(((12))) (13) "Certificate of capital authorization" means a
certification from the department for an allocation from the biennial
capital financing authorization for all new or replacement building
construction, or for major renovation projects, receiving a certificate
of need or a certificate of need exemption under chapter 70.38 RCW
after July 1, 2001.
(((13))) (14) "Contractor" means a person or entity licensed under
chapter 18.51 RCW to operate a medicare and medicaid certified nursing
facility, responsible for operational decisions, and contracting with
the department to provide services to medicaid recipients residing in
the facility.
(((14))) (15) "Default case" means no initial assessment has been
completed for a resident and transmitted to the department by the
cut-off date, or an assessment is otherwise past due for the resident,
under state and federal requirements.
(((15))) (16) "Department" means the department of social and
health services (DSHS) and its employees.
(((16))) (17) "Depreciation" means the systematic distribution of
the cost or other basis of tangible assets, less salvage, over the
estimated useful life of the assets.
(((17))) (18) "Direct care" means nursing care and related care
provided to nursing facility residents. Therapy care shall not be
considered part of direct care.
(((18))) (19) "Direct care supplies" means medical, pharmaceutical,
and other supplies required for the direct care of a nursing facility's
residents.
(((19))) (20) "Entity" means an individual, partnership,
corporation, limited liability company, or any other association of
individuals capable of entering enforceable contracts.
(((20))) (21) "Equity" means the net book value of all tangible and
intangible assets less the recorded value of all liabilities, as
recognized and measured in conformity with generally accepted
accounting principles.
(((21) "Essential community provider" means a facility which is the
only nursing facility within a commuting distance radius of at least
forty minutes duration, traveling by automobile.))
(22) "Facility" or "nursing facility" means a nursing home licensed
in accordance with chapter 18.51 RCW, excepting nursing homes certified
as institutions for mental diseases, or that portion of a multiservice
facility licensed as a nursing home, or that portion of a hospital
licensed in accordance with chapter 70.41 RCW which operates as a
nursing home.
(23) "Fair market value" means the replacement cost of an asset
less observed physical depreciation on the date for which the market
value is being determined.
(24) "Financial statements" means statements prepared and presented
in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles including,
but not limited to, balance sheet, statement of operations, statement
of changes in financial position, and related notes.
(25) "Generally accepted accounting principles" means accounting
principles approved by the financial accounting standards board (FASB).
(26) "Goodwill" means the excess of the price paid for a nursing
facility business over the fair market value of all net identifiable
tangible and intangible assets acquired, as measured in accordance with
generally accepted accounting principles.
(27) "Grouper" means a computer software product that groups
individual nursing facility residents into case mix classification
groups based on specific resident assessment data and computer logic.
(28) "High labor-cost county" means an urban county in which the
median allowable facility cost per case mix unit is more than ten
percent higher than the median allowable facility cost per case mix
unit among all other urban counties, excluding that county.
(29) "Historical cost" means the actual cost incurred in acquiring
and preparing an asset for use, including feasibility studies,
architect's fees, and engineering studies.
(30) "Home and central office costs" means costs that are incurred
in the support and operation of a home and central office. Home and
central office costs include centralized services that are performed in
support of a nursing facility. The department may exclude from this
definition costs that are nonduplicative, documented, ordinary,
necessary, and related to the provision of care services to authorized
patients.
(31) "Imprest fund" means a fund which is regularly replenished in
exactly the amount expended from it.
(32) "Joint facility costs" means any costs which represent
resources which benefit more than one facility, or one facility and any
other entity.
(33) "Lease agreement" means a contract between two parties for the
possession and use of real or personal property or assets for a
specified period of time in exchange for specified periodic payments.
Elimination (due to any cause other than death or divorce) or addition
of any party to the contract, expiration, or modification of any lease
term in effect on January 1, 1980, or termination of the lease by
either party by any means shall constitute a termination of the lease
agreement. An extension or renewal of a lease agreement, whether or
not pursuant to a renewal provision in the lease agreement, shall be
considered a new lease agreement. A strictly formal change in the
lease agreement which modifies the method, frequency, or manner in
which the lease payments are made, but does not increase the total
lease payment obligation of the lessee, shall not be considered
modification of a lease term.
(34) "Medical care program" or "medicaid program" means medical
assistance, including nursing care, provided under RCW 74.09.500 or
authorized state medical care services.
(35) "Medical care recipient," "medicaid recipient," or "recipient"
means an individual determined eligible by the department for the
services provided under chapter 74.09 RCW.
(36) "Minimum data set" means the overall data component of the
resident assessment instrument, indicating the strengths, needs, and
preferences of an individual nursing facility resident.
(37) "Net book value" means the historical cost of an asset less
accumulated depreciation.
(38) "Net invested funds" means the net book value of tangible
fixed assets employed by a contractor to provide services under the
medical care program, including land, buildings, and equipment as
recognized and measured in conformity with generally accepted
accounting principles. "Net invested funds" includes an allowance for
working capital that is five percent of the product of the per patient
day rate multiplied by the prior calendar year reported patient days of
each contractor.
(39) "Nonurban county" means a county which is not located in a
metropolitan statistical area as determined and defined by the United
States office of management and budget or other appropriate agency or
office of the federal government.
(40) "Operating lease" means a lease under which rental or lease
expenses are included in current expenses in accordance with generally
accepted accounting principles.
(41) "Owner" means a sole proprietor, general or limited partners,
members of a limited liability company, and beneficial interest holders
of five percent or more of a corporation's outstanding stock.
(42) "Ownership interest" means all interests beneficially owned by
a person, calculated in the aggregate, regardless of the form which
such beneficial ownership takes.
(43) "Patient day" or "resident day" means a calendar day of care
provided to a nursing facility resident, regardless of payment source,
which will include the day of admission and exclude the day of
discharge; except that, when admission and discharge occur on the same
day, one day of care shall be deemed to exist. A "medicaid day" or
"recipient day" means a calendar day of care provided to a medicaid
recipient determined eligible by the department for services provided
under chapter 74.09 RCW, subject to the same conditions regarding
admission and discharge applicable to a patient day or resident day of
care.
(44) "Professionally designated real estate appraiser" means an
individual who is regularly engaged in the business of providing real
estate valuation services for a fee, and who is deemed qualified by a
nationally recognized real estate appraisal educational organization on
the basis of extensive practical appraisal experience, including the
writing of real estate valuation reports as well as the passing of
written examinations on valuation practice and theory, and who by
virtue of membership in such organization is required to subscribe and
adhere to certain standards of professional practice as such
organization prescribes.
(45) "Qualified therapist" means:
(a) A mental health professional as defined by chapter 71.05 RCW;
(b) A mental retardation professional who is a therapist approved
by the department who has had specialized training or one year's
experience in treating or working with the mentally retarded or
developmentally disabled;
(c) A speech pathologist who is eligible for a certificate of
clinical competence in speech pathology or who has the equivalent
education and clinical experience;
(d) A physical therapist as defined by chapter 18.74 RCW;
(e) An occupational therapist who is a graduate of a program in
occupational therapy, or who has the equivalent of such education or
training; and
(f) A respiratory care practitioner certified under chapter 18.89
RCW.
(46) "Rate" or "rate allocation" means the medicaid per-patient-day
payment amount for medicaid patients calculated in accordance with the
allocation methodology set forth in part E of this chapter.
(47) "Real property," whether leased or owned by the contractor,
means the building, allowable land, land improvements, and building
improvements associated with a nursing facility.
(48) "Rebased rate" or "cost-rebased rate" means a facility-specific component rate assigned to a nursing facility for a particular
rate period established on desk-reviewed, adjusted costs reported for
that facility covering at least six months of a prior calendar year
designated as a year to be used for cost-rebasing payment rate
allocations under the provisions of this chapter.
(49) "Records" means those data supporting all financial statements
and cost reports including, but not limited to, all general and
subsidiary ledgers, books of original entry, and transaction
documentation, however such data are maintained.
(50) "Related organization" means an entity which is under common
ownership and/or control with, or has control of, or is controlled by,
the contractor.
(a) "Common ownership" exists when an entity is the beneficial
owner of five percent or more ownership interest in the contractor and
any other entity.
(b) "Control" exists where an entity has the power, directly or
indirectly, significantly to influence or direct the actions or
policies of an organization or institution, whether or not it is
legally enforceable and however it is exercisable or exercised.
(51) "Related care" means only those services that are directly
related to providing direct care to nursing facility residents. These
services include, but are not limited to, nursing direction and
supervision, medical direction, medical records, pharmacy services,
activities, and social services.
(52) "Resident assessment instrument," including federally approved
modifications for use in this state, means a federally mandated,
comprehensive nursing facility resident care planning and assessment
tool, consisting of the minimum data set and resident assessment
protocols.
(53) "Resident assessment protocols" means those components of the
resident assessment instrument that use the minimum data set to trigger
or flag a resident's potential problems and risk areas.
(54) "Resource utilization groups" means a case mix classification
system that identifies relative resources needed to care for an
individual nursing facility resident.
(55) "Restricted fund" means those funds the principal and/or
income of which is limited by agreement with or direction of the donor
to a specific purpose.
(56) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social
and health services.
(57) "Support services" means food, food preparation, dietary,
housekeeping, and laundry services provided to nursing facility
residents.
(58) "Therapy care" means those services required by a nursing
facility resident's comprehensive assessment and plan of care, that are
provided by qualified therapists, or support personnel under their
supervision, including related costs as designated by the department.
(59) "Title XIX" or "medicaid" means the 1965 amendments to the
social security act, P.L. 89-07, as amended and the medicaid program
administered by the department.
(60) "Urban county" means a county which is located in a
metropolitan statistical area as determined and defined by the United
States office of management and budget or other appropriate agency or
office of the federal government.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.46.410 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Costs will be unallowable if they are not documented,
necessary, ordinary, and related to the provision of care services to
authorized patients.
(2) Unallowable costs include, but are not limited to, the
following:
(a) Costs of items or services not covered by the medical care
program. Costs of such items or services will be unallowable even if
they are indirectly reimbursed by the department as the result of an
authorized reduction in patient contribution;
(b) Costs of services and items provided to recipients which are
covered by the department's medical care program but not included in
the medicaid per-resident day payment rate established by the
department under this chapter;
(c) Costs associated with a capital expenditure subject to section
1122 approval (part 100, Title 42 C.F.R.) if the department found it
was not consistent with applicable standards, criteria, or plans. If
the department was not given timely notice of a proposed capital
expenditure, all associated costs will be unallowable up to the date
they are determined to be reimbursable under applicable federal
regulations;
(d) Costs associated with a construction or acquisition project
requiring certificate of need approval, or exemption from the
requirements for certificate of need for the replacement of existing
nursing home beds, pursuant to chapter 70.38 RCW if such approval or
exemption was not obtained;
(e) Interest costs other than those provided by RCW 74.46.290 on
and after January 1, 1985;
(f) Salaries or other compensation of owners, officers, directors,
stockholders, partners, principals, participants, and others associated
with the contractor or its home office, including all board of
directors' fees for any purpose, except reasonable compensation paid
for service related to patient care;
(g) Costs in excess of limits or in violation of principles set
forth in this chapter;
(h) Costs resulting from transactions or the application of
accounting methods which circumvent the principles of the payment
system set forth in this chapter;
(i) Costs applicable to services, facilities, and supplies
furnished by a related organization in excess of the lower of the cost
to the related organization or the price of comparable services,
facilities, or supplies purchased elsewhere;
(j) Bad debts of non-Title XIX recipients. Bad debts of Title XIX
recipients are allowable if the debt is related to covered services, it
arises from the recipient's required contribution toward the cost of
care, the provider can establish that reasonable collection efforts
were made, the debt was actually uncollectible when claimed as
worthless, and sound business judgment established that there was no
likelihood of recovery at any time in the future;
(k) Charity and courtesy allowances;
(l) Cash, assessments, or other contributions, excluding dues, to
charitable organizations, professional organizations, trade
associations, or political parties, and costs incurred to improve
community or public relations;
(m) Vending machine expenses;
(n) Expenses for barber or beautician services not included in
routine care;
(o) Funeral and burial expenses;
(p) Costs of gift shop operations and inventory;
(q) Personal items such as cosmetics, smoking materials, newspapers
and magazines, and clothing, except those used in patient activity
programs;
(r) Fund-raising expenses, except those directly related to the
patient activity program;
(s) Penalties and fines;
(t) Expenses related to telephones, radios, and similar appliances
in patients' private accommodations;
(u) Televisions acquired prior to July 1, 2001;
(v) Federal, state, and other income taxes;
(w) Costs of special care services except where authorized by the
department;
(x) Expenses of an employee benefit not in fact made available to
all employees on an equal or fair basis, for example, key-man insurance
and other insurance or retirement plans;
(y) Expenses of profit-sharing plans;
(z) Expenses related to the purchase and/or use of private or
commercial airplanes which are in excess of what a prudent contractor
would expend for the ordinary and economic provision of such a
transportation need related to patient care;
(aa) Personal expenses and allowances of owners or relatives;
(bb) All expenses of maintaining professional licenses or
membership in professional organizations;
(cc) Costs related to agreements not to compete;
(dd) Amortization of goodwill, lease acquisition, or any other
intangible asset, whether related to resident care or not, and whether
recognized under generally accepted accounting principles or not;
(ee) Expenses related to vehicles which are in excess of what a
prudent contractor would expend for the ordinary and economic provision
of transportation needs related to patient care;
(ff) Legal and consultant fees in connection with a fair hearing
against the department where a decision is rendered in favor of the
department or where otherwise the determination of the department
stands;
(gg) Legal and consultant fees of a contractor or contractors in
connection with a lawsuit against the department where a decision is
rendered in favor of the department or where otherwise the
determination of the department stands;
(hh) Lease acquisition costs, goodwill, the cost of bed rights, or
any other intangible assets;
(ii) ((All rental or lease costs other than those provided in RCW
74.46.300 on and after January 1, 1985;
(jj))) Postsurvey charges incurred by the facility as a result of
subsequent inspections under RCW 18.51.050 which occur beyond the first
postsurvey visit during the certification survey calendar year;
(((kk) Compensation paid for any purchased nursing care services,
including registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, and nurse
assistant services, obtained through service contract arrangement in
excess of the amount of compensation paid for such hours of nursing
care service had they been paid at the average hourly wage, including
related taxes and benefits, for in-house nursing care staff of like
classification at the same nursing facility, as reported in the most
recent cost report period;
(ll))) (jj) For all partial or whole rate periods after July 17,
1984, costs of land and depreciable assets that cannot be reimbursed
under the Deficit Reduction Act of 1984 and implementing state
statutory and regulatory provisions;
(((mm))) (kk) Costs reported by the contractor for a prior period
to the extent such costs, due to statutory exemption, will not be
incurred by the contractor in the period to be covered by the rate;
(((nn))) (ll) Costs of outside activities, for example, costs
allocated to the use of a vehicle for personal purposes or related to
the part of a facility leased out for office space;
(((oo))) (mm) Travel expenses outside the states of Idaho, Oregon,
and Washington and the province of British Columbia. However, travel
to or from the home or central office of a chain organization operating
a nursing facility is allowed whether inside or outside these areas if
the travel is necessary, ordinary, and related to resident care;
(((pp))) (nn) Moving expenses of employees in the absence of
demonstrated, good-faith effort to recruit within the states of Idaho,
Oregon, and Washington, and the province of British Columbia;
(((qq))) (oo) Depreciation in excess of four thousand dollars per
year for each passenger car or other vehicle primarily used by the
administrator, facility staff, or central office staff;
(((rr))) (pp) Costs for temporary health care personnel from a
nursing pool not registered with the secretary of the department of
health;
(((ss))) (qq) Payroll taxes associated with compensation in excess
of allowable compensation of owners, relatives, and administrative
personnel;
(((tt))) (rr) Costs and fees associated with filing a petition for
bankruptcy;
(((uu))) (ss) All advertising or promotional costs, except
reasonable costs of help wanted advertising;
(((vv))) (tt) Outside consultation expenses required to meet
department-required minimum data set completion proficiency;
(((ww))) (uu) Interest charges assessed by any department or agency
of this state for failure to make a timely refund of overpayments and
interest expenses incurred for loans obtained to make the refunds;
(((xx) All home office or central office costs, whether on or off
the nursing facility premises, and whether allocated or not to specific
services, in excess of the median of those adjusted costs for all
facilities reporting such costs for the most recent report period;))
and
(((yy))) (vv) Tax expenses that a nursing facility has never
incurred.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.46.431 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 5 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) ((Effective July 1, 1999)) Beginning on the effective date of
this act, nursing facility medicaid payment rate allocations shall be
facility-specific and shall have ((seven)) eight components: Direct
care, therapy care, support services, operations, property, financing
allowance, tax and insurance, and variable return. The department
shall establish and adjust each of these components, as provided in
this section and elsewhere in this chapter, for each medicaid nursing
facility in this state.
(2) All component rate allocations ((for essential community
providers as defined in this chapter)), except tax and insurance, and
direct care, shall be based upon a minimum facility occupancy of
eighty-five percent of licensed beds, regardless of how many beds are
set up or in use. ((For all facilities other than essential community
providers, effective July 1, 2001, component rate allocations in direct
care, therapy care, support services, variable return, operations,
property, and financing allowance shall continue to be based upon a
minimum facility occupancy of eighty-five percent of licensed beds.
For all facilities other than essential community providers, effective
July 1, 2002, the component rate allocations in operations, property,
and financing allowance shall be based upon a minimum facility
occupancy of ninety percent of licensed beds, regardless of how many
beds are set up or in use.))
(3) Information and data sources used in determining medicaid
payment rate allocations, including formulas, procedures, cost report
periods, resident assessment instrument formats, resident assessment
methodologies, and resident classification and case mix weighting
methodologies, may be substituted or altered from time to time as
determined by the department.
(4)(a) Direct care component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted
cost report data from 1996 will be used for October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 2001, direct care component rate allocations; adjusted cost
report data from 1999 will be used for July 1, 2001, ((through June 30,
2004)) until the effective date of this act, direct care component rate
allocations. Beginning on the effective date of this act, direct care
component rate allocations shall be rebased annually using adjusted
cost report data from the immediately preceding calendar year.
(b) Direct care component rate allocations based on 1996 cost
report data shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial
appropriations act for facilities whose direct care component rate is
set equal to their adjusted June 30, 1998, rate, as provided in RCW
74.46.506(5)(i).
(c) Direct care component rate allocations based on 1999 cost
report data shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial
appropriations act for facilities whose direct care component rate is
set equal to their adjusted June 30, 1998, rate, as provided in RCW
74.46.506(5)(i).
(5)(a) Therapy care component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted
cost report data from 1996 will be used for October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 2001, therapy care component rate allocations; adjusted cost
report data from 1999 will be used for July 1, 2001, ((through June 30,
2004)) until the effective date of this act, therapy care component
rate allocations. Beginning on the effective date of this act, therapy
care component rate allocations shall be rebased annually using
adjusted cost report data from the immediately preceding calendar year.
(b) Therapy care component rate allocations shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors
defined in the biennial appropriations act.
(6)(a) Support services component rate allocations shall be
established using adjusted cost report data covering at least six
months. Adjusted cost report data from 1996 shall be used for October
1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, support services component rate
allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999 shall be used for July
1, 2001, ((through June 30, 2004)) until the effective date of this
act, support services component rate allocations. Beginning on the
effective date of this act, support services component rate allocations
shall be rebased annually using adjusted cost report data from the
immediately preceding calendar year.
(b) Support services component rate allocations shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors
defined in the biennial appropriations act.
(7)(a) Operations component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted
cost report data from 1996 shall be used for October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 2001, operations component rate allocations; adjusted cost
report data from 1999 shall be used for July 1, 2001, ((through June
30, 2004)) until the effective date of this act, operations component
rate allocations. Beginning on the effective date of this act,
operations component rate allocations shall be rebased annually using
adjusted cost report data from the immediately preceding calendar year.
(b) Operations component rate allocations shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors
defined in the biennial appropriations act.
(8) For July 1, 1998, through September 30, 1998, a facility's
property and return on investment component rates shall be the
facility's June 30, 1998, property and return on investment component
rates, without increase. For October 1, 1998, through June 30, 1999,
a facility's property and return on investment component rates shall be
rebased utilizing 1997 adjusted cost report data covering at least six
months of data.
(9) Total payment rates under the nursing facility medicaid payment
system shall not exceed facility rates charged to the general public
for comparable services.
(10) Medicaid contractors shall pay to all facility staff a minimum
wage of the greater of the state minimum wage or the federal minimum
wage.
(11) The department shall establish in rule procedures, principles,
and conditions for determining component rate allocations for
facilities in circumstances not directly addressed by this chapter,
including but not limited to: The need to prorate inflation for
partial-period cost report data, newly constructed facilities, existing
facilities entering the medicaid program for the first time or after a
period of absence from the program, existing facilities with expanded
new bed capacity, existing medicaid facilities following a change of
ownership of the nursing facility business, facilities banking beds or
converting beds back into service, facilities temporarily reducing the
number of set-up beds during a remodel, facilities having less than six
months of either resident assessment, cost report data, or both, under
the current contractor prior to rate setting, and other circumstances.
(12) The department shall establish in rule procedures, principles,
and conditions, including necessary threshold costs, for adjusting
rates to reflect capital improvements or new requirements imposed by
the department or the federal government. ((Any such rate adjustments
are subject to the provisions of RCW 74.46.421.
(13) Effective July 1, 2001, medicaid rates shall continue to be
revised downward in all components, in accordance with department
rules, for facilities converting banked beds to active service under
chapter 70.38 RCW, by using the facility's increased licensed bed
capacity to recalculate minimum occupancy for rate setting. However,
for facilities other than essential community providers which bank beds
under chapter 70.38 RCW, after May 25, 2001, medicaid rates shall be
revised upward, in accordance with department rules, in direct care,
therapy care, support services, and variable return components only, by
using the facility's decreased licensed bed capacity to recalculate
minimum occupancy for rate setting, but no upward revision shall be
made to operations, property, or financing allowance component rates.
(14))) (13) Facilities obtaining a certificate of need or a
certificate of need exemption under chapter 70.38 RCW after June 30,
2001, must have a certificate of capital authorization in order for (a)
the depreciation resulting from the capitalized addition to be included
in calculation of the facility's property component rate allocation;
and (b) the net invested funds associated with the capitalized addition
to be included in calculation of the facility's financing allowance
rate allocation.
(14) If a contractor elects to bank licensed beds or elects to
convert banked beds to active service under chapter 70.38 RCW, the
department shall use the facility's new licensed bed capacity to
recalculate minimum occupancy for rate setting and revise all rate
components, excluding the tax and insurance rate components, effective
as of the date the beds are banked or converted to active service.
When the contractor converts beds to active licensed status, the
department shall use the facility's average resident occupancy level
for the second quarter immediately preceding the increase in licensed
bed capacity. However, in no case shall the department use less than
eighty-five percent occupancy of the facility's licensed bed capacity
after banking or conversion for setting the therapy care, support
services, property, financial allowance, and operations rate component
allocations.
(15) If at any time during the rate year, between July 1st and June
30th, a contractor returns banked beds to active licensed status, the
contractor shall receive four rate component allocation adjustments at
three-month intervals consistent with the direct care quarterly rate
setting intervals under RCW 74.46.506. Except that, the first
adjustment shall be effective on the day the beds are restored to
licensed status and shall be based on actual resident occupancy during
the calendar quarter commencing six months before the effective date of
the rate adjustment. For all subsequent interval rate component
allocation adjustments, the department shall use the actual resident
occupancy during the calendar quarter commencing six months before the
effective date of the rate adjustment. To determine the actual
resident occupancy, the department shall use the facility's census
report for the applicable time period.
(16) Effective July 1, 2003, when a contractor voluntarily and
permanently delicenses any of its licensed bed capacity, the department
shall recalculate each rate component allocation using the facility's
new licensed bed capacity, on the date of delicensure, to determine
whether the minimum occupancy resident days shall be used or the actual
resident days shall be used, whichever is greater.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.46.433 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 6 are each amended
to read as follows:
(((1))) The department shall establish for each medicaid nursing
facility a variable return component rate allocation. In determining
the variable return allowance:
(((a))) (1) The variable return array and percentage shall be
assigned whenever rebasing of noncapital rate allocations is scheduled
under RCW ((46.46.431 [74.46.431])) 74.46.431 (4), (5), (6), and (7).
(((b))) (2)(a) To calculate the array of facilities for the July 1,
2001, rate setting, the department, without using peer groups, shall
first rank all facilities in numerical order from highest to lowest
according to each facility's examined and documented, but unlidded,
combined direct care, therapy care, support services, and operations
per resident day cost from the 1999 cost report period. However,
before being combined with other per resident day costs and ranked, a
facility's direct care cost per resident day shall be adjusted to
reflect its facility average case mix index, to be averaged from the
four calendar quarters of 1999, weighted by the facility's resident
days from each quarter, under RCW 74.46.501(7)(b)(ii). The array shall
then be divided into four quartiles, each containing, as nearly as
possible, an equal number of facilities, and four percent shall be
assigned to facilities in the lowest quartile, three percent to
facilities in the next lowest quartile, two percent to facilities in
the next highest quartile, and one percent to facilities in the highest
quartile.
(((c))) (b) To calculate the array of facilities for the July 1,
2003, and each subsequent July 1st rate setting, the department,
without using peer groups, shall first rank all facilities in numerical
order from highest to lowest according to each facility's examined and
documented, but unlidded, combined direct care, therapy care, support
services, and operations per resident day cost from the immediately
preceding calendar year cost report period. However, before being
combined with other per resident day costs and ranked, a facility's
direct care cost per resident day shall be adjusted to reflect its
facility average case mix index, to be averaged from the four calendar
quarters of the cost report period used to rebase each July 1st
component rate allocations, weighted by the facility's resident days
from each quarter under RCW 74.46.501(7)(b)(iii). The array shall then
be divided into four quartiles, each containing, as nearly as possible,
an equal number of facilities, and four percent shall be assigned to
facilities in the lowest quartile, three percent to facilities in the
next lowest quartile, two percent to facilities in the next highest
quartile, and one percent to facilities in the highest quartile.
(3) The department shall((, subject to (d) of this subsection,))
compute the variable return allowance by multiplying a facility's
assigned percentage by the sum of the facility's direct care, therapy
care, support services, and operations component rates determined in
accordance with this chapter and rules adopted by the department.
(((d) Effective July 1, 2001, if a facility's examined and
documented direct care cost per resident day for the preceding report
year is lower than its average direct care component rate weighted by
medicaid resident days for the same year, the facility's direct care
cost shall be substituted for its July 1, 2001, direct care component
rate, and its variable return component rate shall be determined or
adjusted each July 1st by multiplying the facility's assigned
percentage by the sum of the facility's July 1, 2001, therapy care,
support services, and operations component rates, and its direct care
cost per resident day for the preceding year.
(2) The variable return rate allocation calculated in accordance
with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary to comply
with RCW 74.46.421.))

Sec. 5 RCW 74.46.435 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 7 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) ((Effective July 1, 2001,)) The property component rate
allocation for each facility shall be determined by dividing the sum of
the reported allowable prior period actual depreciation, subject to RCW
74.46.310 through 74.46.380, adjusted for any capitalized additions or
replacements approved by the department, and the retained savings from
such cost center, by the greater of a facility's total resident days
for the facility in the prior period or resident days as calculated on
eighty-five percent facility occupancy. ((Effective July 1, 2002, the
property component rate allocation for all facilities, except essential
community providers, shall be set by using the greater of a facility's
total resident days from the most recent cost report period or resident
days calculated at ninety percent facility occupancy.)) If a
capitalized addition or retirement of an asset will result in a
different licensed bed capacity during the ensuing period, the prior
period total resident days used in computing the property component
rate shall be adjusted to anticipated resident day level.
(2) A nursing facility's property component rate allocation shall
be rebased annually, effective July 1st, in accordance with this
section and this chapter.
(3) When a certificate of need for a new facility is requested, the
department, in reaching its decision, shall take into consideration
per-bed land and building construction costs for the facility which
shall not exceed a maximum to be established by the secretary.
(4) ((Effective July 1, 2001,)) For the purpose of calculating a
nursing facility's property component rate, if a contractor ((has
elected)) elects to bank licensed beds ((prior to April 1, 2001,)) or
elects to convert banked beds to active service at any time, under
chapter 70.38 RCW, the department shall use the facility's ((new
licensed bed capacity to recalculate minimum occupancy for rate setting
and revise the property component rate, as needed, effective as of the
date the beds are banked or converted to active service)) average
resident occupancy level for the second quarter immediately preceding
the decrease or increase in licensed bed capacity. However, in no case
shall the department use less than eighty-five percent occupancy of the
facility's licensed bed capacity after banking or conversion.
((Effective July 1, 2002, in no case, other than essential community
providers, shall the department use less than ninety percent occupancy
of the facility's licensed bed capacity after conversion.
(5) The property component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.))

Sec. 6 RCW 74.46.437 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 8 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 1999, the department shall establish for each
medicaid nursing facility a financing allowance component rate
allocation. The financing allowance component rate shall be rebased
annually, effective July 1st, in accordance with the provisions of this
section and this chapter.
(2) ((Effective July 1, 2001,)) The financing allowance shall be
determined by multiplying the net invested funds of each facility by
.10, and dividing by the greater of a nursing facility's total resident
days from the most recent cost report period or resident days
calculated on eighty-five percent facility occupancy. ((Effective July
1, 2002, the financing allowance component rate allocation for all
facilities, other than essential community providers, shall be set by
using the greater of a facility's total resident days from the most
recent cost report period or resident days calculated at ninety percent
facility occupancy.)) However, assets acquired on or after May 17,
1999, shall be grouped in a separate financing allowance calculation
that shall be multiplied by .085. The financing allowance factor of
.085 shall not be applied to the net invested funds pertaining to new
construction or major renovations receiving certificate of need
approval or an exemption from certificate of need requirements under
chapter 70.38 RCW, or to working drawings that have been submitted to
the department of health for construction review approval, prior to May
17, 1999. Effective July 1, 2003, the financing allowance shall be
determined by multiplying the net invested funds of each facility by
.085, and dividing by the greater of a nursing facility's total
resident days from the most recent cost report period or resident days
calculated on eighty-five percent facility occupancy. If a capitalized
addition, renovation, replacement, or retirement of an asset will
result in a different licensed bed capacity during the ensuing period,
the prior period total resident days used in computing the financing
allowance shall be adjusted to the greater of the anticipated resident
day level or eighty-five percent of the new licensed bed capacity.
((Effective July 1, 2002, for all facilities, other than essential
community providers, the total resident days used to compute the
financing allowance after a capitalized addition, renovation,
replacement, or retirement of an asset shall be set by using the
greater of a facility's total resident days from the most recent cost
report period or resident days calculated at ninety percent facility
occupancy.))
(3) In computing the portion of net invested funds representing the
net book value of tangible fixed assets, the same assets, depreciation
bases, lives, and methods referred to in RCW 74.46.330, 74.46.350,
74.46.360, 74.46.370, and 74.46.380, including owned and leased assets,
shall be utilized, except that the capitalized cost of land upon which
the facility is located and such other contiguous land which is
reasonable and necessary for use in the regular course of providing
resident care shall also be included. Subject to provisions and
limitations contained in this chapter, for land purchased by owners or
lessors before July 18, 1984, capitalized cost of land shall be the
buyer's capitalized cost. For all partial or whole rate periods after
July 17, 1984, if the land is purchased after July 17, 1984,
capitalized cost shall be that of the owner of record on July 17, 1984,
or buyer's capitalized cost, whichever is lower. In the case of leased
facilities where the net invested funds are unknown or the contractor
is unable to provide necessary information to determine net invested
funds, the secretary shall have the authority to determine an amount
for net invested funds based on an appraisal conducted according to RCW
74.46.360(1).
(4) ((Effective July 1, 2001,)) For the purpose of calculating a
nursing facility's financing allowance component rate, if a contractor
((has elected)) elects to bank licensed beds ((prior to May 25, 2001,))
or elects to convert banked beds to active service ((at any time)),
under chapter 70.38 RCW, the department shall use the facility's ((new
licensed bed capacity to recalculate minimum occupancy for rate setting
and revise the financing allowance component rate, as needed, effective
as of the date the beds are banked or converted to active service))
average resident occupancy level for the second quarter immediately
preceding the decrease or increase in licensed bed capacity. However,
in no case shall the department use less than eighty-five percent
occupancy of the facility's licensed bed capacity after banking or
conversion. ((Effective July 1, 2002, in no case, other than for
essential community providers, shall the department use less than
ninety percent occupancy of the facility's licensed bed capacity after
conversion.
(5) The financing allowance rate allocation calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.))

Sec. 7 RCW 74.46.496 and 1998 c 322 s 23 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each case mix classification group shall be assigned a case mix
weight. The case mix weight for each resident of a nursing facility
for each calendar quarter shall be based on data from resident
assessment instruments completed for the resident and weighted by the
number of days the resident was in each case mix classification group.
Days shall be counted as provided in this section.
(2) The case mix weights shall be based on the average minutes per
registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, and certified nurse aide,
for each case mix group, and using the health care financing
administration of the United States department of health and human
services 1995 nursing facility staff time measurement study stemming
from its multistate nursing home case mix and quality demonstration
project. Those minutes shall be weighted by statewide ratios of
registered nurse to certified nurse aide, and licensed practical nurse
to certified nurse aide, wages, including salaries and benefits, which
shall be based on 1995 cost report data for this state.
(3) The case mix weights shall be determined as follows:
(a) Set the certified nurse aide wage weight at 1.000 and calculate
wage weights for registered nurse and licensed practical nurse average
wages by dividing the certified nurse aide average wage into the
registered nurse average wage and licensed practical nurse average
wage;
(b) Calculate the total weighted minutes for each case mix group in
the resource utilization group III classification system by multiplying
the wage weight for each worker classification by the average number of
minutes that classification of worker spends caring for a resident in
that resource utilization group III classification group, and summing
the products;
(c) Assign a case mix weight of 1.000 to the resource utilization
group III classification group with the lowest total weighted minutes
and calculate case mix weights by dividing the lowest group's total
weighted minutes into each group's total weighted minutes and rounding
weight calculations to the third decimal place.
(4) The case mix weights in this state may be revised if the health
care financing administration updates its nursing facility staff time
measurement studies. The case mix weights shall be revised, but only
when direct care component rates are cost-rebased as provided in
subsection (5) of this section, to be effective on the July 1st
effective date of each cost-rebased direct care component rate.
However, the department may revise case mix weights more frequently if,
and only if, significant variances in wage ratios occur among direct
care staff in the different caregiver classifications identified in
this section.
(5) Case mix weights shall be revised when direct care component
rates are cost-rebased ((every three years)) as provided in RCW
74.46.431(4)(a).

Sec. 8 RCW 74.46.501 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 9 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) From individual case mix weights for the applicable quarter,
the department shall determine two average case mix indexes for each
medicaid nursing facility, one for all residents in the facility, known
as the facility average case mix index, and one for medicaid residents,
known as the medicaid average case mix index.
(2)(a) In calculating a facility's two average case mix indexes for
each quarter, the department shall include all residents or medicaid
residents, as applicable, who were physically in the facility during
the quarter in question (January 1st through March 31st, April 1st
through June 30th, July 1st through September 30th, or October 1st
through December 31st).
(b) The facility average case mix index shall exclude all default
cases as defined in this chapter. However, the medicaid average case
mix index shall include all default cases.
(3) Both the facility average and the medicaid average case mix
indexes shall be determined by multiplying the case mix weight of each
resident, or each medicaid resident, as applicable, by the number of
days, as defined in this section and as applicable, the resident was at
each particular case mix classification or group, and then averaging.
(4)(a) In determining the number of days a resident is classified
into a particular case mix group, the department shall determine a
start date for calculating case mix grouping periods as follows:
(i) If a resident's initial assessment for a first stay or a return
stay in the nursing facility is timely completed and transmitted to the
department by the cutoff date under state and federal requirements and
as described in subsection (5) of this section, the start date shall be
the later of either the first day of the quarter or the resident's
facility admission or readmission date;
(ii) If a resident's significant change, quarterly, or annual
assessment is timely completed and transmitted to the department by the
cutoff date under state and federal requirements and as described in
subsection (5) of this section, the start date shall be the date the
assessment is completed;
(iii) If a resident's significant change, quarterly, or annual
assessment is not timely completed and transmitted to the department by
the cutoff date under state and federal requirements and as described
in subsection (5) of this section, the start date shall be the due date
for the assessment.
(b) If state or federal rules require more frequent assessment, the
same principles for determining the start date of a resident's
classification in a particular case mix group set forth in subsection
(4)(a) of this section shall apply.
(c) In calculating the number of days a resident is classified into
a particular case mix group, the department shall determine an end date
for calculating case mix grouping periods as follows:
(i) If a resident is discharged before the end of the applicable
quarter, the end date shall be the day before discharge;
(ii) If a resident is not discharged before the end of the
applicable quarter, the end date shall be the last day of the quarter;
(iii) If a new assessment is due for a resident or a new assessment
is completed and transmitted to the department, the end date of the
previous assessment shall be the earlier of either the day before the
assessment is due or the day before the assessment is completed by the
nursing facility.
(5) The cutoff date for the department to use resident assessment
data, for the purposes of calculating both the facility average and the
medicaid average case mix indexes, and for establishing and updating a
facility's direct care component rate, shall be one month and one day
after the end of the quarter for which the resident assessment data
applies.
(6) A threshold of ninety percent, as described and calculated in
this subsection, shall be used to determine the case mix index each
quarter. The threshold shall also be used to determine which
facilities' costs per case mix unit are included in determining the
ceiling, floor, and price. If the facility does not meet the ninety
percent threshold, the department may use an alternate case mix index
to determine the facility average and medicaid average case mix indexes
for the quarter. The threshold is a count of unique minimum data set
assessments, and it shall include resident assessment instrument
tracking forms for residents discharged prior to completing an initial
assessment. The threshold is calculated by dividing a facility's count
of residents being assessed by the average census for the facility. A
daily census shall be reported by each nursing facility as it transmits
assessment data to the department. The department shall compute a
quarterly average census based on the daily census. If no census has
been reported by a facility during a specified quarter, then the
department shall use the facility's licensed beds as the denominator in
computing the threshold.
(7)(a) Although the facility average and the medicaid average case
mix indexes shall both be calculated quarterly, the facility average
case mix index will be used ((only every three years)) throughout the
applicable cost rebasing period in combination with cost report data as
specified by RCW 74.46.431 and 74.46.506, to establish a facility's
allowable cost per case mix unit. A facility's medicaid average case
mix index shall be used to update a nursing facility's direct care
component rate quarterly.
(b) The facility average case mix index used to establish each
nursing facility's direct care component rate shall be based on an
average of calendar quarters of the facility's average case mix
indexes.
(i) For October 1, 1998, direct care component rates, the
department shall use an average of facility average case mix indexes
from the four calendar quarters of 1997.
(ii) For July 1, 2001, direct care component rates, the department
shall use an average of facility average case mix indexes from the four
calendar quarters of 1999.
(iii) For July 1, 2003, and each subsequent July 1st direct care
component rates, the department shall use an average of facility case
mix indexes from the immediately preceding four calendar quarters.
(c) The medicaid average case mix index used to update or
recalibrate a nursing facility's direct care component rate quarterly
shall be from the calendar quarter commencing six months prior to the
effective date of the quarterly rate. For example, October 1, 1998,
through December 31, 1998, direct care component rates shall utilize
case mix averages from the April 1, 1998, through June 30, 1998,
calendar quarter, and so forth.

Sec. 9 RCW 74.46.506 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 10 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The direct care component rate allocation corresponds to the
provision of nursing care for one resident of a nursing facility for
one day, including direct care supplies. Therapy services and
supplies, which correspond to the therapy care component rate, shall be
excluded. The direct care component rate includes elements of case mix
determined consistent with the principles of this section and other
applicable provisions of this chapter.
(2) Beginning October 1, 1998, the department shall determine and
update quarterly for each nursing facility serving medicaid residents
a facility-specific per-resident day direct care component rate
allocation, to be effective on the first day of each calendar quarter.
In determining direct care component rates the department shall
utilize, as specified in this section, minimum data set resident
assessment data for each resident of the facility, as transmitted to,
and if necessary corrected by, the department in the resident
assessment instrument format approved by federal authorities for use in
this state.
(3) The department may question the accuracy of assessment data for
any resident and utilize corrected or substitute information, however
derived, in determining direct care component rates. The department is
authorized to impose civil fines and to take adverse rate actions
against a contractor, as specified by the department in rule, in order
to obtain compliance with resident assessment and data transmission
requirements and to ensure accuracy.
(4) Cost report data used in setting direct care component rate
allocations shall be 1996 and 1999((,)) for rate periods ending June
30, 2003, and shall be the immediately preceding cost report data for
direct care component rate allocations set beginning July 1, 2003, and
each subsequent July 1st, as specified in RCW 74.46.431(4)(a).
(5) Beginning October 1, 1998, the department shall rebase each
nursing facility's direct care component rate allocation as described
in RCW 74.46.431, adjust its direct care component rate allocation for
economic trends and conditions as described in RCW 74.46.431, and
update its medicaid average case mix index, consistent with the
following:
(a) Reduce total direct care costs reported by each nursing
facility for the applicable cost report period specified in RCW
74.46.431(4)(a) to reflect any department adjustments, and to eliminate
reported resident therapy costs and adjustments, in order to derive the
facility's total allowable direct care cost;
(b) Divide each facility's total allowable direct care cost by its
adjusted resident days for the same report period((, increased if
necessary to a minimum occupancy of eighty-five percent; that is, the
greater of actual or imputed occupancy at eighty-five percent of
licensed beds,)) to derive the facility's allowable direct care cost
per resident day;
(c) Adjust the facility's per resident day direct care cost by the
applicable factor specified in RCW 74.46.431(4) (b) and (c) to derive
its adjusted allowable direct care cost per resident day;
(d) Divide each facility's adjusted allowable direct care cost per
resident day by the facility average case mix index for the applicable
quarters specified by RCW 74.46.501(7)(b) to derive the facility's
allowable direct care cost per case mix unit;
(e) Effective for July 1, 2001, rate setting, divide nursing
facilities into at least two and, if applicable, three peer groups:
Those located in nonurban counties; those located in high labor-cost
counties, if any; and those located in other urban counties;
(f) Array separately the allowable direct care cost per case mix
unit for all facilities in nonurban counties; for all facilities in
high labor-cost counties, if applicable; and for all facilities in
other urban counties, including the high labor-cost counties, and
determine the median allowable direct care cost per case mix unit for
each peer group;
(g) Except as provided in (i) of this subsection, from October 1,
1998, through June 30, 2000, determine each facility's quarterly direct
care component rate as follows:
(i) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is less
than eighty-five percent of the facility's peer group median
established under (f) of this subsection shall be assigned a cost per
case mix unit equal to eighty-five percent of the facility's peer group
median, and shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal to
the facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that
facility's medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter
specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);
(ii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is greater
than one hundred fifteen percent of the peer group median established
under (f) of this subsection shall be assigned a cost per case mix unit
equal to one hundred fifteen percent of the peer group median, and
shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal to the
facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that
facility's medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter
specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);
(iii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is
between eighty-five and one hundred fifteen percent of the peer group
median established under (f) of this subsection shall have a direct
care component rate allocation equal to the facility's allowable cost
per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid average case
mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);
(h) Except as provided in (i) of this subsection, from July 1,
2000, forward, and for all future rate setting, determine each
facility's quarterly direct care component rate as follows:
(i) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is less
than ninety percent of the facility's peer group median established
under (f) of this subsection shall be assigned a cost per case mix unit
equal to ninety percent of the facility's peer group median, and shall
have a direct care component rate allocation equal to the facility's
assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid
average case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW
74.46.501(7)(c);
(ii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is greater
than one hundred ten percent of the peer group median established under
(f) of this subsection shall be assigned a cost per case mix unit equal
to one hundred ten percent of the peer group median, and shall have a
direct care component rate allocation equal to the facility's assigned
cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid average
case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW
74.46.501(7)(c);
(iii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is
between ninety and one hundred ten percent of the peer group median
established under (f) of this subsection shall have a direct care
component rate allocation equal to the facility's allowable cost per
case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid average case mix
index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);
(i)(i) Between October 1, 1998, and June 30, 2000, the department
shall compare each facility's direct care component rate allocation
calculated under (g) of this subsection with the facility's nursing
services component rate in effect on September 30, 1998, less therapy
costs, plus any exceptional care offsets as reported on the cost
report, adjusted for economic trends and conditions as provided in RCW
74.46.431. A facility shall receive the higher of the two rates.
(ii) Between July 1, 2000, and June 30, 2002, the department shall
compare each facility's direct care component rate allocation
calculated under (h) of this subsection with the facility's direct care
component rate in effect on June 30, 2000. A facility shall receive
the higher of the two rates. Between July 1, 2001, and June 30, 2002,
if during any quarter a facility whose rate paid under (h) of this
subsection is greater than either the direct care rate in effect on
June 30, 2000, or than that facility's allowable direct care cost per
case mix unit calculated in (d) of this subsection multiplied by that
facility's medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter
specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c), the facility shall be paid in that
and each subsequent quarter pursuant to (h) of this subsection and
shall not be entitled to the greater of the two rates.
(iii) Effective July 1, 2002, all direct care component rate
allocations shall be as determined under (h) of this subsection.
(6) ((The direct care component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.
(7))) Payments resulting from increases in direct care component
rates, granted under authority of RCW 74.46.508(1) for a facility's
exceptional care residents, shall be offset against the facility's
examined, allowable direct care costs, for each report year or partial
period such increases are paid. Such reductions in allowable direct
care costs shall be for rate setting, settlement, and other purposes
deemed appropriate by the department.

Sec. 10 RCW 74.46.511 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The therapy care component rate allocation corresponds to the
provision of medicaid one-on-one therapy provided by a qualified
therapist as defined in this chapter, including therapy supplies and
therapy consultation, for one day for one medicaid resident of a
nursing facility. The therapy care component rate allocation for
October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, shall be based on adjusted
therapy costs and days from calendar year 1996. The therapy component
rate allocation for July 1, 2001, through June 30, ((2004)) 2003, shall
be based on adjusted therapy costs and days from calendar year 1999.
For the July 1, 2003, and each subsequent July 1st, therapy care
component rate allocations shall be based on adjusted therapy costs and
days from the immediately preceding calendar year. The therapy care
component rate shall be adjusted for economic trends and conditions as
specified in RCW 74.46.431(5)(b), and shall be determined in accordance
with this section.
(2) In rebasing, as provided in RCW 74.46.431(5)(a), the department
shall take from the cost reports of facilities the following reported
information:
(a) Direct one-on-one therapy charges for all residents by payer
including charges for supplies;
(b) The total units or modules of therapy care for all residents by
type of therapy provided, for example, speech or physical. A unit or
module of therapy care is considered to be fifteen minutes of one-on-one therapy provided by a qualified therapist or support personnel; and
(c) Therapy consulting expenses for all residents.
(3) The department shall determine for all residents the total cost
per unit of therapy for each type of therapy by dividing the total
adjusted one-on-one therapy expense for each type by the total units
provided for that therapy type.
(4) The department shall divide medicaid nursing facilities in this
state into two peer groups:
(a) Those facilities located within urban counties; and
(b) Those located within nonurban counties.
The department shall array the facilities in each peer group from
highest to lowest based on their total cost per unit of therapy for
each therapy type. The department shall determine the median total
cost per unit of therapy for each therapy type and add ten percent of
median total cost per unit of therapy. The cost per unit of therapy
for each therapy type at a nursing facility shall be the lesser of its
cost per unit of therapy for each therapy type or the median total cost
per unit plus ten percent for each therapy type for its peer group.
(5) The department shall calculate each nursing facility's therapy
care component rate allocation as follows:
(a) To determine the allowable total therapy cost for each therapy
type, the allowable cost per unit of therapy for each type of therapy
shall be multiplied by the total therapy units for each type of
therapy;
(b) The medicaid allowable one-on-one therapy expense shall be
calculated taking the allowable total therapy cost for each therapy
type times the medicaid percent of total therapy charges for each
therapy type;
(c) The medicaid allowable one-on-one therapy expense for each
therapy type shall be divided by total adjusted medicaid days to arrive
at the medicaid one-on-one therapy cost per patient day for each
therapy type;
(d) The medicaid one-on-one therapy cost per patient day for each
therapy type shall be multiplied by total adjusted patient days for all
residents to calculate the total allowable one-on-one therapy expense.
The lesser of the total allowable therapy consultant expense for the
therapy type or a reasonable percentage of allowable therapy consultant
expense for each therapy type, as established in rule by the
department, shall be added to the total allowable one-on-one therapy
expense to determine the allowable therapy cost for each therapy type;
(e) The allowable therapy cost for each therapy type shall be added
together, the sum of which shall be the total allowable therapy expense
for the nursing facility;
(f) The total allowable therapy expense will be divided by the
greater of adjusted total patient days from the cost report on which
the therapy expenses were reported, or patient days at eighty-five
percent occupancy of licensed beds. The outcome shall be the nursing
facility's therapy care component rate allocation.
(6) ((The therapy care component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.
(7))) The therapy care component rate shall be suspended for
medicaid residents in qualified nursing facilities designated by the
department who are receiving therapy paid by the department outside the
facility daily rate under RCW 74.46.508(2).

Sec. 11 RCW 74.46.515 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 12 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The support services component rate allocation corresponds to
the provision of food, food preparation, dietary, housekeeping, and
laundry services for one resident for one day.
(2) Beginning October 1, 1998, the department shall determine each
medicaid nursing facility's support services component rate allocation
using cost report data specified by RCW 74.46.431(6).
(3) To determine each facility's support services component rate
allocation, the department shall:
(a) Array facilities' adjusted support services costs per adjusted
resident day for each facility from facilities' cost reports from the
applicable report year, for facilities located within urban counties,
and for those located within nonurban counties and determine the median
adjusted cost for each peer group;
(b) Set each facility's support services component rate at the
lower of the facility's per resident day adjusted support services
costs from the applicable cost report period or the adjusted median per
resident day support services cost for that facility's peer group,
either urban counties or nonurban counties, plus ten percent; and
(c) Adjust each facility's support services component rate for
economic trends and conditions as provided in RCW 74.46.431(6).
(((4) The support services component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.))

Sec. 12 RCW 74.46.521 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 13 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The operations component rate allocation corresponds to the
general operation of a nursing facility for one resident for one day,
including but not limited to management, administration, utilities,
office supplies, accounting and bookkeeping, minor building
maintenance, minor equipment repairs and replacements, and other
supplies and services, exclusive of taxes and insurance paid under
section 13 of this act, direct care, therapy care, support services,
property, financing allowance, and variable return.
(2) Beginning October 1, 1998, the department shall determine each
medicaid nursing facility's operations component rate allocation using
cost report data specified by RCW 74.46.431(7)(a). ((Effective July 1,
2002, operations component rates for all facilities except essential
community providers shall be based upon a minimum occupancy of ninety
percent of licensed beds, and no operations component rate shall be
revised in response to beds banked on or after May 25, 2001, under
chapter 70.38 RCW.)) As of the effective date of this act, the
operations component rates for all facilities shall be based on a
minimum occupancy of eighty-five percent of licensed beds.
(3) To determine each facility's operations component rate the
department shall:
(a) Array facilities' adjusted general operations costs per
adjusted resident day for each facility from facilities' cost reports
from the applicable report year, for facilities located within urban
counties and for those located within nonurban counties and determine
the median adjusted cost for each peer group;
(b) Set each facility's operations component rate at the lower of:
(i) The facility's per resident day adjusted operations costs from
the applicable cost report period adjusted if necessary to a minimum
occupancy of eighty-five percent of licensed beds ((before July 1,
2002, and ninety percent effective July 1, 2002)); or
(ii) The adjusted median per resident day general operations cost
for that facility's peer group, urban counties or nonurban counties,
plus ten percent; and
(c) Adjust each facility's operations component rate for economic
trends and conditions as provided in RCW 74.46.431(7)(b).
(((4) The operations component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 74.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax and insurance component rate allocation corresponds to
the real estate, personal property, and business and occupation taxes,
and labor and industries workers' compensation insurance, and liability
insurance paid by a nursing facility.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2003, and on each July 1st thereafter, the
department shall determine each medicaid nursing facility's tax and
insurance component rate allocation, as applicable, using cost report
data from the immediately preceding calendar year.
(3) The tax and insurance component rate allocation shall be a per
resident day amount that is proportionate to the nursing facility's
medicaid resident days to total actual days during the immediately
preceding cost report year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 RCW 74.46.421 (Purpose of part E -- Nursing
facility medicaid payment rates) and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 4, 1999 c 353
s 3, & 1998 c 322 s 18 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 If specific funding for this act, matching
the amount appropriated for nursing facilities in section 206(2),
chapter 371, Laws of 2002 and adjusted for inflation using the market
basket index, and referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is
not provided by June 30, 2003, in the omnibus appropriations act, this
act is null and void.

--- END ---