BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
providing room and domiciliary care to residents of a boarding home
licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, the amount of tax with respect to
such business shall be equal to the gross income from such services
multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(2) If the persons described in subsection (1) of this section
receive income from sources other than those described in subsection
(1) of this section or provide services other than those named in
subsection (1) of this section, that income and those services are
subject to tax as otherwise provided in this chapter.
(3) "Domiciliary care" has the same meaning as in RCW 18.20.020.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.290 and 2003 c 343 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
providing international investment management services, as to such
persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal
to the gross income or gross proceeds of sales of the business
multiplied by a rate of 0.275 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in any business
activity other than or in addition to those enumerated in RCW
82.04.230, 82.04.240, 82.04.250, 82.04.255, 82.04.260, 82.04.270,
82.04.298, 82.04.2905, 82.04.280, 82.04.2907, 82.04.272, ((and))
82.04.2906, and section 1 of this act, and subsection (1) of this
section; as to such persons the amount of tax on account of such
activities shall be equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of 1.5 percent.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section includes, among others, and
without limiting the scope hereof (whether or not title to materials
used in the performance of such business passes to another by
accession, confusion or other than by outright sale), persons engaged
in the business of rendering any type of service which does not
constitute a "sale at retail" or a "sale at wholesale." The value of
advertising, demonstration, and promotional supplies and materials
furnished to an agent by his principal or supplier to be used for
informational, educational and promotional purposes shall not be
considered a part of the agent's remuneration or commission and shall
not be subject to taxation under this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.04.050 and 2003 c 168 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) "Sale at retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of tangible
personal property (including articles produced, fabricated, or
imprinted) to all persons irrespective of the nature of their business
and including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons
who install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real
or personal property of or for consumers other than a sale to a person
who presents a resale certificate under RCW 82.04.470 and who:
(a) Purchases for the purpose of resale as tangible personal
property in the regular course of business without intervening use by
such person, but a purchase for the purpose of resale by a regional
transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a sale for resale; or
(b) Installs, repairs, cleans, alters, imprints, improves,
constructs, or decorates real or personal property of or for consumers,
if such tangible personal property becomes an ingredient or component
of such real or personal property without intervening use by such
person; or
(c) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing for sale a new article of tangible personal property or
substance, of which such property becomes an ingredient or component or
is a chemical used in processing, when the primary purpose of such
chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with
an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale; or
(d) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing
magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property is to
create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient
of ferrosilicon; or
(e) Purchases for the purpose of providing the property to
consumers as part of competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW
82.04.065. The term shall include every sale of tangible personal
property which is used or consumed or to be used or consumed in the
performance of any activity classified as a "sale at retail" or "retail
sale" even though such property is resold or utilized as provided in
(a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) of this subsection following such use. The
term also means every sale of tangible personal property to persons
engaged in any business which is taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (2) and
(7) ((and)), 82.04.290, and section 1 of this act.
(2) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" shall include the
sale of or charge made for tangible personal property consumed and/or
for labor and services rendered in respect to the following:
(a) The installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or
improving of tangible personal property of or for consumers, including
charges made for the mere use of facilities in respect thereto, but
excluding charges made for the use of coin-operated laundry facilities
when such facilities are situated in an apartment house, rooming house,
or mobile home park for the exclusive use of the tenants thereof, and
also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit health care
facilities, and excluding services rendered in respect to live animals,
birds and insects;
(b) The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or
existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real
property of or for consumers, including the installing or attaching of
any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether
or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation, and shall also include the sale of services or charges
made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth excepting the
mere leveling of land used in commercial farming or agriculture;
(c) The charge for labor and services rendered in respect to
constructing, repairing, or improving any structure upon, above, or
under any real property owned by an owner who conveys the property by
title, possession, or any other means to the person performing such
construction, repair, or improvement for the purpose of performing such
construction, repair, or improvement and the property is then
reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the original
owner;
(d) The sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in
respect to the cleaning, fumigating, razing or moving of existing
buildings or structures, but shall not include the charge made for
janitorial services; and for purposes of this section the term
"janitorial services" shall mean those cleaning and caretaking services
ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service businesses
including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor cleaning
and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery.
The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering,
repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or
sandblasting;
(e) The sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in
respect to automobile towing and similar automotive transportation
services, but not in respect to those required to report and pay taxes
under chapter 82.16 RCW;
(f) The sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging and
all other services by a hotel, rooming house, tourist court, motel,
trailer camp, and the granting of any similar license to use real
property, as distinguished from the renting or leasing of real
property, and it shall be presumed that the occupancy of real property
for a continuous period of one month or more constitutes a rental or
lease of real property and not a mere license to use or enjoy the same.
For the purposes of this subsection, it shall be presumed that the sale
of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging for a continuous
period of one month or more to a person is a rental or lease of real
property and not a mere license to enjoy the same;
(g) The sale of or charge made for tangible personal property,
labor and services to persons taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e),
and (f) of this subsection when such sales or charges are for property,
labor and services which are used or consumed in whole or in part by
such persons in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at
retail" or "retail sale" even though such property, labor and services
may be resold after such use or consumption. Nothing contained in this
subsection shall be construed to modify subsection (1) of this section
and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section shall be
construed to modify this subsection.
(3) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" shall include the
sale of or charge made for personal, business, or professional services
including amounts designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and
other service emoluments however designated, received by persons
engaging in the following business activities:
(a) Amusement and recreation services including but not limited to
golf, pool, billiards, skating, bowling, ski lifts and tows, day trips
for sightseeing purposes, and others, when provided to consumers;
(b) Abstract, title insurance, and escrow services;
(c) Credit bureau services;
(d) Automobile parking and storage garage services;
(e) Landscape maintenance and horticultural services but excluding
(i) horticultural services provided to farmers and (ii) pruning,
trimming, repairing, removing, and clearing of trees and brush near
electric transmission or distribution lines or equipment, if performed
by or at the direction of an electric utility;
(f) Service charges associated with tickets to professional
sporting events; and
(g) The following personal services: Physical fitness services,
tanning salon services, tattoo parlor services, steam bath services,
turkish bath services, escort services, and dating services.
(4)(a) The term shall also include:
(i) The renting or leasing of tangible personal property to
consumers; and
(ii) Providing tangible personal property along with an operator
for a fixed or indeterminate period of time. A consideration of this
is that the operator is necessary for the equipment to perform as
designed. For the purpose of this subsection (4)(a)(ii), an operator
must do more than maintain, inspect, or set up the tangible personal
property.
(b) The term shall not include the renting or leasing of tangible
personal property where the lease or rental is for the purpose of
sublease or subrent.
(5) The term shall also include the providing of telephone service,
as defined in RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.
(6) The term shall also include the sale of prewritten computer
software other than a sale to a person who presents a resale
certificate under RCW 82.04.470, regardless of the method of delivery
to the end user, but shall not include custom software or the
customization of prewritten computer software.
(7) The term shall not include the sale of or charge made for labor
and services rendered in respect to the building, repairing, or
improving of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right of way,
mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or
political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is
used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including
mass transportation vehicles of any kind.
(8) The term shall also not include sales of chemical sprays or
washes to persons for the purpose of postharvest treatment of fruit for
the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or decay, nor shall it include
sales of feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents for enhanced
pollination including insects such as bees, and spray materials to:
(a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation reserve
program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands
reserve program, and the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their
successors administered by the United States department of agriculture;
(b) farmers for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural
product; and (c) farmers acting under cooperative habitat development
or access contracts with an organization exempt from federal income tax
under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or the Washington state department of
fish and wildlife to produce or improve wildlife habitat on land that
the farmer owns or leases.
(9) The term shall not include the sale of or charge made for labor
and services rendered in respect to the constructing, repairing,
decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other
structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United
States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing
authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing, or attaching of any article of tangible personal property
therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a
part of the realty by virtue of installation. Nor shall the term
include the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land
and the moving of earth of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority. Nor
shall the term include the sale of services or charges made for
cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities,
radioactive waste and other byproducts of weapons production and
nuclear research and development.
(((10) Until July 1, 2003, the term shall not include the sale of
or charge made for labor and services rendered for environmental
remedial action as defined in RCW 82.04.2635(2).))

Sec. 4 RCW 82.04.190 and 2002 c 367 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Consumer" means the following:
(1) Any person who purchases, acquires, owns, holds, or uses any
article of tangible personal property irrespective of the nature of the
person's business and including, among others, without limiting the
scope hereof, persons who install, repair, clean, alter, improve,
construct, or decorate real or personal property of or for consumers
other than for the purpose (a) of resale as tangible personal property
in the regular course of business or (b) of incorporating such property
as an ingredient or component of real or personal property when
installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, improving,
constructing, or decorating such real or personal property of or for
consumers or (c) of consuming such property in producing for sale a new
article of tangible personal property or a new substance, of which such
property becomes an ingredient or component or as a chemical used in
processing, when the primary purpose of such chemical is to create a
chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of a new
article being produced for sale or (d) purchases for the purpose of
consuming the property purchased in producing ferrosilicon which is
subsequently used in producing magnesium for sale, if the primary
purpose of such property is to create a chemical reaction directly
through contact with an ingredient of ferrosilicon;
(2)(a) Any person engaged in any business activity taxable under
RCW 82.04.290 or section 1 of this act; (b) any person who purchases,
acquires, or uses any telephone service as defined in RCW 82.04.065,
other than for resale in the regular course of business; (c) any person
who purchases, acquires, or uses any service defined in RCW
82.04.050(2)(a) or any amusement and recreation service defined in RCW
82.04.050(3)(a), other than for resale in the regular course of
business; and (d) any person who is an end user of software;
(3) Any person engaged in the business of contracting for the
building, repairing or improving of any street, place, road, highway,
easement, right of way, mass public transportation terminal or parking
facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal
corporation or political subdivision of the state of Washington or by
the United States and which is used or to be used primarily for foot or
vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind as
defined in RCW 82.04.280, in respect to tangible personal property when
such person incorporates such property as an ingredient or component of
such publicly owned street, place, road, highway, easement, right of
way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle by installing, placing or spreading the property in
or upon the right of way of such street, place, road, highway,
easement, bridge, tunnel, or trestle or in or upon the site of such
mass public transportation terminal or parking facility;
(4) Any person who is an owner, lessee or has the right of
possession to or an easement in real property which is being
constructed, repaired, decorated, improved, or otherwise altered by a
person engaged in business, excluding only (a) municipal corporations
or political subdivisions of the state in respect to labor and services
rendered to their real property which is used or held for public road
purposes, and (b) the United States, instrumentalities thereof, and
county and city housing authorities created pursuant to chapter 35.82
RCW in respect to labor and services rendered to their real property.
Nothing contained in this or any other subsection of this definition
shall be construed to modify any other definition of "consumer";
(5) Any person who is an owner, lessee, or has the right of
possession to personal property which is being constructed, repaired,
improved, cleaned, imprinted, or otherwise altered by a person engaged
in business;
(6) Any person engaged in the business of constructing, repairing,
decorating, or improving new or existing buildings or other structures
under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created
pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing or attaching of
any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether
or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation; also, any person engaged in the business of clearing land
and moving earth of or for the United States, any instrumentality
thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant to
chapter 35.82 RCW. Any such person shall be a consumer within the
meaning of this subsection in respect to tangible personal property
incorporated into, installed in, or attached to such building or other
structure by such person;
(7) Any person who is a lessor of machinery and equipment, the
rental of which is exempt from the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 under
RCW 82.08.02565, with respect to the sale of or charge made for
tangible personal property consumed in respect to repairing the
machinery and equipment, if the tangible personal property has a useful
life of less than one year. Nothing contained in this or any other
subsection of this section shall be construed to modify any other
definition of "consumer"; and
(8) Any person engaged in the business of cleaning up for the
United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste and other
byproducts of weapons production and nuclear research and
development((; and
(9) Until July 1, 2003, any person engaged in the business of
conducting environmental remedial action as defined in RCW
82.04.2635(2))).

Sec. 5 RCW 82.04.440 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 6 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Every person engaged in activities which are within the purview
of the provisions of two or more of sections RCW 82.04.230 to
((82.04.290)) 82.04.298 and section 1 of this act, inclusive, shall be
taxable under each paragraph applicable to the activities engaged in.
(2) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.250, 82.04.270, or 82.04.260
(4) or (13) with respect to selling products in this state shall be
allowed a credit against those taxes for any (a) manufacturing taxes
paid with respect to the manufacturing of products so sold in this
state, and/or (b) extracting taxes paid with respect to the extracting
of products so sold in this state or ingredients of products so sold in
this state. Extracting taxes taken as credit under subsection (3) of
this section may also be taken under this subsection, if otherwise
allowable under this subsection. The amount of the credit shall not
exceed the tax liability arising under this chapter with respect to the
sale of those products.
(3) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.240 or 82.04.260(1)(b) shall be
allowed a credit against those taxes for any extracting taxes paid with
respect to extracting the ingredients of the products so manufactured
in this state. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax
liability arising under this chapter with respect to the manufacturing
of those products.
(4) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.230, 82.04.240, or 82.04.260
(1), (2), (4), (6), or (13) with respect to extracting or manufacturing
products in this state shall be allowed a credit against those taxes
for any (i) gross receipts taxes paid to another state with respect to
the sales of the products so extracted or manufactured in this state,
(ii) manufacturing taxes paid with respect to the manufacturing of
products using ingredients so extracted in this state, or (iii)
manufacturing taxes paid with respect to manufacturing activities
completed in another state for products so manufactured in this state.
The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax liability arising
under this chapter with respect to the extraction or manufacturing of
those products.
(5) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Gross receipts tax" means a tax:
(i) Which is imposed on or measured by the gross volume of
business, in terms of gross receipts or in other terms, and in the
determination of which the deductions allowed would not constitute the
tax an income tax or value added tax; and
(ii) Which is also not, pursuant to law or custom, separately
stated from the sales price.
(b) "State" means (i) the state of Washington, (ii) a state of the
United States other than Washington, or any political subdivision of
such other state, (iii) the District of Columbia, and (iv) any foreign
country or political subdivision thereof.
(c) "Manufacturing tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the
act or privilege of engaging in business as a manufacturer, and
includes (i) the taxes imposed in RCW 82.04.240 and 82.04.260 (1), (2),
(4), and (13), and (ii) similar gross receipts taxes paid to other
states.
(d) "Extracting tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the act
or privilege of engaging in business as an extractor, and includes the
tax imposed in RCW 82.04.230 and similar gross receipts taxes paid to
other states.
(e) "Business", "manufacturer", "extractor", and other terms used
in this section have the meanings given in RCW 82.04.020 through
82.04.212, notwithstanding the use of those terms in the context of
describing taxes imposed by other states.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.04.460 and 1985 c 7 s 154 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person rendering services taxable under RCW 82.04.290 or
section 1 of this act and maintaining places of business both within
and without this state which contribute to the rendition of such
services shall, for the purpose of computing tax liability under RCW
82.04.290 or section 1 of this act, apportion to this state that
portion of ((his)) the person's gross income which is derived from
services rendered within this state. Where such apportionment cannot
be accurately made by separate accounting methods, the taxpayer shall
apportion to this state that proportion of ((his)) the taxpayer's total
income which the cost of doing business within the state bears to the
total cost of doing business both within and without the state.
(2) Notwithstanding the provision of subsection (1) of this
section, persons doing business both within and without the state who
receive gross income from service charges, as defined in RCW 63.14.010
(relating to amounts charged for granting the right or privilege to
make deferred or installment payments) or who receive gross income from
engaging in business as financial institutions within the scope of
chapter 82.14A RCW (relating to city taxes on financial institutions)
shall apportion or allocate gross income taxable under RCW 82.04.290 to
this state pursuant to rules promulgated by the department consistent
with uniform rules for apportionment or allocation developed by the
states.
(3) The department shall by rule provide a method or methods of
apportioning or allocating gross income derived from sales of telephone
services taxed under this chapter, if the gross proceeds of sales
subject to tax under this chapter do not fairly represent the extent of
the taxpayer's income attributable to this state. The rules shall be,
so far as feasible, consistent with the methods of apportionment
contained in this section and shall require the consideration of those
facts, circumstances, and apportionment factors as will result in an
equitable and constitutionally permissible division of the services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A boarding home licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW may deduct
from the measure of tax amounts received as compensation for providing
adult residential care, enhanced adult residential care, or assisted
living services under contract with the department of social and health
services authorized by chapter 74.39A RCW to residents who are medicaid
recipients.
(2) For purposes of this section, "adult residential care,"
"enhanced adult residential care," and "assisted living services" have
the same meaning as in RCW 74.39A.009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---