BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Gross income" has the same meaning as the term is defined in
RCW 82.04.080.
(2) "Patient days" shall not include medicare patient days.
(3) "Multiplier" means the fixed dollar amount used to calculate
the quality maintenance fee.
(4) "Nursing facility" has the same meaning as the term is defined
in RCW 74.46.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Without exemptions, there is levied and
there shall be collected a quality maintenance fee on nursing
facilities to be calculated in accordance with subsection (2) of this
section.
(2)(a) The quality maintenance fee shall be an amount determined
each quarter by multiplying the patient days as reported by each
nursing facility for each day of the quarter by the multiplier.
(b) Each multiplier shall be calculated by the department to
produce an aggregate annual quality maintenance fee payment equal to
six percent of the aggregate annual gross income for all nursing
facilities. The multiplier shall be subject to prospective adjustment
as necessary so that the annual aggregate quality maintenance payments
do not exceed six percent of the aggregate annual gross income for all
nursing facilities.
(3)(a) Between the effective date of this act and June 30, 2004,
the multiplier shall be nine dollars and twenty-five cents.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2004, and annually thereafter, the multiplier
shall be determined using the patient days and gross income reported to
the department under section 3 of this act. The department shall use
at least six months of data from each nursing facility that shall then
be annualized.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Each nursing facility shall file a report
with the department listing the patient days and gross income for the
immediately preceding calendar year. The report shall be filed with
the department by April 30th of each year beginning April 30, 2004.
The quality maintenance fee, determined by the department in accordance
with section 2 of this act, shall be due and payable in accordance with
RCW 82.32.045(1). The department has authority to impose penalties in
accordance with RCW 82.32.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The quality maintenance fee assessed and
collected under this act, and any penalties imposed and collected
pursuant to RCW 82.32.050, shall be deposited in the nursing facility
medicaid trust fund account created in section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The department may adopt rules, in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, if necessary to implement this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The nursing facility medicaid trust fund
account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from the
assessed and collected quality maintenance fees, any penalties imposed
and collected, and the federal financial participation amounts derived
from the assessed fees paid by the nursing facilities must be deposited
in the account. Money in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may only be used for the
purposes of this section.
(2) The nursing facility medicaid trust fund account shall be: (a)
Separate and distinct from the state's general fund; (b) supplementary
to the base level of the Washington state medicaid program funds
appropriated by the legislature to maintain the state's nursing
facility medicaid program. To determine the base level of the nursing
facility medicaid program funds, the amount appropriated for nursing
facilities in the 2001-03 biennial appropriations act shall be used and
will establish the base level amount. The base level amount shall be
adjusted annually by an inflation factor that shall be equal to the
inflation factor used to annually update the medicare skilled nursing
facility payment rates; (c) exempt from budgetary cuts, reductions, or
eliminations caused by general revenue shortfalls; and (d)
supplementary to any increases in state general funds resulting from
any increase in the federal financial participation percentage amounts.
(3)(a) The nursing facility medicaid trust fund account shall be
used only to prospectively pay, under section 8 of this act, each
nursing facility the medicaid proportionate amount of the quality
maintenance fee paid under this act, to the extent permitted under
section 1903(w) of the social security act and to fund:
(i) The nursing facility medicaid payment method improvements made
by the fifty-eighth legislature; or
(ii) The nursing facility rate stabilization component created in
section 7 of this act.
(b) Should the state fail to appropriate funds in an amount that is
sufficient to maintain the base level funding for nursing facilities,
including the annual inflation adjustment amounts, as described in
subsection (2) of this section, all funds collected and held in the
nursing facility medicaid trust fund account shall be distributed to
the nursing facility rate stabilization component established in
section 7 of this act.
(4) The funds in the nursing facility medicaid trust fund account
shall not be used for any purpose other than that expressly allowed
under this section.
(5) All funds collected and maintained in the nursing facility
medicaid trust fund account shall accrue interest. The accrued
interest amounts shall be available and expended in accordance with
this act.
(6) If the operation of the nursing facility medicaid trust fund
account is terminated for any reason, any and all amounts remaining in
the nursing facility medicaid trust fund account shall be immediately
disbursed to each contractor in an amount that is representative of the
contractor's percentage of the total annual assessed fee amount.
(7) No nursing facility is guaranteed, expressly or otherwise, that
any additional money paid to the nursing facility will equal or exceed
the amount of its quality maintenance fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Effective July 1, 2003, and consistent
with the provisions of section 6 of this act, a new nursing facility
rate component shall be created and referred to as the nursing facility
rate stabilization component.
(2)(a) As long as the base level funding adjusted for inflation has
been maintained by the state under section 6 of this act, the nursing
facility rate stabilization component shall include quality maintenance
fee amounts that may remain in the nursing facility medicaid trust fund
account after the nursing facility medicaid payment method improvements
as enacted by the fifty-eighth legislature have been funded.
(b) If the state has not maintained its base level funding
adjusted for inflation under section 6 of this act, then the nursing
facility rate stabilization component shall consist of all funds
collected and held in the nursing facility medicaid trust fund account.
(3) By June 1st of each year, the department shall determine
whether the state will maintain its base level funding, adjusted for
inflation, under section 6 of this act.
(a) If the department determines that the state will meet its base
level funding adjusted for inflation, then by the first day of the
third quarter of each rate year, the department will estimate, based on
census and medicaid payments made to date, whether any funds will
remain in the nursing facility medicaid trust fund account by June 30th
of each rate year after meeting the funding obligations of the nursing
facility medicaid payment method improvements. If the department
determines that funds will be remaining in the nursing facility
medicaid trust fund account as of June 30th of the applicable rate
year, the department shall divide the total amount of the anticipated
unexpended funds by the total number of medicaid patient days. The
result shall be a per patient day rate amount that shall be added to
the total medicaid rate that shall be paid beginning on the first day
of the third quarter of the applicable rate year until the nursing
facility medicaid trust fund account is fully expended.
(b) If the department determines that the state will not meet its
base level funding adjusted for inflation, then the department shall
divide the total amount of the funds held in the nursing facility
medicaid trust fund account by the total number of medicaid patient
days. The result shall be a per patient day rate amount that shall be
added to each nursing facility's total medicaid rate that shall be paid
beginning on July 1st of each applicable rate year until the nursing
facility medicaid trust fund account is fully expended.
(4) The nursing facility rate stabilization component is not
subject to minimum occupancy requirements, medians, lids, or any other
limitations contained in the rate setting part of chapter 74.46 RCW,
Part E.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) Beginning July 1, 2003, there shall be
a new rate allocation component that shall correspond to the quality
maintenance fee amounts paid by a nursing facility.
(2) By July 1, 2003, and by each subsequent July 1st, the
department shall determine each medicaid nursing facility's quality
maintenance fee amount that will be paid to the department of revenue.
In making this determination, the department shall consult with
department of revenue staff and calculate the quality maintenance fee
amounts for each medicaid nursing facility using the method described
in section 2 of this act.
(3) Based on the amount of the quality maintenance fee amount that
each medicaid nursing facility is required to pay, the department shall
then determine the per resident day amount that is proportionate to the
nursing facility's medicaid resident days to total actual days during
the applicable reporting period. This per medicaid resident day amount
shall be the quality maintenance fee component rate allocation that
shall be paid to each medicaid nursing facility on a prospective basis.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.84.092 and 2002 c 242 s 2, 2002 c 114 s 24, and
2002 c 56 s 402 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking
water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund,
the federal forest revolving account, the health services account, the
public health services account, the health system capacity account, the
personal health services account, the state higher education
construction account, the higher education construction account, the
highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account,
the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the nursing facility medicaid trust fund account, the
oyster reserve land account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance
account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the
public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account,
the public facilities construction loan revolving account beginning
July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account, the Puyallup
tribal settlement account, the regional transportation investment
district account, the resource management cost account, the site
closure account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the
state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the
Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system
plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco
settlement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the
tuition recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond
retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the
volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation equipment
fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement account,
the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the
urban arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 10 RCW 74.46.200 and 1980 c 177 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Allowable costs shall be reduced by the contractor whenever the
item, service, or activity covered by such costs generates revenue or
financial benefits other than through the contractor's normal billing
for care services; except that, unrestricted grants, gifts, and
endowments, and interest therefrom, will not be deducted from the
allowable costs of a nonprofit facility.
(2) Where goods or services are sold, the amount of the reduction
shall be the actual cost relating to the item, service, or activity.
In the absence of adequate documentation of cost, it shall be the full
amount of the revenue received. Where financial benefits such as
purchase discounts or rebates are received, the amount of the reduction
shall be the amount of the discount or rebate.
(3) This section does not apply to the nursing facility rate
stabilization component under section 7 of this act.

Sec. 11 RCW 74.46.421 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The purpose of part E of this chapter is to determine nursing
facility medicaid payment rates that, in the aggregate for all
participating nursing facilities, are in accordance with the biennial
appropriations act.
(2)(a) The department shall use the nursing facility medicaid
payment rate methodologies described in this chapter to determine
initial component rate allocations for each medicaid nursing facility.
(b) The initial component rate allocations shall be subject to
adjustment as provided in this section in order to assure that the
statewide average payment rate to nursing facilities is less than or
equal to the statewide average payment rate specified in the biennial
appropriations act.
(3) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as creating a legal
right or entitlement to any payment that (a) has not been adjusted
under this section or (b) would cause the statewide average payment
rate to exceed the statewide average payment rate specified in the
biennial appropriations act.
(4)(a) The statewide average payment rate for any state fiscal year
under the nursing facility payment system, weighted by patient days,
shall not exceed the annual statewide weighted average nursing facility
payment rate identified for that fiscal year in the biennial
appropriations act.
(b) If the department determines that the weighted average nursing
facility payment rate calculated in accordance with this chapter is
likely to exceed the weighted average nursing facility payment rate
identified in the biennial appropriations act, then the department
shall adjust all nursing facility payment rates proportional to the
amount by which the weighted average rate allocations would otherwise
exceed the budgeted rate amount. Any such adjustments shall only be
made prospectively, not retrospectively, and shall be applied
proportionately to each component rate allocation for each facility.
(5) The quality maintenance fee component rate allocation
calculated under section 8 of this act is not subject to adjustment
under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 43.131
RCW to read as follows:
The nursing facility medicaid trust fund account shall be
terminated on June 30, 2005, as provided in section 13 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 43.131
RCW to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective June 30, 2006:
(1) Section 1 of this act;
(2) Section 2 of this act;
(3) Section 3 of this act;
(4) Section 4 of this act;
(5) Section 5 of this act;
(6) Section 6 of this act;
(7) Section 7 of this act;
(8) Section 8 of this act;
(9) Section 9 of this act;
(10) Section 10 of this act; and
(11) Section 11 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 (1) Sections 1 through 5 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.
(2) Sections 6 through 8 of this act are each added to chapter
74.46 RCW and codified with the subchapter heading of "nursing facility
medicaid trust fund account."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---