BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a boarding home contracts with the department to provide
adult residential care services, enhanced adult residential care
services, or assisted living services under chapter 74.39A RCW, the
boarding home must hold a medicaid eligible resident's room or unit
when short-term care is needed in a nursing home or hospital, the
resident is likely to return to the boarding home, and payment is made
under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The medicaid resident's bed or unit shall be held for a period
of time consistent with the funding that is available to compensate the
boarding home for holding the bed or unit. The per day bed or unit
hold compensation amount shall be seventy percent of the daily rate
paid for the resident who needs short-term nursing home care or
hospitalization.
(3) If the department is unable to compensate the boarding home
provider in the amount specified in subsection (2) of this section, or
cannot fully cover the number of days needed, the bed or unit hold
will, at that time, become a noncovered medicaid service and the
boarding home may seek third party payment. If neither the department
nor any available third party is able or willing to pay for bed or unit
hold for short-term nursing home or hospitalization stay, the medicaid
resident may return to the first available and appropriate bed or unit,
if the resident continues to meet the admission criteria under this
chapter.

--- END ---