BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature declares and reaffirms that
a core principle embodied in chapter 90.82 RCW is that state agencies
must work cooperatively with local citizens in a process of planning
for future uses of water by giving local citizens and the governments
closest to them the ability to determine the management of water in the
WRIA or WRIAs being planned.
The legislature further finds that this process of local planning
must have all the tools necessary to accomplish this task and that it
is essential for the legislature to provide a clear statutory process
for implementation so that the locally developed plan will be the
adopted and implemented plan to the greatest extent possible.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.82.040 and 2001 c 237 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Once a WRIA planning unit has been initiated under RCW
90.82.060 and a lead agency has been designated, it shall notify the
department and may apply to the department for funding assistance for
conducting the planning and implementation. Funds shall be provided
from and to the extent of appropriations made by the legislature to the
department expressly for this purpose.
(2)(a) Each planning unit that has complied with subsection (1) of
this section is eligible to receive watershed planning grants in the
following amounts for the first three phases of watershed planning and
phase four watershed plan implementation:
(i) Initiating governments may apply for an initial organizing
grant of up to fifty thousand dollars for a single WRIA or up to
seventy-five thousand dollars for a multi-WRIA management area in
accordance with RCW 90.82.060(4);
(ii)(A) A planning unit may apply for up to two hundred thousand
dollars for each WRIA in the management area for conducting watershed
assessments in accordance with RCW 90.82.070, except that a planning
unit that chooses to conduct a detailed assessment or studies under
(a)(ii)(B) of this subsection or whose initiating governments choose or
have chosen to include an instream flow or water quality component in
accordance with RCW 90.82.080 or 90.82.090 may apply for up to one
hundred thousand additional dollars for each instream flow and up to
one hundred thousand additional dollars for each water quality
component included for each WRIA to conduct an assessment on that
optional component and for each WRIA in which the assessments or
studies under (a)(ii)(B) of this subsection are conducted.
(B) A planning unit may elect to apply for up to one hundred
thousand additional dollars to conduct a detailed assessment of
multipurpose water storage opportunities or for studies of specific
multipurpose storage projects which opportunities or projects are
consistent with and support the other elements of the planning unit's
watershed plan developed under this chapter; and
(iii) A planning unit may apply for up to two hundred fifty
thousand dollars for each WRIA in the management area for developing a
watershed plan and making recommendations for actions by local, state,
and federal agencies, tribes, private property owners, private
organizations, and individual citizens, including a recommended list of
strategies and projects that would further the purpose of the plan in
accordance with RCW 90.82.060 through 90.82.100.
(b) A planning unit may request a different amount for phase two or
phase three of watershed planning than is specified in (a) of this
subsection, provided that the total amount of funds awarded do not
exceed the maximum amount the planning unit is eligible for under (a)
of this subsection. The department shall approve such an alternative
allocation of funds if the planning unit identifies how the proposed
alternative will meet the goals of this chapter and provides a proposed
timeline for the completion of planning. However, the up to one
hundred thousand additional dollars in funding for instream flow and
water quality components and for water storage assessments or studies
that a planning unit may apply for under (a)(ii)(A) of this subsection
may be used only for those instream flow, water quality, and water
storage purposes.
(c) By December 1, 2001, or within one year of initiating phase one
of watershed planning, whichever occurs later, the initiating
governments for each planning unit must inform the department whether
they intend to have the planning unit establish or amend instream flows
as part of its planning process. If they elect to have the planning
unit establish or amend instream flows, the planning unit is eligible
to receive one hundred thousand dollars for that purpose in accordance
with (a)(ii) of this subsection. If the initiating governments for a
planning unit elect not to establish or amend instream flows as part of
the unit's planning process, the department shall retain one hundred
thousand dollars to carry out an assessment to support establishment of
instream flows and to establish such flows in accordance with RCW
90.54.020(3)(a) and chapter 90.22 RCW. The department shall not use
these funds to amend an existing instream flow unless requested to do
so by the initiating governments for a planning unit.
(d) In administering funds appropriated for supplemental funding
for optional plan components under (a)(ii) of this subsection, the
department shall give priority in granting the available funds to
proposals for setting or amending instream flows.
(e) A planning unit may apply for a matching grant for phase four
watershed plan implementation following approval under the provisions
of RCW 90.82.130. A match of ten percent is required and may include
financial contributions or in-kind goods and services directly related
to coordination and oversight functions. The match can be provided by
the planning unit or by the combined commitments from federal agencies,
tribal governments, local governments, special districts, or other
local organizations. The phase four grant may be up to one hundred
thousand dollars for each planning unit for each of the first three
years of implementation. At the end of the three-year period, a two-year extension may be available for up to fifty thousand dollars each
year. For planning units that cover more than one WRIA, additional
matching funds of up to twenty-five thousand dollars may be available
for each additional WRIA per year for the first three years of
implementation, and up to twelve thousand five hundred dollars per WRIA
per year for each of the fourth and fifth years.
(3)(a) The department shall use the eligibility criteria in this
subsection (3) instead of rules, policies, or guidelines when
evaluating grant applications at each stage of the grants program.
(b) In reviewing grant applications under this subsection (3), the
department shall evaluate whether:
(i) The planning unit meets all of the requirements of this
chapter;
(ii) The application demonstrates a need for state planning funds
to accomplish the objectives of the planning process; and
(iii) The application and supporting information evidences a
readiness to proceed.
(c) In ranking grant applications submitted at each stage of the
grants program, the department shall give preference to applications in
the following order of priority:
(i) Applications from existing planning groups that have been in
existence for at least one year;
(ii) Applications that address protection and enhancement of fish
habitat in watersheds that have aquatic fish species listed or proposed
to be listed as endangered or threatened under the federal endangered
species act, 16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq. and for which there is
evidence of an inability to supply adequate water for population and
economic growth from:
(A) First, multi-WRIA planning; and
(B) Second, single WRIA planning;
(iii) Applications that address protection and enhancement of fish
habitat in watersheds or for which there is evidence of an inability to
supply adequate water for population and economic growth from:
(A) First, multi-WRIA planning; and
(B) Second, single WRIA planning.
(d) Except for phase four watershed plan implementation, the
department may not impose any local matching fund requirement as a
condition for grant eligibility or as a preference for receiving a
grant.
(4) The department may retain up to one percent of funds allocated
under this section to defray administrative costs.
(5) Planning under this chapter should be completed as
expeditiously as possible, with the focus being on local stakeholders
cooperating to meet local needs.
(6) Funding provided under this section shall be considered a
contractual obligation against the moneys appropriated for this
purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 90.82 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Within one year of accepting funding under RCW 90.82.040(2)(e),
the planning unit must complete a detailed implementation plan.
Submittal of a detailed implementation plan to the department is a
condition of receiving grants for the second and all subsequent years
of the phase four grant.
(2) Each implementation plan must contain strategies to provide
sufficient water for: (a) Production agriculture; (b) commercial,
industrial, and residential use; and (c) instream flows. Each
implementation plan must contain timelines to achieve these strategies
and interim milestones to measure progress.
(3) The implementation plan must clearly define coordination and
oversight responsibilities; any needed interlocal agreements, rules, or
ordinances; any needed state or local administrative approvals and
permits that must be secured; and specific funding mechanisms.
(4) In developing the implementation plan, the planning unit must
consult with other entities planning in the watershed management area
and identify and seek to eliminate any activities or policies that are
duplicative or inconsistent.
(5) By December 1, 2003, and by December 1st of each subsequent
year, the director of the department shall report to the appropriate
legislative standing committees regarding statutory changes necessary
to enable state agency approval or permit decision making needed to
implement a plan approved under this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 90.82.080 and 1998 c 247 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If the initiating governments choose, by majority vote, to
include an instream flow component, it shall be accomplished in the
following manner:
(i) If minimum instream flows have already been adopted by rule for
a stream within the management area, unless the members of the local
governments and tribes on the planning unit by a recorded unanimous
vote request the department to modify those flows, the minimum instream
flows shall not be modified under this chapter. If the members of
local governments and tribes request the planning unit to modify
instream flows and unanimous approval of the decision to modify such
flow is not achieved, then the instream flows shall not be modified
under this section;
(ii) If minimum stream flows have not been adopted by rule for a
stream within the management area, setting the minimum instream flows
shall be a collaborative effort between the department and members of
the planning unit. The department must attempt to achieve consensus
and approval among the members of the planning unit regarding the
minimum flows to be adopted by the department. Approval is achieved if
all government members and tribes that have been invited and accepted
on the planning unit present for a recorded vote unanimously vote to
support the proposed minimum instream flows, and all nongovernmental
members of the planning unit present for the recorded vote, by a
majority, vote to support the proposed minimum instream flows.
(b) The department shall undertake rule making to adopt flows under
(a) of this subsection. The department may adopt the rules either by
the regular rules adoption process provided in chapter 34.05 RCW, the
expedited rules adoption process as set forth in RCW ((34.05.230))
34.05.353, or through a rules adoption process that uses public
hearings and notice provided by the county legislative authority to the
greatest extent possible. Such rules do not constitute significant
legislative rules as defined in RCW 34.05.328, and do not require the
preparation of small business economic impact statements.
(c) If approval is not achieved within four years of the date the
planning unit first receives funds from the department for conducting
watershed assessments under RCW 90.82.040, the department may promptly
initiate rule making under chapter 34.05 RCW to establish flows for
those streams and shall have two additional years to establish the
instream flows for those streams for which approval is not achieved.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding RCW 90.03.345, minimum instream flows set
under this section for rivers or streams that do not have existing
minimum instream flow levels set by rule of the department shall have
a priority date of two years after funding is first received from the
department under RCW 90.82.040, unless determined otherwise by a
unanimous vote of the members of the planning unit but in no instance
may it be later than the effective date of the rule adopting such flow.
(b) Any increase to an existing minimum instream flow set by rule
of the department shall have a priority date of two years after funding
is first received for planning in the WRIA or multi-WRIA area from the
department under RCW 90.82.040 and the priority date of the portion of
the minimum instream flow previously established by rule shall retain
its priority date as established under RCW 90.03.345.
(c) Any existing minimum instream flow set by rule of the
department that is reduced shall retain its original date of priority
as established by RCW 90.03.345 for the revised amount of the minimum
instream flow level.
(3) Before setting minimum instream flows under this section, the
department shall engage in government-to-government consultation with
affected tribes in the management area regarding the setting of such
flows.
(4) Nothing in this chapter either: (a) Affects the department's
authority to establish flow requirements or other conditions under RCW
90.48.260 or the federal clean water act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.)
for the licensing or relicensing of a hydroelectric power project under
the federal power act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 791 et seq.); or (b) affects or
impairs existing instream flow requirements and other conditions in a
current license for a hydroelectric power project licensed under the
federal power act.
(5) If the planning unit is unable to obtain unanimity under
subsection (1) of this section, the department may adopt rules setting
such flows.
(6) The department shall report annually to the appropriate
legislative standing committees on the progress of instream flows being
set under this chapter, as well as progress toward setting instream
flows in those watersheds not being planned under this chapter. The
report shall be made by December 1, 2003, and by December 1st of each
subsequent year.

Sec. 5 RCW 90.82.130 and 2001 c 237 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Upon completing its proposed watershed plan, the planning
unit may approve the proposal by consensus of all of the members of the
planning unit or by consensus among the members of the planning unit
appointed to represent units of government and a majority vote of the
nongovernmental members of the planning unit.
(b) If the proposal is approved by the planning unit, the unit
shall submit the proposal to the counties with territory within the
management area. If the planning unit has received funding beyond the
initial organizing grant under RCW 90.82.040, such a proposal approved
by the planning unit shall be submitted to the counties within four
years of the date that funds beyond the initial funding are first drawn
upon by the planning unit.
(c) If the watershed plan is not approved by the planning unit, the
planning unit may submit the components of the plan for which agreement
is achieved using the procedure under (a) of this subsection, or the
planning unit may terminate the planning process.
(2)(a) With the exception of a county legislative authority that
chooses to opt out of watershed planning as provided in (c) of this
subsection, the legislative authority of each of the counties with
territory in the management area shall provide public notice of and
conduct at least one public hearing on the proposed watershed plan
submitted under this section. After the public hearings, the
legislative authorities of these counties shall convene in joint
session to consider the proposal. The counties may approve or reject
the proposed watershed plan for the management area, but may not amend
it. Approval of such a proposal shall be made by a majority vote of
the members of each of the counties with territory in the management
area.
(b) If a proposed watershed plan is not approved, it shall be
returned to the planning unit with recommendations for revisions.
Approval of such a revised proposal by the planning unit and the
counties shall be made in the same manner provided for the original
watershed plan. If approval of the revised plan is not achieved, the
process shall terminate.
(c) A county legislative authority may choose to opt out of
watershed planning under this chapter and the public hearing processes
under (a) and (b) of this subsection if the county's affected territory
within a particular management area is: (i) Less than five percent of
the total territory within the management area; or (ii) five percent or
more of the total territory within the management area and all other
initiating governments within the management area consent. A county
meeting these conditions and choosing to opt out shall notify the
department and the other initiating governments of that choice prior to
commencement of plan adoption under the provisions of (a) of this
subsection. A county choosing to opt out under the provisions of this
section shall not be bound by obligations contained in the watershed
plan adopted for that management area under this chapter. Even if a
county chooses to opt out under the provisions of this section, the
other counties within a management area may adopt a proposed watershed
plan as provided in this chapter.
(3) The planning unit shall not add an element to its watershed
plan that creates an obligation unless each of the governments to be
obligated has at least one representative on the planning unit and the
respective members appointed to represent those governments agree to
adding the element that creates the obligation. A member's agreeing to
add an element shall be evidenced by a recorded vote of all members of
the planning unit in which the members record support for adding the
element. If the watershed plan is approved under subsections (1) and
(2) of this section and the plan creates obligations: (a) For agencies
of state government, the agencies shall adopt by rule the obligations
of both state and county governments and rules implementing the state
obligations, or, with the consent of the planning unit, may adopt
policies, procedures, or agreements related to the obligations or
implementation of the obligations in addition to or in lieu of rules.
The obligations on state agencies are binding upon adoption of the
obligations ((into rule)), and the agencies shall take other actions to
fulfill their obligations as soon as possible, and should annually
review implementation needs with respect to budget and staffing; ((or))
(b) for counties, the obligations are binding on the counties and the
counties shall adopt any necessary implementing ordinances and take
other actions to fulfill their obligations as soon as possible, and
should annually review implementation needs with respect to budget and
staffing; or (c) for an organization voluntarily accepting an
obligation, the organization must adopt policies, procedures,
agreements, rules, or ordinances to implement the plan, and should
annually review implementation needs with respect to budget and
staffing.
(4) After a plan is adopted in accordance with subsection (3) of
this section, and if the department participated in the planning
process, the plan shall be deemed to satisfy the watershed planning
authority of the department with respect to the components included
under the provisions of RCW 90.82.070 through 90.82.100 for the
watershed or watersheds included in the plan. The department shall use
the plan as the framework for making future water resource decisions
for the planned watershed or watersheds. Additionally, the department
shall rely upon the plan as a primary consideration in determining the
public interest related to such decisions.
(5) Once a WRIA plan has been approved under subsection (2) of this
section for a watershed, the department may develop and adopt
modifications to the plan or obligations imposed by the plan only
through a form of negotiated rule making that uses the same processes
that applied in that watershed for developing the plan.
(6) As used in this section, "obligation" means any action required
as a result of this chapter that imposes upon a tribal government,
county government, or state government, either: A fiscal impact; a
redeployment of resources; or a change of existing policy.

--- END ---