BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.44.100 and 1997 c 316 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After an application to, and upon the issuance by the
department of an amendment to the appropriate permit or certificate of
ground water right, the holder of a valid right to withdraw public
ground waters may, without losing the holder's priority of right,
construct wells or other means of withdrawal or withdraw water under
the right from an additional existing well or wells at a new location
in substitution for or in addition to those at the original location,
or the holder may change the manner or the place of use of the water.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, an
amendment to withdraw water under the right from an additional existing
well or wells, construct replacement or a new additional well or wells
at a location outside of the location of the original well or wells, or
to change the manner or place of use of the water shall be issued only
after publication of notice of the application and findings as
prescribed in the case of an original application. Such amendment
shall be issued by the department only on the conditions that: (a) The
additional or replacement well or wells shall ((tap the same body of
public ground water)) be located within the same water resource
inventory area (WRIA), as defined in chapter 173-500 WAC, as the
original well or wells or in an adjoining WRIA. If a watershed plan
has been approved under chapter 90.82 RCW or a comprehensive watershed
plan has been adopted under RCW 90.54.040(1) for the WRIA or the
adjoining WRIA or for both WRIAs, moving the location of the well or
wells through construction or addition must be consistent with the plan
or plans. If a ground water management program has been adopted by the
department under RCW 90.44.400 through 90.44.430 for the original or
new location for the well or wells, moving the location of the well or
wells through construction or addition must be consistent with the
adopted program; (b) where a replacement well or wells is approved, the
use of the original well or wells shall be discontinued and the
original well or wells shall be properly decommissioned as required
under chapter 18.104 RCW; (c) where an additional well or wells is
added or constructed, the original well or wells may continue to be
used, but the combined total withdrawal from the original and
additional well or wells shall not ((enlarge the right)) increase the
annual or instantaneous quantity conveyed by the original permit or
certificate; and (d) other existing rights shall not be impaired. The
department may specify an approved manner of construction and shall
require a showing of compliance with the terms of the amendment, as
provided in RCW 90.44.080 in the case of an original permit.
(3) The addition or construction of a replacement or new or
existing additional well or wells at the location of the original well
or wells shall be allowed without application to the department for an
amendment. However, the following apply to such a replacement or new
or existing additional well: (a) The well shall tap the same body of
public ground water as the original well or wells; (b) if a replacement
well is added or constructed, the use of the original well or wells
shall be discontinued and the original well or wells shall be properly
decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104 RCW; (c) if a new or
existing additional well is added or constructed, the original well or
wells may continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from
the original and additional well or wells shall not ((enlarge the
right)) increase the annual or instantaneous quantity conveyed by the
original water use permit or certificate; (d) the addition or
construction and use of the well shall not interfere with or impair
water rights with an earlier date of priority than the water right or
rights for the original well or wells; (e) the replacement or
additional well shall be located no closer than the original well to a
well it might interfere with; (f) the department may specify an
approved manner of construction of the well; and (g) the department
shall require a showing of compliance with the conditions of this
subsection (3).
(4) As used in this section, the "location of the original well or
wells" is the larger of: (a) The area described as the point of
withdrawal in the original public notice published for the application
for the water right for the well; or (b) the area up to one-quarter
mile radius from the current well or wells.
(5)(a) A water right holder may add or construct a replacement or
new or existing additional well or wells at a location outside the
location of the original well or wells but not more than two miles from
the current well or wells without obtaining approval from the
department under the following conditions:
(i) At least sixty days before adding or starting construction of
the well or wells, the water right holder must provide written notice
to the department of the intention to add or construct the replacement
or additional well or wells and publish a legal notice prescribed by
the department describing the location of the additional existing or
proposed well or wells, the amounts of water to be withdrawn, and other
details deemed necessary by the department. The notice must state that
a person wishing to assert a claim of impairment of the person's water
right may do so by filing the claim with the department and the
deadline for doing so, which shall be within thirty days of the last
date of publication of the notice. The notice must be published once
a week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation
in the area in which the well or wells would be located or added. The
department must provide a copy of the notice to the tribal governments
of all Indian tribes in the watershed or watersheds involved and to any
planning unit conducting planning under chapter 90.82 RCW for the area
and must post a copy of the notice on its internet web site. The
department must file such a claim on behalf of the state if it believes
any water rights held by the state would be impaired;
(ii) No claims of impairment of a water right are filed by the
holder of the water right with the department relating to the proposed
replacement or additional well or wells within thirty days of the last
date of publication of the legal notice; and
(iii) The conditions of subsection (3)(a) through (d), (f), and (g)
of this section are met.
(b) If a claim of impairment of a water right is timely filed by
the holder of the water right with the department, the department shall
make a determination regarding the impairment claim and shall issue its
determination in writing within ninety days of the date the claim was
filed, stating either that it finds that there will be impairment (a
"finding of impairment") or that it finds there will not be impairment
(a "finding of no impairment"). The department's written determination
or its failure to issue a determination within the ninety-day deadline
may be appealed, by the claimant or by the water right holder who
published notice under (a)(i) of this subsection, to the pollution
control hearings board as provided in chapter 43.21B RCW.
(c) Where an impairment claim has been filed, a replacement well
may only be added or constructed under this subsection (5) after a
final resolution of the impairment claim results in a finding of no
impairment. Final resolution of an impairment claim occurs at the
expiration of the appeal period following a final determination by the
department, the pollution control hearings board, and any reviewing
court.
(d) The failure of the department or a person authorized to file a
claim of impairment before the thirty-day deadline established in (a)
of this subsection shall not be construed as precluding the department
or the person from taking actions to require the discontinuance of or
reduction in the withdrawal of water from the well or wells added or
located and constructed under the authority of this subsection (5) if
the state's or person's rights are impaired by the withdrawals.

--- END ---