BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.03.015 and 1987 c 109 s 65 are each amended to read
as follows:
((As used in this chapter:)) The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology((;)).
(2) "Director" means the director of ecology((; and)).
(3) "Municipal water supplier" means an entity that supplies water
for municipal water supply purposes.
(4) "Municipal water supply purposes" means a beneficial use of
water: (a) For residential purposes through fifteen or more
residential service connections or for providing residential use of
water for a nonresidential population that is, on average, at least
twenty-five people for at least sixty days a year; (b) for governmental
or governmental proprietary purposes by a city, town, public utility
district, county, sewer district, or water district; or (c) indirectly
for the purposes in (a) or (b) of this subsection through the delivery
of treated or raw water to a public water system for such use. If
water is beneficially used under a water right for the purposes listed
in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection, any other beneficial use of
water under the right generally associated with the use of water within
a municipality is also for "municipal water supply purposes,"
including, but not limited to, beneficial use for commercial,
industrial, irrigation of parks and open spaces, institutional,
landscaping, fire flow, water system maintenance and repair, or related
purposes. If a governmental entity holds a water right that is for the
purposes listed in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection, its use of
water or its delivery of water for any other beneficial use generally
associated with the use of water within a municipality is also for
"municipal water supply purposes," including, but not limited to,
beneficial use for commercial, industrial, irrigation of parks and open
spaces, institutional, landscaping, fire flow, water system maintenance
and repair, or related purposes.
(5) "Person" means any firm, association, water users' association,
corporation, irrigation district, or municipal corporation, as well as
an individual.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
Beneficial uses of water under a municipal water supply purposes
water right may include water withdrawn or diverted under such a right
and used for:
(1) Uses that benefit fish and wildlife, water quality, or other
instream resources or related habitat values; or
(2) Uses that are needed to implement environmental obligations
called for by a watershed plan approved under chapter 90.82 RCW, or a
comprehensive watershed plan adopted under RCW 90.54.040(1) after the
effective date of this section, a federally approved habitat
conservation plan prepared in response to the listing of a species as
being endangered or threatened under the federal endangered species
act, 16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq., a hydropower license of the federal
energy regulatory commission, or a comprehensive irrigation district
management plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
When requested by a municipal water supplier or when processing a
change or amendment to the right, the department shall amend the water
right documents and related records to ensure that water rights that
are for municipal water supply purposes, as defined in RCW 90.03.015,
are correctly identified as being for municipal water supply purposes.
This section authorizes a water right or portion of a water right held
or acquired by a municipal water supplier that is for municipal water
supply purposes as defined in RCW 90.03.015 to be identified as being
a water right for municipal water supply purposes. However, it does
not authorize any other water right or other portion of a right held or
acquired by a municipal water supplier to be so identified without the
approval of a change or transfer of the right or portion of the right
for such a purpose.

Sec. 4 RCW 90.03.260 and 1987 c 109 s 84 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each application for permit to appropriate water shall set
forth the name and post office address of the applicant, the source of
water supply, the nature and amount of the proposed use, the time
during which water will be required each year, the location and
description of the proposed ditch, canal, or other work, the time
within which the completion of the construction and the time for the
complete application of the water to the proposed use.
(2) If for agricultural purposes, ((it)) the application shall give
the legal subdivision of the land and the acreage to be irrigated, as
near as may be, and the amount of water expressed in acre feet to be
supplied per season. If for power purposes, it shall give the nature
of the works by means of which the power is to be developed, the head
and amount of water to be utilized, and the uses to which the power is
to be applied.
(3) If for construction of a reservoir, ((it)) the application
shall give the height of the dam, the capacity of the reservoir, and
the uses to be made of the impounded waters.
(4) If for community or multiple domestic water supply, the
application shall give the projected number of service connections
sought to be served. However, for a municipal water supplier that has
an approved water system plan under chapter 43.20 RCW or an approval
from the department of health to serve a specified number of service
connections, the service connection figure in the application or any
subsequent water right document is not an attribute limiting exercise
of the water right as long as the number of service connections to be
served under the right is consistent with the approved water system
plan or specified number.
(5) If for municipal water supply, ((it)) the application shall
give the present population to be served, and, as near as may be
estimated, the future requirement of the municipality. However, for a
municipal water supplier that has an approved water system plan under
chapter 43.20 RCW or an approval from the department of health to serve
a specified number of service connections, the population figures in
the application or any subsequent water right document are not an
attribute limiting exercise of the water right as long as the
population to be provided water under the right is consistent with the
approved water system plan or specified number.
(6) If for mining purposes, ((it)) the application shall give the
nature of the mines to be served and the method of supplying and
utilizing the water; also their location by legal subdivisions.
(7) All applications shall be accompanied by such maps and
drawings, in duplicate, and such other data, as may be required by the
department, and such accompanying data shall be considered as a part of
the application.

Sec. 5 RCW 90.03.386 and 1991 c 350 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Within service areas established pursuant to chapter((s)) 43.20
((and)) or 70.116 RCW, the department of ecology and the department of
health shall coordinate approval procedures to ensure compliance and
consistency with the approved water system plan or small water system
management program.
(2) The effect of the department of health's approval of a planning
or engineering document that describes a municipal water supplier's
service area under chapter 43.20 RCW, or the local legislative
authority's approval of service area boundaries in accordance with
procedures adopted pursuant to chapter 70.116 RCW, is that the place of
use of a surface water right or ground water right used by the supplier
includes any portion of the approved service area that was not
previously within the place of use for the water right if the supplier
is in compliance with the terms of the water system plan or small water
system management program, including those regarding water
conservation, and the alteration of the place of use is not
inconsistent, regarding an area added to the place of use, with: Any
comprehensive plans or development regulations adopted under chapter
36.70A RCW; any other applicable comprehensive plan, land use plan, or
development regulation adopted by a city, town, or county; or any
watershed plan approved under chapter 90.82 RCW, or a comprehensive
watershed plan adopted under RCW 90.54.040(1) after the effective date
of this section, if such a watershed plan has been approved for the
area.
(3) A municipal water supplier must implement cost-effective water
conservation in accordance with the requirements of section 7 of this
act as part of its approved water system plan or small water system
management program. In preparing its regular water system plan update,
a municipal water supplier with one thousand or more service
connections must describe: (a) The projects, technologies, and other
cost-effective measures that comprise its water conservation program;
(b) improvements in the efficiency of water system use resulting from
implementation of its conservation program over the previous six years;
and (c) projected effects of delaying the use of existing inchoate
rights over the next six years through the addition of further cost-effective water conservation measures before it may divert or withdraw
further amounts of its inchoate right for beneficial use. When
establishing or extending a surface or ground water right construction
schedule under RCW 90.03.320, the department must take into
consideration the public water system's use of conserved water.

Sec. 6 RCW 90.03.330 and 1987 c 109 s 89 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon a showing satisfactory to the department that any
appropriation has been perfected in accordance with the provisions of
this chapter, it shall be the duty of the department to issue to the
applicant a certificate stating such facts in a form to be prescribed
by ((him)) the director, and such certificate shall thereupon be
recorded with the department. Any original water right certificate
issued, as provided by this chapter, shall be recorded with the
department and thereafter, at the expense of the party receiving the
same, be transmitted by the department ((transmitted)) to the county
auditor of the county or counties where the distributing system or any
part thereof is located, and be recorded in the office of such county
auditor, and thereafter be transmitted to the owner thereof.
(2) Except as provided for the issuance of certificates under RCW
90.03.240 and for the issuance of certificates following the approval
of a change, transfer, or amendment under RCW 90.03.380 or 90.44.100,
the department shall not revoke or diminish a certificate for a surface
or ground water right for municipal water supply purposes as defined in
RCW 90.03.015 unless the certificate was issued with ministerial errors
or was obtained through misrepresentation. The department may adjust
such a certificate under this subsection if ministerial errors are
discovered, but only to the extent necessary to correct the ministerial
errors. The department may diminish the right represented by such a
certificate if the certificate was obtained through a misrepresentation
on the part of the applicant or permit holder, but only to the extent
of the misrepresentation. The authority provided by this subsection
does not include revoking, diminishing, or adjusting a certificate
based on any change in policy regarding the issuance of such
certificates that has occurred since the certificate was issued. This
subsection may not be construed as providing any authority to the
department to revoke, diminish, or adjust any other water right.
(3) This subsection applies to the water right represented by a
water right certificate issued prior to the effective date of this
section for municipal water supply purposes as defined in RCW 90.03.015
where the certificate was issued based on an administrative policy for
issuing such certificates once works for diverting or withdrawing and
distributing water for municipal supply purposes were constructed
rather than after the water had been placed to actual beneficial use.
Such a water right is a right in good standing.
(4) After the effective date of this section, the department must
issue a new certificate under subsection (1) of this section for a
water right represented by a water right permit only for the perfected
portion of a water right as demonstrated through actual beneficial use
of water.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 70.119A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature that the department
establish water use efficiency requirements designed to ensure
efficient use of water while maintaining water system financial
viability, improving affordability of supplies, and enhancing system
reliability.
(2) The requirements of this section shall apply to all municipal
water suppliers and shall be tailored to be appropriate to system size,
forecasted system demand, and system supply characteristics.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) Water use efficiency includes conservation planning
requirements, water distribution system leakage standards, and water
conservation performance reporting requirements; and
(b) "Municipal water supplier" and "municipal water supply
purposes" have the meanings provided by RCW 90.03.015.
(4) To accomplish the purposes of this section, the department
shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section by December 31,
2005. The department shall:
(a) Develop conservation planning requirements that ensure
municipal water suppliers are: (i) Implementing programs to integrate
conservation with water system operation and management; and (ii)
identifying how to appropriately fund and implement conservation
activities. Requirements shall apply to the conservation element of
water system plans and small water system management programs developed
pursuant to chapter 43.20 RCW. In establishing the conservation
planning requirements the department shall review the current
department conservation planning guidelines and include those elements
that are appropriate for rule. Conservation planning requirements
shall include but not be limited to:
(A) Selection of cost-effective measures to achieve a system's
water conservation objectives. Requirements shall allow the municipal
water supplier to select and schedule implementation of the best
methods for achieving its conservation objectives;
(B) Evaluation of the feasibility of adopting and implementing
water delivery rate structures that encourage water conservation;
(C) Evaluation of each system's water distribution system leakage
and, if necessary, identification of steps necessary for achieving
water distribution system leakage standards developed under (b) of this
subsection;
(D) Collection and reporting of water consumption and source
production and/or water purchase data. Data collection and reporting
requirements shall be sufficient to identify water use patterns among
utility customer classes, where applicable, and evaluate the
effectiveness of each system's conservation program. Requirements,
including reporting frequency, shall be appropriate to system size and
complexity. Reports shall be available to the public; and
(E) Establishment of minimum requirements for water demand forecast
methodologies such that demand forecasts prepared by municipal water
suppliers are sufficient for use in determining reasonably anticipated
future water needs;
(b) Develop water distribution system leakage standards to ensure
that municipal water suppliers are taking appropriate steps to reduce
water system leakage rates or are maintaining their water distribution
systems in a condition that results in leakage rates in compliance with
the standards. Limits shall be developed in terms of percentage of
total water produced and/or purchased and shall not be lower than ten
percent. The department may consider alternatives to the percentage of
total water supplied where alternatives provide a better evaluation of
the water system's leakage performance. The department shall institute
a graduated system of requirements based on levels of water system
leakage. A municipal water supplier shall select one or more control
methods appropriate for addressing leakage in its water system;
(c) Establish minimum requirements for water conservation
performance reporting to assure that municipal water suppliers are
regularly evaluating and reporting their water conservation
performance. The objective of setting conservation goals is to enhance
the efficient use of water by the water system customers. Performance
reporting shall include:
(i) Requirements that municipal water suppliers adopt and achieve
water conservation goals. The elected governing board or governing
body of the water system shall set water conservation goals for the
system. In setting water conservation goals the water supplier may
consider historic conservation performance and conservation investment,
customer base demographics, regional climate variations, forecasted
demand and system supply characteristics, system financial viability,
system reliability, and affordability of water rates. Conservation
goals shall be established by the municipal water supplier in an open
public forum;
(ii) Requirements that the municipal water supplier adopt schedules
for implementing conservation program elements and achieving
conservation goals to ensure that progress is being made toward adopted
conservation goals;
(iii) A reporting system for regular reviews of conservation
performance against adopted goals. Performance reports shall be
available to customers and the public. Requirements, including
reporting frequency, shall be appropriate to system size and
complexity;
(iv) Requirements that any system not meeting its water
conservation goals shall develop a plan for modifying its conservation
program to achieve its goals along with procedures for reporting
performance to the department;
(v) If a municipal water supplier determines that further
reductions in consumption are not reasonably achievable, it shall
identify how current consumption levels will be maintained;
(d) Adopt rules that, to the maximum extent practical, utilize
existing mechanisms and simplified procedures in order to minimize the
cost and complexity of implementation and to avoid placing unreasonable
financial burden on smaller municipal systems.
(5) The department shall establish an advisory committee to assist
the department in developing rules for water use efficiency. The
advisory committee shall include representatives from public water
system customers, environmental interest groups, business interest
groups, a representative cross-section of municipal water suppliers, a
water utility conservation professional, tribal governments, the
department of ecology, and any other members determined necessary by
the department. The department may use the water supply advisory
committee created pursuant to RCW 70.119A.160 augmented with additional
participants as necessary to comply with this subsection to assist the
department in developing rules.
(6) The department shall provide technical assistance upon request
to municipal water suppliers and local governments regarding water
conservation, which may include development of best management
practices for water conservation programs, conservation landscape
ordinances, conservation rate structures for public water systems, and
general public education programs on water conservation.
(7) To ensure compliance with this section, the department shall
establish a compliance process that incorporates a graduated approach
employing the full range of compliance mechanisms available to the
department.
(8) Prior to completion of rule making required in subsection (4)
of this section, municipal water suppliers shall continue to meet the
existing conservation requirements of the department and shall continue
to implement their current water conservation programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 43.20 RCW
to read as follows:
In approving the water system plan of a public water system, the
department shall ensure that water service to be provided by the system
under the plan for any new industrial, commercial, or residential use
is consistent with the requirements of any comprehensive plans or
development regulations adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW or any other
applicable comprehensive plan, land use plan, or development regulation
adopted by a city, town, or county for the service area. A municipal
water supplier, as defined in RCW 90.03.015, has a duty to provide
retail water service within its retail service area if: (1) Its
service can be available in a timely and reasonable manner; (2) the
municipal water supplier has sufficient water rights to provide the
service; (3) the municipal water supplier has sufficient capacity to
serve the water in a safe and reliable manner as determined by the
department of health; and (4) it is consistent with the requirements of
any comprehensive plans or development regulations adopted under
chapter 36.70A RCW or any other applicable comprehensive plan, land use
plan, or development regulation adopted by a city, town, or county for
the service area and, for water service by the water utility of a city
or town, with the utility service extension ordinances of the city or
town.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 90.82 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The timelines and interim milestones in a detailed
implementation plan required by section 3, chapter . . . (Engrossed
Second Substitute House Bill No. 1336), Laws of 2003 must address the
planned future use of existing water rights for municipal water supply
purposes, as defined in RCW 90.03.015, that are inchoate, including how
these rights will be used to meet the projected future needs identified
in the watershed plan, and how the use of these rights will be
addressed when implementing instream flow strategies identified in the
watershed plan.
(2) The watershed planning unit or other authorized lead agency
shall ensure that holders of water rights for municipal water supply
purposes not currently in use are asked to participate in defining the
timelines and interim milestones to be included in the detailed
implementation plan.
(3) The department of health shall annually compile a list of water
system plans and plan updates to be reviewed by the department during
the coming year and shall consult with the departments of community,
trade, and economic development, ecology, and fish and wildlife to:
(a) Identify watersheds where further coordination is needed between
water system planning and local watershed planning under this chapter;
and (b) develop a work plan for conducting the necessary coordination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 90.54 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall prioritize the expenditure of funds and other
resources for programs related to streamflow restoration in watersheds
where the exercise of inchoate water rights may have a larger effect on
streamflows and other water uses.

Sec. 11 RCW 90.48.495 and 1989 c 348 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department of ecology shall require sewer plans to include a
discussion of water conservation measures considered or underway that
would reduce flows to the sewerage system and an analysis of their
anticipated impact on public sewer service and treatment capacity.

Sec. 12 RCW 90.48.112 and 1997 c 444 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The evaluation of any plans submitted under RCW 90.48.110 must
include consideration of opportunities for the use of reclaimed water
as defined in RCW 90.46.010. Wastewater plans submitted under RCW
90.48.110 must include a statement describing how applicable
reclamation and reuse elements will be coordinated as required under
RCW 90.46.120(2).

Sec. 13 RCW 90.46.120 and 1997 c 444 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The owner of a wastewater treatment facility that is reclaiming
water with a permit issued under this chapter has the exclusive right
to any reclaimed water generated by the wastewater treatment facility.
Use and distribution of the reclaimed water by the owner of the
wastewater treatment facility is exempt from the permit requirements of
RCW 90.03.250 and 90.44.060. Revenues derived from the reclaimed water
facility shall be used only to offset the cost of operation of the
wastewater utility fund or other applicable source of system-wide
funding.
(2) If the proposed use or uses of reclaimed water are intended to
augment or replace potable water supplies or create the potential for
the development of additional potable water supplies, such use or uses
shall be considered in the development of the regional water supply
plan or plans addressing potable water supply service by multiple water
purveyors. The owner of a wastewater treatment facility that proposes
to reclaim water shall be included as a participant in the development
of such regional water supply plan or plans.
(3) Where opportunities for the use of reclaimed water exist within
the period of time addressed by a water supply plan or coordinated
water system plan developed under chapter 43.20 or 70.116 RCW, these
plans must be developed and coordinated to ensure that opportunities
for reclaimed water are evaluated. The requirements of this subsection
(3) do not apply to water system plans developed under chapter 43.20
RCW for utilities serving less than one thousand service connections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An unperfected surface water right for municipal water supply
purposes or a portion thereof held by a municipal water supplier may be
changed or transferred in the same manner as provided by RCW 90.03.380
for any purpose if:
(a) The supplier is in compliance with the terms of an approved
water system plan or small water system management program under
chapter 43.20 or 70.116 RCW that applies to the supplier, including
those regarding water conservation;
(b) Instream flows have been established by rule for the water
resource inventory area, as established in chapter 173-500 WAC as it
exists on the effective date of this section, that is the source of the
water for the transfer or change;
(c) A watershed plan has been approved for the water resource
inventory area referred to in (b) of this subsection under chapter
90.82 RCW and a detailed implementation plan has been completed that
satisfies the requirements of section 3, chapter . . ., Laws of 2003
(section 3, Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1336) or a
watershed plan has been adopted after the effective date of this
section for that water resource inventory area under RCW 90.54.040(1)
and a detailed implementation plan has been completed that satisfies
the requirements of section 3, chapter . . ., Laws of 2003 (section 3,
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1336); and
(d) Stream flows that satisfy the instream flows referred to in (b)
of this subsection are met or the milestones for satisfying those
instream flows required under (c) of this subsection are being met.
(2) If the criteria listed in subsection (1)(a) through (d) of this
section are not satisfied, an unperfected surface water right for
municipal water supply purposes or a portion thereof held by a
municipal water supplier may nonetheless be changed or transferred in
the same manner as provided by RCW 90.03.380 if the change or transfer
is:
(a) To provide water for an instream flow requirement that has been
established by the department by rule;
(b) Subject to stream flow protection or restoration requirements
contained in: A federally approved habitat conservation plan under the
federal endangered species act, 16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq., a
hydropower license of the federal energy regulatory commission, or a
watershed agreement established under section 16 of this act;
(c) For a water right that is subject to instream flow requirements
or agreements with the department and the change or transfer is also
subject to those instream flow requirements or agreements; or
(d) For resolving or alleviating a public health or safety
emergency caused by a failing public water supply system currently
providing potable water to existing users, as such a system is
described in section 15 of this act, and if the change, transfer, or
amendment is for correcting the actual or anticipated cause or causes
of the public water system failure. Inadequate water rights for a
public water system to serve existing hookups or to accommodate future
population growth or other future uses do not constitute a public
health or safety emergency.
(3) If the recipient of water under a change or transfer authorized
by subsection (1) of this section is a water supply system, the
receiving system must also be in compliance with the terms of an
approved water system plan or small water system management program
under chapter 43.20 or 70.116 RCW that applies to the system, including
those regarding water conservation.
(4) The department must provide notice to affected tribes of any
transfer or change proposed under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
To be considered a failing public water system for the purposes of
section 14 of this act, the department of health, in consultation with
the department and the local health authority, must make a
determination that the system meets one or more of the following
conditions:
(1) A public water system has failed, or is in danger of failing
within two years, to meet state board of health standards for the
delivery of potable water to existing users in adequate quantity or
quality to meet basic human drinking, cooking, and sanitation needs or
to provide adequate fire protection flows;
(2) The current water source has failed or will fail so that the
public water system is or will become incapable of exercising its
existing water rights to meet existing needs for drinking, cooking, and
sanitation purposes after all reasonable conservation efforts have been
implemented; or
(3) A change in source is required to meet drinking water quality
standards and avoid unreasonable treatment costs, or the state
department of health determines that the existing source of supply is
unacceptable for human use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) On a pilot project basis, the department may enter into a
watershed agreement with one or more municipal water suppliers in water
resource inventory area number one to meet the objectives established
in a water resource management program approved or being developed
under chapter 90.82 RCW with the consent of the initiating governments
of the water resource inventory area. The term of an agreement may not
exceed ten years, but the agreement may be renewed or amended upon
agreement of the parties.
(2) A watershed agreement must be consistent with:
(a) Growth management plans developed under chapter 36.70A RCW
where these plans are adopted and in effect;
(b) Water supply plans and small water system management programs
approved under chapter 43.20 or 70.116 RCW;
(c) Coordinated water supply plans approved under chapter 70.116
RCW; and
(d) Water use efficiency and conservation requirements and
standards established by the state department of health or such
requirements and standards as are provided in an approved watershed
plan, whichever are the more stringent.
(3) A watershed agreement must:
(a) Require the public water system operated by the participating
municipal water supplier to meet obligations under the watershed plan;
(b) Establish performance measures and timelines for measures to be
completed;
(c) Provide for monitoring of stream flows and metering of water
use as needed to ensure that the terms of the agreement are met; and
(d) Require annual reports from the water users regarding
performance under the agreement.
(4) As needed to implement watershed agreement activities, the
department may provide or receive funding, or both, under its existing
authorities.
(5) The department must provide opportunity for public review of a
proposed agreement before it is executed. The department must make
proposed and executed watershed agreements and annual reports available
on the department's internet web site.
(6) The department must consult with affected local governments and
the state departments of health and fish and wildlife before executing
an agreement.
(7) Before executing a watershed agreement, the department must
conduct a government-to-government consultation with affected tribal
governments. The municipal water suppliers operating the public water
systems that are proposing to enter into the agreements must be invited
to participate in the consultations. During these consultations, the
department and the municipal water suppliers shall explore the
potential interest of the tribal governments or governments in
participating in the agreement.
(8) Any person aggrieved by the department's failure to satisfy the
requirements in subsection (3) of this section as embodied in the
department's decision to enter into a watershed agreement under this
section may, within thirty days of the execution of such an agreement,
appeal the department's decision to the pollution control hearings
board under chapter 43.21B RCW.
(9) Any projects implemented by a municipal water system under the
terms of an agreement reached under this section may be continued and
maintained by the municipal water system after the agreement expires or
is terminated as long as the conditions of the agreement under which
they were implemented continue to be met.
(10) Before December 31, 2003, and December 31, 2004, the
department must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature
the results of the pilot project provided for in this section. Based
on the experience of the pilot project, the department must offer any
suggested changes in law that would improve, facilitate, and maximize
the implementation of watershed plans adopted under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may not enter into new watershed agreements under
section 16 of this act after July 1, 2008. This section does not apply
to the renewal of agreements in effect prior to that date.

Sec. 18 RCW 70.119A.110 and 1991 c 304 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No person may operate a group A public water system unless the
person first submits an application to the department and receives an
operating permit as provided in this section. A new application must
be submitted upon any change in ownership of the system. Any person
operating a public water system on July 28, 1991, may continue to
operate the system until the department takes final action, including
any time necessary for a hearing under subsection (3) of this section,
on a permit application submitted by the person operating the system
under the rules adopted by the department to implement this section.
(2) The department may require that each application include the
information that is reasonable and necessary to determine that the
system complies with applicable standards and requirements of the
federal safe drinking water act, state law, and rules adopted by the
department or by the state board of health.
(3) Following its review of the application, its supporting
material, and any information received by the department in its
investigation of the application, the department shall issue or deny
the operating permit. The department shall act on initial permit
applications as expeditiously as possible, and shall in all cases
either grant or deny the application within one hundred twenty days of
receipt of the application or of any supplemental information required
to complete the application. The applicant for a permit shall be
entitled to file an appeal in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW if the
department denies the initial or subsequent applications or imposes
conditions or requirements upon the operator. Any operator of a public
water system that requests a hearing may continue to operate the system
until a decision is issued after the hearing.
(4) At the time of initial permit application or at the time of
permit renewal the department may impose such permit conditions,
requirements for system improvements, and compliance schedules as it
determines are reasonable and necessary to ensure that the system will
provide a safe and reliable water supply to its users.
(5) Operating permits shall be issued for a term of one year, and
shall be renewed annually, unless the operator fails to apply for a new
permit or the department finds good cause to deny the application for
renewal.
(6) Each application shall be accompanied by an annual fee as
follows:
(a) The annual fee for public water supply systems serving fifteen
to forty-nine service connections shall be twenty-five dollars.
(b) The annual fee for public water supply systems serving fifty to
three thousand three hundred thirty-three service connections shall be
based on a uniform per service connection fee of one dollar and fifty
cents per service connection.
(c) The annual fee for public water supply systems serving three
thousand three hundred thirty-four to fifty-three thousand three
hundred thirty-three service connections shall be based on a uniform
per service connection fee of one dollar and fifty cents per service
connection plus ten cents for each service connection in excess of
three thousand three hundred thirty-three service connections.
(d) The annual fee for public water supply systems serving fifty-three thousand three hundred thirty-four or more service connections
shall be ten thousand dollars.
(e) In addition to the fees under (a) through (d) of this
subsection, the department may charge an additional one-time fee of
five dollars for each service connection in a new water system.
(f) Until June 30, 2007, in addition to the fees under (a) through
(e) of this subsection, the department may charge municipal water
suppliers, as defined in RCW 90.03.015, an additional annual fee
equivalent to twenty-five cents for each residential service connection
for the purpose of funding the water conservation activities in section
7 of this act.
(7) The department may phase-in the implementation for any group of
systems provided the schedule for implementation is established by
rule. Prior to implementing the operating permit requirement on water
systems having less than five hundred service connections, the
department shall form a committee composed of persons operating these
systems. The committee shall be composed of the department of health,
two operators of water systems having under one hundred connections,
two operators of water systems having between one hundred and two
hundred service connections, two operators of water systems having
between two hundred and three hundred service connections, two
operators of water systems having between three hundred and four
hundred service connections, two operators of water systems having
between four hundred and five hundred service connections, and two
county public health officials. The members shall be chosen from
different geographic regions of the state. This committee shall
develop draft rules to implement this section. The draft rules will
then be subject to the rule-making procedures in accordance with
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(8) The department shall notify existing public water systems of
the requirements of RCW 70.119A.030, 70.119A.060, and this section at
least one hundred twenty days prior to the date that an application for
a permit is required pursuant to RCW 70.119A.030, 70.119A.060, and this
section.
(9) The department shall issue one operating permit to any approved
satellite system management agency. Operating permit fees for approved
satellite system management agencies shall be one dollar per connection
per year for the total number of connections under the management of
the approved satellite agency. The department shall define by rule the
meaning of the term "satellite system management agency." If a
statutory definition of this term exists, then the department shall
adopt by rule a definition consistent with the statutory definition.
(10) For purposes of this section, "group A public water system"
and "system" mean those water systems with fifteen or more service
connections, regardless of the number of people; or a system serving an
average of twenty-five or more people per day for sixty or more days
within a calendar year, regardless of the number of service
connections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---