BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 31.45.010 and 1995 c 18 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means a person that files an application for a
license under this chapter, including the applicant's sole proprietor,
owners, directors, officers, partners, members, and controlling
persons.
(2) "Borrower" means a natural person who receives a small loan.
(3) "Business day" means any day that the licensee is open for
business in at least one physical location.
(4) "Check" means the same as defined in RCW 62A.3-104(f) and, for
purposes of conducting the business of making small loans, shall
include other electronic forms of payment including stored value cards,
internet transfers, and automated clearinghouse transactions.
(5) "Check casher" means an individual, partnership, unincorporated
association, or corporation that, for compensation, engages, in whole
or in part, in the business of cashing checks, drafts, money orders, or
other commercial paper serving the same purpose.
(((2))) (6) "Check seller" means an individual, partnership,
unincorporated association, or corporation that, for compensation,
engages, in whole or in part, in the business of or selling checks,
drafts, money orders, or other commercial paper serving the same
purpose.
(((3))) (7) "Collateral" means the same as defined in chapter
62A.9A RCW.
(8) "Controlling person" means a person owning or controlling ten
percent or more of the total outstanding shares of the applicant or
licensee, if the applicant or licensee is a corporation, and a member
who owns ten percent or more of a limited liability company or limited
liability partnership.
(9) "Default" means the borrower's failure to repay the small loan
in compliance with the terms contained in the small loan agreement or
note or failure to make payments in compliance with a loan payment
plan.
(10) "Director" means the director of financial institutions.
(11) "Financial institution" means a commercial bank, savings bank,
savings and loan association, or credit union.
(12) "Licensee" means a check casher or seller licensed by the
director to engage in business in accordance with this chapter. For
purposes of the enforcement powers of this chapter, including the power
to issue cease and desist orders under RCW 31.45.110, "licensee" also
means a check casher or seller who fails to obtain the license required
by this chapter.
(((4))) (13) "Origination date" means the date upon which the
borrower and the licensee initiate a small loan transaction.
(14) "Outstanding principal balance" of a small loan means any of
the principal amount that has not been paid by the borrower.
(15) "Paid" means that moment in time when the licensee deposits
the borrower's check or accepts cash for the full amount owing on a
valid small loan.
(16) "Person" means an individual, partnership, association,
limited liability company, limited liability partnership, trust,
corporation, and any other legal entity.
(17) "Principal" means the loan proceeds advanced for the benefit
of the borrower in a small loan, excluding any fee or interest charge.
(18) "Rescission" means annulling the loan contract and, with
respect to the small loan contract, returning the borrower and the
licensee to their financial condition prior to the origination date of
the loan.
(19) "Small loan" means a loan of up to ((five hundred dollars for
a period of thirty-one days or less)) the maximum amount and for a
period of time up to the maximum term specified in RCW 31.45.073.
(((5) "Director" means the director of financial institutions.))
(20) "Successive loans" means a series of loans made by the same
licensee to the same borrower in such a manner that no more than three
business days separate the termination date of any one loan and the
origination date of any other loan in the series.
(21) "Termination date" means the date upon which payment for the
small loan transaction is due or paid to the licensee, whichever occurs
first.
(22) "Total of payments" means the principal amount of the small
loan plus all fees or interest charged on the loan.
(23) "Trade secret" means the same as defined in RCW 19.108.010.

Sec. 2 RCW 31.45.020 and 1994 c 92 s 275 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to:
(a) Any ((bank, trust company, savings bank, savings and loan
association, or credit union)) financial institution or trust company
authorized to do business in Washington;
(b) The cashing of checks, drafts, or money orders by any
((corporation, partnership, association, or)) person who cashes checks,
drafts, or money orders as a convenience, as a minor part of its
customary business, and not for profit;
(c) The issuance or sale of checks, drafts, or money orders by any
corporation, partnership, or association that has a net worth of not
less than three million dollars as shown by audited financial
statements; and
(d) The issuance or sale of checks, drafts, money orders, or other
commercial paper serving the same purpose by any agent of a
corporation, partnership, or association described in (c) of this
subsection.
(2) Upon application to the director, the director may exempt a
((corporation, partnership, association, or other)) person from any or
all provisions of this chapter upon a finding by the director that
although not otherwise exempt under this section, the applicant is not
primarily engaged in the business of cashing or selling checks and a
total or partial exemption would not be detrimental to the public.

Sec. 3 RCW 31.45.030 and 2001 c 177 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 31.45.020, no check casher or seller
may engage in business without first obtaining a license from the
director in accordance with this chapter. A license is required for
each location where a licensee engages in the business of cashing or
selling checks or drafts.
(2) Each application for a license shall be in writing in a form
prescribed by the director and shall contain the following information:
(a) The legal name, residence, and business address of the
applicant and, if the applicant is a partnership, association, or
corporation, of every member, officer, and director thereof;
(b) The location where the initial registered office of the
applicant will be located in this state;
(c) The complete address of any other locations at which the
applicant proposes to engage in business as a check casher or seller;
and
(d) Such other data, financial statements, and pertinent
information as the director may require with respect to the applicant,
its directors, trustees, officers, members, or agents.
(3) Any information in the application regarding the personal
residential address or telephone number of the applicant, and any trade
secret as defined in RCW 19.108.010 including any financial statement
that is a trade secret, is exempt from the public records disclosure
requirements of chapter 42.17 RCW.
(4) The application shall be filed together with an investigation
and supervision fee established by rule by the director. Such fees
collected shall be deposited to the credit of the financial services
regulation fund in accordance with RCW 43.320.110.
(5)(a) Before granting a license to sell checks, drafts, or money
orders under this chapter, the director shall require that the licensee
file with the director a surety bond running to the state of
Washington, which bond shall be issued by a surety insurer which meets
the requirements of chapter 48.28 RCW, and be in a format acceptable to
the director. The director shall adopt rules to determine the penal
sum of the bond that shall be filed by each licensee. The bond shall
be conditioned upon the licensee paying all persons who purchase
checks, drafts, or money orders from the licensee the face value of any
check, draft, or money order which is dishonored by the drawee bank,
savings bank, or savings and loan association due to insufficient funds
or by reason of the account having been closed. The bond shall only be
liable for the face value of the dishonored check, draft, or money
order, and shall not be liable for any interest or consequential
damages.
(b) Before granting a small loan endorsement under this chapter,
the director shall require that the licensee file with the director a
surety bond, in a format acceptable to the director, issued by a surety
insurer that meets the requirements of chapter 48.28 RCW. The director
shall adopt rules to determine the penal sum of the bond that shall be
filed by each licensee. A licensee who wishes to engage in both check
selling and making small loans may combine the penal sums of the
bonding requirements and file one bond in a form acceptable to the
director. The bond shall run to the state of Washington as obligee,
and shall run to the benefit of the state and any person or persons who
suffer loss by reason of the licensee's violation of this chapter or
any rules adopted under this chapter. The bond shall only be liable
for damages suffered by borrowers as a result of the licensee's
violation of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter, and
shall not be liable for any interest or consequential damages.
(c) The bond shall be continuous and may be canceled by the surety
upon the surety giving written notice to the director and licensee of
its intent to cancel the bond. The cancellation is effective thirty
days after the notice is received by the director. Whether or not the
bond is renewed, continued, reinstated, reissued, or otherwise
extended, replaced, or modified, including increases or decreases in
the penal sum, it shall be considered one continuous obligation, and
the surety upon the bond shall not be liable in an aggregate or
cumulative amount exceeding the penal sum set forth on the face of the
bond. In no event shall the penal sum, or any portion thereof, at two
or more points in time be added together in determining the surety's
liability. The bond shall not be liable for any liability of the
licensee for tortious acts, whether or not such liability is imposed by
statute or common law, or is imposed by contract. The bond shall not
be a substitute or supplement to any liability or other insurance
required by law or by the contract. If the surety desires to make
payment without awaiting court action against it, the penal sum of the
bond shall be reduced to the extent of any payment made by the surety
in good faith under the bond.
(d) Any person who is a purchaser of a check, draft, or money order
from the licensee having a claim against the licensee for the dishonor
of any check, draft, or money order by the drawee bank, savings bank,
or savings and loan association due to insufficient funds or by reason
of the account having been closed, or who obtained a small loan from
the licensee and was damaged by the licensee's violation of this
chapter or rules adopted under this chapter, may bring suit upon such
bond or deposit in the superior court of the county in which the check,
draft, or money order was purchased, or in the superior court of a
county in which the licensee maintains a place of business.
Jurisdiction shall be exclusively in the superior court. Any such
action must be brought not later than one year after the dishonor of
the check, draft, or money order on which the claim is based. In the
event valid claims against a bond or deposit exceed the amount of the
bond or deposit, each claimant shall only be entitled to a pro rata
amount, based on the amount of the claim as it is valid against the
bond, or deposit, without regard to the date of filing of any claim or
action.
(e) In lieu of the surety bond required by this section, the
applicant for a check seller license may file with the director a
deposit consisting of cash or other security acceptable to the director
in an amount equal to the penal sum of the required bond. In lieu of
the surety bond required by this section, the applicant for a small
loan endorsement may file with the director a deposit consisting of
cash or other security acceptable to the director in an amount equal to
the penal sum of the required bond, or may demonstrate to the director
net worth in excess of three times the amount of the penal sum of the
required bond.
The director may adopt rules necessary for the proper
administration of the security or to establish reporting requirements
to ensure that the net worth requirements continue to be met. A
deposit given instead of the bond required by this section is not an
asset of the licensee for the purpose of complying with the liquid
asset provisions of this chapter. A deposit given instead of the bond
required by this section is a fund held in trust for the benefit of
eligible claimants under this section and is not an asset of the estate
of any licensee that seeks protection voluntarily or involuntarily
under the bankruptcy laws of the United States.
(f) Such security may be sold by the director at public auction if
it becomes necessary to satisfy the requirements of this chapter.
Notice of the sale shall be served upon the licensee who placed the
security personally or by mail. If notice is served by mail, service
shall be addressed to the licensee at its address as it appears in the
records of the director. Bearer bonds of the United States or the
state of Washington without a prevailing market price must be sold at
public auction. Such bonds having a prevailing market price may be
sold at private sale not lower than the prevailing market price. Upon
any sale, any surplus above amounts due shall be returned to the
licensee, and the licensee shall deposit with the director additional
security sufficient to meet the amount required by the director. A
deposit given instead of the bond required by this section shall not be
deemed an asset of the licensee for the purpose of complying with the
liquid asset provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 31.45.040 and 1996 c 13 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall conduct an investigation of every applicant
to determine the financial responsibility, experience, character, and
general fitness of the applicant. The director shall issue the
applicant a license to engage in the business of cashing or selling
checks, or both, or a small loan endorsement, if the director
determines to his or her satisfaction that:
(a) The applicant has satisfied the requirements of RCW 31.45.030;
(b) The applicant is financially responsible and appears to be able
to conduct the business of cashing or selling checks or making small
loans in an honest, fair, and efficient manner with the confidence and
trust of the community; and
(((b))) (c) The applicant has the required bonds, or has provided
an acceptable alternative form of financial security.
(2) The director may refuse to issue a license or small loan
endorsement if he or she finds that the applicant, or any person who is
a director, officer, partner, agent, ((or substantial stockholder))
sole proprietor, owner, or controlling person of the applicant, has
been convicted of a felony in any jurisdiction within seven years of
filing the present application or is associating or consorting with any
person who has been convicted of a felony in any jurisdiction within
seven years of filing the present application. The term "substantial
stockholder" as used in this subsection, means a person owning or
controlling ten percent or more of the total outstanding shares of the
applicant corporation.
(3) ((No)) A license or small loan endorsement may not be issued to
an applicant ((whose license to conduct business under this chapter had
been revoked by the director within the twelve-month period preceding
the application)):
(a) Whose license to conduct business under this chapter, or any
similar statute in any other jurisdiction, has been suspended or
revoked within five years of the filing of the present application;
(b) Who has been banned from the industry by an administrative
order issued by the director or the director's designee, for the period
specified in the administrative order; or
(c) When any person who is a sole proprietor, owner, director,
officer, partner, agent, or controlling person of the applicant has
been banned from the industry in an administrative order issued by the
director, for the period specified in the administrative order.
(4) A license or small loan endorsement issued under this chapter
shall be conspicuously posted in the place of business of the licensee.
The license is not transferable or assignable.
(5) A license or small loan endorsement issued in accordance with
this chapter remains in force and effect until surrendered, suspended,
or revoked, or until the license expires as a result of nonpayment of
the annual assessment fee.

Sec. 5 RCW 31.45.050 and 2001 c 177 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each applicant and licensee shall pay to the director an
investigation or examination fee as established in rule and an annual
assessment fee for the coming year in an amount determined by rule ((of
the director)) as necessary to cover the operation of the program. The
annual assessment fee is due upon the annual assessment fee due date as
established in rule. Nonpayment of the annual assessment fee may
result in expiration of the license as provided in subsection (2) of
this section. In establishing the fees, the director shall
differentiate between check cashing and check selling and making small
loans, and consider at least the volume of business, level of risk, and
potential harm to the public related to each activity. The fees
collected shall be deposited to the credit of the financial services
regulation fund in accordance with RCW 43.320.110.
(2) If a licensee does not pay its annual assessment fee by the
annual assessment fee due date as specified in rule, the director or
the director's designee shall send the licensee a notice of suspension
and assess the licensee a late fee not to exceed twenty-five percent of
the annual assessment fee as established in rule by the director. The
licensee's payment of both the annual assessment fee and the late fee
must arrive in the department's offices by 5:00 p.m. on the tenth day
after the annual assessment fee due date, unless the department is not
open for business on that date, in which case the licensee's payment of
both the annual assessment fee and the late fee must arrive in the
department's offices by 5:00 p.m. on the next occurring day that the
department is open for business. If the payment of both the annual
assessment fee and the late fee does not arrive prior to such time and
date, then the expiration of the licensee's license is effective at
5:00 p.m. on the thirtieth day after the assessment fee due date. The
director or the director's designee may reinstate the license if,
within twenty days after the effective date of expiration, the
licensee:
(a) Pays both the annual assessment fee and the late fee; and
(b) Attests under penalty of perjury that it did not engage in
conduct requiring a license under this chapter during the period its
license was expired, as confirmed by an investigation by the director
or the director's designee.
(3) If a licensee intends to do business at a new location, to
close an existing place of business, or to relocate an existing place
of business, the licensee shall provide written notification of that
intention to the director no less than thirty days before the proposed
establishing, closing, or moving of a place of business.

Sec. 6 RCW 31.45.060 and 1994 c 92 s 279 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A schedule of the fees and the charges for the cashing and
selling of checks, drafts, money orders, or other commercial paper
serving the same purpose shall be conspicuously and continuously posted
in every location licensed under this chapter. The licensee shall
provide to its customer a receipt for each transaction. The receipt
must include the name of the licensee, the type and amount of the
transaction, and the fee or fees charged for the transaction.
(2) Each licensee shall keep and maintain such business books,
accounts, and records as the director may require to fulfill the
purposes of this chapter. Every licensee shall preserve such books,
accounts, and records as required in rule by the director for at least
two years from the completion of the transaction. Records may be
maintained on an electronic, magnetic, optical, or other storage media.
However, the licensee must maintain the necessary technology to permit
access to the records by the department for the period required under
this chapter.
(3) A check, draft, or money order sold by a licensee shall be
drawn on an account of a licensee maintained ((at a bank, savings bank,
or savings and loan association)) in a federally insured financial
institution authorized to do business in the state of Washington.

Sec. 7 RCW 31.45.070 and 1995 c 18 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No licensee may engage in a loan business or the negotiation of
loans or the discounting of notes, bills of exchange, checks, or other
evidences of debt on the same premises where a check cashing or selling
business is conducted, unless the licensee:
(a) Is conducting the activities of pawnbroker as defined in RCW
19.60.010;
(b) Is a properly licensed consumer loan company under chapter
31.04 RCW;
(c) Is conducting other lending activity permitted in the state of
Washington; or
(d) Has a small loan endorsement.
(2) Except as otherwise permitted in this chapter, no licensee may
at any time cash or advance any moneys on a postdated check or draft.
However, a licensee may cash a check payable on the first banking day
following the date of cashing if:
(a) The check is drawn by the United States, the state of
Washington, or any political subdivision of the state, or by any
department or agency of the state or its subdivisions; or
(b) The check is a payroll check drawn by an employer to the order
of its employee in payment for services performed by the employee.
(3) Except as otherwise permitted in this chapter, no licensee may
agree to hold a check or draft for later deposit. A licensee shall
deposit all checks and drafts cashed by the licensee as soon as
practicable.
(4) No licensee may issue or cause to be issued any check, draft,
or money order, or other commercial paper serving the same purpose,
that is drawn upon the trust account of a licensee without concurrently
receiving the full principal amount, in cash, or by check, draft, or
money order from a third party believed to be valid.
(5) No licensee may advertise, print, display, publish, distribute,
or broadcast or cause or permit to be advertised, printed, displayed,
published, distributed, or broadcast, any statement or representation
that is false, misleading, or deceptive, or that omits material
information, or that refers to the supervision of the licensee by the
state of Washington or any department or official of the state.
(6) Each licensee shall comply with all applicable federal statutes
governing currency transaction reporting.

Sec. 8 RCW 31.45.073 and 1995 c 18 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No licensee may engage in the business of making small loans
without first obtaining a small loan endorsement to its license from
the director in accordance with this chapter. An endorsement will be
required for each location where a licensee engages in the business of
making small loans, but a small loan endorsement may authorize a
licensee to make small loans at a location different than the licensed
locations where it cashes or sells checks ((or drafts)). A licensee
may have more than one endorsement.
(2) The termination date of a small loan may not exceed the
origination date of that same small loan by more than forty-five days,
including weekends and holidays, unless the term of the loan is
extended by agreement of both the borrower and the licensee and no
additional fee or interest is charged. The maximum principal amount of
any small loan, or the outstanding principal balances of all small
loans made by a licensee to a single borrower at any one time, may not
exceed seven hundred dollars.
(3) A licensee that has obtained the required small loan
endorsement may charge interest or fees for small loans not to exceed
in the aggregate fifteen percent of the first five hundred dollars of
principal ((amount borrowed)). If the principal exceeds five hundred
dollars, a licensee may charge interest or fees not to exceed in the
aggregate ten percent of that portion of the principal in excess of
five hundred dollars. If a licensee makes more than one loan to a
single borrower, and the aggregated principal of all loans made to that
borrower exceeds five hundred dollars at any one time, the licensee may
charge interest or fees not to exceed in the aggregate ten percent on
that portion of the aggregated principal of all loans at any one time
that is in excess of five hundred dollars. The director may determine
by rule which fees, if any, are not subject to the ((fifteen percent
limitation)) interest or fee limitations described in this section. It
is a violation of this chapter for any licensee to knowingly loan to a
single borrower at any one time, in a single loan or in the aggregate,
more than the maximum principal amount described in this section.
(((3))) (4) In connection with making a small loan, a licensee may
advance moneys on the security of a postdated check ((or draft provided
the time period between the date the loan is granted and the date of
the postdated check does not exceed thirty-one days. A licensee shall
deposit all postdated checks or drafts as soon as practicable after the
date of the check or draft has passed)). The licensee may not accept
any other property, title to property, or other evidence of ownership
of property as collateral for a small loan. The licensee may accept
only one postdated check per loan as security for the loan. A licensee
may permit a borrower to redeem a postdated check with a payment of
cash or the equivalent of cash. The licensee may disburse the proceeds
of a small loan in cash, in the form of a check, or in the form of the
electronic equivalent of cash or a check.
(((4))) (5) No person may at any time cash or advance any moneys on
a postdated check or draft in excess of the amount of goods or services
purchased without first obtaining a small loan endorsement to a check
casher or check seller license.

Sec. 9 RCW 31.45.077 and 2001 c 177 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each application for a small loan endorsement to a check casher
or check seller license must be in writing and in a form prescribed by
the director and shall contain the following information:
(a) The legal name, residence, and business address of the
applicant, and if the applicant is a partnership, corporation, or
association, the name and address of every member, partner, officer,
and director thereof;
(b) The street and mailing address of each location where the
licensee will engage in the business of making small loans;
(c) A surety bond, or other security allowed under RCW 31.45.030,
in the amount required; and
(d) Any other pertinent information, including financial
statements, as the director may require with respect to the licensee
and its directors, officers, trustees, members, or employees.
(2) Any information in the application regarding the licensee's
personal residential address or telephone number, and any trade secrets
of the licensee as defined under RCW 19.108.010 including any financial
statement that is a trade secret, is exempt from the public records
disclosure requirements of chapter 42.17 RCW.
(3) The application shall be filed together with an investigation
and ((supervision)) review fee established by rule by the director.
Fees collected shall be deposited to the credit of the financial
services regulation fund in accordance with RCW 43.320.110.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 31.45 RCW
to read as follows:
A person may not engage in the business of making small loans as an
agent for a licensee or exempt entity without first obtaining a small
loan endorsement to a check casher or check seller license under this
chapter. An agent of a licensee or exempt entity engaged in the
business of making small loans is subject to this chapter. To the
extent that federal law preempts the applicability of any part of this
chapter, all other parts of this chapter remain in effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 31.45 RCW
to read as follows:
A licensee shall comply with all applicable state and federal laws
when collecting a delinquent small loan. A licensee may charge a one-time fee as determined in rule by the director to any borrower in
default on any loan or loans where the borrower's check has been
returned unpaid by the financial institution upon which it was drawn.
A licensee may take civil action under Title 62A RCW to collect upon a
check that has been dishonored. If the licensee takes civil action, a
licensee may charge the borrower the cost of collection as allowed
under RCW 62A.3-515, but may not collect attorneys' fees or any other
interest or damages as allowed under RCW 62A.3-515. A licensee may not
threaten criminal prosecution as a method of collecting a delinquent
small loan. If a dishonored check is assigned to any third party for
collection, this section applies to the third party for the collection
of the dishonored check.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 31.45 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A licensee and borrower may agree to a payment plan for a small
loan at any time. After four successive loans and prior to default
upon the last loan, each borrower may convert their small loan to a
payment plan. Each agreement for a loan payment plan must be in
writing and acknowledged by both the borrower and the licensee. The
licensee may charge the borrower, at the time both parties enter into
the payment plan, a one-time fee for the payment plan in an amount up
to the fee or interest on the outstanding principal of the loan as
allowed under RCW 31.45.073(3). The licensee may not assess any other
fee, interest charge, or other charge on the borrower as a result of
converting the small loan into a payment plan. This payment plan must
provide for the payment of the total of payments due on the small loan
over a period not less than sixty days in three or more payments,
unless the borrower and licensee agree to a shorter payment period.
The borrower may pay the total of payments at any time. The licensee
may not charge any penalty, fee, or charge to the borrower for
prepayment of the loan payment plan by the borrower. Each licensee
shall conspicuously disclose to each borrower in the small loan
agreement or small loan note that the borrower has access to such a
payment plan after four successive loans. A licensee's violation of
such a payment plan constitutes a violation of this chapter.
(2) The licensee may take postdated checks at the initiation of the
payment plan for the payments agreed to under the plan. If any check
accepted by the licensee as payment under the payment plan is
dishonored, the licensee may not charge the borrower any fee for the
dishonored check.
(3) If the borrower defaults on the payment plan, the licensee may
initiate action to collect the total of payments under section 11 of
this act. The licensee may charge the borrower a one-time payment plan
default fee of twenty-five dollars.
(4) If the licensee enters into a payment plan with the borrower
through an accredited third party, with certified credit counselors,
that is representing the borrower, the licensee's failure to comply
with the terms of that payment plan constitutes a violation of this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 31.45 RCW
to read as follows:
A borrower may rescind a loan, on or before the close of business
on the next day of business at the location where the loan was
originated, by returning the principal in cash or the original check
disbursed by the licensee to fund the small loan. The licensee may not
charge the borrower for rescinding the loan and shall return to the
borrower any postdated check taken as security for the loan or any
electronic equivalent. The licensee shall conspicuously disclose to
the borrower this right of rescission in writing in the small loan
agreement or small loan note.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 31.45 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When advertising the availability of small loans, if a licensee
includes in an advertisement the fee or interest rate charged by the
licensee for a small loan, then the licensee shall also disclose the
annual percentage rate resulting from this fee or interest rate.
(2) When advertising the availability of small loans, compliance
with all applicable state and federal laws and regulations, including
the truth in lending act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 and Regulation Z, 12
C.F.R. Sec. 226 constitutes compliance with subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) When making a small loan, each licensee shall disclose to the
borrower the terms of the small loan, including the principal amount of
the small loan, the total of payments of the small loan, the fee or
interest rate charged by the licensee on the small loan, and the annual
percentage rate resulting from this fee or interest rate.
(4) When making a small loan, disclosure of the terms of the small
loan in compliance with all applicable state and federal laws and
regulations, including the truth in lending act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601
and Regulation Z, 12 C.F.R. Sec. 226 constitutes compliance with
subsection (3) of this section.

Sec. 15 RCW 31.45.090 and 1994 c 92 s 282 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each licensee shall submit to the director, in a form approved
by the director, a report containing financial statements covering the
calendar year or, if the licensee has an established fiscal year, then
for such fiscal year, within one hundred five days after the close of
each calendar or fiscal year. The licensee shall also file such
additional relevant information as the director may require. Any
information provided by a licensee in an annual report that constitutes
a trade secret under chapter 19.108 RCW is exempt from disclosure under
chapter 42.17 RCW, unless aggregated with information supplied by other
licensees in such a manner that the licensee's individual information
is not identifiable. Any information provided by the licensee that
allows identification of the licensee may only be used for purposes
reasonably related to the regulation of licensees to ensure compliance
with this chapter.
(2) A licensee whose license has been suspended or revoked shall
submit to the director, at the licensee's expense, within one hundred
five days after the effective date of such surrender or revocation, a
closing audit report containing audited financial statements as of such
effective date for the twelve months ending with such effective date.
(3) The director shall adopt rules specifying the form and content
of such audit reports and may require additional reporting as is
necessary for the director to ensure compliance with this chapter.

Sec. 16 RCW 31.45.100 and 1994 c 92 s 283 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director or the director's designee may at any time examine and
investigate the business and examine the books, accounts, records, and
files, or other information, wherever located, of any licensee or
person who the director has reason to believe is engaging in the
business governed by this chapter. For these purposes, the director or
the director's designee may require the attendance of and examine under
oath all persons whose testimony may be required about the business or
the subject matter of the investigation. The director or the
director's designee may require the production of original books,
accounts, records, files, or other information, or may make copies of
such original books, accounts, records, files, or other information.
The director or the director's designee may issue a subpoena or
subpoena duces tecum requiring attendance and testimony, or the
production of the books, accounts, records, files, or other
information. The director shall collect from the licensee((,)) the
actual cost of the examination or investigation.

Sec. 17 RCW 31.45.110 and 1994 c 92 s 284 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director may issue and serve upon a licensee or applicant
a ((notice)) statement of charges if, in the opinion of the director,
any licensee or applicant:
(a) Is engaging or has engaged in an unsafe or unsound financial
practice in conducting the business of a check seller governed by this
chapter;
(b) Is violating or has violated ((the law, rule)) this chapter,
including rules, orders, or subpoenas, any rule adopted under this act,
any order issued under this act, any subpoena issued under this act, or
any condition imposed in writing by the director or the director's
designee in connection with the granting of any application or other
request by the licensee or any written agreement made with the
director; ((or))
(c) Is about to do the acts prohibited in (a) or (b) of this
subsection when the opinion that the threat exists is based upon
reasonable cause;
(d) Obtains a license by means of fraud, misrepresentation,
concealment, or through mistake or inadvertence of the director;
(e) Provides false statements or omissions of material information
on the application that, if known, would have allowed the director to
deny the application for the original license;
(f) Fails to pay a fee required by the director or maintain the
required bond;
(g) Commits a crime against the laws of the state of Washington or
any other state or government involving moral turpitude, financial
misconduct, or dishonest dealings;
(h) Knowingly commits or is a party to any material fraud,
misrepresentation, concealment, conspiracy, collusion, trick, scheme,
or device whereby any other person relying upon the word,
representation, or conduct acts to his or her injury or damage;
(i) Converts any money or its equivalent to his or her own use or
to the use of his or her principal or of any other person;
(j) Fails, upon demand by the director or the director's designee,
to disclose any information within his or her knowledge to, or to
produce any document, book, or record in his or her possession for
inspection of, the director or the director's designee;
(k) Commits any act of fraudulent or dishonest dealing, and a
certified copy of the final holding of any court, tribunal, agency, or
administrative body of competent jurisdiction regarding that act is
conclusive evidence in any hearing under this chapter; or
(l) Commits an act or engages in conduct that demonstrates
incompetence or untrustworthiness, or is a source of injury and loss to
the public.
(2) The ((notice)) statement of charges shall ((contain a statement
of the facts constituting the alleged violation or violations or the
practice or practices and shall fix a time and place at which a hearing
will be held to determine whether an order to cease and desist should
be issued against the licensee. The hearing shall be set not earlier
than ten days nor later than thirty days after service of the notice
unless a later date is set by the director at the request of the
licensee)) be issued under chapter 34.05 RCW. The director or the
director's designee may impose the following sanctions against any
licensee or applicant, or any director, officer, sole proprietor,
partner, controlling person, or employee of a licensee or applicant:
(a) Deny, revoke, suspend, or condition the license;
(b) Order the licensee to cease and desist from practices in
violation of this chapter or practices that constitute unsafe and
unsound financial practices in the sale of checks;
(c) Impose a fine not to exceed one hundred dollars per day for
each day's violation of this chapter;
(d) Order restitution to borrowers or other parties damaged by the
licensee's violation of this chapter or take other affirmative action
as necessary to comply with this chapter; and
(e) Remove from office or ban from participation in the affairs of
any licensee any director, officer, sole proprietor, partner,
controlling person, or employee of a licensee.
(3) The proceedings to impose the sanctions described in subsection
(2) of this section, including any hearing or appeal of the statement
of charges, are governed by chapter 34.05 RCW.
Unless the licensee personally appears at the hearing or is
represented by a duly authorized representative, the licensee is deemed
to have consented to the ((issuance of the cease and desist order. In
the event of this consent or if upon the record made at the hearing the
director finds that any violation or practice specified in the notice
of charges has been established, the director may issue and serve upon
the licensee an order to cease and desist from the violation or
practice. The order may require the licensee and its directors,
officers, employees, and agents to cease and desist from the violation
or practice and may require the licensee to take affirmative action to
correct the conditions resulting from the violation or practice.
(3) A cease and desist order becomes effective upon the expiration
of ten days after the service of the order upon the licensee concerned,
except that a cease and desist order issued upon consent becomes
effective at the time specified in the order and remains effective as
provided in the order unless it is stayed, modified, terminated, or set
aside by action of the director or a reviewing court)) statement of
charges and the sanctions imposed in the statement of charges.

Sec. 18 RCW 31.45.120 and 1994 c 92 s 285 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever the director determines that the acts specified in RCW
31.45.110 or their continuation is likely to cause insolvency or
substantial injury to the public, the director may also issue a
temporary cease and desist order requiring the licensee to cease and
desist from the violation or practice. The order becomes effective
upon service upon the licensee and remains effective unless set aside,
limited, or suspended by a court under RCW 31.45.130 pending the
completion of the administrative proceedings under the notice and until
such time as the director dismisses the charges specified in the notice
or until the effective date of the cease and desist order issued
against the licensee under RCW 31.45.110.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 RCW 31.45.170 (Violation -- Penalty) and 1994
c 92 s 289 & 1991 c 355 s 17 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 Section 12 of this act takes effect October
1, 2003.

--- END ---