BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.32.155 and 1998 c 191 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When purchasing any hunting license, persons under the age
of eighteen shall present certification of completion of a course of
instruction of at least ten hours in the safe handling of firearms,
safety, conservation, and sportsmanship. Beginning January 1, 1995,
all persons purchasing any hunting license for the first time, if born
after January 1, 1972, shall present such certification.
(b) The director may establish a program for training persons in
the safe handling of firearms, conservation, and sportsmanship and may
cooperate with the National Rifle Association, organized sportsmen's
groups, or other public or private organizations.
(c) The director shall prescribe the type of instruction and the
qualifications of the instructors.
(d) Upon successful completion of the course, a trainee shall
receive a hunter education certificate signed by an authorized
instructor. The certificate is evidence of compliance with this
section.
(e) The director may accept certificates from other states that
persons have successfully completed firearm safety, hunter education,
or similar courses as evidence of compliance with this section.
(2) A person on active duty in the United States armed forces who
was born after January 1, 1972, is exempt from the firearms range safe
handling portion of the hunter education course required by subsection
(1) of this section if the person:
(a) Is currently stationed at a military installation located in
Washington; and
(b) Has successfully completed any firearms qualification
requirements required by his or her branch of the military within the
twenty-four month period prior to purchasing an initial hunting
license.
(3)(a) A person on active duty in the United States armed forces
who was born after January 1, 1972, and who is currently stationed at
a military installation located in Washington may receive a current
year hunting license without satisfying the certification requirements
of subsection (1) of this section if their transfer to a Washington
military installation is within the ninety-day period preceding the
purchase of an initial hunting license.
(b) The provisions of (a) of this subsection may be exercised by a
person one time. The certification requirements of subsection (1) of
this section, as modified by subsection (2) of this section, must be
met before purchasing a subsequent hunting license.
(4) Active duty military personnel applying for the exemption
provided in subsection (2) or (3) of this section are responsible for
providing identification and documentation to the department
establishing that the requirements of subsection (2) or (3) of this
section have been satisfied.

--- END ---