BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.58.055 and 1997 c 58 s 948 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To promote and maintain nation-wide uniformity in the system of
vital statistics, the certificates required by this chapter or by the
rules adopted under this chapter shall include, as a minimum, the items
recommended by the federal agency responsible for national vital
statistics including social security numbers. However, if a social
security number is included on a certificate of death, it shall be
placed in a confidential section of the certificate form and shall not
be subject to the view of the public, except that the personal
representative of the estate of the deceased or the surviving spouse of
the deceased may obtain the confidential section with the certificate
and may authorize the release of the confidential section with the
certificate.
(2) The state board of health by rule may require additional
pertinent information relative to the birth and manner of delivery as
it may deem necessary for statistical study. This information shall be
placed in a confidential section of the birth certificate form and
shall not be subject to the view of the public or for certification
purposes except upon order of the court. The state board of health may
eliminate from the forms items that it determines are not necessary for
statistical study.
(3) Each certificate or other document required by this chapter
shall be on a form or in a format prescribed by the state registrar.
(4) All vital records shall contain the data required for
registration. No certificate may be held to be complete and correct
that does not supply all items of information called for or that does
not satisfactorily account for the omission of required items.
(5) Information required in certificates or documents authorized by
this chapter may be filed and registered by photographic, electronic,
or other means as prescribed by the state registrar.

--- END ---