BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.95.240 and 1957 c 227 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every defendant who has fulfilled the conditions of his or her
probation for the entire period thereof, or who shall have been
discharged from probation prior to the termination of the period
thereof, may at any time prior to the expiration of the maximum period
of punishment for the offense for which he or she has been convicted be
permitted in the discretion of the court to withdraw his or her plea of
guilty and enter a plea of not guilty, or if he or she has been
convicted after a plea of not guilty, the court may in its discretion
set aside the verdict of guilty; and in either case, the court may
thereupon dismiss the information or indictment against such defendant,
who shall thereafter be released from all penalties and disabilities
resulting from the offense or crime of which he or she has been
convicted. The probationer shall be informed of this right in his or
her probation papers: PROVIDED, That in any subsequent prosecution,
for any other offense, such prior conviction may be pleaded and proved,
and shall have the same effect as if probation had not been granted, or
the information or indictment dismissed.
(2)(a) After the period of probation has expired, the defendant may
apply to the sentencing court for a vacation of the defendant's record
of conviction under RCW 9.94A.640. The court may, in its discretion,
clear the record of conviction if it finds the defendant has met the
equivalent of the tests in RCW 9.94A.640(2) as those tests would be
applied to a person convicted of a crime committed before July 1, 1984.
(b) The clerk of the court in which the vacation order is entered
shall immediately transmit the order vacating the conviction to the
Washington state patrol identification section and to the local police
agency, if any, which holds criminal history information for the person
who is the subject of the conviction. The Washington state patrol and
any such local police agency shall immediately update their records to
reflect the vacation of the conviction, and shall transmit the order
vacating the conviction to the federal bureau of investigation. A
conviction that has been vacated under this section may not be
disseminated or disclosed by the state patrol or local law enforcement
agency to any person, except other criminal justice enforcement
agencies.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.92.066 and 1971 ex.s. c 188 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon termination of any suspended sentence under RCW 9.92.060
or 9.95.210, such person may apply to the court for restoration of his
or her civil rights. Thereupon the court may in its discretion enter
an order directing that such defendant shall thereafter be released
from all penalties and disabilities resulting from the offense or crime
of which he or she has been convicted.
(2)(a) Upon termination of a suspended sentence under RCW 9.92.060
or 9.95.210, the person may apply to the sentencing court for a
vacation of the person's record of conviction under RCW 9.94A.640. The
court may, in its discretion, clear the record of conviction if it
finds the person has met the equivalent of the tests in RCW
9.94A.640(2) as those tests would be applied to a person convicted of
a crime committed before July 1, 1984.
(b) The clerk of the court in which the vacation order is entered
shall immediately transmit the order vacating the conviction to the
Washington state patrol identification section and to the local police
agency, if any, which holds criminal history information for the person
who is the subject of the conviction. The Washington state patrol and
any such local police agency shall immediately update their records to
reflect the vacation of the conviction, and shall transmit the order
vacating the conviction to the federal bureau of investigation. A
conviction that has been vacated under this section may not be
disseminated or disclosed by the state patrol or local law enforcement
agency to any person, except other criminal justice enforcement
agencies.

--- END ---