BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to 2001 2nd sp.s. c
8 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Public Works Trust Fund 2001-2003 Supplemental (03-4-002)

Appropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,072,911

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,072,911

Sec. 2 2002 c 238 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Local/Community Projects (2002-S-005): Job Creation and
Infrastructure Projects

The following projects are eligible for funding:

Projects Amount

Asia Pacific center . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
Benton county jail . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Bremerton maritime park . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Edmonds waterfront park . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Grace Cole memorial park/Brookside creek . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Kent station infrastructure improvements . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000
Mill creek active use ball fields . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Nathan Chapman trail . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Penny creek/9th Avenue crossing . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Port Angeles skills center/skills consortium . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Puget Sound environmental learning center . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Ridgefield wastewater treatment . . . . . . . . . . . . $585,000
Sammamish surface water treatment . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Shoreline historical museum . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000
Snohomish county children's museum . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Soundview park/playground . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Stewart heights pool project . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Sundome seating expansion - Yakima . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,250,000
West central community center childcare project . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
William H. Factory small business incubator . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
((Yakima ballfields)) For the transfer of property,
commonly known as Larson park field No. 4 and
Dunbar field, of the city of Yakima to the
Yakima Valley Community College and for the
creation of new ball fields by and for the
city of Yakima. . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,250,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,213,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account -- State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,213,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,213,000

Sec. 3 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 158 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Legislative Buildings - O'Brien and Newhouse Building Improvements
(01-H-021)

Appropriation:
((Capitol Building Construction Account -- State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000))
Thurston County Capital Facilities
Account -- State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,000,000))
$2,000,000

((Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000))

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Sec. 4 2002 c 238 s 109 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Legislative Building: Rehabilitation (01-1-008)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations in this section are subject to the
conditions and limitations of sections 902 and 903 of this act.
(2) The department of general administration, in consultation with
the legislature, the governor, and the state capitol committee, shall
immediately begin planning and initiate an accelerated
design/construction schedule for the renovation of the state
legislative building as follows:
(a) No new permanent buildings shall be constructed, and the
department shall follow standards for historic preservation;
(b) The goal shall be to reoccupy the building in time for the 2005
legislative session;
(c) The department shall make temporary accommodations for the
displacement of legislators and legislative staff in the John L.
O'Brien building, the Pritchard building, the Cherberg building, and
the Newhouse building, and may use modular space. Decisions on the use
of space for the Pritchard building will be made by legislative
leadership by July 1, 2001, to make it available for use by the
legislature by April 1, 2002;
(d) The department shall temporarily move the state library from
the Pritchard building by October 1, 2001, and, if needed, the
department shall lease storage facilities in Thurston county for books
and other library assets;
(e) The department shall make temporary accommodations for other
tenants of the state legislative building as follows:
(i) The office of the insurance commissioner shall be temporarily
moved to leased space in Thurston county;
(ii) The office of the governor shall be moved to the Insurance
building;
(iii) The primary office of the code reviser and the lieutenant
governor shall be moved to a location on the west capitol campus; and
(iv) The other tenants, including the office of the state
treasurer, the office of the state auditor, and the office of the
secretary of state shall be moved to leased space in Thurston county;
(f) The state legislative building shall be completely vacated by
the office of the governor, the office of the secretary of state, the
office of treasurer, and the office of the state auditor by November 1,
2001, and by the legislature fourteen days after the end of the 2002
legislative session to make it available for renovation by the
contractor; and
(g) State contracts for the legislative building renovation,
Nisqually earthquake repair, and future earthquake mitigation shall
conform to all rules, regulations, and requirements of the federal
emergency management agency.
(3) The state capitol committee, in conjunction with a legislative
building renovation oversight committee consisting of two members from
both the house of representatives and senate, each appointed by
legislative leadership, shall periodically advise the department
regarding the rehabilitation, the receipt and use of private funds, and
other issues that may arise.
(4) The department shall report on the progress of accelerated
planning, design, and relocations related to the renovation of the
state legislative building to the legislature and the governor by July
15, 2001, and November 15, 2001, and shall consult with the legislature
and governor on major decisions including placement of the cafeteria
and exiting stairs in the legislative building by August 31, 2001.
(5) In the event of any conflicts between the conditions and
limitations in this section and section 3, chapter 123, Laws of 2001,
the conditions and limitations of this section shall apply.
(((6) $154,000 of the capitol historic district construction
account appropriation is provided solely for the department of general
administration to contract for fund-raising services for the
solicitation of charitable gifts, grants, or donations specifically for
the purpose of preservation and restoration of the state legislative
building and related educational exhibits and programs. By June 30,
2004, the amount provided by this subsection shall be reinvested to the
capitol historic district construction account from the proceeds of the
gifts, grants, and donations.))

Reappropriation:
Capitol Building Construction Account -- State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities
Account -- State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

Appropriation:
Capitol Historic District Construction
Account -- State . . . . . . . . . . . . $81,681,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities
Account -- State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $82,981,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,300,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,781,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to 2001 2nd sp.s. c
8 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Parks Hall Fire Damage (03-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 2002 c 238 s 204 (uncodified) is repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---