BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that grade crossing,
rail trespass, and other safety issues continue to present a public
safety problem.
The legislature further finds that with the increased importance of
rail to freight and commuter mobility, there is a direct public benefit
in assisting local communities and railroads to work together to
address rail-related public safety concerns.

Sec. 2 RCW 81.53.271 and 1982 c 94 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The petition shall set forth by description the location of the
crossing or crossings, the type of signal or other warning device to be
installed, the necessity from the standpoint of public safety for such
installation, the approximate cost of installation and related work,
and the approximate annual cost of maintenance. If the commission
directs the installation of a grade crossing protective device, and a
federal-aid funding program is available to participate in the costs of
such installation, ((both)) installation and maintenance costs of the
device shall be apportioned in accordance with the provisions of RCW
81.53.295. Otherwise if installation is directed by the commission, it
shall apportion the cost of installation and maintenance as provided in
this section:
(1) Installation: (((1))) (a) The first twenty thousand dollars
shall be apportioned to the grade crossing protective fund created by
RCW 81.53.281; and
(b) The remainder of the cost shall be apportioned as follows:
(i) Sixty percent to the grade crossing protective fund, created by
RCW 81.53.281;
(((2))) (ii) Thirty percent to the city, town, county, or state;
and
(((3))) (iii) Ten percent to the railroad:
PROVIDED, That, if the proposed installation is located at a new
crossing requested by a city, town, county, or state, forty percent of
the cost shall be apportioned to the city, town, county, or state, and
none to the railroad. If the proposed installation is located at a new
crossing requested by a railroad, then the entire cost shall be
apportioned to the railroad. In the event the city, town, county, or
state should concurrently petition the commission and secure an order
authorizing the closure of an existing crossing or crossings in
proximity to the crossing for which installation of signals or other
warning devices shall have been directed, the apportionment to the
petitioning city, town, county, or state shall be reduced by ten
percent of the total cost for each crossing ordered closed and the
apportionment from the grade crossing protective fund increased
accordingly. This exception shall not be construed to permit a charge
to the grade crossing protective fund in an amount greater than the
total cost otherwise apportionable to the city, town, county, or state.
No reduction shall be applied where one crossing is closed and another
opened in lieu thereof, nor to crossings of a private nature.
(2) Maintenance: (((1))) (a) Twenty-five percent to the grade
crossing protective fund, created by RCW 81.53.281; and
(((2))) (b) Seventy-five percent to the railroad:
PROVIDED, That if the proposed installation is located at a new
crossing requested by a railroad, then the entire cost shall be
apportioned to the railroad.

Sec. 3 RCW 81.53.281 and 1998 c 245 s 166 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby created in the state treasury a "grade crossing
protective fund((,))" to ((which shall be transferred all moneys
appropriated for the purpose of carrying)) carry out the provisions of
RCW 81.53.261, 81.53.271, 81.53.281, 81.53.291, and 81.53.295; for
grants and/or subsidies to public, private, and nonprofit entities for
rail safety projects authorized or ordered by the commission; and for
personnel and associated costs related to supervising and administering
rail safety grants and/or subsidies. The commission shall transfer
from the public service revolving fund's miscellaneous fees and
penalties accounts moneys appropriated for these purposes as needed.
At the time the commission makes each allocation of cost to said grade
crossing protective fund, it shall certify that such cost shall be
payable out of said fund. ((When federal-aid highway funds are not
involved, the railroad shall, upon completion of the installation of
any such signal or other protective device and related work, present
its claim for reimbursement for the cost of installation and related
work from said fund of the amount allocated thereto by the commission.
The annual cost of maintenance shall be presented and paid in a like
manner.)) When federal-aid highway funds are involved, the department
of transportation shall, upon entry of an order by the commission
requiring the installation or upgrading of a grade crossing protective
device, submit to the commission an estimate for the cost of the
proposed installation and related work. Upon receipt of the estimate
the commission shall pay to the department of transportation the
percentage of the estimate specified in RCW 81.53.295, as now or
hereafter amended, to be used as the grade crossing protective fund
portion of the cost of the installation and related work. ((The
commission is hereby authorized to recover administrative costs from
said fund in an amount not to exceed three percent of the direct
appropriation provided for any biennium, and in the event
administrative costs exceed three percent of the appropriation, the
excess shall be chargeable to regulatory fees paid by railroads
pursuant to RCW 81.24.010.
The office of financial management shall direct the state treasurer
to transfer to the motor vehicle fund an amount not to exceed
$1,331,000 from the grade crossing protective fund for the 1987-89
fiscal biennium.))
The commission may adopt rules for the allocation of money from the
grade crossing protective fund.

--- END ---