BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.17.695 and 1991 c 342 s 38 are each amended to read
as follows:
A state highway to be known as state route number 513 is
established as follows:
Beginning at a junction with state route number 520 in Seattle,
((thence)) then northerly ((and easterly)) to the vicinity of ((Sand
Point)) Northeast Pacific Street.

--- END ---