BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 57.08.050 and 2000 c 138 s 212 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to subsection (5) of this section, public work, other
than ordinary maintenance, of a value of not more than ten percent of
the public works construction budget for the year, as expressed in a
capital improvement plan adopted by resolution of the board of
commissioners, shall be performed by employees of the district, all
work ordered, the estimated cost of which is in excess of ((five))
twenty-five thousand dollars, shall be let by contract and competitive
bidding. Before awarding any such contract the board of commissioners
shall publish a notice in a newspaper of general circulation where the
district is located at least once thirteen days before the last date
upon which bids will be received, inviting sealed proposals for such
work, plans and specifications which must at the time of publication of
such notice be on file in the office of the board of commissioners
subject to the public inspection. The notice shall state generally the
work to be done and shall call for proposals for doing the same to be
sealed and filed with the board of commissioners on or before the day
and hour named therein.
Each bid shall be accompanied by a certified or cashier's check or
postal money order payable to the order of the county treasurer for a
sum not less than five percent of the amount of the bid, or accompanied
by a bid bond in an amount not less than five percent of the bid with
a corporate surety licensed to do business in the state, conditioned
that the bidder will pay the district as liquidated damages the amount
specified in the bond, unless the bidder enters into a contract in
accordance with the bidder's bid, and no bid shall be considered unless
accompanied by such check, cash or bid bond. At the time and place
named such bids shall be publicly opened and read and the board of
commissioners shall proceed to canvass the bids and may let such
contract to the lowest responsible bidder upon plans and specifications
on file or to the best bidder submitting the bidder's own plans and
specifications. The board of commissioners may reject all bids for
good cause and readvertise and in such case all checks, cash or bid
bonds shall be returned to the bidders. If the contract is let, then
all checks, cash, or bid bonds shall be returned to the bidders, except
that of the successful bidder, which shall be retained until a contract
shall be entered into for doing the work, and a bond to perform such
work furnished with sureties satisfactory to the board of commissioners
in the full amount of the contract price between the bidder and the
commission in accordance with the bid. If the bidder fails to enter
into the contract in accordance with the bid and furnish the bond
within ten days from the date at which the bidder is notified that the
bidder is the successful bidder, the check, cash, or bid bonds and the
amount thereof shall be forfeited to the district. If the bidder fails
to enter into a contract in accordance with the bidder's bid, and the
board of commissioners deems it necessary to take legal action to
collect on any bid bond required by this section, then the district
shall be entitled to collect from the bidder any legal expenses,
including reasonable attorneys' fees occasioned thereby. A low bidder
who claims error and fails to enter into a contract is prohibited from
bidding on the same project if a second or subsequent call for bids is
made for the project.
(2) As an alternative to requirements under subsection (1) of this
section, a water-sewer district may let contracts using the small works
roster process under RCW 39.04.155.
(3) Any purchase of materials, supplies, or equipment, with an
estimated cost in excess of ten thousand dollars, shall be by contract.
Any purchase of materials, supplies, or equipment, with an estimated
cost of less than fifty thousand dollars shall be made using the
process provided in RCW 39.04.190. Any purchase of materials,
supplies, or equipment with an estimated cost of fifty thousand dollars
or more shall be made by competitive bidding following the procedure
for letting contracts for projects under subsection (1) of this
section.
(4) The board may waive the competitive bidding requirements of
this section pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption contained within
that section applies to the purchase or public work.
(5) Whenever a water-sewer district shall, subject to the
limitation expressed in subsection (1) of this section, have public
works performed by employees of the water-sewer district during a
calendar year exceeding one percent of the public works construction
budget, a report shall be prepared and made available to the state
auditor.

--- END ---