BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.13A RCW
to read as follows:
A city may not assume, under this chapter, the jurisdiction of all
or part of a water-sewer district serving a population greater than
thirty thousand residents and containing, within its boundaries, the
territory of four or more cities, or three cities and unincorporated
territory of more than five hundred acres, unless voters of the entire
water-sewer district approve a ballot proposition authorizing the
assumption under general election law. The cost of the election shall
be borne by the city seeking approval to assume jurisdiction of a
water-sewer district.

--- END ---