BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 80.24.010 and 1994 c 83 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every public service company subject to regulation by the
commission shall, on or before the date specified by the commission for
filing annual reports under RCW 80.04.080, file with the commission a
statement on oath showing its gross operating revenue from intrastate
operations for the preceding calendar year or portion thereof and pay
to the commission a fee equal to one-tenth of one percent of the first
fifty thousand dollars of gross operating revenue, plus two-tenths of
one percent of any gross operating revenue in excess of fifty thousand
dollars: PROVIDED, That the ((fee shall in no case be less than))
commission may, by rule, set minimum fees that do not exceed one
hundred dollars. The commission may by rule waive any or all of the
minimum fee established pursuant to this section.
The percentage rates of gross operating revenue to be paid in any
year may be decreased by the commission for any class of companies
subject to the payment of such fees, by general order entered before
March 1st of such year, and for such purpose such companies shall be
classified as follows:
Electrical, gas, water, telecommunications, and irrigation
companies shall constitute class one. Every other company subject to
regulation by the commission, for which regulatory fees are not
otherwise fixed by law shall pay fees as herein provided and shall
constitute additional classes according to kinds of businesses engaged
in.
Any payment of the fee imposed by this section made after its due
date shall include a late fee of two percent of the amount due.
Delinquent fees shall accrue interest at the rate of one percent per
month.

Sec. 2 RCW 81.24.010 and 1996 c 196 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every company subject to regulation by the commission, except
auto transportation companies, steamboat companies, ((wharfingers or
warehousemen,)) and motor freight carriers((, and storage
warehousemen)) shall, on or before the date specified by the commission
for filing annual reports under RCW 81.04.080, file with the commission
a statement on oath showing its gross operating revenue from intrastate
operations for the preceding calendar year, or portion thereof, and pay
to the commission a fee equal to one-tenth of one percent of the first
fifty thousand dollars of gross operating revenue, plus two-tenths of
one percent of any gross operating revenue in excess of fifty thousand
dollars, except railroad companies which shall each pay to the
commission a fee equal to one and one-half percent of its intrastate
gross operating revenue. ((However, the fee shall in no case be less
than)) The commission may, by rule, set minimum fees that do not
exceed one hundred dollars. The commission may by rule waive any or
all of the minimum fee established pursuant to this section. Any
railroad association that qualifies as a not-for-profit charitable
organization under the federal internal revenue code section 501(c)(3)
is exempt from the fee required under this subsection.
(2) The percentage rates of gross operating revenue to be paid in
any one year may be decreased by the commission for any class of
companies subject to the payment of such fees, by general order entered
before March 1st of such year, and for such purpose such companies
shall be classified as follows: Railroad, express, sleeping car, and
toll bridge companies shall constitute class two. Every other company
subject to regulation by the commission, for which regulatory fees are
not otherwise fixed by law shall pay fees as herein provided and shall
constitute additional classes according to kinds of businesses engaged
in.

Sec. 3 RCW 81.24.020 and 1997 c 215 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((By May 1st of each year)) On or before the date specified by the
commission for filing annual reports under RCW 81.04.080, every auto
transportation company must file with the commission a statement
showing its gross operating revenue from intrastate operations for the
preceding year and pay to the commission a fee of two-fifths of one
percent of the amount of gross operating revenue. ((However, the fee
paid shall in no case be less than two dollars and fifty cents.)) The
commission may, by rule, set minimum fees that do not exceed one
hundred dollars. The commission may by rule waive any or all of the
minimum fee established pursuant to this section.
The percentage rate of gross operating revenue to be paid in any
period may be decreased by the commission by general order entered
before the fifteenth day of the month preceding the month in which the
fee is due.

Sec. 4 RCW 81.24.030 and 1993 c 427 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every commercial ferry shall, on or before ((the first day of April
of each year)) the date specified by the commission for filing annual
reports under RCW 81.04.080, file with the commission a statement on
oath showing its gross operating revenue from intrastate operations for
the preceding calendar year, or portion thereof, and pay to the
commission a fee of two-fifths of one percent of the amount of gross
operating revenue: PROVIDED, That the ((fee so paid shall in no case
be less than five)) commission may, by rule, set minimum fees that do
not exceed one hundred dollars. The commission may by rule waive any
or all of the minimum fee established pursuant to this section. The
percentage rate of gross operating revenue to be paid in any year may
be decreased by the commission by general order entered before March
1st of such year.

Sec. 5 RCW 81.77.080 and 1989 c 431 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every solid waste collection company shall, on or before ((the 1st
day of April of each year)) the date specified by the commission for
filing annual reports under RCW 81.04.080, file with the commission a
statement on oath showing its gross operating revenue from intrastate
operations for the preceding calendar year, or portion thereof, and pay
to the commission a fee equal to one percent of the amount of gross
operating revenue: PROVIDED, That the ((fee shall in no case be less
than)) commission may, by rule, set minimum fees that do not exceed one
hundred dollars. The commission may by rule waive any or all of the
minimum fee established pursuant to this section.
It is the intent of the legislature that the fees collected under
the provisions of this chapter shall reasonably approximate the cost of
supervising and regulating motor carriers subject thereto, and to that
end the utilities and transportation commission is authorized to
decrease the schedule of fees provided in this section by general order
entered before March 1st of any year in which it determines that the
moneys then in the solid waste collection companies account of the
public service revolving fund and the fees currently to be paid will
exceed the reasonable cost of supervising and regulating such carriers.
All fees collected under this section or under any other provision
of this chapter shall be paid to the commission and shall be by it
transmitted to the state treasurer within thirty days to be deposited
to the credit of the public service revolving fund.

--- END ---