BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) The business of operating as a household goods carrier for
compensation along the highways of this state is declared to be a
business affected with the public interest; and
(b) The unlawful advertisement, use of telecommunications services,
and provision of household goods moving services by unlicensed
household goods carriers constitutes an unfair trade practice and
unfair competitive advantage over properly licensed and regulated
household goods carriers and exposes unsuspecting consumers to the risk
of theft, fraud, deception, and other forms of dishonesty.
(2) The legislature declares that the termination, alteration, or
refusal of telecommunications services utilized by unlicensed household
goods carriers is essential to ensure the public safety and welfare.
(3) The legislature intends that the utilities and transportation
commission take enforcement action in compliance with this act to
refuse or discontinue telecommunications services, including the use of
specific telephone numbers, of unlicensed household goods carriers when
other available enforcement remedies of the commission have failed to
terminate unlawful activities detrimental to the public safety and
welfare.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The superior court of a county has the
power, upon petition of the commission, to order any entity providing
telecommunication services, including wireless telecommunications
service, to refuse or terminate telecommunications services, or to
change or terminate a telephone number with no call forwarding from the
previous telephone number, of an entity advertising for or providing
household goods moving services in violation of the laws requiring a
household goods permit. The court shall issue the order, with or
without hearing, if it finds that:
(1) The telecommunications subscriber is advertising or holding out
to the public to perform, or is performing, household goods carrier
services without having in force a permit issued by the commission;
(2) The telecommunications service, or telephone number, is being
used or is to be used as an instrumentality, directly or indirectly, to
violate or to assist in violation of the laws requiring a household
goods carrier permit;
(3) The commission has made a good faith effort through other
enforcement remedies to terminate unlawful household goods carrier
services including, at a minimum, issuance of a cease and desist order;
and
(4) The order is necessary for public safety and welfare.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 In the event the court orders termination of
the use of a telephone number by a subscriber or orders a changed
telephone number, the original number may not be reused by any entity
providing telecommunications services, including wireless
telecommunications service, in this state for a period of one year
unless a lesser period of time is specified by the court or if further
order of the court releases the number for reuse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Any entity providing telecommunications
services that has been ordered to refuse or terminate
telecommunications services, or to change or terminate a telephone
number, shall notify the subscriber in writing within five business
days that such action was implemented and shall provide a copy of the
court's order to the subscriber.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Any entity that believes that it has been
negatively affected by court action taken under sections 2 through 6 of
this act has the right to petition the court for reconsideration of its
order or, alternatively, to file a complaint with the commission. If
a complaint is filed with the commission, the commission shall schedule
a public hearing on the complaint to be held within twenty-one calendar
days of the filing and assignment of a docket number to the complaint.
The commission hearing must be held in accordance with its rules of
practice and procedure and is subject to judicial appeal consistent
with other general matters that come before the commission for
adjudication.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 No action at law or in equity may accrue
against any entity providing telecommunications services in this state
because of, or as a result of, any lawful act related to action under
sections 2 through 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 2 through 6 of this act are each
added to chapter 81.80 RCW.

--- END ---