BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.105.032 and 1999 c 241 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is hereby created the Washington state information
services board. The board shall be composed of fifteen members. Eight
members shall be appointed by the governor, one of whom shall be a
representative of higher education, one of whom shall be a
representative of an agency under a statewide elected official other
than the governor, and two of whom shall be representatives of the
private sector. One member shall represent the judicial branch and be
appointed by the chief justice of the supreme court. One member shall
be the superintendent of public instruction or shall be appointed by
the superintendent of public instruction. Two members shall represent
the house of representatives and shall be selected by the speaker of
the house of representatives with one representative chosen from each
caucus of the house of representatives; two members shall represent the
senate and shall be appointed by the president of the senate with one
representative chosen from each caucus of the senate. One member shall
be the director who shall be a voting member of the board. These
members shall constitute the membership of the board with full voting
rights. Members of the board shall serve at the pleasure of the
appointing authority. The board shall select a chairperson from among
its members.
(2) Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner that the original
appointments were made.
(3) A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a
quorum for the transaction of business.
(4) Voting members of the board shall be compensated for service on
the board in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) The board may appoint additional nonvoting members to the board
as necessary.

--- END ---