BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The treasurer shall deposit one hundred percent of state
automobile parts-related sales and use tax revenue in the multimodal
transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "automobile parts-related
sales and use tax revenue" means revenue from the taxes imposed in RCW
82.08.020(1) and 82.12.020 reported on returns filed by persons engaged
in the following businesses: Automotive parts, accessories, and tire
stores; motor vehicle supplies and new part wholesalers; tire and tube
wholesalers; and motor vehicle used part wholesalers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 39.42 RCW
to read as follows:
Deposits in the multimodal transportation account under section 1
of this act may not be deducted from the calculation of general state
revenues under RCW 39.42.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---