BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A city, code city, or town shall not impose a tax measured by
"gross proceeds of sales," "gross income of the business," or "value
proceeding or accruing," as those terms are used in chapter 82.04 RCW,
upon any intellectual property creating activity as a taxable incident,
unless the city, code city, or town imposed such a tax on January 1,
2003. Effective January 1, 2005, all cities, code cities, and towns
are prohibited from imposing a tax measured by "gross proceeds of
sales," "gross income of the business," or "value proceeding or
accruing," as those terms are used in chapter 82.04 RCW, upon any
intellectual property creating activity as a taxable incident. Nothing
in this section precludes a city, town, or code city from imposing a
tax upon the sale of products that includes the benefits from
intellectual property creating activities.
(2) "Intellectual property creating activity" means research,
development, authorship, creation, or general or specific inventive
activity, without regard to whether intellectual property creating
activity actually results in the creation of patents, trademarks, trade
secrets, subject matter subject to copyright, or other intellectual
property.
(3) Fee-for-service and contract manufacturing activities shall not
be considered primarily directed at the creation of intellectual
property creating activity rights, whether or not such rights are
incidentally created in the course of conducting such activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---