BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A budget is hereby adopted and, subject
to the provisions set forth in the following sections, the several
amounts specified in parts I through VIII of this act, or so much
thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated,
are hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for salaries,
wages, and other expenses of the agencies and offices of the state and
for other specified purposes for the fiscal biennium beginning July 1,
2003, and ending June 30, 2005, except as otherwise provided, out of
the several funds of the state hereinafter named.
(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this section apply throughout this act.
(a) "Fiscal year 2004" or "FY 2004" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2004.
(b) "Fiscal year 2005" or "FY 2005" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2005.
(c) "FTE" means full time equivalent.
(d) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an
unappropriated status.
(e) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only
for the specified purpose. Unless otherwise specifically authorized in
this act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified
purpose which is unnecessary to fulfill the specified purpose shall
lapse.

PART I
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,414,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,619,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,078,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 FOR THE SENATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,357,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,530,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,932,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW
COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,711,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,822,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,533,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND
ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,827,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,970,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,797,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 FOR THE OFFICE OF THE STATE ACTUARY
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,143,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS
COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,127,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,128,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,255,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 FOR THE STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,129,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,144,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,273,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 FOR THE SUPREME COURT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,841,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,106,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,947,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 FOR THE LAW LIBRARY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,384,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,847,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,231,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,958,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,306,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,264,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111 FOR THE COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $973,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $966,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,939,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 112 FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,423,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,542,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,559,000
State Agency Parking Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
Judicial Information Systems Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,645,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $91,170,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $223,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely for the gender and justice commission.
(2) $308,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely for the minority and justice
commission.
(3) $388,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $393,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005, and $263,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation are provided solely for the workload associated with tax
warrants and other state cases filed in Thurston county.
(4) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for court-appointed special
advocates in dependancy matters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 113 FOR THE OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $878,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,171,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,609,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,658,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 114 FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,068,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,919,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,150,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,903,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,040,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,903,000 of the water quality account appropriation and
$1,150,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation are provided
solely for the Puget Sound water quality action team to implement the
Puget Sound work plan and agency action items PSAT-01 through PSAT-05.
(2) $300,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 shall be used to develop and disseminate
scientifically-based, voluntary, kindergarten readiness standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 115 FOR THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $431,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $438,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $869,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 116 FOR THE PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,883,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,892,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,775,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 117 FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,929,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,890,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,996,000
Archives and Records Management Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,098,000
Archives and Records Management Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,101,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,014,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,296,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's
share of primary and general election costs and the costs of conducting
mandatory recounts on state measures. Counties shall be reimbursed
only for those odd-year election costs that the secretary of state
validates as eligible for reimbursement.
(2) $1,826,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $2,686,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the verification of initiative
and referendum petitions, maintenance of related voter registration
records, and the publication and distribution of the voters and
candidates pamphlet.
(3) $125,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $118,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for legal advertising of state
measures under RCW 29.27.072.
(4)(a) $1,944,004 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2004 and $1,986,772 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for contracting
with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television
coverage of state government deliberations and other events of
statewide significance during the 2003-2005 biennium. The funding
level for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount
provided in this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall be
required to raise contributions or commitments to make contributions,
in cash or in kind, in an amount equal to forty percent of the state
contribution. The office of the secretary of state may make full or
partial payment once all criteria in (a) and (b) of this subsection
have been satisfactorily documented.
(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding
is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage
of public affairs. For that purpose, the secretary of state shall
enter into a four-year contract with the nonprofit organization to
provide public affairs coverage through June 30, 2006.
(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent
audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including
benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in
meeting the intent of the program.
(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection
may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:
(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any
legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any
county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of
Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any
rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state
agency;
(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or
(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel,
lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.
(5) $867,000 of the archives and records management account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for operation of the central
microfilming bureau under RCW 40.14.020(8).
(6) $6,340,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 is provided solely to reimburse the counties for the state's
share of the cost of conducting the presidential primary.
(7) $600,000 of the archives and record management--private/local
appropriation is provided solely to assist local governments in
disaster recovery efforts to protect and preserve archival documents,
upon approval of the director of financial management. A committee
composed of the secretary of state, or designee, the state archivist,
one county auditor, one county clerk member of the archives oversight
committee, and a representative from the office of financial management
shall establish the funding criteria and process by September 30, 2003.
The division of archives shall submit an annual report to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
disaster recovery costs from this appropriation by individual disaster.
The report shall include: (a) Estimates of total costs; (b) actual
expenditures to date; and (c) estimates of total remaining expenditures
to be paid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 118 FOR THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN
AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $252,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $245,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $497,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $10,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 is provided solely to facilitate the
colocation, including remodeling costs, of the office of Indian Affairs
into the same facility shared by the commission on Asian Pacific
American Affairs, commission on African American Affairs, and the
commission on Hispanic Affairs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 119 FOR THE COMMISSION ON ASIAN-AMERICAN
AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $194,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $197,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $391,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 120 FOR THE STATE TREASURER
State Treasurer's Service Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,528,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 121 FOR THE STATE AUDITOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $812,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $827,000
State Auditing Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,274,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,913,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Audits of school districts by the division of municipal
corporations shall include findings regarding the accuracy of: (a)
Student enrollment data; and (b) the experience and education of the
district's certified instructional staff, as reported to the
superintendent of public instruction for allocation of state funding.
(2) $812,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $827,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for staff and related costs to
verify the accuracy of reported school district data submitted for
state funding purposes; conduct school district program audits of state
funded public school programs; establish the specific amount of state
funding adjustments whenever audit exceptions occur and the amount is
not firmly established in the course of regular public school audits;
and to assist the state special education safety net committee when
requested.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 122 FOR THE CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES
FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $77,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $153,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $230,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 123 FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,179,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,288,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,879,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $604,000
New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,193,000
Legal Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $167,621,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $181,034,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual
legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for
each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to
the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the
end of each fiscal year.
(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim
against the state, that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney
general shall notify the director of financial management and the
chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of
representatives committee on appropriations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 124 FOR THE CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $631,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $640,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,271,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 125 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,291,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,821,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $197,660,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,606,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,107,000
Public Works Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,936,000
Building Code Council Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,072,000
Administrative Contingency Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,774,000
Low-Income Weatherization Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,293,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,509,000
Manufactured Home Installation Training Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $259,000
Community and Economic Development Fee Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,909,000
Washington Housing Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,786,000
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $629,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $370,652,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,838,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $2,838,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for a contract with the Washington
technology center. For work essential to the mission of the Washington
technology center and conducted in partnership with universities, the
center shall not pay any increased indirect rate nor increases in other
indirect charges above the absolute amount paid during the 1995-97
fiscal biennium.
(2) $61,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $62,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound work plan and agency action item OCD-01.
(3) $9,992,458 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely for the drug control and system improvement formula
grant program, to be distributed in state fiscal year 2004 as follows:
(a) $3,551,972 to local units of government to continue
multijurisdictional narcotics task forces;
(b) $611,177 to the department to continue the drug prosecution
assistance program in support of multijurisdictional narcotics task
forces;
(c) $1,343,603 to the Washington state patrol for coordination,
investigative, and supervisory support to the multijurisdictional
narcotics task forces and for methamphetamine education and response;
(d) $89,533 to the department for grants to support tribal law
enforcement needs;
(e) $976,897 to the department of social and health services,
division of alcohol and substance abuse, for drug courts in eastern and
western Washington;
(f) $298,246 to the department for training and technical
assistance of public defenders representing clients with special needs;
(g) $687,155 to the department to continue domestic violence legal
advocacy;
(h) $890,150 to the department of social and health services,
juvenile rehabilitation administration, to continue youth violence
prevention and intervention projects;
(i) $89,705 to the department to continue the governor's council on
substance abuse;
(j) $97,591 to the department to continue evaluation of Byrne
formula grant programs;
(k) $543,071 to the office of financial management for criminal
history records improvement;
(l) $813,358 to the department for required grant administration,
monitoring, and reporting on Byrne formula grant programs.
These amounts represent the maximum Byrne grant expenditure
authority for each program. No program may expend Byrne grant funds in
excess of the amounts provided in this subsection. If moneys in excess
of those appropriated in this subsection become available, whether from
prior or current fiscal year Byrne grant distributions, the department
shall hold these moneys in reserve and may not expend them without
specific appropriation. These moneys shall be carried forward and
applied to the pool of moneys available for appropriation for programs
and projects in the succeeding fiscal year. As part of its budget
request for the succeeding year, the department shall estimate and
request authority to spend any funds remaining in reserve as a result
of this subsection.
(4) $5,085,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $5,085,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005, $4,250,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation, and $6,145,000 of the Washington housing trust account
are provided solely for providing housing and shelter for homeless
people, including but not limited to grants to operate, repair, and
staff shelters; grants to operate transitional housing; partial
payments for rental assistance; consolidated emergency assistance;
overnight youth shelters; and emergency shelter assistance.
(5) Up to $300,000 of the Washington housing trust account
appropriation shall be used to study the impacts of publicly funded
housing projects on local services such as, but not limited to, fire
and police services.
(6) $697,000 of the community economic development account
appropriation is provided solely for support of the developmental
disabilities endowment governing board and costs of the endowment
program. The governing board may use appropriations to implement a
sliding-scale fee waiver for families earning below 150 percent of the
state median family income.
(7) Repayments of outstanding loans granted under RCW 43.63A.600,
the mortgage and rental assistance program, shall be remitted to the
department, including any current revolving account balances. The
department shall contract with a lender or contract collection agent to
act as a collection agent of the state. The lender or contract
collection agent shall collect payments on outstanding loans, and
deposit them into an interest-bearing account. The funds collected
shall be remitted to the department quarterly. Interest earned in the
account may be retained by the lender or contract collection agent, and
shall be considered a fee for processing payments on behalf of the
state. Repayments of loans granted under chapter 43.63A RCW shall be
made to the lender or contract collection agent as long as the loan is
outstanding, notwithstanding the repeal of the chapter.
(8) $4,609,000 of the public safety and education account and
$2,973,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account are
provided solely for civil indigent legal services.
(9) $26,862,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $26,862,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for providing early childhood
education assistance.
(10) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for implementing the industries of
the future strategy.
(11) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for technical assistance services
targeted to socially and economically disadvantaged businesses
including those owned and controlled by women and minorities;
certification of small businesses that are owned and controlled by
ethnic minorities, women, and socially and economically disadvantaged
persons; and facilitating access to business development resources and
capital.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 126 FOR THE ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST
COUNCIL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $515,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $521,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,036,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 127 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,319,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,722,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,677,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $242,000
State Auditing Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,985,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $1,000,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 and $500,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 shall be used to conduct
a comprehensive review of state kindergarten through twelfth grade
funding, including an examination of teacher compensation issues.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 128 FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS
Administrative Hearings Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,914,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 129 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN RESOURCES
Dependent Care Administrative Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,955,000
Higher Education Personnel Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,624,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,176,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,757,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,083,000 of retirement systems expense account appropriation
is provided solely for the support of the information systems project
known as the electronic document image management system.
(2) $77,000 of the retirement systems expense account appropriation
is provided solely for the modifications to the retirement information
systems to meet new federal compliance requirements.
(3) $21,000 of the retirement systems expense account appropriation
is provided solely for the modifications to the retirement information
systems to allow for annual changes to member contribution rates.
(4) If legislation to create the department of human resources is
not enacted by June 30, 2003, the appropriations of the department of
personnel service account and the higher education personnel services
account shall be transferred to the department of personnel, and the
appropriations of the dependent care administrative account and the
department of retirement systems expense account shall be transferred
to the department of retirement systems.
(5) The department shall coordinate with the governor's office of
Indian Affairs on providing a one-day government to government training
session for federal, state, local, and tribal government employees.
The training session must cover tribal historical perspectives, legal
issues, tribal sovereignty, and tribal governments. Costs of the
training session shall be recouped through a fee charged to the
participants of the training session.
(6) The department is authorized to enter into a financing contract
for up to $30,700,000, plus necessary financing expenses and required
reserves, pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. The contract shall be to
purchase, develop, and operationalize a new statewide payroll system
and shall be for a term of not more than twelve years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 130 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY
Lottery Administrative Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,304,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 131 FOR THE COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $203,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $206,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $409,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 132 FOR THE COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN
AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $197,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $201,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $398,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 133 FOR THE PERSONNEL APPEALS BOARD
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,744,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 134 FOR THE STATE INVESTMENT BOARD
State Investment Board Expense Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,984,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 135 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $79,733,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,270,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,249,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $101,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $165,434,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 136 FOR THE BOARD OF TAX APPEALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,160,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,018,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,178,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 137 FOR THE MUNICIPAL RESEARCH COUNCIL
County Research Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $827,000
City and Town Research Services -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,142,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,969,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 138 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $265,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $274,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,222,000
General Administration Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,870,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,631,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 139 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION
SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Data Processing Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,603,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,603,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $1,000,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the
digital learning commons to create a demonstration project, in
collaboration with schools, which will provide a web-based portal where
students, parents, and teachers from around the state will have access
to digital resources, learning tools, and online classes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 140 FOR THE INSURANCE COMMISSIONER
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $635,000
Insurance Commissioners Regulatory Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,601,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,236,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 141 FOR THE BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY
Certified Public Accountants' Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,643,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 142 FOR THE FORENSIC INVESTIGATION COUNCIL
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $274,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $250,000 of the death investigation
account appropriation is provided solely for providing financial
assistance to local jurisdictions in multiple death investigations.
The forensic investigation council shall develop criteria for awarding
these funds for multiple death investigations involving an
unanticipated, extraordinary, and catastrophic event or those involving
multiple jurisdictions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 143 FOR THE LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD
Liquor Control Board Construction and Maintenance
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,717,000
Liquor Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $136,854,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $142,571,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,000,000 of the liquor revolving account appropriation is
provided solely for the costs associated with the completion of the
merchandising business system. Actual expenditures are limited to the
balance of funds remaining from the $4,800,000 appropriation provided
for the merchandise business system in the 2001-03 budget.
(2) $2,395,000 of the liquor revolving account appropriation is
provided solely for the costs associated with opening new state liquor
stores in areas of the state that are underserved due to rapid
population growth and with relocating current state liquor stores to
more convenient locations for customers.
(3) $1,921,000 of the liquor revolving account appropriation is
provided solely for the costs associated with purchasing merchandise
business system software and hardware-related items; hiring system-related staff; and expanding the network bandwidth to maximize
transmission speeds for system business transactions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 144 FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION
COMMISSION
Public Service Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,605,000
Pipeline Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,817,000
Pipeline Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,093,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,515,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 145 FOR THE BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS
Volunteer Firefighters' and Reserve Officers' Administrative
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $704,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 146 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,831,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,882,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $102,826,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $374,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,295,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $190,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $292,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,391,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,804,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $215,885,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $190,000 of the disaster response account--state appropriation
is provided solely to develop and implement a disaster grant management
system. The military department shall also submit a report quarterly
to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal
committees detailing information on the disaster response account,
including: (a) The amount and type of deposits into the account; (b)
the current available fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c)
the projected fund balance at the end of the 2003-05 biennium based on
current revenue and expenditure patterns.
(2) $10,157,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account--state
appropriation and $43,804,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account--federal appropriation are provided solely for response and recovery
costs associated with the February 28, 2001, earthquake. The military
department shall submit a report quarterly to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing earthquake
recovery costs, including: (a) Estimates of total costs; (b)
incremental changes from the previous estimate; (c) actual
expenditures; (d) estimates of total remaining costs to be paid; and
(e) estimates of future payments by biennium. This information shall
be displayed by fund, by type of assistance, and by amount paid on
behalf of state agencies or local organizations. The military
department shall also submit a report quarterly to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
information on the Nisqually earthquake account, including: (a) The
amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available
fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund
balance at the end of the 2003-05 biennium based on current revenue and
expenditure patterns.
(3) $6,234,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account--state
appropriation is provided solely to cover other response and recovery
costs associated with the Nisqually earthquake that are not eligible
for federal emergency management agency reimbursement. Prior to
expending funds provided in this subsection, the military department
shall obtain prior approval of the director of financial management.
Prior to approving any single project of over $1,000,000, the office of
financial management shall notify the fiscal committees of the
legislature. The military department is to submit a quarterly report
detailing the costs authorized under this subsection to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees.
(4) $850,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $75,000,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for homeland security, to be distributed as
follows:
(a) $56,250,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation to local
units of government for homeland security purposes, provided that if
any communications equipment is purchased it should be in keeping with
standards set by the Washington state interoperability executive
committee;
(b) $315,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation to the
department to conduct the terrorism consequence management program;
(c) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $375,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation to
the department to conduct a critical infrastructure assessment;
(d) $500,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation to the
office of financial management for the citizen corp and the community
emergency response teams;
(e) $3,001,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation to the
Washington state patrol for ferry inspections and security;
(f) $527,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation to the
Washington state patrol for inspection of commercial vehicles at ports
of entry;
(g) $5,203,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation to the
Washington state patrol for replacement of radios;
(h) $6,534,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation to the
Washington state patrol to design and implement a statewide
interoperable communications system;
(i) $45,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation to the
department of agriculture to complete a risk assessment of the food
supply infrastructure and assets from farm to market;
(j) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation and
$2,250,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation to the department
in order to develop, monitor, coordinate, and manage statewide homeland
security programs, including required grant administration, monitoring,
and reporting.
These amounts represent the maximum homeland security expenditure
authority for each program. No program may expend funds in excess of
the amounts provided in this subsection. If federal moneys in excess
of the total amount appropriated in this subsection become available,
whether from prior or current fiscal year federal distributions, the
department shall hold these moneys in reserve and may not expend them
without specific appropriation. These moneys shall be carried forward
and applied to the pool of moneys available for appropriation for
programs and projects in the succeeding fiscal year. Funding is
contingent upon receipt of federal awards. If federal awards are less
than the amount provided in this subsection, federal funding in (j) of
this subsection shall be adjusted to no more than three percent of the
federal award and state funding shall be no more than the amount
necessary to provide state match; (e) through (i) of this subsection
shall be reduced in reverse order. As part of its budget request in
each year, the department shall estimate and request authority to spend
any federal funds received for homeland security purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 147 FOR THE PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS
COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,384,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,461,000
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,548,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,393,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 148 FOR THE GROWTH PLANNING HEARINGS BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,656,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,588,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,244,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 149 FOR THE STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER
State Convention and Trade Center Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,037,000
State Convention and Trade Center Operating Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,581,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,618,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 150 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GAMING
Horse Racing Commission Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,528,000

If legislation to create the department of gaming is not enacted by
June 30, 2003, the appropriations of the horse racing commission
account shall be transferred to the horse racing commission.

(End of part)

PART II
HUMAN SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES. (1) Appropriations made in this act to the department of
social and health services shall initially be allotted as required by
this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include
transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly
provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys
that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other
than that purpose, except as expressly provided in subsection (3) of
this section.
(2) The department of social and health services shall not initiate
any services that will require expenditure of state general fund moneys
unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department
may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282,
federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal
funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in
excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives
unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation
providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated
state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys
under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify
the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(3) The appropriations to the department of social and health
services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the
amounts specified in this act.
(4) In the event the department receives additional unrestricted
federal funds or achieves savings in excess of that anticipated in this
act, the department shall use up to $5,000,000 of such funds to
initiate a pilot project providing integrated support services to
homeless individuals needing mental health services, alcohol or
substance abuse treatment, medical care, or who demonstrate community
safety concerns. Before such a pilot project is initiated, the
department shall notify the fiscal committees of the legislature of the
plans for such a pilot project including the source of funds to be
used.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $227,967,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $236,974,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $411,926,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,489,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $878,768,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $77,765,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $79,472,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,224,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,098,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,092,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,338,000
Juvenile Accountability Incentive Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,231,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $222,220,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $6,092,000 of the public safety and education account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for distribution to county juvenile
court administrators to fund the costs of processing children in need
of services and at-risk youth petitions. The department shall not
retain any portion of these funds to cover administrative or any other
departmental costs. The department, in conjunction with the juvenile
court administrators, shall develop an equitable funding distribution
formula. The formula shall neither reward counties with higher than
average per-petition processing costs nor shall it penalize counties
with lower than average per-petition processing costs.
(2) Each quarter during the 2001-03 fiscal biennium, each county
shall report the number of petitions processed and the total actual
costs of processing the petitions in each of the following categories:
Children in need of services, and at-risk youth. Counties shall submit
the reports to the department no later than 45 days after the end of
the quarter. The department shall forward this information to the
chair and ranking minority member of the house of representatives
appropriations committee and the senate ways and means committee no
later than 60 days after a quarter ends. These reports are deemed
informational in nature and are not for the purpose of distributing
funds.
(3) The juvenile rehabilitation administration, in consultation
with the juvenile court administrators, may agree on a formula to allow
the transfer of funds among amounts appropriated for consolidated
juvenile services, community juvenile accountability act grants, the
chemically dependent disposition alternative, and the special sex
offender disposition alternative.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $325,435,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $341,073,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $509,883,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,351,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,450,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,205,192,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is available under the limited
casualty program under RCW 74.09.700(1) to cover inpatient psychiatric
care provided to persons defined by the department as requiring
inpatient psychiatric care who are uninusured and who either meet
eligibility requirements set forth by the department or who are
involuntarily committed for inpatient psychiatric care specified under
the involuntary treatment act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $330,767,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $339,433,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $593,452,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,228,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $791,000
Telecommunications Devices for the Hearing
Impaired and Speech Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,782,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,277,453,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $512,663,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $530,984,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,078,200,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,368,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,723,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,144,938,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted
average nursing facility payment rate shall be no more than $127.45 for
fiscal year 2004, and no more than $129.71 for fiscal year 2005.
(2) In accordance with chapter 8, Laws of 2001 1st sp. sess.
(nursing home rates), the department shall issue certificates of
capital authorization which result in up to $27 million of increased
asset value completed and ready for occupancy in fiscal year 2004; and
in up to $27 million of increased asset value completed and ready for
occupancy in fiscal year 2005.
(3) Adult day health services shall not be considered a duplication
of services for persons receiving care in long-term care settings
licensed under chapter 18.20, 72.36, or 70.128 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $391,017,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $397,332,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,436,661,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,880,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,258,890,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,734,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,802,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,721,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $630,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,708,000
Criminal Justice Treatment Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,950,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,023,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $230,568,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,342,660,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,117,768,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,709,891,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $256,159,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,900,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $740,283,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,186,661,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In accordance with RCW 74.46.625, $52,057,000 of the fiscal
year 2004 health services account appropriation, $35,016,000 of the
fiscal year 2005 health services account appropriation, and $87,074,000
of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for
supplemental payments to nursing homes operated by rural public
hospital districts. The payments shall be conditioned upon (a) a
contractual commitment by the association of public hospital districts
and participating rural public hospital districts to make an
intergovernmental transfer to the state treasurer, for deposit into the
health services account, equal to at least 98 percent of the
supplemental payments; and (b) a contractual commitment by the
participating districts to not allow expenditures covered by the
supplemental payments to be used for medicaid nursing home rate-setting. The participating districts shall retain no more than a total
of $3,500,000 for the 2003-05 biennium.
(2) $14,748,000 of the health services account appropriation for
fiscal year 2004, $14,982,000 of the health services account
appropriation for fiscal year 2005, and $29,730,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for additional
disproportionate share and medicare upper payment limit payments to
public hospital districts.
The payments shall be conditioned upon a contractual commitment by
the participating public hospital districts to make an
intergovernmental transfer to the health services account equal to at
least 91 percent of the additional payments. The state's teaching
hospitals shall retain at least 28 percent of the amounts retained by
hospitals under these programs, or the maximum allowable under the
state teaching hospitals' limits as set under federal rules, whichever
is less.
(3) $489,000 of the health services account appropriation, $508,000
of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2004, and
$508,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2005
shall be used for an interagency agreement with the health care
authority to pay for the medical assistance program's share of
administrative costs associated with the prescription drug project.
(4) Increases in managed care organization premiums in calendar
year 2004 and calendar year 2005 shall be no greater than the Seattle
consumer price index as published by the office of the forecast council
in the preceding November's statewide revenue forecast documents.
(5) $3,500,000 of the emergency medical services and trauma care
systems trust account--state appropriation is provided for trauma
assistance payments for physicians. $16,400,000 of the emergency
medical services and trauma care systems trust account--state
appropriation is provided for trauma assistance payments for hospitals
through a grant program matched with available federal funds and based
on experience from the previous year's relative amount of care
provided.
(6) The department of social and health services and the department
of health should work together to identify opportunities for early
intervention and prevention activities that can help prevent disease
and reduce oral health issues among children. Disease prevention among
infants at the age of one year and among children entering the K-12
education system provide cost-effective ways to avoid higher health
spending later in life.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,603,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,337,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $85,585,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $440,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $107,965,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,889,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,719,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,777,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $810,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $116,195,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall implement reductions
in administrative expenditures assumed in these appropriations that
achieve ongoing savings, reduce duplicative and redundant work
processes, and, where possible, eliminate entire administrative
functions and offices. The department may transfer amounts among
sections and programs to achieve these savings provided that reductions
in direct services to clients and recipients of the department shall
not be counted as administrative reductions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,857,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,857,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,562,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $121,276,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213 FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,434,000
State Health Care Authority Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,428,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $364,732,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $384,594,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $41,107,000 of the health services account -- state appropriation
is provided solely for health care services provided through local
community clinics.
(2) Within funds appropriated in this section and sections 205 and
206 of this act, the health care authority shall continue to provide an
enhanced basic health plan subsidy option for foster parents licensed
under chapter 74.15 RCW and workers in state-funded home care programs.
Under this enhanced subsidy option, foster parents and home care
workers with family incomes below 200 percent of the federal poverty
level shall be allowed to enroll in the basic health plan at a cost of
ten dollars per covered worker per month.
(3) The health care authority shall require organizations and
individuals which are paid to deliver basic health plan services and
which choose to sponsor enrollment in the subsidized basic health plan
to pay the following: (i) A minimum of fifteen dollars per enrollee
per month for persons below 100 percent of the federal poverty level;
and (ii) a minimum of twenty dollars per enrollee per month for persons
whose family income is 100 percent to 125 percent of the federal
poverty level.
(4) The administrator shall take at least the following actions to
assure that persons participating in the basic health plan are eligible
for the level of assistance they receive: (a) Require submission of
income tax returns and recent pay history from all applicants; (b)
check employment security payroll records at least once every twelve
months on all enrollees; (c) require enrollees whose income as
indicated by payroll records exceeds that upon which their subsidy is
based to document their current income as a condition of continued
eligibility; (d) require enrollees for whom employment security payroll
records cannot be obtained to document their current income at least
once every six months; and (e) pursue repayment and civil penalties
from persons who have received excessive subsidies, as provided in RCW
70.47.060(9).
(5) Enrollment is authorized in the subsidized basic health plan of
persons who, solely by reason of their immigration status, are not
eligible for medicaid coverage of their nonemergent medical care needs.
(6) $400,000 of the health services account--state appropriation is
provided for an interagency transfer to the Washington State University
college of pharmacy to establish and operate a statewide senior
prescription drug information clearinghouse.
(7) Increases in managed care organization premiums in calendar
year 2004 and calendar year 2005 shall be no greater than the Seattle
consumer price index as published by the office of the forecast council
in the preceding November's statewide revenue forecast documents.
(8) The department of health and the health care authority should
work together to identify ways to make the most effective use of state,
local, and federal funds provided to community clinics. Better
coordination among agencies at various levels of government and among
various funding streams can help improve services provided to low-income people through community clinics.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214 FOR THE HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,407,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,466,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,577,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 215 FOR THE BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE
APPEALS
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,240,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,239,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,499,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 216 FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING
COMMISSION
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,365,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,700,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account --
Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $460,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,673,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 217 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND
INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,951,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,054,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,314,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,641,000
Asbestos Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
Electrical License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,234,000
Farm Labor Revolving Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,570,000
Public Works Administration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,468,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $190,323,000
Accident Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,399,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $189,465,000
Medical Aid Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,963,000
Plumbing Certificate Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,266,000
Pressure Systems Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,841,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $478,217,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to RCW 7.68.015, the department shall operate the
crime victims compensation program within the public safety and
education account funds appropriated in this section. In the event
that cost containment measures are necessary, the department may (a)
institute copayments for services; (b) develop preferred provider
contracts; or (c) other cost containment measures. Cost containment
measures shall not include holding invoices received in one fiscal
period for payment from appropriations in subsequent fiscal periods.
No more than $5,248,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation shall be expended for department administration of the
crime victims compensation program.
(2) $141,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation shall
be used for an interagency agreement with the health care authority to
pay for the department of labor and industries' share of administrative
costs associated with the prescription drug project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 218 FOR THE INDETERMINATE SENTENCE REVIEW
BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $991,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,001,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,992,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 219 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

(1) HEADQUARTERS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,581,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,604,000
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,196,000

(2) FIELD SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,920,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,939,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $309,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,718,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,886,000

(3) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,672,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,758,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,472,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,932,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $68,834,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 220 FOR THE HOME CARE QUALITY AUTHORITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $273,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $274,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $547,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 221 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,046,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,934,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $324,274,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,897,000
Hospital Commission Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,401,000
Health Professions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,053,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,163,000
Safe Drinking Water Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,758,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,572,000
Waterworks Operator Certification -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $644,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,401,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,652,000
Medical Test Site Licensure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,726,000
Youth Tobacco Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,806,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $261,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,400,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,660,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $702,694,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department or any successor agency is authorized to raise
existing fees charged for health care assistants, commercial shellfish
paralytic shellfish poisoning, commercial shellfish licenses, and
newborn screening programs, in excess of the fiscal growth factor
established by Initiative Measure No. 601, if necessary, to meet the
actual costs of conducting business and the appropriation levels in
this section.
(2) $1,684,000 of the general fund -- state fiscal year 2004
appropriation and $1,685,000 of the general fund -- state fiscal year
2005 appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound water work plan and agency action items, DOH-01, DOH-02,
DOH-03, and DOH-04.
(3) The department of social and health services and the department
of health should work together to identify opportunities for early
intervention and prevention activities that can help prevent disease
and reduce oral health issues among children. Disease prevention among
infants at the age of one year and among children entering the K-12
education system provide cost-effective ways to avoid higher health
spending later in life.
(4) The department of health and the health care authority should
work together to identify ways to make the most effective use of state,
local, and federal funds provided to community clinics. Better
coordination among agencies at various levels of government and among
various funding streams can help improve services provided to low-income people through community clinics.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 222 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,074,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,056,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,699,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $76,829,000

(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $430,141,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $442,194,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,746,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,984,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $884,065,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The department may expend funds generated by contractual
agreements entered into for mitigation of severe overcrowding in local
jails. Any funds generated in excess of actual costs shall be
deposited in the state general fund. Expenditures shall not exceed
revenue generated by such agreements and shall be treated as recovery
of costs.
(b) The department of corrections shall accomplish personnel
reductions with the least possible impact on correctional custody
staff, community custody staff, and correctional industries. For the
purposes of this subsection, correctional custody staff means employees
responsible for the direct supervision of offenders.
(c) For the acquisition of properties and facilities, the
department of corrections is authorized to enter into financial
contracts, paid for from operating resources, for the purposes
indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW.
This authority applies to the following: Lease-develop with the option
to purchase or lease-purchase approximately 50 work release beds in
facilities throughout the state for $3,500,000.

(3) COMMUNITY SUPERVISION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,181,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,655,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,492,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $144,648,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The department of corrections shall accomplish personnel
reductions with the least possible impact on correctional custody
staff, community custody staff, and correctional industries. For the
purposes of this subsection, correctional custody staff means employees
responsible for the direct supervision of offenders.
(b) $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the department of corrections
to contract with the institute for public policy for responsibilities
assigned in chapter 196, Laws of 1999 (offender accountability act) and
sections 7 through 12 of chapter 197, Laws of 1999 (drug offender
sentencing).

(4) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $652,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $667,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,319,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $110,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 and $110,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for
transfer to the jail industries board. The board shall use the amounts
provided only for administrative expenses, equipment purchases, and
technical assistance associated with advising cities and counties in
developing, promoting, and implementing consistent, safe, and efficient
offender work programs.

(5) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,752,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,787,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,539,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 223 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE
BLIND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,825,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,846,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,350,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,101,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 224 FOR THE SENTENCING GUIDELINES COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $741,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,491,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 225 FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $269,811,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,307,000
Unemployment Compensation Administration Account --
Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $189,204,000
Administrative Contingency Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,741,000
Employment Service Administrative Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,151,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $525,214,000

(End of part)

PART III
NATURAL RESOURCES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 FOR THE COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $597,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $608,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $770,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,975,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $205,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 and $205,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for grants
to Washington Columbia River Gorge counties to implement their
responsibilities under the national scenic area management plan. Of
this amount, $390,000 is provided for Skamania county and $20,000 is
provided for Clark county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,750,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,959,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,283,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,771,000
Special Grass Seed Burning Research Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Reclamation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,778,000
Flood Control Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,031,000
State Emergency Water Projects Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $556,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,779,000
State Drought Preparedness -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,712,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account (Water
Supply Facilities) -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $603,000
Site Closure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $629,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,962,000
Wood Stove Education and Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $357,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,397,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,721,000
State Toxics Control Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $356,000
Local Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,863,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,349,000
Underground Storage Tank Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,747,000
Environmental Excellence Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $504,000
Biosolids Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $793,000
Hazardous Waste Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,216,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,676,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,237,000
Air Operating Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,687,000
Freshwater Aquatic Weeds Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,507,000
Oil Spill Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,078,000
Metals Mining Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $384,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,894,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $306,612,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,757,696 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $2,757,696 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005, $394,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation,
$2,581,000 of the state toxics account--state appropriation, $217,830
of the water quality account--state appropriation, $322,976 of the
state drought preparedness account--state appropriation, $3,748,220 of
the water quality permit account--state appropriation, and $704,942 of
the oil spill prevention account are provided solely for the
implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action items
DOE-01, DOE-02, DOE-04, DOE-05, DOE-06, DOE-07, DOE-08, and DOE-09.
(2) $4,059,000 of the state toxics control account appropriation is
provided solely for methamphetamine lab clean-up activities.
(3) $800,000 of the state toxics control account appropriation is
provided solely to implement the department's persistent,
bioaccumulative toxic chemical strategy. $54,000 of this amount shall
be allocated to the department of health to assist with this effort.
The department shall proceed with development of a chemical action plan
for Dioxin and Furans, consistent with the December 2000 proposed
strategy to continually reduce PBTs in Washington state. The plan is
to be completed by June 2005.
(4) $170,000 of the oil spill prevention account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of the Puget Sound work plan action
item UW-02 through a contract with the University of Washington's sea
grant program to develop an educational program targeted to small
spills from commercial fishing vessels, ferries, cruise ships, ports,
and marinas.
(5) $1,600,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation for
fiscal year 2004 and $1,400,000 of the oil spill prevention account
appropriation are provided solely for charter safety tug services. The
oil spill prevention account appropriation shall be placed in allotment
reserve and may only be used if federal funding or other state
mechanisms are not available as determined by the office of financial
management. Safety tug services shall include the placement of a
dedicated tug at Neah Bay for not less than 200 days in fiscal year
2004. The appropriations in this subsection are provided solely for
partial implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action
item DOE-09. Ongoing federal funding shall be requested to provide
resources to station a dedicated rescue tug at Neah Bay.
(6) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for shoreline grants to local
governments as required by the shoreline settlement agreement.
(7) Fees approved by the department of ecology in the 2003-05
biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW
43.135.055.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,563,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,912,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,681,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,000
Winter Recreation Program Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,085,000
Off Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $193,000
Snowmobile Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,677,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $339,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,080,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $104,639,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Fees approved by the state parks and recreation commission in
the 2003-05 biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor
under RCW 43.135.055.
(2) $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005, and $8,000 of the winter recreation program account -- state
appropriation are provided solely for a grant for the operation of the
Northwest avalanche center.
(3) $191,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan
and agency action item P+RC-02.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,750,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,785,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,358,000
Salmon Recovery Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,100,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Firearms Range Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,000
Recreation Resources Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,654,000
NOVA Program Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $659,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,528,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to implement priority
recommendations developed by the monitoring oversight committee as
directed by RCW 77.85.210. Within these funds, activity shall be
directed to improve monitoring oversight within watersheds, enhance
data coordination and access amongst recovery partners, and produce a
state watershed health report card.
(2) $16,000,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of the forest and fish agreement
rules. These funds will be passed through to the department of natural
resources and the department of fish and wildlife.
(3) $41,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $41,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the operation and maintenance
of the natural resources data portal.
(4) $1,313,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $1,312,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005, and $1,100,000 of the salmon recovery account are
provided to the salmon recovery funding board for distribution to lead
entities, regional recovery boards, and regional fisheries enhancement
groups. The board shall establish policies to require coordination of
funding requests from lead entities, regional recovery boards, and
regional fisheries enhancement groups to ensure that recovery efforts
are synchronized. At the discretion of the board, funding shall be
concentrated in watersheds within the highest priority salmon recovery
regions as defined by the statewide strategy to recover salmon. The
board shall also coordinate funding decisions with the northwest power
planning council to ensure maximum efficiency and investment return.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 FOR THE ENVIRONMENTAL HEARINGS OFFICE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $934,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $988,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,922,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,638,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,297,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,904,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,530,000
Off Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $346,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,687,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $562,000
Recreational Fisheries Enhancement -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,432,000
Warm Water Game Fish Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,610,000
Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,664,000
Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,543,000
Wildlife Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,290,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,974,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,627,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000
Environmental Excellence Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
Regional Fisheries Salmonid Recovery Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,752,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $992,000
Oyster Reserve Land Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $137,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $281,050,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,355,714 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $1,355,713 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005, and $402,000 of the wildlife account--state
appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the Puget
Sound work plan and agency action items DFW-01 through DFW-06.
(2) $150,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the development and implementation of an agency
strategic marketing plan. The department shall contract for
professional services to develop the commission's strategic marketing
plan. Implementation of the watchable wildlife decal program, as
outlined in Z-0189.1/03, may not occur prior to the fish and wildlife
commission's approval of the final strategic marketing plan. This plan
shall be completed by September 3, 2004.
(3) $225,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $225,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005, and $550,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation
are provided solely for the implementation of hatchery reform
recommendations defined by the hatchery scientific review group.
(4) $850,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely for stewardship and maintenance needs on agency-owned
lands and water access sites.
(5) The department shall emphasize enforcement of laws related to
protection of fish habitat and the illegal harvest of salmon and
steelhead. Within the amount provided for the agency, the department
shall provide support to the department of health to enforce state
shellfish harvest laws.
(6) $150,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $150,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to implement recommendations of
the hydraulic approval task force. Activities to be implemented must
include an employee training program, additional programmatic
approaches to permitting, and enhancement of a post-project monitoring
program.
(7) $2,000,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account
appropriation is provided for cooperative volunteer projects.
(8) The department shall support the activities of the aquatic
nuisance species coordination committee to foster state, federal,
tribal, and private cooperation on aquatic nuisance species issues.
The committee shall strive to prevent the introduction of nonnative
aquatic species and to minimize the spread of species that are
introduced.
(9) The department shall complete and implement an activity-based
costing system. The system shall be operational no later than January
1, 2004.
(10) $400,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement the department's information systems
strategic plan to include continued implementation of a personal
computer leasing plan, an upgrade of computer back-up systems, systems
architecture assessment, and network security analysis.
(11) Within funds provided, the department shall make available
enforcement and biological staff to respond and take appropriate action
to ensure public safety in response to public complaints regarding bear
and cougar.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,351,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,698,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,732,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,482,000
Forest Development Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,368,000
Off Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,575,000
Surveys and Maps Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,791,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,446,000
Resources Management Cost Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,291,000
Surface Mining Reclamation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,327,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,533,000
Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,368,000
Natural Resources Conservation Areas Stewardship Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $83,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $530,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,129,000
Agricultural College Trust Management Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,898,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $221,602,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $18,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $18,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005, and $1,006,950 of the aquatic lands enhancement account
appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the Puget
Sound work plan and agency action items DNR-01, DNR-02, and DNR-04.
(2) $895,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $895,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for deposit into the agricultural
college trust management account and are provided solely to manage
approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State University's
agricultural college trust lands.
(3) $11,762,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $11,819,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for emergency fire suppression.
(4) $582,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation
is provided solely for spartina control.
(5) Fees approved by the board of natural resources in the 2003-05
biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW
43.135.055.
(6) $2,700,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 is provided solely for the department to meet its settlement
obligations with the SDS lumber company.
(7) The department shall prepare a report of actual and planned
expenditures by task and activity from all fund sources for all aspects
of the forest and fish program for the 2001-03 and 2003-05 biennia.
The report shall be submitted to the director of financial management
and the legislative fiscal committees by August 31, 2003.
(8) Authority to expend funding for acquisition of technology
equipment and software associated with development of a new revenue
management system is conditioned on compliance with section 902 of this
act.
(9) $1,000,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department to meet its
obligations with the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency for the
clean-up of the Thea Foss Waterway.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,412,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,384,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,118,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,110,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,926,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,892,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,584,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,426,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $284,250 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $284,250 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for implementation of the Puget
Sound work plan and agency action item WSDA-01 and WSDA-02.
(2) $1,911,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $1,911,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005, and $1,892,000 of the water quality account--state
appropriation are provided solely for operation and administration of
grant programs and technical services to conservation districts
transferred to the department from the state conservation commission as
outlined in legislation enacted during the 2003 legislative session.
(3) Fees and assessments approved by the department in the 2003-05
biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW
43.135.055.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY
REINSURANCE PROGRAM
Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,023,000

(End of part)

PART IV
TRANSPORTATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,093,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,207,000
Architects' License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
Cemetery Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000
Professional Engineers' Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,052,000
Real Estate Commission Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,194,000
Master License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,183,000
Uniform Commercial Code Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,018,000
Real Estate Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $277,000
Real Estate Appraiser Commission Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $927,000
Real Estate Research Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $308,000
Funeral Directors and Embalmers Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $530,000
Geologists' Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000
Data Processing Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,762,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: In accordance with RCW 43.24.086, it is
the policy of the state of Washington that the cost of each
professional, occupational, or business licensing program be fully
borne by the members of that profession, occupation, or business. For
each licensing program covered by RCW 43.24.086, the department shall
set fees at levels sufficient to fully cover the cost of administering
the licensing program, including any costs associated with policy
enhancements funded in the 2003-05 fiscal biennium. Pursuant to RCW
43.135.055, during the 2003-05 fiscal biennium, the department may
increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor if the increases
are necessary to fully fund the costs of the licensing programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 FOR THE STATE PATROL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,379,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,562,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,270,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $380,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,503,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,819,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,773,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,153,000
Fire Service Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $128,000
Fire Service Training Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,414,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $441,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $286,000
Fingerprint Identification Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,439,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $86,547,000

(End of part)

PART V
EDUCATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
(1) STATE AGENCY OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,534,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,696,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,612,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,842,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $10,615,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $11,777,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided for the operation and expenses of the
office of the superintendent of public instruction.
(b) $503,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $503,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of
the state board of education, including basic education assistance
activities. Of this amount, $150,000 is provided for certificate of
mastery development and validation.
(c) $416,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $416,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of
the Washington professional educator standards board.

(2) STATEWIDE PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,888,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,884,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,680,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,452,000

The appropriations in this subsection are provided solely for the
statewide programs specified in this subsection and are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(a) HEALTH AND SAFETY
(i) A maximum of $91,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2004 and a maximum of $91,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided for the school
safety center in the office of the superintendent of public instruction
subject to the following conditions and limitations.
(A) The safety center shall: Disseminate successful models of
school safety plans and cooperative efforts; provide assistance to
schools to establish a comprehensive safe school plan; select models of
cooperative efforts that have been proven successful; act as an
information dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs
in a school district either in Washington or in another state;
coordinate activities relating to school safety; review and approve
manuals and curricula used for school safety models and training; and
develop and maintain a school safety information web site.
(B) The superintendent of public instruction shall participate in
a school safety center advisory committee that includes representatives
of educators, classified staff, principals, superintendents,
administrators, the American society for industrial security, the state
criminal justice training commission, and others deemed appropriate and
approved by the school safety center advisory committee. Members of
the committee shall be chosen by the groups they represent. In
addition, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs
shall appoint representatives of law enforcement to participate on the
school safety center advisory committee. The advisory committee shall
select a chair.
(C) The school safety center advisory committee shall develop a
training program, using the best practices in school safety, for all
school safety personnel.
(ii) $400,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation
transferred from the department of health is provided for a program
that provides grants to school districts for media campaigns promoting
sexual abstinence and addressing the importance of delaying sexual
activity, pregnancy, and childbearing until individuals are ready to
nurture and support their children. Grants to the school districts
shall be for projects that are substantially designed and produced by
students. The grants shall require a local private sector match, which
may include in-kind contribution of technical or other assistance from
consultants or firms involved in public relations, advertising,
broadcasting, and graphics or video production or other related fields.
(iii) $13,663,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided for safe and drug free schools and communities grants for drug
and violence prevention activities and strategies.
(b) TECHNOLOGY
A maximum of $1,939,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2004 and a maximum of $1,939,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided for K-20
telecommunications network technical support in the K-12 sector to
prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school utilization
of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the
network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced
technical support for the network. A maximum of $650,000 of this
amount may be expended for state-level administration and staff
training on the K-20 network.
(c) GRANTS AND ALLOCATIONS
(i) A maximum of $761,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2004 and a maximum of $757,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided for alternative
certification routes. Funds may be used for the professional educator
standards board to continue existing alternative-route grant programs
and create new alternative-route programs in regions of the state with
service shortages.
(ii) A maximum of $97,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2004 and a maximum of $97,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided to support
vocational student leadership organizations.
(iii) $1,433,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for the advanced placement fee program to increase
opportunities for low-income students and under-represented populations
to participate in advanced placement courses and to increase the
capacity of schools to provide advanced placement courses to students.
(iv) $9,510,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for comprehensive school reform demonstration projects to
provide grants to low-income schools for improving student achievement
through adoption and implementation of research-based curricula and
instructional programs.
(v) $12,977,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided for 21st century learning center grants, providing after-school and inter-session activities for students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR GENERAL APPORTIONMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,963,720,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,992,899,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,956,619,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) Allocations for certificated staff salaries for the 2003-04 and
2004-05 school years shall be determined using formula-generated staff
units calculated pursuant to this subsection. Staff allocations for
small school enrollments in (d) through (f) of this subsection shall be
reduced for vocational full-time equivalent enrollments. Staff
allocations for small school enrollments in grades K-6 shall be the
greater of that generated under (a) of this subsection, or under (d)
and (e) of this subsection. Certificated staffing allocations shall be
as follows:
(a) On the basis of each 1,000 average annual full-time equivalent
enrollments, excluding full-time equivalent enrollment otherwise
recognized for certificated staff unit allocations under (c) through
(f) of this subsection:
(i) Four certificated administrative staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-12;
(ii) 49 certificated instructional staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-3;
(iii) Forty-six certificated instructional staff units per thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades 4-12; and
(iv) An additional 4.2 certificated instructional staff units for
grades K-3 and an additional 7.2 certificated instructional staff units
for grade 4. Any funds allocated for the additional certificated units
provided in this subsection (iv) shall not be considered as basic
education funding;
(v) For class size reduction and expanded learning opportunities
under the better schools program, an additional 0.8 certificated
instructional staff units for grades K-4 per thousand full-time
equivalent students. Funds allocated for these additional certificated
units shall not be considered as basic education funding. The
allocation may be used for reducing class sizes in grades K-4 or to
provide additional classroom contact hours for kindergarten, before-and-after-school programs, weekend school programs, summer school
programs, and intercession opportunities to assist elementary school
students in meeting the essential academic learning requirements and
student assessment performance standards. For purposes of this
subsection, additional classroom contact hours provided by teachers
beyond the normal school day under a supplemental contract shall be
converted to a certificated full-time equivalent by dividing the
classroom contact hours by 900.
(A) Funds provided under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) and (v) in
excess of the amount required to maintain the statutory minimum ratio
established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b) shall be allocated only if the
district documents an actual ratio in grades K-4 equal to or greater
than 54 certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time
equivalent students. For any school district documenting a lower
certificated instructional staff ratio, the allocation shall be based
on the district's actual grades K-4 certificated instructional staff
ratio achieved in that school year, or the statutory minimum ratio
established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b), if greater;
(B) Districts at or above 51.0 certificated instructional staff per
one thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-4 may dedicate
up to 1.3 of the 54 funding ratio to employ additional classified
instructional assistants assigned to basic education classrooms in
grades K-4. For purposes of documenting a district's staff ratio under
this section, funds used by the district to employ additional
classified instructional assistants shall be converted to a
certificated staff equivalent and added to the district's actual
certificated instructional staff ratio. Additional classified
instructional assistants, for the purposes of this subsection, shall be
determined using the 1989-90 school year as the base year;
(C) Any district maintaining a ratio in grades K-4 equal to or
greater than 54 certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time
equivalent students may use allocations generated under this subsection
(2)(a)(iv) and (v) in excess of that required to maintain the minimum
ratio established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b) to employ additional
basic education certificated instructional staff or classified
instructional assistants in grades 5-6. Funds allocated under this
subsection (2)(a)(iv) and (v) shall only be expended to reduce class
size in grades K-6. No more than 1.3 of the certificated instructional
funding ratio amount may be expended for provision of classified
instructional assistants;
(b) For school districts with a minimum enrollment of 250 full-time
equivalent students whose full-time equivalent student enrollment count
in a given month exceeds the first of the month full-time equivalent
enrollment count by 5 percent, an additional state allocation of 110
percent of the share that such increased enrollment would have
generated had such additional full-time equivalent students been
included in the normal enrollment count for that particular month;
(c)(i) On the basis of full-time equivalent enrollment in:
(A) Vocational education programs approved by the superintendent of
public instruction, a maximum of 0.92 certificated instructional staff
units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units for each 19.5
full-time equivalent vocational students; and
(B) Skills center programs meeting the standards for skills center
funding established in January 1999 by the superintendent of public
instruction, 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08
certificated administrative units for each 16.67 full-time equivalent
vocational students; and
(ii) Vocational full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported
on the same monthly basis as the enrollment for students eligible for
basic support, and payments shall be adjusted for reported vocational
enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for
enrollment for students eligible for basic support;
(d) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small
school plants within any school district which have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the state board of education and enroll not
more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in
grades K-8:
(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76
certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit
for each additional student enrolled; and
(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68
certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for
each additional student enrolled;
(e) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than
twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within
any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual
full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the state board of education:
(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and
(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;
(f) For districts operating no more than two high schools with
enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school,
other than alternative schools:
(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any
grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated
instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated
administrative staff unit;
(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine
certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated
administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full time
equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of
0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated
administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half
average annual full time equivalent students.
Units calculated under (f)(ii) of this subsection shall be reduced
by certificated staff units at the rate of forty-six certificated
instructional staff units and four certificated administrative staff
units per thousand vocational full-time equivalent students;
(g) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades
1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit; and
(h) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades
1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit.
(3) Allocations for classified salaries for the 2003-04 and 2004-05
school years shall be calculated using formula-generated classified
staff units determined as follows:
(a) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit allocations
under subsection (2)(d) through (h) of this section, one classified
staff unit for each three certificated staff units allocated under such
subsections;
(b) For all other enrollment in grades K-12, including vocational
full-time equivalent enrollments, one classified staff unit for each
sixty average annual full-time equivalent students; and
(c) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified
staff unit.
(4) Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of
9.51 percent in the 2003-04 school year and 9.51 percent in the 2004-05
school year for certificated salary allocations provided under
subsection (2) of this section, and a rate of 12.77 percent in the
2003-04 school year and 12.77 percent in the 2004-05 school year for
classified salary allocations provided under subsection (3) of this
section.
(5) Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the
maintenance rate specified in section 504(1) of this act, based on the
number of benefit units determined as follows:
(a) The number of certificated staff units determined in subsection
(2) of this section; and
(b) The number of classified staff units determined in subsection
(3) of this section multiplied by 1.152. This factor is intended to
adjust allocations so that, for the purposes of distributing insurance
benefits, full-time equivalent classified employees may be calculated
on the basis of 1440 hours of work per year, with no individual
employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent.
(6)(a) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(a), (b), and (d)
through (h) of this section, there shall be provided a maximum of
$8,905 per certificated staff unit in the 2003-04 school year and a
maximum of $9,154 per certificated staff unit in the 2004-05 school
year.
(b) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(A) of this
section, there shall be provided a maximum of $21,869 per certificated
staff unit in the 2003-04 school year and a maximum of $22,481 per
certificated staff unit in the 2004-05 school year.
(c) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(B) of this
section, there shall be provided a maximum of $16,969 per certificated
staff unit in the 2003-04 school year and a maximum of $17,444 per
certificated staff unit in the 2004-05 school year.
(7) Allocations for substitute costs for classroom teachers shall
be distributed at a maintenance rate of $531.09 for the 2003-04 and
2004-05 school years per allocated classroom teacher exclusive of
salary increase amounts, if any, provided in section 504 of this act.
Solely for the purposes of this subsection, allocated classroom
teachers shall be equal to the number of certificated instructional
staff units allocated under subsection (2) of this section, multiplied
by the ratio between the number of actual basic education certificated
teachers and the number of actual basic education certificated
instructional staff reported statewide for the prior school year.
(8) Any school district board of directors may petition the
superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution
adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic
education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public
instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair
the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more
than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on
levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance
pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.
(9) The superintendent may distribute a maximum of $1,377,000
outside the basic education formula during fiscal years 2004 and 2005
as follows:
(a) For fire protection for school districts located in a fire
protection district as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter
52.04 RCW, a maximum of $502,000 may be expended in fiscal year 2004
and a maximum of $516,000 may be expended in fiscal year 2005; and
(b) A maximum of $359,000 may be expended for school district
emergencies.
(10) For purposes of RCW 84.52.0531, the increase per full-time
equivalent student is 3.3 percent from the 2002-03 school year to the
2003-04 school year and 2.5 percent from the 2003-04 school year to the
2004-05 school year.
(11) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district
was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant
to subsection (2)(b) through (h) of this section, the following shall
apply:
(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of
basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number
of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the
school year prior to the consolidation; and
(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following
consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff
units received by the districts for the school year prior to
consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after
consolidation pursuant to subsection (2)(a) through (h) of this section
shall be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION. (1) The following
calculations determine the salaries used in the general fund
allocations for certificated instructional, certificated
administrative, and classified staff units under section 502 of this
act:
(a) Salary allocations for certificated instructional staff units
shall be determined for each district by multiplying the district's
certificated instructional total base salary shown on LEAP Document 12E
for the appropriate year, by the district's average staff mix factor
for certificated instructional staff in that school year, computed
using LEAP Document 1S; and
(b) Salary allocations for certificated administrative staff units
and classified staff units for each district shall be based on the
district's certificated administrative and classified salary allocation
amounts shown on LEAP Document 12E for the appropriate year.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "LEAP Document 1S" means the computerized tabulation
establishing staff mix factors for certificated instructional staff
according to education and years of experience, as developed by the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on March
25, 1999, at 16:55 hours; and
(b) "LEAP Document 12E" means the computerized tabulation of 2003-04 and 2004-05 school year salary allocations for certificated
administrative staff and classified staff and derived and total base
salaries for certificated instructional staff as developed by the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on December
10, 2002, at 12:10 hours.
(3)(a) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.410, the following statewide salary
allocation schedules for certificated instructional staff are
established for basic education salary allocations:

K-12 Salary Allocation Schedule For Certificated Instructional Staff
2003-04 School Year

Years of
Service BA BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90 BA+135 MA MA+45 MA+90
or PHD

0 28,300 29,064 29,856 30,649 33,196 34,836 33,929 36,476 38,118

1 28,680 29,455 30,257 31,086 33,659 35,291 34,306 36,879 38,510

2 29,327 30,117 30,936 31,837 34,428 36,093 35,025 37,616 39,280

3 30,293 31,107 31,950 32,899 35,536 37,274 36,089 38,725 40,464

4 30,975 31,833 32,690 33,681 36,360 38,129 36,840 39,519 41,288

5 31,682 32,553 33,427 34,483 37,179 39,001 37,610 40,307 42,129

6 32,091 32,943 33,847 34,956 37,639 39,470 38,023 40,706 42,537

7 33,139 34,012 34,937 36,118 38,868 40,769 39,185 41,934 43,836

8 34,202 35,122 36,069 37,348 40,135 42,106 40,414 43,202 45,172

9 36,272 37,266 38,591 41,443 43,481 41,656 44,510 46,548

10 38,477 39,898 42,788 44,894 42,964 45,855 47,960

11 41,243 44,196 46,344 44,309 47,263 49,410

12 42,545 45,642 47,854 45,707 48,708 50,921

13 47,123 49,401 47,154 50,189 52,467

14 48,611 51,006 48,644 51,775 54,073

15 49,876 52,333 49,908 53,121 55,479

16 or
more 50,873 53,379 50,906 54,183 56,588

K-12 Salary Allocation Schedule For Certificated Instructional Staff
2004-05 School Year

Years of
Service BA BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90 BA+135 MA MA+45 MA+90
or PHD

0 28,300 29,064 29,856 30,649 33,196 34,836 33,929 36,476 38,118

1 28,680 29,455 30,257 31,086 33,659 35,291 34,306 36,879 38,510

2 29,327 30,117 30,936 31,837 34,428 36,093 35,025 37,616 39,280

3 30,293 31,107 31,950 32,899 35,536 37,274 36,089 38,725 40,464

4 30,975 31,833 32,690 33,681 36,360 38,129 36,840 39,519 41,288

5 31,682 32,553 33,427 34,483 37,179 39,001 37,610 40,307 42,129

6 32,091 32,943 33,847 34,956 37,639 39,470 38,023 40,706 42,537

7 33,139 34,012 34,937 36,118 38,868 40,769 39,185 41,934 43,836

8 34,202 35,122 36,069 37,348 40,135 42,106 40,414 43,202 45,172

9 36,272 37,266 38,591 41,443 43,481 41,656 44,510 46,548

10 38,477 39,898 42,788 44,894 42,964 45,855 47,960

11 41,243 44,196 46,344 44,309 47,263 49,410

12 42,545 45,642 47,854 45,707 48,708 50,921

13 47,123 49,401 47,154 50,189 52,467

14 48,611 51,006 48,644 51,775 54,073

15 49,876 52,333 49,908 53,121 55,479

16 or
more 50,873 53,379 50,906 54,183 56,588

(b) As used in this subsection, the column headings "BA+(N)" refer
to the number of credits earned since receiving the baccalaureate
degree.
(c) For credits earned after the baccalaureate degree but before
the masters degree, any credits in excess of forty-five credits may be
counted after the masters degree. Thus, as used in this subsection,
the column headings "MA+(N)" refer to the total of:
(i) Credits earned since receiving the masters degree; and
(ii) Any credits in excess of forty-five credits that were earned
after the baccalaureate degree but before the masters degree.
(4) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "BA" means a baccalaureate degree.
(b) "MA" means a masters degree.
(c) "PHD" means a doctorate degree.
(d) "Years of service" shall be calculated under the same rules
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction.
(e) "Credits" means college quarter hour credits and equivalent in-service credits computed in accordance with RCW 28A.415.020 and
28A.415.023.
(5) No more than ninety college quarter-hour credits received by
any employee after the baccalaureate degree may be used to determine
compensation allocations under the state salary allocation schedule and
LEAP documents referenced in this act, or any replacement schedules and
documents, unless:
(a) The employee has a masters degree; or
(b) The credits were used in generating state salary allocations
before January 1, 1992.
(6) The certificated instructional staff base salary specified for
each district in LEAP Document 12E and the salary schedules in
subsection (3)(a) of this section include two learning improvement
days. A school district is eligible for the learning improvement day
funds for school years 2003-04 and 2004-05, only if two learning
improvement days have been added to the 180-day contract year. If
fewer than two days are added, the additional learning improvement
allocation shall be adjusted accordingly. The additional days shall be
for activities related to improving student learning consistent with
education reform implementation, and shall not be considered part of
basic education. The length of a learning improvement day shall not be
less than the length of a full day under the base contract. The
superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that school districts
adhere to the intent and purposes of this subsection.
(7) The salary allocation schedules established in this section are
for allocation purposes only except as provided in RCW 28A.400.200(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,102,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $111,631,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $163,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $143,896,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $143,896,000 is provided for adjustments to insurance benefit
allocations. The maintenance rate for insurance benefit allocations is
$457.07 per month for the 2003-04 and 2004-05 school years. The
appropriations in this section provide for a rate increase to $496.69
per month for the 2003-04 school year and $584.69 per month for the
2004-05 school year at the following rates:

School Year

2003-04 2004-05

Pupil Transportation (per weighted pupil mile) $0.36 $1.16

Highly Capable (per formula student) $2.42 $7.86

Transitional Bilingual Education (per eligible bilingual student) $6.41 $20.66

Learning Assistance (per entitlement unit) $5.04 $16.24

(2) The rates specified in this section are subject to revision
each year by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $210,745,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $214,874,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $425,619,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) A maximum of $778,000 of this fiscal year 2004 appropriation
and a maximum of $800,000 of the fiscal year 2005 appropriation may be
expended for regional transportation coordinators and related
activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure that data
submitted by school districts for state transportation funding shall,
to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation
activity of each district.
(3) $5,000 of the fiscal year 2004 appropriation and $5,000 of the
fiscal year 2005 appropriation are provided solely for the
transportation of students enrolled in "choice" programs.
Transportation shall be limited to low-income students who are
transferring to "choice" programs solely for educational reasons.
(4) Allocations for transportation of students shall be based on
reimbursement rates of $39.47 per weighted mile in the 2003-04 school
year and $39.81 per weighted mile in the 2004-05 school year exclusive
of salary and benefit adjustments, if any, provided in section 504 of
this act. Allocations for transportation of students transported more
than one radius mile shall be based on weighted miles as determined by
superintendent of public instruction multiplied by the per mile
reimbursement rates for the school year pursuant to the formulas
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction. Allocations for
transportation of students living within one radius mile shall be based
on the number of enrolled students in grades kindergarten through five
living within one radius mile of their assigned school multiplied by
the per mile reimbursement rate for the school year multiplied by 1.29.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 506 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,100,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,100,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $272,069,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $278,269,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $3,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided for state matching money for federal
child nutrition programs.
(2) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $100,000 of the 2005 fiscal year appropriation are
provided for summer food programs for children in low-income areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 507 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $437,465,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $441,994,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $410,177,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,289,636,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess
cost basis, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure
that special education students as a class receive their full share of
the general apportionment allocation accruing through sections 502 and
504 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an
appropriate education for special education students under chapter
28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall
provide services through the special education excess cost allocation
funded in this section.
(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall use the
excess cost methodology developed and implemented for the 2001-02
school year using the S-275 personnel reporting system and all related
accounting requirements to ensure that:
(i) Special education students are basic education students first;
(ii) As a class, special education students are entitled to the
full basic education allocation; and
(iii) Special education students are basic education students for
the entire school day.
(b) The S-275 and accounting changes in effect since the 2001-02
school year shall supercede any prior excess cost methodologies and
shall be required of all school districts.
(3) Each fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are
necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for
prior fiscal year adjustments.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute state
funds to school districts based on two categories: The optional birth
through age two program for special education eligible developmentally
delayed infants and toddlers, and the mandatory special education
program for special education eligible students ages three to twenty-one. A "special education eligible student" means a student receiving
specially designed instruction in accordance with a properly formulated
individualized education program.
(5)(a) For the 2003-04 and 2004-05 school years, the superintendent
shall make allocations to each district based on the sum of:
(i) A district's annual average headcount enrollment of
developmentally delayed infants and toddlers ages birth through two,
multiplied by the district's average basic education allocation per
full-time equivalent student, multiplied by 1.15; and
(ii) A district's annual average full-time equivalent basic
education enrollment multiplied by the funded enrollment percent
determined pursuant to subsection (6)(b) of this section, multiplied by
the district's average basic education allocation per full-time
equivalent student multiplied by 0.9309.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "average basic education
allocation per full-time equivalent student" for a district shall be
based on the staffing ratios required by RCW 28A.150.260 and shall not
include enhancements, secondary vocational education, or small schools.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Annual average full-time equivalent basic education
enrollment" means the resident enrollment including students enrolled
through choice (RCW 28A.225.225) and students from nonhigh districts
(RCW 28A.225.210) and excluding students residing in another district
enrolled as part of an interdistrict cooperative program (RCW
28A.225.250).
(b) "Enrollment percent" means the district's resident special
education annual average enrollment, excluding the birth through age
two enrollment, as a percent of the district's annual average full-time
equivalent basic education enrollment. For the 2003-04 and the 2004-05
school years, each district's general fund--state funded special
education enrollment shall be the lesser of the district's actual
enrollment percent or 12.7 percent. Increases in enrollment percent
from 12.7 percent to 13.0 percent shall be funded from the general
fund--federal appropriation.
(7) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15
districts in which all excess cost services for special education
students of the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum
enrollment percent shall be calculated in accordance with subsection
(6)(b) of this section, and shall be calculated in the aggregate rather
than individual district units. For purposes of this subsection, the
average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student
shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district
units.
(8) To the extent necessary, $25,746,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is provided for safety net awards for districts
with demonstrated needs for state special education funding beyond the
amounts provided in subsection (5) of this section. If safety net
awards exceed the amount appropriated in this subsection (8), the
superintendent shall expend all available federal discretionary funds
necessary to meet this need. Safety net funds shall be awarded by the
state safety net oversight committee subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The committee shall consider unmet needs for districts that can
convincingly demonstrate that all legitimate expenditures for special
education exceed all available revenues from state funding formulas.
In the determination of need, the committee shall also consider
additional available revenues from federal and local sources.
Differences in program costs attributable to district philosophy,
service delivery choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate
basis for safety net awards.
(b) The committee shall then consider the extraordinary high cost
needs of one or more individual special education students.
Differences in costs attributable to district philosophy, service
delivery choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate basis for
safety net awards.
(c) The maximum allowable indirect cost for calculating safety net
eligibility may not exceed the federal restricted indirect cost rate
for the district plus one percent.
(d) Safety net awards shall be adjusted based on the percent of
potential medicaid eligible students billed as calculated by the
superintendent in accordance with chapter 318, Laws of 1999.
(e) Safety net awards must be adjusted for any audit findings or
exceptions related to special education funding.
(f) The superintendent may expend up to $120,000 per year of the
amount provided from the general fund--federal appropriation in this
subsection (8) to provide staff assistance to the committee in
analyzing applications for safety net funds received by the committee.
(9) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt such rules
and procedures as are necessary to administer the special education
funding and safety net award process. Prior to revising any standards,
procedures, or rules, the superintendent shall consult with the office
of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature.
(10) The safety net oversight committee appointed by the
superintendent of public instruction shall consist of:
(a) One staff from the office of superintendent of public
instruction;
(b) Staff of the office of the state auditor; and
(c) One or more representatives from school districts or
educational service districts knowledgeable of special education
programs and funding.
(11) A maximum of $678,000 may be expended from the general fund--state appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1
full-time equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and
medical center. This amount is in lieu of money provided through the
home and hospital allocation and the special education program.
(12) $1,000,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided for projects to provide special education students with
appropriate job and independent living skills, including work
experience where possible, to facilitate their successful transition
out of the public school system. The funds provided by this subsection
shall be from federal discretionary grants.
(13) The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal
flow-through to school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other
purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from
educational service districts, and for staff development activities
particularly relating to inclusion issues.
(14) A maximum of $1,200,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation may be expended by the superintendent for projects
related to use of inclusion strategies by school districts for
provision of special education services. The superintendent shall
prepare an information database on laws, best practices, examples of
programs, and recommended resources. The information may be
disseminated in a variety of ways, including workshops and other staff
development activities.
(15) A school district may carry over from one year to the next
year up to 10 percent of general fund--state funds allocated under this
program; however, carry over funds shall be expended in the special
education program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 508 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,036,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,036,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,072,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The educational service districts shall
continue to furnish financial services required by the superintendent
of public instruction and RCW 28A.310.190 (3) and (4).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 509 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $159,591,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $162,309,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $321,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 510 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,506,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,645,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,151,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund -- state fiscal year appropriation includes
such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the
fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) State funding provided under this section is based on salaries
and other expenditures for a 220-day school year. The superintendent
of public instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans
for institutional education programs to ensure that districts plan for
a full-time summer program.
(3) State funding for each institutional education program shall be
based on the institution's annual average full-time equivalent student
enrollment. Staffing ratios for each category of institution shall
remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97 biennium.
(4) The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles
age 18 or less in department of corrections facilities shall be the
same as those provided in the 1997-99 biennium.
(5) $211,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $216,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to maintain at least one
certificated instructional staff and related support services at an
institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not sufficient to support
one full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff to furnish
the educational program. The following types of institutions are
included: Residential programs under the department of social and
health services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for
juveniles under the department of corrections, and programs for
juveniles under the juvenile rehabilitation administration.
(6) Ten percent of the funds allocated for each institution may be
carried over from one year to the next.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 511 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,687,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,541,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,228,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) Allocations for school district programs for highly capable
students shall be distributed at a maximum rate of $334.51 per funded
student for the 2003-04 school year and $334.51 per funded student for
the 2004-05 school year, exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments,
if any, pursuant to section 504 of this act. The number of funded
students shall be a maximum of 1.75 percent of each district's full-time equivalent basic education enrollment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 512 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR MISCELLANEOUS PURPOSES UNDER THE ELEMENTARY AND
SECONDARY SCHOOL IMPROVEMENT ACT AND THE NO CHILD LEFT BEHIND ACT
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,198,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 513 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,705,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,893,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $128,402,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $196,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $310,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $310,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the academic achievement and
accountability commission.
(2) $15,524,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $13,742,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005, and $15,455,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided for development and implementation of the
Washington assessments of student learning. Up to $689,000 of the
appropriation may be expended for data analysis and data management of
test results.
(3) $2,348,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $2,348,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for mentor teacher assistance,
including state support activities, under RCW 28A.415.250 and
28A.415.260, and for a mentor academy. Up to $200,000 of the amount in
this subsection may be used each fiscal year to operate a mentor
academy to help districts provide effective training for peer mentors.
Funds for the teacher assistance program shall be allocated to school
districts based on the number of first year beginning teachers.
(a) A teacher assistance program is a program that provides to a
first year beginning teacher peer mentor services that include but are
not limited to:
(i) An orientation process and individualized assistance to help
beginning teachers who have been hired prior to the start of the school
year prepare for the start of a school year;
(ii) The assignment of a peer mentor whose responsibilities to the
beginning teacher include but are not limited to constructive feedback,
the modeling of instructional strategies, and frequent meetings and
other forms of contact;
(iii) The provision by peer mentors of strategies, training, and
guidance in critical areas such as classroom management, student
discipline, curriculum management, instructional skill, assessment,
communication skills, and professional conduct. A district may provide
these components through a variety of means including one-on-one
contact and workshops offered by peer mentors to groups, including
cohort groups, of beginning teachers;
(iv) The provision of release time, substitutes, mentor training in
observation techniques, and other measures for both peer mentors and
beginning teachers, to allow each an adequate amount of time to observe
the other and to provide the classroom experience that each needs to
work together effectively;
(v) Assistance in the incorporation of the essential academic
learning requirements into instructional plans and in the development
of complex teaching strategies, including strategies to raise the
achievement of students with diverse learning styles and backgrounds;
and
(vi) Guidance and assistance in the development and implementation
of a professional growth plan. The plan shall include a professional
self-evaluation component and one or more informal performance
assessments. A peer mentor may not be involved in any evaluation under
RCW 28A.405.100 of a beginning teacher whom the peer mentor has
assisted through this program.
(b) In addition to the services provided in (a) of this subsection,
an eligible peer mentor program shall include but is not limited to the
following components:
(i) Strong collaboration among the peer mentor, the beginning
teacher's principal, and the beginning teacher;
(ii) Stipends for peer mentors and, at the option of a district,
for beginning teachers. The stipends shall not be deemed compensation
for the purposes of salary lid compliance under RCW 28A.400.200 and are
not subject to the continuing contract provisions of Title 28A RCW; and
(iii) To the extent that resources are available for this purpose
and that assistance to beginning teachers is not adversely impacted,
the program may serve second year and more experienced teachers who
request the assistance of peer mentors.
(4) $1,959,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,959,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided for improving technology infrastructure,
monitoring and reporting on school district technology development,
promoting standards for school district technology, promoting statewide
coordination and planning for technology development, and providing
regional educational technology support centers, including state
support activities, under chapter 28A.650 RCW. The superintendent of
public instruction shall coordinate a process to facilitate the
evaluation and provision of online curriculum courses to school
districts which includes the following: Creation of a general listing
of the types of available online curriculum courses; a survey conducted
by each regional educational technology support center of school
districts in its region regarding the types of online curriculum
courses desired by school districts; a process to evaluate and
recommend to school districts the best online courses in terms of
curriculum, student performance, and cost; and assistance to school
districts in procuring and providing the courses to students.
(5) $2,500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $2,500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the meals for kids program
under RCW 28A.235.145 through 28A.235.155.
(6) $1,764,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,764,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the mathematics helping corps
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) In order to increase the availability and quality of technical
mathematics assistance statewide, the superintendent of public
instruction shall employ mathematics school improvement specialists to
provide assistance to schools and districts. The specialists shall be
hired by and work under the direction of a statewide school improvement
coordinator. The mathematics improvement specialists shall serve on a
rotating basis from one to four years and shall not be permanent
employees of the superintendent of public instruction.
(b) The school improvement specialists shall provide the following:
(i) Assistance to schools to disaggregate student performance data
and develop improvement plans based on those data;
(ii) Consultation with schools and districts concerning their
performance on the Washington assessment of student learning and other
assessments emphasizing the performance on the mathematics assessments;
(iii) Consultation concerning curricula that aligns with the
essential academic learning requirements emphasizing the academic
learning requirements for mathematics, the Washington assessment of
student learning, and meets the needs of diverse learners;
(iv) Assistance in the identification and implementation of
research-based instructional practices in mathematics;
(v) Staff training that emphasizes effective instructional
strategies and classroom-based assessment for mathematics;
(vi) Assistance in developing and implementing family and community
involvement programs emphasizing mathematics; and
(vii) Other assistance to schools and school districts intended to
improve student mathematics learning.
(7) $3,713,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $3,713,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the Washington reading corps
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) Grants shall be allocated to schools and school districts to
implement proven, research-based mentoring and tutoring programs in
reading for low-performing students in grades K-6. If the grant is
made to a school district, the principals of schools enrolling targeted
students shall be consulted concerning design and implementation of the
program.
(b) The programs may be implemented before, after, or during the
regular school day, or on Saturdays, summer, intercessions, or other
vacation periods.
(c) Two or more schools may combine their Washington reading corps
programs.
(d) A program is eligible for a grant if it meets the following
conditions:
(i) The program employs methods of teaching and student learning
based on reliable reading/literacy research and effective practices;
(ii) The program design is comprehensive and includes instruction,
on-going student assessment, professional development,
parental/community involvement, and program management aligned with the
school's reading curriculum;
(iii) It provides quality professional development and training for
teachers, staff, and volunteer mentors and tutors;
(iv) It has measurable goals for student reading aligned with the
essential academic learning requirements; and
(v) It contains an evaluation component to determine the
effectiveness of the program.
(e) Funding priority shall be given to low-performing schools.
(f) Beginning and end-of-program testing data shall be available to
determine the effectiveness of funded programs and practices. Common
evaluative criteria across programs, such as grade-level improvements
shall be available for each reading corps program. The superintendent
of public instruction shall provide program evaluations to the governor
and the appropriate committees of the legislature. Administrative and
evaluation costs may be assessed from the annual appropriation for the
program.
(g) Grants provided under this section may be used by schools and
school districts for expenditures from September 2003 through August
31, 2005.
(8) $1,564,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $2,497,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for salary bonuses for teachers
who attain certification by the national board for professional
teaching standards, subject to the following conditions and
limitations:
(a) Teachers who hold a valid certificate from the national board
during the 2003-04 or 2004-05 school years shall receive an annual
bonus not to exceed $3,500 each of these school years in which they
hold a valid national board certificate.
(b) The annual bonus shall be paid in a lump sum amount.
(9) $313,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $313,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided for a principal support program. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction may contract with an
independent organization to administer the program. The program shall
include: (a) Development of an individualized professional growth plan
for a new principal or principal candidate; and (b) participation of a
mentor principal who works over a period of between one and three years
with the new principal or principal candidate to help him or her build
the skills identified as critical to the success of the professional
growth plan.
(10) $70,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $70,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the second grade reading test.
The funds shall be expended for assessment training for new second
grade teachers and replacement of assessment materials.
(11) A maximum of $268,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2004 and a maximum of $305,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided for the
superintendent to assist schools in implementing high academic
standards, aligning curriculum with these standards, and training
teachers to use assessments to improve student learning. Funds may
also be used to increase community and parental awareness of education
reform.
(12) $126,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $126,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided for the development and posting of web-based instructional tools, assessment data, and other information that
assists schools and teachers implementing higher academic standards.
(13) $3,246,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $4,246,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for focused assistance to schools.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall conduct
educational audits of low-performing schools and enter into performance
agreements between school districts and the office to implement the
recommendations of the audit and the community. Of the amounts
provided, $350,000 of the fiscal year 2004 appropriation and $350,000
of the fiscal year 2005 appropriation are provided to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for the administrative duties
arising under this subsection. Each educational audit shall include
recommendations for best practices and ways to address identified needs
and shall be presented to the community in a public meeting to seek
input on ways to implement the audit and its recommendations.
(14) $87,901,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided for preparing, training, and recruiting high quality teachers
and principals under Title II of the elementary and secondary education
act.
(15) $25,046,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided for the reading first program under Title I of the elementary
and secondary education act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 514 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,665,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,911,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,309,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $147,885,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) The superintendent shall distribute a maximum of $724.10 per
eligible bilingual student in the 2003-04 school year and $724.10 in
the 2004-05 school year, exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments,
if any, provided in section 504 of this act.
(3) The superintendent may withhold up to $700,000 in school year
2003-04 and up to $700,000 in school year 2004-05, and adjust the per
eligible pupil rates in subsection (2) of this section accordingly, for
the central provision of assessments as provided in RCW 28A.180.090 (1)
and (2).
(4) $70,000 of the amounts appropriated in this section is provided
solely to develop a system for the tracking of current and former
transitional bilingual program students.
(5) The general fund--federal appropriation in this section is
provided for migrant education under Title I, Part C and English
language acquisition and language enhancement grants under Title III of
the elementary and secondary education act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 515 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR THE LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,294,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $76,228,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $307,178,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $457,700,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund -- state fiscal year appropriation includes
such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the
fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) Funding for school district learning assistance programs shall
be allocated at maximum rates of $433.27 per funded unit for the 2003-04 school year and $434.58 per funded unit for the 2004-05 school year
exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments, if any, provided under
section 504 of this act.
(3) A school district's funded units for the 2003-04 and 2004-05
school years shall be the sum of the following:
(a) The district's percentage of October headcount enrollment in
grades K-12 eligible for free and reduced price lunch multiplied by the
district's K-12 annual average full-time equivalent enrollment for the
current school year multiplied by 40 percent; and
(b) If, in the prior school year, the district's percentage of
October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free and
reduced price lunch exceeded the state average, subtract the state
average percentage of students eligible for free and reduced price
lunch from the district's percentage and multiply the result by the
district's K-12 annual average full-time equivalent enrollment for the
current school year multiplied by 60 percent.
(4) In addition to amounts allocated under subsection (3) of this
section, the superintendent of public instruction shall provide
additional amounts as follows:
(a) For the 2003-04 school year, when a school district's
allocation from subsection (3) of this section is less than the
district's 2002-03 allocation for the learning assistance program, the
difference between the 2002-03 school year allocation and the 2003-04
school year allocation as calculated in subsection (3) of this section;
and
(b) For the 2004-05 school year, when a school district's
allocation from subsection (3) of this section is less than the
district's 2002-03 allocation for the learning assistance program, the
difference between the 2002-03 school year allocation and the 2004-05
school year allocation as calculated in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) The general fund--federal appropriation in this section is
provided for Title I, Part A allocations of the elementary and
secondary education act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 516 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT PROGRAM
Student Achievement Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $210,737,000
Student Achievement Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $211,139,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $421,876,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is allocated for the following uses as
specified in RCW 28A.505.210:
(a) To reduce class size by hiring certificated elementary
classroom teachers in grades K-4 and paying nonemployee-related costs
associated with those new teachers;
(b) To make selected reductions in class size in grades 5-12, such
as small high school writing classes;
(c) To provide extended learning opportunities to improve student
academic achievement in grades K-12, including, but not limited to,
extended school year, extended school day, before-and-after-school
programs, special tutoring programs, weekend school programs, summer
school, and all-day kindergarten;
(d) To provide additional professional development for educators
including additional paid time for curriculum and lesson redesign and
alignment, training to ensure that instruction is aligned with state
standards and student needs, reimbursement for higher education costs
related to enhancing teaching skills and knowledge, and mentoring
programs to match teachers with skilled, master teachers. The funding
shall not be used for salary increases or additional compensation for
existing teaching duties, but may be used for extended year and extend
day teaching contracts;
(e) To provide early assistance for children who need
prekindergarten support in order to be successful in school; or
(f) To provide improvements or additions to school building
facilities which are directly related to the class size reductions and
extended learning opportunities under (a) through (c) of this
subsection.
(2) Funding for school district student achievement programs shall
be allocated at a maximum rate of $219.78 per FTE student for the 2003-04 school year and $220.00 per FTE student for the 2004-05 school year.
For the purposes of this section and in accordance with RCW 84.52.068,
FTE student refers to the annual average full-time equivalent
enrollment of the school district in grades kindergarten through twelve
for the prior school year.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
distribute ten percent of the annual allocation to districts each month
for the months of September through June.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 517 K-12 CARRYFORWARD AND PRIOR SCHOOL YEAR
ADJUSTMENTS. State general fund appropriations provided to the
superintendent of public instruction for state entitlement programs in
the public schools in this part V of this act may be expended as needed
by the superintendent for adjustments to apportionment for prior fiscal
periods. Recoveries of state general fund moneys from school districts
and educational service districts for a prior fiscal period shall be
made as reductions in apportionment payments for the current fiscal
period and shall be shown as prior year adjustments on apportionment
reports for the current period. Such recoveries shall not be treated
as revenues to the state, but as a reduction in the amount expended
against the appropriation for the current fiscal period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 518 FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
Education Savings Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,000,000
Education Construction Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $104,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $131,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $13,500,000 in fiscal year 2004 and $13,500,000 in fiscal year
2005 of the education savings account appropriation shall be deposited
in the common school construction account.
(2) $104,000,000 of the education construction account
appropriation shall be deposited in the common school construction
account.

(End of part)

PART VI
HIGHER EDUCATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 The appropriations in sections 603 through
609 of this act are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:
(1) "Institutions" means the institutions of higher education
receiving appropriations under sections 603 through 609 of this act.
(2) The tuition fees, as defined in chapter 28B.15 RCW, charged to
full-time students at the state's colleges and universities for the
2003-04 and 2004-05 academic years, other than the summer term, shall
be increased or decreased by the governing boards of the state
universities, regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and
the state board for community and technical colleges. Tuition fees may
be increased in excess of the fiscal growth factor.
For the 2003-04 academic year the governing boards of the state
universities, regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and
the state board for community and technical colleges may implement an
increase no greater than nine percent over tuition fees charged to
full-time resident undergraduate students for the 2002-03 academic
year.
For the 2004-05 academic year the governing boards of the state
universities, regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and
the state board for community and technical colleges may implement an
increase no greater than nine percent over tuition fees charged to
full-time resident undergraduate students for the 2003-04 academic
year.
(3) For the 2003-05 biennium, the state board for community and
technical colleges may increase tuition fees differentially based on
student credit hour load at their discretion.
(4) For the 2003-05 biennium, the governing boards and the state
board may adjust full-time operating fees for factors that may include
time of day and day of week, as well as delivery method and campus, to
encourage full use of the state's educational facilities and resources.
(5) The governing boards and the state board are encouraged to
reduce waiver activity in recognition of the need to retain available
resources to preserve the educational quality of higher education
institutions. State general fund appropriations shall not be provided
to replace tuition and fee revenue foregone as a result of waivers
granted under authority of RCW 28B.15.915.
(6) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, institutions of higher education
receiving appropriations under sections 603 through 609 of this act are
authorized to increase summer term tuition in excess of the fiscal
growth factor during the 2003-05 biennium. Tuition levels increased
pursuant to this subsection shall not exceed the per credit hour rate
calculated from the academic year tuition levels adopted under this
act.
(7) Community colleges may increase services and activities fee
charges in excess of the fiscal growth factor up to the maximum level
authorized by the state board for community and technical colleges.
(8) Each institution receiving appropriations under sections 604
through 609 of this act shall submit a biennial plan to achieve
measurable and specific improvements each academic year as part of a
continuing effort to make meaningful and substantial progress towards
the achievement of long-term performance goals. The plans, to be
prepared at the direction of the higher education coordinating board,
shall be submitted by August 15, 2003. The higher education
coordinating board shall set biennial performance targets for each
institution and shall review actual achievements annually.
Institutions shall track their actual performance on the statewide
measures as well as faculty productivity, the goals and targets for
which may be unique to each institution. A report on progress towards
statewide and institution-specific goals, with recommendations for the
ensuing biennium, shall be submitted to the fiscal and higher education
committees of the legislature by November 15, 2005.
(9) The state board for community and technical colleges shall
develop a biennial plan to achieve measurable and specific improvements
each academic year as part of a continuing effort to make meaningful
and substantial progress to achieve long-term performance goals. The
board shall set biennial performance targets for each college or
district, where appropriate, and shall review actual achievements
annually. Colleges shall track their actual performance on the
statewide measures. A report on progress towards the statewide goals,
with recommendations for the ensuing biennium, shall be submitted to
the fiscal and higher education committees of the legislature by
November 15, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 The appropriations in sections 603 through
609 of this act provide state general fund support for full-time
equivalent student enrollments at each institution of higher education.
Listed below are the annual full-time equivalent student enrollments by
institutions assumed in this act.

2003-04
Annual
Average 2004-05
Annual
Average

University of Washington

Main campus 32,427 32,427

Bothell branch 1,235 1,235

Tacoma branch 1,484 1,484

Washington State University

Main campus 17,332 17,332

Spokane branch 593 593

Tri-Cities branch 616 616

Vancouver branch 1,153 1,153

Central Washington University 7,470 7,470

Eastern Washington University 8,017 8,017

The Evergreen State College 3,837 3,837

Western Washington University 11,126 11,126

State Board for Community and Technical Colleges 126,872 126,872

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $513,586,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $506,730,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,020,316,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The technical colleges may increase tuition and fees in excess
of the fiscal growth factor to conform with the percentage increase in
community college operating fees.
(2) $1,650,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $3,350,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to increase salaries and related
benefits for part-time faculty. The board shall report by January 30
of each fiscal year to the office of financial management and
legislative fiscal and higher education committees on (a) the
distribution of state funds; (b) wage adjustments for part-time
faculty; and (c) progress to achieve the long-term performance targets
for each district, with respect to use of part-time faculty, pursuant
to the faculty mix study conducted under section 603, chapter 309, Laws
of 1999.
(3) Salary and benefit savings from faculty turnover may be used to
provide faculty salary increments and associated benefits.
(4) $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided for a program to fund the start-up of new
community and technical college programs in rural counties as defined
under RCW 43.160.020(12) and in communities impacted by business
closures and job reductions. Successful proposals must respond to
local economic development strategies and must include a plan to
continue programs developed with this funding.
(5) $640,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $640,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for allocation to twelve college
districts identified in (a) through (l) of this subsection to prepare
students for transfer to the state technology institute at the Tacoma
branch campus of the University of Washington. The appropriations in
this section are intended to supplement, not supplant, general
enrollment allocations by the board to the districts under (a) through
(l) of this subsection:
(a) Bates Technical College;
(b) Bellevue Community College;
(c) Centralia Community College;
(d) Clover Park Community College;
(e) Grays Harbor Community College;
(f) Green River Community College;
(g) Highline Community College;
(h) Tacoma Community College;
(i) Olympic Community College;
(j) Pierce District;
(k) Seattle District; and
(l) South Puget Sound Community College.
(6) $28,761,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $28,761,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005, are provided solely as special funds for training and
related support services, including financial aid, as specified in
chapter 226, Laws of 1993 (employment and training for unemployed
workers). Funding is provided to support up to 7,200 full-time
equivalent students in each fiscal year.
(7) $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for tuition support for students
enrolled in work-based learning programs.
(8) $567,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $568,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for administration and customized
training contracts through the job skills program.
(9) $50,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $50,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are solely for higher education student child care
matching grants under chapter 28B.135 RCW.
(10) $120,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $120,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided for allocation to Olympic college. The
college shall contract with accredited baccalaureate institution(s) to
bring a program of upper-division courses to Bremerton. The state
board for community and technical colleges shall report to the office
of financial management and the fiscal and higher education committees
of the legislature on the implementation of this subsection by December
1st of each fiscal year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 FOR UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $324,029,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $311,306,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $258,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,963,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,974,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $647,530,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,875,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,875,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to create a state resource for
technology education in the form of an institute located at the
University of Washington, Tacoma. It is the intent of the legislature
that at least ninety-nine of the full-time equivalent enrollments
allocated to the university's Tacoma branch campus for each academic
year may be used to establish the technology institute. The university
will expand undergraduate and graduate degree programs meeting regional
technology needs including, but not limited to, computing and software
systems. As a condition of these appropriations:
(a) The university will work with the state board for community and
technical colleges, or individual colleges where necessary, to
establish articulation agreements in addition to the existing associate
of arts and associate of science transfer degrees. Such agreements
shall improve the transferability of students and in particular,
students with substantial applied information technology credits.
(b) The university will establish performance measures for
recruiting, retaining and graduating students, including nontraditional
students, and report back to the governor and legislature by September
2003 as to its progress and future steps.
(2) $150,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $150,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for research faculty clusters in
the advanced technology initiative program.
(3) $258,000 of the death investigations account appropriation is
provided solely for the forensic pathologist fellowship program.
(4) $150,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $150,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound work plan and agency action item UW-01.
(5) $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the Olympic natural resource
center.
(6) $1,526,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $3,096,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for competitively offered
recruitment and retention salary adjustments for instructional and
research faculty, exempt professional staff, academic administrators,
academic librarians, counselors, teaching and research assistants, as
classified by the office of financial management, and all other
nonclassified staff, but not including employees under RCW 28B.16.015.
Tuition revenues may be expended in addition to those required by this
section to further provide recruitment and retention salary
adjustments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $187,389,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $182,275,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $369,664,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $150,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $150,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for research faculty clusters in
the advanced technology initiative program.
(2) $165,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $166,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound work plan and agency action item WSU-01.
(3) $949,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,927,000 of general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for competitively offered
recruitment and retention salary adjustments for instructional and
research faculty, exempt professional staff, academic administrators,
academic librarians, counselors, teaching and research assistants, as
classified by the office of financial management, and all other
nonclassified staff, but not including employees under RCW 28B.16.015.
Tuition revenues may be expended in addition to those required by this
section to further provide recruitment and retention salary
adjustments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 606 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,032,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,312,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $82,344,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $248,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 and $503,000 of general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for
competitively offered recruitment and retention salary adjustments for
instructional and research faculty, exempt professional staff, academic
administrators, academic librarians, counselors, teaching and research
assistants, as classified by the office of financial management, and
all other nonclassified staff, but not including employees under RCW
28B.16.015. Tuition revenues may be expended in addition to those
required by this section to further provide recruitment and retention
salary adjustments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 607 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,414,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,185,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $79,599,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $206,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 and $418,000 of general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for
competitively offered recruitment and retention salary adjustments for
instructional and research faculty, exempt professional staff, academic
administrators, academic librarians, counselors, teaching and research
assistants, as classified by the office of financial management, and
all other nonclassified staff, but not including employees under RCW
28B.16.015. Tuition revenues may be expended in addition to those
required by this section to further provide recruitment and retention
salary adjustments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 608 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,430,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,600,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,030,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $124,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 and $252,000 of general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for
competitively offered recruitment and retention salary adjustments for
instructional and research faculty, exempt professional staff, academic
administrators, academic librarians, counselors, teaching and research
assistants, as classified by the office of financial management, and
all other nonclassified staff, but not including employees under RCW
28B.16.015. Tuition revenues may be expended in addition to those
required by this section to further provide recruitment and retention
salary adjustments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 609 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,875,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,910,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $109,785,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $980,400 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $980,400 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the operations of the North
Snohomish, Island, Skagit (NSIS) higher education consortium.
(2) $248,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $503,000 of general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 are provided solely for competitively offered recruitment and
retention salary adjustments for instructional and research faculty,
exempt professional staff, academic administrators, academic
librarians, counselors, teaching and research assistants, as classified
by the office of financial management, and all other nonclassified
staff, but not including employees under RCW 28B.16.015. Tuition
revenues may be expended in addition to those required by this section
to further provide recruitment and retention salary adjustments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 610 FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING
BOARD -- POLICY COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION

General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,484,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,004,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $635,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,123,000

The appropriations in this section are provided to carry out the
policy coordination, planning, studies and administrative functions of
the board and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
$5,280,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2004 and $14,880,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to contract for 550 full-time
equivalent students in high-demand fields in fiscal year 2004 and 1,000
full-time equivalent students in high-demand fields in fiscal year
2005. High-demand fields are programs where enrollment access is
limited and employers are experiencing difficulty finding enough
qualified graduates to fill job openings.
The board will manage a competitive process for awarding high-demand student FTEs. Public community and technical colleges and
baccalaureate institutions are eligible to apply for funding. Priority
will go to competitive proposals that include cooperative partnerships
and articulation agreements between universities and community and
technical colleges. The board shall make it a priority to fund
proposals that prepare students for careers in the health services,
veterinary medicine, engineering, teaching, and information technology.
Proposals that document specific regional student and employer demand
in other fields are also eligible for funding. Proposals and grant
awards will separately identify one-time, nonrecurring costs and
on-going costs.
The board will establish a proposal review committee that will
include representatives from the board, the office of financial
management, out-of-state higher education institutions or associations,
industry and labor associations, and economic development and labor
market analysts. The board will develop the request for proposals,
including the criteria for awarding grants, in consultation with the
proposal review committee.
Colleges and universities that receive grants will provide the
board with data specified by the board that shows the impact of this
subsection, particularly the degree of improved access to high-demand
programs for students and successful job placements for graduates.
During the 2003-05 biennium, the board will prepare an annual report on
the impact of this subsection and provide it to the office of financial
management and the fiscal and higher education committees of the
legislature by November 1 for the prior academic year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 611 FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING
BOARD -- FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $141,075,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $158,532,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,537,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $307,144,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $539,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $540,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the displaced homemakers
program.
(2) $266,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $266,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the western interstate
commission for higher education.
(3) $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for the health professional
conditional scholarship and loan program under chapter 28B.115 RCW.
This amount shall be deposited to the health professional loan
repayment and scholarship trust fund to carry out the purposes of the
program.
(4) $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for higher education student child
care matching grants under chapter 28B.135 RCW.
(5) $25,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $25,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the benefit of students who
participate in college assistance migrant programs (CAMP) operating in
Washington state. To ensure timely state aid, the board may establish
a date after which no additional grants would be available for the
2003-04 and 2004-05 academic years. The board shall disperse grants in
equal amounts to eligible post-secondary institutions so that state
money in all cases supplements federal CAMP awards.
(6) $133,761,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2004 and $133,761,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for student
financial aid, including all administrative costs. Of these amounts:
(a) $109,516,945 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2004 and $126,816,078 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the state
need grant program. After April 1 of each fiscal year, up to one
percent of the annual appropriation for the state need grant program
may be transferred to the state work study program;
(b) $17,360,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $17,360,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the state work study program.
After April 1 of each fiscal year, up to one percent of the annual
appropriation for the state work study program may be transferred to
the state need grant program. Four percent of the general fund -- state
amount in this subsection for fiscal year 2003 may be expended for
state work study program administration;
(c) $2,920,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $2,920,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for educational opportunity
grants. The board may deposit sufficient funds from its appropriation
into the state education trust fund as established in RCW 28B.10.821 to
provide a one-year renewal of the grant for each new recipient of the
educational opportunity grant award. For the purpose of establishing
eligibility for the equal opportunity grant program for placebound
students under RCW 28B.101.020, Thurston county lies within the branch
campus service area of the Tacoma branch campus of the University of
Washington;
(d) A maximum of 2.1 percent of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 and 1.8 percent of the general
fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 may be expended for
financial aid administration, excluding the 4 percent state work study
program administrative allowance provision;
(e) $1,819,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,924,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to implement the Washington
scholars program. Any Washington scholars program moneys not awarded
by April 1st of each year may be transferred by the board to the
Washington award for vocational excellence;
(f) $754,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $754,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to implement Washington award for
vocational excellence program. Any Washington award for vocational
program moneys not awarded by April 1st of each year may be transferred
by the board to the Washington scholars program;
(g) $251,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $251,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for community scholarship matching
grants of $2,000 each. Of the amounts provided, no more than $5,200
each year is for the administration of the community scholarship
matching grant program. To be eligible for the matching grant, a
nonprofit community organization organized under section 501(c)(3) of
the internal revenue code must demonstrate that it has raised $2,000 in
new moneys for college scholarships after the effective date of this
act. An organization may receive more than one $2,000 matching grant
and preference shall be given to organizations affiliated with the
citizens' scholarship foundation; and
(h) $6,300,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $6,300,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the Washington promise
scholarship program. Of the amounts provided, no more than $250,000 in
fiscal year 2004 and no more than $250,000 in fiscal year 2005 are for
administration of the Washington promise scholarship program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 612 FOR THE WORK FORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION
COORDINATING BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,684,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,657,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,807,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,148,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $485,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 and $485,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the
operations and development of the inland northwest technology education
center (INTEC) as a regional resource and model for the rapid
deployment of skilled workers trained in the latest technologies for
Washington. The board shall serve as an advisor to and fiscal agent
for INTEC, and will report back to the governor and legislature by
September 2004 as to the progress and future steps for INTEC.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 613 FOR THE SPOKANE INTERCOLLEGIATE RESEARCH
AND TECHNOLOGY INSTITUTE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,408,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,423,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,831,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 614 FOR WASHINGTON STATE LIBRARY

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: At least $2,700,000 shall be expended for
a contract with the Seattle public library for library services for the
Washington book and braille library.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 615 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,716,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,737,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,026,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,479,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 616 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,461,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,567,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,028,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 617 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,465,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,522,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,987,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 618 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,519,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,653,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,335,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,507,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 619 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,428,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,571,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $232,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,231,000

(End of part)

PART VII
SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT LIMIT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $580,062,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $620,938,000
State Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,014,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $322,000
Debt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,587,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,210,923,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for
deposit into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED BY ENTERPRISE ACTIVITIES
State Convention and Trade Center Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,014,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,113,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,113,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,240,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,394,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,805,000
Higher Education Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $238,000
State Vehicle Parking Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $102,000
Education Construction Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,000,000
Capital Historic District Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $299,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $128,375,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $203,213,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriation is for
deposit into the nondebt-limit general fund bond retirement account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 704 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
BOND SALE EXPENSES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $526,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $526,000
Higher Education Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,000
Education Construction Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
State Vehicle Parking Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000
State Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,032,000
Capital Historic District Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,231,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 705 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--EMERGENCY FUND
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are for
the governor's emergency fund for the critically necessary work of any
agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 706 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--FIRE CONTINGENCY POOL. The sum of $4,000,000 is appropriated from the
disaster response account for the purpose of making allocations to the
military department for fire mobilizations costs or to the department
of natural resources for fire suppression costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 707 BELATED CLAIMS. The agencies and
institutions of the state may expend moneys appropriated in this act,
upon approval of the office of financial management, for the payment of
supplies and services furnished to the agency or institution in prior
fiscal biennia.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 708 COMPENSATION -- INSURANCE BENEFITS. The
appropriations for insurance benefits in this act, and which are
contained in agency budgets, are subject to the following conditions
and limitations:
(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit
premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the
uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $520.27 per eligible employee
for fiscal year 2004, and $606.25 for fiscal year 2005.
(b) Within the rates in (a) of this subsection, $4.13 per eligible
employee shall be included in the employer funding rate for fiscal year
2004, and $2.11 per eligible employee shall be included in the employer
funding rate for fiscal year 2005, solely to increase life insurance
coverage in accordance with a court approved settlement in Burbage et
al. v. State of Washington (Thurston county superior court cause no.
94-2-02560-8).
(c) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health
benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require any or all
of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed competition, or
make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW 41.05.065.
(d) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on
behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on
prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any
other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims
payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to
be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for
administrative expenditures.
(2) To facilitate the transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and
accounts, the state treasurer is directed to transfer sufficient moneys
from each dedicated fund or account to the special fund salary and
insurance contribution increase revolving fund in accordance with
schedules provided by the office of financial management.
(3) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the
public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health
benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and
school district employees who are eligible for parts A and B of
medicare, pursuant to RCW 41.05.085. From January 1, 2004, through
December 31, 2004, the subsidy shall be $111.25. Starting January 1,
2005, the subsidy shall be $134.85 per month.
(4) Technical colleges, school districts, and educational service
districts shall remit to the health care authority for deposit into the
public employees' and retirees' insurance account established in RCW
41.05.120 the following amounts:
(a) For each full-time employee, $44.76 per month beginning
September 1, 2003, and $54.46 beginning September 1, 2004;
(b) For each part-time employee who, at the time of the remittance,
is employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.32.010 or
41.40.010 and is eligible for employer fringe benefit contributions for
basic benefits, $44.76 each month beginning September 1, 2003, and
$54.46 beginning September 1, 2004, prorated by the proportion of
employer fringe benefit contributions for a full-time employee that the
part-time employee receives.
The remittance requirements specified in this subsection shall not
apply to employees of a technical college, school district, or
educational service district who purchase insurance benefits through
contracts with the health care authority.
(5) The salary and insurance increase revolving account
appropriation includes amounts sufficient to fund health benefits for
ferry workers at the premium levels specified in subsection (1) of this
section, consistent with the 2003-2005 transportation appropriations
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 709 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS--CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS. The appropriations in this
section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
appropriations for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
retirement system shall be made on a monthly basis consistent with
chapter 41.45 RCW, and the appropriations for the judges and judicial
retirement systems shall be made on a quarterly basis consistent with
chapters 2.10 and 2.12 RCW.
(1) There is appropriated for state contributions to the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system:
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,171,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,829,000

(2) There is appropriated for contributions to the judicial
retirement system:
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

(3) There is appropriated for contributions to the judges
retirement system:
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 710 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--PERSONNEL RESOURCES BOARD'S SALARY SURVEY FOR STATE AND HIGHER
EDUCATION EMPLOYEES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,440,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,441,000
Salary and Insurance Increase Revolving
Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,725,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $92,606,000

The appropriations in this section shall be expended solely for the
purposes designated in this section and are subject to the conditions
and limitations in this section.
(1) Funding is provided in sufficient amounts to bring the current
salary range to within 8 ranges of their market rate, those state and
higher education classified and exempt classes under the Washington
personnel resources board whose current base salary is greater than 8
ranges from their approved survey applied salary range as determined
under RCW 41.06.160.
(2) Implementation of the salary adjustments for the various
classifications is effective July 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 711 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $272,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $276,000
Judicial Information Systems Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $99,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $670,000

The appropriations in this section are provided solely to fund
pension contributions to the public employees' retirement system and
teachers' retirement systems for judicial and legislative employees,
effective July 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 712 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--EDUCATION TECHNOLOGY REVOLVING ACCOUNT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,468,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,468,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,936,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is for
appropriation to the education technology revolving account for the
purpose of covering operational and transport costs incurred by the K-20 educational network program in providing telecommunication services
to network participants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 713 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--LEGISLATIVE AND JUDICIAL EMPLOYEE HEALTH BENEFITS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $548,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,737,000
Public Safety and Education Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $262,000
Judicial Information Systems Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $91,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,660,000

The appropriations in this section shall be expended solely for the
purposes designated in this section and are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely for legislative
and judicial agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 714 INCENTIVE SAVINGS -- FY 2004. The sum of
one hundred million dollars or so much thereof as may be available on
June 30, 2004, from the total amount of unspent fiscal year 2004 state
general fund appropriations is appropriated for the purposes of RCW
43.79.460 in the manner provided in this section.
(1) Of the total appropriated amount, one-half of that portion that
is attributable to incentive savings, not to exceed twenty-five million
dollars, is appropriated to the savings incentive account for the
purpose of improving the quality, efficiency, and effectiveness of
agency services, and credited to the agency that generated the savings.
(2) The remainder of the total amount, not to exceed seventy-five
million dollars, is appropriated to the education savings account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 715 INCENTIVE SAVINGS -- FY 2005. The sum of
one hundred million dollars or so much thereof as may be available on
June 30, 2005, from the total amount of unspent fiscal year 2005 state
general fund appropriations is appropriated for the purposes of RCW
43.79.460 in the manner provided in this section.
(1) Of the total appropriated amount, one-half of that portion that
is attributable to incentive savings, not to exceed twenty-five million
dollars, is appropriated to the savings incentive account for the
purpose of improving the quality, efficiency, and effectiveness of
agency services, and credited to the agency that generated the savings.
(2) The remainder of the total amount, not to exceed seventy-five
million dollars, is appropriated to the education savings account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 716 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH -- COUNTY
PUBLIC HEALTH ASSISTANCE
Health Services Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The director of the department of health
shall distribute the appropriation as follows: $48,000,000 is provided
to the department of health to support protection and improvement of
the public's health and to increase the efficiency and effectiveness of
the public health system. Funds will be provided to local public
health departments and districts through performance-based contracts to
help attain the standards for public health and to implement the
recommendations of the public health improvement plan. A monitoring
and reporting mechanism will be established to demonstrate progress
toward these goals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 717 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
The appropriations in this section correct administrative cost
allocation issues identified by the state auditor.

General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,314,775
Access Road Revolving Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $549,200
Air Pollution Control Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $355,700
Waste Reduction, Recycling, and Litter Control
Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,000
Surveys and Maps Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $109,375
Surface Mining Reclamation Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $79,950
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,452,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are
provided solely for deposit into the following accounts: $2,142,500
for deposit into the forest development account, $144,900 for deposit
into the aquatic lands enhancement account, $1,719,400 for deposit into
the resource management cost account, $8,100 for deposit into the
aquatic land dredged material disposal site account, $1,288,800 for
deposit into the forest fire protection assessment account, and
$148,300 for deposit into the agriculture college trust management
account.

(End of part)

PART VIII
OTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES
FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for fire insurance premium
distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,920,350
General Fund Appropriation for public utility district
excise tax distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,273,684
General Fund Appropriation for prosecuting attorney
distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,441,197
General Fund Appropriation for boating safety and
education distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,074,300
General Fund Appropriation for other tax distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,750
Death Investigations Account Appropriation for
distribution to counties for publicly funded
autopsies . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,123,723
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation for
harbor improvement revenue distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $187,068
Timber Tax Distribution Account Appropriation for
distribution to timber counties . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,192,170
Impaired Driver Safety Account Appropriation for
distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,160,837
County Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,175,755
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,086,550
Liquor Excise Tax Account Appropriation for liquor
excise tax distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,624,831
Liquor Revolving Account Appropriation for liquor
profits distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,511,693
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $275,806,908

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FEDERAL REVENUES
FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for federal grazing fees
distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,293,828
General Fund Appropriation for federal flood control
funds distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,050
Federal Forest Revolving Fund Appropriation for
federal forest reserve fund distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $83,492,373
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $84,811,251

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 803 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS

(1) For transfers in this section to the state general fund,
pursuant to RCW 43.135.035(5), the state expenditure limit shall be
increased by the amount of the transfer. The increase shall occur in
the fiscal year in which the transfer occurs.
State Convention and Trade Center Account:
For transfer to the state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
County Sale/Use Tax Equalization Account:
For transfer to the state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,000
Municipal Sale/Use Tax Equalization Account:
For transfer to the state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $374,000
Landowner Contingency Fire Suppression
Account: For transfer to the state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Asbestos Account: For transfer to the state
general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Industrial Insurance Premium Refund Account:
For transfer to the state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $577,000
Electrical License Account: For transfer
to the state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
Public Service Revolving Account: For transfer
to the state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Site Closure Account: For transfer to the
state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,750,000
Agricultural Local Account: For transfer to
the state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Insurance Commissioner's Regulatory: For transfer
to the state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
State Forest Nursery Revolving Account:
For transfer to the state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
State Treasurer's Service Account: For
transfer to the state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,000,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense
Account: For transfer to the state
general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Gambling Revolving Account: For transfer
to the state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Pressure Systems Safety Account: For transfer
to the state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Woodstove Education and Enforcement Account:
For transfer to the air pollution control account . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Local Toxics Control Account: For transfer
to the state toxics control account . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,059,000
Regional Fisheries Enhancement Account:
For transfer to the salmon recovery account . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,100,000
Education Construction Account: For transfer
to the common school construction account . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,000,000
State Building Construction Account: For
transfer to the common school construction
account . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,170,516
State Building Construction Account: For
transfer to the state and local improvements
revolving account--water supply facilities . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
(2) The treasurer shall transfer $27,500,000 from the pollution
liability insurance program trust account to the state general fund as
follows: $7,500,000 on March 1, 2004; $7,500,000 on September 1, 2004;
$7,500,000 on March 1, 2005; and $5,000,000 on June 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 804 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS--TRANSFERS
General Fund--State Appropriation: For transfer to the
department of retirement systems expense account:
For the administrative expenses of the judicial
retirement system . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,901

(End of part)

PART IX
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 EXPENDITURE AUTHORIZATIONS. The
appropriations contained in this act are maximum expenditure
authorizations. Pursuant to RCW 43.88.037, moneys disbursed from the
treasury on the basis of a formal loan agreement shall be recorded as
loans receivable and not as expenditures for accounting purposes. To
the extent that moneys are disbursed on a loan basis, the corresponding
appropriation shall be reduced by the amount of loan moneys disbursed
from the treasury during the 2003-05 biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902 INFORMATION SYSTEMS PROJECTS. Agencies
shall comply with the following requirements regarding information
systems projects when specifically directed to do so by this act.
(1) Agency planning and decisions concerning information technology
shall be made in the context of its information technology portfolio.
"Information technology portfolio" means a strategic management
approach in which the relationships between agency missions and
information technology investments can be seen and understood, such
that: Technology efforts are linked to agency objectives and business
plans; the impact of new investments on existing infrastructure and
business functions are assessed and understood before implementation;
and agency activities are consistent with the development of an
integrated, nonduplicative statewide infrastructure.
(2) Agencies shall use their information technology portfolios in
making decisions on matters related to the following:
(a) System refurbishment, acquisitions, and development efforts;
(b) Setting goals and objectives for using information technology
in meeting legislatively-mandated missions and business needs;
(c) Assessment of overall information processing performance,
resources, and capabilities;
(d) Ensuring appropriate transfer of technological expertise for
the operation of any new systems developed using external resources;
and
(e) Progress toward enabling electronic access to public
information.
(3) Each project will be planned and designed to take optimal
advantage of Internet technologies and protocols. Agencies shall
ensure that the project is in compliance with the architecture,
infrastructure, principles, policies, and standards of digital
government as maintained by the information services board.
(4) The agency shall produce a feasibility study for information
technology projects at the direction of the information services board
and in accordance with published department of information services
policies and guidelines. At a minimum, such studies shall include a
statement of: (a) The purpose or impetus for change; (b) the business
value to the agency, including an examination and evaluation of
benefits, advantages, and cost; (c) a comprehensive risk assessment
based on the proposed project's impact on both citizens and state
operations, its visibility, and the consequences of doing nothing; (d)
the impact on agency and statewide information infrastructure; and (e)
the impact of the proposed enhancements to an agency's information
technology capabilities on meeting service delivery demands.
(5) The agency shall produce a comprehensive management plan for
each project. The plan or plans shall address all factors critical to
successful completion of each project. The plan(s) shall include, but
is not limited to, the following elements: A description of the
problem or opportunity that the information technology project is
intended to address; a statement of project objectives and assumptions;
a definition and schedule of phases, tasks, and activities to be
accomplished; and the estimated cost of each phase. The planning for
the phased approach shall be such that the business case justification
for a project needs to demonstrate how the project recovers cost or
adds measurable value or positive cost benefit to the agency's business
functions within each development cycle.
(6) The agency shall produce quality assurance plans for
information technology projects. Consistent with the direction of the
information services board and the published policies and guidelines of
the department of information services, the quality assurance plan
shall address all factors critical to successful completion of the
project and successful integration with the agency and state
information technology infrastructure. At a minimum, quality assurance
plans shall provide time and budget benchmarks against which project
progress can be measured, a specification of quality assurance
responsibilities, and a statement of reporting requirements. The
quality assurance plans shall set out the functionality requirements
for each phase of a project.
(7) A copy of each feasibility study, project management plan, and
quality assurance plan shall be provided to the department of
information services, the office of financial management, and
legislative fiscal committees. The plans and studies shall demonstrate
a sound business case that justifies the investment of taxpayer funds
on any new project, an assessment of the impact of the proposed system
on the existing information technology infrastructure, the disciplined
use of preventative measures to mitigate risk, and the leveraging of
private-sector expertise as needed. Authority to expend any funds for
individual information systems projects is conditioned on the approval
of the relevant feasibility study, project management plan, and quality
assurance plan by the department of information services and the office
of financial management.
(8) Quality assurance status reports shall be submitted to the
department of information services, the office of financial management,
and legislative fiscal committees at intervals specified in the
project's quality assurance plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 903 VIDEO TELECOMMUNICATIONS. The department
of information services shall act as lead agency in coordinating video
telecommunications services for state agencies. As lead agency, the
department shall develop standards and common specifications for leased
and purchased telecommunications equipment and assist state agencies in
developing a video telecommunications expenditure plan. No agency may
spend any portion of any appropriation in this act for new video
telecommunication equipment, new video telecommunication transmission,
or new video telecommunication programming, or for expanding current
video telecommunication systems without first complying with chapter
43.105 RCW, including but not limited to, RCW 43.105.041(2), and
without first submitting a video telecommunications expenditure plan,
in accordance with the policies of the department of information
services, for review and assessment by the department of information
services under RCW 43.105.052. Prior to any such expenditure by a
public school, a video telecommunications expenditure plan shall be
approved by the superintendent of public instruction. The office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall submit the plans to the
department of information services in a form prescribed by the
department. The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall coordinate the use of video telecommunications in public schools
by providing educational information to local school districts and
shall assist local school districts and educational service districts
in telecommunications planning and curriculum development. Prior to
any such expenditure by a public institution of postsecondary
education, a telecommunications expenditure plan shall be approved by
the higher education coordinating board. The higher education
coordinating board shall coordinate the use of video telecommunications
for instruction and instructional support in postsecondary education,
including the review and approval of instructional telecommunications
course offerings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 904 PROGRAM COST SHIFTS. Any program costs
or moneys in this act that are shifted to the general fund from another
fund or account require an adjustment to the expenditure limit under
RCW 43.135.035(5).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 905 EMERGENCY FUND ALLOCATIONS. Whenever
allocations are made from the governor's emergency fund appropriation
to an agency that is financed in whole or in part by other than general
fund moneys, the director of financial management may direct the
repayment of such allocated amount to the general fund from any balance
in the fund or funds which finance the agency. No appropriation shall
be necessary to effect such repayment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 906 STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS. In addition
to the amounts appropriated in this act for revenues for distribution,
state contributions to the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 2, and bond retirement and interest including
ongoing bond registration and transfer charges, transfers, interest on
registered warrants, and certificates of indebtedness, there is also
appropriated such further amounts as may be required or available for
these purposes under any statutory formula or under chapters 39.94 and
39.96 RCW or any proper bond covenant made under law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 907 BOND EXPENSES. In addition to such other
appropriations as are made by this act, there is hereby appropriated to
the state finance committee from legally available bond proceeds in the
applicable construction or building funds and accounts such amounts as
are necessary to pay the expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of
the subject bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 908 VOLUNTARY SEPARATION INCENTIVES. As a
management tool to reduce costs and make more effective use of
resources, while improving employee productivity and morale, agencies
may offer voluntary separation and/or downshifting incentives and
options according to procedures and guidelines established by the
department of personnel and the department of retirement systems in
consultation with the office of financial management. The options may
include, but are not limited to, financial incentives for: Voluntary
resignation and retirement, voluntary leave-without-pay, voluntary
workweek or work hour reduction, voluntary downward movement, or
temporary separation for development purposes. No employee shall have
a contractual right to a financial incentive offered pursuant to this
section and employees accepting a voluntary separation incentive are
not eligible for unemployment compensation based on their separation
from state employment under Title 50 RCW.
Agencies shall report on the outcomes of their plans, and offers
shall be reviewed and monitored jointly by the department of personnel
and the department of retirement systems, for reporting to the office
of financial management by December 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 909 VOLUNTARY RETIREMENT INCENTIVES. It is
the intent of the legislature that agencies may implement a voluntary
retirement incentive program that is cost neutral or results in cost
savings provided that such a program is approved by the director of
retirement systems and the office of financial management. No employee
shall have a contractual right to a financial incentive offered
pursuant to this section, and employees accepting a voluntary
retirement incentive are not eligible for unemployment compensation
based on their separation from state employment under Title 50 RCW.
Agencies participating in this authorization are required to submit a
report by June 30, 2005, to the legislature and the office of financial
management on the outcome of their approved retirement incentive
program. The report should include information on the details of the
program including resulting service delivery changes, agency
efficiencies, the cost of the retirement incentive per participant, the
total cost to the state, and the projected or actual net dollar savings
over the 2003-05 biennium.

Sec. 910 RCW 9.46.100 and 2002 c 371 s 901 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby created the gambling revolving fund which shall
consist of all moneys receivable for licensing, penalties, forfeitures,
and all other moneys, income, or revenue received by the commission.
The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. All moneys
received by the commission or any employee thereof, except for change
funds and an amount of petty cash as fixed by rule or regulation of the
commission, shall be deposited each day in a depository approved by the
state treasurer and transferred to the state treasurer to be credited
to the gambling revolving fund. Disbursements from the revolving fund
shall be on authorization of the commission or a duly authorized
representative thereof. In order to maintain an effective expenditure
and revenue control the gambling revolving fund shall be subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW but no appropriation shall be required to
permit expenditures and payment of obligations from such fund. All
expenses relative to commission business, including but not limited to
salaries and expenses of the director and other commission employees
shall be paid from the gambling revolving fund.
During the ((2001-2003)) 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the gambling revolving fund to the state general fund
such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund ((and
reductions made by the 2002 supplemental appropriations act for
administrative efficiencies and savings)).

Sec. 911 RCW 19.28.351 and 1988 c 81 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
All sums received from licenses, permit fees, or other sources,
herein shall be paid to the state treasurer and placed in a special
fund designated as the "electrical license fund," and ((by him)) paid
out upon vouchers duly and regularly issued therefor and approved by
the director of labor and industries or the director's designee
following determination by the board that the sums are necessary to
accomplish the intent of chapter 19.28 RCW. The treasurer shall keep
an accurate record of payments into, or receipts of, ((said)) the fund,
and of all disbursements therefrom.
During the 2003-2005 biennium, the legislature may transfer moneys
from the electrical license fund to the state general fund such amounts
as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

Sec. 912 RCW 41.50.110 and 1998 c 341 s 508 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided by RCW 41.50.255 and subsection (6) of this
section, all expenses of the administration of the department and the
expenses of administration of the retirement systems created in
chapters 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.32, 41.40, 41.34, 41.35, and 43.43 RCW
shall be paid from the department of retirement systems expense fund.
(2) In order to reimburse the department of retirement systems
expense fund on an equitable basis the department shall ascertain and
report to each employer, as defined in RCW 41.26.030, 41.32.010,
41.35.010, or 41.40.010, the sum necessary to defray its proportional
share of the entire expense of the administration of the retirement
system that the employer participates in during the ensuing biennium or
fiscal year whichever may be required. Such sum is to be computed in
an amount directly proportional to the estimated entire expense of the
administration as the ratio of monthly salaries of the employer's
members bears to the total salaries of all members in the entire
system. It shall then be the duty of all such employers to include in
their budgets or otherwise provide the amounts so required.
(3) The department shall compute and bill each employer, as defined
in RCW 41.26.030, 41.32.010, 41.35.010, or 41.40.010, at the end of
each month for the amount due for that month to the department of
retirement systems expense fund and the same shall be paid as are its
other obligations. Such computation as to each employer shall be made
on a percentage rate of salary established by the department. However,
the department may at its discretion establish a system of billing
based upon calendar year quarters in which event the said billing shall
be at the end of each such quarter.
(4) The director may adjust the expense fund contribution rate for
each system at any time when necessary to reflect unanticipated costs
or savings in administering the department.
(5) An employer who fails to submit timely and accurate reports to
the department may be assessed an additional fee related to the
increased costs incurred by the department in processing the deficient
reports. Fees paid under this subsection shall be deposited in the
retirement system expense fund.
(a) Every six months the department shall determine the amount of
an employer's fee by reviewing the timeliness and accuracy of the
reports submitted by the employer in the preceding six months. If
those reports were not both timely and accurate the department may
prospectively assess an additional fee under this subsection.
(b) An additional fee assessed by the department under this
subsection shall not exceed fifty percent of the standard fee.
(c) The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.
(6) Expenses other than those under RCW 41.34.060(((2))) (3) shall
be paid pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
(7) During the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the department of retirement systems' expense fund to the
state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of
the fund.

Sec. 913 RCW 43.08.190 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 83 are each amended
to read as follows:
There is hereby created a fund within the state treasury to be
known as the "state treasurer's service fund". Such fund shall be used
solely for the payment of costs and expenses incurred in the operation
and administration of the state treasurer's office.
Moneys shall be allocated monthly and placed in the state
treasurer's service fund equivalent to a maximum of one percent of the
trust and treasury average daily cash balances from the earnings
generated under the authority of RCW 43.79A.040 and 43.84.080 other
than earnings generated from investment of balances in funds and
accounts specified in RCW 43.79.040(((2)(b))) or 43.84.092(((2)(b)))
(4)(b). The allocation shall precede the distribution of the remaining
earnings as prescribed under RCW 43.79A.040 and 43.84.092. The state
treasurer shall establish a uniform allocation rate based on the
appropriations for the treasurer's office.
During the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
from the state treasurer's service fund to the state general fund such
amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

Sec. 914 RCW 43.23.230 and 1988 c 254 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The agricultural local fund is hereby established in the custody of
the state treasurer. The fund shall consist of such money as is
directed by law for deposit in the fund, and such other money not
subject to appropriation that the department authorizes to be deposited
in the fund. Any money deposited in the fund, the use of which has
been restricted by law, may only be expended in accordance with those
restrictions. The department may make disbursements from the fund.
The fund is not subject to legislative appropriation.
During the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
from the agricultural local fund to the state general fund such amounts
as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

Sec. 915 RCW 43.200.080 and 1999 c 372 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director of ecology shall, in addition to the powers and duties
otherwise imposed by law, have the following special powers and duties:
(1) To fulfill the responsibilities of the state under the lease
between the state of Washington and the federal government executed
September 10, 1964, covering one thousand acres of land lying within
the Hanford reservation near Richland, Washington. The department of
ecology may sublease to private or public entities all or a portion of
the land for specific purposes or activities which are determined,
after public hearing, to be in agreement with the terms of the lease
and in the best interests of the citizens of the state consistent with
any criteria that may be developed as a requirement by the legislature;
(2) To assume the responsibilities of the state under the perpetual
care agreement between the state of Washington and the federal
government executed July 29, 1965 and the sublease between the state of
Washington and the site operator of the Hanford low-level radioactive
waste disposal facility. In order to finance perpetual surveillance
and maintenance under the agreement and ensure site closure under the
sublease, the department of ecology shall impose and collect fees from
parties holding radioactive materials for waste management purposes.
The fees shall be established by rule adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW
and shall be an amount determined by the department of ecology to be
necessary to defray the estimated liability of the state. Such fees
shall reflect equity between the disposal facilities of this and other
states. A site closure account and a perpetual surveillance and
maintenance account is hereby created in the state treasury. The site
closure account shall be exclusively available to reimburse, to the
extent that moneys are available in the account, the site operator for
its costs plus a reasonable profit as agreed by the operator and the
state, or to reimburse the state licensing agency and any agencies
under contract to the state licensing agency for their costs in final
closure and decommissioning of the Hanford low-level radioactive waste
disposal facility. If a balance remains in the account after
satisfactory performance of closure and decommissioning, this balance
shall be transferred to the perpetual surveillance and maintenance
account. The perpetual surveillance and maintenance account shall be
used exclusively by the state to meet post-closure surveillance and
maintenance costs, or for otherwise satisfying surveillance and
maintenance obligations. Appropriations are required to permit
expenditures and payment of obligations from the site closure account
and the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account. All moneys,
including earnings from the investment of balances in the site closure
and the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, less the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund, pursuant to RCW
43.08.190 accruing under the authority of this section shall be
directed to the site closure account until December 31, 1992.
Thereafter receipts including earnings from the investment of balances
in the site closure and the perpetual surveillance and maintenance
account, less the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund,
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190 shall be directed to the site closure account
and the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account as specified by
the department. Additional moneys specifically appropriated by the
legislature or received from any public or private source may be placed
in the site closure account and the perpetual surveillance and
maintenance account. During the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer from the site closure account such amounts as
reflect the excess fund balances in each account;
(3) To assure maintenance of such insurance coverage by state
licensees, lessees, or sublessees as will adequately, in the opinion of
the director, protect the citizens of the state against nuclear
accidents or incidents that may occur on privately or state-controlled
nuclear facilities;
(4) To institute a user permit system and issue site use permits,
consistent with regulatory practices, for generators, packagers, or
brokers using the Hanford low-level radioactive waste disposal
facility. The costs of administering the user permit system shall be
borne by the applicants for site use permits. The site use permit fee
shall be set at a level that is sufficient to fund completely the
executive and legislative participation in activities related to the
Northwest Interstate Compact on Low-Level Radioactive Waste Management;
(5) To make application for or otherwise pursue any federal funds
to which the state may be eligible, through the federal resource
conservation and recovery act or any other federal programs, for the
management, treatment or disposal, and any remedial actions, of wastes
that are both radioactive and hazardous at all Hanford low-level
radioactive waste disposal facilities; and
(6) To develop contingency plans for duties and options for the
department and other state agencies related to the Hanford low-level
radioactive waste disposal facility based on various projections of
annual levels of waste disposal. These plans shall include an analysis
of expected revenue to the state in various taxes and funds related to
low-level radioactive waste disposal and the resulting implications
that any increase or decrease in revenue may have on state agency
duties or responsibilities. The plans shall be updated annually.

Sec. 916 RCW 48.02.190 and 2002 c 371 s 913 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Organization" means every insurer, as defined in RCW
48.01.050, having a certificate of authority to do business in this
state and every health care service contractor registered to do
business in this state. "Class one" organizations shall consist of all
insurers as defined in RCW 48.01.050. "Class two" organizations shall
consist of all organizations registered under provisions of chapter
48.44 RCW.
(b) "Receipts" means (i) net direct premiums consisting of direct
gross premiums, as defined in RCW 48.18.170, paid for insurance written
or renewed upon risks or property resident, situated, or to be
performed in this state, less return premiums and premiums on policies
not taken, dividends paid or credited to policyholders on direct
business, and premiums received from policies or contracts issued in
connection with qualified plans as defined in RCW 48.14.021, and (ii)
prepayments to health care service contractors as set forth in RCW
48.44.010(3) less experience rating credits, dividends, prepayments
returned to subscribers, and payments for contracts not taken.
(2) The annual cost of operating the office of insurance
commissioner shall be determined by legislative appropriation. A pro
rata share of the cost shall be charged to all organizations. Each
class of organization shall contribute sufficient in fees to the
insurance commissioner's regulatory account to pay the reasonable
costs, including overhead, of regulating that class of organization.
(3) Fees charged shall be calculated separately for each class of
organization. The fee charged each organization shall be that portion
of the cost of operating the insurance commissioner's office, for that
class of organization, for the ensuing fiscal year that is represented
by the organization's portion of the receipts collected or received by
all organizations within that class on business in this state during
the previous calendar year: PROVIDED, That the fee shall not exceed
one-eighth of one percent of receipts: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the
minimum fee shall be one thousand dollars.
(4) The commissioner shall annually, on or before June 1, calculate
and bill each organization for the amount of its fee. Fees shall be
due and payable no later than June 15 of each year: PROVIDED, That if
the necessary financial records are not available or if the amount of
the legislative appropriation is not determined in time to carry out
such calculations and bill such fees within the time specified, the
commissioner may use the fee factors for the prior year as the basis
for the fees and, if necessary, the commissioner may impose
supplemental fees to fully and properly charge the organizations. The
penalties for failure to pay fees when due shall be the same as the
penalties for failure to pay taxes pursuant to RCW 48.14.060. The fees
required by this section are in addition to all other taxes and fees
now imposed or that may be subsequently imposed.
(5) All moneys collected shall be deposited in the insurance
commissioner's regulatory account in the state treasury which is hereby
created.
(6) Unexpended funds in the insurance commissioner's regulatory
account at the close of a fiscal year shall be carried forward in the
insurance commissioner's regulatory account to the succeeding fiscal
year and shall be used to reduce future fees. During the ((2001-2003))
2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the
insurance commissioner's regulatory account to the state general fund
such amounts as reflect excess fund balance in the account.

Sec. 917 RCW 49.26.130 and 1989 c 154 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall administer this chapter.
(2) The director of the department shall adopt, in accordance with
chapters 34.05 and 49.17 RCW, rules necessary to carry out this
chapter.
(3) The department shall prescribe fees for the issuance and
renewal of certificates, including recertification, and the
administration of examinations, and for the review of training courses.
(4) The asbestos account is hereby established in the state
treasury. All fees collected under this chapter shall be deposited in
the account. Moneys in the account shall be spent after appropriation
only for costs incurred by the department in the administration and
enforcement of this chapter. Disbursements from the account shall be
on authorization of the director of the department or the director's
designee.
(5) During the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the asbestos account to the state general fund such
amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the account.

Sec. 918 RCW 51.44.170 and 2002 c 371 s 916 are each amended to
read as follows:
The industrial insurance premium refund account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All industrial insurance refunds
earned by state agencies or institutions of higher education under the
state fund retrospective rating program shall be deposited into the
account. The account is subject to the allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures
from the account. Only the executive head of the agency or institution
of higher education, or designee, may authorize expenditures from the
account. No agency or institution of higher education may make an
expenditure from the account for an amount greater than the refund
earned by the agency. If the agency or institution of higher education
has staff dedicated to workers' compensation claims management,
expenditures from the account must be used to pay for that staff, but
additional expenditure from the account may be used for any program
within an agency or institution of higher education that promotes or
provides incentives for employee workplace safety and health and early,
appropriate return-to-work for injured employees. During the ((2001-2003)) 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the
industrial insurance premium refund account to the state general fund
such amounts as reflect the ((reductions made by the 2002 supplemental
appropriations act for administrative efficiencies and savings)) excess
fund balance of the account.

Sec. 919 RCW 67.40.040 and 1995 c 386 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The proceeds from the sale of the bonds authorized in RCW
67.40.030, proceeds of the taxes imposed under RCW 67.40.090 and
67.40.130, and all other moneys received by the state convention and
trade center from any public or private source which are intended to
fund the acquisition, design, construction, expansion, exterior cleanup
and repair of the Eagles building, conversion of various retail and
other space to meeting rooms, purchase of the land and building known
as the McKay Parcel, development of low-income housing, or renovation
of the center, and those expenditures authorized under RCW 67.40.170
shall be deposited in the state convention and trade center account
hereby created in the state treasury and in such subaccounts as are
deemed appropriate by the directors of the corporation.
(2) Moneys in the account, including unanticipated revenues under
RCW 43.79.270, shall be used exclusively for the following purposes in
the following priority:
(a) For reimbursement of the state general fund under RCW
67.40.060;
(b) After appropriation by statute:
(i) For payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of
the bonds issued under RCW 67.40.030;
(ii) For expenditures authorized in RCW 67.40.170;
(iii) For acquisition, design, and construction of the state
convention and trade center; and
(iv) For reimbursement of any expenditures from the state general
fund in support of the state convention and trade center; and
(c) For transfer to the state convention and trade center
operations account.
(3) The corporation shall identify with specificity those
facilities of the state convention and trade center that are to be
financed with proceeds of general obligation bonds, the interest on
which is intended to be excluded from gross income for federal income
tax purposes. The corporation shall not permit the extent or manner of
private business use of those bond-financed facilities to be
inconsistent with treatment of such bonds as governmental bonds under
applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
(4) In order to ensure consistent treatment of bonds authorized
under RCW 67.40.030 with applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, and notwithstanding RCW 43.84.092, investment
earnings on bond proceeds deposited in the state convention and trade
center account in the state treasury shall be retained in the account,
and shall be expended by the corporation for the purposes authorized
under chapter 386, Laws of 1995 and in a manner consistent with
applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
(5) During the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the state convention and trade center account to the
state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of
the account.

Sec. 920 RCW 70.79.350 and 1979 c 151 s 171 are each amended to
read as follows:
The chief inspector shall give an official receipt for all fees
required by chapter 70.79 RCW and shall transfer all sums so received
to the treasurer of the state of Washington as ex officio custodian
thereof and ((by him, as such custodian,)) the treasurer shall place
((said)) all sums in a special fund hereby created and designated as
the "pressure systems safety fund". ((Said)) Funds ((by him)) shall be
paid out upon vouchers duly and regularly issued therefor and approved
by the director of the department of labor and industries. The
treasurer, as ex officio custodian of ((said)) the fund, shall keep an
accurate record of any payments into ((said)) the fund, and of all
disbursements therefrom. ((Said)) The fund shall be used exclusively
to defray only the expenses of administering chapter 70.79 RCW by the
chief inspector as authorized by law and the expenses incident to the
maintenance of ((his)) the office. The fund shall be charged with its
pro rata share of the cost of administering ((said)) the fund which is
to be determined by the director of financial management and by the
director of the department of labor and industries.
During the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
from the pressure systems safety fund to the state general fund such
amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

Sec. 921 RCW 70.146.030 and 2002 c 371 s 921 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The water quality account is hereby created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be used only in a manner
consistent with this chapter. Moneys deposited in the account shall be
administered by the department of ecology and shall be subject to
legislative appropriation. Moneys placed in the account shall include
tax receipts as provided in RCW 82.24.027, 82.26.025, and 82.32.390,
principal and interest from the repayment of any loans granted pursuant
to this chapter, and any other moneys appropriated to the account by
the legislature.
(2) The department may use or permit the use of any moneys in the
account to make grants or loans to public bodies, including grants to
public bodies as cost-sharing moneys in any case where federal, local,
or other funds are made available on a cost-sharing basis, for water
pollution control facilities and activities, or for purposes of
assisting a public body to obtain an ownership interest in water
pollution control facilities and/or to defray a part of the payments
made by a public body to a service provider under a service agreement
entered into pursuant to RCW 70.150.060, within the purposes of this
chapter and for related administrative expenses. For the period July
1, ((2001)) 2003, to June 30, ((2003)) 2005, moneys in the account may
be used to process applications received by the department that seek to
make changes to or transfer existing water rights and for grants and
technical assistance to public bodies for watershed planning under
chapter 90.82 RCW. No more than three percent of the moneys deposited
in the account may be used by the department to pay for the
administration of the grant and loan program authorized by this
chapter.
(3) Beginning with the biennium ending June 30, 1997, the
department shall present a biennial progress report on the use of
moneys from the account to the chairs of the senate committee on ways
and means and the house of representatives committee on appropriations.
The first report is due June 30, 1996, and the report for each
succeeding biennium is due December 31 of the odd-numbered year. The
report shall consist of a list of each recipient, project description,
and amount of the grant, loan, or both.

Sec. 922 RCW 76.04.630 and 1993 c 36 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is created a landowner contingency forest fire suppression
account in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only
as provided in this section. Disbursements from the account shall be
on authorization of the commissioner of public lands or the
commissioner's designee. The account is subject to the allotment
procedure provided under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for disbursements.
The department may expend from this account the amounts as may be
available and as it considers appropriate for the payment of emergency
fire costs resulting from a participating landowner fire. The
department may, when moneys are available from the landowner
contingency forest fire suppression account, expend moneys for
summarily abating, isolating, or reducing an extreme fire hazard under
RCW 76.04.660. All moneys recovered as a result of the department's
actions, from the owner or person responsible, under RCW 76.04.660
shall be deposited in the landowner contingency forest fire suppression
account.
When a determination is made that the fire was started by other
than a landowner operation, moneys expended from this account in the
suppression of such fire shall be recovered from the general fund
appropriations as may be available for emergency fire suppression
costs. The department shall deposit in the landowner contingency
forest fire suppression account moneys paid out of the account which
are later recovered, less reasonable costs of recovery.
This account shall be established and renewed by an annual special
forest fire suppression account assessment paid by participating
landowners at a rate to be established by the department. In
establishing assessments, the department shall seek to establish and
thereafter reestablish a balance in the account of three million
dollars. The department may establish a flat fee assessment of no more
than seven dollars and fifty cents for participating landowners owning
parcels of fifty acres or less. For participating landowners owning
parcels larger than fifty acres, the department may charge the flat fee
assessment plus a per acre assessment for every acre over fifty acres.
The per acre assessment established by the department may not exceed
fifteen cents per acre per year. The assessments may differ to
equitably distribute the assessment based on emergency fire suppression
cost experience necessitated by landowner operations. Amounts assessed
for this account shall be a lien upon the forest lands with respect to
which the assessment is made and may be collected as directed by the
department in the same manner as forest protection assessments.
Payment of emergency costs from this account shall in no way restrict
the right of the department to recover costs pursuant to RCW 76.04.495
or other laws.
When the department determines that a forest fire was started in
the course of or as a result of a landowner operation, it shall notify
the forest fire advisory board of the determination. The determination
shall be final, unless, within ninety days of the notification, the
forest fire advisory board or an interested party serves a request for
a hearing before the department. The hearing shall constitute an
adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative
procedure act, and an appeal shall be in accordance with RCW 34.05.510
through 34.05.598.
During the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
from the landowner contingency forest fire suppression account to the
state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of
the account.

Sec. 923 RCW 76.12.170 and 1988 c 128 s 36 are each amended to
read as follows:
All receipts from the sale of stock or seed shall be deposited in
a state forest nursery revolving fund to be maintained by the
department, which is hereby authorized to use all money in said fund
for the maintenance of the state tree nursery or the planting of
denuded state owned lands.
During the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
from the state forest nursery revolving fund to the state general fund
such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

Sec. 924 RCW 80.01.080 and 2002 c 371 s 924 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is created in the state treasury a public service revolving
fund. Regulatory fees payable by all types of public service companies
shall be deposited to the credit of the public service revolving fund.
Except for expenses payable out of the pipeline safety account, all
expense of operation of the Washington utilities and transportation
commission shall be payable out of the public service revolving fund.
During the ((2001-2003)) 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the public service revolving fund to the state
general fund such amounts as reflect the ((appropriations reductions
made by the 2002 supplemental appropriations act for administrative
efficiencies and savings)) excess fund balance of the fund.

Sec. 925 RCW 82.14.200 and 1998 c 321 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is created in the state treasury a special account to be
known as the "county sales and use tax equalization account." Into
this account shall be placed a portion of all motor vehicle excise tax
receipts as provided in RCW 82.44.110. Funds in this account shall be
allocated by the state treasurer according to the following procedure:
(1) Prior to April 1st of each year the director of revenue shall
inform the state treasurer of the total and the per capita levels of
revenues for the unincorporated area of each county and the statewide
weighted average per capita level of revenues for the unincorporated
areas of all counties imposing the sales and use tax authorized under
RCW 82.14.030(1) for the previous calendar year.
(2) At such times as distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150,
the state treasurer shall apportion to each county imposing the sales
and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(1) at the maximum rate and receiving
less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars from the tax for the
previous calendar year, an amount from the county sales and use tax
equalization account sufficient, when added to the amount of revenues
received the previous calendar year by the county, to equal one hundred
fifty thousand dollars.
The department of revenue shall establish a governmental price
index as provided in this subsection. The base year for the index
shall be the end of the third quarter of 1982. Prior to November 1,
1983, and prior to each November 1st thereafter, the department of
revenue shall establish another index figure for the third quarter of
that year. The department of revenue may use the implicit price
deflators for state and local government purchases of goods and
services calculated by the United States department of commerce to
establish the governmental price index. Beginning on January 1, 1984,
and each January 1st thereafter, the one hundred fifty thousand dollar
base figure in this subsection shall be adjusted in direct proportion
to the percentage change in the governmental price index from 1982
until the year before the adjustment. Distributions made under this
subsection for 1984 and thereafter shall use this adjusted base amount
figure.
(3) Subsequent to the distributions under subsection (2) of this
section and at such times as distributions are made under RCW
82.44.150, the state treasurer shall apportion to each county imposing
the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(1) at the maximum rate and
receiving less than seventy percent of the statewide weighted average
per capita level of revenues for the unincorporated areas of all
counties as determined by the department of revenue under subsection
(1) of this section, an amount from the county sales and use tax
equalization account sufficient, when added to the per capita level of
revenues for the unincorporated area received the previous calendar
year by the county, to equal seventy percent of the statewide weighted
average per capita level of revenues for the unincorporated areas of
all counties determined under subsection (1) of this section, subject
to reduction under subsections (6) and (7) of this section. When
computing distributions under this section, any distribution under
subsection (2) of this section shall be considered revenues received
from the tax imposed under RCW 82.14.030(1) for the previous calendar
year.
(4) Subsequent to the distributions under subsection (3) of this
section and at such times as distributions are made under RCW
82.44.150, the state treasurer shall apportion to each county imposing
the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate and
receiving a distribution under subsection (2) of this section, a third
distribution from the county sales and use tax equalization account.
The distribution to each qualifying county shall be equal to the
distribution to the county under subsection (2) of this section,
subject to the reduction under subsections (6) and (7) of this section.
To qualify for the total distribution under this subsection, the county
must impose the tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) for the entire calendar
year. Counties imposing the tax for less than the full year shall
qualify for prorated allocations under this subsection proportionate to
the number of months of the year during which the tax is imposed.
(5) Subsequent to the distributions under subsection (4) of this
section and at such times as distributions are made under RCW
82.44.150, the state treasurer shall apportion to each county imposing
the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate and
receiving a distribution under subsection (3) of this section, a fourth
distribution from the county sales and use tax equalization account.
The distribution to each qualifying county shall be equal to the
distribution to the county under subsection (3) of this section,
subject to the reduction under subsections (6) and (7) of this section.
To qualify for the distributions under this subsection, the county must
impose the tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) for the entire calendar year.
Counties imposing the tax for less than the full year shall qualify for
prorated allocations under this subsection proportionate to the number
of months of the year during which the tax is imposed.
(6) Revenues distributed under subsections (2) through (5) of this
section in any calendar year shall not exceed an amount equal to
seventy percent of the statewide weighted average per capita level of
revenues for the unincorporated areas of all counties during the
previous calendar year. If distributions under subsections (3) through
(5) of this section cannot be made because of this limitation, then
distributions under subsections (3) through (5) of this section shall
be reduced ratably among the qualifying counties.
(7) If inadequate revenues exist in the county sales and use tax
equalization account to make the distributions under subsections (3)
through (5) of this section, then the distributions under subsections
(3) through (5) of this section shall be reduced ratably among the
qualifying counties. At such time during the year as additional funds
accrue to the county sales and use tax equalization account, additional
distributions shall be made under subsections (3) through (5) of this
section to the counties.
(8) If the level of revenues in the county sales and use tax
equalization account exceeds the amount necessary to make the
distributions under subsections (2) through (5) of this section, at
such times as distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150, the state
treasurer shall apportion an amount to the county public health account
created in RCW 70.05.125 equal to the adjustment under RCW
70.05.125(2)(b).
(9) If the level of revenues in the county sales and use tax
equalization account exceeds the amount necessary to make the
distributions under subsections (2) through (5) and (8) of this
section, then the additional revenues shall be credited and transferred
as follows:
(a) Fifty percent to the public facilities construction loan
revolving account under RCW 43.160.080; and
(b) Fifty percent to the distressed county public facilities
construction loan account under RCW 43.160.220, or so much thereof as
will not cause the balance in the account to exceed twenty-five million
dollars. Any remaining funds shall be deposited into the public
facilities construction loan revolving account.
(10) During the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the county sales and use tax equalization account to the
state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of
the account.

Sec. 926 RCW 82.14.210 and 1996 c 64 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is created in the state treasury a special account to be
known as the "municipal sales and use tax equalization account." Into
this account shall be placed such revenues as are provided under RCW
82.44.110(1)(e). Funds in this account shall be allocated by the state
treasurer according to the following procedure:
(1) Prior to January 1st of each year the department of revenue
shall determine the total and the per capita levels of revenues for
each city and the statewide weighted average per capita level of
revenues for all cities imposing the sales and use tax authorized under
RCW 82.14.030(1) for the previous calendar year.
(2) At such times as distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150,
the state treasurer shall apportion to each city not imposing the sales
and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) an amount from the municipal sales
and use tax equalization account equal to the amount distributed to the
city under RCW 82.44.155, multiplied by forty-five fifty-fifths.
(3) Subsequent to the distributions under subsection (2) of this
section, and at such times as distributions are made under RCW
82.44.150, the state treasurer shall apportion to each city imposing
the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(1) at the maximum rate and
receiving less than seventy percent of the statewide weighted average
per capita level of revenues for all cities as determined by the
department of revenue under subsection (1) of this section, an amount
from the municipal sales and use tax equalization account sufficient,
when added to the per capita level of revenues received the previous
calendar year by the city, to equal seventy percent of the statewide
weighted average per capita level of revenues for all cities determined
under subsection (1) of this section, subject to reduction under
subsection (6) of this section.
(4) Subsequent to the distributions under subsection (3) of this
section, and at such times as distributions are made under RCW
82.44.150, the state treasurer shall apportion to each city imposing
the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate and
receiving a distribution under subsection (3) of this section, a third
distribution from the municipal sales and use tax equalization account.
The distribution to each qualifying city shall be equal to the
distribution to the city under subsection (3) of this section, subject
to the reduction under subsection (6) of this section. To qualify for
the distributions under this subsection, the city must impose the tax
under RCW 82.14.030(2) for the entire calendar year. Cities imposing
the tax for less than the full year shall qualify for prorated
allocations under this subsection proportionate to the number of months
of the year during which the tax is imposed.
(5) For a city with an official incorporation date after January 1,
1990, municipal sales and use tax equalization distributions shall be
made according to the procedures in this subsection. Municipal sales
and use tax equalization distributions to eligible new cities shall be
made at the same time as distributions are made under subsections (3)
and (4) of this section. The department of revenue shall follow the
estimating procedures outlined in this subsection until the new city
has received a full year's worth of revenues under RCW 82.14.030(1) as
of the January municipal sales and use tax equalization distribution.
(a) Whether a newly incorporated city determined to receive funds
under this subsection receives its first equalization payment at the
January, April, July, or October municipal sales and use tax
equalization distribution shall depend on the date the city first
imposes the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1).
(i) A newly incorporated city imposing the tax authorized under RCW
82.14.030(1) effective as of January 1st shall be eligible to receive
funds under this subsection beginning with the April municipal sales
and use tax equalization distribution of that year.
(ii) A newly incorporated city imposing the tax authorized under
RCW 82.14.030(1) effective as of February 1st, March 1st, or April 1st
shall be eligible to receive funds under this subsection beginning with
the July municipal sales and use tax equalization distribution of that
year.
(iii) A newly incorporated city imposing the tax authorized under
RCW 82.14.030(1) effective as of May 1st, June 1st, or July 1st shall
be eligible to receive funds under this subsection beginning with the
October municipal sales and use tax equalization distribution of that
year.
(iv) A newly incorporated city imposing the tax authorized under
RCW 82.14.030(1) effective as of August 1st, September 1st, or October
1st shall be eligible to receive funds under this subsection beginning
with the January municipal sales and use tax equalization distribution
of the next year.
(v) A newly incorporated city imposing the tax authorized under RCW
82.14.030(1) effective as of November 1st or December 1st shall be
eligible to receive funds under this subsection beginning with the
April municipal sales and use tax equalization distribution of the next
year.
(b) For purposes of calculating the amount of funds the new city
should receive under this subsection, the department of revenue shall:
(i) Estimate the per capita amount of revenues from the tax
authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) that the new city would have received
had the city received revenues from the tax the entire calendar year;
(ii) Calculate the amount provided under subsection (3) of this
section based on the per capita revenues determined under (b)(i) of
this subsection;
(iii) Prorate the amount determined under (b)(ii) of this
subsection by the number of months the tax authorized under RCW
82.14.030(1) is imposed.
(c) A new city imposing the tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) at the
maximum rate and receiving a distribution calculated under (b) of this
subsection shall receive another distribution from the municipal sales
and use tax equalization account. This distribution shall be equal to
the calculation made under (b)(ii) of this subsection, prorated by the
number of months the city imposes the tax authorized under RCW
82.14.030(2) at the full rate.
(d) The department of revenue shall advise the state treasurer of
the amounts calculated under (b) and (c) of this subsection and the
state treasurer shall distribute these amounts to the new city from the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account subject to the
limitations imposed in subsection (6) of this section.
(e) Revenues estimated under this subsection shall not affect the
calculation of the statewide weighted average per capita level of
revenues for all cities made under subsection (1) of this section.
(6) If inadequate revenues exist in the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account to make the distributions under subsection (3),
(4), or (5) of this section, then the distributions under subsections
(3), (4), and (5) of this section shall be reduced ratably among the
qualifying cities. At such time during the year as additional funds
accrue to the municipal sales and use tax equalization account,
additional distributions shall be made under subsections (3), (4), and
(5) of this section to the cities.
(7) If the level of revenues in the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account exceeds the amount necessary to make the
distributions under subsections (2) through (5) of this section, then
the additional revenues shall be apportioned among the several cities
within the state ratably on the basis of population as last determined
by the office of financial management: PROVIDED, That no such
distribution shall be made to those cities receiving a distribution
under subsection (2) of this section.
(8) During the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the municipal sales and use tax equalization account to
the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance
in the account.

Sec. 927 RCW 86.26.007 and 1997 c 149 s 914 are each amended to
read as follows:
The flood control assistance account is hereby established in the
state treasury. At the beginning of the 1997-99 fiscal biennium and
each biennium thereafter the state treasurer shall transfer four
million dollars from the general fund to the flood control assistance
account. Moneys in the flood control assistance account may be spent
only after appropriation for purposes specified under this chapter
((or, during the 1997-99 fiscal biennium, for transfer to the disaster
response account)). During the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer from the flood control assistance account to
the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance
of the account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 928 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 929 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of part)

INDEX PAGE #

ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
ATTORNEY GENERAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
BELATED CLAIMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 100
BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 31
BOARD OF TAX APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 16
BOND EXPENSES . . . . . . . . . . . . 113
CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 90
CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 39
COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
COMMISSION ON ASIAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
COMPENSATION -- INSURANCE BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 100
COURT OF APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 32
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 47
DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 35
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 39
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 43
DEPARTMENT OF GAMING . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 16
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
COUNTY PUBLIC HEALTH ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 104
DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 16
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 32
DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING . . . . . . . . . . . . 49
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 46
DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS
CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 101
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 108
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 37
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 26
ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 26
ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 26
JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 25
PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 33
EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 97
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 90
ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
EMERGENCY FUND ALLOCATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 112
EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 37
ENVIRONMENTAL HEARINGS OFFICE . . . . . . . . . . . . 43
EXPENDITURE AUTHORIZATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 109
FORENSIC INVESTIGATION COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
GROWTH PLANNING HEARINGS BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD
FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 93
POLICY COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 92
HOME CARE QUALITY AUTHORITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 31
INCENTIVE SAVINGS
FY 2004 . . . . . . . . . . . . 104
FY 2005 . . . . . . . . . . . . 104
INDETERMINATE SENTENCE REVIEW BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 33
INFORMATION SYSTEMS PROJECTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 109
INSURANCE COMMISSIONER . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 42
JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
K-12 CARRYFORWARD AND PRIOR SCHOOL YEAR ADJUSTMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 81
LAW LIBRARY . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
MUNICIPAL RESEARCH COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 16
OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 105, 13
CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 103
EDUCATION TECHNOLOGY REVOLVING ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 103
EMERGENCY FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 99
FIRE CONTINGENCY POOL . . . . . . . . . . . . 99
LEGISLATIVE AND JUDICIAL EMPLOYEE HEALTH BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 103
PERSONNEL RESOURCES BOARD'S SALARY SURVEY . . . . . . . . . . . . 102
OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
OFFICE OF THE STATE ACTUARY . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
PERSONNEL APPEALS BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
PROGRAM COST SHIFTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 112
PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
SECRETARY OF STATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
SENATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
SENTENCING GUIDELINES COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 37
SPOKANE INTERCOLLEGIATE RESEARCH AND TECHNOLOGY INSTITUTE . . . . . . . . . . . . 96
STATE AUDITOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES . . . . . . . . . . . . 85
STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 82
STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
STATE INVESTMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 41
STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 49
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 97
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF . . . . . . . . . . . . 97
STATE TREASURER . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST . . . . . . . . . . . . 98, 99
FEDERAL REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 106
STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 106
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 107
STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 112
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 51
BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 60
EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 72
EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 70
GENERAL APPORTIONMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 54
INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 70
LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 79
LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 70
MISCELLANEOUS PURPOSES . . . . . . . . . . . . 72
PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 71
PUPIL TRANSPORTATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 64
SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 64
SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 65
SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 66
STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 80
TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 78
SUPREME COURT . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE . . . . . . . . . . . . 91
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 88
UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
VIDEO TELECOMMUNICATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 111
VOLUNTARY RETIREMENT INCENTIVES . . . . . . . . . . . . 113
VOLUNTARY SEPARATION INCENTIVES . . . . . . . . . . . . 113
WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY REINSURANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 48
WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 96
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 97
WASHINGTON STATE LIBRARY . . . . . . . . . . . . 96
WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 89
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 91
WORK FORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 96

--- END ---