BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that performance
measurement is integral to the efficient and effective management and
operation of state agencies and programs, essential to the achievement
of effective interagency cooperation and management, and integral to
identifying priorities of government for purposes of funding biennial
budgets. The legislature finds that reviews of outcome and performance
measures are necessary for demonstrating the accountability of state
government to the public. Thus, the legislature intends to expand its
performance measure reviews to provide greater accountability to the
public, to ensure that state government has effective measures for
assessing and continuously improving performance, and to determine
whether targeted funding investments and established priorities of
government actually produce the intended and expected services and
benefits. It is the intent of the legislature that outcome and
performance measures used by state agencies and programs and required
by RCW 43.88.090 become a tool for the governor and the legislature in
establishing priorities of government and developing biennial budgets.

Sec. 2 RCW 44.04.260 and 2001 c 259 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((joint legislative audit and review committee)) legislative
accountability board, the legislative transportation committee, the
joint committee on pension policy, the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee, and the joint legislative systems
committee are subject to such operational policies, procedures, and
oversight as are deemed necessary by the facilities and operations
committee of the senate and the executive rules committee of the house
of representatives to ensure operational adequacy of the agencies of
the legislative branch. As used in this section, "operational
policies, procedures, and oversight" includes the development process
of biennial budgets, contracting procedures, personnel policies, and
compensation plans, selection of a chief administrator, facilities, and
expenditures. This section does not grant oversight authority to the
facilities and operations committee of the senate over any standing
committee of the house of representatives or oversight authority to the
executive rules committee of the house of representatives over any
standing committee of the senate.

Sec. 3 RCW 44.28.005 and 1996 c 288 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) (("Legislative auditor" means the executive officer of the
joint legislative audit and review committee)) "Board" means the
legislative accountability board.
(2) "Economy and efficiency audits" means performance audits that
establish: (a) Whether a state agency or unit of local government
receiving state funds is acquiring, protecting, and using its resources
such as personnel, property, and space economically and efficiently;
(b) the causes of inefficiencies or uneconomical practices; and (c)
whether the state agency or local government has complied with
significant laws and rules in acquiring, protecting, and using its
resources.
(3) "Final compliance report" means a written document, as approved
by the ((joint committee)) board, that states the specific actions a
state agency or unit of local government receiving state funds has
taken to implement recommendations contained in the final performance
audit report and the preliminary compliance report. Any
recommendations, including proposed legislation and changes in the
agency's rules and practices or the local government's practices, based
on testimony received, must be included in the final compliance report.
(4) "Final performance audit report" means a written document
adopted by the ((joint legislative audit and review committee)) board
that contains the findings and proposed recommendations made in the
preliminary performance audit report, the final recommendations adopted
by the ((joint committee)) board, any comments to the preliminary
performance audit report by the ((joint committee)) board, and any
comments to the preliminary performance audit report by the state
agency or local government that was audited.
(5) (("Joint committee" means the joint legislative audit and
review committee)) "Legislative auditor" means the executive officer of
the board.
(6) "Local government" means a city, town, county, special purpose
district, political subdivision, municipal corporation, or quasi-municipal corporation, including a public corporation created by such
an entity.
(7) "Performance audit" means an ((objective and systematic
assessment of a state agency or any of its programs, functions, or
activities, or a unit of local government receiving state funds, by an
independent evaluator in order to help public officials improve
efficiency, effectiveness, and accountability)) independent,
systematic, and unbiased review of selected programs, operations,
services, or functions of state government or a unit of local
government receiving state funds:
(a) To determine (i) compliance with statutory intent or budget
direction, and (ii) whether applicable performance goals, standards,
benchmarks, and measures are being achieved in a timely, efficient, and
cost-effective manner; and
(b) Based upon such determinations, to develop recommendations for
the improvement, cessation, reorganization, or more effective, timely,
and efficient use of government resources to accomplish established
priorities of government as expressed in statute and budget direction.
Performance audits include economy and efficiency audits and program
audits. A performance audit of a local government may only be made to
determine whether the local government is using state funds for their
intended purpose in an efficient and effective manner.
(8) "Performance measures" are a composite of key indicators of a
program's or activity's inputs, outputs, outcomes, productivity,
timeliness, and/or quality. They are means of evaluating policies and
programs by measuring results against agreed upon program goals or
standards.
(9) "Performance measure review" means an independent evaluation of
how a state agency uses its performance measures to assess the outcomes
of its legislatively authorized activities.
(10) "Preliminary compliance report" means a written document that
states the specific actions a state agency or unit of local government
receiving state funds has taken to implement any recommendations
contained in the final performance audit report.
(((10))) (11) "Preliminary performance audit report" means a
written document prepared for review and comment by the ((joint
legislative audit and review committee)) board after the completion of
a performance audit. The preliminary performance audit report must
contain the audit findings and any proposed recommendations to improve
the efficiency, effectiveness, or accountability of the state agency or
local government audited.
(((11))) (12) "Program audits" means performance audits that
determine: (a) The extent to which desired outcomes or results are
being achieved; (b) the causes for not achieving intended outcomes or
results; and (c) compliance with significant laws and rules applicable
to the program.
(((12))) (13) "State agency" or "agency" means a state agency,
department, office, officer, board, commission, bureau, division,
institution, or institution of higher education. "State agency"
includes all elective offices in the executive branch of state
government.

Sec. 4 RCW 44.28.010 and 1996 c 288 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((joint legislative audit and review committee)) legislative
accountability board is created, which shall consist of eight senators
and eight representatives from the legislature. The senate members of
the ((committee)) board shall be appointed by the president of the
senate, and the house members of the ((committee)) board shall be
appointed by the speaker of the house. Not more than four members from
each house shall be from the same political party. Members shall be
appointed before the close of each regular session of the legislature
during an odd-numbered year. If before the close of a regular session
during an odd-numbered year, the governor issues a proclamation
convening the legislature into special session, or the legislature by
resolution convenes the legislature into special session, following
such regular session, then such appointments shall be made as a matter
of closing business of such special session. Members shall be subject
to confirmation, as to the senate members by the senate, and as to the
house members by the house. In the event of a failure to appoint or
confirm ((joint committee)) board members, the members of the ((joint
committee)) board from either house in which there is a failure to
appoint or confirm shall be elected by the members of such house.

Sec. 5 RCW 44.28.020 and 1996 c 288 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The term of office of the members of the ((joint committee)) board
who continue to be members of the senate and house shall be from the
close of the session in which they were appointed or elected as
provided in RCW 44.28.010 until the close of the next regular session
during an odd-numbered year or special session following such regular
session, or, in the event that such appointments or elections are not
made, until the close of the next regular session during an odd-numbered year during which successors are appointed or elected. The
term of office of ((joint committee)) board members who do not continue
to be members of the senate and house ceases upon the convening of the
next regular session of the legislature during an odd-numbered year
after their confirmation, election or appointment. Vacancies on the
((joint committee)) board shall be filled by appointment by the
remaining members. All such vacancies shall be filled from the same
political party and from the same house as the member whose seat was
vacated.

Sec. 6 RCW 44.28.030 and 1996 c 288 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
On and after the commencement of a succeeding general session of
the legislature, those members of the ((joint committee)) board who
continue to be members of the senate and house, respectively, shall
continue as members of the ((joint committee)) board as indicated in
RCW 44.28.020 and the ((joint committee)) board shall continue with all
its powers, duties, authorities, records, papers, personnel and staff,
and all funds made available for its use.

Sec. 7 RCW 44.28.040 and 1996 c 288 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The members of the ((joint committee)) board shall serve without
additional compensation, but shall be reimbursed for their travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120 for attending meetings of the
((joint committee)) board or a subcommittee of the ((joint committee))
board, or while engaged on other business authorized by the ((joint
committee)) board.

Sec. 8 RCW 44.28.050 and 1989 c 137 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
All expenses incurred by the ((committee)) board, including
salaries and expenses of employees, shall be paid upon voucher forms as
provided by the auditor. The legislative auditor may be authorized by
the ((legislative budget committee's)) board's executive committee to
sign vouchers. Such authorization shall specify a dollar limitation
and be set out in writing. A monthly report of such vouchers shall be
submitted to the executive committee. If authorization is not given to
the legislative auditor then the chair, or the vice-chair in the
chair's absence, is authorized to sign vouchers. This authority shall
continue until the chair's or vice-chair's successors are selected
after each ensuing session of the legislature. Vouchers may be drawn
on funds appropriated generally by the legislature for legislative
expenses or upon any special appropriation which may be provided by the
legislature for the expenses of the ((committee)) board or both.

Sec. 9 RCW 44.28.055 and 2001 c 259 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The administration of the ((joint legislative audit and review
committee)) board is subject to RCW 44.04.260.

Sec. 10 RCW 44.28.060 and 2001 c 259 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The members of the ((joint committee)) board shall form an
executive committee consisting of one member from each of the four
major political caucuses, which shall include a chair and a vice-chair.
The chair and vice-chair shall serve for a period not to exceed two
years. The chair and the vice-chair may not be members of the same
political party. The chair shall alternate between the members of the
majority parties in the senate and the house of representatives.
Subject to RCW 44.04.260, the executive committee is responsible
for performing all general administrative and personnel duties assigned
to it in the rules and procedures adopted by the ((joint committee))
board, as well as other duties delegated to it by the ((joint
committee)) board. The executive committee shall recommend applicants
for the position of the legislative auditor to the membership of the
((joint committee)) board. The legislative auditor shall be hired with
the approval of a majority of the membership of the ((joint committee))
board. Subject to RCW 44.04.260, the executive committee shall set the
salary of the legislative auditor.
The ((joint committee)) board shall adopt rules and procedures for
its orderly operation. The board must review and approve its rules and
procedures not less than every two years. The ((joint committee))
board may create subcommittees to perform duties under this chapter.

Sec. 11 RCW 44.28.065 and 2001 c 259 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislative auditor shall:
(1) Establish and manage the office of the ((joint legislative
audit and review committee)) board to carry out the functions of this
chapter;
(2) Direct the audit and review functions described in this chapter
and ensure that performance audits are performed in accordance with the
"Government Auditing Standards" published by the comptroller general of
the United States as applicable to the scope of the audit;
(3) Make findings and recommendations to the ((joint committee))
board and under its direction to the committees of the state
legislature concerning the organization and operation of state agencies
and the expenditure of state funds by units of local government;
(4) Subject to RCW 44.04.260, in consultation with and with the
approval of the executive committee, hire staff necessary to carry out
the purposes of this chapter. Subject to RCW 44.04.260, employee
salaries, other than the legislative auditor, shall be set by the
legislative auditor with the approval of the executive committee;
(5) Assist the several standing committees of the house and senate
in consideration of legislation affecting state departments and their
efficiency; appear before other legislative committees; and assist any
other legislative committee upon instruction by the ((joint legislative
audit and review committee)) board;
(6) Provide the legislature with information obtained under the
direction of the ((joint legislative audit and review committee))
board;
(7) Maintain a record of all work performed by the legislative
auditor under the direction of the ((joint legislative audit and review
committee)) board and keep and make available all documents, data, and
reports submitted to the legislative auditor by any legislative
committee.

Sec. 12 RCW 44.28.071 and 1996 c 288 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In conducting performance audits and other reviews, the
legislative auditor shall work closely with the chairs and staff of
standing committees of the senate and house of representatives, and may
((work in consultation)) consult with the state auditor and the
director of financial management.
(2) The legislative auditor may contract with and consult with
public and private independent professional and technical experts as
necessary in conducting the performance audits. The legislative
auditor shall solicit input from appropriate representatives and
experts in the field that is the subject of an audit regarding the
conduct of the performance audits and regarding the preliminary and
final reports and recommendations of the legislative auditor. It is
the intent of the legislature that the staff, administration, and costs
of the board be minimized, and that the board conduct operations
through the use of qualified public and private resources and entities
when appropriate and feasible or when staff resources are insufficient.
The legislative auditor should also involve front-line employees and
internal auditors in the performance audit process to the highest
possible degree.
(3) The legislative auditor shall work with the ((legislative
evaluation and accountability program committee)) board and the office
of financial management to develop information system capabilities
necessary for the performance audit requirements of this chapter.
(4) The legislative auditor shall work with the ((legislative
office of performance review)) board and the office of financial
management to facilitate the implementation of effective performance
measures throughout state government. In agencies and programs where
effective systems for performance measurement exist, the measurements
incorporated into those systems should be a basis for performance
audits conducted under this chapter.

Sec. 13 RCW 44.28.075 and 1996 c 288 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((Subject to the requirements of the performance audit work
plan approved by the joint committee under RCW 44.28.083, performance
audits may, in addition to the determinations that may be made in such
an audit as specified in RCW 44.28.005, include the following:
(a) An examination of the costs and benefits of agency programs,
functions, and activities;
(b) Identification of viable alternatives for reducing costs or
improving service delivery;
(c) Identification of gaps and overlaps in service delivery, along
with corrective action; and
(d) Comparison with other states whose agencies perform similar
functions, as well as their relative funding levels and performance.
(2) As part of a performance audit, the legislative auditor may
review the costs of programs recently implemented by the legislature to
compare actual agency costs with the appropriations provided and the
cost estimates that were included in the fiscal note for the program at
the time the program was enacted.)) The scope of performance audits
conducted by the legislative accountability board, in addition to the
requirements of the performance audit work plan approved by the board
under RCW 44.28.083, should be attentive to the following issues:
(a) Identification of recommendations to the governor, the
legislature, and appropriate agencies for performance improvement, cost
avoidance, cost savings, and more efficient, timely, and effective use
of available resources in selected state programs, operations,
services, or functions, based on cost-effectiveness analyses and review
of best management practices;
(b) Identification of opportunities for enhancement, consolidation,
elimination, or other actions to improve the administration of state
programs, operations, services, or functions to address significant and
unnecessary duplication of effort;
(c) Identification of opportunities for improved communication and
integration of information technology systems and data bases within and
across program, operational, service, or functional areas of state
government;
(d) Identification of opportunities to eliminate, combine, or
integrate statutes, rules, and policy directives when their intended
purposes are substantially equivalent or overlapping, in order to
improve and simplify government programs, services, operations, or
functions; and
(e) Verification of the reliability and validity of individual or
multiple agency performance data, self-assessments, and performance
measurement systems as required under RCW 43.88.090.
(2) In setting the scope of a performance audit, the legislative
auditor may include comparisons with other states, governments, or
private or nonprofit organizations in which similar programs,
operations, services, processes, or functions are being administered or
performed.

Sec. 14 RCW 44.28.080 and 1996 c 288 s 11 are each
amended to
read as follows:
The ((joint committee)) board has the following powers:
(1) To make examinations and reports concerning whether or not
appropriations are being expended for the purposes and within the
statutory restrictions provided by the legislature; and concerning the
organization and operation of procedures necessary or desirable to
promote economy, efficiency, and effectiveness in state government, its
officers, boards, committees, commissions, institutions, and other
state agencies, and to make recommendations and reports to the
legislature.
(2) To make such other studies and examinations of economy,
efficiency, and effectiveness of state government and its state
agencies as it may find advisable, and to hear complaints, hold
hearings, gather information, and make findings of fact with respect
thereto.
(3) To conduct program and fiscal reviews of any state agency or
program scheduled for termination under the process provided under
chapter 43.131 RCW.
(4) To perform other legislative staff studies of state government
or the use of state funds.
(5) To conduct performance audits in accordance with the work plan
adopted by the ((joint committee)) board under RCW ((44.28.180))
44.28.083.
(6) To receive a copy of each report of examination or audit issued
by the state auditor for examinations or audits that were conducted at
the request of the ((joint committee)) board and to make
recommendations as it deems appropriate as a separate addendum to the
report or audit.
(7) To develop internal tracking procedures that will allow the
legislature to measure the effectiveness of performance audits
conducted by the ((joint committee)) board including, where
appropriate, measurements of cost-savings and increases in efficiency
and effectiveness in how state agencies deliver their services.
(8) To receive messages and reports in person or in writing from
the governor or any other state officials and to study generally any
and all business relating to economy, efficiency, and effectiveness in
state government and state agencies.

Sec. 15 RCW 44.28.083 and
1996 c 288 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) During the regular legislative session of each odd-numbered
year, beginning with 1997, the ((joint legislative audit and review
committee)) board shall develop and approve a performance audit work
plan for the subsequent sixteen to twenty-four-month period and an
overall work plan that identifies state agency programs for which
formal evaluation appears necessary. Among the factors to be
considered in preparing the work plans are:
(a) Whether a program newly created or significantly altered by the
legislature warrants continued oversight because (i) the fiscal impact
of the program is significant, or (ii) the program represents a
relatively high degree of risk in terms of reaching the stated goals
and objectives for that program;
(b) Whether implementation of an existing program has failed to
meet its goals and objectives by any significant degree; and
(c) Whether a follow-up audit would help ensure that previously
identified recommendations for improvements were being implemented.
(2) The project description for each performance audit must include
start and completion dates, the proposed approach, and cost estimates.
(3) The legislative auditor ((may)) shall consult with the chairs
and staff of appropriate legislative committees, the state auditor, and
the director of financial management in developing the performance
audit work plan.
(4) The performance audit work plan and the overall work plan may
include proposals to employ contract resources. As conditions warrant,
the performance audit work plan and the overall work plan may be
amended from time to time. All performance audit work plans shall be
transmitted to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the
senate and the house of representatives no later than the sixtieth day
of the regular legislative session of each odd-numbered year, beginning
with 1997. All overall work plans shall be transmitted to the
appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the senate and the house of
representatives.

Sec. 16 RCW 44.28.088 and 1996 c 288 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) When the legislative auditor has completed a performance audit
authorized in the performance audit work plan, the legislative auditor
shall transmit the preliminary performance audit report to the affected
state agency or local government and the office of financial management
for comment. The agency or local government and the office of
financial management shall provide any response to the legislative
auditor within thirty days after receipt of the preliminary performance
audit report unless a different time period is approved by the ((joint
committee)) board. The legislative auditor shall incorporate the
response of the agency or local government and the office of financial
management into the final performance audit report.
(2) Before releasing the results of a performance audit to the
legislature or the public, the legislative auditor shall submit the
preliminary performance audit report to the ((joint committee)) board
for its review, comments, and final recommendations. Any comments by
the ((joint committee)) board must be included as a separate addendum
to the final performance audit report. Upon consideration and
incorporation of the review, comments, and recommendations of the
((joint committee)) board, the legislative auditor shall transmit the
final performance audit report to the affected agency or local
government, the director of financial management, the leadership of the
senate and the house of representatives, and the appropriate standing
committees of the house of representatives and the senate and shall
publish the results and make the report available to the public through
the board's web site and through customary public communications. For
purposes of this section, "leadership of the senate and the house of
representatives" means the speaker of the house, the majority leaders
of the senate and the house of representatives, the minority leaders of
the senate and the house of representatives, the caucus chairs of both
major political parties of the senate and the house of representatives,
and the floor leaders of both major political parties of the senate and
the house of representatives.

Sec. 17 RCW 44.28.091 and 1996 c 288 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No later than nine months after the final performance audit has
been transmitted by the ((joint committee)) board to the appropriate
standing committees of the house of representatives and the senate, the
((joint committee)) board in consultation with the standing committees
may produce a preliminary compliance report on the agency's or local
government's compliance with the final performance audit
recommendations. The agency or local government may attach its
comments to the ((joint committee's)) board's preliminary compliance
report as a separate addendum.
(2) Within three months after the issuance of the preliminary
compliance report, the ((joint committee)) board may hold at least one
public hearing and receive public testimony regarding the findings and
recommendations contained in the preliminary compliance report. The
((joint committee)) board may waive the public hearing requirement if
the preliminary compliance report demonstrates that the agency or local
government is in compliance with the audit recommendations. The
((joint committee)) board shall issue any final compliance report
within four weeks after the public hearing or hearings. The
legislative auditor shall transmit the final compliance report in the
same manner as a final performance audit is transmitted under RCW
44.28.088.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 44.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board shall review the performance and outcome measures of
selected state agencies and departments. The purpose of these
performance measure reviews is to ensure that the legislature has the
means to adequately and accurately assess the performance of those
agencies and departments, and the outcomes of their performance. Where
two or more agencies have shared responsibility for functions or
priorities of government, these reviews can also determine whether
effective interagency cooperation and collaboration occurs in areas
such as program coordination, administrative structures, information
systems, and administration of grants and loans.
(2) In conducting these reviews, the board shall consult with the
office of financial management and other state agencies. The
legislative auditor may contract with and consult with public and
private independent professional and technical experts as necessary in
conducting the reviews.
(3) The board shall develop a work plan and common methodology for
conducting these reviews, which shall be accomplished within a five-year period. In setting the work plan and the extent of these
performance measure reviews, the board shall consider the timing and
results of other recent state, federal, and independent reviews and
audits, the seriousness of past findings, any inadequate remedial
action taken by an agency or department, the adequacy of an agency or
department's existing performance and outcome measures, and the
desirability to include a diverse range of agencies each year. The
reviews may include, but not be limited to:
(a) A determination of whether the performance and outcome measures
are consistent with legislative mandates, as well as agency strategic
plans, mission statements, and goals and objectives, and whether the
legislature has established clear mandates, strategic plans, mission
statements, and goals and objectives that lend themselves to
performance and outcome measurement;
(b) An examination of how agency management uses the measures to
manage resources in an efficient and effective manner;
(c) An assessment of how the agency uses performance benchmarks for
the purpose of assessing program or agency performance compared to
external standards and benchmarks;
(d) An examination of how performance and outcome measures are used
to make planning and operational improvements;
(e) A determination of how performance and outcome measures are
used in the budget planning, development, and allotment processes and
the extent to which the agency is in compliance with its
responsibilities under RCW 43.88.090;
(f) An assessment of whether the performance and outcome measures
are reliable and collected in a uniform and timely manner; and
(g) Recommendations as necessary or appropriate.
(4) Completed performance measure reviews shall be presented to the
board and published in the same manner as prescribed for performance
audits in RCW 44.28.088. Published performance measure reviews shall
be made available to the public through the board's web site and
through customary public communications. Final reports must also be
transmitted to the appropriate policy and fiscal standing committees of
the legislature.
(5) After reviewing the performance or outcome measures of an
agency or department, the legislative auditor shall recommend whether
a full performance audit of the agency or department, or a specific
program within the agency or department, is appropriate, and publicly
post those recommendations. The board shall solicit input from the
public at a subsequent hearing to decide whether and how to proceed
with a full performance audit. If the board decides by a majority vote
that a full performance audit of an agency or department, a specific
program within an agency or department, or multiple agencies is
appropriate, the board shall add that audit to its biennial performance
audit work plan under RCW 44.28.080 and 44.28.083.
(6) When conducting a full performance audit of an agency or
department, or a specific program within an agency or department, or
multiple agencies, in accordance with subsection (5) of this section,
the board shall solicit input from appropriate representatives and
experts in the field that is the subject of an audit. The board shall
make recommendations regarding the continuation, abolition,
consolidation, or reorganization of each affected agency, department,
or program. The board shall identify opportunities to develop
government partnerships, and eliminate program redundancies that will
result in increased quality, effectiveness, and efficiency of state
agencies.

Sec. 19 RCW 44.28.094 and 1996 c 288 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Subject to the joint committee's approval, the office of the
joint committee)) The board, legislative auditor, and board staff shall
undergo an external ((quality control review within three years of June
6, 1996, and)) performance audit at regular intervals ((thereafter))
not less than every three years. The ((review)) audit must be
conducted by an independent organization that has experience in
conducting performance audits. The ((quality control review))
performance audit must include, at a minimum, an evaluation of the
quality of the audits conducted by the ((joint committee)) board, an
assessment of the audit procedures used by the ((joint committee))
board, and an assessment of the qualifications of the ((joint
committee)) board staff to conduct performance audits. The first
performance audit shall be completed no later than June 30, 2004.

Sec. 20 RCW 44.28.097 and 1996 c 288 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
All agency reports concerning program performance, including
administrative review, quality control, and other internal audit or
performance reports, as requested by the ((joint committee)) board,
shall be furnished by the agency requested to provide such report.

Sec. 21 RCW 44.28.100 and 1996 c 288 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((joint committee may)) board shall make reports from time to
time to the members of the legislature, to the governor, and to the
public with respect to any of its findings or recommendations. The
((joint committee)) board shall keep complete minutes of its meetings.

Sec. 22 RCW 44.28.120 and 1996 c 288 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
In case of the failure on the part of any person to comply with any
subpoena issued in behalf of the ((joint committee)) board, or on the
refusal of any witness to testify to any matters regarding which he or
she may be lawfully interrogated, it shall be the duty of the superior
court of any county, or of the judge thereof, on application of the
((joint committee)) board, to compel obedience by proceedings for
contempt, as in the case of disobedience of the requirements of a
subpoena issued from such court or a refusal to testify therein.

Sec. 23 RCW 44.28.130 and 1996 c 288 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each witness who appears before the ((joint committee)) board by
its order, other than a state official or employee, shall receive for
his or her attendance the fees and mileage provided for witnesses in
civil cases in courts of record, which shall be audited and paid upon
the presentation of proper vouchers signed by such witness, verified by
the legislative auditor, and approved by the chair and the vice-chair
of the ((joint committee)) board.

Sec. 24 RCW 44.28.150 and 1996 c 288 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((joint committee)) board shall cooperate, act, and function
with legislative committees and with the councils or committees of
other states similar to this ((joint committee)) board and with other
interstate research organizations.

--- END ---