BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.43.080 and 1985 c 7 s 43 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Certificates of registration, and certificates of authorization
and renewals thereof, shall expire on the last day of the month of
December following their issuance or renewal and shall become invalid
on that date unless renewed. It shall be the duty of the administrator
of the division of professional licensing to notify every person, firm,
or corporation registered under this chapter((,)) of the date of the
expiration of his or her certificate and the amount of the renewal fee
that shall be required for its renewal for one year. Such notice shall
be mailed at least thirty days before the end of December of each year.
Renewal may be effected during the month of December by the payment of
a fee determined by the director as provided in RCW 43.24.086. In case
any professional engineer and/or land surveyor registered under this
chapter shall fail to pay the renewal fee hereinabove provided for,
within ninety days from the date when the same shall become due, the
renewal fee shall be the current fee plus an amount equal to one year's
fee.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2006, the department of licensing may not
renew a certificate of registration for a land surveyor unless the
registrant verifies to the board that he or she has completed at least
fifteen hours of continuing professional development per year of the
registration period. By July 1, 2005, the board shall adopt rules
governing continuing professional development for land surveyors that
are generally patterned after the model rules of the national council
of examiners for engineering and surveying.

--- END ---