BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.12.101 and 2002 c 279 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A transfer of ownership in a motor vehicle is perfected by
compliance with the requirements of this section. Once transfer of
ownership in a motor vehicle is perfected by complying with the
requirements of this section, the owner is not subject to any
liabilities, costs, penalties, or other sanctions that arise under
chapter 46.55 RCW for any event or circumstance involving the vehicle
that occurs after the time of perfection.
(1) If an owner transfers his or her interest in a vehicle, other
than by the creation, deletion, or change of a security interest, the
owner shall, at the time of the delivery of the vehicle, execute an
assignment to the transferee and provide an odometer disclosure
statement under RCW 46.12.124 on the certificate of ownership or as the
department otherwise prescribes, and cause the certificate and
assignment to be transmitted to the transferee. The owner shall notify
the department or its agents or subagents, in writing, ((on the
appropriate form,)) of the date of the sale or transfer, the name and
address of the owner ((and)), the name and address of the transferee if
available, the transferee's driver's license number if available, ((and
such description of the vehicle, including)) the vehicle identification
number, and the license plate number((, or both, as may be required in
the appropriate form provided or approved for that purpose by the
department)) if available. The report of sale will be deemed properly
filed if all information required in this section is provided ((on the
form)) in writing and includes a department-authorized notation that
the document was received by the department, its agents, or subagents
on or before the ((fifth)) tenth day after the sale of the vehicle,
excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and state and federal holidays. A report
of sale that has been properly addressed and deposited postpaid in the
United States mail is deemed to have been received by the department on
the date of the mailing. It is presumed that the date shown by the
post office cancellation mark on the envelope is the date of mailing.
A person who causes a cancellation mark to reflect a date earlier than
the actual date of mailing is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable under
RCW 9.92.030. Agents and subagents shall immediately electronically
transmit the seller's report of sale to the department. Reports of
sale processed and recorded by the department's agents or subagents may
be subject to fees as specified in RCW 46.01.140 (4)(a) or (5)(b). By
January 1, 2003, the department shall create a system enabling the
seller of a vehicle to transmit the report of sale electronically. The
system created by the department must immediately indicate on the
department's vehicle record that a seller's report of sale has been
filed.
(2) The requirements of subsection (1) of this section to provide
an odometer disclosure statement apply to the transfer of vehicles held
for lease when transferred to a lessee and then to the lessor at the
end of the leasehold and to vehicles held in a fleet when transferred
to a purchaser.
(3) Except as provided in RCW 46.70.122, the transferee shall
within fifteen days after delivery to the transferee of the
vehicle((,)) execute the application for a new certificate of ownership
in the same space provided therefor on the certificate or as the
department prescribes, ((and)) cause the certificates and application
to be transmitted to the department, and notify the seller in writing
that the transferee has transmitted the certificates and application to
the department.
(4) Upon request of the owner or transferee, a secured party in
possession of the certificate of ownership shall, unless the transfer
was a breach of its security agreement, either deliver the certificate
to the transferee for transmission to the department or, when the
secured party receives the owner's assignment from the transferee, it
shall transmit the transferee's application for a new certificate, the
existing certificate, and the required fee to the department.
Compliance with this section does not affect the rights of the secured
party.
(5) If a security interest is reserved or created at the time of
the transfer, the certificate of ownership shall be retained by or
delivered to the person who becomes the secured party, and the parties
shall comply with the provisions of RCW 46.12.170.
(6) If the purchaser or transferee fails or neglects to make
application to transfer the certificate of ownership and license
registration within fifteen days after the date of delivery of the
vehicle, he or she shall on making application for transfer be assessed
a twenty-five dollar penalty on the sixteenth day and two dollars
additional for each day thereafter, but not to exceed one hundred
dollars. The director may by rule establish conditions under which the
penalty will not be assessed when an application for transfer is
delayed for reasons beyond the control of the purchaser. Conditions
for not assessing the penalty may be established for but not limited to
delays caused by:
(a) The department requesting additional supporting documents;
(b) Extended hospitalization or illness of the purchaser;
(c) Failure of a legal owner to release his or her interest;
(d) Failure, negligence, or nonperformance of the department,
auditor, or subagent.
Failure or neglect to make application to transfer the certificate
of ownership and license registration within forty-five days after the
date of delivery of the vehicle is a misdemeanor.
(7) Upon receipt of an application for reissue or replacement of a
certificate of ownership and transfer of license registration,
accompanied by the endorsed certificate of ownership or other
documentary evidence as is deemed necessary, the department shall, if
the application is in order and if all provisions relating to the
certificate of ownership and license registration have been complied
with, issue new certificates of title and license registration as in
the case of an original issue and shall transmit the fees together with
an itemized detailed report to the state treasurer, to be deposited in
the motor vehicle fund.
(8) Once each quarter the department shall report to the department
of revenue a list of those vehicles for which a seller's report has
been received but no transfer of title has taken place.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.55.110 and 2002 c 279 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When an unauthorized vehicle is impounded, the impounding
towing operator shall notify the legal and registered owners of the
impoundment of the unauthorized vehicle and the owners of any other
items of personal property registered or titled with the department.
The ((notification shall)) notice must be sent by first-class mail
within twenty-four hours after the impoundment to the last known
registered and legal owners of the vehicle, and the owners of any other
items of personal property registered or titled with the department, as
provided by the law enforcement agency, and shall inform the owners of
the identity of the person or agency authorizing the impound. The
((notification shall)) notice must also include the name of the
impounding tow firm, its address, and telephone number. The notice
shall also include the location, time of the impound, and by whose
authority the vehicle was impounded. The notice shall also include the
written ((notice)) notification of the right of redemption and
opportunity for a hearing to contest the validity of the impoundment
pursuant to RCW 46.55.120.
(2) ((In addition,)) If a suspended license impound has been
ordered, the ((notice must state)) impounding towing operator shall
notify the legal and registered owners of the suspended license impound
of the vehicle and the owners of any other items of personal property
registered or titled with the department. The notice must be sent by
first-class mail within twenty-four hours after the impoundment to the
last known registered and legal owners of the vehicle, and the owners
of any other items of personal property registered or titled with the
department, as provided by the law enforcement agency. The notice must
include the following items:
(a) The identity of the person or agency authorizing the impound;
(b) The name of the impounding tow firm, its address, and telephone
number;
(c) The location, time of the impound, and the length of the
impound((,));
(d) Notification of the right of redemption and opportunity for a
hearing to contest the validity of the impoundment under RCW 46.55.120;
(e) Notification of the right to submit a written request for
release of the vehicle on the basis of economic or personal hardship
under RCW 46.55.120(5);
(f) Notification of the requirement of the posting of a security
deposit to ensure payment of the costs of removal, towing, and
storage((,));
(g) Notification that if the security deposit is not posted the
vehicle will immediately be processed and sold at auction as an
abandoned vehicle, and the requirements set out in RCW 46.55.130
regarding the sale of abandoned vehicles at auction;
(h) The requirements set out in RCW 46.55.120(1)(((b))) (e)
regarding the payment of the costs of removal, towing, and storage as
well as providing proof of satisfaction of any penalties, fines, or
forfeitures before redemption((. The notice must also state)); and
(i) A statement that the registered owner is ineligible to purchase
the vehicle at the abandoned vehicle auction, if held.
(3) In the case of an abandoned vehicle, or other item of personal
property registered or titled with the department, within twenty-four
hours after receiving information on the owners from the department
through the abandoned vehicle report, the tow truck operator shall send
by certified mail, with return receipt requested, a notice of custody
and sale to the legal and registered owners and of the penalties for
the traffic infraction littering -- abandoned vehicle.
(4) If the date on which a notice required by subsection (3) of
this section is to be mailed falls upon a Saturday, Sunday, or a postal
holiday, the notice may be mailed on the next day that is neither a
Saturday, Sunday, nor a postal holiday.
(5) No notices need be sent to the legal or registered owners of an
impounded vehicle or other item of personal property registered or
titled with the department, if the vehicle or personal property has
been redeemed.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.55.120 and 2000 c 193 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Vehicles or other items of personal property registered or
titled with the department that are impounded by registered tow truck
operators pursuant to RCW 46.55.080, 46.55.085, 46.55.113, or 9A.88.140
may be redeemed or released only under the following circumstances:
(a) Only the legal owner, the registered owner, a person authorized
in writing by the registered owner or the vehicle's insurer, a person
who is determined and verified by the operator to have the permission
of the registered owner of the vehicle or other item of personal
property registered or titled with the department, or one who has
purchased a vehicle or item of personal property registered or titled
with the department from the registered owner who produces proof of
ownership or written authorization and signs a receipt therefor, may
redeem an impounded vehicle or items of personal property registered or
titled with the department. In addition, a vehicle impounded because
the operator is in violation of RCW 46.20.342(1)(c) shall not be
released until a person eligible to redeem it under this subsection
(1)(a) satisfies the requirements of (e) of this subsection, including
paying all towing, removal, and storage fees, notwithstanding the fact
that the hold was ordered by a government agency. If the department's
records show that the operator has been convicted of a violation of RCW
46.20.342 or a similar local ordinance within the past five years, the
vehicle may be held for up to thirty days at the written direction of
the agency ordering the vehicle impounded. A vehicle impounded because
the operator is arrested for a violation of RCW 46.20.342 may be
released only pursuant to a written order from the agency that ordered
the vehicle impounded or from the court having jurisdiction. ((An
agency may issue a written order to release pursuant to a provision of
an applicable state agency rule or local ordinance authorizing release
on the basis of economic or personal hardship to the spouse of the
operator, taking into consideration public safety factors, including
the operator's criminal history and driving record.))
If a vehicle is impounded because the operator is in violation of
RCW 46.20.342(1) (a) or (b), the vehicle may be held for up to thirty
days at the written direction of the agency ordering the vehicle
impounded. However, if the department's records show that the operator
has been convicted of a violation of RCW 46.20.342(1) (a) or (b) or a
similar local ordinance within the past five years, the vehicle may be
held at the written direction of the agency ordering the vehicle
impounded for up to sixty days, and for up to ninety days if the
operator has two or more such prior offenses. If a vehicle is
impounded because the operator is arrested for a violation of RCW
46.20.342, the vehicle may not be released until a person eligible to
redeem it under this subsection (1)(a) satisfies the requirements of
(e) of this subsection, including paying all towing, removal, and
storage fees, notwithstanding the fact that the hold was ordered by a
government agency.
(b) If the vehicle is directed to be held for a suspended license
impound, a person who desires to redeem the vehicle at the end of the
period of impound shall within five days of the impound at the request
of the tow truck operator pay a security deposit to the tow truck
operator of not more than one-half of the applicable impound storage
rate for each day of the proposed suspended license impound. The tow
truck operator shall credit this amount against the final bill for
removal, towing, and storage upon redemption. The tow truck operator
may accept other sufficient security in lieu of the security deposit.
If the person desiring to redeem the vehicle does not pay the security
deposit or provide other security acceptable to the tow truck operator,
the tow truck operator may process and sell at auction the vehicle as
an abandoned vehicle within the normal time limits set out in RCW
46.55.130(1). The security deposit required by this section may be
paid and must be accepted at any time up to twenty-four hours before
the beginning of the auction to sell the vehicle as abandoned. The
registered owner is not eligible to purchase the vehicle at the
auction, and the tow truck operator shall sell the vehicle to the
highest bidder who is not the registered owner.
(c) Notwithstanding (b) of this subsection, a rental car business
may immediately redeem a rental vehicle it owns by payment of the costs
of removal, towing, and storage, whereupon the vehicle will not be held
for a suspended license impound.
(d) Notwithstanding (b) of this subsection, a motor vehicle dealer
or lender with a perfected security interest in the vehicle may redeem
or lawfully repossess a vehicle immediately by payment of the costs of
removal, towing, and storage, whereupon the vehicle will not be held
for a suspended license impound. A motor vehicle dealer or lender with
a perfected security interest in the vehicle may not knowingly and
intentionally engage in collusion with a registered owner to repossess
and then return or resell a vehicle to the registered owner in an
attempt to avoid a suspended license impound. However, this provision
does not preclude a vehicle dealer or a lender with a perfected
security interest in the vehicle from repossessing the vehicle and then
selling, leasing, or otherwise disposing of it in accordance with
chapter 62A.9A RCW, including providing redemption rights to the debtor
under RCW ((62A.9-506)) 62A.9A-623. If the debtor is the registered
owner of the vehicle, the debtor's right to redeem the vehicle under
chapter 62A.9A RCW is conditioned upon the debtor obtaining and
providing proof from the impounding authority or court having
jurisdiction that any fines, penalties, and forfeitures owed by the
registered owner, as a result of the suspended license impound, have
been paid, and proof of the payment must be tendered to the vehicle
dealer or lender at the time the debtor tenders all other obligations
required to redeem the vehicle. Vehicle dealers or lenders are not
liable for damages if they rely in good faith on an order from the
impounding agency or a court in releasing a vehicle held under a
suspended license impound.
(e) The vehicle or other item of personal property registered or
titled with the department shall be released upon the presentation to
any person having custody of the vehicle of commercially reasonable
tender sufficient to cover the costs of towing, storage, or other
services rendered during the course of towing, removing, impounding, or
storing any such vehicle, with credit being given for the amount of any
security deposit paid under (b) of this subsection. In addition, if a
vehicle is impounded because the operator was arrested for a violation
of RCW 46.20.342 or 46.20.345 and was being operated by the registered
owner when it was impounded under local ordinance or agency rule, it
must not be released to any person until the registered owner
establishes with the agency that ordered the vehicle impounded or the
court having jurisdiction that any penalties, fines, or forfeitures
owed by him or her have been satisfied. Registered tow truck operators
are not liable for damages if they rely in good faith on an order from
the impounding agency or a court in releasing a vehicle held under a
suspended license impound. Commercially reasonable tender shall
include, without limitation, cash, major bank credit cards issued by
financial institutions, or personal checks drawn on Washington state
branches of financial institutions if accompanied by two pieces of
valid identification, one of which may be required by the operator to
have a photograph. If the towing firm cannot determine through the
customer's bank or a check verification service that the presented
check would be paid by the bank or guaranteed by the service, the
towing firm may refuse to accept the check. Any person who stops
payment on a personal check or credit card, or does not make
restitution within ten days from the date a check becomes insufficient
due to lack of funds, to a towing firm that has provided a service
pursuant to this section or in any other manner defrauds the towing
firm in connection with services rendered pursuant to this section
shall be liable for damages in the amount of twice the towing and
storage fees, plus costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
(2)(a) The registered tow truck operator shall give to each person
who seeks to redeem an impounded vehicle, or item of personal property
registered or titled with the department, written notice of the right
of redemption and opportunity for a hearing, which notice shall be
accompanied by a form to be used for requesting a hearing, the name of
the person or agency authorizing the impound, and a copy of the towing
and storage invoice. The registered tow truck operator shall maintain
a record evidenced by the redeeming person's signature that such
notification was provided.
(b) Any person seeking to redeem an impounded vehicle under this
section has a right to a hearing in the district or municipal court for
the jurisdiction in which the vehicle was impounded to contest the
validity of the impoundment or the amount of towing and storage
charges. The district court has jurisdiction to determine the issues
involving all impoundments including those authorized by the state or
its agents. The municipal court has jurisdiction to determine the
issues involving impoundments authorized by agents of the municipality.
Any request for a hearing shall be made in writing on the form provided
for that purpose and must be received by the appropriate court within
ten days of the date the opportunity was provided for in subsection
(2)(a) of this section and more than five days before the date of the
auction. At the time of the filing of the hearing request, the
petitioner shall pay to the court clerk a filing fee in the same amount
required for the filing of a suit in district court. If the hearing
request is not received by the court within the ten-day period, the
right to a hearing is waived and the registered owner is liable for any
towing, storage, or other impoundment charges permitted under this
chapter. Upon receipt of a timely hearing request, the court shall
proceed to hear and determine the validity of the impoundment.
(3)(a) The court, within five days after the request for a hearing,
shall notify the registered tow truck operator, the person requesting
the hearing if not the owner, the registered and legal owners of the
vehicle or other item of personal property registered or titled with
the department, and the person or agency authorizing the impound in
writing of the hearing date and time.
(b) At the hearing, the person or persons requesting the hearing
may produce any relevant evidence to show that the impoundment, towing,
or storage fees charged were not proper. The court may consider a
written report made under oath by the officer who authorized the
impoundment in lieu of the officer's personal appearance at the
hearing.
(c) At the conclusion of the hearing, the court shall determine
whether the impoundment was proper, whether the towing or storage fees
charged were in compliance with the posted rates, and who is
responsible for payment of the fees. The court may not adjust fees or
charges that are in compliance with the posted or contracted rates.
(d) If the impoundment is found proper, the impoundment, towing,
and storage fees as permitted under this chapter together with court
costs shall be assessed against the person or persons requesting the
hearing, unless the operator did not have a signed and valid
impoundment authorization from a private property owner or an
authorized agent.
(e) If the impoundment is determined to be in violation of this
chapter, then the registered and legal owners of the vehicle or other
item of personal property registered or titled with the department
shall bear no impoundment, towing, or storage fees, and any security
shall be returned or discharged as appropriate, and the person or
agency who authorized the impoundment shall be liable for any towing,
storage, or other impoundment fees permitted under this chapter. The
court shall enter judgment in favor of the registered tow truck
operator against the person or agency authorizing the impound for the
impoundment, towing, and storage fees paid. In addition, the court
shall enter judgment in favor of the registered and legal owners of the
vehicle, or other item of personal property registered or titled with
the department, for the amount of the filing fee required by law for
the impound hearing petition as well as reasonable damages for loss of
the use of the vehicle during the time the same was impounded, for not
less than fifty dollars per day, against the person or agency
authorizing the impound. However, if an impoundment arising from an
alleged violation of RCW 46.20.342 or 46.20.345 is determined to be in
violation of this chapter, then the law enforcement officer directing
the impoundment and the government employing the officer are not liable
for damages if the officer relied in good faith and without gross
negligence on the records of the department in ascertaining that the
operator of the vehicle had a suspended or revoked driver's license.
If any judgment entered is not paid within fifteen days of notice in
writing of its entry, the court shall award reasonable attorneys' fees
and costs against the defendant in any action to enforce the judgment.
Notice of entry of judgment may be made by registered or certified
mail, and proof of mailing may be made by affidavit of the party
mailing the notice. Notice of the entry of the judgment shall read
essentially as follows:

TO: . . . . . .

YOU ARE HEREBY NOTIFIED JUDGMENT was entered against you in the
. . . . . . Court located at . . . . . . in the sum of $. . .
. . ., in an action entitled . . . . . ., Case No. . . . . YOU
ARE FURTHER NOTIFIED that attorneys fees and costs will be
awarded against you under RCW . . . if the judgment is not paid
within 15 days of the date of this notice.

DATED this . . . . day of . . . . . ., (year) . . .

Signature
Typed name and address
of party mailing notice

(4) Any impounded abandoned vehicle or item of personal property
registered or titled with the department that is not redeemed within
fifteen days of mailing of the notice of custody and sale as required
by RCW 46.55.110(3) shall be sold at public auction in accordance with
all the provisions and subject to all the conditions of RCW 46.55.130.
A vehicle or item of personal property registered or titled with the
department may be redeemed at any time before the start of the auction
upon payment of the applicable towing and storage fees.
(5)(a) For a vehicle that is impounded by a registered tow truck
operator under RCW 46.55.080, 46.55.085, 46.55.113, or 9A.88.140, an
agency shall provide the following persons the opportunity to submit a
written request for release of the vehicle on the basis of economic or
personal hardship:
(i) The spouse of the operator, taking into consideration public
safety factors, including the operator's criminal history and driving
record; and
(ii) The owner of the vehicle if the owner was not the operator of
the vehicle when it was impounded and if the owner has not received a
prior release under this subsection (5) for hardship to the owner.
(b) The agency shall make a final decision to grant or reject the
request no later than seven days after receipt by the agency.
(c) If a vehicle is released to the owner under this subsection
(5), the owner has a cause of action against the operator of the
vehicle for any removal, towing, storage, or other impoundment fees,
reasonable damages for loss of the use of the vehicle during the time
the vehicle was impounded, and reasonable attorneys' fees and costs
paid by the owner to gain the release of the vehicle.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.63.020 and 2001 c 325 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Failure to perform any act required or the performance of any act
prohibited by this title or an equivalent administrative regulation or
local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution relating to traffic
including parking, standing, stopping, and pedestrian offenses, is
designated as a traffic infraction and may not be classified as a
criminal offense, except for an offense contained in the following
provisions of this title or a violation of an equivalent administrative
regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution:
(1) RCW 46.09.120(2) relating to the operation of a nonhighway
vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a
controlled substance;
(2) RCW 46.09.130 relating to operation of nonhighway vehicles;
(3) RCW 46.10.090(2) relating to the operation of a snowmobile
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or narcotics or
habit-forming drugs or in a manner endangering the person of another;
(4) RCW 46.10.130 relating to the operation of snowmobiles;
(5) Chapter 46.12 RCW relating to certificates of ownership and
registration ((and)), markings indicating that a vehicle has been
destroyed or declared a total loss, and causing a postal cancellation
to reflect an earlier date;
(6) RCW 46.16.010 relating to initial registration of motor
vehicles;
(7) RCW 46.16.011 relating to permitting unauthorized persons to
drive;
(8) RCW 46.16.160 relating to vehicle trip permits;
(9) RCW 46.16.381(2) relating to knowingly providing false
information in conjunction with an application for a special placard or
license plate for disabled persons' parking;
(10) RCW 46.20.005 relating to driving without a valid driver's
license;
(11) RCW 46.20.091 relating to false statements regarding a
driver's license or instruction permit;
(12) RCW 46.20.0921 relating to the unlawful possession and use of
a driver's license;
(13) RCW 46.20.342 relating to driving with a suspended or revoked
license or status;
(14) RCW 46.20.345 relating to the operation of a motor vehicle
with a suspended or revoked license;
(15) RCW 46.20.410 relating to the violation of restrictions of an
occupational driver's license;
(16) RCW 46.20.740 relating to operation of a motor vehicle without
an ignition interlock device in violation of a license notation that
the device is required;
(17) RCW 46.20.750 relating to assisting another person to start a
vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock device;
(18) RCW 46.25.170 relating to commercial driver's licenses;
(19) Chapter 46.29 RCW relating to financial responsibility;
(20) RCW 46.30.040 relating to providing false evidence of
financial responsibility;
(21) RCW 46.37.435 relating to wrongful installation of
sunscreening material;
(22) RCW 46.44.180 relating to operation of mobile home pilot
vehicles;
(23) RCW 46.48.175 relating to the transportation of dangerous
articles;
(24) RCW 46.52.010 relating to duty on striking an unattended car
or other property;
(25) RCW 46.52.020 relating to duty in case of injury to or death
of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;
(26) RCW 46.52.090 relating to reports by repairmen, storagemen,
and appraisers;
(27) RCW 46.52.130 relating to confidentiality of the driving
record to be furnished to an insurance company, an employer, and an
alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agency;
(28) RCW 46.55.020 relating to engaging in the activities of a
registered tow truck operator without a registration certificate;
(29) RCW 46.55.035 relating to prohibited practices by tow truck
operators;
(30) RCW 46.61.015 relating to obedience to police officers,
flaggers, or fire fighters;
(31) RCW 46.61.020 relating to refusal to give information to or
cooperate with an officer;
(32) RCW 46.61.022 relating to failure to stop and give
identification to an officer;
(33) RCW 46.61.024 relating to attempting to elude pursuing police
vehicles;
(34) RCW 46.61.500 relating to reckless driving;
(35) RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504 relating to persons under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;
(36) RCW 46.61.503 relating to a person under age twenty-one
driving a motor vehicle after consuming alcohol;
(37) RCW 46.61.520 relating to vehicular homicide by motor vehicle;
(38) RCW 46.61.522 relating to vehicular assault;
(39) RCW 46.61.5249 relating to first degree negligent driving;
(40) RCW 46.61.527(4) relating to reckless endangerment of roadway
workers;
(41) RCW 46.61.530 relating to racing of vehicles on highways;
(42) RCW 46.61.685 relating to leaving children in an unattended
vehicle with the motor running;
(43) RCW 46.61.740 relating to theft of motor vehicle fuel;
(44) RCW 46.64.010 relating to unlawful cancellation of or attempt
to cancel a traffic citation;
(45) RCW 46.64.048 relating to attempting, aiding, abetting,
coercing, and committing crimes;
(46) Chapter 46.65 RCW relating to habitual traffic offenders;
(47) RCW 46.68.010 relating to false statements made to obtain a
refund;
(48) Chapter 46.70 RCW relating to unfair motor vehicle business
practices, except where that chapter provides for the assessment of
monetary penalties of a civil nature;
(49) Chapter 46.72 RCW relating to the transportation of passengers
in for hire vehicles;
(50) RCW 46.72A.060 relating to limousine carrier insurance;
(51) RCW 46.72A.070 relating to operation of a limousine without a
vehicle certificate;
(52) RCW 46.72A.080 relating to false advertising by a limousine
carrier;
(53) Chapter 46.80 RCW relating to motor vehicle wreckers;
(54) Chapter 46.82 RCW relating to driver's training schools;
(55) RCW 46.87.260 relating to alteration or forgery of a cab card,
letter of authority, or other temporary authority issued under chapter
46.87 RCW;
(56) RCW 46.87.290 relating to operation of an unregistered or
unlicensed vehicle under chapter 46.87 RCW.

--- END ---