BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.525 and 2002 c 290 s 3 and 2002 c 107 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The offender score is measured on the horizontal axis of the
sentencing grid. The offender score rules are as follows:
The offender score is the sum of points accrued under this section
rounded down to the nearest whole number.
(1) A prior conviction is a conviction which exists before the date
of sentencing for the offense for which the offender score is being
computed. Convictions entered or sentenced on the same date as the
conviction for which the offender score is being computed shall be
deemed "other current offenses" within the meaning of RCW 9.94A.589.
(2) Class A and sex prior felony convictions shall always be
included in the offender score. Class B prior felony convictions other
than sex offenses shall not be included in the offender score, if since
the last date of release from confinement (including full-time
residential treatment) pursuant to a felony conviction, if any, or
entry of judgment and sentence, the offender had spent ten consecutive
years in the community without committing any crime that subsequently
results in a conviction. Class C prior felony convictions other than
sex offenses shall not be included in the offender score if, since the
last date of release from confinement (including full-time residential
treatment) pursuant to a felony conviction, if any, or entry of
judgment and sentence, the offender had spent five consecutive years in
the community without committing any crime that subsequently results in
a conviction. Serious traffic convictions shall not be included in the
offender score if, since the last date of release from confinement
(including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a felony
conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and sentence, the offender
spent five years in the community without committing any crime that
subsequently results in a conviction. This subsection applies to both
adult and juvenile prior convictions.
(3) Out-of-state convictions for offenses shall be classified
according to the comparable offense definitions and sentences provided
by Washington law. Federal convictions for offenses shall be
classified according to the comparable offense definitions and
sentences provided by Washington law. If there is no clearly
comparable offense under Washington law or the offense is one that is
usually considered subject to exclusive federal jurisdiction, the
offense shall be scored as a class C felony equivalent if it was a
felony under the relevant federal statute.
(4) Score prior convictions for felony anticipatory offenses
(attempts, criminal solicitations, and criminal conspiracies) the same
as if they were convictions for completed offenses.
(5)(a) In the case of multiple prior convictions, for the purpose
of computing the offender score, count all convictions separately,
except:
(i) Prior offenses which were found, under RCW 9.94A.589(1)(a), to
encompass the same criminal conduct, shall be counted as one offense,
the offense that yields the highest offender score. The current
sentencing court shall determine with respect to other prior adult
offenses for which sentences were served concurrently or prior juvenile
offenses for which sentences were served consecutively, whether those
offenses shall be counted as one offense or as separate offenses using
the "same criminal conduct" analysis found in RCW 9.94A.589(1)(a), and
if the court finds that they shall be counted as one offense, then the
offense that yields the highest offender score shall be used. The
current sentencing court may presume that such other prior offenses
were not the same criminal conduct from sentences imposed on separate
dates, or in separate counties or jurisdictions, or in separate
complaints, indictments, or informations;
(ii) In the case of multiple prior convictions for offenses
committed before July 1, 1986, for the purpose of computing the
offender score, count all adult convictions served concurrently as one
offense, and count all juvenile convictions entered on the same date as
one offense. Use the conviction for the offense that yields the
highest offender score.
(b) As used in this subsection (5), "served concurrently" means
that: (i) The latter sentence was imposed with specific reference to
the former; (ii) the concurrent relationship of the sentences was
judicially imposed; and (iii) the concurrent timing of the sentences
was not the result of a probation or parole revocation on the former
offense.
(6) If the present conviction is one of the anticipatory offenses
of criminal attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy, count each prior
conviction as if the present conviction were for a completed offense.
When these convictions are used as criminal history, score them the
same as a completed crime.
(7) If the present conviction is for a nonviolent offense and not
covered by subsection (11) or (12) of this section, count one point for
each adult prior felony conviction and one point for each juvenile
prior violent felony conviction and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior
nonviolent felony conviction.
(8) If the present conviction is for a violent offense and not
covered in subsection (9), (10), (11), or (12) of this section, count
two points for each prior adult and juvenile violent felony conviction,
one point for each prior adult nonviolent felony conviction, and 1/2
point for each prior juvenile nonviolent felony conviction.
(9) If the present conviction is for a serious violent offense,
count three points for prior adult and juvenile convictions for crimes
in this category, two points for each prior adult and juvenile violent
conviction (not already counted), one point for each prior adult
nonviolent felony conviction, and 1/2 point for each prior juvenile
nonviolent felony conviction.
(10) If the present conviction is for Burglary 1, count prior
convictions as in subsection (8) of this section; however count two
points for each prior adult Burglary 2 or residential burglary
conviction, and one point for each prior juvenile Burglary 2 or
residential burglary conviction.
(11) If the present conviction is for a felony traffic offense
count two points for each adult or juvenile prior conviction for
Vehicular Homicide or Vehicular Assault; for each felony offense count
one point for each adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior
conviction; for each serious traffic offense, other than those used for
an enhancement pursuant to RCW 46.61.520(2), count one point for each
adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior conviction.
(12) If the present conviction is for manufacture of
methamphetamine count three points for each adult prior manufacture of
methamphetamine conviction and two points for each juvenile manufacture
of methamphetamine offense. If the present conviction is for a drug
offense and the offender has a criminal history that includes a sex
offense or serious violent offense, count three points for each adult
prior felony drug offense conviction and two points for each juvenile
drug offense. All other adult and juvenile felonies are scored as in
subsection (8) of this section if the current drug offense is violent,
or as in subsection (7) of this section if the current drug offense is
nonviolent.
(13) If the present conviction is for Escape from Community
Custody, RCW 72.09.310, count only prior escape convictions in the
offender score. Count adult prior escape convictions as one point and
juvenile prior escape convictions as 1/2 point.
(14) If the present conviction is for Escape 1, RCW 9A.76.110, or
Escape 2, RCW 9A.76.120, count adult prior convictions as one point and
juvenile prior convictions as 1/2 point.
(15) If the present conviction is for Burglary 2 or residential
burglary, count priors as in subsection (7) of this section; however,
count two points for each adult and juvenile prior Burglary 1
conviction, two points for each adult prior Burglary 2 or residential
burglary conviction, and one point for each juvenile prior Burglary 2
or residential burglary conviction.
(16) If the present conviction is for a sex offense, count priors
as in subsections (7) through (15) of this section; however count three
points for each adult and juvenile prior sex offense conviction.
(17) If the present conviction is for an offense committed while
the offender was under community placement, add one point.
(18) If the present conviction is for taking a motor vehicle
without permission, first or second degree, count two points for each
prior juvenile conviction for this offense.
(19) The fact that a prior conviction was not included in an
offender's offender score or criminal history at a previous sentencing
shall have no bearing on whether it is included in the criminal history
or offender score for the current offense. Accordingly, prior
convictions that were not counted in the offender score or included in
criminal history under repealed or previous versions of the sentencing
reform act shall be included in criminal history and shall count in the
offender score if the current version of the sentencing reform act
requires including or counting those convictions.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.40.0357 and 2002 c 324 s 3 and 2002 c 175 s 20 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

DESCRIPTION AND OFFENSE CATEGORY

JUVENILE
DISPOSITION
OFFENSE
CATEGORY DESCRIPTION (RCW CITATION) JUVENILE DISPOSITION
CATEGORY FOR
ATTEMPT, BAILJUMP,
CONSPIRACY, OR
SOLICITATION

. . . . . . . . . . . .

Arson and Malicious Mischief

A Arson 1 (9A.48.020) B+

B Arson 2 (9A.48.030) C

C Reckless Burning 1 (9A.48.040) D

D Reckless Burning 2 (9A.48.050) E

B Malicious Mischief 1 (9A.48.070) C

C Malicious Mischief 2 (9A.48.080) D

D Malicious Mischief 3 (<$50 is E class)
(9A.48.090) E

E Tampering with Fire Alarm Apparatus
(9.40.100) E

A Possession of Incendiary Device (9.40.120)
B+

Assault and Other Crimes Involving
Physical Harm

A Assault 1 (9A.36.011) B+

B+ Assault 2 (9A.36.021) C+

C+ Assault 3 (9A.36.031) D+

D+ Assault 4 (9A.36.041) E

B+ Drive-By Shooting (9A.36.045) C+

D+ Reckless Endangerment (9A.36.050) E

C+ Promoting Suicide Attempt (9A.36.060) D+

D+ Coercion (9A.36.070) E

C+ Custodial Assault (9A.36.100) D+

Burglary and Trespass

B+ Burglary 1 (9A.52.020) C+

B Residential Burglary (9A.52.025) C

B Burglary 2 (9A.52.030) C

D Burglary Tools (Possession of) (9A.52.060) E

D Criminal Trespass 1 (9A.52.070) E

E Criminal Trespass 2 (9A.52.080) E

C Vehicle Prowling 1 (9A.52.095) D

D Vehicle Prowling 2 (9A.52.100) E

Drugs

E Possession/Consumption of Alcohol
(66.44.270) E

C Illegally Obtaining Legend Drug
(69.41.020) D

C+ Sale, Delivery, Possession of Legend Drug
with Intent to Sell (69.41.030) D+

E Possession of Legend Drug (69.41.030) E

B+ Violation of Uniform Controlled
Substances Act - Narcotic,
Methamphetamine, or Flunitrazepam Sale
(69.50.401(a)(1) (i) or (ii)) B+

C Violation of Uniform Controlled
Substances Act - Nonnarcotic Sale
(69.50.401(a)(1)(iii)) C

E Possession of Marihuana <40 grams
(69.50.401(e)) E

C Fraudulently Obtaining Controlled
Substance (69.50.403) C

C+ Sale of Controlled Substance for Profit
(69.50.410) C+

E Unlawful Inhalation (9.47A.020) E

B Violation of Uniform Controlled
Substances Act - Narcotic,
Methamphetamine, or Flunitrazepam
Counterfeit Substances (69.50.401(b)(1) (i)
or (ii)) B

C Violation of Uniform Controlled
Substances Act - Nonnarcotic Counterfeit
Substances (69.50.401(b)(1) (iii), (iv), (v)) C

C Violation of Uniform Controlled
Substances Act - Possession of a Controlled
Substance (69.50.401(d)) C

C Violation of Uniform Controlled
Substances Act - Possession of a Controlled
Substance (69.50.401(c))
C

Firearms and Weapons

B Theft of Firearm (9A.56.300) C

B Possession of Stolen Firearm (9A.56.310) C

E Carrying Loaded Pistol Without Permit
(9.41.050) E

C Possession of Firearms by Minor (<18)
(9.41.040(1)(b)(iii)) C

D+ Possession of Dangerous Weapon
(9.41.250) E

D Intimidating Another Person by use of
Weapon (9.41.270)
E

Homicide

A+ Murder 1 (9A.32.030) A

A+ Murder 2 (9A.32.050) B+

B+ Manslaughter 1 (9A.32.060) C+

C+ Manslaughter 2 (9A.32.070) D+

B+ Vehicular Homicide (46.61.520) C+

Kidnapping

A Kidnap 1 (9A.40.020) B+

B+ Kidnap 2 (9A.40.030) C+

C+ Unlawful Imprisonment (9A.40.040)
D+

Obstructing Governmental Operation

D Obstructing a Law Enforcement Officer
(9A.76.020) E

E Resisting Arrest (9A.76.040) E

B Introducing Contraband 1 (9A.76.140) C

C Introducing Contraband 2 (9A.76.150) D

E Introducing Contraband 3 (9A.76.160) E

B+ Intimidating a Public Servant (9A.76.180) C+

B+ Intimidating a Witness (9A.72.110)
C+

Public Disturbance

C+ Riot with Weapon (9A.84.010) D+

D+ Riot Without Weapon (9A.84.010) E

E Failure to Disperse (9A.84.020) E

E Disorderly Conduct (9A.84.030) E

Sex Crimes

A Rape 1 (9A.44.040) B+

A- Rape 2 (9A.44.050) B+

C+ Rape 3 (9A.44.060) D+

A- Rape of a Child 1 (9A.44.073) B+

B+ Rape of a Child 2 (9A.44.076) C+

B Incest 1 (9A.64.020(1)) C

C Incest 2 (9A.64.020(2)) D

D+ Indecent Exposure (Victim <14)
(9A.88.010) E

E Indecent Exposure (Victim 14 or over)
(9A.88.010) E

B+ Promoting Prostitution 1 (9A.88.070) C+

C+ Promoting Prostitution 2 (9A.88.080) D+

E O & A (Prostitution) (9A.88.030) E

B+ Indecent Liberties (9A.44.100) C+

A- Child Molestation 1 (9A.44.083) B+

B Child Molestation 2 (9A.44.086) C+

Theft, Robbery, Extortion, and Forgery

B Theft 1 (9A.56.030) C

C Theft 2 (9A.56.040) D

D Theft 3 (9A.56.050) E

B Theft of Livestock (9A.56.080) C

C Forgery (9A.60.020) D

A Robbery 1 (9A.56.200) B+

B+ Robbery 2 (9A.56.210) C+

B+ Extortion 1 (9A.56.120) C+

C+ Extortion 2 (9A.56.130) D+

C Identity Theft 1 (9.35.020(2)(a)) D

D Identity Theft 2 (9.35.020(2)(b)) E

D Improperly Obtaining Financial
Information (9.35.010) E

B Possession of Stolen Property 1
(9A.56.150) C

C Possession of Stolen Property 2
(9A.56.160) D

D Possession of Stolen Property 3
(9A.56.170) E

((C))
B+
Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission
1 ((and 2)) (Second or subsequent offense)
(9A.56.070 (1) ((and (2))))

((D))
C+

B Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission
1 (First offense) (9A.56.070(1)) and 2
(9A.56.070(2))
C

Motor Vehicle Related Crimes

E Driving Without a License (46.20.005) E

B+ Hit and Run - Death (46.52.020(4)(a)) C+

C Hit and Run - Injury (46.52.020(4)(b)) D

D Hit and Run-Attended (46.52.020(5)) E

E Hit and Run-Unattended (46.52.010) E

C Vehicular Assault (46.61.522) D

C Attempting to Elude Pursuing Police
Vehicle (46.61.024) D

E Reckless Driving (46.61.500) E

D Driving While Under the Influence
(46.61.502 and 46.61.504)
E

Other

B Bomb Threat (9.61.160) C

C Escape 11 (9A.76.110) C

C Escape 21 (9A.76.120) C

D Escape 3 (9A.76.130) E

E Obscene, Harassing, Etc., Phone Calls
(9.61.230) E

A Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class
A Felony B+

B Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class
B Felony C

C Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class
C Felony D

D Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult
Gross Misdemeanor E

E Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult
Misdemeanor E

V Violation of Order of Restitution,
Community Supervision, or Confinement
(13.40.200)2 V

1Escape 1 and 2 and Attempted Escape 1 and 2 are classed as C offenses
and the standard range is established as follows:

1st escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 4 weeks
confinement
2nd escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 8 weeks
confinement
3rd and subsequent escape or attempted escape during 12-month
period - 12 weeks confinement

2If the court finds that a respondent has violated terms of an order,
it may impose a penalty of up to 30 days of confinement.

JUVENILE SENTENCING STANDARDS

This schedule must be used for juvenile offenders. The court may
select sentencing option A, B, or C.

OPTION A
JUVENILE OFFENDER SENTENCING GRID
STANDARD RANGE

A+
180 WEEKS TO AGE 21 YEARS

A 103 WEEKS TO 129 WEEKS

A- 15-36 52-65 80-100 103-129

WEEKS WEEKS WEEKS WEEKS

EXCEPT

30-40

WEEKS FOR

15-17

YEAR OLDS

Current B+ 15-36 52-65 80-100 103-129

Offense WEEKS WEEKS WEEKS WEEKS

Category

B LOCAL 52-65

SANCTIONS (LS) 15-36 WEEKS WEEKS

C+ LS

15-36 WEEKS

C LS 15-36 WEEKS

Local Sanctions:

0 to 30 Days

D+ LS 0 to 12 Months Community Supervision

0 to 150 Hours Community Restitution

D LS $0 to $500 Fine

E LS

0 1 2 3 4
or more

PRIOR ADJUDICATIONS

NOTE: References in the grid to days or weeks mean periods of
confinement.
(1) The vertical axis of the grid is the current offense category.
The current offense category is determined by the offense of
adjudication.
(2) The horizontal axis of the grid is the number of prior
adjudications included in the juvenile's criminal history. Each prior
felony adjudication shall count as one point. Each prior violation,
misdemeanor, and gross misdemeanor adjudication shall count as 1/4
point. Fractional points shall be rounded down.
(3) The standard range disposition for each offense is determined
by the intersection of the column defined by the prior adjudications
and the row defined by the current offense category.
(4) RCW 13.40.180 applies if the offender is being sentenced for
more than one offense.
(5) A current offense that is a violation is equivalent to an
offense category of E. However, a disposition for a violation shall
not include confinement.

OR

OPTION B CHEMICAL DEPENDENCY DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE

If the juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition
of local sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not
committed an A- or B+ offense, the court may impose a disposition
under RCW 13.40.160(4) and 13.40.165.

OR

OPTION C MANIFEST INJUSTICE

If the court determines that a disposition under option A or B would
effectuate a manifest injustice, the court shall impose a disposition
outside the standard range under RCW 13.40.160(2).

--- END ---