BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the basic health
plan is a valuable means of providing access to affordable health
insurance coverage for low-income families and individuals in
Washington state. The legislature further finds that persons studying
in the United States as full-time students under temporary visas must
show, as a condition of receiving their temporary visa, that they have
sufficient funds available for self-support during their entire
proposed course of study. For this reason, the legislature finds that
it is not appropriate to provide subsidized basic health plan coverage
to this group of students.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.47.020 and 2000 c 79 s 43 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Washington basic health plan" or "plan" means the system of
enrollment and payment for basic health care services, administered by
the plan administrator through participating managed health care
systems, created by this chapter.
(2) "Administrator" means the Washington basic health plan
administrator, who also holds the position of administrator of the
Washington state health care authority.
(3) "Managed health care system" means: (a) Any health care
organization, including health care providers, insurers, health care
service contractors, health maintenance organizations, or any
combination thereof, that provides directly or by contract basic health
care services, as defined by the administrator and rendered by duly
licensed providers, to a defined patient population enrolled in the
plan and in the managed health care system; or (b) a self-funded or
self-insured method of providing insurance coverage to subsidized
enrollees provided under RCW 41.05.140 and subject to the limitations
under RCW 70.47.100(7).
(4) "Subsidized enrollee" means an individual, or an individual
plus the individual's spouse or dependent children: (a) Who is not
eligible for medicare; (b) who is not confined or residing in a
government-operated institution, unless he or she meets eligibility
criteria adopted by the administrator; (c) who is not a full-time
student who has received a temporary visa to study in the United
States; (d) who resides in an area of the state served by a managed
health care system participating in the plan; (((d))) (e) whose gross
family income at the time of enrollment does not exceed two hundred
percent of the federal poverty level as adjusted for family size and
determined annually by the federal department of health and human
services; and (((e))) (f) who chooses to obtain basic health care
coverage from a particular managed health care system in return for
periodic payments to the plan. To the extent that state funds are
specifically appropriated for this purpose, with a corresponding
federal match, "subsidized enrollee" also means an individual, or an
individual's spouse or dependent children, who meets the requirements
in (a) through (((c))) (d) and (((e))) (f) of this subsection and whose
gross family income at the time of enrollment is more than two hundred
percent, but less than two hundred fifty-one percent, of the federal
poverty level as adjusted for family size and determined annually by
the federal department of health and human services.
(5) "Nonsubsidized enrollee" means an individual, or an individual
plus the individual's spouse or dependent children: (a) Who is not
eligible for medicare; (b) who is not confined or residing in a
government-operated institution, unless he or she meets eligibility
criteria adopted by the administrator; (c) who resides in an area of
the state served by a managed health care system participating in the
plan; (d) who chooses to obtain basic health care coverage from a
particular managed health care system; and (e) who pays or on whose
behalf is paid the full costs for participation in the plan, without
any subsidy from the plan.
(6) "Subsidy" means the difference between the amount of periodic
payment the administrator makes to a managed health care system on
behalf of a subsidized enrollee plus the administrative cost to the
plan of providing the plan to that subsidized enrollee, and the amount
determined to be the subsidized enrollee's responsibility under RCW
70.47.060(2).
(7) "Premium" means a periodic payment, based upon gross family
income which an individual, their employer or another financial sponsor
makes to the plan as consideration for enrollment in the plan as a
subsidized enrollee or a nonsubsidized enrollee.
(8) "Rate" means the amount, negotiated by the administrator with
and paid to a participating managed health care system, that is based
upon the enrollment of subsidized and nonsubsidized enrollees in the
plan and in that system.

--- END ---