BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that large woody
debris was frequently removed from rivers and streams decades ago
because of concerns that it may cause flooding downstream. The
legislature finds that the placement of large woody debris into rivers
and streams serves an important function in salmon recovery because the
large woody debris can create pools for salmon to rest and feed, and
can provide salmon protection from predators. The legislature also
finds that landowners are sometimes required to place large woody
debris into rivers or streams as a condition of a hydraulic permit
approval, or because of rules adopted by the forest practices board.
Because landowners, project sponsors, and volunteers who place large
woody debris into rivers and streams pursuant to a hydraulic permit
serve an important state purpose by helping to restore salmon habitat,
it is the legislature's intent to provide immunity from liability that
may occur as a result of this activity. It is also the intent of the
legislature to increase participation of downstream property owners in
decisions pertaining to placement of large woody debris.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any landowner, or any project sponsor or volunteer working on
a project from a habitat project list, who is involved in the design or
placement of large woody debris into a watercourse to enhance salmon or
other fish recovery shall not be held liable for any injury or damages
resulting from ordinary negligence associated with these actions, if
the placement of the large woody debris is in accordance with the terms
of a hydraulic permit and is consistent with generally accepted design
guidelines. The immunity provided in this section applies, but is not
limited to, personal injury, property damage, flooding, erosion, damage
to public improvements, and other injuries or damages of any kind or
character resulting from the placement of the large woody debris.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section:
(a) "Watercourse" has the same meaning as defined in WAC 220- 110-020, as that regulation existed on January 1, 2001.
(b) "Large woody debris" means trees or tree parts larger than four
inches in diameter and longer than six feet and rootwads, wholly or
partially waterward of the ordinary high water line.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.55.120 and 2000 c 107 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever the placement of large woody debris ((is required as a
condition of)), as defined in section 2 of this act, requires a
hydraulic permit approval issued pursuant to RCW 77.55.100 or
77.55.110, the department, upon request, shall invite comment regarding
that placement from the local governmental authority, affected tribes,
affected federal and state agencies, ((and)) the project applicant, and
downstream property owners who own property within one mile of where
the large woody debris is to be installed.

--- END ---