BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A city, town, or county may exercise traffic control
jurisdiction over any private road or street, or over any limited
access road owned or controlled by a special district, that is located
within the boundaries of the city, town, or county, if the city, town,
or county and the party or parties owning or controlling such road or
street provide by written agreement as approved by the governing body
of the city, town, or county that the city, town, or county may provide
traffic control jurisdiction over the roads or streets encompassed by
such agreement. Pursuant thereto:
(a) Provision for reimbursement for actual costs of traffic control
and enforcement and for liability insurance and indemnification by any
party or parties, and such other terms as are mutually agreeable, may
be included in such an agreement.
(b) The traffic control jurisdiction provided for under this
section shall be in addition to or concurrent with any jurisdictional
authority otherwise exercised by the city, town, or county under law,
and nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or remove any
such jurisdictional authority. Such jurisdictional authority includes
regulation of access to such road or street by security devices or
personnel.
(2) If the chief law enforcement official of the city or town, or
the sheriff of the county, is an elected official, prior to entering
into any written agreement which provides the city, town, or county
traffic control jurisdiction over any private road or street, or over
any limited access road owned or controlled by a special district, the
governing body of the city, town, or county shall consult with the
elected chief law enforcement official or sheriff. No such agreement
shall take effect unless the agreement is approved in writing by the
elected chief law enforcement officer or sheriff.

--- END ---