BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A person commits the crime of mineral
trespass if the person:
(a) Intentionally and without the permission of the claim holder:
(i) Enters a mining claim posted as required in chapter 78.08 RCW
and disturbs, removes, or attempts to remove any mineral from the claim
site;
(ii) Tampers with or disturbs a flume, rocker box, bedrock sluice,
sluice box, dredge, quartz mill, or other mining equipment at a posted
claim site; or
(iii) Defaces a location stake, side post, corner post, landmark,
monument, or posted written notice within a posted mining claim;
(b) Intentionally interferes with a lawful small scale mining
operation that is in full compliance with state and federal laws; or
(c) Intentionally stops, or causes to be stopped, a lawful small
scale mining operation that is in full compliance with state and
federal laws.
(2) Mineral trespass is a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Section 1 of this act does not apply to
conduct that would otherwise constitute an offense when it is required
or authorized by law or judicial decree or is performed by a public
servant in the reasonable exercise of official powers, duties, or
functions.
(2) As used in subsection (1) of this section, "law or judicial
decree" includes but is not limited to:
(a) Laws defining duties and functions of public servants;
(b) Laws defining duties of private citizens to assist public
servants in the performance of certain of their functions; and
(c) Judgments and orders of courts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act are each added
to chapter 78.44 RCW.

--- END ---