BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.230 and 1992 c 7 s 41 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall furnish to all persons making satisfactory
application for vehicle license as provided by law, two identical
vehicle license number plates each containing the vehicle license
number to be displayed on such vehicle as by law required: PROVIDED,
That if the vehicle to be licensed is a trailer, semitrailer or
motorcycle only one vehicle license number plate shall be issued for
each thereof. The number and plate shall be of such size and color and
shall contain such symbols indicative of the registration period for
which the same is issued and of the state of Washington, as shall be
determined and prescribed by the director. Any vehicle license number
plate or plates issued to a dealer shall contain thereon a sufficient
and satisfactory indication that such plates have been issued to a
dealer in vehicles.
(2) All vehicle license number plates ((may be obtained by the
director from the metal working plant of a state correctional facility
or from any source in accordance with existing state of Washington
purchasing procedures.)) issued by the department after the effective
date of this act must be flat, digitally printed license number plates,
and the department shall contract with a private vendor for the
manufacturing of the plates. The digitally printed license number
plates may include bar codes to facilitate distribution and inventory
control.
(3) Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, the
director may, in his discretion and under such rules and regulations as
he may prescribe, adopt a type of vehicle license number plates whereby
the same shall be used as long as legible on the vehicle for which
issued, with provision for tabs or emblems to be attached thereto or
elsewhere on the vehicle to signify renewals, in which event the term
"vehicle license number plate" as used in any enactment shall be deemed
to include in addition to such plate the tab or emblem signifying
renewal except when such plate contains the designation of the current
year without reference to any tab or emblem. Renewals shall be
effected by the issuance and display of such tab or emblem.

--- END ---