BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.01.290 and 1994 c 258 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature recognizes that environmental review of
transportation projects is a continuous process that should begin at
the earliest stages of planning and continue through final project
construction. ((Early and extensive involvement of the relevant
environmental regulatory authorities is critical in order to avoid
significant changes in substantially completed project design and
engineering.)) Streamlining the permit approval process is essential
for reducing project delays and for making the most efficient use of
every transportation dollar. It is the expectation of the legislature
that if a comprehensive environmental approach is integrated throughout
various transportation processes, onerous, duplicative, and time-consuming permit processes will be minimized. To this end, the
legislature directs that substantive standards and best management
practices governing the construction of transportation projects be
jointly agreed upon by both the department and Washington's natural
resource agencies. After these substantive standards have been agreed
upon, the legislature finds that the greatest efficiency and
effectiveness in both protecting our environmental resources and in
constructing the transportation infrastructure required to serve
Washington's growing population will come from the implementation of
these standards by the department itself, with appropriate oversight,
as defined in this act, by both natural resource agencies and local
governments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Best available information" means the existing sources of
data, including limiting factors analyses required under chapter 77.85
RCW, that can be used to make informed decisions regarding
environmental conditions within a watershed.
(2) "Best management practices" means currently available and
generally accepted techniques, including new technologies or strategies
that seek to reduce the negative impacts of transportation facilities,
projects, and services on communities and the environment.
(3) "Committee" means the transportation permit efficiency and
accountability committee created in section 3 of this act.
(4) "Least-cost planning" means the use of best available
information within a watershed basin applied to transportation decision
making in the planning, permitting, and mitigation phases of a project.
(5) "Programmatic permit" means a regulatory instrument that
outlines permit conditions and obligations for a variety of similar
project activities spanning a watershed ecosystem or geographically
defined boundary, that once entered into by parties, delineates an
applicant's proposed actions over a specific period of time, that may
be conducted without the necessity of obtaining individual permits for
the types of projects identified.
(6) "Transportation project of statewide significance" means a
project or combination of projects that crosses two or more city or
county jurisdictional boundaries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 TRANSPORTATION PERMIT EFFICIENCY AND
ACCOUNTABILITY COMMITTEE--CREATED. The transportation permit
efficiency and accountability committee is created.
(1) The committee will consist of nine voting members, including
two members from the house of representatives, one each selected by the
speaker and the minority leader of the house; two members of the
senate, one each selected by the senate majority leader and the senate
minority leader; one member designated by the secretary of
transportation; one member designated by the director of fish and
wildlife; one member designated by the director of ecology; one member
designated by the Association of Washington Cities, and one member
designated by the Washington State Association of Counties. The
committee shall elect a chair from the four legislators appointed to
the committee.
(2) Representatives of additional organizations or groups,
including but not limited to the following organizations and groups,
may be invited by the committee to appear before the committee and
advise and provide input to the committee: The state commissioner of
public lands; the Northwest Indian Fisheries Commission; the Columbia
River Intertribal Fisheries Commission; the Consulting Engineers
Council of Washington; the Associated General Contractors of
Washington; the Washington Construction Industry Council; the
Association of Washington Business; the Building Industry Association
of Washington; any statewide environmental organization; the state fish
and wildlife commission; the federal Environmental Protection Agency;
the National Marine Fisheries Service; the Federal Highway
Administration; and the United States Fish and Wildlife Service.
(3) The committee may create technical subcommittees to assist with
drafting of and advice on decisions to adopt the standards described in
section 4(1)(a) of this act. In order to use the broadest range of
expertise available in writing the substantive standards, the committee
may appoint any individual or any representative from any organization
or agency as nonvoting members of these technical subcommittees to
assist in developing standards governing specific topics.
(4) Legislative members of the committee will be reimbursed for
travel expenses as provided in RCW 44.04.120.
(5) The department of transportation office of environmental
affairs shall provide administrative and clerical assistance to the
committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 COMMITTEE--RESPONSIBILITIES. (1) By
December 31, 2003, the committee shall:
(a) Develop concise environmental standards and best management
practices for transportation projects that can be applied with
certainty, consistency, and assurance of swift permit action, while
taking into account the varying climate, geomorphologic, and hydrologic
conditions throughout the state. The standards and best management
practices must conform to all current relevant federal and state
environmental regulations, and must be sufficient to protect critical
areas as defined in chapter 36.70A RCW. Actions to achieve this goal
must include identification and development of standards to govern both
programmatic permits and individual project permits. Actions to
achieve this goal may include the adoption of existing environmental
standards, such as existing storm water manuals or other existing
sources of standards and best management practices, if the committee
decides that these existing resources meet or constitute state or
federal environmental standards. These existing resources may be
incorporated by reference into the standards developed by the
committee. Nothing in this chapter may be interpreted as providing the
committee any authority to engage in rule making other than for the
purpose of drafting or adopting the standards specified in this
subsection. Nothing in this chapter may be interpreted as expanding
the rule-making authority of any state agency or as providing rule-making authority for any state agency, including those agencies
participating on the committee;
(b) Create a streamlined consultation process for transportation
projects for section 404 federal Clean Water Act and section 10 permits
issued by the United States Army Corps of Engineers;
(c) Develop a least-cost methodology for analyzing environmental
impacts and applying compensatory mitigation consistent with a
watershed-based approach before final design;
(d) Assess models to collate and access watershed data to support
early agency involvement in transportation planning and reviews under
the federal Environmental Protection Act and the State Environmental
Protection Act;
(e) Develop procedures to use existing best available information
from a variety of sources including, but not limited to, watershed
planning efforts, lead entities, regional fisheries enhancement groups,
the salmon and steelhead inventory assessment project (SSIAHP), and
other recognized entities as deemed appropriate by the committee, in
order to determine potential mitigation site requirements for project
actions within a watershed. Priority consideration should be given to
the use of the state's alternative mitigation strategy to best link
transportation mitigation needs with local watershed and lead entity
project lists;
(f) Ensure that the department seeks federal delegation authorities
to the state where appropriate to streamline permit processes
including: Delegation of section 404 permit authority under the
federal Clean Water Act; nonfederal lead agency status under the
federal Endangered Species Act; section 106 cultural resource
designation under the National Historic Preservation Act; and other
appropriate authority that when delegated should result in permit
streamlining.
(2) Upon completion of the drafting and adoption of the standards
referred to in subsection (1)(a) of this section, the committee shall
suspend its operation until it is reconvened to amend existing
standards or draft or adopt additional standards as provided by section
9(4) of this act, or until it is required to draft a remediation plan
as provided by section 9(3) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Upon completion of the standard drafting
or adoption process specified in section 4(1)(a) of this act, the
department of ecology and the department of fish and wildlife shall
delegate, to the maximum extent consistent with federal law, all
environmental permitting authority currently exercised by these
agencies, including, but not limited to, chapters 90.48, 90.58, and
77.55 RCW. The department of ecology and the department of fish and
wildlife shall delegate authority by certifying the department to self-permit with regard to all state environmental permits currently issued,
approved, or consulted upon by the department of ecology and the
department of fish and wildlife.
(2) As part of the department's self-permitting process, the
department shall, before issuing the final permit for a transportation
project of statewide significance, send a draft copy of the permit to
both the department of ecology and the department of fish and wildlife
for review and comment. The departments of ecology and fish and
wildlife shall limit their comments to whether the department has
complied with the substantive standards and best management practices
developed under section 4(1)(a) of this act. The departments of
ecology and fish and wildlife have thirty days to review and comment on
the draft permit.
(3) Upon completion of the drafting or adoption process specified
in section 4(1)(a) of this act, the department shall review the
department's construction project list to determine which projects can
be included in programmatic or general permits under the standards
adopted under section 4(1)(a) of this act. The department shall issue
seventy percent of delegated permits through use of the programmatic
and general permits consistent with the standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Upon the certification provided for by
section 5 of this act or recertification provided for by section 9 of
this act, the department is exempt from obtaining any permit issued by
a county, city, or town, regarding a transportation project of
statewide significance, including, but not limited to, any permit
issued under chapter 90.58 RCW, any permit related to regulation of
critical areas under chapter 36.70A RCW, and any permit required for
filling, grading, building, or construction, or any other permit
required for a transportation project of statewide significance, that
would otherwise be issued under a local ordinance meeting the
definition of a development regulation under chapter 35.63, 35A.63,
36.70, 36.70A, or 36.70B RCW.
(2) For transportation projects of statewide significance, the
department shall serve as the lead entity for all review required under
the State Environmental Protection Act (SEPA), chapter 43.21C RCW.
Nothing in this section may be construed as limiting the ability of
local governments to participate in the SEPA process as provided for in
chapter 43.21C RCW.
(3) In addition to local government participation in the SEPA
process and as part of the self-permitting process set forth in this
chapter, the department shall, before issuing the final permit for a
transportation project of statewide significance, send a draft copy of
the permit to each local government in whose jurisdiction the project
is being constructed for review and comment. Each local government
will have thirty days to review and comment on the draft permit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The department of ecology and the department
of fish and wildlife may conduct inspections of projects performed by
the department of transportation where the department of transportation
has issued permits under authority delegated by the department of
ecology or the department of fish and wildlife. If an inspector from
the department of ecology or the department of fish and wildlife
discovers an example of substantial noncompliance with the standards
developed under section 4 of this act, the inspector shall document
that example and issue a detailed report of that example, which shall
be transmitted to the department of transportation. The department of
transportation may issue a formal response to the report addressing
whether it believes that the department or its contractors failed to
substantially comply with the standards developed under section 4 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Every two years the department shall send to
the legislature, the governor, the department of ecology, and the
department of fish and wildlife a report detailing its self-permitting
activities over the previous two years. The report must include a
detailed description of all permits issued during the previous two
years and must include detailed analysis of all instances of
noncompliance with the standards developed under section 4(1)(a) of
this act, as well as all measures taken to prevent any future
noncompliance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) Every four years, the department of fish
and wildlife and the department of ecology shall jointly conduct a
review of the department's self-permitting practices. The department
of ecology and the department of fish and wildlife shall submit a
report on the performance of the department to the legislature and the
governor. The report must include a recommendation as to whether the
department should be decertified from self-permitting. The department
of ecology and the department of fish and wildlife may recommend that
the department be decertified from self-permitting only if they find
that the department has engaged in repeated substantial noncompliance
with the substantive standards developed and adopted under section
4(1)(a) of this act. The department of ecology and the department of
fish and wildlife shall specifically identify all instances of
substantial noncompliance, and shall additionally identify measures
that could be implemented to prevent the substantial noncompliance in
the future. For purposes of this section, "repeated substantial
noncompliance" means repeated failure to meet the substantive standards
and best management practices developed and adopted under section
4(1)(a) of this act that causes more than de minimis actual harm to
fish and wildlife or their associated habitat.
(2) Upon a joint finding by the department of ecology and the
department of fish and wildlife that the department has engaged in
repeated substantial noncompliance with the substantive standards
developed under section 4(1)(a) of this act, the governor may decertify
the department from self-permitting. The notice of decertification by
the governor to the department must include written findings that
support the basis for decertification. Upon decertification, all
delegation of permitting authority from the departments of ecology and
fish and wildlife, and the department's exemption from the requirements
to obtain local permits as provided for in section 6(1) of this act, is
suspended until the committee has developed and imposed a remediation
plan as governed by subsection (3) of this section.
(3) Upon decertification of the department by the governor under
subsection (2) of this section, the committee shall meet and develop a
remediation plan to identify and correct department procedures that
were responsible for, or contributed to, the department's substantial
noncompliance with the standards. The department shall implement the
remediation plan developed by the committee. Upon full implementation
of the remediation plan, the department of ecology and the department
of fish and wildlife shall recertify the department to self-permit.
(4) Following the four-year review specified in subsection (1) of
this section, the department of ecology, the department of fish and
wildlife, or the department of transportation may reconvene the
committee and propose amendments or additions to the substantive
standards adopted under section 4(1)(a) of this act. The committee
shall use the same process for amending standards or adopting
additional standards as were used to draft or adopt the initial
standards as specified in section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 DEPARTMENT ORGANIZATION AND ADMINISTRATIVE
ACTIONS. The legislature finds that an essential component of
delegated federal or state permitting authority to the department is
the ability of the department to demonstrate the capacity to meet
environmental responsibilities. Therefore, the legislature directs
that:
(1) Environmental staff within the department shall lead the
development of all environmental documentation associated with
department projects and permit activities in accordance with the
department's managing project delivery tools.
(2) Certified environmental staff or certified consultants shall be
given the responsibility to draft environmental permits for the
department.
(3) The department shall conduct special prebid meetings for
projects that are environmentally complex. In addition, the department
shall review environmental considerations related to these projects
during the preconstruction meeting held with the contractor who is
awarded the bid.
(4) Environmental staff at the department shall conduct field
inspections to ensure that project activities are performed under
permit conditions. These inspectors may issue stop work orders when
compliance with permit standards are not being met. For this portion
of their job duties, the inspectors are accountable to the director of
the office of environmental services of the department.
(5) Failure to comply with a stop work order may result in civil
penalties being assessed against the department and individuals
involved. Willful violation by an agency or individual of a stop work
notice issued by the department is subject to civil penalties.
Continued failure to comply or willful violations by the department may
result in loss of permit writing and program management
responsibilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 TRAINING AND COMPLIANCE. The legislature
expects the department to continue its efforts to improve training and
compliance. The department shall:
(1) Provide training in environmental procedures and permit
requirements for those responsible for project delivery activities;
(2) Provide resource agency-approved certification training for
permit writers and environmental inspectors;
(3) Require wetland mitigation sites to be designed by biologists
or landscape architects certified by the department of ecology's
wetland program. Environmental mitigation site improvements must have
oversight conducted by environmental staff;
(4) Develop an environmental compliance data system to track all
permit conditions; and
(5) Keep detailed records of all noncompliance activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
Where the department of fish and wildlife has delegated hydraulic
project permit approval authority contained in this chapter to the
department of transportation under chapter 47.--- RCW (sections 2
through 11 of this act), the department of transportation will be
substituted for the department of fish and wildlife in an appeal of the
approval of a permit concerning a hydraulic project that is a
transportation project of statewide significance as defined in section
2 of this act. The appeal process for the permits issued by the
department of transportation under authority delegated by the
department of fish and wildlife will operate in the same manner as for
permits granted by the department of fish and wildlife under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Captions used in this act are not part of
the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 2 through 11 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 47 RCW.

--- END ---