BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary of transportation shall report no later than November
30th of every even-numbered year to the house of representatives and
senate transportation committees on both current practices regarding
contracting out and on further opportunities for contracting out within
the department. In recommending programs that might be performed by
the private sector, the secretary shall place emphasis on programs that
could be undertaken at a lower cost by the private sector than by state
employees, and on programs in which the use of the private sector could
augment the department's workforce in order to increase the
department's capacity to complete projects as quickly as possible. The
secretary may issue the report electronically by publishing it on the
department's web site and by transmitting the report electronically to
all members of the house of representatives and senate transportation
committees.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.06.142 and 2002 c 354 s 208 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any department, agency, or institution of higher education may
purchase services, including services that have been customarily and
historically provided by employees in the classified service under this
chapter, by contracting with individuals, nonprofit organizations,
businesses, employee business units, or other entities if the following
criteria are met:
(a) The invitation for bid or request for proposal contains
measurable standards for the performance of the contract;
(b) Employees in the classified service whose positions or work
would be displaced by the contract are provided an opportunity to offer
alternatives to purchasing services by contract and, if these
alternatives are not accepted, compete for the contract under
competitive contracting procedures in subsection (4) of this section;
(c) The contract with an entity other than an employee business
unit includes a provision requiring the entity to consider employment
of state employees who may be displaced by the contract;
(d) The department, agency, or institution of higher education has
established a contract monitoring process to measure contract
performance, costs, service delivery quality, and other contract
standards, and to cancel contracts that do not meet those standards;
and
(e) The department, agency, or institution of higher education has
determined that the contract results in savings or efficiency
improvements. The contracting agency must consider the consequences
and potential mitigation of improper or failed performance by the
contractor.
(2)(a) Departments, agencies, and institutions of higher education
are prohibited from bargaining matters pertaining to purchasing by
contract.
(b) Any provision contrary to or in conflict with this section in
any collective bargaining agreement in effect on July 1, 2005, is not
effective beyond the expiration date of the agreement.
(3) Contracting for services that is expressly mandated by the
legislature or was authorized by law prior to July 1, 2005, including
contracts and agreements between public entities, shall not be subject
to the processes set forth in subsections (1) and (4) through (6) of
this section.
(4) Competitive contracting shall be implemented as follows:
(a) At least ninety days prior to the date the contracting agency
requests bids from private entities for a contract for services
provided by classified employees, the contracting agency shall notify
the classified employees whose positions or work would be displaced by
the contract. The employees shall have sixty days from the date of
notification to offer alternatives to purchasing services by contract,
and the agency shall consider the alternatives before requesting bids.
(b) If the employees decide to compete for the contract, they shall
notify the contracting agency of their decision. Employees must form
one or more employee business units for the purpose of submitting a bid
or bids to perform the services.
(c) The director of personnel, with the advice and assistance of
the department of general administration, shall develop and make
available to employee business units training in the bidding process
and general bid preparation.
(d) The director of general administration, with the advice and
assistance of the department of personnel, shall, by rule, establish
procedures to ensure that bids are submitted and evaluated in a fair
and objective manner and that there exists a competitive market for the
service. Such rules shall include, but not be limited to: (i)
Prohibitions against participation in the bid evaluation process by
employees who prepared the business unit's bid or who perform any of
the services to be contracted; (ii) provisions to ensure no bidder
receives an advantage over other bidders and that bid requirements are
applied equitably to all parties; and (iii) procedures that require the
contracting agency to receive complaints regarding the bidding process
and to consider them before awarding the contract. Appeal of an
agency's actions under this subsection is an adjudicative proceeding
and subject to the applicable provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, the
administrative procedure act, with the final decision to be rendered by
an administrative law judge assigned under chapter 34.12 RCW.
(e) An employee business unit's bid must include the fully
allocated costs of the service, including the cost of the employees'
salaries and benefits, space, equipment, materials, and other costs
necessary to perform the function. An employee business unit's cost
shall not include the state's indirect overhead costs unless those
costs can be attributed directly to the function in question and would
not exist if that function were not performed in state service.
(f) A department, agency, or institution of higher education may
contract with the department of general administration to conduct the
bidding process.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) "Employee business unit" means a group of employees who perform
services to be contracted under this section and who submit a bid for
the performance of those services under subsection (4) of this section.
(b) "Indirect overhead costs" means the pro rata share of existing
agency administrative salaries and benefits, and rent, equipment costs,
utilities, and materials associated with those administrative
functions.
(c) "Competitive contracting" means the process by which classified
employees of a department, agency, or institution of higher education
compete with businesses, individuals, nonprofit organizations, or other
entities for contracts authorized by subsection (1) of this section.
(6) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall conduct
a performance audit of the implementation of this section, including
the adequacy of the appeals process in subsection (4)(d) of this
section, and report to the legislature by January 1, 2007, on the
results of the audit.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.80.020 and 2002 c 354 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the matters
subject to bargaining include wages, hours, and other terms and
conditions of employment, and the negotiation of any question arising
under a collective bargaining agreement.
(2) The employer is not required to bargain over matters pertaining
to:
(a) Health care benefits or other employee insurance benefits,
except as required in subsection (3) of this section;
(b) Any retirement system or retirement benefit; or
(c) Rules of the director of personnel or the Washington personnel
resources board adopted under section 203, chapter 354, Laws of 2002.
(3) Matters subject to bargaining include the number of names to be
certified for vacancies, promotional preferences, and the dollar amount
expended on behalf of each employee for health care benefits. However,
except as provided otherwise in this subsection for institutions of
higher education, negotiations regarding the number of names to be
certified for vacancies, promotional preferences, and the dollar amount
expended on behalf of each employee for health care benefits shall be
conducted between the employer and one coalition of all the exclusive
bargaining representatives subject to this chapter. Any such provision
agreed to by the employer and the coalition shall be included in all
master collective bargaining agreements negotiated by the parties. For
institutions of higher education, promotional preferences and the
number of names to be certified for vacancies shall be bargained under
the provisions of RCW 41.80.010(4).
(4) The employer and the exclusive bargaining representative shall
not agree to any proposal that would prevent the implementation of
approved affirmative action plans or that would be inconsistent with
the comparable worth agreement that provided the basis for the salary
changes implemented beginning with the 1983-1985 biennium to achieve
comparable worth.
(5) The employer and the exclusive bargaining representative shall
not bargain over matters pertaining to management rights established in
RCW 41.80.040 or over matters pertaining to purchasing services by
contract.
(6) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, if a conflict
exists between an executive order, administrative rule, or agency
policy relating to wages, hours, and terms and conditions of employment
and a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this chapter,
the collective bargaining agreement shall prevail. A provision of a
collective bargaining agreement that conflicts with the terms of a
statute is invalid and unenforceable.
(((7) This section does not prohibit bargaining that affects
contracts authorized by RCW 41.06.142.))

Sec. 4 RCW 41.80.910 and 2002 c 354 s 411 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Sections 203, 204, 213 through 223, 227, 229 through 231, 241,
243, 246, 248, 301, 302, 304 through 307, 309 through 316, 318, 319,
and 402 of this act take effect July 1, 2004.
(2) Section 224 of this act takes effect March 15, 2005.
(3) Sections ((208,)) 234 through 238((,)) and 403 of this act take
effect July 1, 2005.
(4) Sections 225, 226, 233, and 404 of this act take effect July 1,
2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 41.06.380 (Purchasing services by contract not prohibited--Limitations) and 1979 ex.s. c 46 s 2; and
(2) RCW 41.06.382 (Purchasing services by contract not prohibited--Limitations) and 1979 ex.s. c 46 s 1.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---