BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the Washington
state department of transportation should focus on its core ferry
mission of moving automobiles on Washington state's marine highways.
The legislature finds that current statutes impose barriers to entities
other than the state operating passenger-only ferries. The legislature
intends to lift those barriers to allow entities other than the state
to provide passenger-only ferry service. The legislature finds that
the provision of this service and the improvement in the mobility of
the citizens of Washington state is legally adequate consideration for
the use of state facilities in conjunction with the provision of the
service, and the legislature finds that allowing the operators of
passenger-only ferries to use state facilities on the basis of legally
adequate consideration does not evince donative intent on the part of
the legislature.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.60.120 and 1993 c 427 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the department acquires or constructs, maintains, and
operates any ferry crossings upon or toll bridges over Puget Sound or
any of its tributary or connecting waters, there shall not be
constructed, operated, or maintained any other ferry crossing upon or
bridge over any such waters within ten miles of any such crossing or
bridge operated or maintained by the department excepting such bridges
or ferry crossings in existence, and being operated and maintained
under a lawfully issued franchise at the time of the location of the
ferry crossing or construction of the toll bridge by the department.
(2) The ten-mile distance in subsection (1) of this section means
ten statute miles measured by airline distance. The ten-mile
restriction shall be applied by comparing the two end points (termini)
of a state ferry crossing to those of a private ferry crossing.
(3) The Washington utilities and transportation commission may,
upon written petition of a commercial ferry operator certificated or
applying for certification under chapter 81.84 RCW, and upon notice and
hearing, grant a waiver from the ten-mile restriction. The waiver must
not be detrimental to the public interest. In making a decision to
waive the ten-mile restriction, the commission shall consider, but is
not limited to, the impact of the waiver on transportation congestion
mitigation, air quality improvement, and the overall impact on the
Washington state ferry system. The commission shall act upon a request
for a waiver within ninety days after the conclusion of the hearing.
A waiver is effective for a period of five years from the date of
issuance. At the end of five years the waiver becomes permanent unless
appealed within thirty days by the commission on its own motion, the
department, or an interested party.
(4) The department shall not maintain and operate any ferry
crossing or toll bridge over Puget Sound or any of its tributary or
connecting waters that would infringe upon any franchise lawfully
issued by the state and in existence and being exercised at the time of
the location of the ferry crossing or toll bridge by the department,
without first acquiring the rights granted to such franchise holder
under the franchise.
(5) This section does not apply to operators of passenger-only
ferry service.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.64.090 and 1983 c 15 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, if any
party assumes the operation and maintenance of any ferry or ferry
system by rent, lease, or charter from the department of
transportation, such party shall assume and be bound by all the
provisions herein and any agreement or contract for such operation of
any ferry or ferry system entered into by the department shall provide
that the wages to be paid, hours of employment, working conditions and
seniority rights of employees will be established by the marine
employees' commission in accordance with the terms and provisions of
this chapter and it shall further provide that all labor disputes shall
be adjudicated in accordance with chapter 47.64 RCW.
(2) The department of transportation shall make its terminal, dock,
and pier space available to private operators of passenger-only ferries
if the space can be made available without limiting the operation of
car ferries operated by the department. These private operators are
not bound by the provisions of subsection (1) of this section. Charges
for the equipment and space must be fair market value taking into
account the public benefit derived from the passenger-only ferry
service.

Sec. 4 RCW 81.84.010 and 1993 c 427 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No commercial ferry may hereafter operate any vessel or ferry
for the public use for hire between fixed termini or over a regular
route upon the waters within this state, including the rivers and lakes
and Puget Sound, without first applying for and obtaining from the
commission a certificate declaring that public convenience and
necessity require such operation. Service authorized by certificates
issued before or after July 25, 1993, to a commercial ferry operator
shall be exercised by the operator in a manner consistent with the
conditions established in the certificate or tariffs: PROVIDED, That
no certificate shall be required for a vessel primarily engaged in
transporting freight other than vehicles, whose gross earnings from the
transportation of passengers and/or vehicles, are not more than ten
percent of the total gross annual earnings of such vessel: PROVIDED,
That nothing herein shall be construed to affect the right of any
county public transportation benefit area or other public agency within
this state to construct, condemn, purchase, operate, or maintain,
itself or by contract, agreement, or lease, with any person, firm, or
corporation, ferries or boats across or wharfs at or upon the waters
within this state, including rivers and lakes and Puget Sound, provided
such operation is not over the same route or between the same
districts, being served by a certificate holder without first acquiring
the rights granted to the certificate holder under the certificate, nor
shall this chapter be construed to affect, amend, or invalidate any
contract entered into prior to January 15, 1927, for the operation of
ferries or boats upon the waters within this state, which was entered
into in good faith by any county with any person, firm, or corporation,
except that in case of the operation or maintenance by any county,
city, town, port district, or other political subdivision by contract,
agreement, or lease with any person, firm, or corporation, of ferries
or boats across or wharfs at or upon the waters within this state,
including rivers and lakes and Puget Sound, the commission shall have
power and authority to regulate rates and services of such operation or
maintenance of ferries, boats, or wharfs, to make, fix, alter, or amend
said rates, and to regulate service and safety of operations thereof,
in the manner and to the same extent as it is empowered to regulate a
commercial ferry, notwithstanding the provisions of any act or parts of
acts inconsistent herewith.
(2) The holder of a certificate of public convenience and necessity
granted under this chapter must initiate service within five years of
obtaining the certificate, except that the holder of a certificate of
public convenience and necessity for passenger-only ferry service in
Puget Sound must initiate service within twenty months of obtaining the
certificate. The certificate holder shall report to the commission
every six months after the certificate is granted on the progress of
the certificated route. The reports shall include, but not be limited
to, the progress of environmental impact, parking, local government
land use, docking, and financing considerations. ((However)) Except in
the case of passenger-only service in Puget Sound, if service has not
been initiated within five years of obtaining the certificate, the
commission may extend the certificate on a twelve-month basis for up to
three years if the six-month progress reports indicate there is
significant advancement toward initiating service.
(3) The commission shall review certificates in existence as of
July 25, 1993, where service is not being provided on all or any
portion of the route or routes certificated. Based on progress reports
required under subsection (2) of this section, the commission may grant
an extension beyond that provided in subsection (2) of this section.
Such additional extension may not exceed a total of two years.

Sec. 5 RCW 81.84.020 and 1993 c 427 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon the filing of an application the commission shall give
reasonable notice to the department, affected cities ((and)), counties,
and public transportation benefit areas and any common carrier which
might be adversely affected, of the time and place for hearing on such
application. The commission shall have power after hearing, to issue
the certificate as prayed for, or to refuse to issue it, or to issue it
for the partial exercise only of the privilege sought, and may attach
to the exercise of the rights granted by said certificate such terms
and conditions as in its judgment the public convenience and necessity
may require; but the commission shall not have power to grant a
certificate to operate between districts and/or into any territory
prohibited by RCW 47.60.120 or already served by an existing
certificate holder, unless such existing certificate holder has failed
or refused to furnish reasonable and adequate service or has failed to
provide the service described in its certificate or tariffs after the
time period allowed to initiate service has elapsed: PROVIDED, A
certificate shall be granted when it shall appear to the satisfaction
of the commission that the commercial ferry was actually operating in
good faith over the route for which such certificate shall be sought,
on January 15, 1927: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That in case two or more
commercial ferries shall upon said date have been operating vessels
upon the same route, or between the same districts the commission shall
determine after public hearing whether one or more certificates shall
issue, and in determining to whom a certificate or certificates shall
be issued, the commission shall consider all material facts and
circumstances including the prior operation, schedules, and services
rendered by either of the ferries, and in case more than one
certificate shall issue, the commission shall fix and determine the
schedules and services of the ferries to which the certificates are
issued to the end that duplication of service be eliminated and public
convenience be furthered.
(2) Before issuing a certificate, the commission shall determine
that the applicant has the financial resources to operate the proposed
service for at least twelve months, based upon the submission by the
applicant of a pro forma financial statement of operations. Issuance
of a certificate shall be determined upon, but not limited to, the
following factors: Ridership and revenue forecasts; the cost of
service for the proposed operation; an estimate of the cost of the
assets to be used in providing the service; a statement of the total
assets on hand of the applicant that will be expended on the proposed
operation; and a statement of prior experience, if any, in such field
by the applicant. The documentation required of the applicant under
this section shall comply with the provisions of RCW 9A.72.085.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section does not apply to an application
for a certificate that is pending as of July 25, 1993.
(4) In granting a certificate for passenger-only ferries and
determining what conditions to place on the certificate, the commission
shall consider and give substantial weight to the effect of its
decisions on public agencies operating, or eligible to operate,
passenger-only ferry service.
(5) Until March 1, 2005, the commission shall not consider an
application for passenger-only ferry service serving any county in
Puget Sound, unless the public transportation benefit area authority or
ferry district serving that county, by resolution, agrees to the
application.

Sec. 6 RCW 81.84.060 and 1993 c 427 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission, upon complaint by an interested party, or upon its
own motion after notice and opportunity for hearing, may cancel,
revoke, suspend, alter, or amend a certificate issued under this
chapter on any of the following grounds:
(1) Failure of the certificate holder to initiate service by the
conclusion of the fifth year after the certificate has been granted or
by the conclusion of an extension granted under RCW 81.84.010 (2) or
(3), if the commission has considered the progress report information
required under RCW 81.84.010 (2) or (3);
(2) Failure of a certificate holder for passenger-only ferry
service in Puget Sound to initiate service by the conclusion of the
twentieth month after the certificate has been granted;
(3) Failure of the certificate holder to file an annual report;
(((3))) (4) The filing by a certificate holder of an annual report
that shows no revenue in the previous twelve-month period after service
has been initiated;
(((4))) (5) The violation of any provision of this chapter;
(((5))) (6) The violation of or failure to observe the provisions
or conditions of the certificate or tariffs;
(((6))) (7) The violation of an order, decision, rule, regulation,
or requirement established by the commission under this chapter;
(((7))) (8) Failure of a certificate holder to maintain the
required insurance coverage in full force and effect; or
(((8))) (9) Failure or refusal to furnish reasonable and adequate
service after initiating service.
The commission shall take appropriate action within thirty days
upon a complaint by an interested party or of its own finding that a
provision of this section has been violated.

--- END ---