BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 LEGISLATIVE INTENT. The legislature finds
that in order to recapture the public trust and demonstrate to the
public that the department of transportation is operating as
efficiently and effectively as possible, the department must be subject
to regular performance audits supervised by the legislature. The
legislature further finds that the department can recapture public
trust by submitting performance data to the legislature along with its
project list.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 44.40 RCW
to read as follows:
PERFORMANCE AUDITS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION. (1) Every
four years the legislative transportation committee shall undertake
independent, objective, and comprehensive performance audits of the
department of transportation, to be performed in accordance with
government auditing standards.
(2) For the purposes of this chapter, "government auditing
standards" means the Generally Accepted Government Auditing Standards
(GAGAS) as published by the Comptroller General of the United States
General Accounting Office (GAO).
(3) The performance audit report must include:
(a) Identification of potential cost savings in the department of
transportation, its programs, and its services;
(b) Identification of funding to the department of transportation,
to programs, and to services that can be eliminated or reduced;
(c) Identification of programs and services that can be eliminated,
reduced, or transferred to the private sector;
(d) Analysis of gaps and overlaps in programs and services and
recommendations for improving, dropping, blending, or separating
functions to correct gaps or overlaps;
(e) Analysis and recommendations for pooling information technology
systems used within the department;
(f) Analysis of the roles and functions of the department, its
programs, and its services and their compliance with statutory
authority and recommendations for eliminating or changing those roles
and functions and ensuring compliance with statutory authority;
(g) Recommendations for eliminating or changing statutes, rules,
and policy directives as may be necessary to ensure that the department
carry out reasonably and properly those functions expressly vested in
the department by statute;
(h) Verification of the reliability and validity of department
performance data, self-assessments, and performance measurement systems
as required under RCW 43.88.090; and
(i) Identification and recognition of best practices.
(4) The legislative transportation committee may require the
department to provide all information required for completion of any
audit, and the department shall fully and completely cooperate with the
legislative transportation committee for the purposes of this section.
Costs of complying with the requirements will be paid by the
department.
(5) The legislative transportation committee shall contract with
private sector professional and technical experts for conducting
performance audits and shall provide oversight of the audits.
Employees within the legislative transportation committee's office, if
available and qualified, may assist in the audits. The legislative
transportation committee shall create and maintain a list of qualified
private sector professional and technical experts who may be selected
to conduct performance audits either by lot or on a rotating basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 44.40 RCW
to read as follows:
DEFINITION. For the purpose of this chapter, a "performance audit"
is an objective and systematic examination of evidence for the purpose
of providing an independent assessment of the performance of the
department of transportation, or of a program or service provided by
the department, in order to provide information for improving public
accountability and facilitating decision making by those who have the
responsibility to initiate or oversee corrective action. Performance
audits include economy and efficiency audits and program audits.
(1) Economy and efficiency audits include determining whether the
department is acquiring, protecting, and using its resources, such as
personnel, property, and space, economically and efficiently; the
causes of uneconomical or inefficient practices; and whether the
department has complied with laws and rules on matters of economy and
efficiency.
(2) Program audits include determining the extent to which the
desired results or benefits established by the legislature or other
authorizing body are being achieved by the department; the
effectiveness of agencies, programs, and services; and whether the
department complied with laws and rules applicable to the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
SUBMISSION OF PERFORMANCE DATA TO THE LEGISLATURE. The department
shall submit to the transportation commission or its statutory
successor, the governor, and the legislature, cost and performance data
to accompany the proposed project list developed under RCW 47.05.051.
For capacity projects the data must specify the estimated congestion
relief in both time and money (opportunity costs). For safety
projects, the department shall submit estimates for both the number of
lives saved and the reduced negative economic effects of high-accident
areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Captions used in this act are not part of
the law.

--- END ---