BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 FINDINGS AND PURPOSE. (1) The legislature
finds that it is in the public interest to adopt a voting system in
which all successful candidates must win by a majority vote rather than
a plurality of effective votes and that allows voters to vote secondary
and other preferences in case their favorite candidate does not receive
a majority of the votes cast. The legislature recognizes that the
system known as instant runoff voting achieves that purpose.
(2) The legislature further finds that voter interest and
participation in elections will increase by use of instant runoff
voting because a voter has more choices and all votes will be more
meaningful than votes under the present system. The legislature
declares it is in the interest of participatory democracy that voters
be given the opportunity to vote their true beliefs with their first
choice votes, while still making effective secondary choices among the
remaining acceptable candidates.
(3) The legislature therefore intends to authorize a pilot project
to study the effects of using instant runoff voting as a local option
for nonpartisan offices in charter cities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 PILOT PROJECT--INSTANT RUNOFF VOTING. The
secretary of state shall conduct a pilot project on the use of instant
runoff voting as a local option for nonpartisan offices in charter
cities. The pilot project must begin by August 1, 2003, and conclude
no later than June 30, 2008.
(1) The secretary of state shall select at least one city to
participate in the pilot project. Only the city or cities selected by
the secretary of state may participate in the pilot project. The
county auditor for the county containing a selected city must also be
selected to participate in this project. Cities demonstrating support
for instant runoff voting as indicated by compliance with the charter
amendment required in section 7 of this act will receive first
consideration for participation in the pilot project.
(2) Elections conducted under the instant runoff voting method for
the pilot project must comply with this chapter and may be held only on
the dates specified by RCW 29.13.020(1).
(3) For the purpose of implementing this chapter, the secretary of
state shall develop and adopt:
(a) Rules governing the conduct of elections conducted under the
instant runoff voting method; and
(b) A pilot project timeline. The secretary of state may consult
with appropriate local officials to develop this timeline. The
timeline is subject to review and amendment by the secretary of state,
as necessary.
(4) The secretary of state shall certify all election equipment and
related processes before the conduct of an election under the instant
runoff voting method.
(5) The secretary of state shall submit a report of findings to the
legislature by July 1, 2008, that includes, but is not limited to:
(a) An assessment of all elections conducted using the instant
runoff voting method;
(b) Recommendations for statutory, rule, and local voting
procedural changes necessary to implement instant runoff voting as an
alternative election method for special and general elections;
(c) An inventory of currently available election equipment
necessary for the conduct of elections using the instant runoff method,
including costs associated with the equipment; and
(d) Any recommendations from any city legislative body or county
auditor participating in this pilot project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Instant runoff voting" means a system of voting in which
voters may rank up to three candidates for the same office in order of
preference, so that voters may indicate a first choice, a second
choice, and a third choice.
(2) "Choice" means an indication on a ballot of a voter's ranking
of candidates for a particular office according to the voter's
preference.
(3) "Vote" means a ballot choice that is counted toward election of
a candidate. All first choices are votes, and lower ranked choices are
potential votes that may be credited to a candidate, and thus become
votes for the candidate, according to the rules stated in this chapter.
(4) "Stage" or "stage in the counting" means a step in counting
votes, in which votes for all remaining candidates are counted to
determine whether a candidate has achieved a majority and, if not,
which candidate or candidates are eliminated.
(5) "Next choice" means the highest ranked choice for a remaining
candidate that has not become a vote at a previous stage.
(6) "Last place candidate" means a candidate who has received the
fewest votes among the candidates who remain at any stage. Two or more
candidates simultaneously become last place candidates when their
combined votes are fewer than all votes for the candidate with the next
highest number of votes.
(7) "Exhausted ballot" means a ballot on which all available
choices have been used such that all choices made on the ballot have
become votes for the various candidates so indicated or contain choices
for eliminated candidates or both and no other choices remain.
(8) "Continuing ballot" means a ballot that is not exhausted.
(9) "Remaining candidate" means a candidate who has not been
eliminated.
(10) "Candidates who remain" means all candidates who have not been
eliminated at a previous stage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 INSTANT RUNOFF VOTING--APPLICABLE
PROVISIONS. To the extent they are not inconsistent with this chapter,
the laws governing the conduct of elections apply to the pilot project
on instant runoff voting authorized by section 2 of this act. The
authority of a city meeting the criteria of section 7 of this act to
participate in an election conducted under the instant runoff voting
method expires on June 30, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 COUNTING OF BALLOTS. (1) General
explanation. In general, instant runoff counting proceeds in the
following manner: All votes are counted in the first stage. If a
candidate receives a majority of votes, he or she is elected. If no
candidate receives a majority on the first or any subsequent stage,
then the last place candidate at each stage is eliminated. The next
choices on ballots for an eliminated candidate become votes for the
candidates indicated in those choices, and this process continues until
all but one candidate has been eliminated.
(2) Specific rules and procedures. The following specific rules
and procedures, subject to the conditions of section 6 of this act,
govern how votes must be counted for each office subject to instant
runoff voting:
(a) All first choices are counted first. If a candidate has
obtained a majority of those votes, that candidate is elected and
counting ends.
(b) If no candidate receives a majority of votes at the first
stage, then second stage counting begins by eliminating the last place
candidate. The second choices made on ballots for the eliminated
candidate become votes for the second choice candidate indicated on
those ballots. A candidate who receives a majority of votes at that
stage is elected.
(c) If no candidate receives a majority at a previous stage, then
the last place candidate among the remaining candidates is eliminated.
The next choices made on ballots for an eliminated candidate become
votes for the candidate indicated on those ballots. A candidate who
receives a majority of votes at that stage is elected.
(d) If at any stage in the counting there are two or more last
place candidates, these candidates are eliminated simultaneously. The
next choices made on ballots that had votes for all such eliminated
candidates become votes for any candidates so indicated who remain.
(e) The counting process continues in this manner with successive
last place candidates being eliminated and the next choices made on
continuing ballots on which votes were cast for eliminated candidates
are counted for the remaining candidate or candidates indicated by
those choices until all but one candidate has been eliminated. That
candidate is then elected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 VOTING CONDITIONS AND LIMITATIONS. (1)
Exhausted ballots. (a) Once a ballot is exhausted, it is disregarded
and no longer counted.
(b) A ballot assigning the same ranking to more than one candidate
for an office is exhausted when the duplicate ranking is reached. In
that case no vote is recorded for any of the duplicate candidates so
chosen.
(2) Maximum effective choices. Only three choices for any one
office are counted.
(3) Write-in votes. If the total votes of all write-in candidates
in each race during any stage is less than the last place candidate
among the candidates appearing on the ballot, all write-in candidates
are considered eliminated for the current and subsequent stages.
(4) Insufficient choice votes made. If ballots do not contain
sufficient effective second and lower choices for a particular office
so that at the end of the counting no candidate achieves a majority,
the candidate with the most votes credited to him or her is elected.
(5) Votes for eliminated candidates. No votes may be counted for
a candidate who has been eliminated no matter how many second and lower
ranked choices might otherwise have become votes for the candidate in
a later stage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 LOCAL OPTION AUTHORIZED. (1) After a
charter amendment as provided in RCW 35.22.120 through 35.22.190 or
chapter 35A.09 RCW authorizing a city to adopt instant runoff voting as
an alternative election method and selection by the secretary of state
to participate in the pilot project authorized by section 2 of this
act, the legislative body of a charter city may adopt instant runoff
voting as the method for electing candidates for all nonpartisan city
offices.
(2) After adoption of instant runoff voting by the legislative body
of a charter city as provided for in subsection (1) of this section,
the city shall notify the county auditor and the secretary of state of
its intent to hold an election under the instant runoff voting method
before such election. If the county auditor notifies the city that
existing election equipment of the county is insufficient for the
conduct of an election under the instant runoff voting method, the city
and the county auditor shall reach an agreement for the purchase of any
new equipment specifically required for such election. Nothing in this
subsection precludes the auditor from canvassing the returns by hand.
(3) The date of an election conducted under the instant runoff
voting method must be consistent with the timeline required by section
2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 BALLOT SPECIFICATIONS AND DIRECTIONS TO
VOTERS. Ballots should be simple and easy to understand. Sample
ballots illustrating voting procedures must be posted in or near the
voting booth, and included in the instruction packet of absentee
ballots. Directions provided to voters must conform substantially to
the following specifications:

"You may vote for up to three candidates in order of
preference. Indicate your first choice by marking the number
"1" beside a candidate's name (or by marking in the column
labeled "First Choice"), your second choice by marking the
number "2" (or by marking in the column labeled "Second
Choice"), your third choice by the number "3" (or by marking
the "Third Choice" column). You are under no obligation to
rank more than one candidate for each office and ranking
additional candidates will not affect your first choice
candidate. Do not mark the same number beside more than one
candidate (or put more than one mark in each column for the
office on which you are voting). Do not skip numbers."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 CHANGES IN VOTING DEVICES AND COUNTING
METHODS. Appropriate election officials of this state may provide for
the use of electronic, computerized, or other devices for marking,
sorting, and counting the ballots and tabulating the results, and may
modify the design and form of the ballots, the directions to voters,
and the details with respect to the method of marking, sorting,
invalidating, and retaining of ballots, and the counting of votes. No
change may be made inconsistent with provisions, purposes, or
principles of this chapter. Election officials should provide voters
with a ballot that has a special design, format, or layout for offices
to which instant runoff voting applies, but the parts of ballots for
contests that have only one or two candidates for the same office may
differ from the parts of a ballot to which instant runoff voting
applies.

Sec. 10 RCW 29.21.015 and 1998 c 19 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No primary may be held for any single position in any city,
town, district, or district court, as required by RCW 29.21.010, if,
after the last day allowed for candidates to withdraw, there are no
more than two candidates filed for the position. The county auditor
shall, as soon as possible, notify all the candidates so affected that
the office for which they filed will not appear on the primary ballot.
(2) (a) No primary may be held for nonpartisan offices in charter
cities if the city:
(i) Has been selected to participate in the pilot project
authorized by section 2 of this act; and
(ii) Is conducting an election using the instant runoff voting
method authorized by this chapter.
(b) This subsection (2) expires June 30, 2008.
(3) No primary may be held for the office of commissioner of a park
and recreation district or for the office of cemetery district
commissioner.
(((3))) (4) Names of candidates for offices that do not appear on
the primary ballot shall be printed upon the general election ballot in
the manner specified by RCW 29.30.025.

Sec. 11 RCW 29.62.020 and 1999 c 259 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At least every third day after a special election, primary, or
general election and before certification of the election results,
except Sundays and legal holidays, the county auditor shall convene the
county canvassing board or their designees to process absentee ballots
and canvass the votes cast at that special election, primary, or
general election, if the county auditor is in possession of more than
twenty-five ballots that have yet to be canvassed. The county auditor
may use his or her discretion in determining when to convene the
canvassing board or their designees during the final four days before
the certification of election results in order to protect the secrecy
of any ballot.
Each absentee ballot previously not canvassed that was received by
the county auditor two days or more before the convening of the
canvassing board or their designees and that either was received by the
county auditor before the closing of the polls on the day of the
special election, primary, or general election for which it was issued,
or that bears a date of mailing on or before the special election,
primary, or general election for which it was issued, must be processed
at that time. The tabulation of votes that results from that day's
canvass must be made available to the general public immediately upon
completion of the canvass.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, on the
tenth day after a special election or a primary and on the fifteenth
day after a general election, the canvassing board shall complete the
canvass and certify the results. Each absentee ballot that was
returned before the closing of the polls on the date of the primary or
election for which it was issued, and each absentee ballot with a date
of mailing on or before the date of the primary or election for which
it was issued and received on or before the date on which the primary
or election is certified, shall be included in the canvass report.
(3) At the request of any caucus of the state legislature, the
county auditor shall transmit copies of all unofficial returns of state
and legislative primaries or elections prepared by or for the county
canvassing board to either the secretary of the senate or the chief
clerk of the house.
(4) On or before the thirtieth day after an election conducted
under the instant runoff voting method for the pilot project authorized
by section 2 of this act, the canvassing board shall complete the
canvass and certify the results. This subsection expires June 30,
2008.

Sec. 12 RCW 29.65.050 and 1965 c 9 s 29.65.050 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The clerk shall issue subpoenas for witnesses in ((such)) a
contested election at the request of either party, which shall be
served by the sheriff or constable, as other subpoenas, and the
superior court shall have full power to issue attachments to compel the
attendance of witnesses who shall have been duly subpoenaed to attend
if they fail to do so.
(2) The court shall meet at the time and place designated to
determine such contested election by the rules of law and evidence
governing the determination of questions of law and fact, so far as the
same may be applicable, and may dismiss the proceedings if the
statement of the cause or causes of contest is insufficient, or for
want of prosecution. After hearing the proofs and allegations of the
parties, the court shall pronounce judgment in the premises, either
confirming or annulling and setting aside such election, according to
the law and right of the case.
(3) If in any such case it shall appear that another person than
the one returned has the highest number of legal votes, said court
shall declare such person duly elected.
(4) When applicable, subsections (1) through (3) of this section
apply to elections conducted under the instant runoff voting method as
authorized by section 2 of this act. This subsection expires June 30,
2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 9 of this act apply to
the pilot project for instant runoff voting authorized by section 2 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 1 through 9 of this act expire on
June 30, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 29 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Section captions used in this act are not
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---