BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is strong
public support for use of first offender waiver programs for those
charged with nonviolent offenses. The legislature finds that the first
offender waiver program results in significant savings of public funds.
The legislature also finds that there is evidence that when the first
offender waiver is used for drug offenses, the rates of conviction for
a subsequent felony are considerably lower for those drug offenders who
receive the first offender waiver when compared with those who are
eligible but do not receive it. The legislature further finds that
there is strong public support for saving public funds by reinstating
the first offender waiver for drug offenses.
It is the intent of the legislature to reduce prison overcrowding,
reduce recidivism, and save public funds by reinstating the first
offender waiver for those charged with drug offenses.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.650 and 2002 c 175 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section applies to offenders who have never been
previously convicted of a felony in this state, federal court, or
another state, and who have never participated in a program of deferred
prosecution for a felony, and who are:
(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, convicted of a
felony that is not:
(((a))) (i) Classified as a violent offense or a sex offense under
this chapter;
(((b))) (ii) Manufacture, delivery, or possession with intent to
manufacture or deliver a controlled substance classified in Schedule I
or II that is a narcotic drug or flunitrazepam classified in Schedule
IV;
(((c))) (iii) Manufacture, delivery, or possession with intent to
deliver a methamphetamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of its isomers
as defined in RCW 69.50.206(d)(2); or
(((d))) (iv) The selling for profit of any controlled substance or
counterfeit substance classified in Schedule I, RCW 69.50.204, except
leaves and flowering tops of marihuana; or
(b)(i) Convicted of the manufacture, delivery, or possession with
the intent to manufacture or deliver a controlled substance classified
in schedule I, RCW 69.50.204, or schedule II, RCW 69.50.206, or the
selling for profit of any controlled substance or counterfeit substance
classified in schedule I, RCW 69.50.204, who the court determines to be
in need of treatment for drug abuse; or
(ii) An offender determined by the court not to be in need of
treatment for drug abuse, and who is otherwise eligible for the
first-time offender option under this section, and the court determines
that the offender had a minimal role in the offense or acted under
duress not constituting a defense or that there are other strong
mitigating circumstances, then the court may order a sentence employing
the first-time offender option under this section.
(2) In sentencing a first-time offender the court may waive the
imposition of a sentence within the standard sentence range and impose
a sentence which may include up to ninety days of confinement in a
facility operated or utilized under contract by the county and a
requirement that the offender refrain from committing new offenses.
The sentence may also include a term of community supervision or
community custody as specified in subsection (3) of this section,
which, in addition to crime-related prohibitions, may include
requirements that the offender perform any one or more of the
following:
(a) Devote time to a specific employment or occupation;
(b) Undergo available outpatient treatment for up to the period
specified in subsection (3) of this section, or inpatient treatment not
to exceed the standard range of confinement for that offense;
(c) Pursue a prescribed, secular course of study or vocational
training;
(d) Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the
community corrections officer prior to any change in the offender's
address or employment;
(e) Report as directed to a community corrections officer; or
(f) Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations as provided
in RCW 9.94A.030 and/or perform community restitution work.
(3) The terms and statuses applicable to sentences under subsection
(2) of this section are:
(a) For sentences imposed on or after July 25, 1999, for crimes
committed before July 1, 2000, up to one year of community supervision.
If treatment is ordered, the period of community supervision may
include up to the period of treatment, but shall not exceed two years;
and
(b) For crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000, up to one year
of community custody unless treatment is ordered, in which case the
period of community custody may include up to the period of treatment,
but shall not exceed two years. Any term of community custody imposed
under this section is subject to conditions and sanctions as authorized
in this section and in RCW 9.94A.715 (2) and (3).
(4) The department shall discharge from community supervision any
offender sentenced under this section before July 25, 1999, who has
served at least one year of community supervision and has completed any
treatment ordered by the court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
Offenders who are in prison who were sentenced for a drug offense
since July 1, 1988, and who would have been eligible for the first-time
offender option under RCW 9.94A.650 had it been in effect at the time
of sentencing, may request review by the sentencing court and
resentencing to a first-time offender option to include a drug
treatment program acceptable to the court. The request for review must
include a presentation of an appropriate proposed course of treatment.

--- END ---