BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.43.112 and 1997 c 375 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Washington state patrol officers may engage in private law
enforcement off-duty employment in uniform for private benefit, subject
to guidelines adopted by the chief of the Washington state patrol.
These guidelines must ensure that the integrity and professionalism of
the Washington state patrol is preserved. Use of Washington state
patrol officer's uniforms shall be considered de minimis use of state
property.
(2) Washington state patrol officers engaged in authorized off-duty
uniformed employment are authorized to use state patrol vehicles for
the purposes of that authorized employment, subject to guidelines
adopted by the chief of the Washington state patrol through
negotiations with the appropriate bargaining representatives. The
Washington state patrol shall be reimbursed for the use of the vehicle
at the prevailing state employee rate for mileage and hours of usage to
be determined through agreement between the Washington state patrol and
the appropriate bargaining representative.

--- END ---