BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 47.06B.030 (Council -- Duties) and 1999 c 385 s 5, 1999 c 372
s 13, & 1998 c 173 s 3; and
(2) RCW 47.06B.900 (Council--Termination) and 1999 c 385 s 7 & 1998
c 173 s 6.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.06B.901 and 1999 c 385 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective June 30, 2008:
(1) RCW 47.06B.010 and 1999 c 385 s 1 & 1998 c 173 s 1;
(2) RCW 47.06B.012 and 1999 c 385 s 2;
(3) RCW 47.06B.015 and 1999 c 385 s 3;
(4) RCW 47.06B.020 and ((1999 c 385 s 4 &)) 1998 c 173 s 2; and
(5) ((RCW 47.06B.030 and 1999 c 385 s 5 & 1998 c 173 s 3; and
(6))) RCW 47.06B.040 and 1999 c 385 s 6.

--- END ---