BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this act is to require
disclosure and reporting of gifts, grants, and gratuities made by
pharmaceutical manufacturers, directly or indirectly, to any person or
entity authorized to prescribe, dispense, or purchase prescription
drugs in Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.64 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Group purchasing organization" means any group of two or more
hospitals, nursing homes, or other health care organizations that
collectively purchase either directly from a manufacturer or by
accessing contracts through another group.
(b) "Health benefit plan administrator" means any person or entity
who manages or administers a private, self-insured health benefit plan
or public employee health benefit plan and any person who manages or
administers health benefit plans for another person, including health
insuring corporations and sickness and accident insurers under contract
to provide managerial and administrative services.
(c) "Pharmaceutical detailing, promotional, or marketing
activities" means promotional or educational activities by
pharmaceutical marketers directed at physicians, their staff, or other
health care professionals who prescribe, dispense, or administer
prescription drugs.
(d) "Pharmaceutical manufacturing company" means an entity that is
engaged in the production, preparation, propagation, compounding,
conversion, or processing of prescription drugs, either directly or
indirectly by extraction from substances of natural origin, or
independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of
extraction and chemical synthesis, or any entity engaged in the
packaging, repackaging, labeling, relabeling, or distribution of
prescription drugs. This term does not include pharmacists licensed
under this chapter, or pharmacy operations of any integrated delivery
system undertaken for the benefit of patients obtaining care through
that system.
(e) "Pharmaceutical marketer" means a person, agent, or
representative who, while employed by or under contract to represent a
pharmaceutical manufacturing company, engages in pharmaceutical
detailing, promotional activities, or other marketing of prescription
drugs in this state to any entity or person authorized to prescribe,
dispense, or purchase prescription drugs in this state.
(f) "Pharmacy benefit manager" means a person or business entity
that administers or otherwise assists with prescription drug benefit
services including formulary management, rebates, discounted pharmacy
network, mail service pharmacies, and electronic claims processing.
Such services may be provided on behalf of a health insurer, an
employer-sponsored health benefit plan, or an agency of the state.
(2) On or before January 1st of each year, every pharmaceutical
manufacturing company must disclose to the board the value, nature, and
purpose of any gift, fee, or payment made to any person or entity
licensed under Title 18 RCW who is authorized to prescribe or dispense
prescription drugs, hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, health
benefit plan administrator, group purchasing organization or pharmacy
benefit manager, or other entity authorized to purchase prescription
drugs in this state. For the purpose of this section, disclosure
includes any subsidy or other economic benefit provided in connection
with detailing, promotional, or other marketing activities by the
company directly or through its pharmaceutical marketers. Disclosure
must include both direct payments made by the company, as well as
indirect payments made through any other entity at the direction of or
with the implied or express knowledge of the company. Disclosure must
include the names of all persons or entities receiving the gift, fee,
or payment and be made in electronic format in a manner prescribed by
the board. Initial disclosure must be made on or before January 1,
2005, for the twelve-month period ending June 30, 2004. The board must
provide to the office of the attorney general complete access to the
information required to be disclosed and report annually on the
disclosures made under this section to the legislature and the governor
on or before March 1st.
(3) Each company subject to the provisions of this section must
also disclose to the board, on or before October 1, 2003, and annually
thereafter, the name and address of the individual responsible for the
company's compliance with the provisions of this section.
(4) The following are exempt from disclosure:
(a) Free samples of prescription drugs intended to be distributed
to patients; and
(b) Any gift, fee, payment, subsidy, or other economic benefit the
value of which in the aggregate to any entity including all of its
employees is less than twenty-five dollars.
(5) The attorney general may bring an action in Thurston county
superior court for injunctive relief, costs, and attorneys' fees, and
to impose on a pharmaceutical manufacturing company that fails to
disclose as required by subsection (2) of this section a civil penalty
of not more than ten thousand dollars per violation. Each unlawful
failure to disclose constitutes a separate violation.
(6) The board may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act may be known and cited as the
prescription drug marketing and disclosure act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---