BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the
marauding dog protection act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature finds that during the period
of March 1, 2002, through July 31, 2002, two hundred eighty dogs were
impounded by the animal control unit in Snohomish county. It is the
purpose of this act to better protect the residents of this state and
their animals and property. The legislature intends to require the
sheriff or any deputy sheriff to kill any dog without an identification
tag running at large after August 1st of any year and before March 1st
of the following year.

Sec. 3 RCW 16.08.070 and 2002 c 244 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout ((RCW 16.08.070 through 16.08.100)) this
chapter.
(1) "Potentially dangerous dog" or "marauding dog" means any dog
that when unprovoked: (a) Inflicts bites on a human or a domestic
animal either on public or private property, or (b) chases or
approaches a person upon the streets, sidewalks, or any public grounds
in a menacing fashion or apparent attitude of attack, or any dog with
a known propensity, tendency, or disposition to attack unprovoked, to
cause injury, or to cause injury or otherwise to threaten the safety of
humans or domestic animals.
(2) "Dangerous dog" means any dog that (a) inflicts severe injury
on a human being without provocation on public or private property, (b)
kills a domestic animal without provocation while the dog is off the
owner's property, or (c) has been previously found to be potentially
dangerous because of injury inflicted on a human, the owner having
received notice of such and the dog again aggressively bites, attacks,
or endangers the safety of humans.
(3) "Severe injury" means any physical injury that results in
broken bones or disfiguring lacerations requiring multiple sutures or
cosmetic surgery.
(4) "Proper enclosure of a dangerous dog" means, while on the
owner's property, a dangerous dog shall be securely confined indoors or
in a securely enclosed and locked pen or structure, suitable to prevent
the entry of young children and designed to prevent the animal from
escaping. Such pen or structure shall have secure sides and a secure
top, and shall also provide protection from the elements for the dog.
(5) "Animal control authority" means an entity acting alone or in
concert with other local governmental units for enforcement of the
animal control laws of the city, county, and state and the shelter and
welfare of animals.
(6) "Animal control officer" means any individual employed,
contracted with, or appointed by the animal control authority for the
purpose of aiding in the enforcement of this chapter or any other law
or ordinance relating to the licensure of animals, control of animals,
or seizure and impoundment of animals, and includes any state or local
law enforcement officer or other employee whose duties in whole or in
part include assignments that involve the seizure and impoundment of
any animal.
(7) "Owner" means any person, firm, corporation, organization, or
department possessing, harboring, keeping, having an interest in, or
having control or custody of an animal.
(8) "Stray" means any domesticated dog wandering unattended and
without identification in any public area.

Sec. 4 RCW 16.08.030 and 1929 c 198 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It ((shall be)) is the duty of any person owning or keeping any
dog or dogs ((which shall be)) found killing any domestic animal to
kill ((such)) that dog or those dogs within forty-eight hours after
being notified of that fact, and any person failing or neglecting to
comply with ((the provisions of)) this section ((shall be deemed)) is
guilty of a misdemeanor((, and)).
(2)(a) It ((shall be)) is the duty of the sheriff or any deputy
sheriff to kill any dog found running at large ((())after the first day
of August of any year and before the first day of March in the
following year(())) without a metal identification tag.
(b) It is the duty of the sheriff or any deputy sheriff to kill any
marauding dog or stray, but the stray dog may only be killed if it is
demonstrating a propensity, tendency, or disposition to attack
unprovoked.

--- END ---