BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.631 and 1984 c 209 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
If an offender violates any condition or requirement of a sentence,
a community corrections officer or law enforcement officer may arrest
or cause the arrest of the offender without a warrant, pending a
determination by the court. If there is reasonable cause to believe
that an offender has violated a condition or requirement of the
sentence, a community corrections officer or law enforcement officer
may require an offender ((may be required)) to submit to a search and
seizure of the offender's person, residence, automobile, or other
personal property. A community corrections officer or law enforcement
officer may also arrest an offender for any crime committed in his or
her presence. The facts and circumstances of the conduct of the
offender shall be reported by the assigned community corrections
officer, with recommendations, to the court.
If a community corrections officer or law enforcement officer
arrests or causes the arrest of an offender under this section, the
offender shall be confined and detained in the county jail of the
county in which the offender was taken into custody, and the sheriff of
that county shall receive and keep in the county jail, where room is
available, all prisoners delivered to the jail by the community
corrections officer, and such offenders shall not be released from
custody on bail or personal recognizance, except upon approval of the
court, pursuant to a written order.

--- END ---