BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.50.839 and 1994 c 234 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In consultation with eligible community and technical colleges,
the college board shall set priorities and guidelines for the program.
(2) ((Under this section, a college shall not receive more than
four faculty grants in twenty-five thousand dollar increments, with a
maximum total of one hundred thousand dollars per campus in any
biennium.
(3))) All community and technical colleges and their foundations
shall be eligible for matching trust funds. When they can match the
state funds with equal cash donations from private sources,
institutions and foundations may apply to the college board for grants
from the fund in ((twenty-five)) ten thousand dollar increments up to
a maximum ((of one hundred thousand dollars when they can match the
state funds with equal cash donations from private sources, except that
in the initial year of the program, no college or foundation may
receive more than one grant until every college or its foundation has
received one grant)) set by the college board. These donations shall
be made specifically to the exceptional faculty awards program and
deposited by the institution or foundation in a local endowment fund or
a foundation's fund. Otherwise unrestricted gifts may be deposited in
the endowment fund by the institution or foundation.
(((4))) (3) Once sufficient private donations are received by the
institution or foundation, the institution shall inform the college
board and request state matching funds. The college board shall
evaluate the request for state matching funds based on program
priorities and guidelines. The college board may ask the state
treasurer to release the state matching funds to a local endowment fund
established by the institution or a foundation's fund established by a
foundation for each faculty award created.
(((5))) (4) A college, by action of its board of trustees, may
transfer those exceptional faculty award funds accumulated in its local
endowment fund between July 1, 1991, and July 25, 1993, to its
foundation's local endowment fund established as provided in subsection
(((3))) (2) of this section.

--- END ---