BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds a fundamental
difference between providing certain health care services to inmates
who are under a sentence of death after initial appellate review and
providing such services to inmates who have been sentenced to life or
to a lesser term or whose death sentence is under initial appellate
review. The people of Washington state should not be required to
provide or pay for health care services not otherwise constitutionally
required for inmates who have had final disposition of at least one
appeal and are under a sentence of death or whose death sentence is
under additional appellate review.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 72.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(l) For an inmate who has had final disposition of at least one
appeal and is under a sentence of death or whose death sentence is
under additional appellate review, the department may provide basic,
nonemergency health care services, including administration of
medication necessary for pain relief or to prevent infection or
contagion, but shall not use any public funds to provide a life-saving
health care procedure. The department may, however, provide procedures
such as cardiopulmonary resuscitation, the Heimlich maneuver, and other
similar, basic emergency life-saving procedures.
(2) For purposes of this section, the term "life-saving health care
procedure" means a medical or surgical treatment or intervention to
sustain, restore, or replace a bodily function, where failure to
perform the treatment or intervention may result in the inmate's death.
This term includes, but is not limited to, open-heart surgery, organ
transplants, bone marrow transplants, and chemotherapy.
(3) The inmate shall be responsible for the costs of any health
care services obtained or provided unless the provision of the health
care service is otherwise required by law as determined to be binding
upon the state of Washington by a court of competent jurisdiction.
Under the authority granted under RCW 72.01.050(2), the secretary shall
direct the superintendent to collect the amount due directly from the
offender's institution account. If the balance of the account is
insufficient to meet the costs of the health care services provided,
the department may obtain a judgment and may obtain a lien on any real
property owned by the offender. The inmate shall be provided due
process to defend against the lien before the department may enforce
the judgment against any real property owned by the inmate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---