BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the 1975
legislature unambiguously stated that any felony, including assault,
can be a predicate offense for felony murder. The intent was clear to
punish, under the applicable murder statutes, persons who commit a
homicide in the course and in furtherance of a felony. The legislature
reaffirms that original intent and further intends to endorse the
decisions of the supreme court over the past twenty-eight years
correctly interpreting "in furtherance of" as requiring the death to be
sufficiently close in time and proximity to the predicate felony. The
legislature does not agree with or accept the court's findings of
legislative intent in State v. Andress, Docket No. 71170-4 (October 24,
2002), and reasserts that assault has always been and still remains a
predicate offense for felony murder in the second degree under the
statute. To prevent a misconstruction of the legislature's original
intent and the law, the legislature finds in light of State v. Andress,
Docket No. 71170-4 (October 24, 2002), that it is necessary to add
language to RCW 9A.32.050 in order to make the original meaning of the
statute and the intent of the legislature as clear as possible. This
language is intended to be instructive in nature. The legislature
urges the supreme court to apply this interpretation retroactively to
July 1, 1976.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.32.050 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 38 s 4 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of murder in the second degree when:
(a) With intent to cause the death of another person but without
premeditation, he or she causes the death of such person or of a third
person; or
(b) He or she commits or attempts to commit any felony, including
assault, other than those enumerated in RCW 9A.32.030(1)(c), and, in
the course of and in furtherance of such crime or in immediate flight
therefrom, he or she, or another participant, causes the death of a
person other than one of the participants; except that in any
prosecution under this subdivision (1)(b) in which the defendant was
not the only participant in the underlying crime, if established by the
defendant by a preponderance of the evidence, it is a defense that the
defendant:
(i) Did not commit the homicidal act or in any way solicit,
request, command, importune, cause, or aid the commission thereof; and
(ii) Was not armed with a deadly weapon, or any instrument,
article, or substance readily capable of causing death or serious
physical injury; and
(iii) Had no reasonable grounds to believe that any other
participant was armed with such a weapon, instrument, article, or
substance; and
(iv) Had no reasonable grounds to believe that any other
participant intended to engage in conduct likely to result in death or
serious physical injury.
(2) Murder in the second degree is a class A felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---