BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the littering of
potentially dangerous products poses a greater danger to the public
safety than other classes of litter. Broken glass, human waste, and
other dangerous materials along roadways, within parking lots, and on
pedestrian, bicycle, and recreation trails elevates the risk to public
safety, such as vehicle tire punctures, and the risk to the community
volunteers who spend their time gathering and properly disposing of the
litter left behind by others. As such, the legislature finds that a
higher penalty should be imposed on those who improperly dispose of
potentially dangerous products, such as is imposed on those who
improperly dispose of tobacco products.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.93.030 and 2000 c 154 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((As used in)) The definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter unless the context ((indicates)) clearly requires
otherwise((:)).
(1) "Conveyance" means a boat, airplane, or vehicle((;)).
(2) "Department" means the department of ecology((;)).
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of
ecology((;)).
(4) "Disposable package or container" means all packages or
containers defined as such by rules ((and regulations)) adopted by the
department of ecology((;)).
(5) "Junk vehicle" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
46.55.010((;)).
(6) "Litter" means all waste material including but not limited to
disposable packages or containers thrown or deposited as herein
prohibited and solid waste that is illegally dumped, but not including
the wastes of the primary processes of mining, logging, sawmilling,
farming, or manufacturing((;)). "Litter" includes the material
described in subsection (10) of this section as "potentially dangerous
litter."
(7) "Litter bag" means a bag, sack, or other container made of any
material which is large enough to serve as a receptacle for litter
inside the vehicle or watercraft of any person. It is not necessarily
limited to the state approved litter bag but must be similar in size
and capacity((;)).
(8) "Litter receptacle" means those containers adopted by the
department of ecology and which may be standardized as to size, shape,
capacity, and color and which shall bear the state anti-litter symbol,
as well as any other receptacles suitable for the depositing of
litter((;)).
(9) "Person" means any political subdivision, government agency,
municipality, industry, public or private corporation, copartnership,
association, firm, individual, or other entity whatsoever((;)).
(10) "Potentially dangerous litter" means litter that is likely to
injure a person or cause damage to a vehicle or other property.
"Potentially dangerous litter" includes, but is not limited to:
(a) Cigarettes, cigars, or other tobacco products that are capable
of starting a fire;
(b) Glass;
(c) A container or other product made predominantly or entirely of
glass;
(d) A hypodermic needle or other medical instrument designed to cut
or pierce;
(e) Raw human waste, including soiled baby diapers, regardless of
whether or not the waste is in a container of any sort; and
(f) Nails or tacks.
(11) "Public place" means any area that is used or held out for use
by the public whether owned or operated by public or private
interests((;)).
(((11))) (12) "Recycling" means transforming or remanufacturing
waste materials into a finished product for use other than landfill
disposal or incineration((;)).
(((12))) (13) "Recycling center" means a central collection point
for recyclable materials((;)).
(((13))) (14) "To litter" means a single or cumulative act of
disposing of litter((;)).
(((14))) (15) "Vehicle" includes every device capable of being
moved upon a public highway and in, upon, or by which any persons or
property is or may be transported or drawn upon a public highway,
excepting devices moved by human or animal power or used exclusively
upon stationary rails or tracks((;)).
(((15))) (16) "Waste reduction" means reducing the amount or
toxicity of waste generated or reusing materials((;)).
(((16))) (17) "Watercraft" means any boat, ship, vessel, barge, or
other floating craft.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.93.060 and 2002 c 175 s 45 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is a violation of this section to abandon a junk vehicle
upon any property. In addition, no person shall throw, drop, deposit,
discard, or otherwise dispose of litter upon any public property in the
state or upon private property in this state not owned by him or her or
in the waters of this state whether from a vehicle or otherwise
including but not limited to any public highway, public park, beach,
campground, forest land, recreational area, trailer park, highway,
road, street, or alley except:
(a) When the property is designated by the state or its agencies or
political subdivisions for the disposal of garbage and refuse, and the
person is authorized to use such property for that purpose;
(b) Into a litter receptacle in a manner that will prevent litter
from being carried away or deposited by the elements upon any part of
the private or public property or waters.
(2)(a) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, it is
a class 3 civil infraction as provided in RCW 7.80.120 for a person to
litter in an amount less than or equal to one cubic foot.
(b) It is a misdemeanor for a person to litter in an amount greater
than one cubic foot but less than one cubic yard. The person shall
also pay a litter cleanup restitution payment equal to twice the actual
cost of cleanup, or fifty dollars per cubic foot of litter, whichever
is greater. The court shall distribute one-half of the restitution
payment to the landowner and one-half of the restitution payment to the
law enforcement agency investigating the incident. The court may, in
addition to or in lieu of part or all of the cleanup restitution
payment, order the person to pick up and remove litter from the
property, with prior permission of the legal owner or, in the case of
public property, of the agency managing the property. The court may
suspend or modify the litter cleanup restitution payment for a first-time offender under this section, if the person cleans up and properly
disposes of the litter.
(c) It is a gross misdemeanor for a person to litter in an amount
of one cubic yard or more. The person shall also pay a litter cleanup
restitution payment equal to twice the actual cost of cleanup, or one
hundred dollars per cubic foot of litter, whichever is greater. The
court shall distribute one-half of the restitution payment to the
landowner and one-half of the restitution payment to the law
enforcement agency investigating the incident. The court may, in
addition to or in lieu of part or all of the cleanup restitution
payment, order the person to pick up and remove litter from the
property, with prior permission of the legal owner or, in the case of
public property, of the agency managing the property. The court may
suspend or modify the litter cleanup restitution payment for a first-time offender under this section, if the person cleans up and properly
disposes of the litter.
(d) If a junk vehicle is abandoned in violation of this section,
RCW 46.55.230 governs the vehicle's removal, disposal, and sale, and
the penalties that may be imposed against the person who abandoned the
vehicle.
(3) If the violation occurs in a state park, the court shall, in
addition to any other penalties assessed, order the person to perform
twenty-four hours of community restitution in the state park where the
violation occurred if the state park has stated an intent to
participate as provided in RCW 79A.05.050.
(4) It is a class 1 civil infraction as provided in RCW 7.80.120
for a person to discard, in violation of this section, ((a cigarette,
cigar, or other tobacco product that is capable of starting a fire))
potentially dangerous litter in any amount.

Sec. 4 RCW 7.80.120 and 1997 c 159 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person found to have committed a civil infraction shall be
assessed a monetary penalty.
(a) The maximum penalty and the default amount for a class 1 civil
infraction shall be two hundred fifty dollars, not including statutory
assessments, except for an infraction of state law involving ((tobacco
products)) potentially dangerous litter as specified in RCW
70.93.060(4), in which case the maximum penalty and default amount is
five hundred dollars;
(b) The maximum penalty and the default amount for a class 2 civil
infraction shall be one hundred twenty-five dollars, not including
statutory assessments;
(c) The maximum penalty and the default amount for a class 3 civil
infraction shall be fifty dollars, not including statutory assessments;
and
(d) The maximum penalty and the default amount for a class 4 civil
infraction shall be twenty-five dollars, not including statutory
assessments.
(2) The supreme court shall prescribe by rule the conditions under
which local courts may exercise discretion in assessing fines for civil
infractions.
(3) Whenever a monetary penalty is imposed by a court under this
chapter it is immediately payable. If the person is unable to pay at
that time the court may grant an extension of the period in which the
penalty may be paid. If the penalty is not paid on or before the time
established for payment, the court may proceed to collect the penalty
in the same manner as other civil judgments and may notify the
prosecuting authority of the failure to pay.
(4) The court may also order a person found to have committed a
civil infraction to make restitution.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.93.100 and 1981 c 260 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall design and produce a litter bag bearing the
statewide anti-litter symbol and a statement of the penalties
prescribed herein for littering in this state. Such litter bags shall
be distributed by the department of licensing at no charge to the owner
of every licensed vehicle in this state at the time and place of
license renewal. The department of ecology shall make such litter bags
available to the owners of water craft in this state and shall also
provide such litter bags at no charge at points of entry into this
state and at visitor centers to the operators of incoming vehicles and
watercraft. ((The owner of any vehicle or watercraft who fails to keep
and use a litter bag in his vehicle or watercraft shall be guilty of a
violation of this section and shall be subject to a fine as provided in
this chapter.))

Sec. 6 RCW 46.61.645 and 1965 ex.s. c 155 s 77 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) ((No person shall throw or deposit upon any highway any glass
bottle, glass, nails, tacks, wire, cans or any other substance likely
to injure any person, animal or vehicle upon such highway.
(2))) Any person who drops, or permits to be dropped or thrown,
upon any highway any ((destructive or injurious)) material shall
immediately remove the same or cause it to be removed.
(((3))) (2) Any person removing a wrecked or damaged vehicle from
a highway shall remove any glass or other injurious substance dropped
upon the highway from such vehicle.

--- END ---