BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 54.16 RCW
to read as follows:
A public utility district located within a county that has a
contiguous border with the state of Oregon and a population of three
hundred forty thousand or more that provides electrical, water, and
sewer service to its customers may operate an electrical appliance
repair service.

--- END ---