BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 73.04.110 and 1987 c 98 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person who is a veteran as defined in RCW 41.04.005 who submits
to the department of licensing satisfactory proof of a service-connected disability rating from the veterans administration or the
military service from which the veteran was discharged and:
(1) Has lost the use of both hands or one foot;
(2) Was captured and incarcerated for more than twenty-nine days by
an enemy of the United States during a period of war with the United
States;
(3) Has become blind in both eyes as the result of military
service; or
(4) Is rated by the veterans administration or the military service
from which the veteran was discharged and is receiving service-connected compensation at the one hundred percent rate that is expected
to exist for more than one year;
is entitled to regular or special license plates issued by the
department of licensing. The special license plates shall bear
distinguishing marks, letters, or numerals indicating that the motor
vehicle is owned by a disabled veteran or former prisoner of war. This
license shall be issued annually for one personal use vehicle without
payment of any license fees or excise tax thereon. Whenever any person
who has been issued license plates under the provisions of this section
applies to the department for transfer of the plates to a subsequently
acquired motor vehicle, a transfer fee of five dollars shall be charged
in addition to all other appropriate fees. The department may
periodically verify the one hundred percent rate as provided in
subsection (4) of this section.
Any person who has been issued free motor vehicle license plates
under this section prior to July 1, 1983, shall continue to be eligible
for the annual free license plates.
For the purposes of this section, "blind" means the definition of
"blind" used by the state of Washington in determining eligibility for
financial assistance to the blind under Title 74 RCW.
For purposes of this section, "personal use vehicle" means any
vehicle used solely for personal purposes, including vehicles subject
to RCW 46.16.070 if the vehicle is not used for commercial purposes.
Any unauthorized use of a special plate is a gross misdemeanor.

--- END ---