BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.32.050 and 1963 c 4 s 36.32.050 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided under subsection (2) of this section, county
commissioners shall be elected by the ((qualified)) registered voters
of the entire county and the person receiving the highest number of
votes for the office of commissioner for the district in which he or
she resides shall be declared duly elected from that district.
(2) In a noncharter county west of the crest of the Cascade
mountains with a population greater than three hundred thousand, the
commissioners shall be elected by commissioner district.

--- END ---