BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.32.155 and 1998 c 191 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When purchasing any hunting license, persons under the age of
eighteen shall present certification of completion of a course of
instruction of at least ten hours in the safe handling of firearms,
safety, conservation, and sportsmanship. Beginning January 1, 1995,
all persons purchasing any hunting license for the first time, if born
after January 1, 1972, shall present such certification.
(2) The director may establish a program for training persons in
the safe handling of firearms, conservation, and sportsmanship and may
cooperate with the National Rifle Association, organized sportsmen's
groups, or other public or private organizations.
(3) The director shall prescribe the type of instruction and the
qualifications of the instructors and the National Rifle Association,
organized sportsmen's groups, or other public or private organizations
may provide the course of instruction in accordance with the type of
instruction and the qualifications of the instructors prescribed by the
director.
(4) Upon successful completion of the course, a trainee shall
receive a hunter education certificate signed by an authorized
instructor. The certificate is evidence of compliance with this
section.
(5) The director may accept certificates from other states that
persons have successfully completed firearm safety, hunter education,
or similar courses as evidence of compliance with this section.
(6) This section does not apply to persons age eighteen and over
who are:
(a) Marshals, sheriffs, prison or jail wardens or their deputies,
or other law enforcement officers of this state or another state,
whether active or retired;
(b) Members of the armed forces of the United States or of the
national guard or organized reserves, whether active or retired;
(c) Officers or employees of the United States duly authorized to
carry a firearm;
(d) Engaged in the business of manufacturing, repairing, or dealing
in firearms;
(e) Regularly enrolled members of an organization duly authorized
to purchase or receive firearms from the United States or from this
state;
(f) Regularly enrolled members of clubs organized for the purpose
of target shooting; or
(g) Regularly enrolled members of clubs organized for the purpose
of modern and antique firearm collecting.

--- END ---