BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.265 and 1998 c 41 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to any other authority to revoke driving privileges
under this chapter, the department shall revoke all driving privileges
of a juvenile when the department receives notice from a court pursuant
to RCW 9.41.040(5), 13.40.265, 66.44.365, 69.41.065, 69.50.420,
69.52.070, or a substantially similar municipal ordinance adopted by a
local legislative authority, or from a diversion unit pursuant to RCW
13.40.265. The revocation shall be imposed without hearing.
(2) The driving privileges of the juvenile revoked under subsection
(1) of this section shall be revoked in the following manner:
(a) Upon receipt of the first notice, the department shall impose
a revocation for one year, or until the juvenile reaches seventeen
years of age, whichever is longer.
(b) Upon receipt of a second or subsequent notice, the department
shall impose a revocation for two years or until the juvenile reaches
eighteen years of age, whichever is longer.
(c) Each offense for which the department receives notice shall
result in a separate period of revocation. All periods of revocation
imposed under this section that could otherwise overlap shall run
consecutively up to the juvenile's twenty-first birthday, and no period
of revocation imposed under this section shall begin before the
expiration of all other periods of revocation imposed under this
section or other law. Periods of revocation imposed consecutively
under this section shall not extend beyond the juvenile's twenty-first
birthday.
(3)(a) If the department receives notice from a court that the
juvenile's privilege to drive should be reinstated, the department
shall immediately reinstate any driving privileges that have been
revoked under this section if the minimum term of revocation as
specified in RCW 13.40.265(1)(c), 66.44.365(3), 69.41.065(3),
69.50.420(3), 69.52.070(3), or similar ordinance has expired, and
subject to subsection (2)(c) of this section.
(b) The juvenile may seek reinstatement of his or her driving
privileges from the department when the juvenile reaches the age of
twenty-one. A notice from the court reinstating the juvenile's driving
privilege shall not be required if reinstatement is pursuant to this
subsection.
(4)(a) If the department receives notice pursuant to RCW
13.40.265(2)(b) from a diversion unit that a juvenile has completed a
diversion agreement for which the juvenile's driving privileges were
revoked, the department shall reinstate any driving privileges revoked
under this section as provided in (b) of this subsection, subject to
subsection (2)(c) of this section.
(b) If the diversion agreement was for the juvenile's first
violation of chapter 66.44, 69.41, 69.50, or 69.52 RCW, the department
shall not reinstate the juvenile's privilege to drive until the later
of ninety days after the date the juvenile turns sixteen or ninety days
after the juvenile entered into a diversion agreement for the offense.
If the diversion agreement was for the juvenile's second or subsequent
violation of chapter 66.44, 69.41, 69.50, or 69.52 RCW, the department
shall not reinstate the juvenile's privilege to drive until the later
of the date the juvenile turns seventeen or one year after the juvenile
entered into the second or subsequent diversion agreement.

--- END ---