BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there are
significant impacts to existing economies and legally protected land
uses in Skagit county resulting from the current activities involving
the use of a regulatory approach to restore and enhance habitat for
anadromous fisheries within the county. The legislature finds that
while it has authorized regulatory approaches by state and local
governments to protect fish habitat and other critical areas, it has
not required nor authorized regulatory approaches to be taken to
restore or enhance fish habitat.
By contrast, the legislature finds that there are hundreds of acres
primarily outside the dikes within the county under public ownership
primarily under the management control of the department of natural
resources and the department of fish and wildlife that have the
potential to provide equal or greater value as fish habitat that have
not been examined. The purpose of this act is to require a concerted
effort be made to fully use the potential to restore and enhance
fishery habitat on these publicly owned lands as the highest priority.
Further, it is recognized that this effort needs to involve
representatives from a wide spectrum of the public and the involved
agencies, and that it be comprised primarily by people who have first-hand knowledge of the area and who understand its history.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.85 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) A program for restoration and enhancement of salmonid
habitat on publicly owned lands in Skagit county is created. The
program shall be known as the Skagit salmon habitat enhancement
initiative. The purpose of the program is to provide for the
systematic examination of opportunities to enhance habitat for
salmonids on public lands, develop project proposals and priorities,
apply for funding for implementation of projects, and manage the
projects to completion.
(b) The management board created under subsection (2) of this
section shall implement the habitat portion of the plan and is
empowered to receive and disburse funds for the approved salmonid
habitat restoration projects. This management board constitutes the
lead entity and the committee established under RCW 77.85.050
responsible for fulfilling the requirements and exercising powers under
this chapter.
(2)(a) A management board consisting of nine voting members is
created. The members shall consist of one county commissioner selected
by the county legislative authority; one member representing the cities
selected by the cities within the county; a member of the Swinomish
Tribe appointed by the tribal council; one representative of diking or
drainage districts selected by the boards of diking and drainage
districts that contain lands within the county; two members of the
general public appointed by the Skagit county board of commissioners to
include one who represents agricultural interests who resides in the
county and one who represents the environmental community who resides
in the county; a representative of the department of fish and wildlife
appointed by the chair of the state fish and wildlife commission; one
representative appointed by the governor; and a representative of the
department of natural resources appointed by the commissioner of public
lands. The management board may appoint and consult with a technical
advisory committee or consultants to perform work for the management
board.
(b) The chair of the management board shall be elected by the
members of the management board. In making appointments under this
subsection, the county commissioners shall consider recommendations of
interested parties. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as
the original appointments were selected.
(c) No action may be brought or maintained against any management
board member, the management board, or any of its agents, officers, or
employees for any noncontractual acts or omissions in carrying out the
purposes of this section.
(3)(a) The management board shall participate in the review and
development of a restoration and enhancement plan on public lands to
implement its responsibilities under (b) of this subsection. The
management board shall consider local watershed efforts and activities
that pertain to fish habitat enhancement and restoration on public
land. This section does not limit the authority of units of local
government to enter into interlocal agreements under chapter 39.34 RCW
or any other provision of law.
(b) The management board is responsible for implementing the plan.
The management board may not preempt the authority of cities, counties,
or diking and drainage districts. If any plan or project developed by
the management board conflicts with a state law or rule, the management
board shall provide recommendations to the legislature for ways to
address the conflict if the management board believes the project or
plan should move forward.
(c) The management board shall prioritize and approve projects and
programs related to the restoration and enhancement of salmonid
habitat, including seeking funding of those projects and programs
through the salmon recovery funding board, and coordinate local
government efforts as prescribed in the plan. The management board
shall establish criteria for funding projects and programs based upon
their likely value in salmonid restoration. The management board may
consider local economic impact among the criteria.
(d) The management board is encouraged to use state and local
expertise, volunteer groups, interest groups, and affected units of
local government.
(4) The management board may hire and fire staff including an
executive director, enter into contracts, accept grants and other
moneys, disburse funds, pay all necessary expenses, and choose a
fiduciary agent. The management board shall report on its progress on
a quarterly basis to the county legislative authority and state natural
resource-related agencies. The management board shall prepare a final
report at the conclusion of the program describing its efforts and
successes in implementing the habitat restoration plan associated with
restoring and enhancing salmon habitat on publicly owned lands. The
final report shall be transmitted to the appropriate committees of the
legislature, the legislative body of the participating county, and the
state natural resource-related agencies.
(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Enhance" means to increase the quantity or the quality of
available fish habitat.
(b) "Protect" means to maintain the status, to save from loss, or
to prevent further harm to fish habitat. "Protect" includes the no net
loss of fish habitat concept as measured from the current condition.
(c) "Restore" means to bring back to a former position or
condition, to put back or bring back into existence or use, or to bring
back to or put back into a former or original state of fish habitat.
(6) The program terminates July 1, 2006, unless extended by the
legislature.

--- END ---