BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that taxpayer
support of higher education represents an investment in the economic
and social vitality of Washington state over the long term. Benefits
from higher education accrue both to the individuals who choose to
pursue higher learning and to society at large through improving our
schools, our businesses, and our communities.
(2) However, the legislature also finds that public financial
resources will always be in more limited supply than the demands placed
upon them. Increasingly, taxpayers expect a clear connection between
the investment of public funds and the benefits society gains as a
result.
(3) Therefore, it is the policy of the state that a greater focus
of the public investment in higher education be to support educational
and degree programs in priority academic disciplines. Priority
academic disciplines are those that prepare individuals for occupations
necessary for the state's overall economic and social well-being over
the medium and long term. Beginning with the 2003-2005 biennium, it is
the intent of the legislature to begin implementation of this policy at
the four-year institutions of higher education through the state funds
appropriated to each college and university. Thereafter, the
legislature intends to create an ongoing process for reprioritization
of the public investment in higher education.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.80.330 and 1997 c 369 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board shall perform the following planning duties in
consultation with the four-year institutions, the community and
technical college system, and when appropriate the work force training
and education coordinating board, the superintendent of public
instruction, and the independent higher educational institutions:
(1) Develop and establish role and mission statements for each of
the four-year institutions and for the community and technical college
system;
(2) Identify the state's higher education goals, objectives, and
priorities;
(3) Prepare a comprehensive master plan which includes but is not
limited to:
(a) Assessments of the state's higher education needs. These
assessments may include, but are not limited to: The basic and
continuing needs of various age groups; business and industrial needs
for a skilled work force; analyses of demographic, social, and economic
trends; consideration of the changing ethnic composition of the
population and the special needs arising from such trends; college
attendance, retention, and dropout rates, and the needs of recent high
school graduates and placebound adults. The board should consider the
needs of residents of all geographic regions, but its initial
priorities should be applied to heavily populated areas underserved by
public institutions;
(b) Recommendations on enrollment and other policies and actions to
meet those needs;
(c) Guidelines for continuing education, adult education, public
service, and other higher education programs;
(d) Mechanisms through which the state's higher education system
can meet the needs of employers hiring for industrial projects of
statewide significance;
(e) Recommendations developed by the expert committee under section
3 of this act for focusing the public investment in higher education on
support of student enrollment in priority academic disciplines.
The initial plan shall be submitted to the governor and the
legislature by December 1, 1987. Comments on the plan from the board's
advisory committees and the institutions shall be submitted with the
plan.
The plan shall be updated every four years, and presented to the
governor and the appropriate legislative policy committees. Following
public hearings, the legislature shall, by concurrent resolution,
approve or recommend changes to the initial plan, and the updates. The
plan shall then become state higher education policy unless legislation
is enacted to alter the policies set forth in the plan;
(4) Review, evaluate, and make recommendations on operating and
capital budget requests from four-year institutions and the community
and technical college system, based on the elements outlined in
subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section, and on guidelines which
outline the board's fiscal priorities. These guidelines shall be
distributed to the institutions and the community college board by
December of each odd-numbered year. The institutions and the community
college board shall submit an outline of their proposed budgets,
identifying major components, to the board no later than August 1st of
each even-numbered year. The board shall submit recommendations on the
proposed budgets and on the board's budget priorities to the office of
financial management before November 1st of each even-numbered year,
and to the legislature by January 1st of each odd-numbered year;
(5) Institutions and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall submit any supplemental budget requests and revisions to
the board at the same time they are submitted to the office of
financial management. The board shall submit recommendations on the
proposed supplemental budget requests to the office of financial
management by November 1st and to the legislature by January 1st;
(6) Recommend legislation affecting higher education;
(7) Recommend tuition and fees policies and levels based on
comparisons with peer institutions;
(8) Establish priorities and develop recommendations on financial
aid based on comparisons with peer institutions;
(9) Prepare recommendations on merging or closing institutions; and
(10) Develop criteria for identifying the need for new
baccalaureate institutions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In preparing the comprehensive master plan, the higher
education coordinating board shall convene an expert committee to
analyze supply and demand for college and university graduates in
Washington state. The committee shall be made up of labor market
economists, economic forecasters, business and community leaders,
college faculty and administrators, and other individuals with
experience examining local, regional, and state educational and
employment needs.
(2) Using a planning horizon of five to ten years into the future,
the expert committee shall examine available data regarding supply and
demand for college and university graduates in Washington state and
identify possible gaps that could be addressed by reprioritizing the
public funds that support higher education. Supply data includes
number and type of degrees awarded by public colleges and universities,
patterns of student enrollment in major academic disciplines, and
patterns of postgraduation employment by individuals previously
enrolled in public colleges and universities. Demand data includes
forecasted job openings and employer demand for college and university
graduates in particular occupations, both statewide and by major region
of the state. The committee shall also consider expert testimony,
business projections, economic forecasts, regional factors, and other
relevant information. Within available funds, the committee may
contract for independent research to expand the data available for its
consideration.
(3) As a result of its deliberations, the committee shall make
specific recommendations to expand capacity and student enrollment in
priority academic disciplines where the committee expects greater
demand than supply of qualified graduates statewide or in a major
region of the state. The committee shall make its recommendations
specific enough, including by discipline area and by institution, to
guide reallocation of public funds for higher education in support of
the priority academic disciplines. After adoption by the committee,
the recommendations shall become part of the state comprehensive master
plan for higher education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Within the general fund--state
appropriation provided in the 2003-2005 biennial operating budget, the
University of Washington shall reallocate at least $3,996,000 for
fiscal year 2004 and at least $3,996,000 for fiscal year 2005 to
provide additional student enrollments and enrollment capacity in
priority academic disciplines identified in subsection (7) of this
section.
(2) Within the general fund--state appropriation provided in the
2003-2005 biennial operating budget, Washington State University shall
reallocate at least $1,685,000 for fiscal year 2004 and at least
$1,685,000 for fiscal year 2005 to provide additional student
enrollments and enrollment capacity in priority academic disciplines
identified in subsection (7) of this section.
(3) Within the general fund--state appropriation provided in the
2003-2005 biennial operating budget, Eastern Washington University
shall reallocate at least $587,000 for fiscal year 2004 and at least
$587,000 for fiscal year 2005 to provide additional student enrollments
and enrollment capacity in priority academic disciplines identified in
subsection (7) of this section.
(4) Within the general fund--state appropriation provided in the
2003-2005 biennial operating budget, Central Washington University
shall reallocate at least $643,000 for fiscal year 2004 and at least
$643,000 for fiscal year 2005 to provide additional student enrollments
and enrollment capacity in priority academic disciplines identified in
subsection (7) of this section.
(5) Within the general fund--state appropriation provided in the
2003-2005 biennial operating budget, Western Washington University
shall reallocate at least $712,000 for fiscal year 2004 and at least
$712,000 for fiscal year 2005 to provide additional student enrollments
and enrollment capacity in priority academic disciplines identified in
subsection (7) of this section.
(6) Within the general fund--state appropriation provided in the
2003-2005 biennial operating budget, The Evergreen State College shall
reallocate at least $166,000 for fiscal year 2004 and at least $166,000
for fiscal year 2005 to provide additional student enrollments and
enrollment capacity in priority academic disciplines identified in
subsection (7) of this section.
(7) For fiscal years 2004 and 2005, the priority academic
disciplines receiving the funding reallocation shall be health
sciences, technology, educator preparation, and engineering.
Washington State University may also reallocate funds to support
veterinary medicine. Each institution may choose how much of the
reallocation each priority academic discipline receives and is not
required to reallocate funds to every discipline.
(8) Within the priority academic disciplines, the institutions
shall focus on expanding capacity in upper division and graduate
courses for degrees in occupational fields where employers are
experiencing difficulty finding enough qualified graduates to fill
available jobs. The institutions shall use the reallocated funds to
hire additional faculty, add courses or course sections, or take other
actions necessary to expand enrollment capacity.
(9) The amounts reallocated under this section shall supplement but
not supplant the institutions' existing allocation of moneys from the
general fund--state or any other revenue source for instruction or
support of the priority academic disciplines.
(10) By December 1, 2004, the institutions shall report the results
of the funding reallocation to the legislature, including but not
limited to the number of additional students enrolled, additional
courses or faculty provided, and a description of the overall impact of
the reallocation. The reports shall provide evidence that the
institutions did not supplant existing funding for the priority
academic disciplines, but used the reallocation to expand enrollment
capacity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) A task force on reprioritizing the
public investment in higher education is established. The task force
shall consist of sixteen members, as follows:
(a) Two members from each major caucus of the senate, appointed by
the president of the senate, including one member appointed to serve as
cochair of the task force;
(b) Two members from each major caucus of the house of
representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives, including one member appointed to serve as cochair of
the task force;
(c) Three members representing the community and technical
colleges, including one member representing the state board for
community and technical colleges, appointed jointly by the president of
the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives;
(d) Three members representing public four-year institutions of
higher education, including one member representing the higher
education coordinating board, appointed jointly by the president of the
senate and the speaker of the house of representatives;
(e) Two members representing the business community in the state,
appointed jointly by the president of the senate and the speaker of the
house of representatives.
(2) The task force shall examine the following issues:
(a) Options for funding mechanisms and processes that will
systematically and on an ongoing basis focus the public investment in
higher education to support priority academic disciplines as identified
by the expert committee established by this act.
(b) Options for phasing in the reallocation of funds toward
priority academic disciplines, including the feasibility of expanding
the reallocation process to include the community and technical
colleges.
(c) Options for ongoing monitoring and accountability of the
reallocation and its outcomes to ensure legislative objectives are
being met.
(3) The task force shall use legislative facilities and staff from
senate committee services and the office of program research. Staff
from the state board for community and technical colleges and the
higher education coordinating board shall provide additional assistance
and information where necessary.
(4) Each nonlegislative member of the task force shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060. With the exception of staff assistance from the state board
for community and technical colleges or the higher education
coordinating board, all expenses of the task force, including travel,
shall be paid jointly by the senate and the house of representatives.
(5) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to
the legislature by December 15, 2003.
(6) This section expires July 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---