BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Retired or disabled school district and educational service
district employees, or retired state employees, who are receiving a
retirement allowance under chapter 41.32 or 41.40 RCW as of September
30, 1993, and their dependents may purchase health care insurance
coverage from the authority under terms and conditions established by
this chapter and by the board.
(2) Retired or disabled school district and educational service
district employees, or retired state employees, who began receiving a
retirement allowance under chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW on or
after October 1, 1993, may enroll in benefit plans under the authority
during annual enrollment periods established by the board, with
demonstrated continuous employer group medical coverage from the time
they became retired or disabled.
(3) Retired or disabled school district and educational service
district employees, or retired state employees, and their dependents
shall pay the cost of premiums for the insurance offered by the
authority and any surcharge imposed by the board. The authority shall
charge as premiums, the cost to the authority of providing insurance
coverage for retired or disabled school district and educational
service district employees, or retired state employees, and their
dependents, including any amounts necessary for reserves and
administration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---