BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.28.161 and 2002 c 249 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person may engage in the electrical construction trade
without having a valid master journeyman electrician certificate of
competency, journeyman electrician certificate of competency, master
specialty electrician certificate of competency, or specialty
electrician certificate of competency issued by the department in
accordance with this chapter. Electrician certificate of competency
specialties include, but are not limited to: Residential, pump and
irrigation, limited energy system, signs, nonresidential maintenance,
restricted nonresidential maintenance, and appliance repair.
(2) A person who is indentured in an apprenticeship program
approved under chapter 49.04 RCW for the electrical construction trade
or who is learning the electrical construction trade may work in the
electrical construction trade if supervised by a certified master
journeyman electrician, journeyman electrician, master specialty
electrician in that electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician
in that electrician's specialty. All apprentices and individuals
learning the electrical construction trade shall obtain an electrical
training certificate from the department. The certificate shall
authorize the holder to learn the electrical construction trade while
under the direct supervision of a master journeyman electrician,
journeyman electrician, master specialty electrician working in that
electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician working in that
electrician's specialty. The holder of the electrical training
certificate shall renew the certificate biennially. At the time of
renewal, the holder shall provide the department with an accurate list
of the holder's employers in the electrical construction industry for
the previous biennial period and the number of hours worked for each
employer. A biennial fee shall be charged for the issuance or renewal
of the certificate. The department shall set the fee by rule. The fee
shall cover but not exceed the cost of administering and enforcing the
trainee certification and supervision requirements of this chapter.
Apprentices and individuals learning the electrical construction trade
shall have their electrical training certificates in their possession
at all times that they are performing electrical work. They shall show
their certificates to an authorized representative of the department at
the representative's request.
(3) Any person who has been issued an electrical training
certificate under this chapter may work if that person is under
supervision. Supervision shall consist of a person being on the same
job site and under the control of either a certified master journeyman
electrician, journeyman electrician, master specialty electrician
working in that electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician
working in that electrician's specialty.
For individuals employed by a general electrical contractor
performing nonresidential installations, either a master journeyman
electrician or journeyman electrician shall be on the same job site as
the noncertified individual for a minimum of one hundred percent of
each working day for the first four thousand hours and seventy-five
percent of each working day for all hours thereafter.
For other individuals, either a certified master journeyman
electrician, journeyman electrician, master specialty electrician
working in that electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician
working in that electrician's specialty shall be on the same job site
as the noncertified individual for a minimum of seventy-five percent of
each working day unless otherwise provided in this chapter.
(4) The ratio of noncertified individuals to certified master
journeymen electricians, journeymen electricians, master specialty
electricians, or specialty electricians on any one job site is as
follows:
(a) When working as a specialty electrician, not more than two
noncertified individuals for every certified master specialty
electrician working in that electrician's specialty, specialty
electrician working in that electrician's specialty, master journeyman
electrician, or journeyman electrician, except that the ratio
requirements are one certified master specialty electrician working in
that electrician's specialty, specialty electrician working in that
electrician's specialty, master journeyman electrician, or journeyman
electrician working as a specialty electrician to no more than four
students enrolled in and working as part of an electrical construction
program at public community or technical colleges, or not-for-profit
nationally accredited trade or technical schools licensed by the work
force training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10
RCW. In meeting the ratio requirements for students enrolled in an
electrical construction program at a trade school, a trade school may
receive input and advice from the electrical board; and
(b) When working as a journeyman electrician, not more than one
noncertified individual for every certified master journeyman
electrician or journeyman electrician, except that the ratio
requirements shall be one certified master journeyman electrician or
journeyman electrician to no more than four students enrolled in and
working as part of an electrical construction program at public
community or technical colleges, or not-for-profit nationally
accredited trade or technical schools licensed by the work force
training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW. In
meeting the ratio requirements for students enrolled in an electrical
construction program at a trade school, a trade school may receive
input and advice from the electrical board.
An individual who has a current training certificate and who has
successfully completed or is currently enrolled in an approved
apprenticeship program or in an electrical construction program at
public community or technical colleges, or not-for-profit nationally
accredited technical or trade schools licensed by the work force
training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW, may
work without direct on-site supervision during the last six months of
meeting the practical experience requirements of this chapter.
(5) For the residential (as specified in WAC 296-46A-930(2)(a)),
pump and irrigation (as specified in WAC 296-46A-930(2)(b)(i)), sign
(as specified in WAC 296-46A-930(2)(c)), limited energy (as specified
in WAC 296-46A-930(2)(e)(i)), nonresidential maintenance (as specified
in WAC 296-46A-930(2)(f)(i)), restricted nonresidential maintenance as
determined by the department in rule, or other new nonresidential
specialties, not including appliance repair, as determined by the
department in rule, either a master journeyman electrician, journeyman
electrician, master specialty electrician working in that electrician's
specialty, or specialty electrician working in that electrician's
specialty must be on the same job site as the noncertified individual
for a minimum of seventy-five percent of each working day. Other
specialties must meet the requirements specified in RCW
19.28.191(1)(f)(ii). When the ratio of certified electricians to
noncertified individuals on a job site is one certified electrician to
three or four noncertified individuals, the certified electrician must:
(a) Directly supervise and instruct the noncertified individuals
and the certified electrician may not directly make or engage in an
electrical installation; and
(b) Be on the same job site as the noncertified individual for a
minimum of one hundred percent of each working day.
(6) The electrical contractor shall accurately verify and attest to
the electrical trainee hours worked by electrical trainees on behalf of
the electrical contractor.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.28.271 and 2001 c 211 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, corporation,
or other entity to employ an individual for purposes of RCW 19.28.161
through 19.28.271 who has not been issued a certificate of competency
or a training certificate. It is unlawful for any individual to engage
in the electrical construction trade or to maintain or install any
electrical equipment or conductors without having in his or her
possession a certificate of competency or a training certificate under
RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271. Any person, firm, partnership,
corporation, or other entity found in violation of RCW 19.28.161
through 19.28.271 shall be assessed a penalty of not less than fifty
dollars or more than five hundred dollars. The department shall set by
rule a schedule of penalties for violating RCW 19.28.161 through
19.28.271. An appeal may be made to the board as is provided in RCW
19.28.131. The appeal shall be filed within twenty days after the
notice of the penalty is given to the assessed party by certified mail,
return receipt requested, sent to the last known address of the
assessed party and shall be made by filing a written notice of appeal
with the department. Any equipment maintained or installed by any
person who does not possess a certificate of competency under RCW
19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall not receive an electrical work permit
and electrical service shall not be connected or maintained to operate
the equipment. Each day that a person, firm, partnership, corporation,
or other entity violates RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 is a separate
violation.
(2) A civil penalty shall be collected in a civil action brought by
the attorney general in the county wherein the alleged violation arose
at the request of the department if any of RCW 19.28.161 through
19.28.271 or any rules adopted under RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271
are violated.
(3) Electrical trainees, who are directed by their employers to
work unsupervised or who are left unsupervised by their employers, are
not subject to fines levied by the department.

--- END ---