BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29.13.070 and 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 29 are each amended
to read as follows:
Nominating primaries for general elections to be held in November
((shall)) must be held at the regular polling places in each precinct
on the ((third Tuesday)) first Wednesday after the first Monday of the
preceding September ((or on the seventh Tuesday immediately preceding
such general election, whichever occurs first)).

Sec. 2 RCW
29.13.010 and 1994 c 142 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All state, county, city, town, and district general elections
for the election of federal, state, legislative, judicial, county,
city, town, district, and precinct officers, and for the submission to
the voters of the state, county, city, town, or district of any measure
for their adoption and approval or rejection, shall be held on the
first Tuesday after the first Monday of November, in the year in which
they may be called. A statewide general election shall be held on the
first Tuesday after the first Monday of November of each year:
PROVIDED, That the statewide general election held in odd-numbered
years shall be limited to (a) city, town, and district general
elections as provided for in RCW 29.13.020, or as otherwise provided by
law; (b) the election of federal officers for the remainder of any
unexpired terms in the membership of either branch of the congress of
the United States; (c) the election of state and county officers for
the remainder of any unexpired terms of offices created by or whose
duties are described in Article II, section 15, Article III, sections
16, 17, 19, 20, 21, 22, and 23, and Article IV, sections 3 and 5 of the
state Constitution and RCW 2.06.080; (d) the election of county
officers in any county governed by a charter containing provisions
calling for general county elections at this time; and (e) the approval
or rejection of state measures, including proposed constitutional
amendments, matters pertaining to any proposed constitutional
convention, initiative measures and referendum measures proposed by the
electorate, referendum bills, and any other matter provided by the
legislature for submission to the electorate.
(2) A county legislative authority may, if it deems an emergency to
exist, call a special county election by presenting a resolution to the
county auditor at least ((forty-five days prior to)) fifty-five days
before the proposed election date. Except as provided in subsection
(4) of this section, a special election called by the county
legislative authority shall be held on one of the following dates as
decided by such governing body:
(a) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in February;
(b) The second Tuesday in March;
(c) The fourth Tuesday in April;
(d) The third Tuesday in May;
(e) The day of the primary as specified by RCW 29.13.070; or
(f) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in November.
(3) In addition to the dates set forth in subsection (2) (a)
through (f) of this section, a special election to validate an excess
levy or bond issue may be called at any time to meet the needs
resulting from fire, flood, earthquake, or other act of God. Such
county special election shall be noticed and conducted in the manner
provided by law.
(4) In a presidential election year, if a presidential preference
primary is conducted in February, March, April, or May under chapter
29.19 RCW, the date on which a special election may be called by the
county legislative authority under subsection (2) of this section
during the month of that primary is the date of the presidential
primary.
(5) This section shall supersede the provisions of any and all
other statutes, whether general or special in nature, having different
dates for such city, town, and district elections, the purpose of this
section being to establish mandatory dates for holding elections except
for those elections held pursuant to a home-rule charter adopted under
Article XI, section 4 of the state Constitution. This section shall
not be construed as fixing the time for holding primary elections, or
elections for the recall of any elective public officer.

Sec. 3 RCW 29.13.020 and 2002 c 43 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All city, town, and district general elections shall be held
throughout the state of Washington on the first Tuesday following the
first Monday in November in the odd-numbered years.
This section shall not apply to:
(a) Elections for the recall of any elective public officer;
(b) Public utility districts, conservation districts, or district
elections at which the ownership of property within those districts is
a prerequisite to voting, all of which elections shall be held at the
times prescribed in the laws specifically applicable thereto;
(c) Consolidation proposals as provided for in chapter 28A.315 RCW
((28A.315.280)) and nonhigh capital fund aid proposals as provided for
in chapter 28A.540 RCW.
(2) The county auditor, as ex officio supervisor of elections, upon
request in the form of a resolution of the governing body of a city,
town, or district, presented to the auditor at least ((forty-five days
prior to)) fifty-five days before the proposed election date, may, if
the county auditor deems an emergency to exist, call a special election
in such city, town, or district, and for the purpose of such special
election he or she may combine, unite, or divide precincts. Except as
provided in subsection (3) of this section, such a special election
shall be held on one of the following dates as decided by the governing
body:
(a) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in February;
(b) The second Tuesday in March;
(c) The fourth Tuesday in April;
(d) The third Tuesday in May;
(e) The day of the primary election as specified by RCW 29.13.070;
or
(f) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in November.
(3) In a presidential election year, if a presidential preference
primary is conducted in February, March, April, or May under chapter
29.19 RCW, the date on which a special election may be called under
subsection (2) of this section during the month of that primary is the
date of the presidential primary.
(4) In addition to subsection (2)(a) through (f) of this section,
a special election to validate an excess levy or bond issue may be
called at any time to meet the needs resulting from fire, flood,
earthquake, or other act of God, except that no special election may be
held between the first day for candidates to file for public office and
the last day to certify the returns of the general election other than
as provided in subsection (2)(((e))) (d) and (f) of this section. Such
special election shall be conducted and notice thereof given in the
manner provided by law.
(5) This section shall supersede the provisions of any and all
other statutes, whether general or special in nature, having different
dates for such city, town, and district elections, the purpose of this
section being to establish mandatory dates for holding elections.

Sec. 4 RCW 29.15.020 and 1990 c 59 s 81 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except where otherwise provided by this title, declarations of
candidacy for the following offices shall be filed during regular
business hours with the filing officer no earlier than the ((fourth))
second Monday in July and no later than the following Friday in the
year in which the office is scheduled to be voted upon:
(1) Offices that are scheduled to be voted upon for full terms or
both full terms and short terms at, or in conjunction with, a state
general election; and
(2) Offices where a vacancy, other than a short term, exists that
has not been filled by election and for which an election to fill the
vacancy is required in conjunction with the next state general
election.
This section supersedes all other statutes that provide for a
different filing period for these offices.

Sec. 5 RCW 29.15.170 and 2001 c 46 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Filings for a nonpartisan office shall be reopened for a period of
three normal business days, such three day period to be fixed by the
election officer with whom such declarations of candidacy are filed and
notice thereof given by notifying press, radio, and television in the
county and by such other means as may now or hereafter be provided by
law whenever before the ((sixth)) seventh Tuesday prior to a primary:
(1) A void in candidacy occurs;
(2) A vacancy occurs in any nonpartisan office leaving an unexpired
term to be filled by an election for which filings have not been held;
or
(3) A nominee for judge of the superior court entitled to a
certificate of election pursuant to Article 4, section 29, Amendment 41
of the state Constitution, dies or is disqualified.
Candidacies validly filed within said three-day period shall appear
on the ballot as if made during the earlier filing period.

Sec. 6 RCW 29.15.180 and 2001 c 46 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Filings for a nonpartisan office (other than judge of the supreme
court or superintendent of public instruction) shall be reopened for a
period of three normal business days, such three day period to be fixed
by the election officer with whom such declarations of candidacy are
filed and notice thereof given by notifying press, radio, and
television in the county and by such other means as may now or
hereafter be provided by law, when:
(1) A void in candidacy for such nonpartisan office occurs on or
after the sixth Tuesday prior to a primary but prior to the sixth
Tuesday before an election; or
(2) A nominee for judge of the superior court eligible after a
contested primary for a certificate of election by Article 4, section
29, Amendment 41 of the state Constitution, dies or is disqualified
within the ten day period immediately following the last day allotted
for a candidate to withdraw; or
(3) A vacancy occurs in any nonpartisan office on or after the
((sixth)) seventh Tuesday prior to a primary but prior to the sixth
Tuesday before an election leaving an unexpired term to be filled by an
election for which filings have not been held.
The candidate receiving a plurality of the votes cast for that
office in the general election shall be deemed elected.

Sec. 7 RCW 29.15.190 and 2002 c 108 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A scheduled election shall be lapsed, the office deemed stricken
from the ballot, no purported write-in votes counted, and no candidate
certified as elected, when:
(1) In an election for judge of the supreme court or superintendent
of public instruction, a void in candidacy occurs on or after the
((sixth)) seventh Tuesday prior to a primary, public filings and the
primary being an indispensable phase of the election process for such
offices;
(2) Except as otherwise specified in RCW 29.15.180, ((as now or
hereafter amended,)) a nominee for judge of the superior court entitled
to a certificate of election pursuant to Article 4, section 29,
Amendment 41 of the state Constitution dies or is disqualified on or
after the ((sixth)) seventh Tuesday prior to a primary;
(3) In other elections for nonpartisan office a void in candidacy
occurs or a vacancy occurs involving an unexpired term to be filled on
or after the sixth Tuesday prior to an election.

Sec. 8 RCW
29.15.230 and 2001 c 46 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Filings for a partisan elective office shall be opened for a period
of three normal business days whenever, on or after the first day of
the regular filing period and before the ((sixth)) seventh Tuesday
prior to a primary, a vacancy occurs in that office, leaving an
unexpired term to be filled by an election for which filings have not
been held.
Any such special three-day filing period shall be fixed by the
election officer with whom declarations of candidacy for that office
are filed. The election officer shall give notice of the special
three-day filing period by notifying the press, radio, and television
in the county or counties involved, and by such other means as may be
required by law.
Candidacies validly filed within the special three-day filing
period shall appear on the primary ballot as if filed during the
regular filing period.

Sec. 9 RCW 29.18.160 and 2001 c 46 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
A vacancy caused by the death or disqualification of any candidate
or nominee of a major or minor political party may be filled at any
time up to and including the day prior to the election for that
position. For state partisan offices in any political subdivision
voted on solely by electors of a single county, an individual shall be
appointed to fill such vacancy by the county central committee in the
case of a major political party or by the state central committee or
comparable governing body in the case of a minor political party. For
other partisan offices, including federal or statewide offices, an
individual shall be appointed to fill such vacancy by the state central
committee or comparable governing body of the appropriate political
party.
Should such vacancy occur no later than the ((sixth)) seventh
Tuesday prior to the state primary or no later than the sixth Tuesday
prior to the state general election ((concerned)) and the ballots have
been printed, it shall be mandatory that they be corrected by the
appropriate election officers. In making such correction, it shall not
be necessary to reprint complete ballots if any other less expensive
technique can be used and the resulting correction is reasonably clear.
Should such vacancy occur after the ((sixth)) seventh Tuesday prior
to ((said)) the state primary or after the sixth Tuesday prior to the
state general election and time does not exist in which to correct
ballots (including absentee ballots), either in total or in part, then
the votes cast or recorded for the person who has died or become
disqualified shall be counted for the person who has been named to fill
such vacancy.
When the secretary of state is the person with whom the appointment
by the major or minor political party is filed, he shall, in certifying
candidates or nominations to the various county officers insert the
name of the person appointed to fill a vacancy.
In the event that the secretary of state has already sent forth his
certificate when the appointment to fill a vacancy is filed with him,
he shall forthwith certify to the county auditors of the proper
counties the name and place of residence of the person appointed to
fill a vacancy, the office for which he is a candidate or nominee, the
party he represents and all other pertinent facts pertaining to the
vacancy.

Sec. 10 RCW 29.24.020 and 2001 c 30 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any nomination of a candidate for partisan public office by
other than a major political party may be made only: (a) In a
convention held not earlier than the ((last)) second Saturday in June
and not later than the ((first)) third Saturday in ((July)) June or
during any of the seven days immediately preceding the first day for
filing declarations of candidacy as fixed in accordance with RCW
29.68.080; (b) as provided by RCW 29.62.180; or (c) as otherwise
provided in this section.
(2) Nominations of candidates for president and vice president of
the United States other than by a major political party may be made
either at a convention conducted under subsection (1) of this section,
or at a similar convention taking place not earlier than the ((first))
third Sunday in ((July)) June and not later than seventy days before
the general election. Conventions held during this time period may not
nominate candidates for any public office other than president and vice
president of the United States, except as provided in subsection (3) of
this section.
(3) If a special filing period for a partisan office is opened
under RCW 29.15.230, candidates of minor political parties and
independent candidates may file for office during that special filing
period. The names of those candidates may not appear on the ballot
unless they are nominated by convention held no later than five days
after the close of the special filing period and a certificate of
nomination is filed with the filing officer no later than three days
after the convention. The requirements of RCW 29.24.025 do not apply
to such a convention. If primary ballots or a voters' pamphlet are
ordered to be printed before the deadline for submitting the
certificate of nomination and the certificate has not been filed, then
the candidate's name will be included but may not appear on the general
election ballot unless the certificate is timely filed and the
candidate otherwise qualifies to appear on that ballot.
(4) A minor political party may hold more than one convention but
in no case shall any such party nominate more than one candidate for
any one partisan public office or position. For the purpose of
nominating candidates for the offices of president and vice president,
United States senator, or a statewide office, a minor party or
independent candidate holding multiple conventions may add together the
number of signatures of different individuals from each convention
obtained in support of the candidate or candidates in order to obtain
the number required by RCW 29.24.030. For all other offices for which
nominations are made, signatures of the requisite number of registered
voters must be obtained at a single convention.

Sec. 11 RCW 29.36.270 and 1987 c 54 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except where a recount or litigation under RCW 29.04.030 is
pending, the county auditor shall have sufficient absentee ballots
ready to mail to absentee voters of that county, other than overseas
voters or service voters, at least twenty days before any primary,
general election, or special election. At least thirty days before a
general election or special election, and at least thirty-six days
before a primary, the county auditor shall mail absentee ballots to all
overseas and service voters who have submitted valid requests for
absentee ballots. A request for an absentee ballot made by an overseas
voter or service voter after that day must be processed immediately.

Sec. 12 RCW 29.38.020 and 2001 c 241 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
At any nonpartisan special election not being held in conjunction
with a state primary or general election, the county, city, town, or
district requesting the election pursuant to RCW 29.13.010 or 29.13.020
may also request that the special election be conducted by mail ballot.
The county auditor may honor the request or may determine that the
election is not to be conducted by mail ballot. The decision of the
county auditor in this regard is final.
((For all special elections not being held in conjunction with a
state primary or state general election where voting is conducted by
mail ballot, the county auditor shall, not less than twenty days before
the date of such election, make available to each registered voter a
mail ballot.)) The auditor shall handle inactive voters in the same
manner as inactive voters in mail ballot precincts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 29.38 RCW
to read as follows:
Except where a recount or litigation under RCW 29.04.030 is
pending, the county auditor shall have sufficient mail ballots ready to
mail to voters of that county, other than overseas voters or service
voters, at least twenty days before a primary, general election, or
special election. At least thirty days before a general election or
special election, and at least thirty-six days before a primary, the
county auditor shall mail ballots to all overseas voters and service
voters. A request for a ballot made by an overseas voter or service
voter after that day must be processed immediately.

Sec. 14 RCW 29.62.020 and 1999 c 259 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At least every third day after a special election, primary, or
general election and before certification of the election results,
except Sundays and legal holidays, the county auditor shall convene the
county canvassing board or their designees to process absentee ballots
and canvass the votes cast at that special election, primary, or
general election, if the county auditor is in possession of more than
twenty-five ballots that have yet to be canvassed. The county auditor
may use his or her discretion in determining when to convene the
canvassing board or their designees during the final four days before
the certification of election results in order to protect the secrecy
of any ballot.
Each absentee ballot previously not canvassed that was received by
the county auditor two days or more before the convening of the
canvassing board or their designees and that either was received by the
county auditor before the closing of the polls on the day of the
special election, primary, or general election for which it was issued,
or that bears a date of mailing on or before the special election,
primary, or general election for which it was issued, must be processed
at that time. The tabulation of votes that results from that day's
canvass must be made available to the general public immediately upon
completion of the canvass.
(2) On the ((tenth)) ninth day after ((a special election or)) a
primary and on the fifteenth day after a general election or a special
election, the canvassing board shall complete the canvass and certify
the results. Each absentee ballot that was returned before the closing
of the polls on the date of the primary or election for which it was
issued, and each absentee ballot with a date of mailing on or before
the date of the primary or election for which it was issued and
received on or before the date on which the primary or election is
certified, shall be included in the canvass report.
(3) At the request of any caucus of the state legislature, the
county auditor shall transmit copies of all unofficial returns of state
and legislative primaries or elections prepared by or for the county
canvassing board to either the secretary of the senate or the chief
clerk of the house.

Sec. 15 RCW 42.12.040 and 2002 c 108 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
If a vacancy occurs in any partisan elective office in the
executive or legislative branches of state government or in any
partisan county elective office before the ((sixth)) seventh Tuesday
prior to the primary for the next general election following the
occurrence of the vacancy, a successor shall be elected to that office
at that general election. Except during the last year of the term of
office, if such a vacancy occurs on or after the ((sixth)) seventh
Tuesday prior to the primary for that general election, the election of
the successor shall occur at the next succeeding general election. The
elected successor shall hold office for the remainder of the unexpired
term. This section shall not apply to any vacancy occurring in a
charter county which has charter provisions inconsistent with this
section.

Sec. 16 RCW 27.12.355 and 1987 c 138 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As provided in this section, a rural county library district,
island library district, or intercounty rural library district may
withdraw areas from its boundaries, or reannex areas into the library
district that previously had been withdrawn from the library district
under this section.
(2) The withdrawal of an area shall be authorized upon: (a)
Adoption of a resolution by the board of trustees requesting the
withdrawal and finding that, in the opinion of the board, inclusion of
this area within the library district will result in a reduction of the
district's tax levy rate under the provisions of RCW 84.52.010; and (b)
adoption of a resolution by the city or town council approving the
withdrawal, if the area is located within the city or town, or adoption
of a resolution by the county legislative authority of the county
within which the area is located approving the withdrawal, if the area
is located outside of a city or town. A withdrawal shall be effective
at the end of the day on the thirty-first day of December in the year
in which the resolutions are adopted, but for purposes of establishing
boundaries for property tax purposes, the boundaries shall be
established immediately upon the adoption of the second resolution.
The authority of an area to be withdrawn from a library district as
provided under this section is in addition, and not subject, to the
provisions of RCW 27.12.380.
The withdrawal of an area from the boundaries of a library district
shall not exempt any property therein from taxation for the purpose of
paying the costs of redeeming any indebtedness of the library district
existing at the time of the withdrawal.
(3) An area that has been withdrawn from the boundaries of a
library district under this section may be reannexed into the library
district upon: (a) Adoption of a resolution by the board of trustees
proposing the reannexation; and (b) adoption of a resolution by the
city or town council approving the reannexation, if the area is located
within the city or town, or adoption of a resolution by the county
legislative authority of the county within which the area is located
approving the reannexation, if the area is located outside of a city or
town. The reannexation shall be effective at the end of the day on the
thirty-first day of December in the year in which the adoption of the
second resolution occurs, but for purposes of establishing boundaries
for property tax purposes, the boundaries shall be established
immediately upon the adoption of the second resolution. Referendum
action on the proposed reannexation may be taken by the voters of the
area proposed to be reannexed if a petition calling for a referendum is
filed with the city or town council, or county legislative authority,
within a thirty-day period after the adoption of the second resolution,
which petition has been signed by registered voters of the area
proposed to be reannexed equal in number to ten percent of the total
number of the registered voters residing in that area.
If a valid petition signed by the requisite number of registered
voters has been so filed, the effect of the resolutions shall be held
in abeyance and a ballot proposition to authorize the reannexation
shall be submitted to the voters of the area at the next special
election date specified in RCW 29.13.020 that occurs ((forty-five))
fifty-five or more days after the petitions have been validated.
Approval of the ballot proposition authorizing the reannexation by a
simple majority vote shall authorize the reannexation.

Sec. 17 RCW 27.12.370 and 1982 c 123 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county legislative authority or authorities shall by resolution
call a special election to be held in such city or town at the next
date provided in RCW 29.13.010 but not less than ((forty-five)) fifty-five days from the date of the declaration of such finding, and shall
cause notice of such election to be given as provided for in RCW
29.27.080.
The election on the annexation of the city or town into the library
district shall be conducted by the auditor of the county or counties in
which the city or town is located in accordance with the general
election laws of the state and the results thereof shall be canvassed
by the canvassing board of the county or counties. No person shall be
entitled to vote at such election unless he or she is registered to
vote in said city or town for at least thirty days preceding the date
of the election. The ballot proposition shall be in substantially the
following form:

If a majority of the persons voting on the proposition shall vote
in favor thereof, the city or town shall thereupon be annexed and shall
be a part of such library district.

Sec. 18 RCW 35.06.070 and 1994 c 81 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
A ballot proposition authorizing an advancement in classification
of a town to a second class city shall be submitted to the voters of
the town if either: (1) Petitions proposing the advancement are
submitted to the town clerk that have been signed by voters of the town
equal in number to at least ten percent of the voters of the town
voting at the last municipal general election; or (2) the town council
adopts a resolution proposing the advancement. The clerk shall
immediately forward the petitions to the county auditor who shall
review the signatures and certify the sufficiency of the petitions.
A ballot proposition authorizing an advancement shall be submitted
to the town voters at the next municipal general election occurring
((forty-five)) fifty-five or more days after the petitions are
submitted if the county auditor certifies the petitions as having
sufficient valid signatures. The town shall be advanced to a second
class city if the ballot proposition is approved by a simple majority
vote, effective when the corporation is actually reorganized and the
new officers are elected and qualified. The county auditor shall
notify the secretary of state if the advancement of a town to a second
class city is approved.

Sec. 19 RCW 35.13.1821 and 1998 c 286 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The annexation ordinance provided for in RCW 35.13.182 is subject
to referendum for forty-five days after its passage. Upon the filing
of a timely and sufficient referendum petition with the legislative
body, signed by qualified electors in number equal to not less than ten
percent of the votes cast in the last general state election in the
area to be annexed, the question of annexation shall be submitted to
the voters of the area in a general election if one is to be held
within ninety days or at a special election called for that purpose not
less than ((forty-five)) fifty-five days nor more than ninety days
after the filing of the referendum petition. Notice of the election
shall be given as provided in RCW 35.13.080 and the election shall be
conducted as provided in the general election law. The annexation
shall be deemed approved by the voters unless a majority of the votes
cast on the proposition are in opposition thereto.
After the expiration of the forty-fifth day from but excluding the
date of passage of the annexation ordinance, if no timely and
sufficient referendum petition has been filed, the area annexed shall
become a part of the city or town upon the date fixed in the ordinance
of annexation.

Sec. 20 RCW 35.61.360 and 1987 c 138 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As provided in this section, a metropolitan park district may
withdraw areas from its boundaries, or reannex areas into the
metropolitan park district that previously had been withdrawn from the
metropolitan park district under this section.
(2) The withdrawal of an area shall be authorized upon: (a)
Adoption of a resolution by the park district commissioners requesting
the withdrawal and finding that, in the opinion of the commissioners,
inclusion of this area within the metropolitan park district will
result in a reduction of the district's tax levy rate under the
provisions of RCW 84.52.010; and (b) adoption of a resolution by the
city or town council approving the withdrawal, if the area is located
within the city or town, or adoption of a resolution by the county
legislative authority of the county within which the area is located
approving the withdrawal, if the area is located outside of a city or
town. A withdrawal shall be effective at the end of the day on the
thirty-first day of December in the year in which the resolutions are
adopted, but for purposes of establishing boundaries for property tax
purposes, the boundaries shall be established immediately upon the
adoption of the second resolution.
The withdrawal of an area from the boundaries of a metropolitan
park district shall not exempt any property therein from taxation for
the purpose of paying the costs of redeeming any indebtedness of the
metropolitan park district existing at the time of the withdrawal.
(3) An area that has been withdrawn from the boundaries of a
metropolitan park district under this section may be reannexed into the
metropolitan park district upon: (a) Adoption of a resolution by the
park district commissioners proposing the reannexation; and (b)
adoption of a resolution by the city or town council approving the
reannexation, if the area is located within the city or town, or
adoption of a resolution by the county legislative authority of the
county within which the area is located approving the reannexation, if
the area is located outside of a city or town. The reannexation shall
be effective at the end of the day on the thirty-first day of December
in the year in which the adoption of the second resolution occurs, but
for purposes of establishing boundaries for property tax purposes, the
boundaries shall be established immediately upon the adoption of the
second resolution. Referendum action on the proposed reannexation may
be taken by the voters of the area proposed to be reannexed if a
petition calling for a referendum is filed with the city or town
council, or county legislative authority, within a thirty-day period
after the adoption of the second resolution, which petition has been
signed by registered voters of the area proposed to be reannexed equal
in number to ten percent of the total number of the registered voters
residing in that area.
If a valid petition signed by the requisite number of registered
voters has been so filed, the effect of the resolutions shall be held
in abeyance and a ballot proposition to authorize the reannexation
shall be submitted to the voters of the area at the next special
election date specified in RCW 29.13.020 that occurs ((forty-five))
fifty-five or more days after the petitions have been validated.
Approval of the ballot proposition authorizing the reannexation by a
simple majority vote shall authorize the reannexation.

Sec. 21 RCW 35A.14.299 and 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.14.299 are each
amended to read as follows:
Such annexation ordinance as provided for in RCW 35A.14.297 shall
be subject to referendum for forty-five days after the passage thereof.
Upon the filing of a timely and sufficient referendum petition with the
legislative body, signed by qualified electors in number equal to not
less than ten percent of the votes cast in the last general state
election in the area to be annexed, the question of annexation shall be
submitted to the voters of such area in a general election if one is to
be held within ninety days or at a special election called for that
purpose not less than ((forty-five)) fifty-five days nor more than
ninety days after the filing of the referendum petition. Notice of
such election shall be given as provided in RCW 35A.14.070 and the
election shall be conducted as provided in RCW ((35A.14.060))
35A.29.151. The annexation shall be deemed approved by the voters
unless a majority of the votes cast on the proposition are in
opposition thereto.
After the expiration of the forty-fifth day from but excluding the
date of passage of the annexation ordinance, if no timely and
sufficient referendum petition has been filed, the area annexed shall
become a part of the code city upon the date fixed in the ordinance of
annexation. From and after such date, if the ordinance so provided,
property in the annexed area shall be subject to the proposed zoning
regulation prepared and filed for such area as provided in RCW
35A.14.330 and 35A.14.340. If the ordinance so provided, all property
within the area annexed shall be assessed and taxed at the same rate
and on the same basis as the property of such annexing code city is
assessed and taxed to pay for any then outstanding indebtedness of such
city contracted prior to, or existing at, the date of annexation.

Sec. 22 RCW 36.93.030 and 1991 c 363 s 91 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is ((hereby)) created and established in each county with
a population of two hundred ten thousand or more a board to be known
and designated as a "boundary review board".
(2) A boundary review board may be created and established in any
other county in the following manner:
(a) The county legislative authority may, by majority vote, adopt
a resolution establishing a boundary review board; or
(b) A petition seeking establishment of a boundary review board
signed by qualified electors residing in the county equal in number to
at least five percent of the votes cast in the county at the last
county general election may be filed with the county auditor.
Upon the filing of such a petition, the county auditor shall
examine the same and certify to the sufficiency of the signatures
thereon. No person may withdraw his or her name from a petition after
it has been filed with the auditor. Within thirty days after the
filing of such petition, the county auditor shall transmit the same to
the county legislative authority, together with his or her certificate
of sufficiency.
After receipt of a valid petition for the establishment of a
boundary review board, the county legislative authority shall submit
the question of whether a boundary review board should be established
to the electorate at the next county primary or county general election
which occurs more than ((forty-five)) fifty-five days from the date of
receipt of the petition. Notice of the election shall be given as
provided in RCW 29.27.080 and shall include a clear statement of the
proposal to be submitted.
If a majority of the persons voting on the proposition shall vote
in favor of the establishment of the boundary review board, such board
shall thereupon be deemed established.

Sec. 23 RCW 52.02.080 and 1989 c 63 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The election on the formation of the district and to elect the
initial fire commissioners shall be conducted by the election officials
of the county or counties in which the proposed district is located in
accordance with the general election laws of the state. This election
shall be held at the next general election date, as specified under RCW
29.13.020, that occurs ((forty-five)) fifty-five or more days after the
date of the action by the boundary review board, or county legislative
authority or authorities, approving the proposal.

Sec. 24 RCW 52.04.056 and 1989 c 63 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As provided in this section, a fire protection district may
withdraw areas from its boundaries, or reannex areas into the fire
protection district that previously had been withdrawn from the fire
protection district under this section.
(2) The withdrawal of an area shall be authorized upon: (a)
Adoption of a resolution by the board of fire commissioners requesting
the withdrawal and finding that, in the opinion of the board, inclusion
of this area within the fire protection district will result in a
reduction of the district's tax levy rate under the provisions of RCW
84.52.010; and (b) adoption of a resolution by the city or town council
approving the withdrawal, if the area is located within the city or
town, or adoption of a resolution by the county legislative authority
or authorities of the county or counties within which the area is
located approving the withdrawal, if the area is located outside of a
city or town. A withdrawal shall be effective at the end of the day on
the thirty-first day of December in the year in which the resolutions
are adopted, but for purposes of establishing boundaries for property
tax purposes, the boundaries shall be established immediately upon the
adoption of the second resolution.
The authority of an area to be withdrawn from a fire protection
district as provided under this section is in addition, and not
subject, to the provisions of RCW 52.04.101.
The withdrawal of an area from the boundaries of a fire protection
district shall not exempt any property therein from taxation for the
purpose of paying the costs of redeeming any indebtedness of the fire
protection district existing at the time of the withdrawal.
(3) An area that has been withdrawn from the boundaries of a fire
protection district under this section may be reannexed into the fire
protection district upon: (a) Adoption of a resolution by the board of
fire commissioners proposing the reannexation; and (b) adoption of a
resolution by the city or town council approving the reannexation, if
the area is located within the city or town, or adoption of a
resolution by the county legislative authority or authorities of the
county or counties within which the area is located approving the
reannexation, if the area is located outside of a city or town. The
reannexation shall be effective at the end of the day on the thirty-first day of December in the year in which the adoption of the second
resolution occurs, but for purposes of establishing boundaries for
property tax purposes, the boundaries shall be established immediately
upon the adoption of the second resolution. Referendum action on the
proposed reannexation may be taken by the voters of the area proposed
to be reannexed if a petition calling for a referendum is filed with
the city or town council, or county legislative authority or
authorities, within a thirty-day period after the adoption of the
second resolution, which petition has been signed by registered voters
of the area proposed to be reannexed equal in number to ten percent of
the total number of the registered voters residing in that area.
If a valid petition signed by the requisite number of registered
voters has been so filed, the effect of the resolutions shall be held
in abeyance and a ballot proposition to authorize the reannexation
shall be submitted to the voters of the area at the next special
election date specified in RCW 29.13.020 that occurs ((forty-five))
fifty-five or more days after the petitions have been validated.
Approval of the ballot proposition authorizing the reannexation by a
simple majority vote shall authorize the reannexation.

Sec. 25 RCW 52.04.071 and 1984 c 230 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county legislative authority or authorities shall by resolution
call a special election to be held in the city or town and in the fire
protection district at the next date provided in RCW 29.13.010 but not
less than ((forty-five)) fifty-five days from the date of the
declaration of the finding, and shall cause notice of the election to
be given as provided for in RCW 29.27.080.
The election on the annexation of the city or town into the fire
protection district shall be conducted by the auditor of the county or
counties in which the city or town and the fire protection district are
located in accordance with the general election laws of the state. The
results thereof shall be canvassed by the canvassing board of the
county or counties. No person is entitled to vote at the election
unless he or she is a qualified elector in the city or town or unless
he or she is a qualified elector within the boundaries of the fire
protection district. The ballot proposition shall be in substantially
the following form:

"Shall the city or town of . . . . . . be annexed to and be a part
of . . . . . . fire protection district?

YES. . . . . . . . . .
NO . . . . . . . . . . "

If a majority of the persons voting on the proposition in the city
or town and a majority of the persons voting on the proposition in the
fire protection district vote in favor thereof, the city or town shall
be annexed and shall be a part of the fire protection district.

Sec. 26 RCW 53.04.110 and 1998 c 240 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any port district now existing or which may hereafter be organized
under the laws of the state of Washington is hereby authorized to
change its corporate name under the following conditions and in the
following manner:
(1) On presentation, at least ((forty-five)) fifty-five days before
any general port election to be held in the port district, of a
petition to the commissioners of any port district now existing or
which may hereafter be established under the laws of the state of
Washington, signed by at least ten percent of the total number of
voters of the port district who voted at the last general port election
and asking that the corporate name of the port district be changed, it
shall be the duty of the commissioners to submit to the voters of the
port district the proposition as to whether the corporate name of the
port shall be changed. The proposition shall be submitted at the next
general port election.
(2) The petition shall contain the present corporate name of the
port district and the corporate name which is proposed to be given to
the port district.
(3) On submitting the proposition to the voters of the port
district it shall be the duty of the port commissioners to cause to be
printed on the official ballot used at the election the following
proposition:

(4) At the time when the returns of the general election shall be
canvassed by the commissioners of the port district, it shall be the
duty of the commissioners to canvass the vote upon the proposition so
submitted, recording in their record the result of the canvass.
(5) Should a majority of the registered voters of the port district
voting at the general port election vote in favor of the proposition it
shall be the duty of the port commissioners to certify the fact to the
auditor of the county in which the port district shall be situated and
to the secretary of state of the state of Washington, under the seal of
the port district. On and after the filing of the certificate with the
county auditor as aforesaid and with the secretary of state of the
state of Washington, the corporate name of the port district shall be
changed, and thenceforth the port district shall be known and
designated in accordance therewith.

Sec. 27 RCW 54.08.010 and 1985 c 469 s 55 are each amended to
read as follows:
At any general election held in an even-numbered year, the county
legislative authority of any county in this state may, or, on petition
of ten percent of the qualified electors of the county based on the
total vote cast in the last general county election held in an even-numbered year, shall, by resolution, submit to the voters of the county
the proposition of creating a public utility district which shall be
coextensive with the limits of the county as now or hereafter
established. A form of petition for the creation of a public utility
district shall be submitted to the county auditor within ten months
prior to the election at which the proposition is to be submitted to
the voters. Petitions shall be filed with the county auditor not less
than four months before the election and the county auditor shall
within thirty days examine the signatures thereof and certify to the
sufficiency or insufficiency thereof. If the petition be found to be
insufficient, it shall be returned to the persons filing the same, who
may amend or add names thereto for ten days, when the same shall be
returned to the county auditor, who shall have an additional fifteen
days
to examine the same and attach his certificate thereto. No person
having signed the petition shall be allowed to withdraw his name
therefrom after the filing of the same with the county auditor:
PROVIDED, That each signature shall be dated and that no signature
dated prior to the date on which the form of petition was submitted to
the county auditor shall be valid. Whenever the petition shall be
certified to as sufficient, the county auditor shall forthwith transmit
the same, together with his certificate of sufficiency attached
thereto, to the county legislative authority which shall submit the
proposition to the voters of the county at the next general election in
an even-numbered year occurring ((forty-five)) fifty-five days after
submission of the proposition to the legislative authority. The notice
of the election shall state the boundaries of the proposed public
utility district and the object of such election, and shall in other
respects conform to the requirements of the general laws of the state
of Washington, governing the time and manner of holding elections. In
submitting the question to the voters for their approval or rejection,
the proposition shall be expressed on the ballot substantially in the
following terms:

Public Utility District No. . . . . . . . . . . . . YES □
Public Utility District No. . . . . . . . . . . . . NO □

Any petition for the formation of a public utility district may
describe a less area than the entire county in which the petition is
filed, the boundaries of which shall follow the then existing precinct
boundaries and not divide any voting precinct; and in the event that
such a petition is filed the county legislative authority shall fix a
date for a hearing on such petition, and shall publish the petition,
without the signatures thereto appended, for two weeks prior to the
date of the hearing, together with a notice stating the time of the
meeting when the petition will be heard. The publication, and all
other publications required by chapter 1, Laws of 1931, shall be in a
newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the district is
situated. The hearing on the petition may be adjourned from time to
time, not exceeding four weeks in all. If upon the final hearing the
county legislative authority shall find that any lands have been
unjustly or improperly included within the proposed public utility
district and will not be benefited by inclusion therein, it shall
change and fix the boundary lines in such manner as it shall deem
reasonable and just and conducive to the public welfare and
convenience, and make and enter an order establishing and defining the
boundary lines of the proposed public utility district: PROVIDED, That
no lands shall be included within the boundaries so fixed lying outside
the boundaries described in the petition, except upon the written
request of the owners of those lands. Thereafter the same procedure
shall be followed as prescribed in this chapter for the formation of a
public utility district including an entire county, except that the
petition and election shall be confined solely to the lesser public
utility district.
No public utility district created after September 1, 1979, shall
include any other public utility district within its boundaries:
PROVIDED, That this paragraph shall not alter, amend, or modify
provisions of chapter 54.32 RCW.

Sec. 28 RCW 54.08.070 and 1979 ex.s. c 240 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
Any district which does not own or operate electric facilities for
the generation, transmission or distribution of electric power on March
25, 1969, or any district which hereafter does not construct or acquire
such electric facilities within ten years of its creation, shall not
construct or acquire any such electric facilities without the approval
of such proposal by the voters of such district: PROVIDED, That a
district shall have the power to construct or acquire electric
facilities within ten years following its creation by action of its
commission without voter approval of such action.
At any general election held in an even-numbered year, the proposal
to construct or acquire electric facilities may be submitted to the
voters of the district by resolution of the public utility district
commission or shall be submitted to the voters of the district by the
county legislative authority on petition of ten percent of the
qualified electors of such district, based on the total vote cast in
the last general county election held in an even-numbered year. A form
of petition for the construction or acquisition of electric facilities
by the public utility district shall be submitted to the county auditor
within ten months prior to the election at which such proposition is to
be submitted to the voters. Petitions shall be filed with the county
auditor not less than four months before such election and the county
auditor shall within thirty days examine the signatures thereof and
certify to the sufficiency or insufficiency thereof. If such petition
is found to be insufficient, it shall be returned to the persons filing
the same, who may amend and add names thereto for ten days, when the
same shall be returned to the county auditor, who shall have an
additional fifteen days to examine the same and attach his certificate
thereto. No person having signed such petition shall be allowed to
withdraw his name therefrom after the filing of the same with the
county auditor: PROVIDED, That each signature shall be dated and that
no signature dated prior to the date on which the form of petition was
submitted to the county auditor shall be valid. Whenever such petition
shall be certified to as sufficient, the county auditor shall forthwith
transmit the same, together with his certificate of sufficiency
attached thereto, to the county legislative authority which shall
submit such proposition to the voters of said district at the next
general election in an even-numbered year occurring ((forty-five))
fifty-five days after submission of the proposition to said legislative
authority. The notice of the election shall state the object of such
election, and shall in other respects conform to the requirements of
the general laws of Washington, governing the time and manner of
holding elections.
The proposal submitted to the voters for their approval or
rejection, shall be expressed on the ballot substantially in the
following terms:

Shall Public Utility District No. . . . . of . . . . . . County
construct or acquire electric facilities for the generation,
transmission or distribution of electric power?

Yes □ No □

Within ten days after such election, the election board of the
county shall canvass the returns, and if at such election a majority of
the voters voting on such proposition shall vote in favor of such
construction or acquisition of electric facilities, the district shall
be authorized to construct or acquire electric facilities.

Sec. 29 RCW 57.04.050 and 1999 c 153 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon entry of the findings of the final hearing on the petition if
one or more county legislative authorities find that the proposed
district will be conducive to the public health, welfare, and
convenience and will benefit the land therein, they shall present a
resolution to the county auditor calling for a special election to be
held at a date specified under RCW 29.13.020, that occurs ((forty-five)) fifty-five or more days after the resolution is presented, at
which a ballot proposition authorizing the district to be created shall
be submitted to voters for their approval or rejection. The
commissioners shall cause to be published a notice of the election for
four successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the
proposed district, which notice shall state the hours during which the
polls will be open, the boundaries of the district as finally adopted
and the object of the election, and the notice shall also be posted ten
days in ten public places in the proposed district. The district shall
be created if the ballot proposition authorizing the district to be
created is approved by a majority of the voters voting on the
proposition.
A separate ballot proposition authorizing the district, if created,
to impose a single-year excess levy for the preliminary expenses of the
district shall be submitted to voters for their approval or rejection
at the same special election, if the petition to create the district
also proposed that a ballot proposition authorizing an excess levy be
submitted to voters for their approval or rejection. The excess levy
shall be proposed in the amount specified in the petition to create the
district, not to exceed one dollar and twenty-five cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value, and may only be submitted to voters for
their approval or rejection if the special election is held in
February, March, April, or May. The proposition to be effective must
be approved in the manner set forth in Article VII, section 2(a) of the
state Constitution.

Sec. 30 RCW 70.44.235 and 1987 c 138 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As provided in this section, a public hospital district may
withdraw areas from its boundaries, or reannex areas into the public
hospital district that previously had been withdrawn from the public
hospital district under this section.
(2) The withdrawal of an area shall be authorized upon: (a)
Adoption of a resolution by the hospital district commissioners
requesting the withdrawal and finding that, in the opinion of the
commissioners, inclusion of this area within the public hospital
district will result in a reduction of the district's tax levy rate
under the provisions of RCW 84.52.010; and (b) adoption of a resolution
by the city or town council approving the withdrawal, if the area is
located within the city or town, or adoption of a resolution by the
county legislative authority of the county within which the area is
located approving the withdrawal, if the area is located outside of a
city or town. A withdrawal shall be effective at the end of the day on
the thirty-first day of December in the year in which the resolutions
are adopted, but for purposes of establishing boundaries for property
tax purposes, the boundaries shall be established immediately upon the
adoption of the second resolution.
The withdrawal of an area from the boundaries of a public hospital
district shall not exempt any property therein from taxation for the
purpose of paying the costs of redeeming any indebtedness of the public
hospital district existing at the time of the withdrawal.
(3) An area that has been withdrawn from the boundaries of a public
hospital district under this section may be reannexed into the public
hospital district upon: (a) Adoption of a resolution by the hospital
district commissioners proposing the reannexation; and (b) adoption of
a resolution by the city or town council approving the reannexation, if
the area is located within the city or town, or adoption of a
resolution by the county legislative authority of the county within
which the area is located approving the reannexation, if the area is
located outside of a city or town. The reannexation shall be effective
at the end of the day on the thirty-first day of December in the year
in which the adoption of the second resolution occurs, but for purposes
of establishing boundaries for property tax purposes, the boundaries
shall be established immediately upon the adoption of the second
resolution. Referendum action on the proposed reannexation may be
taken by the voters of the area proposed to be reannexed if a petition
calling for a referendum is filed with the city or town council, or
county legislative authority, within a thirty-day period after the
adoption of the second resolution, which petition has been signed by
registered voters of the area proposed to be reannexed equal in number
to ten percent of the total number of the registered voters residing in
that area.
If a valid petition signed by the requisite number of registered
voters has been so filed, the effect of the resolutions shall be held
in abeyance and a ballot proposition to authorize the reannexation
shall be submitted to the voters of the area at the next special
election date specified in RCW 29.13.020 that occurs ((forty-five))
fifty-five or more days after the petitions have been validated.
Approval of the ballot proposition authorizing the reannexation by a
simple majority vote shall authorize the reannexation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 Prior to the 2004 and 2005 primary
elections, the secretary of state and county auditors shall notify the
public of the change in the date of the primary and the new date of the
primary. The change in the date of the primary and the new date shall
be clearly and prominently displayed on all appropriate election
materials, including sample ballots, voters' pamphlets, election
notifications, absentee ballot envelopes, web sites, poll site
instructions, and candidate filing forms. The secretary of state and
county auditors shall make a reasonable effort to provide notice of the
new date of the primary in multiple languages.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 This act takes effect January 1, 2004.

--- END ---