BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29.79.080 and 1982 c 116 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The person proposing the measure shall print blank petitions upon
single sheets of paper of good writing quality (including but not
limited to newsprint) not less than eleven inches in width and not less
than fourteen inches in length. Each petition at the time of
circulating, signing, and filing with the secretary of state shall
consist of not more than one sheet with numbered lines for not more
than twenty signatures, with the prescribed warning and title, shall be
in the form required by RCW 29.79.090, 29.79.100, or 29.79.110, as now
or hereafter amended, and shall have a full, true, and correct copy of
the proposed measure referred to therein printed on the reverse side of
the petition.
Nothing in this section prohibits the person proposing the measure
from making the blank petition available in electronic form to persons
intending to print and circulate petitions, as long as the electronic
form is secured so that the blank petition may not be altered by a
person of ordinary skill before printing. The secretary of state may
make the electronic form of the blank petition available for download
from the secretary of state's web site.

--- END ---