BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 As the disparity in the cost-of-living
between different regions and locales in the state has grown in recent
years, the purchasing power of salaries has become more disparate for
K-12 employees. A major contributor to these costs is housing. The
purpose of this act is to commission a study on the impact of housing
costs on nonsupervisory K-12 employees and to provide the governor and
the legislature with a set of recommendations designed to address those
costs within the state's constitutionally required general and uniform
system of public schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The education housing task force is
created to study and report on the issues that need to be addressed in
order to provide housing allowances or otherwise meet the housing needs
of nonsupervisory education employees.
(2) The education housing task force shall include seven members
selected as follows: One member appointed by the governor; one member
appointed by the superintendent of public instruction; two members of
the house of representatives committee on education, one from each
major caucus, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;
two members of the senate committee on education, one from each major
caucus, appointed by the president of the senate; and a nonvoting chair
selected by the other members of the task force. Each voting member of
the task force may appoint a designee.
(3) The members of the task force shall be appointed and commence
the study by August 1, 2003.
(4) By October 1, 2004, the task force shall report to the governor
and the legislative education and fiscal committees on possible ways to
provide a housing allowance or otherwise meet the housing needs of
nonsupervisory education employees.
(5) The economic and revenue forecast supervisor and staff shall
provide staff support to the task force. The economic and revenue
forecast supervisor may enter into contracts for any research or other
services necessary to fulfill the duties of the task force.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 In its deliberations, the education housing
task force shall include but need not be limited to consideration of
the following questions:
(1) What are some possible options that could be used to address
differences in regional and local housing costs for nonsupervisory
educational employees?
(2) What are the benefits and challenges of providing a regional or
local housing allowance from different funding sources that include but
need not be limited to:
(a) Additional state funding;
(b) Current state funding levels;
(c) Existing maintenance and operation levy limitations;
(d) Higher maintenance and operation levy limitations; and
(e) State bond sales for an education housing trust?
(3) What could form the basis of a system of housing cost
allowances, a system based on equity, or on the need to reduce
attrition and turnover, or on both?
(4) If a housing allowance is based on attrition and turnover, is
there evidence that attrition and turnover are highest in the school
districts with the highest living or housing costs?
(5) What is the most appropriate geographic unit upon which to
differentiate pay based on the cost of housing?
(6) Should a housing allowance be a fixed dollar allowance for all
eligible personnel or a percentage of salary, or inversely
proportionate to salary levels?
(7) Should a housing allowance be based on comparative costs across
school districts or regions, or on a comparison of private sector wages
across regions or on the housing needs of individual employees?
(8) Can quality of life issues that may affect the location
decisions of nonsupervisory education employees be factored into
monetary compensation issues such as housing costs?
(9) If nonsupervisory education employees receive housing
allowances, should the same system be extended to other state
employees?
(10) Should options in lieu of housing allowances be considered,
options that may include but need not be limited to:
(a) Downpayment assistance for nonsupervisory education employees
in qualifying districts;
(b) Low-interest loans or mortgage subsidies for nonsupervisory
education employees in qualifying districts; and
(c) Capital bond proceeds to buy-down mortgages?
(11) What are the legal implications of a housing allowance on
state requirements to define and fund basic education, provide funding
equity for students, and provide a general and uniform system of public
schools?
(12) Within different nonsupervisory employee classifications,
should there be additional eligibility limitations or preferences to
guide local collective bargaining efforts?

--- END ---