BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.04.320 and 2002 c 247 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Motor vehicle" ((shall)) means every vehicle which is self-propelled and every vehicle which is propelled by electric power
obtained from overhead trolley wires, but not operated upon rails.
"Motor vehicle" includes a neighborhood electric vehicle as defined in
section 2 of this act. An electric personal assistive mobility device
is not considered a motor vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Neighborhood electric vehicle" means a self-propelled,
electrically powered four-wheeled motor vehicle whose speed attainable
in one mile is more than twenty miles per hour and not more than
twenty-five miles per hour and conforms to federal regulations under
Title 49 C.F.R. Part 571.500.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.37.010 and 1997 c 241 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is a traffic infraction for any person to drive or move or
for the owner to cause or knowingly permit to be driven or moved on any
highway any vehicle or combination of vehicles which is in such unsafe
condition as to endanger any person, or which does not contain those
parts or is not at all times equipped with such lamps and other
equipment in proper condition and adjustment as required in this
chapter or in regulations issued by the chief of the Washington state
patrol, or which is equipped in any manner in violation of this chapter
or the state patrol's regulations, or for any person to do any act
forbidden or fail to perform any act required under this chapter or the
state patrol's regulations.
(2) Nothing contained in this chapter or the state patrol's
regulations shall be construed to prohibit the use of additional parts
and accessories on any vehicle not inconsistent with the provisions of
this chapter or the state patrol's regulations.
(3) The provisions of the chapter and the state patrol's
regulations with respect to equipment on vehicles shall not apply to
implements of husbandry, road machinery, road rollers, or farm tractors
except as herein made applicable.
(4) No owner or operator of a farm tractor, self-propelled unit of
farm equipment, or implement of husbandry shall be guilty of a crime or
subject to penalty for violation of RCW 46.37.160 as now or hereafter
amended unless such violation occurs on a public highway.
(5) It is a traffic infraction for any person to sell or offer for
sale vehicle equipment which is required to be approved by the state
patrol as prescribed in RCW 46.37.005 unless it has been approved by
the state patrol.
(6) The provisions of this chapter with respect to equipment
required on vehicles shall not apply to neighborhood electric vehicles,
motorcycles, or motor-driven cycles except as herein made applicable.
(7) This chapter does not apply to vehicles used by the state parks
and recreation commission exclusively for park maintenance and
operations upon public highways within state parks.
(8) Notices of traffic infraction issued to commercial drivers
under the provisions of this chapter with respect to equipment required
on commercial motor vehicles shall not be considered for driver
improvement purposes under chapter 46.20 RCW.
(9) Whenever a traffic infraction is chargeable to the owner or
lessee of a vehicle under subsection (1) of this section, the driver
shall not be arrested or issued a notice of traffic infraction unless
the vehicle is registered in a jurisdiction other than Washington
state, or unless the infraction is for an offense that is clearly
within the responsibility of the driver.
(10) Whenever the owner or lessee is issued a notice of traffic
infraction under this section the court may, on the request of the
owner or lessee, take appropriate steps to make the driver of the
vehicle, or any other person who directs the loading, maintenance, or
operation of the vehicle, a codefendant. If the codefendant is held
solely responsible and is found to have committed the traffic
infraction, the court may dismiss the notice against the owner or
lessee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Absent prohibition by local authorities authorized under this
section and except as prohibited elsewhere in this section, a person
may operate a neighborhood electric vehicle upon a highway of this
state having a speed limit of thirty-five miles per hour or less if:
(a) The person does not operate a neighborhood electric vehicle
upon state highways that are listed in chapter 47.17 RCW;
(b) The person does not operate a neighborhood electric vehicle
upon a highway of this state without first having obtained and having
in full force and effect a current and proper vehicle license and
display vehicle license number plates in compliance with chapter 46.16
RCW;
(c) The person does not operate a neighborhood electric vehicle
upon a highway of this state without first obtaining a valid driver's
license issued to Washington residents in compliance with chapter 46.20
RCW;
(d) The person does not operate a neighborhood electric vehicle
subject to registration under chapter 46.16 RCW on a highway of this
state unless the person is insured under a motor vehicle liability
policy in compliance with chapter 46.30 RCW; and
(e) The person operating a neighborhood electric vehicle does not
cross a roadway with a speed limit in excess of thirty-five miles per
hour, unless the crossing begins and ends on a roadway with a speed
limit of thirty-five miles per hour or less and occurs at an
intersection of approximately ninety degrees, except that the operator
of a neighborhood electric vehicle must not cross an uncontrolled
intersection of streets and highways that are part of the state highway
system subject to Title 47 RCW unless that intersection has been
authorized by local authorities provided elsewhere in this section.
(2) Any person who violates this section commits a traffic
infraction.
(3) This section does not prevent local authorities, with respect
to streets and highways under their jurisdiction and within the
reasonable exercise of their police power, from regulating the
operation of neighborhood electric vehicles on streets and highways
under their jurisdiction, including the prohibition of neighborhood
electric vehicles on certain streets and highways, by resolution or
ordinance of the governing body, if the regulation is consistent with
the provisions of this title, except that:
(a) Local authorities may not authorize the operation of
neighborhood electric vehicles on streets and highways that are part of
the state highway system subject to the provisions of Title 47 RCW; and
(b) Local authorities are prohibited from establishing any
requirements for the registration and licensing of neighborhood
electric vehicles.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.61.688 and 2002 c 328 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, the term "motor vehicle"
includes:
(a) "Buses," meaning motor vehicles with motive power, except
trailers, designed to carry more than ten passengers;
(b) "Multipurpose passenger vehicles," meaning motor vehicles with
motive power, except trailers, designed to carry ten persons or less
that are constructed either on a truck chassis or with special features
for occasional off-road operation;
(c) "Neighborhood electric vehicle," meaning a self-propelled,
electrically powered four-wheeled motor vehicle whose speed attainable
in one mile is more than twenty miles per hour and not more than
twenty-five miles per hour and conforms to federal regulations under
Title 49 C.F.R. Part 571.500;
(d) "Passenger cars," meaning motor vehicles with motive power,
except multipurpose passenger vehicles, motorcycles, or trailers,
designed for carrying ten passengers or less; and
(((d))) (e) "Trucks," meaning motor vehicles with motive power,
except trailers, designed primarily for the transportation of property.
(2) This section only applies to motor vehicles that meet the
manual seat belt safety standards as set forth in federal motor vehicle
safety standard 208 and to neighborhood electric vehicles. This
section does not apply to a vehicle occupant for whom no safety belt is
available when all designated seating positions as required by federal
motor vehicle safety standard 208 are occupied.
(3) Every person sixteen years of age or older operating or riding
in a motor vehicle shall wear the safety belt assembly in a properly
adjusted and securely fastened manner.
(4) No person may operate a motor vehicle unless all child
passengers under the age of sixteen years are either: (a) Wearing a
safety belt assembly or (b) are securely fastened into an approved
child restraint device.
(5) A person violating this section shall be issued a notice of
traffic infraction under chapter 46.63 RCW. A finding that a person
has committed a traffic infraction under this section shall be
contained in the driver's abstract but shall not be available to
insurance companies or employers.
(6) Failure to comply with the requirements of this section does
not constitute negligence, nor may failure to wear a safety belt
assembly be admissible as evidence of negligence in any civil action.
(7) This section does not apply to an operator or passenger who
possesses written verification from a licensed physician that the
operator or passenger is unable to wear a safety belt for physical or
medical reasons.
(8) The state patrol may adopt rules exempting operators or
occupants of farm vehicles, construction equipment, and vehicles that
are required to make frequent stops from the requirement of wearing
safety belts.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.61.687 and 2000 c 190 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a child who is less than sixteen years of age is being
transported in a motor vehicle that is in operation and that is
required by RCW 46.37.510 to be equipped with a safety belt system in
a passenger seating position, or is being transported in a neighborhood
electric vehicle that is in operation, the driver of the vehicle shall
keep the child properly restrained as follows:
(a) If the child is less than six years old and/or sixty pounds and
the passenger seating position equipped with a safety belt system
allows sufficient space for installation, then the child will be
restrained in a child restraint system that complies with standards of
the United States department of transportation and that is secured in
the vehicle in accordance with instructions of the manufacturer of the
child restraint system;
(b) If the child is less than one year of age or weighs less than
twenty pounds, the child shall be properly restrained in a rear-facing
infant seat;
(c) If the child is more than one but less than four years of age
or weighs less than forty pounds but at least twenty pounds, the child
shall be properly restrained in a forward facing child safety seat
restraint system;
(d) If the child is less than six but at least four years of age or
weighs less than sixty pounds but at least forty pounds, the child
shall be properly restrained in a child booster seat;
(e) If the child is six years of age or older or weighs more than
sixty pounds, the child shall be properly restrained with the motor
vehicle's safety belt properly adjusted and fastened around the child's
body or an appropriately fitting booster seat; and
(f) Enforcement of (a) through (e) of this subsection is subject to
a visual inspection by law enforcement to determine if the child
restraint system in use is appropriate for the child's individual
height, weight, and age. The visual inspection for usage of a forward
facing child safety seat must ensure that the seat in use is equipped
with a four-point shoulder harness system. The visual inspection for
usage of a booster seat must ensure that the seat belt properly fits
across the child's lap and the shoulder strap crosses the center of the
child's chest. The visual inspection for the usage of a seat belt by
a child must ensure that the lap belt properly fits across the child's
lap and the shoulder strap crosses the center of the child's chest. In
determining violations, consideration to the above criteria must be
given in conjunction with the provisions of (a) through (e) of this
subsection. The driver of a vehicle transporting a child who is under
the age of six years old or weighs less than sixty pounds, when the
vehicle is equipped with a passenger side air bag supplemental
restraint system, and the air bag system is activated, shall transport
the child in the back seat positions in the vehicle where it is
practical to do so.
(2) A person violating subsection (1)(a) through (e) of this
section may be issued a notice of traffic infraction under chapter
46.63 RCW. If the person to whom the notice was issued presents proof
of acquisition of an approved child passenger restraint system or a
child booster seat, as appropriate, within seven days to the
jurisdiction issuing the notice and the person has not previously had
a violation of this section dismissed, the jurisdiction shall dismiss
the notice of traffic infraction.
(3) Failure to comply with the requirements of this section shall
not constitute negligence by a parent or legal guardian; nor shall
failure to use a child restraint system be admissible as evidence of
negligence in any civil action.
(4) This section does not apply to: (a) For hire vehicles, (b)
vehicles designed to transport sixteen or less passengers, including
the driver, operated by auto transportation companies, as defined in
RCW 81.68.010, (c) vehicles providing customer shuttle service between
parking, convention, and hotel facilities, and airport terminals, and
(d) school buses.
(5) As used in this section "child booster seat" means a child
passenger restraint system that meets the Federal Motor Vehicle Safety
Standards set forth in 49 C.F.R. 571.213 that is designed to elevate a
child to properly sit in a federally approved lap/shoulder belt system.
(6) The requirements of subsection (1)(a) through (e) of this
section do not apply in any seating position where there is only a lap
belt available and the child weighs more than forty pounds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act takes effect August 1, 2003.

--- END ---