BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 64.06.020 and 1996 c 301 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In a transaction for the sale of residential real property, the
seller shall, unless the buyer has expressly waived the right to
receive the disclosure statement, or unless the transfer is exempt
under RCW 64.06.010, deliver to the buyer a completed real property
transfer disclosure statement in the following format and that
contains, at a minimum, the following information:

INSTRUCTIONS TO THE SELLER
Please complete the following form. Do not leave any spaces blank. If
the question clearly does not apply to the property write "NA". If the
answer is "yes" to any * items, please explain on attached sheets.
Please refer to the line number(s) of the question(s) when you provide
your explanation(s). For your protection you must date and sign each
page of this disclosure statement and each attachment. Delivery of the
disclosure statement must occur not later than five business days,
unless otherwise agreed, after mutual acceptance of a written contract
to purchase between a buyer and a seller.

NOTICE TO THE BUYER
THE FOLLOWING DISCLOSURES ARE MADE BY THE SELLER(S), CONCERNING THE
CONDITION OF THE PROPERTY LOCATED AT . . . . . . . . . . . .
("THE PROPERTY"), OR AS LEGALLY DESCRIBED ON ATTACHED EXHIBIT A.

DISCLOSURES CONTAINED IN THIS FORM ARE PROVIDED BY THE SELLER ON THE
BASIS OF SELLER'S ACTUAL KNOWLEDGE OF THE PROPERTY AT THE TIME THIS
DISCLOSURE FORM IS COMPLETED BY THE SELLER. YOU HAVE THREE BUSINESS
DAYS, UNLESS OTHERWISE AGREED, FROM THE SELLER'S DELIVERY OF THIS
SELLER'S DISCLOSURE STATEMENT TO RESCIND YOUR AGREEMENT BY DELIVERING
YOUR SEPARATE SIGNED WRITTEN STATEMENT OF RESCISSION TO THE SELLER,
UNLESS YOU WAIVE THIS RIGHT AT OR PRIOR TO ENTERING INTO A SALE
AGREEMENT. THE FOLLOWING ARE DISCLOSURES MADE BY THE SELLER AND ARE
NOT THE REPRESENTATIONS OF ANY REAL ESTATE LICENSEE OR OTHER PARTY.
THIS INFORMATION IS FOR DISCLOSURE ONLY AND IS NOT INTENDED TO BE A
PART OF ANY WRITTEN AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE BUYER AND THE SELLER.

FOR A MORE COMPREHENSIVE EXAMINATION OF THE SPECIFIC CONDITION OF THIS
PROPERTY YOU ARE ADVISED TO OBTAIN AND PAY FOR THE SERVICES OF A
QUALIFIED SPECIALIST TO INSPECT THE PROPERTY ON YOUR BEHALF, FOR
EXAMPLE, ARCHITECTS, ENGINEERS, LAND SURVEYORS, PLUMBERS, ELECTRICIANS,
ROOFERS, BUILDING INSPECTORS, OR PEST AND DRY ROT INSPECTORS. THE
PROSPECTIVE BUYER AND THE OWNER MAY WISH TO OBTAIN PROFESSIONAL ADVICE
OR INSPECTIONS OF THE PROPERTY AND TO PROVIDE FOR APPROPRIATE
PROVISIONS IN A CONTRACT BETWEEN THEM WITH RESPECT TO ANY ADVICE,
INSPECTION, DEFECTS OR WARRANTIES.

Seller . . . . is/ . . . . is not occupying the property.

I. SELLER'S DISCLOSURES:

*If "Yes" attach a copy or explain. If necessary use an attached sheet.

1. TITLE

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know A. Do you have legal authority to
sell the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *B. Is title to the property subject
to any of the following?

(1) First right of refusal

(2) Option

(3) Lease or rental agreement

(4) Life estate?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. Are there any encroachments,
boundary agreements, or boundary
disputes?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *D. Are there any rights of way,
easements, or access limitations
that may affect the owner's use of
the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *E. Are there any written
agreements for joint maintenance
of an easement or right of way?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *F. Is there any study, survey
project, or notice that would
adversely affect the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *G. Are there any pending or
existing assessments against the
property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *H. Are there any zoning
violations, nonconforming uses, or
any unusual restrictions on the
subject property that would affect
future construction or remodeling?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *I. Is there a boundary survey for
the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *J. Are there any covenants,
conditions, or restrictions which
affect the property?

2. WATER

A. Household Water

(1) The source of the water is
[ ] Public [ ] Community
[ ] Private [ ] Shared

(2) Water source information:

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *a. Are there any written
agreements for shared
water source?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *b. Is there an easement
(recorded or unrecorded)
for access to and/or
maintenance of the water
source?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *c. Are any known
problems or repairs
needed?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *d. Does the source
provide an adequate year
round supply of potable
water?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(3) Are there any water
treatment systems for the
property? [ ]Leased [ ]Owned

B. Irrigation

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (1) Are there any water rights
for the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(2) If they exist, to your
knowledge, have the water
rights been used during the last
five-year period?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(3) If so, is the certificate
available?

C. Outdoor Sprinkler System

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (1) Is there an outdoor sprinkler
system for the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(2) Are there any defects in the
outdoor sprinkler system?

3. SEWER/SEPTIC SYSTEM

A. The property is served by: [ ]
Public sewer main, [ ] Septic tank
system [ ] Other disposal system
(describe)

. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know B. If the property is served by a
public or community sewer main,
is the house connected to the
main?

C. Is the property currently
subject to a sewer capacity charge?

D. If the property is connected to
a septic system:

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (1) Was a permit issued for its
construction, and was it
approved by the city or county
following its construction?

(2) When was it last pumped:

. . . . . . . . . . . . , 19. . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(3) Are there any defects in the
operation of the septic system?

[ ] Don't know (4) When was it last inspected?

. . . . . . . . . . . . , 19. . .

By Whom: . . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Don't know (5) How many bedrooms was
the system approved for?

. . . . . . . . . . . . bedrooms

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *E. Do all plumbing fixtures,
including laundry drain, go to the
septic/sewer system? If no,
explain: . . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *F. Are you aware of any changes
or repairs to the septic system?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know G. Is the septic tank system,
including the drainfield, located
entirely within the boundaries of
the property?

4. STRUCTURAL

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *A. Has the roof leaked?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know If yes, has it been repaired?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *B. Have there been any
conversions, additions, or
remodeling?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *1. If yes, were all building
permits obtained?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *2. If yes, were all final
inspections obtained?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know C. Do you know the age of the
house? If yes, year of original
construction:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *D. Do you know of any settling,
slippage, or sliding of either the
house or other
structures/improvements located
on the property? If yes, explain:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *E. Do you know of any defects
with the following: (Please check
applicable items)

□ Foundations
□ Decks
□ Exterior Walls

□ Chimneys □ Interior Walls □ Fire Alarm

□ Doors □ Windows □ Patio

□ Ceilings □ Slab Floors □ Driveways

□ Pools □ Hot Tub □ Sauna

□ Sidewalks □ Outbuildings □ Fireplaces

□ Garage Floors □ Walkways

□ Other □ Wood Stoves

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *F. Was a pest or dry rot,
structural or "whole house"
inspection done? When and by
whom was the inspection
completed? . . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *G. Since assuming ownership,
has your property had a problem
with wood destroying organisms
and/or have there been any
problems with pest control,
infestations, or vermin?

5. SYSTEMS AND FIXTURES

A. If the following systems or
fixtures are included with the
transfer, do they have any existing
defects:

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *((A.)) (1) Electrical system,
including wiring, switches,
outlets, and service

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *((B.)) (2) Plumbing system,
including pipes, faucets,
fixtures, and toilets

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *((C.)) (3) Hot water tank

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *((D.)) (4) Garbage disposal

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *((E.)) (5) Appliances

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *((F.)) (6) Sump pump

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *((G.)) (7) Heating and
cooling systems

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *((H.)) (8) Security system
[ ] Owned [ ] Leased

*((I.)) (9) Other . . . . . . . . . . . .

B. Uncertified Wood stoves
and Uncertified Fireplace
Inserts

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (1) Does this property have an
uncertified wood stove or
uncertified fireplace insert?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (2) If yes, is it subject to a
registration or fee program?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (3) If yes, is it currently
registered, and/or have all fees
been paid, as required?

6. COMMON INTEREST

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know A. Is there a Home Owners'
Association? Name of Association
. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know B. Are there regular periodic
assessments:

$. . . per [ ] Month [ ] Year
[ ] Other . . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. Are there any pending special
assessments?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *D. Are there any shared
"common areas" or any joint
maintenance agreements (facilities
such as walls, fences, landscaping,
pools, tennis courts, walkways, or
other areas co-owned in undivided
interest with others)?

7. GENERAL

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *A. Is there any settling, soil,
standing water, or drainage
problems on the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *B. Does the property contain fill
material?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. Is there any material damage
to the property or any of the
structure from fire, wind, floods,
beach movements, earthquake,
expansive soils, or landslides?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know D. Is the property in a designated
flood plain?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *E. Are there any substances,
materials, or products that may be
an environmental hazard such as,
but not limited to, asbestos,
formaldehyde, radon gas, lead-based paint, fuel or chemical
storage tanks, and contaminated
soil or water on the subject
property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *F. Are there any tanks or
underground storage tanks (e.g.,
chemical, fuel, etc.) on the
property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *G. Has the property ever been
used as an illegal drug
manufacturing site?

8. FULL DISCLOSURE BY
SELLERS

A. Other conditions or defects:

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *Are there any other material
defects affecting this property or its
value that a prospective buyer
should know about?

B. Verification:

The foregoing answers and
attached explanations (if any) are
complete and correct to the best of
my/our knowledge and I/we have
received a copy hereof. I/we
authorize all of my/our real estate
licensees, if any, to deliver a copy
of this disclosure statement to
other real estate licensees and all
prospective buyers of the property.

DATE . . . . . . . . . . . .
SELLER . . . . . . . . . . . .
SELLER . . . . . . . . . . . .

II. BUYER'S ACKNOWLEDGMENT

A. As buyer(s), I/we acknowledge the duty to pay diligent
attention to any material defects which are known to
me/us or can be known to me/us by utilizing diligent
attention and observation.

B. Each buyer acknowledges and understands that the
disclosures set forth in this statement and in any
amendments to this statement are made only by the
seller.

C. Buyer (which term includes all persons signing the
"buyer's acceptance" portion of this disclosure
statement below) hereby acknowledges receipt of a
copy of this disclosure statement (including
attachments, if any) bearing seller's signature.

DISCLOSURES CONTAINED IN THIS FORM ARE PROVIDED BY THE SELLER ON THE
BASIS OF SELLER'S ACTUAL KNOWLEDGE OF THE PROPERTY AT THE TIME OF
DISCLOSURE. YOU, THE BUYER, HAVE THREE BUSINESS DAYS, UNLESS OTHERWISE
AGREED, FROM THE SELLER'S DELIVERY OF THIS SELLER'S DISCLOSURE
STATEMENT TO RESCIND YOUR AGREEMENT BY DELIVERING YOUR SEPARATE SIGNED
WRITTEN STATEMENT OF RESCISSION TO THE SELLER UNLESS YOU WAIVE THIS
RIGHT OF RESCISSION.
BUYER HEREBY ACKNOWLEDGES RECEIPT OF A COPY OF THIS REAL PROPERTY
TRANSFER DISCLOSURE STATEMENT AND ACKNOWLEDGES THAT THE DISCLOSURES
MADE HEREIN ARE THOSE OF THE SELLER ONLY, AND NOT OF ANY REAL ESTATE
LICENSEE OR OTHER PARTY.
DATE . . . . . . . BUYER . . . . . . . . . BUYER . . . . . . . . . . . .

(2) The real property transfer disclosure statement shall be for
disclosure only, and shall not be considered part of any written
agreement between the buyer and seller of residential real property.
The real property transfer disclosure statement shall be only a
disclosure made by the seller, and not any real estate licensee
involved in the transaction, and shall not be construed as a warranty
of any kind by the seller or any real estate licensee involved in the
transaction.

--- END ---