BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.85.010 and 1998 c 46 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
In this chapter words and phrases have the following meanings
unless otherwise apparent from the context:
(1) "Real estate broker," or "broker," means a person, while acting
for another for commissions or other compensation or the promise
thereof, or a licensee under this chapter while acting in his or her
own behalf, who:
(a) Sells or offers for sale, lists or offers to list, buys or
offers to buy real estate or business opportunities, or any interest
therein, for others;
(b) Negotiates or offers to negotiate, either directly or
indirectly, the purchase, sale, exchange, lease, or rental of real
estate or business opportunities, or any interest therein, for others;
(c) Negotiates or offers to negotiate, either directly or
indirectly, the purchase, sale, lease, or exchange of a manufactured or
mobile home in conjunction with the purchase, sale, exchange, rental,
or lease of the land upon which the manufactured or mobile home is, or
will be, located;
(d) Advertises or holds himself or herself out to the public by any
oral or printed solicitation or representation that he or she is so
engaged; or
(e) Engages, directs, or assists in procuring prospects or in
negotiating or closing any transaction which results or is calculated
to result in any of these acts;
(2) "Real estate salesperson" or "salesperson" means any natural
person employed, either directly or indirectly, by a real estate
broker, or any person who represents a real estate broker in the
performance of any of the acts specified in subsection (1) of this
section;
(3) An "associate real estate broker" is a person who has qualified
as a "real estate broker" who works with a broker and whose license
states that he or she is associated with a broker;
(4) The word "person" as used in this chapter shall be construed to
mean and include a corporation, limited liability company, limited
liability partnership, or partnership, except where otherwise
restricted;
(5) "Business opportunity" shall mean and include business,
business opportunity and good will of an existing business or any one
or combination thereof;
(6) "Commission" means the real estate commission of the state of
Washington;
(7) "Director" means the director of licensing;
(8) "Real estate multiple listing association" means any
association of real estate brokers:
(a) Whose members circulate listings of the members among
themselves so that the properties described in the listings may be sold
by any member for an agreed portion of the commission to be paid; and
(b) Which require in a real estate listing agreement between the
seller and the broker, that the members of the real estate multiple
listing association shall have the same rights as if each had executed
a separate agreement with the seller;
(9) "Clock hours of instruction" means actual hours spent in
classroom instruction in any tax supported, public technical college,
community college, or any other institution of higher learning or a
correspondence course from any of the aforementioned institutions
certified by such institution as the equivalent of the required number
of clock hours, and the real estate commission may certify courses of
instruction other than in the aforementioned institutions; ((and))
(10) "Incapacitated" means the physical or mental inability to
perform the duties of broker prescribed by this chapter; and
(11) "Commercial real estate" means any parcel of real estate in
this state other than real estate containing one to four residential
units. "Commercial real estate" does not include a single-family
residential lot or single-family residential units such as
condominiums, townhouses, manufactured homes, or homes in a subdivision
when sold, leased, or otherwise conveyed on a unit-by-unit basis, even
when those units are part of a larger building or parcel of real
estate, unless the property is sold or leased for a commercial purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.85 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An out-of-state broker, for a fee, commission, or other
valuable consideration, or in the expectation, or upon the promise of
receiving or collecting a fee, commission, or other valuable
consideration, may perform those acts that require a license under this
chapter, with respect to commercial real estate, provided that the out-of-state broker does all of the following:
(a) Works in cooperation with a Washington real estate broker who
holds a valid, active license issued under this chapter;
(b) Enters into a written agreement with the Washington broker that
includes the terms of cooperation, oversight by the Washington broker,
compensation, and a statement that the out-of-state broker and its
agents will agree to adhere to the laws of Washington;
(c) Furnishes the Washington broker with a copy of the out-of-state
broker's current license in good standing from any jurisdiction where
the out-of-state broker maintains an active real estate license;
(d) Consents to jurisdiction that legal actions arising out of the
conduct of the out-of-state broker or its agents may be commenced
against the out-of-state broker in the court of proper jurisdiction of
any county in Washington where the cause of action arises or where the
plaintiff resides;
(e) Includes the name of the Washington broker on all advertising
in accordance with RCW 18.85.230(8); and
(f) Deposits all documentation required by this section and records
and documents related to the transaction with the Washington broker,
for a period of three years after the date the documentation is
provided, or the transaction occurred, whichever is later.
(2) An out-of-state salesperson or associate broker may perform
those acts that require a real estate salesperson or associate broker
license under this chapter with respect to commercial real estate,
provided that the out-of-state salesperson or associate broker meets
all of the following requirements:
(a) Is licensed with and works under the direct supervision of an
out-of-state broker who meets all of the requirements under subsection
(1) of this section; and
(b) Provides the Washington broker who is working in cooperation
with the out-of-state broker with whom the salesperson or associate
broker is associated with a copy of the salesperson's or associate
broker's current license in good standing from the jurisdiction where
the out-of-state salesperson or associate broker maintains an active
real estate license in connection with the out-of-state broker.
(3) A person licensed in a jurisdiction where there is no legal
distinction between a real estate broker license and a real estate
salesperson license must meet the requirements of subsection (1) of
this section before engaging in any activity described in this section
that requires a real estate broker license in this state.

--- END ---