BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 64.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An effective registration pursuant to this chapter is required
for any party to offer to sell a timeshare interest. A promoter who
offers to sell or sells revocable timeshare interests in incomplete
projects or facilities is limited by and must comply with all of the
requirements of RCW 64.36.025. If a promoter seeks to enter into
irrevocable purchase agreements with purchasers for timeshare interests
in incomplete projects or facilities, the promoter must meet the
requirements in this section in addition to RCW 64.36.020 and the
following limitations and conditions apply:
(a) The promoter is limited to offering or selling only fee simple
deeded timeshare interests;
(b) Construction on the project must have begun and be at least
twenty percent complete and must be completed no later than within two
years of the date of the initial offer to sell the timeshare interest;
(c) The promoter must establish an escrow or trust account for the
purpose of protecting the funds or other property paid, pledged, or
deposited by purchasers;
(d) The promoter's solicitations, advertisements, and promotional
materials must clearly and conspicuously disclose that "THE PROJECT IS
NOT YET COMPLETED; IT IS STILL UNDER CONSTRUCTION"; and
(e) The promoter's solicitations, advertisements, and promotional
materials and the timeshare interest purchase agreement must clearly
and conspicuously provide for and disclose the last possible estimated
date for completion of construction.
(2) The timeshare interest purchase agreement must contain the
following language in fourteen point bold face type: "If the project
is not completed by [estimated date of completion], the purchaser has
the right to void the purchase agreement and is entitled to a full,
unqualified refund of all moneys paid."
(3) One hundred percent of all funds or other property that is
received from or on behalf of purchasers of timeshare interests prior
to the occurrence of events required in this section must be deposited
pursuant to an escrow or trust agreement approved by the director.
Funds may be released from the escrow or trust account to the purchaser
if the purchaser cancels within the cancellation period, or to the
promoter only when all three of the following conditions occur:
(a) The purchaser's cancellation period has expired;
(b) Closing has occurred; and
(c) Construction is complete and the facility is ready to occupy.
(4) In lieu of depositing purchaser funds into an escrow or trust
account, the promoter may post with the department a bond equal to the
amount of Washington resident purchaser funds or other property. The
amount of the bond must be adjusted upwards as the promoter makes
additional sales and must at all times equal the amount of funds or
other property that have been paid by Washington resident purchasers.
(5) Any purchaser has the right to void the timeshare purchase
agreement and request a full, unqualified refund if construction of the
timeshare project is not completed within two years from the date of
the initial offer to sell the timeshare interest or by the last
estimated date of construction contained in the timeshare purchase
agreement, whichever is earlier.
(6) If the completed timeshare project is materially and adversely
different from the project that was promised to purchasers at the time
that the purchase agreements were signed, the director may declare any
or all of the purchaser contracts void. Before declaring the contracts
void, the director shall give the promoter the opportunity for a
hearing in accordance with chapters 34.05 and 18.235 RCW.
(7) If the promoter intends to or does pledge or borrow against
funds or properties, which are held in trust or escrow or protected by
a bond, to help finance in whole or in part the construction of the
timeshare project or to help pay for operating costs, this must be
fully, plainly, and conspicuously disclosed in all advertising, in all
written or oral solicitations for the sale of the timeshare interests,
in the registration with the director, and in the purchase agreement or
contract.
(8) A promoter who obtains an effective registration for a
revocable timeshare interest reservation must meet the requirements of
this section in order to complete an irrevocable purchase agreement.

--- END ---