BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.220.010 and 2000 c 253 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the geologist licensing board.
(2) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing.
(4) "Engineering geologist" means a geologist who, by reason of his
or her knowledge of engineering geology, acquired by education and
practical experience, is qualified to engage in the practice of
engineering geology, has met the qualifications in engineering geology
established under this chapter, and has been issued a license in
engineering geology by the board.
(5) "Engineering geology" means a specialty of geology affecting
the planning, design, operation, and maintenance of engineering works
and other human activities where geological factors and conditions
impact the public welfare or the safeguarding of life, health,
property, and the environment.
(6) "Geologist" means a person who, by reason of his or her
knowledge of geology, mathematics, the environment, and the supporting
physical and life sciences, acquired by education and practical
experience, has met the qualifications established under this chapter,
and has been issued a certificate of licensing as a geologist by the
board.
(7) "Geology" means the science that includes: Treatment of the
earth and its origin and history, in general; the investigation of the
earth's constituent rocks, minerals, solids, fluids, including surface
and underground waters, gases, and other materials; and the study of
the natural agents, forces, and processes that cause changes in the
earth.
(8) "Hydrogeology" means a science that involves the study of the
waters of the earth, including the study of the occurrence,
circulation, distribution, chemistry, remediation, or quality of water
or its role as a natural agent that causes changes in the earth, and
the investigation and collection of data concerning waters in the
atmosphere or on the surface or in the interior of the earth, including
data regarding the interaction of water with other gases, solids, or
fluids.
(9) "Licensed specialty geologist" means a licensed geologist who
has met the qualifications in a specialty of geology established under
this chapter and has been issued a license in that specialty by the
board.
(10) "Practice of engineering geology" means performance of
geological service or work including but not limited to consultation,
investigation, evaluation, planning, geological mapping, and inspection
of geological work, and the responsible supervision thereof, the
performance of which is related to public welfare or the safeguarding
of life, health, property, and the environment, except as otherwise
specifically provided by this chapter, and includes but is not limited
to the commonly recognized geological practices of construction
geology, environmental geology, and urban geology.
(11) "Practice of geology" means performance of geological service
or work including but not limited to collection of geological data,
consultation, investigation, evaluation, interpreting, planning,
geological mapping, or inspection relating to a service or work that
applies to geology, and the responsible supervision thereof, the
performance of which is related to public welfare or the safeguarding
of life, health, property, and the environment, except as otherwise
specifically provided by this chapter.
(12) "Practice of geology for others" includes, but is not limited
to:
(a) The preparation of geologic reports, documents, or exhibits by
any commission, board, department, district, or division of the state
or any political subdivision thereof or of any county, city, or other
public body, or by the employees or staff members of the commission,
board, department, district, or division of the state or any political
subdivision thereof or of any county, city, or other public body when
the reports, documents, or exhibits are disseminated or made available
to the public in such a manner that the public may reasonably be
expected to rely thereon or be affected thereby; and
(b) The performance of geological services by any individual, firm,
partnership, corporation, or other association or by the employees or
staff members thereof, whether or not the principal business of the
organization is the practice of geology, which the geological reports,
documents, or exhibits constituting the practice of geology are
disseminated or made available to the public or any individual or
organization in such a manner that the public or individual or
combination of individuals may reasonably be expected to rely thereon
or be affected thereby.
However, geological reports, documents, or exhibits that are
prepared by the employees or staff members of any individual, firm,
partnership, corporation, or other association or commission, board,
department, district, or division of the state or any political
subdivision thereof or any county, city, or other public body that are
for use solely within such organizations are considered in-house
reports, documents, or exhibits and are not the practice of geology for
others unless or until the reports are disseminated or made available
as set forth in (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(13) "Practice of hydrogeology" means the performance of or offer
to perform any hydrogeologic service or work in which the public
welfare or the safeguarding of life, health, environment, or property
is concerned or involved. This includes the collection of geological
data, and consultation, investigation, evaluation, interpretation,
planning, or inspection relating to a service or work that applies
hydrogeology.
(14) "Responsible charge" means the exercise of fully independent
control and direction of geological work or the supervision of such
work, and being fully responsible, answerable, accountable, or liable
for the results.
(15) "Specialty" means a branch of geology that has been recognized
under this chapter for the purposes of licensure. Engineering geology
((is)) and hydrogeology are considered to be ((a specialty))
specialties of geology.
(16) "Subordinate" means any person who assists in the practice of
geology by a licensed geologist or an exempt person, without assuming
the responsible charge of the work.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.220.060 and 2000 c 253 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
In order to become a licensed geologist, an applicant must meet the
following requirements:
(1) The applicant shall be of good moral and ethical character as
attested to by letters of reference submitted by the applicant or as
otherwise determined by the board;
(2) The applicant shall have graduated from a course of study in
geology satisfactory to the board or satisfy educational equivalents
determined by the board;
(3) The applicant shall have a documented record of a minimum of
five years of experience in geology or a specialty of geology, obtained
subsequent to completion of the academic requirements specified in this
section, in geological work of a character satisfactory to the board,
demonstrating that the applicant is qualified to assume responsible
charge of such work upon licensing as a geologist. The board shall
require that three years of the experience be gained under the
supervision of a geologist licensed in this or any other state, or
under the supervision of others who, in the opinion of the board, are
qualified to have responsible charge of geological work;
(4) The applicant shall have passed an examination covering the
fundamentals and practice of geology prescribed or accepted by the
board;
(5) The applicant shall meet other general or individual
requirements established by the board pursuant to its authority under
this chapter;
(6) For licensing in any geological specialty recognized under this
chapter, an applicant must first be a licensed geologist under this
chapter, and then meet the following requirements:
(a) In addition to the educational requirements for licensing as a
geologist defined in subsection (2) of this section, an applicant for
licensing in any specialty of geology established by the board shall
have successfully completed advanced study pertinent to their
specialty, or equivalent seminars or on-the-job training acceptable to
the board;
(b) The applicant's experience shall include a documented record of
five years of experience, after completion of the academic requirements
specified in this subsection, in geological work in the applicable
specialty of a character satisfactory to the board, and demonstrating
that the applicant is qualified to assume responsible charge of the
specialty work upon licensing in that specialty of geology. The board
shall require that three years of the experience be gained under the
supervision of a geologist licensed in the specialty in this or any
other state, or under the supervision of others who, in the opinion of
the board, are qualified to have responsible charge of geological work
in the specialty; and
(c) The applicant must pass an examination in the applicable
specialty prescribed or accepted by the board;
(7) The following standards are applicable to experience in the
practice of geology or a specialty required under subsections (3) and
(6) of this section:
(a) Each year of professional practice of a character acceptable to
the board, carried out under the direct supervision of a geologist who
(i) is licensed in this state or is licensed in another state with
licensing standards substantially similar to those under this chapter;
or (ii) meets the educational and experience requirements for
licensing, but who is not required to be licensed under the limitations
of this chapter, qualifies as one year of professional experience in
geology;
(b) Each year of professional specialty practice of a character
acceptable to the board, carried out under the direct supervision of a
(i) geologist who is licensed in a specialty under this chapter, or who
is licensed as a specialty geologist in another state that has
licensing requirements that are substantially similar to this chapter;
or (ii) specialty geologist who meets the educational and experience
requirements for licensing, but who is not required to be licensed
under the limitations of this chapter, qualifies as one year of
practice in the applicable specialty of geology; and
(c) Experience in professional practice, of a character acceptable
to the board and acquired prior to one year after July 1, 2001,
qualifies if the experience (i) was acquired under the direct
supervision of a geologist who meets the educational and experience
requirements for licensing under this chapter, or who is licensed in
another state that has licensing requirements that are substantially
similar to this chapter; or (ii) would constitute responsible charge of
professional geological work, as determined by the board;
(8) Each year of full-time graduate study in the geological
sciences or in a specialty of geology shall qualify as one year of
professional experience in geology or the applicable specialty of
geology, up to a maximum of two years. The board may accept geological
research, teaching of geology, or a geological specialty at the college
or university level as qualifying experience, provided that such
research or teaching, in the judgment of the board, is comparable to
experience obtained in the practice of geology or a specialty thereof;
(9) An applicant who applies for licensing ((within one year after
July 1, 2001)) before July 1, 2003, shall be considered to be qualified
for licensing, without further written examination, if the applicant
possesses the following qualifications:
(a)(i) A specific record of graduation with a bachelor of science
or bachelor of arts or higher degree, with a major in geology granted
by an approved institution of higher education acceptable to the board;
or
(ii) Graduation from an approved institution of higher education in
a four-year academic degree program other than geology, but with the
required number of course hours as defined by the board to qualify as
a geologist or engineering geologist; and
(b) Experience consisting of a minimum of five years of
professional practice in geology or a specialty thereof as required
under subsections (3) and (7) of this section, of a character
acceptable to the board;
(10) An applicant who applies for licensing in a specialty within
one year after recognition of the specialty under this chapter shall be
considered qualified for licensing in that specialty, without further
written examination, if the applicant:
(a) Is qualified for licensing as a geologist in this state; and
(b) Has experience consisting of a minimum five years of
professional practice in the applicable specialty of geology as
required under subsections (3) and (7) of this section, of a character
acceptable to the board; and
(11) The geologists initially appointed to the board under RCW
18.220.030 shall be qualified for licensing under subsections (7) and
(8) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---