BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that
efficiencies, improvements in customer service, and economies can be
achieved by merging the operations of agencies with like functions.
Both the public printer and the department of general administration
provide vital direct central services to state agencies and their other
clients, which involve large scale purchasing, mailing, and
distribution and storage. Because of these functional similarities,
there is overlap and duplication of some services, administrative
functions, and facilities and equipment.
It is therefore the intent of the legislature to transfer the
powers, duties, and functions of the public printer to the department
of general administration to strengthen the ability of both agencies to
provide optimal central services to their clients. By combining the
resources of the two agencies, the legislature expects that service
duplications will be eliminated, administrative functions streamlined,
distribution networks coordinated, facility and equipment use
maximized, and other efficiencies and economies achieved.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.78 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The office of the public printer is abolished and its powers,
duties, and functions are transferred to the department of general
administration. All references to the public printer or the state
printer in the Revised Code of Washington mean the director or the
department of general administration.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the public printer
must be delivered to the custody of the department of general
administration. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor
vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the public printer
must be made available to the department of general administration.
All funds, credits, or other assets held by the public printer are
assigned to the department of general administration.
(b) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel,
funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other
tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the
performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the public printer are transferred to the
jurisdiction of the department of general administration. All
employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service
law, are assigned to the department of general administration to
perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any
loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate
thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil
service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the public printer
are continued to be acted upon by the department of general
administration. All existing contracts and obligations remain in full
force and must be performed by the department of general
administration.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the public printer does not affect the validity of any act performed
before the effective date of this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified. Nothing contained in this
section may be construed to alter any right to bargain collectively of
employees or positions in the state printing plant within the
department of general administration.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.06.070 and 2002 c 354 s 209 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
(a) The members of the legislature or to any employee of, or
position in, the legislative branch of the state government including
members, officers, and employees of the legislative council, joint
legislative audit and review committee, statute law committee, and any
interim committee of the legislature;
(b) The justices of the supreme court, judges of the court of
appeals, judges of the superior courts or of the inferior courts, or to
any employee of, or position in the judicial branch of state
government;
(c) Officers, academic personnel, and employees of technical
colleges;
(d) The officers of the Washington state patrol;
(e) Elective officers of the state;
(f) The chief executive officer of each agency;
(g) In the departments of employment security and social and health
services, the director and the director's confidential secretary; in
all other departments, the executive head of which is an individual
appointed by the governor, the director, his or her confidential
secretary, and his or her statutory assistant directors;
(h) In the case of a multimember board, commission, or committee,
whether the members thereof are elected, appointed by the governor or
other authority, serve ex officio, or are otherwise chosen:
(i) All members of such boards, commissions, or committees;
(ii) If the members of the board, commission, or committee serve on
a part-time basis and there is a statutory executive officer: The
secretary of the board, commission, or committee; the chief executive
officer of the board, commission, or committee; and the confidential
secretary of the chief executive officer of the board, commission, or
committee;
(iii) If the members of the board, commission, or committee serve
on a full-time basis: The chief executive officer or administrative
officer as designated by the board, commission, or committee; and a
confidential secretary to the chair of the board, commission, or
committee;
(iv) If all members of the board, commission, or committee serve ex
officio: The chief executive officer; and the confidential secretary
of such chief executive officer;
(i) The confidential secretaries and administrative assistants in
the immediate offices of the elective officers of the state;
(j) Assistant attorneys general;
(k) Commissioned and enlisted personnel in the military service of
the state;
(l) Inmate, student, part-time, or temporary employees, and part-time professional consultants, as defined by the Washington personnel
resources board;
(m) ((The public printer or to any)) Employees of or positions in
the state printing plant within the department of general
administration;
(n) Officers and employees of the Washington state fruit
commission;
(o) Officers and employees of the Washington ((state)) apple
((advertising)) commission;
(p) Officers and employees of the Washington state dairy products
commission;
(q) Officers and employees of the Washington tree fruit research
commission;
(r) Officers and employees of the Washington state beef commission;
(s) Officers and employees of any commission formed under chapter
15.66 RCW;
(t) Officers and employees of agricultural commissions formed under
chapter 15.65 RCW;
(u) Officers and employees of the nonprofit corporation formed
under chapter 67.40 RCW;
(v) Executive assistants for personnel administration and labor
relations in all state agencies employing such executive assistants
including but not limited to all departments, offices, commissions,
committees, boards, or other bodies subject to the provisions of this
chapter and this subsection shall prevail over any provision of law
inconsistent herewith unless specific exception is made in such law;
(w) In each agency with fifty or more employees: Deputy agency
heads, assistant directors or division directors, and not more than
three principal policy assistants who report directly to the agency
head or deputy agency heads;
(x) All employees of the marine employees' commission;
(y) Staff employed by the department of community, trade, and
economic development to administer energy policy functions and manage
energy site evaluation council activities under RCW 43.21F.045(2)(m);
(z) Staff employed by Washington State University to administer
energy education, applied research, and technology transfer programs
under RCW 43.21F.045 as provided in RCW 28B.30.900(5).
(2) The following classifications, positions, and employees of
institutions of higher education and related boards are hereby exempted
from coverage of this chapter:
(a) Members of the governing board of each institution of higher
education and related boards, all presidents, vice-presidents, and
their confidential secretaries, administrative, and personal
assistants; deans, directors, and chairs; academic personnel; and
executive heads of major administrative or academic divisions employed
by institutions of higher education; principal assistants to executive
heads of major administrative or academic divisions; other managerial
or professional employees in an institution or related board having
substantial responsibility for directing or controlling program
operations and accountable for allocation of resources and program
results, or for the formulation of institutional policy, or for
carrying out personnel administration or labor relations functions,
legislative relations, public information, development, senior computer
systems and network programming, or internal audits and investigations;
and any employee of a community college district whose place of work is
one which is physically located outside the state of Washington and who
is employed pursuant to RCW 28B.50.092 and assigned to an educational
program operating outside of the state of Washington;
(b) The governing board of each institution, and related boards,
may also exempt from this chapter classifications involving research
activities, counseling of students, extension or continuing education
activities, graphic arts or publications activities requiring
prescribed academic preparation or special training as determined by
the board: PROVIDED, That no nonacademic employee engaged in office,
clerical, maintenance, or food and trade services may be exempted by
the board under this provision;
(c) Printing craft employees in the department of printing at the
University of Washington.
(3) In addition to the exemptions specifically provided by this
chapter, the director of personnel may provide for further exemptions
pursuant to the following procedures. The governor or other
appropriate elected official may submit requests for exemption to the
director of personnel stating the reasons for requesting such
exemptions. The director of personnel shall hold a public hearing,
after proper notice, on requests submitted pursuant to this subsection.
If the director determines that the position for which exemption is
requested is one involving substantial responsibility for the
formulation of basic agency or executive policy or one involving
directing and controlling program operations of an agency or a major
administrative division thereof, the director of personnel shall grant
the request and such determination shall be final as to any decision
made before July 1, 1993. The total number of additional exemptions
permitted under this subsection shall not exceed one percent of the
number of employees in the classified service not including employees
of institutions of higher education and related boards for those
agencies not directly under the authority of any elected public
official other than the governor, and shall not exceed a total of
twenty-five for all agencies under the authority of elected public
officials other than the governor.
The salary and fringe benefits of all positions presently or
hereafter exempted except for the chief executive officer of each
agency, full-time members of boards and commissions, administrative
assistants and confidential secretaries in the immediate office of an
elected state official, and the personnel listed in subsections (1)(j)
through (u) and (x) and (2) of this section, shall be determined by the
director of personnel. Changes to the classification plan affecting
exempt salaries must meet the same provisions for classified salary
increases resulting from adjustments to the classification plan as
outlined in RCW 41.06.152.
Any person holding a classified position subject to the provisions
of this chapter shall, when and if such position is subsequently
exempted from the application of this chapter, be afforded the
following rights: If such person previously held permanent status in
another classified position, such person shall have a right of
reversion to the highest class of position previously held, or to a
position of similar nature and salary.
Any classified employee having civil service status in a classified
position who accepts an appointment in an exempt position shall have
the right of reversion to the highest class of position previously
held, or to a position of similar nature and salary.
A person occupying an exempt position who is terminated from the
position for gross misconduct or malfeasance does not have the right of
reversion to a classified position as provided for in this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.78.030 and 1994 c 82 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((public printer)) director of general administration shall
print and bind the session laws, the journals of the two houses of the
legislature, all bills, resolutions, documents, and other printing and
binding of either the senate or house, as the same may be ordered by
the legislature; and such forms, blanks, record books, and printing and
binding of every description as may be ordered by all state officers,
boards, commissions, and institutions, and the supreme court, and the
court of appeals and officers thereof, as the same may be ordered on
requisition, from time to time, by the proper authorities. This
section shall not apply to the printing of the supreme court and the
court of appeals reports, to the printing of bond certificates or bond
offering disclosure documents, to the printing of educational
publications of the state historical societies, or to any printing done
or contracted for by institutions of higher education: PROVIDED, That
institutions of higher education, in consultation with the ((public
printer)) director of general administration, develop vendor selection
procedures comparable to those used by the ((public printer)) director
of general administration for contracted printing jobs. Where any
institution or institution of higher learning of the state is or may
become equipped with facilities for doing such work, it may do any
printing: (1) For itself, or (2) for any other state institution when
such printing is done as part of a course of study relative to the
profession of printer. Any printing and binding of whatever
description as may be needed by any institution or agency of the state
department of social and health services not at Olympia, or the supreme
court or the court of appeals or any officer thereof, the estimated
cost of which shall not exceed one thousand dollars, may be done by any
private printing company in the general vicinity within the state of
Washington so ordering, if in the judgment of the officer of the agency
so ordering, the saving in time and processing justifies the award to
such local private printing concern.
Beginning on July 1, 1989, and on July 1 of each succeeding odd-numbered year, the dollar limit specified in this section shall be
adjusted as follows: The office of financial management shall
calculate such limit by adjusting the previous biennium's limit by an
appropriate federal inflationary index reflecting the rate of inflation
for the previous biennium. Such amounts shall be rounded to the
nearest fifty dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 41.56 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to the entities listed in RCW 41.56.020, this chapter
applies to the department of general administration with respect to
printing craft employees in the state printing plant within the
department of general administration.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.78.040 and 1965 c 8 s 43.78.040 are each amended to
read as follows:
All printing and binding shall be done under the general
superintendence of the authorities ordering it, and when completed
shall be delivered to such authorities, who shall sign receipts
therefor.
Before the ((public printer shall)) director of general
administration may execute any printing or binding for any office,
board, commission, or institution, the proper officer thereof shall
apply therefor by requisition.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.78.050 and 1965 c 8 s 43.78.050 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon delivering a printing or binding job and receiving a receipt
therefor the ((public printer)) director of general administration
shall make out, and deliver to the requesting agency, an itemized
statement of charges.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.78.070 and 1979 c 151 s 134 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((public printer)) director of general administration shall use
the state printing plant, which includes the state copy centers, upon
the following conditions, to wit:
(1) ((He)) The director shall do the public printing, and charge
therefor the fees as provided by law. ((He)) The director may print
the Washington Reports for the publishers thereof under a contract
approved in writing by the governor.
(2) ((The gross income of the public printer shall)) All receipts
from the state printing plant must be deposited in ((an account
designated "state printing plant revolving fund" in depositaries
approved by the state treasurer, and shall be)) the general
administration services account and disbursed ((by the public printer
by check and only)) as follows:
((First,)) (a) In payment of the actual cost of labor, material,
supplies, replacements, repairs, water, light, heat, telephone, rent,
and all other expenses necessary in the operation of the plant((:
PROVIDED, That no machinery shall be purchased except on written
approval of the governor));
((Second,)) (b) In payment of the cost of reasonable insurance upon
the printing plant((, payable to the state and of all fidelity bonds
required by law of the public printer;
Third, in payment to the public printer of a salary which shall be
fixed by the governor in accordance with the provisions of RCW
43.03.040;
Fourth, in remitting the balance to the state treasurer for the
general fund: PROVIDED, That a reasonable sum to be determined by the
governor, the public printer, and the director of financial management
shall be retained in the fund for working capital for the public
printer)).
(3) Disbursements from the general administration services account
for the cost of materials and services purchased for resale by the
state printing plant are not subject to allotment procedures provided
under chapter 43.88 RCW. Disbursements from the general administration
services account for all other expenses of the state printing plant
including administrative expenses and all staff costs are subject to
the allotment procedures provided under chapter 43.88 RCW. An
appropriation is not required for expenditures for the operation of the
state printing plant.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.78.090 and 1965 c 8 s 43.78.090 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever required by law or by the legislature or by any state
officer, board, commission, or institution, the ((public printer))
director of general administration shall keep the ((type)) copy used in
printing any matter ((forming a part of the first, second, third, and
fourth classes standing)) for a period not exceeding sixty days for use
in reprinting such matter.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.78.100 and 1993 c 379 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((public printer)) director of general administration shall
furnish all paper, stock, and binding materials required in all public
work, and shall charge the same to the state, as it is actually used,
at the actual price at which it was purchased plus up to five percent
for waste, insurance, storage, and handling. This section does not
apply to institutions of higher education.

Sec. 11 RCW 43.78.105 and 1993 c 379 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((public printer)) director of general administration may use
the state printing plant for the purposes of printing or furnishing
materials under RCW 43.78.100 if an interlocal agreement under chapter
39.34 RCW has been executed between an institution of higher education
and the ((public printer)) department of general administration.

Sec. 12 RCW 43.78.170 and 1996 c 198 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((public printer)) director of general administration shall
take all actions consistent with the ((plan)) strategy under RCW
43.19A.050 to ensure that seventy-five percent or more of the total
dollar amount of printing paper stock used by the ((printer)) state
printing plant is recycled content paper by January 1, 1997, and ninety
percent or more of the total dollar amount of printing paper stock used
by the ((printer)) state printing plant is recycled content paper by
January 1, 1999.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The legislature recognizes that the
challenge of attracting and retaining skilled employees to carry out
vital state government functions is of utmost importance. To meet this
challenge effectively, the state must have an integrated human
resources management structure to address comprehensively present and
future workforce needs.
The state's pension, compensation, and personnel laws, policies,
and practices must be coordinated and focused on ensuring productive
employees and well-managed systems to support agencies, employees, the
legislature, and the public. The current state structure is
fragmented, with personnel, compensation, and retirement functions in
separate agencies. This makes administrative efficiencies and
economies, improvements in customer service and employee
communications, and strategic planning and systems integration more
difficult to achieve.
It is, therefore, the intent of the legislature to consolidate
operations of the departments of personnel and retirement systems to
unify human resources functions for state government. To accomplish
this goal, sections 13 through 28 of this act transfer the powers,
duties, and functions of the departments of personnel and retirement
systems to a new department of human resources.
By combining the two agencies, the legislature expects a
strengthened and streamlined department of human resources. In
addition to current duties, it is the intent of the legislature that
the new department, subject to available resources, concentrate its
efforts on the following goals and objectives:
(1) Implementation of an integrated state workforce plan that
addresses the present and future skill needs of state agencies;
(2) Development of coordinated personnel, compensation, and
retirement information services and systems to support employees,
management, the legislature, and the public; and
(3) Achievement of efficiencies and economies in administration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Department" means the department of human resources.
(2) "Director" means the director of human resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 There is created a department of state
government to be known as the department of human resources. The
department is vested with all powers and duties transferred to it under
this chapter and such other powers and duties as may be authorized by
law. The department of personnel and the department of retirement
systems are abolished and their powers, duties, and functions are
transferred to the department of human resources. All references in
the Revised Code of Washington to the director or department of
personnel or the director or department of retirement systems mean the
director or department of human resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 The executive head and appointing authority
of the department is the director. The director is appointed by the
governor, subject to confirmation by the senate, and serves at the
pleasure of the governor. The director shall be paid a salary to be
fixed by the governor in accordance with RCW 43.03.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 In addition to other powers and duties
granted or transferred to the director, the director has the following
powers and duties:
(1) Supervise and administer the department in accordance with law;
(2) Appoint personnel and prescribe their duties. Except as
otherwise provided by law, personnel of the department are subject to
chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law;
(3) Appoint a deputy director and such assistant directors and
special assistants as may be needed to administer the department.
These employees are exempt from the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW,
the state civil service law;
(4) Enter into contracts on behalf of the department;
(5) Adopt such rules as are necessary to carry out the powers,
duties, and functions of the department, except where rule-making
authority is otherwise granted by law to the personnel resources board;
(6) Delegate powers, duties, and functions as the director deems
necessary for efficient administration, but the director is responsible
for the official acts of the officers and employees of the department;
(7) Advise the governor and the legislature with respect to matters
under the jurisdiction of the department;
(8) Accept and expend grants, gifts, or other funds that are
related to the purposes of the department;
(9) Carry out the policies of the governor;
(10) Create or abolish such administrative structures internal to
the department as the director deems appropriate, except as otherwise
specified by law; and
(11) Establish advisory groups as may be necessary to carry out the
purposes of the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 This chapter must not be construed to
interfere with the powers, duties, and authority of the Washington
personnel resources board created in RCW 41.06.110.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A new section is added to chapter 41.06 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to the exemptions under RCW 41.06.070, the provisions
of this chapter do not apply in the department of human resources to
the director, the director's personal secretary, the deputy director,
all assistant directors and special assistants, and one confidential
secretary for each of these officers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 (1)(a) All reports, documents, surveys,
books, records, files, papers, or written material connected with the
powers, duties, and functions transferred by sections 13 through 28 of
this act must be delivered to the custody of the department of human
resources. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles,
and other tangible property employed in connection with the powers,
duties, and functions transferred by sections 13 through 28 of this act
must be made available to the department of human resources. All
funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with the powers,
duties, and functions transferred by sections 13 through 28 of this act
are assigned to the department of human resources.
(b) Any appropriations made in connection with the powers, duties,
and functions transferred by sections 13 through 28 of this act are, on
the effective date of this section, transferred and credited to the
department of human resources.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel,
funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other
tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the
performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(2) All employees of the department of retirement systems and the
department of personnel are transferred to the jurisdiction of the
department of human resources. All employees classified under chapter
41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the department
of human resources to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as
formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be
appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing
state civil service.
(3) All rules and all pending business before any agency of state
government pertaining to the powers, duties, and functions transferred
by sections 13 through 28 of this act are continued to be acted upon by
the department of human resources. All existing contracts and
obligations remain in full force and must be performed by the
department of human resources.
(4) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel
under this section does not affect the validity of any act performed
before the effective date of this section.
(5) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(6) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the personnel
resources board as provided by law.

Sec. 21 RCW 41.06.020 and 1993 c 281 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the words used in
this chapter have the meaning given in this section.
(1) "Agency" means an office, department, board, commission, or
other separate unit or division, however designated, of the state
government and all personnel thereof; it includes any unit of state
government established by law, the executive officer or members of
which are either elected or appointed, upon which the statutes confer
powers and impose duties in connection with operations of either a
governmental or proprietary nature.
(2) "Board" means the Washington personnel resources board
established under the provisions of RCW 41.06.110, except that this
definition does not apply to the words "board" or "boards" when used in
RCW 41.06.070.
(3) "Classified service" means all positions in the state service
subject to the provisions of this chapter.
(4) "Competitive service" means all positions in the classified
service for which a competitive examination is required as a condition
precedent to appointment.
(5) "Comparable worth" means the provision of similar salaries for
positions that require or impose similar responsibilities, judgments,
knowledge, skills, and working conditions.
(6) "Noncompetitive service" means all positions in the classified
service for which a competitive examination is not required.
(7) "Department" means an agency of government that has as its
governing officer a person, or combination of persons such as a
commission, board, or council, by law empowered to operate the agency
responsible either to (a) no other public officer or (b) the governor.
(8) "Career development" means the progressive development of
employee capabilities to facilitate productivity, job satisfaction, and
upward mobility through work assignments as well as education and
training that are both state-sponsored and are achieved by individual
employee efforts, all of which shall be consistent with the needs and
obligations of the state and its agencies.
(9) "Training" means activities designed to develop job-related
knowledge and skills of employees.
(10) "Director" means the director of ((personnel)) human resources
appointed under ((the provisions of RCW 41.06.130)) section 16 of this
act.
(11) "Affirmative action" means a procedure by which racial
minorities, women, persons in the protected age category, persons with
disabilities, Vietnam-era veterans, and disabled veterans are provided
with increased employment opportunities. It shall not mean any sort of
quota system.
(12) "Institutions of higher education" means the University of
Washington, Washington State University, Central Washington University,
Eastern Washington University, Western Washington University, The
Evergreen State College, and the various state community colleges.
(13) "Related boards" means the state board for community and
technical colleges; and such other boards, councils, and commissions
related to higher education as may be established.

Sec. 22 RCW 41.06.130 and 1993 c 281 s 26 are each amended to
read as follows:
((The office of director of personnel is hereby established.
(1) The director of personnel shall be appointed by the governor.
The governor shall consult with, but shall not be obligated by
recommendations of the board. The director's appointment shall be
subject to confirmation by the senate.
(2) The director of personnel shall serve at the pleasure of the
governor.
(3) The director of personnel shall direct and supervise all the
department of personnel's administrative and technical activities in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the rules adopted
under it.))
(1) The director of human resources shall prepare for consideration
by the board proposed rules required by this chapter. ((The director's
salary shall be fixed by the governor.
(4)))(2) The director of ((personnel)) human resources may delegate
to any agency the authority to perform administrative and technical
personnel activities if the agency requests such authority and the
director of ((personnel)) human resources is satisfied that the agency
has the personnel management capabilities to effectively perform the
delegated activities. The director of ((personnel)) human resources
shall prescribe standards and guidelines for the performance of
delegated activities. If the director of ((personnel)) human resources
determines that an agency is not performing delegated activities within
the prescribed standards and guidelines, the director shall withdraw
the authority from the agency to perform such activities.

Sec. 23 RCW 41.50.010 and 1994 c 197 s 30 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly indicates
otherwise:
(1) "Actuarial value" means the present value of a change in
actuarial liability((;)).
(2) "Department" means the department of ((retirement systems;
and)) human resources.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of ((retirement
systems)) human resources.

Sec. 24 RCW 41.54.010 and 1998 c 341 s 702 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Base salary" means salaries or wages earned by a member of a
system during a payroll period for personal services and includes wages
and salaries deferred under provisions of the United States internal
revenue code, but shall exclude overtime payments, nonmoney maintenance
compensation, and lump sum payments for deferred annual sick leave,
unused accumulated vacation, unused accumulated annual leave, any form
of severance pay, any bonus for voluntary retirement, any other form of
leave, or any similar lump sum payment.
(2) "Department" means the department of ((retirement systems))
human resources.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of ((retirement
systems)) human resources.
(4) "Dual member" means a person who (a) is or becomes a member of
a system on or after July 1, 1988, (b) has been a member of one or more
other systems, and (c) has never been retired for service from a
retirement system and is not receiving a disability retirement or
disability leave benefit from any retirement system listed in RCW
41.50.030 or subsection (6) of this section.
(5) "Service" means the same as it may be defined in each
respective system. For the purposes of RCW 41.54.030, military service
granted under RCW 41.40.170(3) or 43.43.260 may only be based on
service accrued under chapter 41.40 or 43.43 RCW, respectively.
(6) "System" means the retirement systems established under
chapters 41.32, 41.40, 41.44, 41.35, and 43.43 RCW; plan 2 of the
system established under chapter 41.26 RCW; and the city employee
retirement systems for Seattle, Tacoma, and Spokane. The inclusion of
an individual first class city system is subject to the procedure set
forth in RCW 41.54.061.

Sec. 25 RCW 43.17.010 and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 16, 1993 c 472 s 17,
and 1993 c 280 s 18 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
There shall be departments of the state government which shall be
known as (1) the department of social and health services, (2) the
department of ecology, (3) the department of labor and industries, (4)
the department of agriculture, (5) the department of fish and wildlife,
(6) the department of transportation, (7) the department of licensing,
(8) the department of general administration, (9) the department of
community, trade, and economic development, (10) the department of
veterans affairs, (11) the department of revenue, (12) the department
of ((retirement systems)) human resources, (13) the department of
corrections, ((and)) (14) the department of health, and (15) the
department of financial institutions, which shall be charged with the
execution, enforcement, and administration of such laws, and invested
with such powers and required to perform such duties, as the
legislature may provide.

Sec. 26 RCW 43.17.020 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
There shall be a chief executive officer of each department to be
known as: (1) The secretary of social and health services, (2) the
director of ecology, (3) the director of labor and industries, (4) the
director of agriculture, (5) the director of fish and wildlife, (6) the
secretary of transportation, (7) the director of licensing, (8) the
director of general administration, (9) the director of community,
trade, and economic development, (10) the director of veterans affairs,
(11) the director of revenue, (12) the director of ((retirement
systems)) human resources, (13) the secretary of corrections, ((and))
(14) the secretary of health, and (15) the director of financial
institutions.
Such officers, except the secretary of transportation and the
director of fish and wildlife, shall be appointed by the governor, with
the consent of the senate, and hold office at the pleasure of the
governor. The secretary of transportation shall be appointed by the
transportation commission as prescribed by RCW 47.01.041. The director
of fish and wildlife shall be appointed by the fish and wildlife
commission as prescribed by RCW 77.04.055.

Sec. 27 RCW 42.17.2401 and 2001 c 36 s 1 and 2001 c 9 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 42.17.240, the term "executive state
officer" includes:
(1) The chief administrative law judge, the director of
agriculture, the administrator of the Washington basic health plan, the
director of the department of services for the blind, the director of
the state system of community and technical colleges, the director of
community, trade, and economic development, the secretary of
corrections, the director of ecology, the commissioner of employment
security, the chairman of the energy facility site evaluation council,
the secretary of the state finance committee, the director of financial
management, the director of fish and wildlife, the executive secretary
of the forest practices appeals board, the director of the gambling
commission, the director of general administration, the secretary of
health, the administrator of the Washington state health care
authority, the executive secretary of the health care facilities
authority, the executive secretary of the higher education facilities
authority, the executive secretary of the horse racing commission, the
director of human resources, the executive secretary of the human
rights commission, the executive secretary of the indeterminate
sentence review board, the director of the department of information
services, the director of the interagency committee for outdoor
recreation, the executive director of the state investment board, the
director of labor and industries, the director of licensing, the
director of the lottery commission, the director of the office of
minority and women's business enterprises, the director of parks and
recreation, ((the director of personnel,)) the executive director of
the public disclosure commission, ((the director of retirement
systems,)) the director of revenue, the secretary of social and health
services, the chief of the Washington state patrol, the executive
secretary of the board of tax appeals, the secretary of transportation,
the secretary of the utilities and transportation commission, the
director of veterans affairs, the president of each of the regional and
state universities and the president of The Evergreen State College,
each district and each campus president of each state community
college;
(2) Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;
(3) Each professional staff member of the legislature; and
(4) Central Washington University board of trustees, board of
trustees of each community college, each member of the state board for
community and technical colleges, state convention and trade center
board of directors, ((committee for deferred compensation,)) Eastern
Washington University board of trustees, Washington economic
development finance authority, The Evergreen State College board of
trustees, executive ethics board, forest practices appeals board,
forest practices board, gambling commission, Washington health care
facilities authority, each member of the Washington health services
commission, higher education coordinating board, higher education
facilities authority, horse racing commission, state housing finance
commission, human rights commission, indeterminate sentence review
board, board of industrial insurance appeals, information services
board, interagency committee for outdoor recreation, state investment
board, commission on judicial conduct, legislative ethics board, liquor
control board, lottery commission, marine oversight board, Pacific
Northwest electric power and conservation planning council, parks and
recreation commission, personnel appeals board, board of pilotage
commissioners, pollution control hearings board, public disclosure
commission, public pension commission, shorelines hearing board, public
employees' benefits board, salmon recovery funding board, board of tax
appeals, transportation commission, University of Washington board of
regents, utilities and transportation commission, Washington state
maritime commission, Washington personnel resources board, Washington
public power supply system executive board, Washington State University
board of regents, Western Washington University board of trustees, and
fish and wildlife commission.

Sec. 28 RCW 43.33A.020 and 2002 c 303 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby created the state investment board to consist of
fifteen members to be appointed as provided in this section.
(1) One member who is an active member of the public employees'
retirement system and has been an active member for at least five
years. This member shall be appointed by the governor, subject to
confirmation by the senate, from a list of nominations submitted by
organizations representing active members of the system. The initial
term of appointment shall be one year.
(2) One member who is an active member of the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system and has been an active
member for at least five years. This member shall be appointed by the
governor, subject to confirmation by the senate, from a list of
nominations submitted by organizations representing active members of
the system. The initial term of appointment shall be two years.
(3) One member who is an active member of the teachers' retirement
system and has been an active member for at least five years. This
member shall be appointed by the superintendent of public instruction
subject to confirmation by the senate. The initial term of appointment
shall be three years.
(4) The state treasurer or the assistant state treasurer if
designated by the state treasurer.
(5) A member of the state house of representatives. This member
shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives.
(6) A member of the state senate. This member shall be appointed
by the president of the senate.
(7) One member who is a retired member of a state retirement system
shall be appointed by the governor, subject to confirmation by the
senate. The initial term of appointment shall be three years.
(8) The director of the department of labor and industries.
(9) The director of the department of ((retirement systems)) human
resources.
(10) One member who is an active member of the school employees'
retirement system and has at least five years of service credit. This
member shall be appointed by the superintendent of public instruction
subject to confirmation by the senate. The initial term of appointment
shall be three years.
(11) Five nonvoting members appointed by the state investment board
who are considered experienced and qualified in the field of
investments.
The legislative members shall serve terms of two years. The
initial legislative members appointed to the board shall be appointed
no sooner than January 10, 1983. The position of a legislative member
on the board shall become vacant at the end of that member's term on
the board or whenever the member ceases to be a member of the senate or
house of representatives from which the member was appointed.
After the initial term of appointment, all other members of the
state investment board, except ex officio members, shall serve terms of
three years and shall hold office until successors are appointed.
Members' terms, except for ex officio members, shall commence on
January 1 of the year in which the appointments are made.
Members may be reappointed for additional terms. Appointments for
vacancies shall be made for the unexpired terms in the same manner as
the original appointments. Any member may be removed from the board
for cause by the member's respective appointing authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 The director of personnel and the director
of retirement systems shall, by December 1, 2003, jointly submit a plan
to the governor for consolidation and smooth transition of the
department of personnel and the department of retirement systems into
the department of human resources. The plan shall include, but not be
limited to, recommendations for any additional statutory changes
necessary to implement the consolidated agency.

Sec. 30 RCW 47.64.011 and 1983 c 15 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the
definitions in this section shall apply.
(1) "Arbitration" means the procedure whereby the parties involved
in an impasse submit their differences to a third party for a final and
binding decision or as provided in this chapter.
(2) "Arbitrator" means either a single arbitrator or a panel of
three arbitrators as provided in RCW 47.64.240.
(3) "Collective bargaining representative" means the persons
designated by the secretary of transportation and employee
organizations to be the exclusive representatives during collective
bargaining negotiations.
(4) "Department of transportation" means the department as defined
in RCW 47.01.021.
(5) "Ferry employee" means any employee of the marine
transportation division of the department of transportation who is a
member of a collective bargaining unit represented by a ferry employee
organization and does not include an exempt employee pursuant to RCW
41.06.079.
(6) "Ferry employee organization" means any labor organization
recognized to represent a collective bargaining unit of ferry
employees.
(7) "Ferry system management" means those management personnel of
the marine transportation division of the department of transportation
who have been vested with the day-to-day management responsibilities of
the Washington state ferry system by the transportation commission and
who are not members of a collective bargaining unit represented by a
ferry employee organization.
(8) "Lockout" means the refusal of ferry system management to
furnish work to ferry employees in an effort to get ferry employee
organizations to make concessions during collective bargaining,
grievance, or other labor relation negotiations. Curtailment of
employment of ferry employees due to lack of work resulting from a
strike or work stoppage, as defined in subsection (11) of this section,
shall not be considered a lockout.
(9) (("Marine employees' commission" means the commission created
in RCW 47.64.280.
(10))) "Office of financial management" means the office as created
in RCW 43.41.050.
(10) "Public employment relations commission" means the office as
created in RCW 41.58.010.
(11) "Strike or work stoppage" means a ferry employee's refusal, in
concerted action with others, to report to duty, or his or her wilful
absence from his or her position, or his or her stoppage or slowdown of
work, or his or her abstinence in whole or in part from the full,
faithful, and proper performance of the duties of employment, for the
purpose of inducing, influencing, or coercing a change in conditions,
compensation, rights, privileges, or obligations of his, her, or any
other ferry employee's employment. A refusal, in good faith, to work
under conditions which pose an endangerment to the health and safety of
ferry employees or the public, as determined by the master of the
vessel, shall not be considered a strike for the purposes of this
chapter.
(12) "Transportation commission" means the commission as defined in
RCW 47.01.021.

Sec. 31 RCW 47.64.090 and 1983 c 15 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
If any party assumes the operation and maintenance of any ferry or
ferry system by rent, lease, or charter from the department of
transportation, such party shall assume and be bound by all the
provisions herein and any agreement or contract for such operation of
any ferry or ferry system entered into by the department shall provide
that the wages to be paid, hours of employment, working conditions and
seniority rights of employees will be established by the ((marine
employees')) public employment relations commission in accordance with
the terms and provisions of this chapter and it shall further provide
that all labor disputes shall be adjudicated in accordance with chapter
47.64 RCW.

Sec. 32 RCW 47.64.190 and 1983 c 15 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No negotiated agreement or arbitration order may become
effective and in force until five calendar days after an agreement has
been negotiated or an arbitration order entered for each and every
ferry employee bargaining unit.
(2) Upon the conclusion of negotiations or arbitration procedures
with all ferry employee bargaining units, the secretary shall ascertain
whether the cumulative fiscal requirements of all such agreements and
arbitration orders are within the limitations imposed by RCW 47.64.180.
(3) If the secretary finds that budgetary or fare restrictions will
be exceeded, he shall, within five calendar days of completion of
negotiations or arbitration with the last bargaining unit to conclude
an agreement, submit all agreements and arbitration awards to the
((marine employees')) public employment relations commission for a
binding determination whether the limitations of RCW 47.64.180 have
been exceeded.
(4) The ((marine employees')) public employment relations
commission shall review all negotiated agreements and arbitration
orders, and may take written or oral testimony from the parties,
regarding compliance with RCW 47.64.180. Within fifteen calendar days
of receiving the secretary's request for review, the commission shall
determine by a majority vote of its members whether or not the
cumulative effect of all such agreements and orders exceeds the
limitations of RCW 47.64.180.
(5) If the ((marine employees')) public employment relations
commission determines that the limitations of RCW 47.64.180 would be
exceeded if all agreements and arbitration orders were given full force
and effect, it shall order the minimum percentage reduction in straight
time wage provisions applied equally across the board to all agreements
or arbitration orders which will result in compliance with RCW
47.64.180.
(6) Whenever the secretary requests a determination by the ((marine
employees')) public employment relations commission pursuant to this
section, the effect of all agreements and arbitration orders shall be
stayed, pending the commission's final determination.

Sec. 33 RCW 47.64.210 and 1983 c 15 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
In the absence of an impasse agreement between the parties or the
failure of either party to utilize its procedures by August 1st in each
odd-numbered year, the ((marine employees')) public employment
relations commission shall, upon the request of either party, appoint
an impartial and disinterested person to act as mediator pursuant to
RCW 47.64.280. It is the function of the mediator to bring the parties
together to effectuate a settlement of the dispute, but the mediator
shall not compel the parties to agree.

Sec. 34 RCW 47.64.220 and 1999 c 256 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Prior to collective bargaining, the ((marine employees'))
public employment relations commission shall conduct a salary survey.
The results of the survey shall be published in a report which shall be
a public document comparing wages, hours, employee benefits, and
conditions of employment of involved ferry employees with those of
public and private sector employees in states along the west coast of
the United States, including Alaska, and in British Columbia doing
directly comparable but not necessarily identical work, giving
consideration to factors peculiar to the area and the classifications
involved. Such survey report shall be for the purpose of disclosing
generally prevailing levels of compensation, benefits, and conditions
of employment. It shall be used to guide generally but not to define
or limit collective bargaining between the parties. The commission
shall make such other findings of fact as the parties may request
during bargaining or impasse.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, salary
and employee benefit information collected from private employers that
identifies a specific employer with the salary and employee benefit
rates which that employer pays to its employees is not subject to
public disclosure under chapter 42.17 RCW.
(3) A person or entity, having reason to believe that the salary
survey results are inaccurate, may submit a petition to the state
auditor requesting an audit of the data upon which the salary survey
results are based. The state auditor shall review and analyze all data
collected for the salary survey, including proprietary information, but
is prohibited from disclosing the salary survey data to any other
person or entity, except by court order.

Sec. 35 RCW 47.64.240 and 1989 c 327 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If impasse persists fourteen days after the mediator has been
appointed, or beyond any other date mutually agreed to by the parties,
all impasse items shall be submitted to arbitration pursuant to this
section, and that arbitration shall be binding upon the parties.
(2) Each party shall submit to the other within four days of
request, a final offer on the impasse items with proof of service of a
copy upon the other party. Each party shall also submit a copy of a
draft of the proposed collective bargaining agreement to the extent to
which agreement has been reached and the name of its selected
arbitrator. The parties may continue to negotiate all offers until an
agreement is reached or a decision rendered by the panel of
arbitrators.
As an alternative procedure, the two parties may agree to submit
the dispute to a single arbitrator. If the parties cannot agree on the
arbitrator within four days, the selection shall be made pursuant to
subsection (5) of this section. The full costs of arbitration under
this provision shall be shared equally by the parties to the dispute.
(3) The submission of the impasse items to the arbitrators shall be
limited to those issues upon which the parties have not reached
agreement. With respect to each such item, the arbitration panel award
shall be restricted to the final offers on each impasse item submitted
by the parties to the arbitration board on each impasse item.
(4) The panel of arbitrators shall consist of three members
appointed in the following manner:
(a) One member shall be appointed by the secretary of
transportation;
(b) One member shall be appointed by the ferry employee
organization;
(c) One member shall be appointed mutually by the members appointed
by the secretary of transportation and the employee organization. The
last member appointed shall be the chairman of the panel of
arbitrators. No member appointed may be an employee of the parties;
(d) Ferry system management and the employee organization shall
each pay the fees and expenses incurred by the arbitrator each
selected. The fee and expenses of the chairman of the panel shall be
shared equally by each party.
(5) If the third member has not been selected within four days of
notification as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a list of
seven arbitrators shall be submitted to the parties by the ((marine
employees')) public employment relations commission. The two
arbitrators selected by ferry system management and the ferry employee
organization shall determine by lot which arbitrator shall remove the
first name from the list submitted by the ((marine employees')) public
employment relations commission. The second arbitrator and the first
arbitrator shall alternately remove one additional name until only one
name remains. The person whose name remains shall become the chairman
of the panel of arbitrators and shall call a meeting within thirty
days, or at such time mutually agreed to by the parties, at a location
designated by him or her. In lieu of a list of seven nominees for the
third member being submitted by the ((marine employees')) public
employment relations commission, the parties may mutually agree to have
either the Federal Mediation and Conciliation Service or the American
Arbitration Association submit a list of seven nominees.
(6) If a vacancy occurs on the panel of arbitrators, the selection
for replacement of that member shall be in the same manner and within
the same time limits as the original member was chosen. No final award
under subsection (3) of this section may be made by the panel until
three arbitrators have been chosen.
(7) The panel of arbitrators shall at no time engage in an effort
to mediate or otherwise settle the dispute in any manner other than
that prescribed in this section.
(8) From the time of appointment until such time as the panel of
arbitrators makes its final determination, there shall be no discussion
concerning recommendations for settlement of the dispute by the members
of the panel of arbitrators with parties other than those who are
direct parties to the dispute. The panel of arbitrators may conduct
formal or informal hearings to discuss offers submitted by both
parties.
(9) The panel of arbitrators shall consider, in addition to any
other relevant factors, the following factors:
(a) Past collective bargaining contracts between the parties
including the bargaining that led up to the contracts;
(b) Comparison of wages, hours, employee benefits, and conditions
of employment of the involved ferry employees with those of public and
private sector employees in states along the west coast of the United
States, including Alaska, and in British Columbia doing directly
comparable but not necessarily identical work, giving consideration to
factors peculiar to the area and the classifications involved;
(c) The interests and welfare of the public, the ability of the
ferry system to finance economic adjustments, and the effect of the
adjustments on the normal standard of services;
(d) The right of the legislature to appropriate and to limit funds
for the conduct of the ferry system; and
(e) The limitations on ferry toll increases and operating subsidies
as may be imposed by the legislature.
(10) The chairman of the panel of arbitrators may hold hearings and
administer oaths, examine witnesses and documents, take testimony and
receive evidence, issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses
and the production of records, and delegate such powers to other
members of the panel of arbitrators. The chairman of the panel of
arbitrators may petition the superior court in Thurston county, or any
county in which any hearing is held, to enforce the order of the
chairman compelling the attendance of witnesses and the production of
records.
(11) A majority of the panel of arbitrators shall within thirty
days after its first meeting select the most reasonable offer, in its
judgment, of the final offers on each impasse item submitted by the
parties.
(12) The selections by the panel of arbitrators and items agreed
upon by the ferry system management and the employee organization shall
be deemed to be the collective bargaining agreement between the
parties.
(13) The determination of the panel of arbitrators shall be by
majority vote and shall be final and binding, subject to RCW 47.64.180
and 47.64.190. The panel of arbitrators shall give written explanation
for its selection and inform the parties of its decision.

Sec. 36 RCW 47.64.280 and 1984 c 287 s 95 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((There is created the marine employees' commission. The
governor shall appoint the commission with the consent of the senate.
The commission shall consist of three members: One member to be
appointed from labor, one member from industry, and one member from the
public who has significant knowledge of maritime affairs. The public
member shall be chairman of the commission. One of the original
members shall be appointed for a term of three years, one for a term of
four years, and one for a term of five years. Their successors shall
be appointed for terms of five years each, except that any person
chosen to fill a vacancy shall be appointed only for the unexpired term
of the member whom he succeeds. Commission members are eligible for
reappointment. Any member of the commission may be removed by the
governor, upon notice and hearing, for neglect of duty or malfeasance
in office, but for no other cause. Commission members are not eligible
for state retirement under chapter 41.40 RCW by virtue of their service
on the commission. Members of the commission shall be compensated in
accordance with RCW 43.03.250 and shall receive reimbursement for
official travel and other expenses at the same rate and on the same
terms as provided for the transportation commission by RCW 47.01.061.
The payments shall be made from the Puget Sound ferry operations
account.
(2))) The ((marine employees')) public employment relations
commission shall: (a) Adjust all complaints, grievances, and disputes
between labor and management arising out of the operation of the ferry
system as provided in RCW 47.64.150; (b) provide for impasse mediation
as required in RCW 47.64.210; (c) conduct fact-finding and provide
salary surveys as required in RCW 47.64.220; and (d) provide for the
selection of an impartial arbitrator as required in RCW 47.64.240(5).
(((3))) (2) In adjudicating all complaints, grievances, and
disputes, the party claiming labor disputes shall, in writing, notify
the ((marine employees')) public employment relations commission, which
shall make careful inquiry into the cause thereof and issue an order
advising the ferry employee, or the ferry employee organization
representing him or her, and the department of transportation, as to
the decision of the public employment relations commission.
The parties are entitled to offer evidence relating to disputes at
all hearings conducted by the public employment relations commission.
The orders and awards of the public employment relations commission are
final and binding upon any ferry employee or employees or their
representative affected thereby and upon the department.
The public employment relations commission shall adopt rules of
procedure under chapter 34.05 RCW.
The public employment relations commission has the authority to
subpoena any ferry employee or employees, or their representatives, and
any member or representative of the department, and any witnesses. The
public employment relations commission may require attendance of
witnesses and the production of all pertinent records at any hearings
held by the public employment relations commission. The subpoenas of
the public employment relations commission are enforceable by order of
any superior court in the state of Washington for the county within
which the proceeding may be pending. The public employment relations
commission may hire staff as necessary, appoint consultants, enter into
contracts, and conduct studies as reasonably necessary to carry out
this chapter.

Sec. 37 RCW 41.58.020 and 1993 c 379 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It shall be the duty of the commission, in order to prevent or
minimize interruptions growing out of labor disputes, to assist
employers and employees to settle such disputes through mediation and
fact-finding.
(2) The commission, through the director, may proffer its services
in any labor dispute arising under a collective bargaining statute
administered by the commission, either upon its own motion or upon the
request of one or more of the parties to the dispute, whenever in its
judgment such dispute threatens to cause a substantial disruption to
the public welfare.
(3) If the director is not able to bring the parties to agreement
by mediation within a reasonable time, the director shall seek to
induce the parties to voluntarily seek other means of settling the
dispute without resort to strike or other coercion, including
submission to the employees in the bargaining unit of the employer's
last offer of settlement for approval or rejection in a secret ballot.
The failure or refusal of either party to agree to any procedure
suggested by the director shall not be deemed a violation of any duty
or obligation imposed by this chapter.
(4) Final adjustment by a method agreed upon by the parties is
declared to be the desirable method for settlement of grievance
disputes arising over the application or interpretation of an existing
collective bargaining agreement. The commission is directed to make
its mediation and fact-finding services available in the settlement of
such grievance disputes only as a last resort.
(5) Notwithstanding the requirements of this chapter, settlements
of grievance disputes involving employees of the marine transportation
division of the department of transportation shall be administered in
accordance with the requirements of chapter 47.64 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 38 (1) The marine employees' commission is
hereby abolished and its powers, duties, and functions are hereby
transferred to the public employment relations commission. All
references to the commissioners or the marine employees' commission in
the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the director
or the public employment relations commission.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the marine employees'
commission shall be delivered to the custody of the public employment
relations commission. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor
vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the marine employees'
commission shall be made available to the public employment relations
commission. All funds, credits, or other assets held by the marine
employees' commission shall be assigned to the public employment
relations commission.
(b) Any appropriations made to the marine employees' commission
shall, on the effective date of this section, be transferred and
credited to the public employment relations commission.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel,
funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other
tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the
performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All rules and all pending business before the marine employees'
commission shall be continued and acted upon by the public employment
relations commission. All existing contracts and obligations shall
remain in full force and shall be performed by the public employment
relations commission.
(4) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the marine employees' commission shall not affect the validity of any
act performed before the effective date of this section.
(5) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(6) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the personnel
resources board as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 39 The public employment relations commission
shall report by September 1, 2004, to the house of representatives
appropriations committee, the senate ways and means committee and the
transportation committees in both houses on the progress it has made in
subsuming the responsibilities and duties of the marine employees'
commission. This report shall include the process used to transfer the
functions from the marine employees' commission to the public
employment relations commission, any difficulties encountered in the
transfer, how those difficulties were overcome, and whether any
legislation may be needed to fully achieve the transfer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 40 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Department" means the department of gaming.
(2) "Director" means the director of gaming.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 41 There is created a department of state
government to be known as the department of gaming. The department is
vested with all powers and duties transferred to it under this chapter
and such other powers and duties as may be authorized by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 42 The executive head and appointing authority
of the department is the director. The director shall be appointed by
the governor, with the consent of the senate, and shall serve at the
pleasure of the governor. The director shall be paid a salary to be
fixed by the governor in accordance with RCW 43.03.040. If a vacancy
occurs in the position while the senate is not in session, the governor
shall make a temporary appointment until the next meeting of the
senate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 43 It is the intent of the legislature
wherever possible to place the internal affairs of the department under
the control of the director in order that the director may institute
therein the flexible, alert, and intelligent management of its business
that changing contemporary circumstances require. Therefore, whenever
the director's authority is not specifically limited by law, the
director has complete charge and supervisory powers over the
department. The director may create such administrative structures as
the director considers appropriate, except as otherwise specified by
law. The director may employ such assistants and personnel as
necessary for the general administration of the department. This
employment shall be in accordance with the state civil service law,
chapter 41.06 RCW, except as otherwise provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 44 Any power or duty vested in or transferred
to the director by law or executive order may be delegated by the
director to the deputy director or to any other assistant or
subordinate; but the director shall be responsible for the official
acts of the officers and employees of the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 45 A new section is added to chapter 41.06 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to the exemptions under RCW 41.06.070, the provisions
of this chapter shall not apply in the department of gaming to the
director, the director's personal secretary, the deputy director, all
division directors and assistant directors, and one confidential
secretary for each of these officers.

Sec. 46 RCW 43.17.010 and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 16, 1993 c 472 s 17,
and 1993 c 280 s 18 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
There shall be departments of the state government which shall be
known as (1) the department of social and health services, (2) the
department of ecology, (3) the department of labor and industries, (4)
the department of agriculture, (5) the department of fish and wildlife,
(6) the department of transportation, (7) the department of licensing,
(8) the department of general administration, (9) the department of
community, trade, and economic development, (10) the department of
veterans affairs, (11) the department of revenue, (12) the department
of retirement systems, (13) the department of corrections, ((and)) (14)
the department of health, ((and)) (15) the department of financial
institutions, and (16) the department of gaming, which shall be charged
with the execution, enforcement, and administration of such laws, and
invested with such powers and required to perform such duties, as the
legislature may provide.

Sec. 47 RCW 43.17.020 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
There shall be a chief executive officer of each department to be
known as: (1) The secretary of social and health services, (2) the
director of ecology, (3) the director of labor and industries, (4) the
director of agriculture, (5) the director of fish and wildlife, (6) the
secretary of transportation, (7) the director of licensing, (8) the
director of general administration, (9) the director of community,
trade, and economic development, (10) the director of veterans affairs,
(11) the director of revenue, (12) the director of retirement systems,
(13) the secretary of corrections, ((and)) (14) the secretary of
health, ((and)) (15) the director of financial institutions, and (16)
the director of gaming.
Such officers, except the secretary of transportation and the
director of fish and wildlife, shall be appointed by the governor, with
the consent of the senate, and hold office at the pleasure of the
governor. The secretary of transportation shall be appointed by the
transportation commission as prescribed by RCW 47.01.041. The director
of fish and wildlife shall be appointed by the fish and wildlife
commission as prescribed by RCW 77.04.055.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 48 (1) The gambling commission and the horse
racing commission are hereby abolished and their powers, duties, and
functions are hereby transferred to the department of gaming. All
references to the executive directors of the gambling commission or the
horse racing commission or the gambling commission or the horse racing
commission in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean
the director or the department of gaming.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the gambling
commission or the horse racing commission shall be delivered to the
custody of the department of gaming. All cabinets, furniture, office
equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the
gambling commission or the horse racing commission shall be made
available to the department of gaming. All funds, credits, or other
assets held by the gambling commission or the horse racing commission
shall be assigned to the department of gaming.
(b) Any appropriations made to the gambling commission or the horse
racing commission shall, on the effective date of this section, be
transferred and credited to the department of gaming.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel,
funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other
tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the
performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the gambling commission and the horse racing
commission are transferred to the jurisdiction of the department of
gaming. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state
civil service law, are assigned to the department of gaming to perform
their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of
rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in
accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the gambling
commission and the horse racing commission shall be continued and acted
upon by the department of gaming. All existing contracts and
obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the
department of gaming.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the gambling commission and the horse racing commission shall not
affect the validity of any act performed before the effective date of
this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the personnel
resources board as provided by law.

Sec. 49 RCW 9.46.0201 and 1987 c 4 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Amusement game," as used in this chapter, means a game played for
entertainment in which:
(1) The contestant actively participates;
(2) The outcome depends in a material degree upon the skill of the
contestant;
(3) Only merchandise prizes are awarded;
(4) The outcome is not in the control of the operator;
(5) The wagers are placed, the winners are determined, and a
distribution of prizes or property is made in the presence of all
persons placing wagers at such game; and
(6) Said game is conducted or operated by any agricultural fair,
person, association, or organization in such manner and at such
locations as may be authorized by rules ((and regulations)) adopted by
the ((commission)) department pursuant to this chapter ((as now or
hereafter amended)).
Cake walks as commonly known and fish ponds as commonly known shall
be treated as amusement games for all purposes under this chapter.

Sec. 50 RCW 9.46.0205 and 2002 c 369 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Bingo," as used in this chapter, means a game conducted only in
the county within which the organization is principally located in
which prizes are awarded on the basis of designated numbers or symbols
on a card conforming to numbers or symbols selected at random and in
which no cards are sold except at the time and place of said game, when
said game is conducted by a bona fide charitable or nonprofit
organization, or if an agricultural fair authorized under chapters
15.76 and 36.37 RCW, which does not conduct bingo on more than twelve
consecutive days in any calendar year, and except in the case of any
agricultural fair as authorized under chapters 15.76 and 36.37 RCW, no
person other than a bona fide member or an employee of said
organization takes any part in the management or operation of said
game, and no person who takes any part in the management or operation
of said game takes any part in the management or operation of any game
conducted by any other organization or any other branch of the same
organization, unless approved by the ((commission)) department, and no
part of the proceeds thereof inure to the benefit of any person other
than the organization conducting said game. For the purposes of this
section, the organization shall be deemed to be principally located in
the county within which it has its primary business office. If the
organization has no business office, the organization shall be deemed
to be located in the county of principal residence of its chief
executive officer: PROVIDED, That any organization which is conducting
any licensed and established bingo game in any locale as of January 1,
1981, shall be exempt from the requirement that such game be conducted
in the county in which the organization is principally located.

Sec. 51 RCW 9.46.0209 and 2000 c 233 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization," as used in this
chapter, means: (1) Any organization duly existing under the
provisions of chapter 24.12, 24.20, or 24.28 RCW, any agricultural fair
authorized under the provisions of chapters 15.76 or 36.37 RCW, or any
nonprofit corporation duly existing under the provisions of chapter
24.03 RCW for charitable, benevolent, eleemosynary, educational, civic,
patriotic, political, social, fraternal, athletic or agricultural
purposes only, or any nonprofit organization, whether incorporated or
otherwise, when found by the ((commission)) department to be organized
and operating for one or more of the aforesaid purposes only, all of
which in the opinion of the ((commission)) department have been
organized and are operated primarily for purposes other than the
operation of gambling activities authorized under this chapter; or (2)
any corporation which has been incorporated under Title 36 U.S.C. and
whose principal purposes are to furnish volunteer aid to members of the
armed forces of the United States and also to carry on a system of
national and international relief and to apply the same in mitigating
the sufferings caused by pestilence, famine, fire, floods, and other
national calamities and to devise and carry on measures for preventing
the same. Such an organization must have been organized and
continuously operating for at least twelve calendar months immediately
preceding making application for any license to operate a gambling
activity, or the operation of any gambling activity authorized by this
chapter for which no license is required. It must have not less than
fifteen bona fide active members each with the right to an equal vote
in the election of the officers, or board members, if any, who
determine the policies of the organization in order to receive a
gambling license. An organization must demonstrate to the
((commission)) department that it has made significant progress toward
the accomplishment of the purposes of the organization during the
twelve consecutive month period preceding the date of application for
a license or license renewal. The fact that contributions to an
organization do not qualify for charitable contribution deduction
purposes or that the organization is not otherwise exempt from payment
of federal income taxes pursuant to the internal revenue code of 1954,
as amended, shall constitute prima facie evidence that the organization
is not a bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization for the
purposes of this section.
Any person, association or organization which pays its employees,
including members, compensation other than is reasonable therefor under
the local prevailing wage scale shall be deemed paying compensation
based in part or whole upon receipts relating to gambling activities
authorized under this chapter and shall not be a bona fide charitable
or nonprofit organization for the purposes of this chapter.
For the purposes of RCW 9.46.0315 and 9.46.110, a bona fide
nonprofit organization also includes a credit union organized and
operating under state or federal law. All revenue less prizes and
expenses received from raffles conducted by credit unions must be
devoted to purposes authorized under this section for charitable and
nonprofit organizations.

Sec. 52 RCW 9.46.0217 and 1994 c 120 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Commercial stimulant," as used in this chapter, means an activity
is operated as a commercial stimulant, for the purposes of this
chapter, only when it is an activity operated in connection with an
established business, with the purpose of increasing the volume of
sales of food or drink for consumption on that business premises. The
((commission)) department may by rule establish guidelines and criteria
for applying this definition to its applicants and licensees for
gambling activities authorized by this chapter as commercial
stimulants.

Sec. 53 RCW 9.46.0233 and 2000 c 178 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) "Fund raising event," as used in this chapter, means a fund
raising event conducted during any seventy-two consecutive hours but
exceeding twenty-four consecutive hours and not more than once in any
calendar year or a fund raising event conducted not more than twice
each calendar year for not more than twenty-four consecutive hours each
time by a bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization as defined in
RCW 9.46.0209 other than any agricultural fair referred to thereunder,
upon authorization therefor by the ((commission)) department, which the
legislature hereby authorizes to issue a license therefor, with or
without fee, permitting the following activities, or any of them,
during such event: Bingo, amusement games, contests of chance,
lotteries, and raffles. However: (a) Gross wagers and bets or revenue
generated from participants under subsection (2) of this section
received by the organization less the amount of money paid by the
organization as winnings, or as payment for services or equipment
rental under subsection (2) of this section, and for the purchase cost
of prizes given as winnings do not exceed ten thousand dollars during
the total calendar days of such fund raising event in the calendar
year; (b) such activities shall not include any mechanical gambling or
lottery device activated by the insertion of a coin or by the insertion
of any object purchased by any person taking a chance by gambling in
respect to the device; (c) only bona fide members of the organization
who are not paid for such service or persons licensed or approved by
the ((commission)) department under subsection (2) of this section
shall participate in the management or operation of the activities, and
all income therefrom, after deducting the cost of prizes and other
expenses, shall be devoted solely to the lawful purposes of the
organization; and (d) such organization shall notify the appropriate
local law enforcement agency of the time and place where such
activities shall be conducted. The ((commission)) department shall
require an annual information report setting forth in detail the
expenses incurred and the revenue received relative to the activities
permitted.
(2) Bona fide charitable or nonprofit organizations may hire a
person or vendor, who is licensed or approved by the ((commission))
department, to organize and conduct a fund raising event on behalf of
the sponsoring organization subject to the following restrictions:
(a) The person or vendor may not provide the facility for the
event;
(b) The person or vendor may use paid personnel and may be
compensated by a fixed fee determined prior to the event, but may not
share in the proceeds of the event;
(c) All wagers must be made with scrip or chips having no cash
value. At the end of the event, participants may be given the
opportunity to purchase or otherwise redeem their scrip or chips for
merchandise prizes;
(d) The value of all purchased prizes must not exceed ten percent
of the gross revenue from the event; and
(e) Only members and guests of the sponsoring organization may
participate in the event.
(3) Bona fide charitable or nonprofit organizations holding a
license to conduct a fund raising event may join together to jointly
conduct a fund raising event if:
(a) Approval to do so is received from the ((commission))
department; and
(b) The method of dividing the income and expenditures and the
method of recording and handling of funds are disclosed to the
((commission)) department in the application for approval of the joint
fund raising event and are approved by the ((commission)) department.
The gross wagers and bets or revenue generated from participants
under subsection (2) of this section received by the organizations less
the amount of money paid by the organizations as winnings, or as
payment for services or equipment rental under subsection (2) of this
section, and for the purchase costs of prizes given as winnings may not
exceed ten thousand dollars during the total calendar days of such
event. The net receipts each organization receives shall count against
the organization's annual limit stated in this subsection.
A joint fund raising event shall count against only the lead
organization or organizations receiving fifty percent or more of the
net receipts for the purposes of the number of such events an
organization may conduct each year.
The ((commission)) department may issue a joint license for a joint
fund raising event and charge a license fee for such license according
to a schedule of fees adopted by the ((commission)) department which
reflects the added cost to the ((commission)) department of licensing
more than one licensee for the event.

Sec. 54 RCW 9.46.0261 and 1987 c 4 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Member" and "bona fide member," as used in this chapter, mean a
person accepted for membership in an organization eligible to be
licensed by the ((commission)) department under this chapter upon
application, with such action being recorded in the official minutes of
a regular meeting or who has held full and regular membership status in
the organization for a period of not less than twelve consecutive
months prior to participating in the management or operation of any
gambling activity. Such membership must in no way be dependent upon,
or in any way related to, the payment of consideration to participate
in any gambling activity.
Member or bona fide member shall include only members of an
organization's specific chapter or unit licensed by the ((commission))
department or otherwise actively conducting the gambling activity:
PROVIDED, That:
(1) Members of chapters or local units of a state, regional or
national organization may be considered members of the parent
organization for the purpose of a gambling activity conducted by the
parent organization, if the rules of the parent organization so permit;
(2) Members of a bona fide auxiliary to a principal organization
may be considered members of the principal organization for the purpose
of a gambling activity conducted by the principal organization.
Members of the principal organization may also be considered members of
its auxiliary for the purpose of a gambling activity conducted by the
auxiliary; and
(3) Members of any chapter or local unit within the jurisdiction of
the next higher level of the parent organization, and members of a bona
fide auxiliary to that chapter or unit, may assist any other chapter or
local unit of that same organization licensed by the ((commission))
department in the conduct of gambling activities.
No person shall be a member of any organization if that person's
primary purpose for membership is to become, or continue to be, a
participant in, or an operator or manager of, any gambling activity or
activities.

Sec. 55 RCW 9.46.0273 and 1987 c 4 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Punch boards" and "pull-tabs," as used in this chapter, shall be
given their usual and ordinary meaning as of July 16, 1973, except that
such definition may be revised by the ((commission)) department
pursuant to rules ((and regulations promulgated)) adopted pursuant to
this chapter.

Sec. 56 RCW 9.46.0282 and 1997 c 118 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Social card game" as used in this chapter means a card game that
constitutes gambling and is authorized by the ((commission)) department
under RCW 9.46.070. Authorized card games may include a house-banked
or a player-funded banked card game. No one may participate in the
card game or have an interest in the proceeds of the card game who is
not a player or a person licensed by the ((commission)) department to
participate in social card games. There shall be two or more
participants in the card game who are players or persons licensed by
the ((commission)) department. The card game must be played in
accordance with the rules adopted by the ((commission)) department
under RCW 9.46.070, which shall include but not be limited to rules for
the collection of fees, limitation of wagers, and management of player
funds. The number of tables authorized shall be set by the
((commission)) department but shall not exceed a total of fifteen
separate tables per establishment.

Sec. 57 RCW 9.46.0311 and 1987 c 4 s 26 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature hereby authorizes bona fide charitable or nonprofit
organizations to conduct bingo games, raffles, amusement games, and
fund raising events, and to utilize punch boards and pull-tabs and to
allow their premises and facilities to be used by only members, their
guests, and members of a chapter or unit organized under the same
state, regional, or national charter or constitution, to play social
card games authorized by the ((commission)) department, when licensed,
conducted or operated pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and
rules ((and regulations)) adopted pursuant thereto.

Sec. 58 RCW 9.46.0315 and 1991 c 192 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Bona fide charitable or bona fide nonprofit organizations organized
primarily for purposes other than the conduct of raffles, are hereby
authorized to conduct raffles without obtaining a license to do so from
the ((commission)) department when such raffles are held in accordance
with all other requirements of this chapter, other applicable laws, and
rules of the ((commission)) department; when gross revenues from all
such raffles held by the organization during the calendar year do not
exceed five thousand dollars; and when tickets to such raffles are sold
only to, and winners are determined only from among, the regular
members of the organization conducting the raffle. The organization
may provide unopened containers of beverages containing alcohol as
raffle prizes if the appropriate permit has been obtained from the
liquor control board: PROVIDED, That the term members for this purpose
shall mean only those persons who have become members prior to the
commencement of the raffle and whose qualification for membership was
not dependent upon, or in any way related to, the purchase of a ticket,
or tickets, for such raffles.

Sec. 59 RCW 9.46.0321 and 1987 c 4 s 28 are each amended to read
as follows:
Bona fide charitable or bona fide nonprofit organizations organized
primarily for purposes other than the conduct of such activities are
hereby authorized to conduct bingo, raffles, and amusement games,
without obtaining a license to do so from the ((commission)) department
but only when:
(1) Such activities are held in accordance with all other
requirements of this chapter, other applicable laws, and rules of the
((commission)) department;
(2) Said activities are, alone or in any combination, conducted no
more than twice each calendar year and over a period of no more than
twelve consecutive days each time, notwithstanding the limitations of
RCW 9.46.0205: PROVIDED, That a raffle conducted under this subsection
may be conducted for a period longer than twelve days;
(3) Only bona fide members of that organization, who are not paid
for such services, participate in the management or operation of the
activities;
(4) Gross revenues to the organization from all the activities
together do not exceed five thousand dollars during any calendar year;
(5) All revenue therefrom, after deducting the cost of prizes and
other expenses of the activity, is devoted solely to the purposes for
which the organization qualifies as a bona fide charitable or nonprofit
organization;
(6) The organization gives notice at least five days in advance of
the conduct of any of the activities to the local police agency of the
jurisdiction within which the activities are to be conducted of the
organization's intent to conduct the activities, the location of the
activities, and the date or dates they will be conducted; and
(7) The organization conducting the activities maintains records
for a period of one year from the date of the event which accurately
show at a minimum the gross revenue from each activity, details of the
expenses of conducting the activities, and details of the uses to which
the gross revenue therefrom is put.

Sec. 60 RCW 9.46.0331 and 1991 c 287 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature hereby authorizes any person to conduct or operate
amusement games when licensed and operated pursuant to the provisions
of this chapter and rules ((and regulations)) adopted by the
((commission)) department at such locations as the ((commission))
department may authorize. The rules shall provide for at least the
following:
(1) Persons other than bona fide charitable or bona fide nonprofit
organizations shall conduct amusement games only after obtaining a
special amusement game license from the ((commission)) department.
(2) Amusement games may be conducted under such a license only as
a part of, and upon the site of:
(a) Any agricultural fair as authorized under chapter 15.76 or
36.37 RCW; or
(b) A civic center of a county, city, or town; or
(c) A world's fair or similar exposition that is approved by the
bureau of international expositions at Paris, France; or
(d) A community-wide civic festival held not more than once
annually and sponsored or approved by the city, town, or county in
which it is held; or
(e) A commercial exposition organized and sponsored by an
organization or association representing the retail sales and service
operators conducting business in a shopping center or other commercial
area developed and operated for retail sales and service, but only upon
a parking lot or similar area located in said shopping center or
commercial area for a period of no more than seventeen consecutive days
by any licensee during any calendar year; or
(f) An amusement park. An amusement park is a group of activities,
at a permanent location, to which people go to be entertained through
a combination of various mechanical or aquatic rides, theatrical
productions, motion picture, and/or slide show presentations with food
and drink service. The amusement park must include at least five
different mechanical, or aquatic rides, three additional activities,
and the gross receipts must be primarily from these amusement
activities; or
(g) Within a regional shopping center. A regional shopping center
is a shopping center developed and operated for retail sales and
service by retail sales and service operators and consisting of more
than six hundred thousand gross square feet not including parking
areas. Amusement games conducted as a part of, and upon the site of,
a regional shopping center shall not be subject to the prohibition on
revenue sharing set forth in RCW 9.46.120(2); or
(h) A location that possesses a valid license from the Washington
state liquor (([control])) control board and prohibits minors on their
premises; or
(i) Movie theaters, bowling alleys, miniature golf course
facilities, and amusement centers. For the purposes of this section an
amusement center shall be defined as a permanent location whose primary
source of income is from the operation of ten or more amusement
devices; or
(j) Any business whose primary activity is to provide food service
for on premises consumption and who offers family entertainment which
includes at least three of the following activities: Amusement
devices; theatrical productions; mechanical rides; motion pictures; and
slide show presentations.
(3) No amusement games may be conducted in any location except in
conformance with local zoning, fire, health, and similar regulations.
In no event may the licensee conduct any amusement games at any of the
locations set out in subsection (2) of this section without first
having obtained the written permission to do so from the person or
organization owning the premises or an authorized agent thereof, and
from the persons sponsoring the fair, exhibition, commercial
exhibition, or festival, or from the city or town operating the civic
center, in connection with which the games are to be operated.
(4) In no event may a licensee conduct any amusement games at the
location described in subsection (2)(g) of this section, without, at
the location of such games, providing adult supervision during all
hours the licensee is open for business at such location, prohibiting
school-age minors from entry during school hours, maintaining full-time
personnel whose responsibilities include maintaining security and daily
machine maintenance, and providing for hours for the close of business
at such location that are no later than 10:00 p.m. on Fridays and
Saturdays and on all other days that are the same as those of the
regional shopping center in which the licensee is located.
(5) In no event may a licensee conduct any amusement game at a
location described in subsection (2)(i) or (j) of this section,
without, at the location of such games, providing adult supervision
during all hours the licensee is open for business at such location,
prohibiting school-age minors from playing licensed amusement games
during school hours, maintaining full-time personnel whose
responsibilities include maintaining security and daily machine
maintenance, and prohibiting minors from playing the amusement games
after 10:00 p.m. on any day.

Sec. 61 RCW 9.46.0335 and 1987 c 4 s 31 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature hereby authorizes any person, association, or
organization to conduct sports pools without a license to do so from
the ((commission)) department but only when the outcome of which is
dependent upon the score, or scores, of a certain athletic contest and
which is conducted only in the following manner:
(1) A board or piece of paper is divided into one hundred equal
squares, each of which constitutes a chance to win in the sports pool
and each of which is offered directly to prospective contestants at one
dollar or less;
(2) The purchaser of each chance or square signs his or her name on
the face of each square or chance he or she purchases; and
(3) At some time not later than prior to the start of the subject
athletic contest the pool is closed and no further chances in the pool
are sold;
(4) After the pool is closed a prospective score is assigned by
random drawing to each square;
(5) All money paid by entrants to enter the pool less taxes is paid
out as the prize or prizes to those persons holding squares assigned
the winning score or scores from the subject athletic contest;
(6) The sports pool board is available for inspection by any person
purchasing a chance thereon, the ((commission)) department, or by any
law enforcement agency upon demand at all times prior to the payment of
the prize;
(7) The person or organization conducting the pool is conducting no
other sports pool on the same athletic event; and
(8) The sports pool conforms to any rules ((and regulations)) of
the ((commission)) department applicable thereto.

Sec. 62 RCW 9.46.0345 and 1987 c 4 s 33 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature hereby authorizes bowling establishments to
conduct, without the necessity of obtaining a permit or license to do
so, as a commercial stimulant, a bowling activity which permits bowlers
to purchase tickets from the establishment for a predetermined and
posted amount of money, which tickets are then selected by the luck of
the draw and the holder of the matching ticket so drawn has an
opportunity to bowl a strike and if successful receives a predetermined
and posted monetary prize: PROVIDED, That all sums collected by the
establishment from the sale of tickets shall be returned to purchasers
of tickets and no part of the proceeds shall inure to any person other
than the participants winning in the game or a recognized charity. The
tickets shall be sold, and accounted for, separately from all other
sales of the establishment. The price of any single ticket shall not
exceed one dollar. Accounting records shall be available for
inspection during business hours by any person purchasing a chance
thereon, by the ((commission)) department or its representatives, or by
any law enforcement agency.

Sec. 63 RCW 9.46.0351 and 1999 c 143 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature hereby authorizes any bona fide charitable or
nonprofit organization which is licensed pursuant to RCW 66.24.400, and
its officers and employees, to allow the use of the premises,
furnishings, and other facilities not gambling devices of such
organization by members of the organization, and members of a chapter
or unit organized under the same state, regional, or national charter
or constitution, who engage as players in the following types of
gambling activities only:
(a) Social card games; and
(b) Social dice games, which shall be limited to contests of
chance, the outcome of which are determined by one or more rolls of
dice.
(2) Bona fide charitable or nonprofit organizations shall not be
required to be licensed by the ((commission)) department in order to
allow use of their premises in accordance with this section. However,
the following conditions must be met:
(a) No organization, corporation, or person shall collect or obtain
or charge any percentage of or shall collect or obtain any portion of
the money or thing of value wagered or won by any of the players:
PROVIDED, That a player may collect his or her winnings; and
(b) No organization, corporation, or person shall collect or obtain
any money or thing of value from, or charge or impose any fee upon, any
person which either enables him or her to play or results in or from
his or her playing: PROVIDED, That this subsection shall not preclude
collection of a membership fee which is unrelated to participation in
gambling activities authorized under this section.

Sec. 64 RCW 9.46.0356 and 2000 c 228 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature authorizes a business to conduct a promotional
contest of chance as defined in this section, in this state, or
partially in this state, whereby the elements of prize and chance are
present but in which the element of consideration is not present.
(2) Promotional contests of chance under this section are not
gambling as defined in RCW 9.46.0237.
(3) Promotional contests of chance shall be conducted as
advertising and promotional undertakings solely for the purpose of
advertising or promoting the services, goods, wares, and merchandise of
a business.
(4) No person eligible to receive a prize in a promotional contest
of chance may be required to:
(a) Pay any consideration to the promoter or operator of the
business in order to participate in the contest; or
(b) Purchase any service, goods, wares, merchandise, or anything of
value from the business, however, for other than contests entered
through a direct mail solicitation, the promoter or sponsor may give
additional entries or chances upon purchase of service, goods, wares,
or merchandise if the promoter or sponsor provides an alternate method
of entry requiring no consideration.
(5)(a) As used in this section, "consideration" means anything of
pecuniary value required to be paid to the promoter or sponsor in order
to participate in a promotional contest. Such things as visiting a
business location, placing or answering a telephone call, completing an
entry form or customer survey, or furnishing a stamped, self-addressed
envelope do not constitute consideration.
(b) Coupons or entry blanks obtained by purchase of a bona fide
newspaper or magazine or in a program sold in conjunction with a
regularly scheduled sporting event are not consideration.
(6) Unless authorized by the ((commission)) department, equipment
or devices made for use in a gambling activity are prohibited from use
in a promotional contest.
(7) This section shall not be construed to permit noncompliance
with chapter 19.170 RCW, promotional advertising of prizes, and chapter
19.86 RCW, unfair business practices.

Sec. 65 RCW 9.46.0361 and 1987 c 4 s 36 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature hereby authorizes bona fide charitable or nonprofit
organizations to conduct, without the necessity of obtaining a permit
or license to do so from the ((commission)) department, turkey shoots
permitting wagers of money. Such contests shall not constitute such
gambling or lottery as otherwise prohibited in this chapter, or be
subject to civil or criminal penalties. Such organizations must be
organized for purposes other than the conduct of turkey shoots.
Such turkey shoots shall be held in accordance with all other
requirements of this chapter, other applicable laws, and rules that may
be adopted by the ((commission)) department. Gross revenues from all
such turkey shoots held by the organization during the calendar year
shall not exceed five thousand dollars. Turkey shoots conducted under
this section shall meet the following requirements:
(1) The target shall be divided into one hundred or fewer equal
sections, with each section constituting a chance to win. Each chance
shall be offered directly to a prospective contestant for one dollar or
less;
(2) The purchaser of each chance shall sign his or her name on the
face of the section he or she purchases;
(3) The person shooting at the target shall not be a participant in
the contest, but shall be a member of the organization conducting the
contest;
(4) Participation in the contest shall be limited to members of the
organization which is conducting the contest and their guests;
(5) The target shall contain the following information:
(a) Distance from the shooting position to the target;
(b) The gauge of the shotgun;
(c) The type of choke on the barrel;
(d) The size of shot that will be used; and
(e) The prize or prizes that are to be awarded in the contest;
(6) The targets, shotgun, and ammunition shall be available for
inspection by any person purchasing a chance thereon, the
((commission)) department, or by any law enforcement agency upon
demand, at all times before the prizes are awarded;
(7) The turkey shoot shall award the prizes based upon the greatest
number of shots striking a section;
(8) No turkey shoot may offer as a prize the right to advance or
continue on to another turkey shoot or turkey shoot target; and
(9) Only bona fide members of the organization who are not paid for
such service may participate in the management or operation of the
turkey shoot, and all income therefrom, after deducting the cost of
prizes and other expenses, shall be devoted solely to the lawful
purposes of the organization.

Sec. 66 RCW 9.46.060 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 218 s 6 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The attorney general shall be general counsel for the ((state
gambling commission)) department and shall assign such assistants as
may be necessary in carrying out the purposes and provisions of this
chapter, which shall include instituting and prosecuting any actions
and proceedings necessary thereto.
(2) The state auditor shall audit the books, records, and affairs
of the ((commission)) department annually. The ((commission))
department shall pay to the state treasurer for the credit of the state
auditor such funds as may be necessary to defray the costs of such
audits. The ((commission)) department may provide for additional
audits by certified public accountants. All such audits shall be
public records of the state.
The payment for legal services and audits as authorized in this
section shall be paid upon authorization of the ((commission))
department from moneys in the gambling revolving fund.

Sec. 67 RCW 9.46.070 and 2002 c 119 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((commission)) department shall have the following powers and
duties:
(1) To authorize and issue licenses for a period not to exceed one
year to bona fide charitable or nonprofit organizations approved by the
((commission)) department meeting the requirements of this chapter and
any rules ((and regulations)) adopted pursuant thereto permitting said
organizations to conduct bingo games, raffles, amusement games, and
social card games, to utilize punch boards and pull-tabs in accordance
with the provisions of this chapter and any rules ((and regulations))
adopted pursuant thereto and to revoke or suspend said licenses for
violation of any provisions of this chapter or any rules ((and
regulations)) adopted pursuant thereto: PROVIDED, That the
((commission)) department shall not deny a license to an otherwise
qualified applicant in an effort to limit the number of licenses to be
issued: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the ((commission)) department or
director shall not issue, deny, suspend, or revoke any license because
of considerations of race, sex, creed, color, or national origin: AND
PROVIDED FURTHER, That the ((commission)) department may authorize the
director to temporarily issue or suspend licenses subject to final
action by the ((commission)) department;
(2) To authorize and issue licenses for a period not to exceed one
year to any person, association, or organization operating a business
primarily engaged in the selling of items of food or drink for
consumption on the premises, approved by the ((commission)) department
meeting the requirements of this chapter and any rules ((and
regulations)) adopted pursuant thereto permitting said person,
association, or organization to utilize punch boards and pull-tabs and
to conduct social card games as a commercial stimulant in accordance
with the provisions of this chapter and any rules ((and regulations))
adopted pursuant thereto and to revoke or suspend said licenses for
violation of any provisions of this chapter and any rules ((and
regulations)) adopted pursuant thereto: PROVIDED, That the
((commission)) department shall not deny a license to an otherwise
qualified applicant in an effort to limit the number of licenses to be
issued: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the ((commission)) department may
authorize the director to temporarily issue or suspend licenses subject
to final action by the ((commission)) department;
(3) To authorize and issue licenses for a period not to exceed one
year to any person, association, or organization approved by the
((commission)) department meeting the requirements of this chapter and
meeting the requirements of any rules ((and regulations)) adopted by
the ((commission)) department pursuant to this chapter ((as now or
hereafter amended)), permitting said person, association, or
organization to conduct or operate amusement games in such manner and
at such locations as the ((commission)) department may determine;
(4) To authorize, require, and issue, for a period not to exceed
one year, such licenses as the ((commission)) department may by rule
provide, to any person, association, or organization to engage in the
selling, distributing, or otherwise supplying or in the manufacturing
of devices for use within this state for those activities authorized by
this chapter;
(5) To establish a schedule of annual license fees for carrying on
specific gambling activities upon the premises, and for such other
activities as may be licensed by the ((commission)) department, which
fees shall provide to the ((commission)) department not less than an
amount of money adequate to cover all costs incurred by the
((commission)) department relative to licensing under this chapter and
the enforcement by the ((commission)) department of the provisions of
this chapter and rules ((and regulations)) adopted pursuant thereto:
PROVIDED, That all licensing fees shall be submitted with an
application therefor and such portion of said fee as the ((commission))
department may determine, based upon its cost of processing and
investigation, shall be retained by the ((commission)) department upon
the withdrawal or denial of any such license application as its
reasonable expense for processing the application and investigation
into the granting thereof: PROVIDED FURTHER, That if in a particular
case the basic license fee established by the ((commission)) department
for a particular class of license is less than the ((commission's))
department's actual expenses to investigate that particular
application, the ((commission)) department may at any time charge to
that applicant such additional fees as are necessary to pay the
((commission)) department for those costs. The ((commission))
department may decline to proceed with its investigation and no license
shall be issued until the ((commission)) department has been fully paid
therefor by the applicant: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the
((commission)) department may establish fees for the furnishing by it
to licensees of identification stamps to be affixed to such devices and
equipment as required by the ((commission)) department and for such
other special services or programs required or offered by the
((commission)) department, the amount of each of these fees to be not
less than is adequate to offset the cost to the ((commission))
department of the stamps and of administering their dispersal to
licensees or the cost of administering such other special services,
requirements or programs;
(6) To prescribe the manner and method of payment of taxes, fees
and penalties to be paid to or collected by the ((commission))
department;
(7) To require that applications for all licenses contain such
information as may be required by the ((commission)) department:
PROVIDED, That all persons (a) having a managerial or ownership
interest in any gambling activity, or the building in which any
gambling activity occurs, or the equipment to be used for any gambling
activity, or (b) participating as an employee in the operation of any
gambling activity, shall be listed on the application for the license
and the applicant shall certify on the application, under oath, that
the persons named on the application are all of the persons known to
have an interest in any gambling activity, building, or equipment by
the person making such application: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the
((commission)) department shall require fingerprinting and national
criminal history background checks on any persons seeking licenses,
certifications, or permits under this chapter or of any person holding
an interest in any gambling activity, building, or equipment to be used
therefor, or of any person participating as an employee in the
operation of any gambling activity. All national criminal history
background checks shall be conducted using fingerprints submitted to
the United States department of justice-federal bureau of
investigation. The ((commission)) department must establish rules to
delineate which persons named on the application are subject to
national criminal history background checks. In identifying these
persons, the ((commission)) department must take into consideration the
nature, character, size, and scope of the gambling activities requested
by the persons making such applications;
(8) To require that any license holder maintain records as directed
by the ((commission)) department and submit such reports as the
((commission)) department may deem necessary;
(9) To require that all income from bingo games, raffles, and
amusement games be recorded and reported as established by rule ((or
regulation)) of the ((commission)) department to the extent deemed
necessary by considering the scope and character of the gambling
activity in such a manner that will disclose gross income from any
gambling activity, amounts received from each player, the nature and
value of prizes, and the fact of distributions of such prizes to the
winners thereof;
(10) To regulate and establish maximum limitations on income
derived from bingo. In establishing limitations pursuant to this
subsection the ((commission)) department shall take into account (i)
the nature, character, and scope of the activities of the licensee;
(ii) the source of all other income of the licensee; and (iii) the
percentage or extent to which income derived from bingo is used for
charitable, as distinguished from nonprofit, purposes. However, the
((commission's)) department's powers and duties granted by this
subsection are discretionary and not mandatory;
(11) To regulate and establish the type and scope of and manner of
conducting the gambling activities authorized by this chapter,
including but not limited to, the extent of wager, money, or other
thing of value which may be wagered or contributed or won by a player
in any such activities;
(12) To regulate the collection of and the accounting for the fee
which may be imposed by an organization, corporation, or person
licensed to conduct a social card game on a person desiring to become
a player in a social card game in accordance with RCW 9.46.0282;
(13) To cooperate with and secure the cooperation of county, city,
and other local or state agencies in investigating any matter within
the scope of its duties and responsibilities;
(14) In accordance with RCW 9.46.080, to adopt such rules ((and
regulations)) as are deemed necessary to carry out the purposes and
provisions of this chapter. All rules ((and regulations)) shall be
adopted pursuant to the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05
RCW;
(15) To set forth for the perusal of counties, city-counties,
cities and towns, model ordinances by which any legislative authority
thereof may enter into the taxing of any gambling activity authorized
by this chapter;
(16) To establish and regulate a maximum limit on salaries or wages
which may be paid to persons employed in connection with activities
conducted by bona fide charitable or nonprofit organizations and
authorized by this chapter, where payment of such persons is allowed,
and to regulate and establish maximum limits for other expenses in
connection with such authorized activities, including but not limited
to rent or lease payments. However, the ((commissioner's))
department's powers and duties granted by this subsection are
discretionary and not mandatory.
In establishing these maximum limits the ((commission)) department
shall take into account the amount of income received, or expected to
be received, from the class of activities to which the limits will
apply and the amount of money the games could generate for authorized
charitable or nonprofit purposes absent such expenses. The
((commission)) department may also take into account, in its
discretion, other factors, including but not limited to, the local
prevailing wage scale and whether charitable purposes are benefited by
the activities;
(17) To authorize, require, and issue for a period not to exceed
one year such licenses or permits, for which the ((commission))
department may by rule provide, to any person to work for any operator
of any gambling activity authorized by this chapter in connection with
that activity, or any manufacturer, supplier, or distributor of devices
for those activities in connection with such business. The
((commission)) department shall not require that persons working solely
as volunteers in an authorized activity conducted by a bona fide
charitable or bona fide nonprofit organization, who receive no
compensation of any kind for any purpose from that organization, and
who have no managerial or supervisory responsibility in connection with
that activity, be licensed to do such work. The ((commission))
department may require that licensees employing such unlicensed
volunteers submit to the ((commission)) department periodically a list
of the names, addresses, and dates of birth of the volunteers. If any
volunteer is not approved by the ((commission)) department, the
((commission)) department may require that the licensee not allow that
person to work in connection with the licensed activity;
(18) To publish and make available at the office of the
((commission)) department or elsewhere to anyone requesting it a list
of the ((commission)) department licensees, including the name,
address, type of license, and license number of each licensee;
(19) To establish guidelines for determining what constitutes
active membership in bona fide nonprofit or charitable organizations
for the purposes of this chapter; ((and))
(20) To license, regulate, and supervise all race meets held in
this state under chapter 67.16 RCW; and
(21) To perform all other matters and things necessary to carry out
the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 68 RCW 9.46.0701 and 2002 c 369 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((commission)) department may allow existing licensees under
RCW 9.46.070(1) to share facilities at one location.

Sec. 69 RCW 9.46.071 and 1994 c 218 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature recognizes that some individuals in this state are
problem or compulsive gamblers. Because the state promotes and
regulates gambling through the activities of the ((state lottery
commission, the Washington horse racing commission, and the Washington
state gambling commission)) department, the state has the
responsibility to continue to provide resources for the support of
services for problem and compulsive gamblers. Therefore, the
((Washington state gambling commission, the Washington horse racing
commission,)) department and the state lottery commission shall jointly
develop informational signs concerning problem and compulsive gambling
which include a toll-free hot line number for problem and compulsive
gamblers. The signs shall be placed in the establishments of gambling
licensees, horse racing licensees, and lottery retailers.

Sec. 70 RCW 9.46.075 and 1981 c 139 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((commission)) department may deny an application, or suspend
or revoke any license or permit issued by it, for any reason or
reasons, it deems to be in the public interest. These reasons shall
include, but not be limited to, cases wherein the applicant or
licensee, or any person with any interest therein:
(1) Has violated, failed or refused to comply with the provisions,
requirements, conditions, limitations or duties imposed by chapter 9.46
RCW and any amendments thereto, or any rules adopted by the
((commission)) department pursuant thereto, or when a violation of any
provision of chapter 9.46 RCW, or any ((commission)) department rule,
has occurred upon any premises occupied or operated by any such person
or over which he or she has substantial control;
(2) Knowingly causes, aids, abets, or conspires with another to
cause, any person to violate any of the laws of this state or the rules
of the ((commission)) department;
(3) Has obtained a license or permit by fraud, misrepresentation,
concealment, or through inadvertence or mistake;
(4) Has been convicted of, or forfeited bond upon a charge of, or
pleaded guilty to, forgery, larceny, extortion, conspiracy to defraud,
wilful failure to make required payments or reports to a governmental
agency at any level, or filing false reports therewith, or of any
similar offense or offenses, or of bribing or otherwise unlawfully
influencing a public official or employee of any state or the United
States, or of any crime, whether a felony or misdemeanor involving any
gambling activity or physical harm to individuals or involving moral
turpitude;
(5) Denies the ((commission)) department or its authorized
representatives, including authorized local law enforcement agencies,
access to any place where a licensed activity is conducted or who fails
promptly to produce for inspection or audit any book, record, document
or item required by law or ((commission)) department rule;
(6) Shall fail to display its license on the premises where the
licensed activity is conducted at all times during the operation of the
licensed activity;
(7) Makes a misrepresentation of, or fails to disclose, a material
fact to the ((commission)) department;
(8) Fails to prove, by clear and convincing evidence, that he, she
or it is qualified in accordance with the provisions of this chapter;
(9) Is subject to current prosecution or pending charges, or a
conviction which is under appeal, for any of the offenses included
under subsection (4) of this section: PROVIDED, That at the request of
an applicant for an original license, the ((commission)) department may
defer decision upon the application during the pendency of such
prosecution or appeal;
(10) Has pursued or is pursuing economic gain in an occupational
manner or context which is in violation of the criminal or civil public
policy of this state if such pursuit creates probable cause to believe
that the participation of such person in gambling or related activities
would be inimical to the proper operation of an authorized gambling or
related activity in this state. For the purposes of this section,
occupational manner or context shall be defined as the systematic
planning, administration, management or execution of an activity for
financial gain;
(11) Is a career offender or a member of a career offender cartel
or an associate of a career offender or career offender cartel in such
a manner which creates probable cause to believe that the association
is of such a nature as to be inimical to the policy of this chapter or
to the proper operation of the authorized gambling or related
activities in this state. For the purposes of this section, career
offender shall be defined as any person whose behavior is pursued in an
occupational manner or context for the purpose of economic gain
utilizing such methods as are deemed criminal violations of the public
policy of this state. A career offender cartel shall be defined as any
group of persons who operate together as career offenders.
For the purpose of reviewing any application for a license and for
considering the denial, suspension or revocation of any license the
((gambling commission)) department may consider any prior criminal
conduct of the applicant or licensee and the provisions of RCW 9.95.240
and of chapter 9.96A RCW shall not apply to such cases.

Sec. 71 RCW 9.46.077 and 1981 c 139 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((commission)) department, when suspending any license for a
period of thirty days or less, may further provide in the order of
suspension that such suspension shall be vacated upon payment to the
((commission)) department of a monetary penalty in an amount then fixed
by the ((commission)) department.

Sec. 72 RCW 9.46.080 and 1994 c 218 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The commission shall employ a full time director, who shall be
the administrator for the commission in carrying out its powers and
duties and who shall issue rules and regulations adopted by the
commission governing the activities authorized hereunder and shall
supervise commission employees in carrying out the purposes and
provisions of this chapter. In addition,)) The director shall employ
a deputy director, not more than three assistant directors, together
with such investigators and enforcement officers and such staff as the
((commission)) department determines is necessary to carry out the
purposes and provisions of this chapter. The director, the deputy
director, the assistant directors, and personnel occupying positions
requiring the performing of undercover investigative work shall be
exempt from the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW((, as now law or
hereafter amended)). Neither the director nor any ((commission))
department employee working therefor shall be an officer or manager of
any bona fide charitable or bona fide nonprofit organization, or of any
organization which conducts gambling activity in this state.
The director((, subject to the approval of the commission,)) is
authorized to enter into agreements on behalf of the ((commission))
department for mutual assistance and services, based upon actual costs,
with any state or federal agency or with any city, town, or county, and
such state or local agency is authorized to enter into such an
agreement with the ((commission)) department. If a needed service is
not available from another agency of state government within a
reasonable time, the director may obtain that service from private
industry.

Sec. 73 RCW 9.46.090 and 1987 c 505 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Subject to RCW 40.07.040, the ((commission)) department shall, from
time to time, make reports to the governor and the legislature covering
such matters in connection with this chapter as the governor and the
legislature may require. These reports shall be public documents and
contain such general information and remarks as the ((commission))
department deems pertinent thereto and any information requested by
either the governor or members of the legislature: PROVIDED, That the
((commission appointed pursuant to RCW 9.46.040)) department may
conduct a thorough study of the types of gambling activity permitted
and the types of gambling activity prohibited by this chapter and may
make recommendations to the legislature as to: (1) Gambling activity
that ought to be permitted; (2) gambling activity that ought to be
prohibited; (3) the types of licenses and permits that ought to be
required; (4) the type and amount of tax that ought to be applied to
each type of permitted gambling activity; (5) any changes which may be
made to the law of this state which further the purposes and policies
set forth in RCW 9.46.010 ((as now law or hereafter amended)); and (6)
any other matter that the ((commission)) department may deem
appropriate. ((Members of the commission and its)) Department staff
may contact the legislature, or any of its members, at any time, to
advise it of recommendations of the ((commission)) department.

Sec. 74 RCW 9.46.095 and 1989 c 175 s 41 are each amended to read
as follows:
No court of the state of Washington other than the superior court
of Thurston county shall have jurisdiction over any action or
proceeding against the ((commission)) department or any member thereof
for anything done or omitted to be done in or arising out of the
performance of his or her duties under this title: PROVIDED, That an
appeal from an adjudicative proceeding involving a final decision of
the ((commission)) department to deny, suspend, or revoke a license
shall be governed by chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure
Act.
Neither the ((commission)) department nor any ((member or members))
employee thereof shall be personally liable in any action at law for
damages sustained by any person because of any acts performed or done,
or omitted to be done, by the ((commission or any member of the
commission,)) department or any employee of the ((commission))
department, in the performance of his or her duties and in the
administration of this title.

Sec. 75 RCW 9.46.100 and 2002 c 371 s 901 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby created the gambling revolving fund which shall
consist of all moneys receivable for licensing, penalties, forfeitures,
and all other moneys, income, or revenue received by the ((commission))
department. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. All
moneys received by the ((commission)) department or any employee
thereof, except for change funds and an amount of petty cash as fixed
by rule ((or regulation)) of the ((commission)) department, shall be
deposited each day in a depository approved by the state treasurer and
transferred to the state treasurer to be credited to the gambling
revolving fund. Disbursements from the revolving fund shall be on
authorization of the ((commission or a duly authorized representative
thereof)) director or the director's designee. In order to maintain an
effective expenditure and revenue control the gambling revolving fund
shall be subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW but no
appropriation shall be required to permit expenditures and payment of
obligations from such fund. All expenses relative to ((commission))
department business, including but not limited to salaries and expenses
of the director and other ((commission)) department employees shall be
paid from the gambling revolving fund.
((During the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the gambling revolving fund to the state general fund
such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund and
reductions made by the 2002 supplemental appropriations act for
administrative efficiencies and savings.))

Sec. 76 RCW 9.46.116 and 1985 c 7 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
The ((commission)) department shall charge fees or increased fees
on pull tabs sold over-the-counter and on sales from punchboards and
pull tab devices at levels necessary to assure that the increased
revenues are equal or greater to the amount of revenue lost by removing
the special tax on coin-operated gambling devices by the 1984 repeal of
RCW 9.46.115.

Sec. 77 RCW 9.46.120 and 1997 c 394 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except in the case of an agricultural fair as authorized under
chapters 15.76 and 36.37 RCW, no person other than a member of a bona
fide charitable or nonprofit organization (and their employees) or any
other person, association or organization (and their employees)
approved by the ((commission)) department, shall take any part in the
management or operation of any gambling activity authorized under this
chapter unless approved by the ((commission)) department. No person
who takes any part in the management or operation of any such gambling
activity shall take any part in the management or operation of any
gambling activity conducted by any other organization or any other
branch of the same organization unless approved by the ((commission))
department. No part of the proceeds of the activity shall inure to the
benefit of any person other than the organization conducting such
gambling activities or if such gambling activities be for the
charitable benefit of any specific persons designated in the
application for a license, then only for such specific persons as so
designated.
(2) No bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization or any other
person, association or organization shall conduct any gambling activity
authorized under this chapter in any leased premises if rental for such
premises is unreasonable or to be paid, wholly or partly, on the basis
of a percentage of the receipts or profits derived from such gambling
activity.

Sec. 78 RCW 9.46.130 and 1981 c 139 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
The premises and paraphernalia, and all the books and records of
any person, association or organization conducting gambling activities
authorized under this chapter and any person, association or
organization receiving profits therefrom or having any interest therein
shall be subject to inspection and audit at any reasonable time, with
or without notice, upon demand, by the ((commission)) department or its
designee, the attorney general or his designee, the chief of the
Washington state patrol or his designee or the prosecuting attorney,
sheriff or director of public safety or their designees of the county
wherein located, or the chief of police or his designee of any city or
town in which said organization is located, for the purpose of
determining compliance or noncompliance with the provisions of this
chapter and any rules ((or regulations)) or local ordinances adopted
pursuant thereto. A reasonable time for the purpose of this section
shall be: (1) If the items or records to be inspected or audited are
located anywhere upon a premises any portion of which is regularly open
to the public or members and guests, then at any time when the premises
are so open, or at which they are usually open; or (2) if the items or
records to be inspected or audited are not located upon a premises set
out in subsection (1) above, then any time between the hours of 8:00
a.m. and 9:00 p.m., Monday through Friday.
The ((commission)) department shall be provided at such reasonable
intervals as the ((commission)) department shall determine with a
report, under oath, detailing all receipts and disbursements in
connection with such gambling activities together with such other
reasonable information as required in order to determine whether such
activities comply with the purposes of this chapter or any local
ordinances relating thereto.

Sec. 79 RCW 9.46.140 and 1989 c 175 s 42 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((commission)) department or its authorized representative
may:
(a) Make necessary public or private investigations within or
outside of this state to determine whether any person has violated or
is about to violate this chapter or any rule or order hereunder, or to
aid in the enforcement of this chapter or in the prescribing of rules
and forms hereunder; and
(b) Inspect the books, documents, and records of any person lending
money to or in any manner financing any license holder or applicant for
a license or receiving any income or profits from the use of such
license for the purpose of determining compliance or noncompliance with
the provisions of this chapter or the rules ((and regulations)) adopted
pursuant thereto.
(2) For the purpose of any investigation or proceeding under this
chapter, the ((commission)) department or an administrative law judge
appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW may conduct hearings, administer
oaths or affirmations, or upon the ((commission's)) department's or
administrative law judge's motion or upon request of any party may
subpoena witnesses, compel attendance, take depositions, take evidence,
or require the production of any matter which is relevant to the
investigation or proceeding, including but not limited to the
existence, description, nature, custody, condition, or location of any
books, documents, or other tangible things, or the identity or location
of persons having knowledge or relevant facts, or any other matter
reasonably calculated to lead to the discovery of material evidence.
(3) Upon failure to obey a subpoena or to answer questions
propounded by the administrative law judge and upon reasonable notice
to all persons affected thereby, the director may apply to the superior
court for an order compelling compliance.
(4) The administrative law judges appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW
may conduct hearings respecting the suspension, revocation, or denial
of licenses, who may administer oaths, admit or deny admission of
evidence, compel the attendance of witnesses, issue subpoenas, issue
orders, and exercise all other powers and perform all other functions
set out in RCW 34.05.446, 34.05.449, and 34.05.452.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all proceedings
under this chapter shall be in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 80 RCW 9.46.150 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 218 s 15 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any activity conducted in violation of any provision of this
chapter may be enjoined in an action commenced by the ((commission))
department through the attorney general or by the prosecuting attorney
or legal counsel of any city or town in which the prohibited activity
may occur.
(2) When a violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule
((or regulation)) adopted pursuant hereto has occurred on any property
or premises for which one or more licenses, permits, or certificates
issued by this state, or any political subdivision or public agency
thereof are in effect, all such licenses, permits and certificates may
be voided and no license, permit, or certificate so voided shall be
issued or reissued for such property or premises for a period of up to
sixty days thereafter.

Sec. 81 RCW 9.46.153 and 1981 c 139 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It shall be the affirmative responsibility of each applicant
and licensee to establish by clear and convincing evidence the
necessary qualifications for licensure of each person required to be
qualified under this chapter, as well as the qualifications of the
facility in which the licensed activity will be conducted;
(2) All applicants and licensees shall consent to inspections,
searches and seizures and the supplying of handwriting examples as
authorized by this chapter and rules adopted hereunder;
(3) All licensees, and persons having any interest in licensees,
including but not limited to employees and agents of licensees, and
other persons required to be qualified under this chapter or rules of
the ((commission)) department shall have a duty to inform the
((commission)) department or its staff of any action or omission which
they believe would constitute a violation of this chapter or rules
adopted pursuant thereto. No person who so informs the ((commission))
department or the staff shall be discriminated against by an applicant
or licensee because of the supplying of such information;
(4) All applicants, licensees, persons who are operators or
directors thereof and persons who otherwise have a substantial interest
therein shall have the continuing duty to provide any assistance or
information required by the ((commission)) department and to
investigations conducted by the ((commission)) department. If, upon
issuance of a formal request to answer or produce information, evidence
or testimony, any applicant, licensee or officer or director thereof or
person with a substantial interest therein, refuses to comply, the
applicant or licensee may be denied or revoked by the ((commission))
department;
(5) All applicants and licensees shall waive any and all liability
as to the state of Washington, its agencies, employees and agents for
any damages resulting from any disclosure or publication in any manner,
other than a wilfully unlawful disclosure or publication, of any
information acquired by the ((commission)) department during its
licensing or other investigations or inquiries or hearings;
(6) Each applicant or licensee may be photographed for
investigative and identification purposes in accordance with rules of
the ((commission)) department;
(7) An application to receive a license under this chapter or rules
adopted pursuant thereto constitutes a request for determination of the
applicant's and those person's with an interest in the applicant,
general character, integrity and ability to engage or participate in,
or be associated with, gambling or related activities impacting this
state. Any written or oral statement made in the course of an official
investigation, proceeding or process of the ((commission)) department
by any member, employee or agent thereof or by any witness, testifying
under oath, which is relevant to the investigation, proceeding or
process, is absolutely privileged and shall not impose any liability
for slander, libel or defamation, or constitute any grounds for
recovery in any civil action.

Sec. 82 RCW 9.46.158 and 1981 c 139 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
No applicant for a license from, nor licensee of, the
((commission)) department, nor any operator of any gambling activity,
shall, without advance approval of the ((commission)) department,
knowingly permit any person to participate in the management or
operation of any activity for which a license from the ((commission))
department is required or which is otherwise authorized by this chapter
if that person:
(1) Has been convicted of, or forfeited bond upon a charge of, or
pleaded guilty to, forgery, larceny, extortion, conspiracy to defraud,
wilful failure to make required payments or reports to a governmental
agency at any level, or filing false reports therewith, or of any
similar offense or offenses, or of any crime, whether a felony or
misdemeanor involving any gambling activity or physical harm to
individuals or involving moral turpitude; or
(2) Has violated, failed, or refused to comply with provisions,
requirements, conditions, limitations or duties imposed by this
chapter, and any amendments thereto, or any rules adopted by the
((commission)) department pursuant thereto, or has permitted, aided,
abetted, caused, or conspired with another to cause, any person to
violate any of the provisions of this chapter or rules of the
((commission)) department.

Sec. 83 RCW 9.46.160 and 1991 c 261 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person who conducts any activity for which a license is
required by this chapter, or by rule of the ((commission)) department,
without the required license issued by the ((commission)) department
shall be guilty of a class B felony. If any corporation conducts any
activity for which a license is required by this chapter, or by rule of
the ((commission)) department, without the required license issued by
the ((commission)) department, it may be punished by forfeiture of its
corporate charter, in addition to the other penalties set forth in this
section.

Sec. 84 RCW 9.46.170 and 1991 c 261 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whoever, in any application for a license or in any book or record
required to be maintained by the ((commission)) department or in any
report required to be submitted to the ((commission)) department, shall
make any false or misleading statement, or make any false or misleading
entry or wilfully fail to maintain or make any entry required to be
maintained or made, or who wilfully refuses to produce for inspection
by the ((commission)) department, or its designee, any book, record, or
document required to be maintained or made by federal or state law,
shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor subject to the penalty set forth
in RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 85 RCW 9.46.198 and 1999 c 143 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person who works as an employee or agent or in a similar
capacity for another person in connection with the operation of an
activity for which a license is required under this chapter or by
((commission)) department rule without having obtained the applicable
license required by the ((commission)) department under RCW
9.46.070(17) shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor and shall, upon
conviction, be punished by not more than one year in the county jail or
a fine of not more than five thousand dollars, or both.

Sec. 86 RCW 9.46.210 and 2000 c 46 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It shall be the duty of all peace officers, law enforcement
officers, and law enforcement agencies within this state to
investigate, enforce, and prosecute all violations of this chapter.
(2) In addition to the authority granted by subsection (1) of this
section law enforcement agencies of cities and counties shall
investigate and report to the ((commission)) department all violations
of the provisions of this chapter and of the rules of the
((commission)) department found by them and shall assist the
((commission)) department in any of its investigations and proceedings
respecting any such violations. Such law enforcement agencies shall
not be deemed agents of the ((commission)) department.
(3) In addition to its other powers and duties, the ((commission))
department shall have the power to enforce the penal provisions of
this chapter ((218, Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess. and as it may be
amended,)) and the penal laws of this state relating to the conduct of
or participation in gambling activities and the manufacturing,
importation, transportation, distribution, possession, and sale of
equipment or paraphernalia used or for use in connection therewith.
The director((, the deputy director, both assistant directors,)) and
each of the ((commission's)) department's investigators, enforcement
officers, and inspectors shall have the power, under the supervision of
the ((commission)) department, to enforce the penal provisions of this
chapter ((218, Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess. and as it may be amended,))
and the penal laws of this state relating to the conduct of or
participation in gambling activities and the manufacturing,
importation, transportation, distribution, possession, and sale of
equipment or paraphernalia used or for use in connection therewith.
They shall have the power and authority to apply for and execute all
warrants and serve process of law issued by the courts in enforcing the
penal provisions of this chapter ((218, Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess. and
as it may be amended,)) and the penal laws of this state relating to
the conduct of or participation in gambling activities and the
manufacturing, importation, transportation, distribution, possession,
and sale of equipment or paraphernalia used or for use in connection
therewith. They shall have the power to arrest without a warrant, any
person or persons found in the act of violating any of the penal
provisions of this chapter ((218, Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess. and as it
may be amended,)) and the penal laws of this state relating to the
conduct of or participation in gambling activities and the
manufacturing, importation, transportation, distribution, possession,
and sale of equipment or paraphernalia used or for use in connection
therewith. To the extent set forth ((above)) in this section, the
((commission)) department shall be a law enforcement agency of this
state with the power to investigate for violations of and to enforce
the provisions of this chapter((, as now law or hereafter amended,))
and to obtain information from and provide information to all other law
enforcement agencies.
(4) Criminal history record information that includes nonconviction
data, as defined in RCW 10.97.030, may be disseminated by a criminal
justice agency to the ((Washington state gambling commission))
department for any purpose associated with the investigation for
suitability for involvement in gambling activities authorized under
this chapter. The ((Washington state gambling commission)) department
shall only disseminate nonconviction data obtained under this section
to criminal justice agencies.

Sec. 87 RCW 9.46.215 and 1994 c 218 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whoever knowingly owns, manufactures, possesses, buys, sells,
rents, leases, finances, holds a security interest in, stores, repairs,
or transports any gambling device or offers or solicits any interest
therein, whether through an agent or employee or otherwise, is guilty
of a felony and shall be fined not more than one hundred thousand
dollars or imprisoned not more than five years or both. However, this
section does not apply to persons licensed by the ((commission))
department, or who are otherwise authorized by this chapter, or by
((commission)) department rule, to conduct gambling activities without
a license, respecting devices that are to be used, or are being used,
solely in that activity for which the license was issued, or for which
the person has been otherwise authorized if:
(1) The person is acting in conformance with this chapter and the
rules adopted under this chapter; and
(2) The devices are a type and kind traditionally and usually
employed in connection with the particular activity. This section also
does not apply to any act or acts by the persons in furtherance of the
activity for which the license was issued, or for which the person is
authorized, when the activity is conducted in compliance with this
chapter and in accordance with the rules adopted under this chapter.
In the enforcement of this section direct possession of any such a
gambling device is presumed to be knowing possession thereof.

Sec. 88 RCW 9.46.250 and 1987 c 4 s 45 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All gambling premises are common nuisances and shall be subject
to abatement by injunction or as otherwise provided by law. The
plaintiff in any action brought under this subsection against any
gambling premises, need not show special injury and may, in the
discretion of the court, be relieved of all requirements as to giving
security.
(2) When any property or premise held under a mortgage, contract or
leasehold is determined by a court having jurisdiction to be a gambling
premises, all rights and interests of the holder therein shall
terminate and the owner shall be entitled to immediate possession at
his election: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That this subsection shall not apply
to those premises in which activities authorized by this chapter or any
act or acts in furtherance thereof are carried on when conducted in
compliance with the provisions of this chapter and in accordance with
the rules ((and regulations)) adopted pursuant thereto.
(3) When any property or premises for which one or more licenses
issued by the ((commission)) department are in effect, is determined by
a court having jurisdiction to be a gambling premise, all such licenses
may be voided and no longer in effect, and no license so voided shall
be issued or reissued for such property or premises for a period of up
to sixty days thereafter. Enforcement of this subsection shall be the
duty of all peace officers and all taxing and licensing officials of
this state and its political subdivisions and other public agencies.
This subsection shall not apply to property or premises in which
activities authorized by this chapter, or any act or acts in
furtherance thereof, are carried on when conducted in compliance with
the provisions of this chapter and in accordance with the rules ((and
regulations)) adopted pursuant thereto.

Sec. 89 RCW 9.46.293 and 1989 c 8 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
Any fishing derby, defined under RCW 9.46.0229, shall not be
subject to any other provisions of this chapter or to any rules ((or
regulations)) of the ((commission)) department.

Sec. 90 RCW 9.46.300 and 1977 ex.s. c 326 s 17 are each amended
to read as follows:
All applications for licenses made to the ((commission))
department, with the exception of any portions of the applications
describing the arrest or conviction record of any person, and all
reports required by the ((commission)) department to be filed by its
licensees on a periodic basis concerning the operation of the licensed
activity or concerning any organization, association, or business in
connection with which a licensed activity is operated, in the
((commission)) department files, shall be open to public inspection at
the ((commission's)) department's offices upon a prior written request
of the ((commission)) department. The ((staff)) employees of the
((commission)) department may decline to allow an inspection until such
time as the inspection will not unduly interfere with the other duties
of the ((staff)) employees. The ((commission)) department may charge
the person making a request for an inspection an amount necessary to
offset the costs to the ((commission)) department of providing the
inspection and copies of any requested documents.

Sec. 91 RCW 9.46.310 and 1981 c 139 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
No person shall manufacture, and no person shall sell, distribute,
furnish or supply to any other person, any gambling device, including
but not limited to punchboards and pull tabs, in this state, or for use
within this state, without first obtaining a license to do so from the
((commission)) department under the provisions of this chapter.
Such licenses shall not be issued by the ((commission)) department
except respecting devices which are designed and permitted for use in
connection with activities authorized under this chapter: PROVIDED,
That this requirement for licensure shall apply only insofar as the
((commission)) department has adopted, or may adopt, rules implementing
it as to particular categories of gambling devices and related
equipment.

Sec. 92 RCW 9.46.350 and 1981 c 139 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
At any time within five years after any amount of fees, interest,
penalties, or tax which is imposed pursuant to this chapter, or rules
adopted pursuant thereto, shall become due and payable, the attorney
general, on behalf of the ((commission)) department, may bring a civil
action in the courts of this state, or any other state, or of the
United States, to collect the amount delinquent, together with
penalties and interest: PROVIDED, That where the tax is one imposed by
a county, city or town under RCW 9.46.110, any such action shall be
brought by that county, city or town on its own behalf. An action may
be brought whether or not the person owing the amount is at such time
a licensee pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
If such an action is brought in the courts of this state, a writ of
attachment may be issued and no bond or affidavit prior to the issuance
thereof shall be required. In all actions in this state, the records
of the ((commission)) department, or the appropriate county, city or
town, shall be prima facie evidence of the determination of the tax due
or the amount of the delinquency.

Sec. 93 RCW 9.46.360 and 1992 c 172 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The negotiation process for compacts with federally recognized
Indian tribes for conducting class III gaming, as defined in the Indian
Gaming Regulatory Act, 25 U.S.C. Sec. 2701 et seq., on federal Indian
lands is governed by this section.
(2) The ((gambling commission)) department, through the director or
the director's designee, shall negotiate compacts for class III gaming
on behalf of the state with federally recognized Indian tribes in the
state of Washington.
(3) When a tentative agreement with an Indian tribe on a proposed
compact is reached, the director shall immediately transmit a copy of
the proposed compact to ((all voting and ex officio members of the
gambling commission and to)) the standing committees designated
pursuant to subsection (((5))) (4) of this section.
(4) ((Notwithstanding RCW 9.46.040, the four ex officio members of
the gambling commission shall be deemed voting members of the gambling
commission for the sole purpose of voting on proposed compacts
submitted under this section.
(5))) Within thirty days after receiving a proposed compact from
the director, one standing committee from each house of the legislature
shall hold a public hearing on the proposed compact and forward its
respective comments to the ((gambling commission)) department. The
president of the senate shall designate the senate standing committee
that is to carry out the duties of this section, and the speaker of the
house of representatives shall designate the house standing committee
that is to carry out the duties of this section. The designated
committees shall continue to perform under this section until the
president of the senate or the speaker of the house of representatives,
as the case may be, designates a different standing committee.
(((6))) (5) The ((gambling commission)) department may hold public
hearings on the proposed compact any time after receiving a copy of the
compact ((from the director)). Within forty-five days after receiving
the proposed compact ((from)), the director((, the gambling commission,
including the four ex officio members, shall vote on whether to return
the proposed compact to the director with instructions for further
negotiation or to)) may forward the proposed compact to the governor
for review and final execution.
(((7))) (6) Notwithstanding provisions in this section to the
contrary, if the director forwards a proposed compact to the ((gambling
commission and the)) designated standing committees within ten days
before the beginning of a regular session of the legislature, or during
a regular or special session of the legislature, the thirty-day time
limit set forth in subsection (((5))) (4) of this section and the
forty-five day limit set forth in subsection (((6))) (5) of this
section are each forty-five days and sixty days, respectively.
(((8))) (7) Funding for the negotiation process under this section
must come from the gambling revolving fund.
(((9))) (8) In addition to the powers granted under this chapter,
the ((commission)) department, consistent with the terms of any
compact, is authorized and empowered to enforce the provisions of any
compact between a federally recognized Indian tribe and the state of
Washington.

Sec. 94 RCW 9.46.400 and 1996 c 101 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any raffle authorized by the fish and wildlife commission involving
hunting big game animals or wild turkeys shall not be subject to any
provisions of this chapter other than RCW 9.46.010 and this section or
to any rules ((or regulations)) of the ((gambling commission))
department.

Sec. 95 RCW 9.46.420 and 2002 c 252 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((commission)) department shall consider the provisions of RCW
9.46.410 as elements to be negotiated with federally recognized Indian
tribes as provided in RCW 9.46.360.

Sec. 96 RCW 42.17.2401 and 2001 c 36 s 1 and 2001 c 9 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 42.17.240, the term "executive state
officer" includes:
(1) The chief administrative law judge, the director of
agriculture, the administrator of the Washington basic health plan, the
director of the department of services for the blind, the director of
the state system of community and technical colleges, the director of
community, trade, and economic development, the secretary of
corrections, the director of ecology, the commissioner of employment
security, the chairman of the energy facility site evaluation council,
the secretary of the state finance committee, the director of financial
management, the director of fish and wildlife, the executive secretary
of the forest practices appeals board, the director of the ((gambling
commission)) department of gaming, the director of general
administration, the secretary of health, the administrator of the
Washington state health care authority, the executive secretary of the
health care facilities authority, the executive secretary of the higher
education facilities authority, ((the executive secretary of the horse
racing commission,)) the executive secretary of the human rights
commission, the executive secretary of the indeterminate sentence
review board, the director of the department of information services,
the director of the interagency committee for outdoor recreation, the
executive director of the state investment board, the director of labor
and industries, the director of licensing, the director of the lottery
commission, the director of the office of minority and women's business
enterprises, the director of parks and recreation, the director of
personnel, the executive director of the public disclosure commission,
the director of retirement systems, the director of revenue, the
secretary of social and health services, the chief of the Washington
state patrol, the executive secretary of the board of tax appeals, the
secretary of transportation, the secretary of the utilities and
transportation commission, the director of veterans affairs, the
president of each of the regional and state universities and the
president of The Evergreen State College, each district and each campus
president of each state community college;
(2) Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;
(3) Each professional staff member of the legislature; and
(4) Central Washington University board of trustees, board of
trustees of each community college, each member of the state board for
community and technical colleges, state convention and trade center
board of directors, committee for deferred compensation, Eastern
Washington University board of trustees, Washington economic
development finance authority, The Evergreen State College board of
trustees, executive ethics board, forest practices appeals board,
forest practices board, ((gambling commission,)) Washington health care
facilities authority, each member of the Washington health services
commission, higher education coordinating board, higher education
facilities authority, ((horse racing commission,)) state housing
finance commission, human rights commission, indeterminate sentence
review board, board of industrial insurance appeals, information
services board, interagency committee for outdoor recreation, state
investment board, commission on judicial conduct, legislative ethics
board, liquor control board, lottery commission, marine oversight
board, Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning
council, parks and recreation commission, personnel appeals board,
board of pilotage commissioners, pollution control hearings board,
public disclosure commission, public pension commission, shorelines
hearing board, public employees' benefits board, salmon recovery
funding board, board of tax appeals, transportation commission,
University of Washington board of regents, utilities and transportation
commission, Washington state maritime commission, Washington personnel
resources board, Washington public power supply system executive board,
Washington State University board of regents, Western Washington
University board of trustees, and fish and wildlife commission.

Sec. 97 RCW 51.12.020 and 1999 c 68 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following are the only employments which shall not be included
within the mandatory coverage of this title:
(1) Any person employed as a domestic servant in a private home by
an employer who has less than two employees regularly employed forty or
more hours a week in such employment.
(2) Any person employed to do gardening, maintenance, or repair, in
or about the private home of the employer. For the purposes of this
subsection, "maintenance" means the work of keeping in proper
condition, "repair" means to restore to sound condition after damage,
and "private home" means a person's place of residence.
(3) A person whose employment is not in the course of the trade,
business, or profession of his or her employer and is not in or about
the private home of the employer.
(4) Any person performing services in return for aid or sustenance
only, received from any religious or charitable organization.
(5) Sole proprietors or partners.
(6) Any child under eighteen years of age employed by his or her
parent or parents in agricultural activities on the family farm.
(7) Jockeys while participating in or preparing horses for race
meets licensed by the ((Washington horse racing commission)) department
of gaming pursuant to chapter 67.16 RCW.
(8)(a) Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this subsection, any
bona fide officer of a corporation voluntarily elected or voluntarily
appointed in accordance with the articles of incorporation or bylaws of
the corporation, who at all times during the period involved is also a
bona fide director, and who is also a shareholder of the corporation.
Only such officers who exercise substantial control in the daily
management of the corporation and whose primary responsibilities do not
include the performance of manual labor are included within this
subsection.
(b) Alternatively, a corporation that is not a "public company" as
defined in RCW 23B.01.400(((21))) may exempt eight or fewer bona fide
officers, who are voluntarily elected or voluntarily appointed in
accordance with the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the
corporation and who exercise substantial control in the daily
management of the corporation, from coverage under this title without
regard to the officers' performance of manual labor if the exempted
officer is a shareholder of the corporation, or may exempt any number
of officers if all the exempted officers are related by blood within
the third degree or marriage. If a corporation that is not a "public
company" elects to be covered under subsection (8)(a) of this section,
the corporation's election must be made on a form prescribed by the
department and under such reasonable rules as the department may adopt.
(c) Determinations respecting the status of persons performing
services for a corporation shall be made, in part, by reference to
Title 23B RCW and to compliance by the corporation with its own
articles of incorporation and bylaws. For the purpose of determining
coverage under this title, substance shall control over form, and
mandatory coverage under this title shall extend to all workers of this
state, regardless of honorary titles conferred upon those actually
serving as workers.
(d) A corporation may elect to cover officers who are exempted by
this subsection in the manner provided by RCW 51.12.110.
(9) Services rendered by a musician or entertainer under a contract
with a purchaser of the services, for a specific engagement or
engagements when such musician or entertainer performs no other duties
for the purchaser and is not regularly and continuously employed by the
purchaser. A purchaser does not include the leader of a group or
recognized entity who employs other than on a casual basis musicians or
entertainers.
(10) Services performed by a newspaper carrier selling or
distributing newspapers on the street or from house to house.
(11) Services performed by an insurance agent, insurance broker, or
insurance solicitor, as defined in RCW 48.17.010, 48.17.020, and
48.17.030, respectively.
(12) Services performed by a booth renter ((as defined in RCW
18.16.020)). However, a person exempted under this subsection may
elect coverage under RCW 51.32.030.
(13) Members of a limited liability company, if either:
(a) Management of the company is vested in its members, and the
members for whom exemption is sought would qualify for exemption under
subsection (5) of this section were the company a sole proprietorship
or partnership; or
(b) Management of the company is vested in one or more managers,
and the members for whom the exemption is sought are managers who would
qualify for exemption under subsection (8) of this section were the
company a corporation.

Sec. 98 RCW 51.16.210 and 1989 c 385 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall assess premiums, under the provisions of
this section, for certain horse racing employments licensed in
accordance with chapter 67.16 RCW. This premium assessment shall be
for the purpose of providing industrial insurance coverage for
employees of trainers licensed under chapter 67.16 RCW, including but
not limited to exercise riders, pony riders, and grooms, and including
all on or off track employment. For the purposes of RCW 51.16.210,
67.16.300, 51.16.140, 51.32.073, and 67.16.020 a hotwalker shall be
considered a groom. The department may adopt rules under chapter 34.05
RCW to carry out the purposes of this section, including rules
providing for alternative reporting periods and payment due dates for
coverage under this section. The department rules shall ensure that no
licensee licensed prior to May 13, 1989, shall pay more than the
assessment fixed at the basic manual rate.
(2) The department shall compute industrial insurance premium rates
on a per license basis, which premiums shall be assessed at the time of
each issuance or renewal of the license for owners, trainers, and
grooms in amounts established by department rule for coverage under
this section. Premium assessments shall be determined in accordance
with the requirements of this title, except that assessments shall not
be experience rated and shall be fixed at the basic manual rate.
However, rates may vary according to differences in working conditions
at major tracks and fair tracks.
(3) For the purposes of paying premiums and assessments under this
section and making reports under this title, individuals licensed as
trainers by the ((Washington horse racing commission)) department of
gaming shall be considered employers. The premium assessment for a
groom's license shall be paid by the trainer responsible for signing
the groom's license application and shall be payable at the time of
license issuance or renewal.
(4) The fee to be assessed on owner licenses as required by this
section shall not exceed one hundred fifty dollars. However, those
owners having less than a full ownership in a horse or horses shall pay
a percentage of the required license fee that is equal to the total
percentage of the ownership that the owner has in the horse or horses.
In no event shall an owner having an ownership percentage in more than
one horse pay more than a one hundred fifty-dollar license fee. The
assessment on each owner's license shall not imply that an owner is an
employer, but shall be required as part of the privilege of holding an
owner's license.
(5) Premium assessments under this section shall be collected by
the ((Washington horse racing commission)) department of gaming and
deposited in the industrial insurance trust funds as provided under
department rules.

Sec. 99 RCW 67.16.010 and 1991 c 270 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless the context otherwise requires, words and phrases as
used herein shall mean:
(("Commission" shall mean the Washington horse racing commission,
hereinafter created.)) (a) "Department" means the department of gaming
created in section 41 of this act.
(b) "Parimutuel machine" shall mean and include both machines at
the track and machines at the satellite locations, that record
parimutuel bets and compute the payoff.
(c) "Person" shall mean and include individuals, firms,
corporations and associations.
(d) "Race meet" shall mean and include any exhibition of
thoroughbred, quarter horse, paint horse, appaloosa horse racing,
arabian horse racing, or standard bred harness horse racing, where the
parimutuel system is used.
(2) Singular shall include the plural, and the plural shall include
the singular; and words importing one gender shall be regarded as
including all other genders.

Sec. 100 RCW 67.16.040 and 1933 c 55 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((commission created by this chapter is hereby authorized, and
it shall be its duty, to)) department shall license, regulate, and
supervise all race meets held in this state under the terms of this
chapter, and to cause the various race courses of the state to be
visited and inspected at least once a year.

Sec. 101 RCW 67.16.100 and 1998 c 345 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All sums paid to the ((commission)) department under this
chapter, including those sums collected for license fees and excluding
those sums collected under RCW 67.16.102 and 67.16.105(3), shall be
disposed of by the ((commission)) department as follows: One hundred
percent thereof shall be retained by the ((commission)) department for
the payment of the salaries of its ((members, secretary, clerical,
office, and other help)) employees and all expenses incurred in
carrying out the provisions of this chapter. ((No salary, wages,
expenses, or compensation of any kind shall be paid by the state in
connection with the work of the commission.))
(2) Any moneys collected or paid to the ((commission)) department
under the terms of this chapter and not expended at the close of the
fiscal biennium shall be paid to the state treasurer and be placed in
the fair fund created in RCW 15.76.115. The ((commission)) department
may, with the approval of the office of financial management, retain
any sum required for working capital.

Sec. 102 RCW 67.16.101 and 1977 ex.s. c 372 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that:
(1) A ((primary)) responsibility of the ((horse racing commission))
department is the encouragement of the training and development of the
equine industry in the state of Washington whether the result of this
training and development results in legalized horse racing or in the
recreational use of horses;
(2) The ((horse racing commission)) department has a further major
responsibility to assure that any facility used as a race course should
be maintained and upgraded to insure the continued safety of both the
public and the horse at any time the facility is used for the training
or contesting of these animals;
(3) Small race courses within the state have difficulty in
obtaining sufficient funds to provide the maintenance and upgrading
necessary to assure this safety at these facilities, or to permit
frequent use of these facilities by 4-H children or other horse owners
involved in training; and
(4) The one percent of the parimutuel machine gross receipts used
to pay a special purse to the licensed owners of Washington bred horses
is available for the purpose of drawing interest, thereby obtaining
sufficient funds to be disbursed to achieve the necessary support to
these small race courses.

Sec. 103 RCW 67.16.105 and 1998 c 345 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Licensees of race meets that are nonprofit in nature and are of
ten days or less shall be exempt from payment of a parimutuel tax.
(2) Licensees that do not fall under subsection (1) of this section
shall withhold and pay to the ((commission)) department daily for each
authorized day of parimutuel wagering the following applicable
percentage of all daily gross receipts from its in-state parimutuel
machines:
(a) If the gross receipts of all its in-state parimutuel machines
are more than fifty million dollars in the previous calendar year, the
licensee shall withhold and pay to the ((commission)) department daily
1.30 percent of the daily gross receipts; and
(b) If the gross receipts of all its in-state parimutuel machines
are fifty million dollars or less in the previous calendar year, the
licensee shall withhold and pay to the ((commission)) department daily
((0.52)) 1.803 percent of the daily gross receipts.
(3) In addition to those amounts in subsection (2) of this section,
a licensee shall forward one-tenth of one percent of the daily gross
receipts of all its in-state parimutuel machines to the ((commission))
department for payment to those nonprofit race meets as set forth in
RCW 67.16.130 and subsection (1) of this section, but said percentage
shall not be charged against the licensee. Payments to nonprofit race
meets under this subsection shall be distributed on a pro rata per-race-day basis and used only for purses at race tracks that have been
operating under RCW 67.16.130 and subsection (1) of this section for
the five consecutive years immediately preceding the year of payment.
The ((commission)) department shall transfer funds generated under
subsection (2) of this section equal to the difference between funds
collected under this subsection (3) in a calendar year and three
hundred thousand dollars, and distribute that amount under this
subsection (3).
(4) Beginning July 1, 1999, at the conclusion of each authorized
race meet, the ((commission)) department shall calculate the
mathematical average daily gross receipts of parimutuel wagering that
is conducted only at the physical location of the live race meet at
those race meets of licensees with gross receipts of all their in-state
parimutuel machines of more than fifty million dollars. Such
calculation shall include only the gross parimutuel receipts from
wagering occurring on live racing dates, including live racing receipts
and receipts derived from one simulcast race card that is conducted
only at the physical location of the live racing meet, which, for the
purposes of this subsection, is "the handle." If the calculation
exceeds eight hundred eighty-six thousand dollars, the licensee shall
within ten days of receipt of written notification by the
((commission)) department forward to the ((commission)) department a
sum equal to the product obtained by multiplying 0.6 percent by the
handle. Sums collected by the ((commission)) department under this
subsection shall be forwarded on the next business day following
receipt thereof to the state treasurer to be deposited in the fair fund
created in RCW 15.76.115.

Sec. 104 RCW 67.16.130 and 1991 c 270 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or of chapter 67.16
RCW, the ((commission)) department may license race meets which are
nonprofit in nature, of ten days or less, and which have an average
daily handle of one hundred twenty thousand dollars or less, at a daily
licensing fee of ten dollars, and the sponsoring nonprofit association
shall be exempt from any other fees as provided for in chapter 67.16
RCW or by rule ((or regulation)) of the ((commission)) department:
PROVIDED, That the ((commission)) department may deny the application
for a license to conduct a racing meet by a nonprofit association, if
same shall be determined not to be a nonprofit association by the
((Washington state racing commission)) department.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or of chapter 67.16
RCW or any rule promulgated by the ((commission)) department, no
license for a race meet which is nonprofit in nature, of ten days or
less, and which has an average daily handle of one hundred twenty
thousand dollars or less, shall be denied for the reason that the
applicant has not installed an electric parimutuel tote board.
(3) As a condition to the reduction in fees as provided for in
subsection (1) of this section, all fees charged to horse owners,
trainers, or jockeys, or any other fee charged for a permit incident to
the running of such race meet shall be retained by the ((commission))
department as reimbursement for its expenses incurred in connection
with the particular race meet.

Sec. 105 RCW 67.16.140 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 216 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
No employee of the ((horse racing commission)) department shall
serve as an employee of any track at which that individual will also
serve as an employee of the ((commission)) department.

Sec. 106 RCW 67.16.150 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 216 s 4 are each
amended to read as follows:
No employee nor ((any commissioner)) the director of the ((horse
racing commission)) department shall have any financial interest
whatsoever, other than an ownership interest in a community venture, in
any track at which said employee serves as an agent or employee of the
((commission or at any track with respect to a commissioner))
department.

Sec. 107 RCW 67.17.005 and 2001 c 18 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The purposes of the live horse racing compact are to:
(1) Establish uniform requirements among the party states for the
licensing of participants in live horse racing with pari-mutuel
wagering, and ensure that all such participants who are licensed
pursuant to the compact meet a uniform minimum standard of honesty and
integrity;
(2) Facilitate the growth of the horse racing industry in each
party state and nationwide by simplifying the process for licensing
participants in live racing, and reduce the duplicative and costly
process of separate licensing by the regulatory agency in each state
that conducts live horse racing with pari-mutuel wagering;
(3) Authorize the ((Washington horse racing commission)) department
of gaming to participate in the live horse racing compact;
(4) Provide for participation in the live horse racing compact by
officials of the party states, and permit those officials, through the
compact committee established by this chapter, to enter into contracts
with governmental agencies and nongovernmental persons to carry out the
purposes of the live horse racing compact; and
(5) Establish the compact committee created by this chapter as an
interstate governmental entity duly authorized to request and receive
criminal history record information from the federal bureau of
investigation and other state and local law enforcement agencies.

Sec. 108 RCW 67.17.120 and 2001 c 18 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to diminish or limit the
powers and responsibilities of the ((Washington horse racing
commission)) department of gaming established in ((chapter 67.16 RCW))
section 41 of this act or to invalidate any action of the Washington
horse racing commission or the department of gaming previously taken,
including without limitation any ((regulation issued)) rule adopted by
the commission or the department.

Sec. 109 RCW 82.04.350 and 1961 c 15 s 82.04.350 are each amended
to read as follows:
This chapter shall not apply to any person in respect to the
business of conducting race meets for the conduct of which a license
must be secured from the ((horse racing commission)) department of
gaming.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 (1) The state conservation commission is
hereby abolished and its powers, duties, and functions are hereby
transferred to the department of agriculture. All references to the
executive director or the state conservation commission in the Revised
Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the director or the
department of agriculture.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the state conservation
commission shall be delivered to the custody of the department of
agriculture. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor
vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the state
conservation commission shall be made available to the department of
agriculture. All funds, credits, or other assets held by the state
conservation commission shall be assigned to the department of
agriculture.
(b) Any appropriations made to the state conservation commission
shall, on the effective date of this section, be transferred and
credited to the department of agriculture.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel,
funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other
tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the
performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) The employees of the state conservation commission that are
transferred to the jurisdiction of the department of agriculture shall
be determined based upon the amount of money appropriated for staff.
All transferred employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state
civil service law, are assigned to the department of agriculture to
perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any
loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate
thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil
service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the state
conservation commission shall be continued and acted upon by the
department of agriculture. All existing contracts and obligations
shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the department of
agriculture.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the state conservation commission shall not affect the validity of any
act performed before the effective date of this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the personnel
resources board as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111 A new section is added to chapter 43.23
RCW to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created within the department a program to
provide grants and technical assistance to local conservation
districts. For the program, the department shall be vested with all
powers and duties transferred to it from the state conservation
commission and such other powers and duties as may be authorized by
chapter 89.08 RCW.
(2) The department shall establish a committee to advise the agency
on its implementation of programs and technical assistance established
in this section.
(3) The advisory committee shall consist of ten members, selected
as provided for in this subsection.
(a) Five of the ten members shall be appointed by the director,
three of whom shall be landowners or operators of a farm. Two of the
five members appointed by the director shall reside in eastern
Washington, and two of the five members shall reside in western
Washington. The appointed members shall serve for terms of four years.
(b) Three of the ten members shall be elected by the conservation
district supervisors at their annual statewide meeting. At least two
of the three elected members shall be landowners or operators of a
farm. One of the members shall reside in eastern Washington, one in
central Washington, and one in western Washington, the specific
boundaries to be determined by district supervisors. At the initial
election, the term of the member from western Washington is one year,
the term of the member from central Washington is two years, and the
term of the member from eastern Washington is three years. Successors
shall be elected for three-year terms.
(c) One member of the committee shall be appointed by the director
of the department of ecology, and one member of the committee shall be
appointed by the director of the department of fish and wildlife.
(4) Unexpired term vacancies in the office of appointed committee
members shall be filled by the director in the same manner as full-term
appointments. Unexpired terms of elected commission members shall be
filled by the regional vice-president of the Washington association of
conservation districts who is serving that part of the state where the
vacancy occurs, the term continuing only until conservation district
supervisors fill the unexpired term by electing the commission member.
(5) Members of the advisory committee shall be compensated in
accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and are entitled to travel expenses
incurred in the discharge of their duties in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 112 RCW 43.21J.030 and 1998 c 245 s 60 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is created the environmental enhancement and job creation
task force within the office of the governor. The purpose of the task
force is to provide a coordinated and comprehensive approach to
implementation of chapter 516, Laws of 1993. The task force shall
consist of the commissioner of public lands, the director of the
department of fish and wildlife, the director of the department of
ecology, the director of the parks and recreation commission, the
timber team coordinator, the executive director of the work force
training and education coordinating board, and the executive director
of the Puget Sound ((water quality authority)) action team, or their
designees. The task force may seek the advice of the following
agencies and organizations: The department of community, trade, and
economic development, the ((conservation commission)) department of
agriculture, the employment security department, the interagency
committee for outdoor recreation, appropriate federal agencies,
appropriate special districts, the Washington state association of
counties, the association of Washington cities, labor organizations,
business organizations, timber-dependent communities, environmental
organizations, and Indian tribes. The governor shall appoint the task
force chair. Members of the task force shall serve without additional
pay. Participation in the work of the committee by agency members
shall be considered in performance of their employment. The governor
shall designate staff and administrative support to the task force and
shall solicit the participation of agency personnel to assist the task
force.
(2) The task force shall have the following responsibilities:
(a) Soliciting and evaluating, in accordance with the criteria set
forth in RCW 43.21J.040, requests for funds from the environmental and
forest restoration account and making distributions from the account.
The task force shall award funds for projects and training programs it
approves and may allocate the funds to state agencies for disbursement
and contract administration;
(b) Coordinating a process to assist state agencies and local
governments to implement effective environmental and forest restoration
projects funded under this chapter;
(c) Considering unemployment profile data provided by the
employment security department.
(3) Beginning July 1, 1994, the task force shall have the following
responsibilities:
(a) To solicit and evaluate proposals from state and local
agencies, private nonprofit organizations, and tribes for environmental
and forest restoration projects;
(b) To rank the proposals based on criteria developed by the task
force in accordance with RCW 43.21J.040; and
(c) To determine funding allocations for projects to be funded from
the account created in RCW 43.21J.020 and for projects or programs as
designated in the omnibus operating and capital appropriations acts.

Sec. 113 RCW 43.41.270 and 2001 c 227 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of financial management shall assist natural
resource-related agencies in developing outcome-focused performance
measures for administering natural resource-related and environmentally
based grant and loan programs. These performance measures are to be
used in determining grant eligibility, for program management and
performance assessment.
(2) The office of financial management and the governor's salmon
recovery office shall assist natural resource-related agencies in
developing recommendations for a monitoring program to measure outcome-focused performance measures required by this section. The
recommendations must be consistent with the framework and coordinated
monitoring strategy developed by the monitoring oversight committee
established in RCW 77.85.210.
(3) Natural resource agencies shall consult with grant or loan
recipients including local governments, tribes, nongovernmental
organizations, and other interested parties, and report to the office
of financial management on the implementation of this section. The
office of financial management shall report to the appropriate
legislative committees of the legislature on the agencies'
implementation of this section, including any necessary changes in
current law, and funding requirements by July 31, 2002. Natural
resource agencies shall assist the office of financial management in
preparing the report, including complying with time frames for
submitting information established by the office of financial
management.
(4) For purposes of this section, "natural resource-related
agencies" include the department of ecology, the department of natural
resources, the department of fish and wildlife, the ((state
conservation commission)) department of agriculture, the interagency
committee for outdoor recreation, the salmon recovery funding board,
and the public works board within the department of community, trade,
and economic development.
(5) For purposes of this section, "natural resource-related
environmentally based grant and loan programs" includes the
conservation reserve enhancement program; dairy nutrient management
grants under chapter 90.64 RCW; ((state conservation commission))
department of agriculture water quality grants under chapter 89.08 RCW;
coordinated prevention grants, public participation grants, and
remedial action grants under RCW 70.105D.070; water pollution control
facilities financing under chapter 70.146 RCW; aquatic lands
enhancement grants under RCW 79.24.580; habitat grants under the
Washington wildlife and recreation program under RCW 79A.15.040; salmon
recovery grants under chapter 77.85 RCW; and the public ((work[s]))
works trust fund program under chapter 43.155 RCW. The term also
includes programs administered by the department of fish and wildlife
related to protection or recovery of fish stocks which are funded with
moneys from the capital budget.

Sec. 114 RCW 70.146.060 and 1987 c 527 s 1 and 1987 c 436 s 7 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
During the period from July 1, 1987, until June 30, 1995, the
following limitations shall apply to the department's total
distribution of funds appropriated from the water quality account:
(1) Not more than fifty percent for water pollution control
facilities which discharge directly into marine waters;
(2) Not more than twenty percent for water pollution control
activities that prevent or mitigate pollution of underground waters and
facilities that protect federally designated sole source aquifers with
at least two-thirds for the Spokane-Rathdrum Prairie Aquifer;
(3) Not more than ten percent for water pollution control
activities that protect freshwater lakes and rivers including but not
limited to Lake Chelan and the Yakima and Columbia rivers;
(4) Not more than ten percent for activities which control nonpoint
source water pollution;
(5) Ten percent and such sums as may be remaining from the
categories specified in subsections (1) through (4) of this section for
water pollution control activities or facilities as determined by the
department; and
(6) Two and one-half percent of the total amounts of moneys under
subsections (1) through (5) of this section from February 21, 1986,
until December 31, 1995, shall be appropriated biennially to the
((state conservation commission)) department of agriculture for the
purposes of this chapter. Not less than ten percent of the moneys
received by the ((state conservation commission)) department of
agriculture under the provisions of this section shall be expended on
research activities.
The distribution under this section shall not be required to be met
in any single fiscal year.
Funds provided for facilities and activities under this chapter may
be used for payments to a service provider under a service agreement
pursuant to RCW 70.150.060. If funds are to be used for such payments,
the department may make periodic disbursements to a public body or may
make a single lump sum disbursement. Disbursements of funds with
respect to a facility owned or operated by a service provider shall be
equivalent in value to disbursements that would otherwise be made if
that facility were owned or operated by a public body. Payments under
this chapter for waste disposal and management facilities made to
public bodies entering into service agreements pursuant to RCW
70.150.060 shall not exceed amounts paid to public bodies not entering
into service agreements.

Sec. 115 RCW 77.55.290 and 2001 c 253 s 55 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In order to receive the permit review and approval process
created in this section, a fish habitat enhancement project must meet
the criteria under (a) and (b) of this subsection:
(a) A fish habitat enhancement project must be a project to
accomplish one or more of the following tasks:
(i) Elimination of human-made fish passage barriers, including
culvert repair and replacement;
(ii) Restoration of an eroded or unstable stream bank employing the
principle of bioengineering, including limited use of rock as a
stabilization only at the toe of the bank, and with primary emphasis on
using native vegetation to control the erosive forces of flowing water;
or
(iii) Placement of woody debris or other instream structures that
benefit naturally reproducing fish stocks.
The department shall develop size or scale threshold tests to
determine if projects accomplishing any of these tasks should be
evaluated under the process created in this section or under other
project review and approval processes. A project proposal shall not be
reviewed under the process created in this section if the department
determines that the scale of the project raises concerns regarding
public health and safety; and
(b) A fish habitat enhancement project must be approved in one of
the following ways:
(i) By the department pursuant to chapter 77.95 or 77.100 RCW;
(ii) By the sponsor of a watershed restoration plan as provided in
chapter 89.08 RCW;
(iii) By the department as a department-sponsored fish habitat
enhancement or restoration project;
(iv) Through the review and approval process for the jobs for the
environment program;
(v) Through the review and approval process for conservation
district-sponsored projects, where the project complies with design
standards established by the ((conservation commission)) department of
agriculture through interagency agreement with the United States fish
and wildlife service and the natural resource conservation service;
(vi) Through a formal grant program established by the legislature
or the department for fish habitat enhancement or restoration; and
(vii) Through other formal review and approval processes
established by the legislature.
(2) Fish habitat enhancement projects meeting the criteria of
subsection (1) of this section are expected to result in beneficial
impacts to the environment. Decisions pertaining to fish habitat
enhancement projects meeting the criteria of subsection (1) of this
section and being reviewed and approved according to the provisions of
this section are not subject to the requirements of RCW
43.21C.030(2)(c).
(3) Hydraulic project approval is required for projects that meet
the criteria of subsection (1) of this section and are being reviewed
and approved under this section. An applicant shall use a joint
aquatic resource permit application form developed by the department of
ecology permit assistance center to apply for approval under this
chapter. On the same day, the applicant shall provide copies of the
completed application form to the department and to each appropriate
local government. Local governments shall accept the application as
notice of the proposed project. The department shall provide a
fifteen-day comment period during which it will receive comments
regarding environmental impacts. In no more than forty-five days, the
department shall either issue hydraulic project approval, with or
without conditions, deny approval, or make a determination that the
review and approval process created by this section is not appropriate
for the proposed project. The department shall base this determination
on identification during the comment period of adverse impacts that
cannot be mitigated by hydraulic project approval. If the department
determines that the review and approval process created by this section
is not appropriate for the proposed project, the department shall
notify the applicant and the appropriate local governments of its
determination. The applicant may reapply for approval of the project
under other review and approval processes.
Any person aggrieved by the approval, denial, conditioning, or
modification of hydraulic project approval under this section may
formally appeal the decision to the hydraulic appeals board pursuant to
the provisions of this chapter.
(4) No local government may require permits or charge fees for fish
habitat enhancement projects that meet the criteria of subsection (1)
of this section and that are reviewed and approved according to the
provisions of this section.

Sec. 116 RCW 77.85.070 and 2000 c 107 s 97 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ((conservation commission)) department of agriculture, in
consultation with local government and the tribes, shall invite
private, federal, state, tribal, and local government personnel with
appropriate expertise to act as a technical advisory group.
(2) For state personnel, involvement on the technical advisory
group shall be at the discretion of the particular agency. Unless
specifically provided for in the budget, technical assistance
participants shall be provided from existing full-time equivalent
employees.
(3) The technical advisory group shall identify the limiting
factors for salmonids to respond to the limiting factors relating to
habitat pursuant to RCW 77.85.060(2).
(4) Where appropriate, the conservation district within the area
implementing this chapter shall take the lead in developing and
maintaining relationships between the technical advisory group and the
private landowners under RCW 75.46.080. The conservation districts may
assist landowners to organize around river, tributary, estuary, or
subbasins of a watershed.
(5) Fishery enhancement groups and other volunteer organizations
may participate in the activities under this section.

Sec. 117 RCW 77.85.110 and 1999 sp.s. c 13 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The salmon recovery funding board is created consisting of ten
members.
(2) Five members of the board shall be voting members who are
appointed by the governor, subject to confirmation by the senate. One
of these voting members shall be a cabinet-level appointment as the
governor's representative to the board. Board members who represent
the general public shall not have a financial or regulatory interest in
salmon recovery. The governor shall appoint one of the general public
members of the board as the chair. The voting members of the board
shall be appointed for terms of four years, except that two members
initially shall be appointed for terms of two years and three members
shall initially be appointed for terms of three years. In making the
appointments, the governor shall seek a board membership that
collectively provide the expertise necessary to provide strong fiscal
oversight of salmon recovery expenditures, and that provide extensive
knowledge of local government processes and functions and an
understanding of issues relevant to salmon recovery in Washington
state. The governor shall appoint at least three of the voting members
of the board no later than ninety days after July 1, 1999. Vacant
positions on the board shall be filled in the same manner as the
original appointments. The governor may remove members of the board
for good cause.
In addition to the five voting members of the board, the following
five state officials shall serve as ex officio nonvoting members of the
board: The director of the department of fish and wildlife, the
((executive)) director of the ((conservation commission)) department of
agriculture, the secretary of transportation, the director of the
department of ecology, and the commissioner of public lands. The state
officials serving in an ex officio capacity may designate a
representative of their respective agencies to serve on the board in
their behalf. Such designations shall be made in writing and in such
manner as is specified by the board.
(3) Staff support to the board shall be provided by the interagency
committee for outdoor recreation. For administrative purposes, the
board shall be located with the interagency committee for outdoor
recreation.
(4) Members of the board who do not represent state agencies shall
be compensated as provided by RCW 43.03.250. Members of the board
shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided by RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060.

Sec. 118 RCW 79.01.295 and 1998 c 245 s 162 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By December 31, 1993, the department of fish and wildlife shall
develop goals for the wildlife and fish that this agency manages, to
preserve, protect, and perpetuate wildlife and fish on shrub steppe
habitat or on lands that are presently agricultural lands, rangelands,
or grazable woodlands. These goals shall be consistent with the
maintenance of a healthy ecosystem.
(2) ((By July 31, 1993,)) The ((conservation commission))
department of agriculture shall appoint a technical advisory committee
to develop standards that achieve the goals developed in subsection (1)
of this section. The committee members shall include but not be
limited to technical experts representing the following interests:
Agriculture, academia, range management, utilities, environmental
groups, commercial and recreational fishing interests, the Washington
rangelands committee, Indian tribes, the department of fish and
wildlife, the department of natural resources, the department of
ecology, and conservation districts((, and the department of
agriculture)). ((A member of the conservation commission)) The
director of the department of agriculture shall appoint a chair from
among the members of the committee.
(3) By December 31, 1994, the committee shall develop standards to
meet the goals developed under subsection (1) of this section. These
standards shall not conflict with the recovery of wildlife or fish
species that are listed or proposed for listing under the federal
endangered species act. These standards shall be utilized to the
extent possible in development of coordinated resource management plans
to provide a level of management that sustains and perpetuates
renewable resources, including fish and wildlife, riparian areas, soil,
water, timber, and forage for livestock and wildlife. Furthermore, the
standards are recommended for application to model watersheds
designated by the Northwest power planning council in conjunction with
the ((conservation commission)) department of agriculture. The
maintenance and restoration of sufficient habitat to preserve, protect,
and perpetuate wildlife and fish shall be a major component included in
the standards and coordinated resource management plans. Application
of standards to privately owned lands is voluntary and may be dependent
on funds to provide technical assistance through conservation
districts.
(4) The ((conservation commission)) department of agriculture shall
approve the standards and shall provide them to the departments of
natural resources and fish and wildlife, each of the conservation
districts, and Washington State University cooperative extension
service. The conservation districts shall make these standards
available to the public and for coordinated resource management
planning. Application to private lands is voluntary.
(5) The department of natural resources shall implement practices
necessary to meet the standards developed pursuant to this section on
department managed agricultural and grazing lands, consistent with the
trust mandate of the Washington state Constitution and Title 79 RCW.
The standards may be modified on a site-specific basis as needed to
achieve the fish and wildlife goals, and as determined by the
department of fish and wildlife, and the department of natural
resources. Existing lessees shall be provided an opportunity to
participate in any site-specific field review. Department agricultural
and grazing leases issued after December 31, 1994, shall be subject to
practices to achieve the standards that meet those developed pursuant
to this section.

Sec. 119 RCW 89.08.010 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 184 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
It is hereby declared, as a matter of legislative determination:
(1) That the lands of the state of Washington are among the basic
assets of the state and that the preservation of these lands is
necessary to protect and promote the health, safety, and general
welfare of its people; that improper land-use practices have caused and
have contributed to, and are now causing and contributing to, a
progressively more serious erosion of the lands of this state by wind
and water; that the breaking of natural grass, plant and forest cover
have interfered with the natural factors of soil stabilization, causing
loosening of soil and exhaustion of humus, and developing a soil
condition that favors erosion; that the topsoil is being blown and
washed off of lands; that there has been an accelerated washing of
sloping lands; that these processes of erosion by wind and water speed
up with removal of absorptive topsoil, causing exposure of less
absorptive and less protective but more erosive subsoil; that failure
by any land occupier to conserve the soil and control erosion upon his
lands may cause a washing and blowing of soil from his lands onto other
lands and makes the conservation of soil and control of erosion on such
other lands difficult or impossible, and that extensive denuding of
land for development creates critical erosion areas that are difficult
to effectively regenerate and the resulting sediment causes extensive
pollution of streams, ponds, lakes and other waters.
(2) That the consequences of such soil erosion in the form of soil
blowing and soil washing are the silting and sedimentation of stream
channels, reservoirs, dams, ditches, and harbors, and loading the air
with soil particles; the loss of fertile soil material in dust storms;
the piling up of soil on lower slopes and its deposit over alluvial
plains; the reduction in productivity or outright ruin of rich bottom
lands by overwash of poor subsoil material, sand, and gravel swept out
of the hills; deterioration of soil and its fertility, deterioration of
crops grown thereon, and declining acre yields despite development of
scientific processes for increasing such yields; loss of soil and water
which causes destruction of food and cover for wildlife; a blowing and
washing of soil into streams which silts over spawning beds, and
destroys water plants, diminishing the food supply of fish; a
diminishing of the underground water reserve, which causes water
shortages, intensifies periods of drought, and causes crop failures; an
increase in the speed and volume of rainfall run-off, causing severe
and increasing floods, which bring suffering, disease, and death;
impoverishment of families attempting to farm eroding and eroded lands;
damage to roads, highways, railways, buildings, and other property from
floods and from dust storms; and losses in navigation, hydroelectric
power, municipal water supply, irrigation developments, farming and
grazing.
(3) That to conserve soil resources and control and prevent soil
erosion and prevent flood water and sediment damages, and further
agricultural and nonagricultural phases of the conservation,
development, utilization, and disposal of water, it is necessary that
land-use practices contributing to soil wastage and soil erosion be
discouraged and discontinued, and appropriate soil-conserving land-use
practices, and works of improvement for flood prevention of
agricultural and nonagricultural phases of the conservation,
development, utilization, and disposal of water be adopted and carried
out; that among the procedures necessary for widespread adoption, are
the carrying on of engineering operations such as the construction of
terraces, terrace outlets, check-dams, desilting basins, flood water
retarding structures, channel floodways, dikes, ponds, ditches, and the
like; the utilization of strip cropping, contour cultivating, and
contour furrowing; land irrigation; seeding and planting of waste,
sloping, abandoned, or eroded lands to water-conserving and erosion-preventing plants, trees, and grasses; forestation and reforestation;
rotation of crops; soil stabilizations with trees, grasses, legumes,
and other thick-growing, soil-holding crops, retardation of run-off by
increasing absorption of rainfall; and retirement from cultivation of
steep, highly erosive areas and areas now badly gullied or otherwise
eroded.
(4) Whereas, there is a pressing need for the conservation of
renewable resources in all areas of the state, whether urban, suburban,
or rural, and that the benefits of resource practices, programs, and
projects, as carried out by the ((state conservation commission))
department of agriculture and by the conservation districts, should be
available to all such areas; therefore, it is hereby declared to be the
policy of the legislature to provide for the conservation of the
renewable resources of this state, and for the control and prevention
of soil erosion, and for the prevention of flood water and sediment
damages, and for furthering agricultural and nonagricultural phases of
conservation, development, utilization, and disposal of water, and
thereby to preserve natural resources, control floods, prevent
impairment of dams and reservoirs, assist in maintaining the
navigability of rivers and harbors, preserve wildlife, protect the tax
base, protect public lands, and protect and promote the health, safety,
and general welfare of the people of this state. To this end all
incorporated cities and towns heretofore excluded from the boundaries
of a conservation district established pursuant to the provisions of
the state conservation district law, as amended, may be approved by the
((conservation commission)) department of agriculture as being included
in and deemed a part of the district upon receiving a petition for
annexation signed by the governing authority of the city or town and
the conservation district within the exterior boundaries of which it
lies in whole or in part or to which it lies closest.

Sec. 120 RCW 89.08.020 and 1999 c 305 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, as used in this
chapter:
(("Commission" and "state conservation commission" means the agency
created hereunder. All former references to "state soil and water
conservation committee", "state committee" or "committee" shall be
deemed to be references to the "state conservation commission";))
"Department" means the state department of agriculture;
"Director" means the director of the department;
"District", or "conservation district" means a governmental
subdivision of this state and a public body corporate and politic,
organized in accordance with the provisions of chapter 184, Laws of
1973 1st ex. sess., for the purposes, with the powers, and subject to
the restrictions set forth in this chapter. All districts created
under chapter 184, Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess. shall be known as
conservation districts and shall have all the powers and duties set out
in chapter 184, Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess. All references in chapter
184, Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess. to "districts", or "soil and water
conservation districts" shall be deemed to be reference to
"conservation districts";
"Board" and "supervisors" mean the board of supervisors of a
conservation district;
"Land occupier" or "occupier of land" includes any person, firm,
political subdivision, government agency, municipality, public or
private corporation, copartnership, association, or any other entity
whatsoever which holds title to, or is in possession of, any lands
lying within a district organized under the provisions of chapter 184,
Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess., whether as owner, lessee, renter, tenant,
or otherwise;
"District elector" or "voter" means a registered voter in the
county where the district is located who resides within the district
boundary or in the area affected by a petition;
"Due notice" means a notice published at least twice, with at least
six days between publications, in a publication of general circulation
within the affected area, or if there is no such publication, by
posting at a reasonable number of public places within the area, where
it is customary to post notices concerning county and municipal
affairs. Any hearing held pursuant to due notice may be postponed from
time to time without a new notice;
"Renewable natural resources", "natural resources" or "resources"
includes land, air, water, vegetation, fish, wildlife, wild rivers,
wilderness, natural beauty, scenery and open space;
"Conservation" includes conservation, development, improvement,
maintenance, preservation, protection and use, and alleviation of
floodwater and sediment damages, and the disposal of excess surface
waters.
"Farm and agricultural land" means either (a) land in any
contiguous ownership of twenty or more acres devoted primarily to
agricultural uses; (b) any parcel of land five acres or more but less
than twenty acres devoted primarily to agricultural uses, which has
produced a gross income from agricultural uses equivalent to one
hundred dollars or more per acre per year for three of the five
calendar years preceding the date of application for classification
under this chapter; or (c) any parcel of land of less than five acres
devoted primarily to agricultural uses which has produced a gross
income of one thousand dollars or more per year for three of the five
calendar years preceding the date of application for classification
under this chapter. Agricultural lands shall also include farm
woodlots of less than twenty and more than five acres and the land on
which appurtenances necessary to production, preparation or sale of the
agricultural products exist in conjunction with the lands producing
such products. Agricultural lands shall also include any parcel of
land of one to five acres, which is not contiguous, but which otherwise
constitutes an integral part of farming operations being conducted on
land qualifying under this section as "farm and agricultural lands".

Sec. 121 RCW 89.08.070 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 184 s 8 are each
amended to read as follows:
In addition to the duties and powers hereinafter conferred upon the
((commission)) department, it shall have the following duties and
powers:
(1) To offer such assistance as may be appropriate to the
supervisors of conservation districts organized under the provisions of
chapter 184, Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess., in the carrying out of any of
their powers and programs:
(a) to assist and guide districts in the preparation and carrying
out of programs for resource conservation authorized under chapter 184,
Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess.;
(b) to review district programs;
(c) to coordinate the programs of the several districts and resolve
any conflicts in such programs;
(d) to facilitate, promote, assist, harmonize, coordinate, and
guide the resource conservation programs and activities of districts as
they relate to other special purpose districts, counties, and other
public agencies.
(2) To keep the supervisors of each of the several conservation
districts organized under the provisions of chapter 184, Laws of 1973
1st ex. sess. informed of the activities and experience of all other
districts organized hereunder, and to facilitate an interchange of
advice and experience between such districts and cooperation between
them.
(3) To review agreements, or forms of agreements, proposed to be
entered into by districts with other districts or with any state,
federal, interstate, or other public or private agency, organization,
or individual, and advise the districts concerning such agreements or
forms of agreements.
(4) To secure the cooperation and assistance of the United States
and any of its agencies, and of agencies of this state in the work of
such districts.
(5) To recommend the inclusion in annual and longer term budgets
and appropriation legislation of the state of Washington of funds
necessary for appropriation by the legislature to finance the
activities of the ((commission)) department and the conservation
districts; to administer the provisions of any law hereinafter enacted
by the legislature appropriating funds for expenditure in connection
with the activities of conservation districts; to distribute to
conservation districts funds, equipment, supplies and services received
by the ((commission)) department for that purpose from any source,
subject to such conditions as shall be made applicable thereto in any
state or federal statute or local ordinance making available such
funds, property or services; to issue regulations establishing
guidelines and suitable controls to govern the use by conservation
districts of such funds, property and services; and to review all
budgets, administrative procedures and operations of such districts and
advise the districts concerning their conformance with applicable laws
and regulations.
(6) To encourage the cooperation and collaboration of state,
federal, regional, interstate and local public and private agencies
with the conservation districts, and facilitate arrangements under
which the conservation districts may serve county governing bodies and
other agencies as their local operating agencies in the administration
of any activity concerned with the conservation of renewable natural
resources.
(7) To disseminate information throughout the state concerning the
activities and programs of the conservation districts organized
((hereunder)) under this chapter, and to encourage the formation of
such districts in areas where their organization is desirable; to make
available information concerning the needs and the work of the
conservation district and the ((commission)) department to the
governor, the legislature, executive agencies of the government of this
state, political subdivisions of this state, cooperating federal
agencies, and the general public.
(8) Pursuant to procedures developed mutually by the ((commission))
department and other state and local agencies that are authorized to
plan or administer activities significantly affecting the conservation
of renewable natural resources, to receive from such agencies for
review and comment suitable descriptions of their plans, programs and
activities for purposes of coordination with district conservation
programs; to arrange for and participate in conferences necessary to
avoid conflict among such plans and programs, to call attention to
omissions, and to avoid duplication of effort.
(9) To compile information and make studies, summaries and analysis
of district programs in relation to each other and to other resource
conservation programs on a statewide basis.
(10) To assist conservation districts in obtaining legal services
from state and local legal officers.
(11) To require annual reports from conservation districts, the
form and content of which shall be developed by the ((commission))
department.
(12) To establish by ((regulations)) rule, with the assistance and
advice of the state auditor's office, adequate and reasonably uniform
accounting and auditing procedures which shall be used by conservation
districts.

Sec. 122 RCW 89.08.080 and 1999 c 305 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
To form a conservation district, twenty percent of the voters
within the area to be affected may file a petition with the
((commission)) department asking that the area be organized into a
district.
The petition shall give the name of the proposed district, state
that it is needed in the interest of the public health, safety, and
welfare, give a general description of the area proposed to be
organized and request that the ((commission)) department determine that
it be created, and that it define the boundaries thereof and call an
election on the question of creating the district.
If more than one petition is filed covering parts of the same area,
the ((commission)) department may consolidate all or any of them.

Sec. 123 RCW 89.08.090 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 184 s 10 are each
amended to read as follows:
Within thirty days after a petition is filed, the ((commission))
department shall give due notice of the time and place of a public
hearing thereon. At the hearing all interested persons shall be heard.
If it appears to the ((commission)) department that additional land
should be included in the district, the hearing shall be adjourned and
a new notice given covering the entire area and a new date fixed for
further hearing, unless waiver of notice by the owners of the
additional land is filed with the ((commission)) department.
No district shall include any portion of a railroad right of way,
or another similar district. The lands included in a district need not
be contiguous.

Sec. 124 RCW 89.08.100 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 184 s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
After the hearing, if the ((commission)) department finds that the
public health, safety, and welfare warrant the creation of the
district, it shall enter an order to that effect and define the
boundaries thereof by metes and bounds or by legal subdivisions.
In making its findings the ((commission)) department shall consider
the topography of the particular area and of the state generally; the
composition of the soil; the distribution of erosion; the prevailing
land use practices; the effects upon and benefits to the land proposed
to be included; the relation of the area to existing watersheds and
agricultural regions and to other similar districts organized or
proposed; and consider such other physical, geographical, and economic
factors as are relevant.
If the ((commission)) department finds there is no need for the
district, it shall enter an order denying the petition, and no petition
covering the same or substantially the same area may be filed within
six months thereafter.

Sec. 125 RCW 89.08.110 and 1999 c 305 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
If the ((commission)) department finds that the district is needed,
it shall then determine whether it is practicable. To assist the
((commission)) department in determining this question, it shall,
within a reasonable time, submit the proposition to a vote of the
district electors in the proposed district.
The ((commission)) department shall fix the date of the election,
designate the polling places, fix the hours for opening and closing the
polls, and appoint the election officials. The election shall be
conducted, the vote counted and returns canvassed and the results
published by the ((commission)) department.

Sec. 126 RCW 89.08.120 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 184 s 13 are each
amended to read as follows:
The ((commission)) department shall provide the ballots for the
election which shall contain the words

"□ For creation of a conservation district of the lands below
described and lying in the county or counties of . . . . . .,
. . . . . . and . . . . . .," and
"□ Against creation of a conservation district of the lands below
described and lying in the county or counties of . . . . . .,
. . . . . . and . . . . . ."

The ballot shall set forth the boundaries of the proposed district,
and contain a direction to insert an X in the square of the voter's
choice.

Sec. 127 RCW 89.08.130 and 1999 c 305 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((commission)) department shall give due notice of the
election, which shall state generally the purpose of the election, the
date thereof, the place and hours of voting, and set forth the
boundaries of the proposed district.
Only qualified district electors within the proposed district as
determined by the ((commission)) department may vote at the election.
Each voter shall vote in the polling place nearest the voter's
residence.

Sec. 128 RCW 89.08.140 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 184 s 15 are each
amended to read as follows:
The ((commission)) department shall bear all expense of giving the
notices and conducting the hearings and election, and shall issue
((regulations)) rules governing all hearings and elections and
supervise the conduct thereof. It shall provide for registration of
eligible voters or prescribe the procedure to determine the eligible
voters. No informality in connection with the election shall
invalidate the results, if the notice thereof was substantially given,
and the election fairly conducted.

Sec. 129 RCW 89.08.150 and 1999 c 305 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
If a majority of the votes cast at the election are against the
creation of the district, the ((commission)) department shall deny the
petition. If a majority favor the district, the ((commission))
department shall determine the practicability of the project.
In making such determination, the ((commission)) department shall
consider the attitude of the voters of the district; the number of
eligible voters who voted at the election; the size of the majority
vote; the wealth and income of the land occupiers; the probable expense
of carrying out the project; and any other economic factors relevant
thereto.
If the ((commission)) department finds that the project is
impracticable it shall enter an order to that effect and deny the
petition. When the petition has been denied, no new petition covering
the same or substantially the same area may be filed within six months
therefrom.

Sec. 130 RCW 89.08.160 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 184 s 17 are each
amended to read as follows:
If the ((commission)) department finds the project practicable, it
shall appoint two supervisors, one of whom shall be a landowner or
operator of a farm, who shall be qualified by training and experience
to perform the specialized skilled services required of them. They,
with the three elected supervisors, two of whom shall be landowners or
operators of a farm, shall constitute the governing board of the
district.
The two appointed supervisors shall file with the secretary of
state a sworn application, reciting that a petition was filed with the
((commission)) department for the creation of the district; that all
required proceedings were had thereon; that they were appointed by the
((commission)) department as such supervisors; and that the application
is being filed to complete the organization of the district. It shall
contain the names and residences of the applicants, a certified copy of
their appointments, the name of the district, the location of the
office of the supervisors and the term of office of each applicant.
The application shall be accompanied by a statement of the
((commission)) department, reciting that a petition was filed, notice
issued, and hearing held thereon as required; that it determined the
need for the district and defined the boundaries thereof; that notice
was given and an election held on the question of creating the
district; that a majority vote favored the district, and that the
((commission)) department had determined the district practicable; and
shall set forth the boundaries of the district.

Sec. 131 RCW 89.08.170 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 184 s 18 are each
amended to read as follows:
If the secretary of state finds that the name of the proposed
district is such as will not be confused with that of any other
district, he shall enter the application and statement in his records.
If he finds the name may be confusing, he shall certify that fact to
the ((commission, which)) director, who shall submit a new name free
from such objections, and he shall enter the application and statement
as modified, in his records. Thereupon the district shall be
considered organized into a body corporate.
The secretary of state shall then issue to the supervisors a
certificate of organization of the district under the seal of the
state, and shall record the certificate in his office. Proof of the
issuance of the certificate shall be evidence of the establishment of
the district, and a certified copy of the certificate shall be
admissible as evidence and shall be proof of the filing and contents
thereof. The name of a conservation district may be changed upon
recommendation by the supervisors of a district and approval by the
((state conservation commission)) director and the secretary of state.
The new name shall be recorded by the secretary of state following the
same general procedure as for the previous name.

Sec. 132 RCW 89.08.180 and 1999 c 305 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
Territory may be added to an existing district upon filing a
petition as in the case of formation with the ((commission)) department
by twenty percent of the voters of the affected area to be included.
The same procedure shall be followed as for the creation of the
district.
As an alternate procedure, the ((commission)) department may upon
the petition of a majority of the voters in any one or more districts
or in unorganized territory adjoining a conservation district change
the boundaries of a district, or districts, if such action will promote
the practical and feasible administration of such district or
districts.
Upon petition of the boards of supervisors of two or more
districts, the ((commission)) department may approve the combining of
all or parts of such districts and name the district, or districts,
with the approval of the name by the secretary of state. A public
hearing and/or a referendum may be held if deemed necessary or
desirable by the ((commission)) department in order to determine the
wishes of the voters.
When districts are combined, the joint boards of supervisors will
first select a chairman, secretary and other necessary officers and
select a regular date for meetings. All elected supervisors will
continue to serve as members of the board until the expiration of their
current term of office, and/or until the election date nearest their
expiration date. All appointed supervisors will continue to serve
until the expiration of their current term of office, at which time the
((commission)) department will make the necessary appointments. In the
event that more than two districts are combined, a similar procedure
will be set up and administered by the ((commission)) department.
When districts are combined or territory is moved from one district
to another, the property, records and accounts of the districts
involved shall be distributed to the remaining district or districts as
approved by the ((commission)) department. A new certificate of
organization, naming and describing the new district or districts,
shall be issued by the secretary of state.

Sec. 133 RCW 89.08.185 and 1999 c 305 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
The local governing body of any city or incorporated town within an
existing district may approve by majority vote a petition to withdraw
from the district. The petition shall be submitted to the district for
its approval. If approved by the district, the petition shall be sent
to the ((commission)) department. The ((commission)) department shall
approve the petition and forward it to the secretary of state and the
boundary of the district shall be adjusted accordingly. If the
petition is not approved by the district, the district shall adopt a
resolution specifying the reasons why the petition is not approved.
The petition and the district's resolution shall be sent to the
((commission)) department for its review. The ((commission))
department shall approve or reject the petition based upon criteria it
has adopted for the evaluation of petitions in dispute. If the
((commission)) department approves the petition, it shall forward the
petition to the secretary of state and the boundaries of the district
shall be adjusted accordingly. The criteria used by the ((commission))
department to evaluate petitions which are in dispute shall be adopted
as rules by the ((commission)) department under chapter 34.05 RCW, the
administrative procedure act.

Sec. 134 RCW 89.08.200 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 184 s 21 are each
amended to read as follows:
The term of office of each supervisor shall be three years and
until his successor is appointed or elected and qualified, except that
the supervisors first appointed shall serve for one and two years
respectively from the date of their appointments, as designated in
their appointments.
In the case of elected supervisors, the term of office of each
supervisor shall be three years and until his successor is elected and
qualified, except that for the first election, the one receiving the
largest number of votes shall be elected for three years; the next
largest two years; and the third largest one year. Successors shall be
elected for three-year terms.
Vacancies in the office of appointed supervisors shall be filled by
the ((state conservation commission)) director. Vacancies in the
office of elected supervisors shall be filled by appointment made by
the remaining supervisors for the unexpired term.
A majority of the supervisors shall constitute a quorum and the
concurrence of a majority is required for any official action or
determination.
Supervisors shall serve without compensation, but they shall be
entitled to expenses, including traveling expenses, necessarily
incurred in discharge of their duties. A supervisor may be removed by
the ((state conservation commission)) director upon notice and hearing,
for neglect of duty or malfeasance in office, but for no other reason.
The governing board shall designate a chairman from time to time.

Sec. 135 RCW 89.08.210 and 2000 c 45 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The supervisors may employ a secretary, treasurer, technical
experts, and such other officers, agents, and employees, permanent and
temporary, as they may require, and determine their qualifications,
duties, and compensation. It may call upon the attorney general for
legal services, or may employ its own counsel and legal staff. The
supervisors may delegate to their chairman, to one or more supervisors,
or to one or more agents or employees such powers and duties as it
deems proper. The supervisors shall furnish to the ((commission))
department, upon request, copies of such internal rules, regulations,
orders, contracts, forms, and other documents as they shall adopt or
employ, and such other information concerning their activities as the
((commission)) department may require in the performance of its duties
under chapter 184, Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess. The supervisors shall
provide for the execution of surety bonds for officers and all
employees who shall be entrusted with funds or property.
The supervisors shall provide for the keeping of a full and
accurate record of all proceedings, resolutions, regulations, and
orders issued or adopted. The supervisors shall provide for an annual
audit of the accounts of receipts and disbursements in accordance with
procedures prescribed by ((regulations)) rules of the ((commission))
department.
The board may invite the legislative body of any municipality or
county near or within the district, to designate a representative to
advise and consult with it on all questions of program and policy which
may affect the property, water supply, or other interests of such
municipality or county. The governing body of a district shall appoint
such advisory committees as may be needed to assure the availability of
appropriate channels of communication to the board of supervisors, to
persons affected by district operations, and to local, regional, state
and interstate special-purpose districts and agencies responsible for
community planning, zoning, or other resource development activities.
The district shall keep such committees informed of its work, and such
advisory committees shall submit recommendations from time to time to
the board of supervisors.

Sec. 136 RCW 89.08.220 and 1999 c 305 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
A conservation district organized under the provisions of chapter
184, Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess. shall constitute a governmental
subdivision of this state, and a public body corporate and politic
exercising public powers, but shall not levy taxes or issue bonds and
such district, and the supervisors thereof, shall have the following
powers, in addition to others granted in other sections of chapter 184,
Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess.:
(1) To conduct surveys, investigations, and research relating to
the conservation of renewable natural resources and the preventive and
control measures and works of improvement needed, to publish the
results of such surveys, investigations, or research, and to
disseminate information concerning such preventive and control measures
and works of improvement: PROVIDED, That in order to avoid duplication
of research activities, no district shall initiate any research program
except in cooperation with the government of this state or any of its
agencies, or with the United States or any of its agencies;
(2) To conduct educational and demonstrational projects on any
lands within the district upon obtaining the consent of the occupier of
such lands and such necessary rights or interests in such lands as may
be required in order to demonstrate by example the means, methods,
measures, and works of improvement by which the conservation of
renewable natural resources may be carried out;
(3) To carry out preventative and control measures and works of
improvement for the conservation of renewable natural resources, within
the district including, but not limited to, engineering operations,
methods of cultivation, the growing of vegetation, changes in use of
lands, and the measures listed in RCW 89.08.010, on any lands within
the district upon obtaining the consent of the occupier of such lands
and such necessary rights or interests in such lands as may be
required;
(4) To cooperate or enter into agreements with, and within the
limits of appropriations duly made available to it by law, to furnish
financial or other aid to any agency, governmental or otherwise, or any
occupier of lands within the district in the carrying on of preventive
and control measures and works of improvement for the conservation of
renewable natural resources within the district, subject to such
conditions as the supervisors may deem necessary to advance the
purposes of chapter 184, Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess. For purposes of
this subsection only, land occupiers who are also district supervisors
are not subject to the provisions of RCW 42.23.030;
(5) To obtain options upon and to acquire in any manner, except by
condemnation, by purchase, exchange, lease, gift, bequest, devise, or
otherwise, any property, real or personal, or rights or interests
therein; to maintain, administer, and improve any properties acquired,
to receive income from such properties and to expend such income in
carrying out the purposes and provisions of chapter 184, Laws of 1973
1st ex. sess.; and to sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of any of its
property or interests therein in furtherance of the purposes and the
provisions of chapter 184, Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess.;
(6) To make available, on such terms, as it shall prescribe, to
land occupiers within the district, agricultural and engineering
machinery and equipment, fertilizer, seeds, seedlings, and such other
equipment and material as will assist them to carry on operations upon
their lands for the conservation of renewable natural resources;
(7) To prepare and keep current a comprehensive long-range program
recommending the conservation of all the renewable natural resources of
the district. Such programs shall be directed toward the best use of
renewable natural resources and in a manner that will best meet the
needs of the district and the state, taking into consideration, where
appropriate, such uses as farming, grazing, timber supply, forest,
parks, outdoor recreation, potable water supplies for urban and rural
areas, water for agriculture, minimal flow, and industrial uses,
watershed stabilization, control of soil erosion, retardation of water
run-off, flood prevention and control, reservoirs and other water
storage, restriction of developments of flood plains, protection of
open space and scenery, preservation of natural beauty, protection of
fish and wildlife, preservation of wilderness areas and wild rivers,
the prevention or reduction of sedimentation and other pollution in
rivers and other waters, and such location of highways, schools,
housing developments, industries, airports and other facilities and
structures as will fit the needs of the state and be consistent with
the best uses of the renewable natural resources of the state. The
program shall include an inventory of all renewable natural resources
in the district, a compilation of current resource needs, projections
of future resource requirements, priorities for various resource
activities, projected timetables, descriptions of available
alternatives, and provisions for coordination with other resource
programs.
The district shall also prepare an annual work plan, which shall
describe the action programs, services, facilities, materials, working
arrangements and estimated funds needed to carry out the parts of the
long-range programs that are of the highest priorities.
The districts shall hold public hearings at appropriate times in
connection with the preparation of programs and plans, shall give
careful consideration to the views expressed and problems revealed in
hearings, and shall keep the public informed concerning their programs,
plans, and activities. Occupiers of land shall be invited to submit
proposals for consideration to such hearings. The districts may
supplement such hearings with meetings, referenda and other suitable
means to determine the wishes of interested parties and the general
public in regard to current and proposed plans and programs of a
district. They shall confer with public and private agencies,
individually and in groups, to give and obtain information and
understanding of the impact of district operations upon agriculture,
forestry, water supply and quality, flood control, particular
industries, commercial concerns and other public and private interests,
both rural and urban.
Each district shall submit to the ((commission)) department its
proposed long-range program and annual work plans for review and
comment.
The long-range renewable natural resource program, together with
the supplemental annual work plans, developed by each district under
the foregoing procedures shall have official status as the authorized
program of the district, and it shall be published by the districts as
its "renewable resources program". Copies shall be made available by
the districts to the appropriate counties, municipalities, special
purpose districts and state agencies, and shall be made available in
convenient places for examination by public land occupier or private
interest concerned. Summaries of the program and selected material
therefrom shall be distributed as widely as feasible for public
information;
(8) To administer any project or program concerned with the
conservation of renewable natural resources located within its
boundaries undertaken by any federal, state, or other public agency by
entering into a contract or other appropriate administrative
arrangement with any agency administering such project or program;
(9) Cooperate with other districts organized under chapter 184,
Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess. in the exercise of any of its powers;
(10) To accept donations, gifts, and contributions in money,
services, materials, or otherwise, from the United States or any of its
agencies, from this state or any of its agencies, or from any other
source, and to use or expend such moneys, services, materials, or any
contributions in carrying out the purposes of chapter 184, Laws 1973
1st ex. sess.;
(11) To sue and be sued in the name of the district; to have a seal
which shall be judicially noticed; have perpetual succession unless
terminated as hereinafter provided; to make and execute contracts and
other instruments, necessary or convenient to the exercise of its
powers; to borrow money and to pledge, mortgage and assign the income
of the district and its real or personal property therefor; and to
make, amend rules and regulations not inconsistent with chapter 184,
Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess. and to carry into effect its purposes;
(12) Any two or more districts may engage in joint activities by
agreement between or among them in planning, financing, constructing,
operating, maintaining, and administering any program or project
concerned with the conservation of renewable natural resources. The
districts concerned may make available for purposes of the agreement
any funds, property, personnel, equipment, or services available to
them under chapter 184, Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess.;
Any district may enter into such agreements with a district or
districts in adjoining states to carry out such purposes if the law in
such other states permits the districts in such states to enter into
such agreements.
The ((commission)) department shall have authority to propose,
guide, and facilitate the establishment and carrying out of any such
agreement;
(13) Every district shall, through public hearings, annual
meetings, publications, or other means, keep the general public,
agencies and occupiers of land within the district, informed of the
works and activities planned and administered by the district, of the
purposes these will serve, of the income and expenditures of the
district, of the funds borrowed by the district and the purposes for
which such funds are expended, and of the results achieved annually by
the district; and
(14) The supervisors of conservation districts may designate an
area, state, and national association of conservation districts as a
coordinating agency in the execution of the duties imposed by this
chapter, and to make gifts in the form of dues, quotas, or otherwise to
such associations for costs of services rendered, and may support and
attend such meetings as may be required to promote and perfect the
organization and to effect its purposes.

Sec. 137 RCW 89.08.341 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 184 s 24 are each
amended to read as follows:
Any agency of the government of this state and any local political
subdivision of this state is hereby authorized to make such
arrangements with any district, through contract, regulation or other
appropriate means, wherever it believes that such arrangements will
promote administrative efficiency or economy.
In connection with any such arrangements, any state or local agency
or political subdivision of this state is authorized, within the limits
of funds available to it, to contribute funds, equipment, property or
services to any district; and to collaborate with a district in jointly
planning, constructing, financing or operating any work or activity
provided for in such arrangements and in the joint acquisition,
maintenance and operation of equipment or facilities in connection
therewith.
State agencies, the districts, and other local agencies are
authorized to make available to each other maps, reports and data in
their possession that are useful in the preparation of their respective
programs and plans for resource conservation. The districts shall keep
the state and local agencies fully informed concerning the status and
progress of the preparation of their resource conservation programs and
plans.
The ((state conservation commission)) department and the counties
of the state may provide respective conservation districts such
administrative funds as will be necessary to carry out the purpose of
chapter 184, Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess.

Sec. 138 RCW 89.08.350 and 1999 c 305 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
At any time after five years from the organization of a district,
twenty percent of the voters in the district may file with the
((commission)) department a petition, praying that the district be
dissolved. The ((commission)) department may hold public hearings
thereon, and within sixty days from receipt of the petition, shall give
due notice of an election on the question of dissolution. It shall
provide appropriate ballots, conduct the election, canvass the returns,
and declare the results in the same manner as for elections to create
a district.
All district electors may vote at the election. No informality
relating to the election shall invalidate it if notice is substantially
given and the election is fairly conducted.

Sec. 139 RCW 89.08.370 and 1999 c 305 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
If the district is ordered dissolved, the supervisors shall
forthwith terminate the affairs of the district and dispose of all
district property at public auction, and pay the proceeds therefrom to
pay any debts of the district and any remaining balance to the state
treasurer.
They shall then file a verified application with the secretary of
state for the dissolution of the district, accompanied by a certificate
of the ((commission)) department reciting the determination that
further operation of the district is impracticable. The application
shall recite that the property of the district has been disposed of,
that the proceeds therefrom have been used to pay any debts of the
district and any remaining balance paid to the treasurer, and contain
a full accounting of the property and proceeds. Thereupon the
secretary shall issue to the supervisors a certificate of dissolution
and file a copy thereof in his or her records.

Sec. 140 RCW 89.08.410 and 1989 c 18 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((state conservation commission)) director may authorize grants
to conservation districts from moneys appropriated to the
((commission)) department for such purposes as provided in this
section. Such grants shall be made annually on or before the last day
of June of each year and shall be made only to those conservation
districts that apply for the grants. After all the grant requests have
been submitted, the initial grants in any year shall be made so that a
conservation district shall not receive a grant in excess of the lesser
of: (1) an amount equal to the total moneys obtained by the
conservation district from all other sources, other than any grants
obtained from the state, during the preceding calendar year; or (2)
twenty-two thousand five hundred dollars. If the appropriated moneys
are insufficient to make the maximum level of the initial grants, each
grant amount shall be reduced by an equal dollar amount until the total
amount of the grants is equal to the amount of the appropriation.
However, further grants shall be made to those conservation
districts that were limited to grants of twenty-two thousand five
hundred dollars if the appropriated moneys are in excess of the amount
of the initial distribution of grants, but the total of both grants to
any conservation district in any year shall not exceed an amount equal
to the total moneys obtained by that conservation district from all
other sources, other than any grants obtained from the state, during
the preceding calendar year. If the appropriated moneys are
insufficient to make the second distribution of grants, each grant
under the second distribution shall be reduced by an equal dollar
amount until the total amount of all the grants is equal to the amount
of the appropriation.

Sec. 141 RCW 89.08.470 and 1998 c 249 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((By January 1, 1996, the Washington conservation commission))
The department shall develop, in consultation with other state
agencies, tribes, and local governments, a consolidated application
process for permits for a watershed restoration project developed by an
agency or sponsored by an agency on behalf of a volunteer organization.
The consolidated process shall include a single permit application form
for use by all responsible state and local agencies. The
((commission)) department shall encourage use of the consolidated
permit application process by any federal agency responsible for
issuance of related permits. The permit application forms to be
consolidated shall include, at a minimum, applications for: (a)
Approvals related to water quality standards under chapter 90.48 RCW;
(b) hydraulic project approvals under chapter ((75.20)) 77.55 RCW; and
(c) section 401 water quality certifications under 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1341
and chapter 90.48 RCW.
(2) If a watershed restoration project is also a fish habitat
enhancement project that meets the criteria of RCW ((75.20.350(1)))
77.55.290(1), the project sponsor shall instead follow the permit
review and approval process established in RCW ((75.20.350)) 77.55.290
with regard to state and local government permitting requirements. The
sponsor shall so notify state and local permitting authorities.

Sec. 142 RCW 89.08.480 and 1995 c 378 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each agency of the state and unit of local government that claims
jurisdiction or the right to require permits, other approvals, or fees
as a condition of allowing a watershed restoration project to proceed
shall designate an office or official as a designated recipient of
project applications and shall inform the ((conservation commission))
department of the designation.

Sec. 143 RCW 89.08.520 and 2001 c 227 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
In administering grant programs to improve water quality and
protect habitat, the ((commission)) department shall require grant
recipients to incorporate the environmental benefits of the project
into their grant applications, and the ((commission)) department shall
utilize the statement of environmental ((benefit[s])) benefits in its
grant prioritization and selection process. The ((commission))
department shall also develop appropriate outcome-focused performance
measures to be used both for management and performance assessment of
the grant program. The ((commission)) department shall work with the
districts to develop uniform performance measures across participating
districts. To the extent possible, the ((commission)) department
should coordinate its performance measure system with other natural
resource-related agencies as defined in RCW 43.41.270. The
((commission)) department shall consult with affected interest groups
in implementing this section.

Sec. 144 RCW 89.08.530 and 2002 c 280 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The agricultural conservation easements program is created.
The ((state conservation commission)) department shall manage the
program and adopt rules as necessary to implement the legislature's
intent.
(2) The ((commission)) department shall report to the legislature
on an ((on-going)) ongoing basis regarding potential funding sources
for the purchase of agricultural conservation easements under the
program and recommend changes to existing funding authorized by the
legislature.
(3) All funding for the program shall be deposited into the
agricultural conservation easements account created in RCW 89.08.540.
Expenditures from the account shall be made to local governments and
private nonprofits on a match or no match required basis at the
discretion of the ((commission)) director.
(4) Easements purchased with money from the agricultural
conservation easements account run with the land.

Sec. 145 RCW 89.08.540 and 2002 c 280 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The agricultural conservation easements account is created in
the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from legislative
appropriations, other sources as directed by the legislature, and
gifts, grants, or endowments from public or private sources must be
deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for the purchase of easements under the agricultural conservation
easements program. Only the ((state conservation commission, or the
executive director of the commission on the commission's behalf,))
director may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.
(2) The ((commission)) department is authorized to receive and
expend gifts, grants, or endowments from public or private sources that
are made available, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of
the agricultural conservation easements program.

Sec. 146 RCW 90.64.005 and 1998 c 262 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that there is a need to establish a clear and
understandable process that provides for the proper and effective
management of dairy nutrients that affect the quality of surface or
ground waters in the state of Washington. The legislature finds that
there is a need for a program that will provide a stable and
predictable business climate upon which dairy farms may base future
investment decisions.
The legislature finds that federal regulations require a permit
program for dairies with over seven hundred head of mature cows and,
other specified dairy farms that directly discharge into waters or are
otherwise significant contributors of pollution. The legislature finds
that significant work has been ongoing over a period of time and that
the intent of this chapter is to take the consensus that has been
developed and place it into statutory form.
It is also the intent of this chapter to establish an inspection
and technical assistance program for dairy farms to address the
discharge of pollution to surface and ground waters of the state that
will lead to water quality compliance by the industry. A further
purpose is to create a balanced program involving technical assistance,
regulation, and enforcement with coordination and oversight of the
program by a committee composed of industry, agency, and other
representatives. Furthermore, it is the objective of this chapter to
maintain the administration of the water quality program as it relates
to dairy operations at the state level.
It is also the intent of this chapter to recognize the existing
working relationships between conservation districts, the
((conservation commission)) department of agriculture, and the
department of ecology in protecting water quality of the state. A
further purpose of this chapter is to provide statutory recognition of
the coordination of the functions of conservation districts, the
((conservation commission)) department of agriculture, and the
department of ecology pertaining to development of dairy waste
management plans for the protection of water quality.

Sec. 147 RCW 90.64.010 and 1998 c 262 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Advisory and oversight committee" means a balanced committee
of agency, dairy farm, and interest group representatives convened to
provide oversight and direction to the dairy nutrient management
program.
(2) "Bypass" means the intentional diversion of waste streams from
any portion of a treatment facility.
(3) "Catastrophic" means a tornado, hurricane, earthquake, flood,
or other extreme condition that causes an overflow from a required
waste retention structure.
(4) "Certification" means:
(a) The acknowledgment by a local conservation district that a
dairy producer has constructed or otherwise put in place the elements
necessary to implement his or her dairy nutrient management plan; and
(b) The acknowledgment by a dairy producer that he or she is
managing dairy nutrients as specified in his or her approved dairy
nutrient management plan.
(5) "Chronic" means a series of wet weather events that precludes
the proper operation of a dairy nutrient management system that is
designed for the current herd size.
(6) (("Conservation commission" or "commission" means the
conservation commission under chapter 89.08 RCW.
(7))) "Conservation districts" or "district" means a subdivision of
state government organized under chapter 89.08 RCW.
(((8))) (7) "Concentrated dairy animal feeding operation" means a
dairy animal feeding operation subject to regulation under this chapter
which the director designates under RCW 90.64.020 or meets the
following criteria:
(a) Has more than seven hundred mature dairy cows, whether milked
or dry cows, that are confined; or
(b) Has more than two hundred head of mature dairy cattle, whether
milked or dry cows, that are confined and either:
(i) From which pollutants are discharged into navigable waters
through a manmade ditch, flushing system, or other similar manmade
device; or
(ii) From which pollutants are discharged directly into surface or
ground waters of the state that originate outside of and pass over,
across, or through the facility or otherwise come into direct contact
with the animals confined in the operation.
(((9))) (8) "Dairy animal feeding operation" means a lot or
facility where the following conditions are met:
(a) Dairy animals that have been, are, or will be stabled or
confined and fed for a total of forty-five days or more in any twelve-month period; and
(b) Crops, vegetation forage growth, or postharvest residues are
not sustained in the normal growing season over any portion of the lot
or facility. Two or more dairy animal feeding operations under common
ownership are considered, for the purposes of this chapter, to be a
single dairy animal feeding operation if they adjoin each other or if
they use a common area for land application of wastes.
(((10))) (9) "Dairy farm" means any farm that is licensed to
produce milk under chapter 15.36 RCW.
(((11))) (10) "Dairy nutrient" means any organic waste produced by
dairy cows or a dairy farm operation.
(((12))) (11) "Dairy nutrient management plan" means a plan meeting
the requirements established under RCW 90.64.026.
(((13))) (12) "Dairy nutrient management technical assistance team"
means one or more professional engineers and local conservation
district employees convened to serve one of four distinct geographic
areas in the state.
(((14))) (13) "Dairy producer" means a person who owns or operates
a dairy farm.
(((15))) (14) "Department" means the department of ecology under
chapter 43.21A RCW.
(((16))) (15) "Director" means the director of the department of
ecology, or his or her designee.
(((17))) (16) "Upset" means an exceptional incident in which there
is an unintentional and temporary noncompliance with technology-based
permit effluent limitations because of factors beyond the reasonable
control of the dairy. An upset does not include noncompliance to the
extent caused by operational error, improperly designed treatment
facilities, inadequate treatment facilities, lack of preventive
maintenance, or careless or improper operation.
(((18))) (17) "Violation" means the following acts or omissions:
(a) A discharge of pollutants into the waters of the state, except
those discharges that are due to a chronic or catastrophic event, or to
an upset as provided in 40 C.F.R. Sec. 122.41, or to a bypass as
provided in 40 C.F.R. Sec. 122.41, and that occur when:
(i) A dairy producer has a current national pollutant discharge
elimination system permit with a wastewater system designed, operated,
and maintained for the current herd size and that contains all process-generated wastewater plus average annual precipitation minus
evaporation plus contaminated storm water runoff from a twenty-five
year, twenty-four hour rainfall event for that specific location, and
the dairy producer has complied with all permit conditions, including
dairy nutrient management plan conditions for appropriate land
application practices; or
(ii) A dairy producer does not have a national pollutant discharge
elimination system permit, but has complied with all of the elements of
a dairy nutrient management plan that: Prevents the discharge of
pollutants to waters of the state, is commensurate with the dairy
producer's current herd size, and is approved and certified under RCW
90.64.026;
(b) Failure to register as required under RCW 90.64.017; or
(c) The lack of an approved dairy nutrient management plan by July
1, 2002; or
(d) The lack of a certified dairy nutrient management plan for a
dairy farm after December 31, 2003.

Sec. 148 RCW 90.64.026 and 1998 c 262 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except for those producers who already have a certified dairy
nutrient management plan as required under the terms and conditions of
an individual or general national pollutant discharge elimination
system permit, all dairy producers licensed under chapter 15.36 RCW,
regardless of size, shall prepare a dairy nutrient management plan. If
at any time a dairy nutrient management plan fails to prevent the
discharge of pollutants to waters of the state, it shall be required to
be updated.
(2) ((By November 1, 1998, the conservation commission)) The
department of agriculture, in conjunction with the advisory and
oversight committee established under section 8 ((of this act)),
chapter 262, Laws of 1998 shall develop a document clearly describing
the elements that a dairy nutrient management plan must contain to gain
local conservation district approval.
(3) In developing the elements that an approved dairy nutrient
management plan must contain, the ((commission)) department of
agriculture may authorize the use of other methods and technologies
than those developed by the natural resources conservation service when
such alternatives have been evaluated by the advisory and oversight
committee. Alternative methods and technologies shall meet the
standards and specifications of:
(a) The natural resources conservation service as modified by the
geographically based standards developed under RCW 90.64.140; or
(b) A professional engineer with expertise in the area of dairy
nutrient management.
(4) In evaluating alternative technologies and methods, the
principal objectives of the committee's evaluation shall be
determining:
(a) Whether there is a substantial likelihood that, once
implemented, the alternative technologies and methods would not violate
water quality requirements;
(b) Whether more cost-effective methods can be successfully
implemented in some or all categories of dairy operations; and
(c) Whether the technologies and methods approved or provided by
the natural resources conservation service for use by confined animal
feeding operations are necessarily required for other categories of
dairy operations.
In addition, the committee shall encourage the ((conservation
commission)) department of agriculture and the conservation districts
to apply in dairy nutrient management plans technologies and methods
that are appropriate to the needs of the specific type of operation and
the specific farm site and to avoid imposing requirements that are not
necessary for the specific dairy producer to achieve compliance with
water quality requirements.
(5) Such plans shall be submitted for approval to the local
conservation district where the dairy farm is located, and shall be
approved by conservation districts no later than by July 1, 2002. The
((conservation commission)) department of agriculture, in conjunction
with conservation districts, shall develop a statewide schedule of plan
development and approval to ensure adequate resources are available to
have all plans approved by July 1, 2002.
(6) If a dairy producer leases land for dairy production from an
owner who has prohibited the development of capital improvements, such
as storage lagoons, on the leased property, the dairy producer shall
indicate in his or her dairy nutrient management plan that such
improvements are prohibited by the landowner and shall describe other
methods, such as land application, that will be employed by the dairy
producer to manage dairy nutrients.
(7) Notwithstanding the timelines in this section, any dairy farm
licensed after September 1, 1998, shall have six months from the date
of licensing to develop a dairy nutrient management plan and another
eighteen months to fully implement that plan.
(8) If a plan contains the elements identified in subsection (2) of
this section, a conservation district shall approve the plan no later
than ninety days after receiving the plan. If the plan does not
contain the elements identified in subsection (2) of this section, the
local conservation district shall notify the dairy producer in writing
of modifications needed in the plan no later than ninety days after
receiving the plan. The dairy producer shall provide a revised plan
that includes the needed modifications within ninety days of the date
of the local conservation district notification. If the dairy producer
does not agree with, or otherwise takes exception to, the modifications
requested by the local conservation district, the dairy producer may
initiate the appeals process described in RCW 90.64.028 within thirty
days of receiving the letter of notification.
(9) An approved plan shall be certified by a conservation district
and a dairy producer when the elements necessary to implement the plan
have been constructed or otherwise put in place, and are being used as
designed and intended. A certification form shall be developed by the
((conservation commission)) department of agriculture for use statewide
and shall provide for a signature by both a conservation district
representative and a dairy producer. Certification forms shall be
signed by December 31, 2003, and a copy provided to the department for
recording in the data base established in RCW 90.64.130.
(10) The ability of dairy producers to comply with the planning
requirements of this chapter depends, in many cases, on the
availability of federal and state funding to support technical
assistance provided by local conservation districts. Dairy producers
shall not be held responsible for noncompliance with the planning
requirements of this chapter if conservation districts are unable to
perform their duties under this chapter because of insufficient
funding.

Sec. 149 RCW 90.64.028 and 1998 c 262 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Conservation district decisions pertaining to denial of
approval or denial of certification of a dairy nutrient management
plan; modification or amendment of a plan; conditions contained in a
plan; application of any dairy nutrient management practices,
standards, methods, and technologies to a particular dairy farm; and
the failure to adhere to plan review and approval timelines identified
in RCW 90.64.026 are appealable under this chapter. Department actions
pertaining to water quality violations are appealable under chapter
90.48 RCW.
In addition, a dairy producer who is constrained from complying
with the planning requirements of this chapter because of financial
hardship or local permitting delays may request a hearing before the
((conservation commission)) department of agriculture and may request
an extension of up to one year beyond the approval and certification
dates prescribed in this chapter for plan approval and certification.
(2) Within thirty days of receiving a local conservation district
notification regarding any of the decisions identified in subsection
(1) of this section, a dairy producer who disagrees with any of these
decisions may request an informal hearing before the ((conservation
commission)) department of agriculture or may appeal directly to the
pollution control hearings board. The ((commission)) department of
agriculture shall issue a written decision no later than thirty days
after the informal hearing.
(3) If the ((conservation commission)) department of agriculture
reverses the decision of the conservation district, the conservation
district may appeal this reversal to the pollution control hearings
board according to the procedure in chapter 43.21B RCW within thirty
days of receipt of the ((commission's)) department of agriculture's
decision.
(4) When an appeals process is initiated under this section, the
length of time extending from the start of the appeals process to its
conclusion shall be added onto the timelines provided in this chapter
for plan development, approval, and certification only if an appeal is
heard by the pollution control hearings board.

Sec. 150 RCW 90.64.080 and 1998 c 262 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((The conservation commission)) Under this chapter, the
department of agriculture has the following duties:
(a) Provide assistance as may be appropriate to the conservation
districts in the discharge of their responsibilities as management
agencies in dairy nutrient management program implementation;
(b) Provide coordination for conservation district programs at the
state level through special arrangements with appropriate federal and
state agencies, including oversight of the review, approval, and
certification of dairy nutrient management plans;
(c) Inform conservation districts of activities and experiences of
other conservation districts relative to agricultural water quality
protection, and facilitate an interchange of advice, experience, and
cooperation between the districts;
(d) Provide an informal hearing for disputes between dairy
producers and local conservation districts pertaining to: (i) Denial
of approval or denial of certification of dairy nutrient management
plans; (ii) modification or amendment of plans; (iii) conditions
contained in plans; (iv) application of any dairy nutrient management
practices, standards, methods, and technologies to a particular dairy
farm; and (v) the failure to adhere to the plan review and approval
timelines identified in RCW 90.64.026. An informal hearing may also
provide an opportunity for dairy producers who are constrained from
timely compliance with the planning requirements of this chapter
because of financial hardship or local permitting delays to petition
for additional time to comply;
(e) Encourage communication between the conservation district
personnel and local department personnel;
(f) Accept nominations and appoint members to serve on the advisory
and oversight committee with advice of the Washington association of
conservation districts and the department;
(g) Provide a cochair to the advisory and oversight committee;
(h) Report to the legislature by December 1st of each year until
2003 on the status of dairy nutrient management planning and on the
technical assistance provided to dairy producers in carrying out the
requirements of this chapter; and
(i) Work with the department to provide communication outreach to
representatives of agricultural and environmental organizations to
receive feedback on implementation of this chapter.
(2) The ((commission's)) department of agriculture's capability to
carry out its responsibilities under this chapter is contingent upon
the availability of funding and resources to implement a dairy nutrient
management program.

Sec. 151 RCW 90.64.140 and 1998 c 262 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ((conservation commission)) department of agriculture shall
establish four dairy nutrient management technical assistance teams by
June 1, 1998. The teams shall be geographically located throughout the
state. Each team shall consist of one or more professional engineers,
local conservation district employees, and dairy nutrient management
experts from Washington State University. The purpose of the teams is
to:
(a) Actively develop and promote new cost-effective approaches for
managing dairy nutrients; and
(b) Assist dairy farms in developing dairy nutrient management
plans.
(2) By January 1, 1999, each team shall develop one or more initial
sets of standards and specifications to assist dairy producers in
developing and implementing dairy nutrient management plans. Standards
and specifications developed by a technical assistance team shall be
appropriate to the soils and other conditions within that geographic
area and shall be reviewed by the advisory and oversight committee.

Sec. 152 RCW 90.64.800 and 1998 c 262 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department, in conjunction with the ((conservation commission))
department of agriculture and advisory and oversight committee, shall
report to the legislature by December 1st of each year until 2003, on
progress made in implementing chapter 262, Laws of 1998. At a minimum,
the reports shall include data on inspections, the status of dairy
nutrient planning, compliance with water quality standards, and
enforcement actions. The report shall also provide recommendations on
how implementation of chapter 262, Laws of 1998 could be facilitated
for dairy producers and generally improved.
((The conservation commission shall include in the report to the
legislature filed December 1, 1999, an evaluation of whether the fiscal
resources available to the commission, to conservation districts, and
to Washington State University dairy nutrient management experts are
adequate to fund the technical assistance teams established under RCW
90.64.140 and to develop and certify plans as required by the schedule
established in RCW 90.64.026. If the funding is insufficient, the
report shall include an estimate of the amount of funding necessary to
accomplish the schedule contained in RCW 90.64.026.))

Sec. 153 RCW 90.64.810 and 2000 c 147 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A dairy nutrient management task force is created that shall be
comprised of no more than fifteen members, who are appointed as
follows:
(a) Two members of the house of representatives, one from each
major caucus, appointed by the co-speakers of the house of
representatives;
(b) Two members of the senate, one from each major caucus,
appointed by the president of the senate;
(c) A representative of the department of ecology, appointed by the
director of ecology;
(d) A representative of the ((state conservation commission))
department of agriculture, appointed by ((its executive secretary)) the
director of agriculture;
(e) A representative of local conservation districts, appointed by
the president of a statewide association of conservation districts;
(f) A representative of local health departments, appointed by the
Washington state association of local public health officials;
(g) A representative of commercial shellfish growers, appointed by
a statewide organization representing oyster growers;
(h) Four representatives of the dairy industry, appointed by a
statewide organization representing the dairy industry in the state;
(i) A representative of an environmental interest organization with
familiarity and expertise in water quality issues, appointed by a
statewide organization representing environmental interests;
(j) A representative of the United States environmental protection
agency, appointed by the regional director of the agency if the agency
chooses to be represented on the task force; and
(k) A representative of the United States natural resources
conservation service, appointed by the state conservationist of that
agency for this state, if the agency chooses to be represented on the
task force.
(2) The task force shall convene as soon as possible upon
appointment of its members. The task force shall elect a chair and
adopt rules for conducting the business of the task force. Staff
support for the task force shall be provided by the ((Washington state
conservation commission)) department of agriculture.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2004.

Sec. 154 RCW 90.71.020 and 1998 c 246 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The Puget Sound action team is created. The action team shall
consist of: The directors of the departments of ecology; agriculture;
natural resources; fish and wildlife; and community, trade, and
economic development; the secretaries of the departments of health and
transportation; the director of the parks and recreation commission;
the director of the interagency committee for outdoor recreation; ((the
administrative officer of the conservation commission designated in RCW
89.08.050;)) one person representing cities, appointed by the governor;
one person representing counties, appointed by the governor; one person
representing federally recognized tribes, appointed by the governor;
and the chair of the action team. The action team shall also include
the following ex officio nonvoting members: The regional director of
the United States environmental protection agency; the regional
administrator of the national marine fisheries service; and the
regional supervisor of the United States fish and wildlife service.
The members representing cities and counties shall each be reimbursed
for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(2) The action team shall:
(a) Prepare a Puget Sound work plan and budget for inclusion in the
governor's biennial budget;
(b) Coordinate monitoring and research programs as provided in RCW
90.71.060;
(c) Work under the direction of the action team chair as provided
in RCW 90.71.040;
(d) Coordinate permitting requirements as necessary to expedite
permit issuance for any local watershed plan developed pursuant to
rules adopted under this chapter;
(e) Identify and resolve any policy or rule conflicts that may
exist between one or more agencies represented on the action team;
(f) Periodically amend the Puget Sound management plan;
(g) Enter into, amend, and terminate contracts with individuals,
corporations, or research institutions for the purposes of this
chapter;
(h) Receive such gifts, grants, and endowments, in trust or
otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of the action team.
The action team may expend the same or any income therefrom according
to the terms of the gifts, grants, or endowments;
(i) Promote extensive public participation, and otherwise seek to
broadly disseminate information concerning Puget Sound;
(j) Receive and expend funding from other public agencies;
(k) To reduce costs and improve efficiency, review by December 1,
1996, all requirements for reports and documentation from state
agencies and local governments specified in the plan for the purpose of
eliminating and consolidating reporting requirements; and
(l) Beginning in December 1998, and every two years thereafter,
submit a report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature that describes and evaluates the successes and shortcomings
of the current work plan relative to the priority problems identified
for each geographic area of Puget Sound.
(3) By July 1, 1996, the action team shall begin developing its
initial work plan, which shall include the coordination of necessary
support staff.
(4) The action team shall incorporate, to the maximum extent
possible, the recommendations of the council regarding amendments to
the Puget Sound management plan and the work plan.
(5) All proceedings of the action team are subject to the open
public meetings act under chapter 42.30 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 155 A new section is added to chapter 39.19
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The office of minority and women's business enterprises is
hereby abolished. All remaining references to the office of minority
and women's business enterprises in the Revised Code of Washington
shall be construed to mean the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the office of minority
and women's business enterprises shall be delivered to the custody of
the department of community, trade, and economic development, except
that materials related to the certified business data base and other
information technology systems and applications shall be delivered to
the custody of the department of general administration. All cabinets,
furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible
property employed by the office of minority and women's business
enterprises shall be made available to the department of community,
trade, and economic development and the department of general
administration. All funds, credits, or other assets held by the office
of minority and women's business enterprises shall be assigned to the
office of financial management for division between the department of
community, trade, and economic development and the department of
general administration as required to implement this section.
(b) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel,
funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other
tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the
performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All rules and all pending business before the office of
minority and women's business enterprises shall be continued and acted
upon by the department of community, trade, and economic development.
All existing contracts, agreements, and obligations shall remain in
full force and shall be performed by the department of community,
trade, and economic development.
(4) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(5) The abolishment of the office of minority and women's business
enterprises shall not affect the validity of any act performed before
the effective date of this section.

Sec. 156 RCW 39.19.020 and 1996 c 69 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) (("Advisory committee" means the advisory committee on minority
and women's business enterprises.
(2))) "Broker" means a person that provides a bona fide service,
such as professional, technical, consultant, brokerage, or managerial
services and assistance in the procurement of essential personnel,
facilities, equipment, materials, or supplies required for performance
of a contract.
(2) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(3) "Director" means the director of the ((office of minority and
women's business enterprises)) department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(4) "Educational institutions" means the state universities, the
regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community
colleges.
(5) "Goals" means annual overall agency goals, expressed as a
percentage of dollar volume, for participation by minority and women-owned and controlled businesses and shall not be construed as a minimum
goal for any particular contract or for any particular geographical
area. It is the intent of this chapter that such overall agency goals
shall be achievable and shall be met on a contract-by-contract or
class-of-contract basis.
(6) "Goods and/or services" includes professional services and all
other goods and services.
(7) (("Office" means the office of minority and women's business
enterprises.
(8))) "Person" includes one or more individuals, partnerships,
associations, organizations, corporations, cooperatives, legal
representatives, trustees and receivers, or any group of persons.
(((9))) (8) "Procurement" means the purchase, lease, or rental of
any goods or services.
(((10))) (9) "Public works" means all work, construction, highway
and ferry construction, alteration, repair, or improvement other than
ordinary maintenance, which a state agency or educational institution
is authorized or required by law to undertake.
(((11))) (10) "State agency" includes the state of Washington and
all agencies, departments, offices, divisions, boards, commissions, and
correctional and other types of institutions.

Sec. 157 RCW 39.19.030 and 1996 c 69 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
((There is hereby created the office of minority and women's
business enterprises. The governor shall appoint a director for the
office, subject to confirmation by the senate. The director may employ
a deputy director and a confidential secretary, both of which shall be
exempt under chapter 41.06 RCW, and such staff as are necessary to
carry out the purposes of this chapter.
The office shall consult with the minority and women's business
enterprises advisory committee to:
(1) Develop, plan, and implement programs to provide an opportunity
for participation by qualified minority and women-owned and controlled
businesses in public works and the process by which goods and services
are procured by state agencies and educational institutions from the
private sector;
(2) Develop a comprehensive plan insuring that qualified minority
and women-owned and controlled businesses are provided an opportunity
to participate in public contracts for public works and goods and
services;
(3) Identify barriers to equal participation by qualified minority
and women-owned and controlled businesses in all state agency and
educational institution contracts;
(4) Establish annual overall goals for participation by qualified
minority and women-owned and controlled businesses for each state
agency and educational institution to be administered on a contract-by-contract basis or on a class-of-contracts basis;
(5) Develop and maintain a central minority and women's business
enterprise certification list for all state agencies and educational
institutions. No business is entitled to certification under this
chapter unless it meets the definition of small business concern as
established by the office. All applications for certification under
this chapter shall be sworn under oath;
(6) Develop, implement, and operate a system of monitoring
compliance with this chapter;
(7) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative
Procedure Act, governing: (a) Establishment of agency goals; (b)
development and maintenance of a central minority and women's business
enterprise certification program, including a definition of "small
business concern" which shall be consistent with the small business
requirements defined under section 3 of the Small Business Act, 15
U.S.C. Sec. 632, and its implementing regulations as guidance; (c)
procedures for monitoring and enforcing compliance with goals,
regulations, contract provisions, and this chapter; (d) utilization of
standard clauses by state agencies and educational institutions, as
specified in RCW 39.19.050; and (e) determination of an agency's or
educational institution's goal attainment consistent with the
limitations of RCW 39.19.075;
(8) Submit an annual report to the governor and the legislature
outlining the progress in implementing this chapter;
(9) Investigate complaints of violations of this chapter with the
assistance of the involved agency or educational institution; and
(10) Cooperate and act jointly or by division of labor with the
United States or other states, and with political subdivisions of the
state of Washington and their respective minority, socially and
economically disadvantaged and women business enterprise programs to
carry out the purposes of this chapter. However, the power which may
be exercised by the office under this subsection permits investigation
and imposition of sanctions only if the investigation relates to a
possible violation of chapter 39.19 RCW, and not to violation of local
ordinances, rules, regulations, however denominated, adopted by
political subdivisions of the state.))
The director shall:
(1) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW governing development and
maintenance of a central socially and economically disadvantaged,
minority, and women's business enterprise certification program,
consistent with enabling such businesses and state and local government
entities to establish and maintain eligibility for any federal program,
if ineligibility would result in a loss of federal funds; and
(2) Submit a biennial report to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the legislature outlining the progress implementing this
section, commencing on December 1, 2004.

Sec. 158 RCW 39.19.090 and 1987 c 328 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
If a person, firm, corporation, or business does not comply with
any provision of this chapter or with a contract requirement
established under this chapter, the state may withhold payment, debar
the contractor, suspend, or terminate the contract and subject the
contractor to civil penalties of up to ten percent of the amount of the
contract or up to five thousand dollars for each violation. The
((office)) director shall adopt, by rule, criteria for the imposition
of penalties under this section. Wilful repeated violations, exceeding
a single violation, may disqualify the contractor from further
participation in state contracts for a period of up to three years. An
apparent low-bidder must be in compliance with the contract provisions
required under this chapter as a condition precedent to the granting of
a notice of award by any state agency or educational institution.
The ((office)) director shall follow administrative procedures
under chapter 34.05 RCW in determining a violation and imposing
penalties under this chapter.
The procedures and sanctions in this section are not exclusive;
nothing in this section prevents the state agency or educational
institution administering the contracts from pursuing such procedures
or sanctions as are otherwise provided by statute, rule, or contract
provision.

Sec. 159 RCW 39.19.120 and 1987 c 328 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ((office)) director shall be the sole authority to perform
certification of minority business enterprises, socially and
economically disadvantaged business enterprises, and women's business
enterprises throughout the state of Washington. Certification by the
((state office)) director will allow these firms to participate in
programs for these enterprises administered by the state of Washington,
any city, town, county, special purpose district, public corporation
created by the state, municipal corporation, or quasi-municipal
corporation within the state of Washington.
(2) This statewide certification process will prevent duplication
of effort, achieve efficiency, and permit local jurisdictions to
further develop, implement, and/or enhance comprehensive systems of
monitoring and compliance for contracts issued by their agencies. This
statewide certification process will also enable state and local
governments within the state of Washington to establish or maintain
eligibility for any federal program, if ineligibility would result in
the loss of federal funds.
(3) For the benefit of certified socially and economically
disadvantaged business enterprises, minority business enterprises, and
women's business enterprises, the department shall develop, plan, and
implement programs to (a) develop and maintain a certification process;
(b) provide technical assistance and training; and (c) facilitate
access to business development resources and capital funding. The
department shall consult and collaborate in these efforts with private
sector entities and other federal, state, and local government agencies
engaged in providing services to these businesses.

Sec. 160 RCW 39.19.140 and 1987 c 328 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
Implementation of statewide certification shall be effective
January 1, 1988, following consultation by the ((office)) director with
appropriate state and local officials who currently administer similar
certification programs. ((Any business having been certified under any
of the programs identified pursuant to RCW 39.19.130 as a minority and
women's business enterprise shall be deemed certified by the office as
of January 1, 1988.))

Sec. 161 RCW 39.19.150 and 1987 c 328 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any city, county, town, special purpose district, public
corporation created by the state, municipal corporation, or quasi-municipal corporation having reason to believe that a particular
minority and women's business enterprise should not have been certified
under RCW 39.19.140 may petition the ((office)) director for
reconsideration. The basis for the petition may be one or more of the
following:
(a) The ((office's)) rules or regulations pertaining to this
chapter were improperly applied; or
(b) Material facts relating to the minority and women's business
enterprise's certification application to the ((office)) director are
untrue.
(2) The petitioner shall carry the burden of persuasion. The
affected minority or women's business enterprise shall receive notice
of the petition and an opportunity to respond.
(3) After reviewing the information presented in support of and in
opposition to the petition, the ((office)) director shall issue a
written decision, granting or denying the petition. If the ((office))
director grants the petition, it may revoke, suspend, or refuse to
renew the certification or impose sanctions under this chapter as
appropriate.
(4) The ((office's)) director's decision on a petition is
administratively final and the rights of appeal set out in the
((office)) director's regulations shall apply. A certification shall
remain in effect while a petition is pending.

Sec. 162 RCW 39.19.160 and 1987 c 328 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any city, town, county, special purpose district, public
corporation created by the state, municipal corporation, or quasi-municipal corporation within the state of Washington utilizing the
certification by the ((office)) director retains the responsibility for
monitoring compliance with the programs under its jurisdiction. The
((office)) director shall not be responsible for enforcement of local
ordinances, rules, or regulations, however titled.

Sec. 163 RCW 39.19.200 and 1993 c 195 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The minority and women's business enterprises account is created in
the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from RCW 39.19.210,
39.19.220, and 39.19.230 shall be deposited in the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes
defraying all or part of the costs of the ((office)) department in
administering this chapter. Only the director ((or the director's
designee)) of the department of general administration may authorize
expenditures from the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation.

Sec. 164 RCW 39.19.240 and 2002 c 305 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ((office)) department shall, in consultation with the state
treasurer ((and the department of community, trade, and economic
development)), compile information on minority and women's business
enterprises that have received financial assistance through a qualified
public depositary under the provisions of RCW 43.86A.060. The
information shall include, but is not limited to:
(a) Name of the qualified public depositary;
(b) Geographic location of the minority or women's business
enterprise;
(c) Name of the minority or women's business enterprise;
(d) Date of last certification by the ((office)) department and
certification number;
(e) Type of business;
(f) Amount and term of the loan to the minority or women's business
enterprise; and
(g) Other information the ((office)) department deems necessary for
the implementation of this section.
(2) The ((office)) department shall notify the state treasurer of
minority or women's business enterprises that are no longer certified
under the provisions of this chapter. The written notification shall
contain information regarding the reason for the decertification and
information on financing provided to the minority or women's business
enterprise under RCW 43.86A.060.

Sec. 165 RCW 42.17.2401 and 2001 c 36 s 1 and 2001 c 9 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 42.17.240, the term "executive state
officer" includes:
(1) The chief administrative law judge, the director of
agriculture, the administrator of the Washington basic health plan, the
director of the department of services for the blind, the director of
the state system of community and technical colleges, the director of
community, trade, and economic development, the secretary of
corrections, the director of ecology, the commissioner of employment
security, the chairman of the energy facility site evaluation council,
the secretary of the state finance committee, the director of financial
management, the director of fish and wildlife, the executive secretary
of the forest practices appeals board, the director of the gambling
commission, the director of general administration, the secretary of
health, the administrator of the Washington state health care
authority, the executive secretary of the health care facilities
authority, the executive secretary of the higher education facilities
authority, the executive secretary of the horse racing commission, the
executive secretary of the human rights commission, the executive
secretary of the indeterminate sentence review board, the director of
the department of information services, the director of the interagency
committee for outdoor recreation, the executive director of the state
investment board, the director of labor and industries, the director of
licensing, the director of the lottery commission, ((the director of
the office of minority and women's business enterprises,)) the director
of parks and recreation, the director of personnel, the executive
director of the public disclosure commission, the director of
retirement systems, the director of revenue, the secretary of social
and health services, the chief of the Washington state patrol, the
executive secretary of the board of tax appeals, the secretary of
transportation, the secretary of the utilities and transportation
commission, the director of veterans affairs, the president of each of
the regional and state universities and the president of The Evergreen
State College, each district and each campus president of each state
community college;
(2) Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;
(3) Each professional staff member of the legislature; and
(4) Central Washington University board of trustees, board of
trustees of each community college, each member of the state board for
community and technical colleges, state convention and trade center
board of directors, committee for deferred compensation, Eastern
Washington University board of trustees, Washington economic
development finance authority, The Evergreen State College board of
trustees, executive ethics board, forest practices appeals board,
forest practices board, gambling commission, Washington health care
facilities authority, each member of the Washington health services
commission, higher education coordinating board, higher education
facilities authority, horse racing commission, state housing finance
commission, human rights commission, indeterminate sentence review
board, board of industrial insurance appeals, information services
board, interagency committee for outdoor recreation, state investment
board, commission on judicial conduct, legislative ethics board, liquor
control board, lottery commission, marine oversight board, Pacific
Northwest electric power and conservation planning council, parks and
recreation commission, personnel appeals board, board of pilotage
commissioners, pollution control hearings board, public disclosure
commission, public pension commission, shorelines hearing board, public
employees' benefits board, salmon recovery funding board, board of tax
appeals, transportation commission, University of Washington board of
regents, utilities and transportation commission, Washington state
maritime commission, Washington personnel resources board, Washington
public power supply system executive board, Washington State University
board of regents, Western Washington University board of trustees, and
fish and wildlife commission.

Sec. 166 RCW 43.63A.690 and 2002 c 305 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall provide technical assistance and loan
packaging services that enable minority and women-owned business
enterprises to obtain financing under the linked deposit program
created under RCW 43.86A.060.
(2) The department shall, in consultation with the state treasurer
((and office of minority and women's business enterprises)), monitor
the performance of loans made to minority and women-owned business
enterprises under RCW 43.86A.060.
(3) The department((, in consultation with the office of minority
and women's business enterprises,)) shall develop indicators to measure
the performance of the linked deposit program in the areas of job
creation or retention and providing access to capital to minority or
women's business enterprises.

Sec. 167 RCW 43.172.010 and 1993 c 512 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Minority" means persons of color, including African-Americans,
Hispanic/Latino Americans, Native Americans, and Asian/Pacific
Islanders Americans;
(2) "Minority and women-owned business" means any resident minority
business enterprise or women's business enterprise, certified as such
by the ((office of minority and women's business enterprises))
department of community, trade, and economic development under chapter
39.19 RCW and consistent with subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 168 RCW 43.172.030 and 1993 c 512 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall seek information, advice, and assistance from
regional minority contractor organizations, and the United States small
business administration and any other appropriate organization or
agency.
The following departments, offices, and agencies shall, at the
request of the department, provide information, advice, and assistance
to the department:
(1) The department of general administration;
(2) The Washington state business assistance center;
(3) The office of the insurance commissioner; and
(4) The Washington state economic development finance authority((;
and
(5) The office of minority and women's business enterprises)).

Sec. 169 RCW 47.28.030 and 1999 c 15 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A state highway shall be constructed, altered, repaired, or
improved, and improvements located on property acquired for right of
way purposes may be repaired or renovated pending the use of such right
of way for highway purposes, by contract or state forces. The work or
portions thereof may be done by state forces when the estimated costs
thereof ((is [are])) are less than fifty thousand dollars and effective
July 1, 2005, sixty thousand dollars: PROVIDED, That when delay of
performance of such work would jeopardize a state highway or constitute
a danger to the traveling public, the work may be done by state forces
when the estimated cost thereof is less than eighty thousand dollars
and effective July 1, 2005, one hundred thousand dollars. When the
department of transportation determines to do the work by state forces,
it shall enter a statement upon its records to that effect, stating the
reasons therefor. To enable a larger number of small businesses, and
minority, and women contractors to effectively compete for department
of transportation contracts, the department may adopt rules providing
for bids and award of contracts for the performance of work, or
furnishing equipment, materials, supplies, or operating services
whenever any work is to be performed and the engineer's estimate
indicates the cost of the work would not exceed eighty thousand dollars
and effective July 1, 2005, one hundred thousand dollars. The rules
adopted under this section:
(1) Shall provide for competitive bids to the extent that
competitive sources are available except when delay of performance
would jeopardize life or property or inconvenience the traveling
public; and
(2) Need not require the furnishing of a bid deposit nor a
performance bond, but if a performance bond is not required then
progress payments to the contractor may be required to be made based on
submittal of paid invoices to substantiate proof that disbursements
have been made to laborers, materialmen, mechanics, and subcontractors
from the previous partial payment; and
(3) May establish prequalification standards and procedures as an
alternative to those set forth in RCW 47.28.070, but the
prequalification standards and procedures under RCW 47.28.070 shall
always be sufficient.
The department of transportation shall comply with such goals and
rules as may be adopted by the ((office of minority and women's
business enterprises)) department of community, trade, and economic
development to implement chapter 39.19 RCW with respect to contracts
entered into under this chapter. The department may adopt such rules
as may be necessary to comply with the rules adopted by the ((office of
minority and women's business enterprises)) department of community,
trade, and economic development under chapter 39.19 RCW.

Sec. 170 RCW 39.04.160 and 1983 c 120 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
All contracts entered into under this chapter by the state on or
after September 1, 1983, are subject to the ((requirements)) targets
established under chapter ((39.19)) 49.60 RCW.

Sec. 171 RCW 43.19.536 and 1983 c 120 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
All contracts entered into and purchases made, including leasing or
renting, under this chapter on or after September 1, 1983, are subject
to the ((requirements)) targets established under chapter ((39.19))
49.60 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 172 A new section is added to chapter 43.19
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department shall support state and local governments in
contracting and purchasing by maintaining a centralized vendor
registry.
(2) The department shall house and maintain, on behalf of the
department of community, trade, and economic development and other
users, a central directory of all businesses certified under chapter
39.19 RCW.
(3) The department may provide to state agencies, institutions of
higher education, and local governments reimbursable technical
assistance services and training on improving access to public
contracting and purchasing opportunities for certified businesses.
(4) For purposes of this section, "certified business" means a
business that has been certified by the department of community, trade,
and economic development as a socially and economically disadvantaged
business enterprise, minority enterprise, or women's enterprise under
chapter 39.19 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 173 A new section is added to chapter 49.60
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall:
(a) Establish annual overall targets for participation by certified
businesses for state agencies and institutions of higher education to
be administered on a class-of-contracts basis. The targets shall
reflect the availability of certified businesses within that class of
contracts. These targets are to be integrated into each agency's
strategic plan;
(b) Adopt policies and procedures by June 30, 2004, governing the
establishment of overall targets;
(c) Submit a report each biennium commencing December 1, 2004,
describing each state agency's progress in achieving the targets; and
(d) Review each agency's strategic plan to see that it includes the
specific measures the agency will undertake to achieve its targets.
(2) For purposes of this section, "certified business" means a
business that has been certified by the department under chapter 39.19
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 174 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 43.78.010 (Appointment of public printer) and 1981 c 338 s
6 & 1965 c 8 s 43.78.010;
(2) RCW 43.78.020 (Bond) and 1965 c 8 s 43.78.020; and
(3) RCW 43.78.110 (Securing printing from private sources -- Farming
out) and 1993 c 379 s 107, 1982 c 164 s 3, 1969 c 79 s 1, & 1965 c 8 s
43.78.110.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 175 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 41.06.030 (Department of personnel established) and 2002 c
354 s 201, 1993 c 281 s 20, & 1961 c 1 s 3;
(2) RCW 41.50.020 (Department of retirement systems -- Created--Director) and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 105 s 4; and
(3) RCW 41.50.050 (Powers, duties, and functions of director) and
1995 c 239 s 317, 1993 c 61 s 1, 1987 c 505 s 24, 1981 c 3 s 33, 1977
ex.s. c 251 s 1, & 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 105 s 7.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 176 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 9.46.0221 ("Commission.") and 1987 c 4 s 7;
(2) RCW 9.46.040 (Gambling commission -- Members -- Appointment--Vacancies, filling) and 1974 ex.s. c 155 s 12, 1974 ex.s. c 135 s 12,
& 1973 1st ex.s. c 218 s 4;
(3) RCW 9.46.050 (Gambling commission -- Chairman -- Quorum -- Meetings--Compensation and travel expenses -- Bond -- Removal) and 1984 c 287 s 9,
1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 7, & 1973 1st ex.s. c 218 s 5;
(4) RCW 9.46.085 (Gambling commission -- Members and employees--Activities prohibited) and 1986 c 4 s 1;
(5) RCW 67.16.012 (Washington horse racing commission -- Creation--Terms -- Vacancies -- Bonds -- Oaths) and 1998 c 345 s 4, 1987 c 453 s 2,
1973 1st ex.s. c 216 s 1, 1969 ex.s. c 233 s 1, & 1933 c 55 s 2;
(6) RCW 67.16.014 (Washington horse racing commission -- Ex officio
nonvoting members) and 1991 c 270 s 2 & 1987 c 453 s 3;
(7) RCW 67.16.015 (Washington horse racing commission--Organization -- Secretary -- Records -- Annual reports) and 1977 c 75 s 80 &
1933 c 55 s 3; and
(8) RCW 67.16.017 (Washington horse racing commission -- Compensation
and travel expenses) and 1984 c 287 s 100, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s
155, & 1969 ex.s. c 233 s 2.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 177 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 89.08.030 (Conservation commission) and 1987 c 180 s 1,
1983 c 248 s 13, 1973 1st ex.s. c 184 s 4, 1967 c 217 s 1, 1961 c 240
s 3, & 1955 c 304 s 3;
(2) RCW 89.08.040 (Members -- Compensation and travel expenses--Records, rules, hearings, etc.) and 1984 c 287 s 112, 1975-'76 2nd
ex.s. c 34 s 179, 1973 1st ex.s. c 184 s 5, 1961 c 240 s 4, & 1955 c
304 s 4;
(3) RCW 89.08.050 (Employees -- Delegation -- Quorum) and 1973 1st
ex.s. c 184 s 6, 1961 c 240 s 5, & 1955 c 304 s 5; and
(4) RCW 89.08.060 (Assistance of other state agencies and
institutions) and 1973 1st ex.s. c 184 s 7 & 1955 c 304 s 6.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 178 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 39.19.041 (Ad hoc advisory committees) and 1995 c 269 s
1302;
(2) RCW 39.19.050 (Standard clauses required in requests for
proposals, advertisements, and bids) and 1983 c 120 s 5;
(3) RCW 39.19.060 (Compliance with public works and procurement
goals -- Plan to maximize opportunity for minority and women-owned
businesses) and 1996 c 288 s 28, 1993 c 512 s 9, & 1983 c 120 s 6;
(4) RCW 39.19.170 (Prequalification of minority and women-owned
businesses -- Waiver of performance bond) and 1993 c 512 s 10;
(5) RCW 39.19.210 (Businesses using the office -- Fees) and 1993 c
195 s 2;
(6) RCW 39.19.220 (Political subdivisions -- Fees) and 1993 c 195 s
3;
(7) RCW 39.19.230 (State agencies and educational institutions--Fees) and 1993 c 195 s 4; and
(8) RCW 41.06.082 (Office of minority and women's business
enterprises -- Certain personnel exempted from chapter) and 1983 c 120 s
14.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 179 RCW 39.19.200 (Minority and women's
business enterprises account -- Created) and 2003 c . . . s 163 (section
163 of this act) & 1993 c 195 s 1 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 180 Sections 13 through 18 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 181 Sections 40 through 44 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 182 Sections 1 through 28, 174, and 175 of
this act take effect July 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 183 Sections 30 through 154, 176, and 177 of
this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, and take effect July 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 184 Section 179 of this act takes effect June
30, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 185 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---