BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.09.170 and 1995 c 166 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) From time to time, but at least once each year, the state
treasurer shall refund from the motor vehicle fund one percent of the
motor vehicle fuel tax revenues collected under chapter 82.36 RCW,
based on the tax rate in effect January 1, 1990, less proper deductions
for refunds and costs of collection as provided in RCW 46.68.090. The
treasurer shall place these funds in the general fund as follows:
(a) Forty percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway
vehicle account and administered by the department of natural resources
solely for planning, maintenance, and management of ORV recreation
facilities, nonhighway roads, and nonhighway road recreation
facilities. The funds under this subsection shall be expended in
accordance with the following limitations:
(i) Not more than five percent may be expended for information
programs under this chapter;
(ii) Not less than ten percent and not more than fifty percent may
be expended for ORV recreation facilities;
(iii) Not more than twenty-five percent may be expended for
maintenance of nonhighway roads;
(iv) Not more than fifty percent may be expended for nonhighway
road recreation facilities;
(v) Ten percent shall be transferred to the interagency committee
for outdoor recreation for grants to law enforcement agencies in those
counties where the department of natural resources maintains ORV
facilities. This amount is in addition to those distributions made by
the interagency committee for outdoor recreation under (d)(i) of this
subsection;
(b) Three and one-half percent shall be credited to the ((ORV and
nonhighway vehicle account)) state wildlife fund and administered by
the department of fish and wildlife solely for the acquisition,
planning, development, maintenance, and management of nonhighway roads
and recreation facilities;
(c) Two percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway vehicle
account and administered by the parks and recreation commission solely
for the maintenance and management of ORV use areas and facilities; and
(d) Fifty-four and one-half percent, together with the funds
received by the interagency committee for outdoor recreation under RCW
46.09.110, shall be credited to the nonhighway and off-road vehicle
activities program account to be administered by the committee for
planning, acquisition, development, maintenance, and management of ORV
recreation facilities and nonhighway road recreation facilities; ORV
user education and information; and ORV law enforcement programs. The
funds under this subsection shall be expended in accordance with the
following limitations:
(i) Not more than twenty percent may be expended for ORV education,
information, and law enforcement programs under this chapter;
(ii) Not less than an amount equal to the funds received by the
interagency committee for outdoor recreation under RCW 46.09.110 and
not more than sixty percent may be expended for ORV recreation
facilities;
(iii) Not more than twenty percent may be expended for nonhighway
road recreation facilities.
(2) On a yearly basis an agency may not, except as provided in RCW
46.09.110, expend more than ten percent of the funds it receives under
this chapter for general administration expenses incurred in carrying
out this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 76.12.110 and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 915 are each
amended to read as follows:
There is created a forest development account in the state
treasury. The state treasurer shall keep an account of all sums
deposited therein and expended or withdrawn therefrom. Any sums placed
in the account shall be pledged for the purpose of paying interest and
principal on the bonds issued by the department, and for the purchase
of land for growing timber. Any bonds issued shall constitute a first
and prior claim and lien against the account for the payment of
principal and interest. No sums for the above purposes shall be
withdrawn or paid out of the account except upon approval of the
department.
Appropriations may be made by the legislature from the forest
development account to the department for the purpose of carrying on
the activities of the department on state forest lands, lands managed
on a sustained yield basis as provided for in RCW 79.68.040, and for
reimbursement of expenditures that have been made or may be made from
the resource management cost account in the management of state forest
lands. For the 1999-2001 fiscal biennium, moneys from the account
shall be distributed as directed in the omnibus appropriations act to
the beneficiaries of the revenues derived from state forest lands.
Funds that accrue to the state from such a distribution shall be
deposited into the ((salmon recovery account)) state wildlife fund.
These funds ((shall)) may be used for a grant program for cities and
counties for the preservation and restoration of riparian, marine, and
estuarine areas.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.12.170 and 2001 c 253 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is established in the state treasury the state wildlife
fund which consists of moneys as directed by the legislature and
received from:
(a) Rentals or concessions of the department;
(b) The sale of real or personal property held for department
purposes;
(c) The sale of licenses, permits, tags, and stamps required by
chapter 77.32 RCW and RCW 77.65.490, except annual resident adult
saltwater and all shellfish licenses, which shall be deposited into the
state general fund;
(d) Fees for informational materials published by the department;
(e) Fees for personalized vehicle license plates as provided in
chapter 46.16 RCW;
(f) Articles or wildlife sold by the director under this title;
(g) Compensation for damage to department property or wildlife
losses or contributions, gifts, or grants received under RCW 77.12.320
or 77.32.380;
(h) Excise tax on anadromous game fish collected under chapter
82.27 RCW;
(i) The sale of personal property seized by the department for
fish, shellfish, or wildlife violations; ((and))
(j) The department's share of revenues from auctions and raffles
authorized by the commission; and
(k) Fees and voluntary contributions collected by state agencies
under RCW 43.21K.150.
(2) State and county officers receiving any moneys listed in
subsection (1) of this section shall deposit them in the state treasury
to be credited to the state wildlife fund.
(3) Expenditures from the fund may include but are not limited to
the following:
(a) Salmon recovery;
(b) The warm water game fish enhancement program, including the
development of warm water pond and lake habitat, culture of warm water
game fish habitat, management of warm water fish populations, and other
practical activities that will improve the fishing for warm water fish;
(c) Purposes consistent with the environmental excellence program
under chapter 43.21K RCW; and
(d) Fisheries enhancement and habitat restoration by regional
fisheries enhancement groups.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.12.810 and 1998 c 191 s 30 are each amended to read
as follows:
As provided in RCW 77.32.440, a portion of each small game hunting
license fee shall be deposited in the ((eastern Washington pheasant
enhancement account created in RCW 77.12.820)) state wildlife fund.

Sec. 5 RCW 77.12.820 and 1997 c 422 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The eastern Washington pheasant enhancement account is created in
the custody of the state treasurer.)) All receipts under RCW 77.12.810
must be deposited in the ((account. Moneys in the account are subject
to legislative appropriation and shall be used for the purpose of
funding the eastern Washington pheasant enhancement program)) state
wildlife fund. The department may use moneys from the ((account)) fund
to improve pheasant habitat or to purchase or produce pheasants. ((Not
less than eighty percent of expenditures from the account must be used
to purchase or produce pheasants. The eastern Washington pheasant
enhancement account funds must not be used for the purchase of land.))
The ((account)) fund may be used to offer grants to improve pheasant
habitat on public or private lands that are open to public hunting.
The department may enter partnerships with private landowners,
nonprofit corporations, cooperative groups, and federal or state
agencies for the purposes of pheasant habitat enhancement in areas that
will be available for public hunting.

Sec. 6 RCW 77.12.858 and 2000 c 107 s 230 are each amended to
read as follows:
All receipts from the salmon stamp program created under RCW
77.12.850 through 77.12.860 must be deposited into the ((regional
fisheries enhancement salmonid recovery account created under RCW
77.95.130)) state wildlife fund. Expenditures from the ((account))
fund may be used ((only)) for the purposes specified in RCW 77.95.130
and chapter 342, Laws of 1999. The department shall report biennially
to the legislature on the amount of money the salmon stamp program has
generated.

Sec. 7 RCW 77.32.440 and 1999 c 235 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) The commission shall adopt rules to continue funding
current enhancement programs ((at levels equal to the participation of
licensees in each of the individual enhancement programs)). All
enhancement funding will continue to be deposited directly into the
((individual accounts created for each enhancement)) state wildlife
fund.
(((2) In implementing subsection (1) of this section with regard to
warm water game fish, the department shall deposit in the warm water
game fish account the sum of one million two hundred fifty thousand
dollars each fiscal year during the fiscal years 1999 and 2000, based
on two hundred fifty thousand warm water anglers. Beginning in fiscal
year 2001, and each year thereafter, the deposit to the warm water game
fish account established in this subsection shall be adjusted annually
to reflect the actual numbers of license holders fishing for warm water
game fish based on an annual survey of licensed anglers from the
previous year conducted by the department beginning with the April 1,
1999, to March 31, 2000, license year survey.))

Sec. 8 RCW 77.44.030 and 1998 c 191 s 29 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As provided in RCW 77.32.440, a portion of each freshwater and
combination fishing license fee shall be deposited into the ((warm
water game fish account)) state wildlife fund.
(2) ((The department shall use the most cost-effective format in
designing and administering the warm water game fish surcharge
[account].
(3) A warm water game fish account shall)) Moneys in the state
wildlife fund from the receipts under RCW 77.32.440 may be used for
enhancement of largemouth bass, smallmouth bass, walleye, black
crappie, white crappie, channel catfish, and tiger musky.

Sec. 9 RCW 77.60.150 and 2001 c 273 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall initiate a pilot project to evaluate the
feasibility and potential of intensively culturing shellfish on
currently nonproductive oyster reserve land in Puget Sound. The pilot
program shall include no fewer than three long-term lease agreements
with commercial shellfish growers. Except as provided in subsection
(4) of this section, revenues from the lease of such lands shall be
deposited in the ((oyster reserve land account created in RCW
77.60.160)) state wildlife fund.
(2) The department shall form one advisory committee each for the
Willapa Bay oyster reserve lands and the Puget Sound oyster reserve
lands. The advisory committees shall make recommendations on
management practices to conserve, protect, and develop oyster reserve
lands. The advisory committees may make recommendations regarding the
management practices on oyster reserve lands, in particular to ensure
that they are managed in a manner that will: (a) Increase revenue
through production of high-value shellfish; (b) not be detrimental to
the market for shellfish grown on nonreserve lands; and (c) avoid
negative impacts to existing shellfish populations. The advisory
committees may also make recommendation on the distribution of funds in
RCW 77.60.160(2)(a). The department shall attempt to structure each
advisory committee to include equal representation between shellfish
growers that participate in reserve sales and shellfish growers that do
not.
(3) The department shall submit a brief progress report on the
status of the pilot programs to the appropriate standing committees of
the legislature by January 7, 2003.
(4) The department of natural resources, in consultation with the
department of fish and wildlife, shall administer the leases for oyster
reserves entered into under this chapter. In administering the leases,
the department of natural resources shall exercise its authority under
RCW 79.96.090. Vacation of state oyster reserves by the department of
fish and wildlife shall not be a requirement for the department of
natural resources to lease any oyster reserves under this section. The
department of natural resources may recover reasonable costs directly
associated with the administration of the leases for oyster reserves
entered into under this chapter. All administrative fees collected by
the department of natural resources pursuant to this section shall be
deposited into the resource management cost account established in RCW
79.64.020. The department of fish and wildlife may not assess charges
to recover the costs of consulting with the department of natural
resources under this subsection.
(5) The Puget Sound pilot program shall not include the culture of
geoduck.

Sec. 10 RCW 77.60.160 and 2001 c 273 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The oyster reserve land account is created in the state
treasury.)) All receipts from revenues from the lease of land or sale
of shellfish from oyster reserve lands must be deposited into the
((account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only as
provided in this section)) state wildlife fund.
(2) ((Funds)) Moneys in the ((account)) fund from receipts under
subsection (1) of this section shall be used for the following purposes
((provided for in this subsection)):
(a) Up to forty percent for the management expenses incurred by the
department that are directly attributable to the management of the
oyster reserve lands and for the expenses associated with new research
and development activities at the Pt. Whitney and Nahcotta shellfish
laboratories managed by the department. As used in this subsection,
"new research and development activities" includes an emphasis on the
control of aquatic nuisance species and burrowing shrimp;
(b) Up to ten percent may be deposited into the state general fund;
and
(c) All remaining funds ((in the account)) from receipts under
subsection (1) of this section shall be used for the shellfish - on-site sewage grant program established in RCW 90.71.100.

Sec. 11 RCW 90.56.510 and 2000 c 69 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The oil spill prevention account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from RCW 82.23B.020(2) shall be deposited in
the account. Moneys from the account may be spent only after
appropriation. The account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW. If, on the first day of any calendar month, the
balance of the oil spill response account is greater than nine million
dollars and the balance of the oil spill prevention account exceeds the
unexpended appropriation for the current biennium, then the tax under
RCW 82.23B.020(2) shall be suspended on the first day of the next
calendar month until the beginning of the following biennium, provided
that the tax shall not be suspended during the last six months of the
biennium. If the tax imposed under RCW 82.23B.020(2) is suspended
during two consecutive biennia, the department shall by November 1st
after the end of the second biennium, recommend to the appropriate
standing committees an adjustment in the tax rate. For the biennium
ending June 30, 1999, and the biennium ending June 30, 2001, the state
treasurer may transfer a total of up to one million dollars from the
oil spill response account to the oil spill prevention account to
support appropriations made from the oil spill prevention account in
the omnibus appropriations act adopted not later than June 30, 1999.
(2) Expenditures from the ((oil spill prevention account shall))
state wildlife fund may be used ((exclusively)) for the administrative
costs related to the purposes of this chapter, and chapters 90.48,
88.40, and 88.46 RCW. Starting with the 1995-1997 biennium, the
legislature shall give activities of state agencies related to
prevention of oil spills priority in funding from the ((oil spill
prevention account)) state wildlife fund. Costs of prevention include
the costs of:
(a) Routine responses not covered under RCW 90.56.500;
(b) Management and staff development activities;
(c) Development of rules and policies and the statewide plan
provided for in RCW 90.56.060;
(d) Facility and vessel plan review and approval, drills,
inspections, investigations, enforcement, and litigation;
(e) Interagency coordination and public outreach and education;
(f) Collection and administration of the tax provided for in
chapter 82.23B RCW; and
(g) Appropriate travel, goods and services, contracts, and
equipment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 77.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The license buyback and resource administration account is
created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation. The account is subject to allotment procedures
under chapter 43.88 RCW.
(2) The license buyback and resource administration account
includes but is not limited to moneys received from:
(a) Sea cucumber dive fishing license surcharges as provided in RCW
77.70.190;
(b) Sea urchin dive fishing license surcharges as provided in RCW
77.70.150;
(c) All revenues from fees under RCW 77.70.430;
(d) An amount equivalent to one cent per gallon from each marine
use refund claim under RCW 82.36.330;
(e) Revenues from fees from the transfer of each Dungeness crab-coastal fishery license assessed under RCW 77.65.020;
(f) Delivery fees assessed under RCW 77.70.300; and
(g) Any license surcharge under RCW 77.65.240.
(3) Moneys in the account may be spent for the following purposes:
(a) Processing appeals related to the issuance of Dungeness crab-coastal fishery licenses; and
(b) Coastal crab management activities.

Sec. 13 RCW 43.21B.300 and 2001 c 36 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any civil penalty provided in RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431,
70.105.080, 70.107.050, 88.46.090, 90.03.600, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, and
90.56.330 shall be imposed by a notice in writing, either by certified
mail with return receipt requested or by personal service, to the
person incurring the penalty from the department or the local air
authority, describing the violation with reasonable particularity.
Within fifteen days after the notice is received, the person incurring
the penalty may apply in writing to the department or the authority for
the remission or mitigation of the penalty. Upon receipt of the
application, the department or authority may remit or mitigate the
penalty upon whatever terms the department or the authority in its
discretion deems proper. The department or the authority may ascertain
the facts regarding all such applications in such reasonable manner and
under such rules as it may deem proper and shall remit or mitigate the
penalty only upon a demonstration of extraordinary circumstances such
as the presence of information or factors not considered in setting the
original penalty.
(2) Any penalty imposed under this section may be appealed to the
pollution control hearings board in accordance with this chapter if the
appeal is filed with the hearings board and served on the department or
authority thirty days after receipt by the person penalized of the
notice imposing the penalty or thirty days after receipt of the notice
of disposition of the application for relief from penalty.
(3) A penalty shall become due and payable on the later of:
(a) Thirty days after receipt of the notice imposing the penalty;
(b) Thirty days after receipt of the notice of disposition on
application for relief from penalty, if such an application is made; or
(c) Thirty days after receipt of the notice of decision of the
hearings board if the penalty is appealed.
(4) If the amount of any penalty is not paid to the department
within thirty days after it becomes due and payable, the attorney
general, upon request of the department, shall bring an action in the
name of the state of Washington in the superior court of Thurston
county, or of any county in which the violator does business, to
recover the penalty. If the amount of the penalty is not paid to the
authority within thirty days after it becomes due and payable, the
authority may bring an action to recover the penalty in the superior
court of the county of the authority's main office or of any county in
which the violator does business. In these actions, the procedures and
rules of evidence shall be the same as in an ordinary civil action.
(5) All penalties recovered shall be paid into the state treasury
and credited to the general fund except those penalties imposed
pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, which shall be credited to the reclamation
account as provided in RCW 18.104.155(7), RCW 70.94.431, the
disposition of which shall be governed by that provision, RCW
70.105.080, which shall be credited to the hazardous waste control and
elimination account, created by RCW 70.105.180, and RCW 90.56.330,
which shall be credited to the ((coastal protection fund created by RCW
90.48.390)) license buyback and resource administration account.

Sec. 14 RCW 43.84.092 and 2002 c 242 s 2, 2002 c 114 s 24, and
2002 c 56 s 402 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking
water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund,
the federal forest revolving account, the health services account, the
public health services account, the health system capacity account, the
personal health services account, the state higher education
construction account, the higher education construction account, the
highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account,
the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, ((the oyster reserve land account,)) the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan
revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health
supplemental account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the
regional transportation investment district account, the resource
management cost account, the site closure account, the special wildlife
account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees'
insurance reserve account, the state investment board expense account,
the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the
supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account,
the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco
prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund,
the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of
Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve
officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire
fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington
fruit express account, the Washington judicial retirement system
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3
account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the
Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the
normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the
scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All
earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation equipment
fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement account,
the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the
urban arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 15 RCW 77.12.177 and 2001 c 253 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in this title, state and county officers
receiving the following moneys shall deposit them in the state general
fund:
(a) The sale of commercial licenses required under this title,
except for licenses issued under RCW 77.65.490; and
(b) Moneys received for damages to food fish or shellfish.
(2) The director shall make weekly remittances to the state
treasurer of moneys collected by the department.
(3) All fines and forfeitures collected or assessed by a district
court for a violation of this title or rule of the department shall be
remitted as provided in chapter 3.62 RCW.
(4) Proceeds from the sale of food fish or shellfish taken in test
fishing conducted by the department, to the extent that these proceeds
exceed the estimates in the budget approved by the legislature, may be
allocated as unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.270 to reimburse
the department for unanticipated costs for test fishing operations in
excess of the allowance in the budget approved by the legislature.
(5) Proceeds from the sale of salmon carcasses and salmon eggs from
state general funded hatcheries by the department of general
administration shall be deposited in the ((regional fisheries
enhancement group account established in RCW 77.95.090)) license
buyback and resource administration account.
(6) Moneys received by the commission under RCW 77.12.039, to the
extent these moneys exceed estimates in the budget approved by the
legislature, may be allocated as unanticipated receipts under RCW
43.79.270. Allocations under this subsection shall be made only for
the specific purpose for which the moneys were received, unless the
moneys were received in settlement of a claim for damages to food fish
or shellfish, in which case the moneys may be expended for the
conservation of these resources.
(7) Proceeds from the sale of herring spawn on kelp fishery
licenses by the department, to the extent those proceeds exceed
estimates in the budget approved by the legislature, may be allocated
as unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.270. Allocations under this
subsection shall be made only for herring management, enhancement, and
enforcement.

Sec. 16 RCW 77.65.230 and 2000 c 107 s 44 are each amended to
read as follows:
A surcharge of fifty dollars shall be collected with each Dungeness
crab-coastal fishery license issued under RCW 77.65.220 until June 30,
2000, and with each Dungeness crab-coastal class B fishery license
issued under RCW 77.65.220 until December 31, 1997. Moneys collected
under this section shall be placed in the ((Dungeness crab appeals
account hereby created in the state treasury. The account is subject
to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation
is required for expenditures. Expenditures from the account shall only
be used for processing appeals related to the issuance of Dungeness
crab-coastal fishery licenses)) license buyback and resource
administration account.

Sec. 17 RCW 77.65.240 and 2000 c 107 s 45 are each amended to
read as follows:
A surcharge of one hundred twenty dollars shall be collected with
each Dungeness crab-coastal fishery license and with each Dungeness
crab-coastal class B fishery license issued under RCW 77.65.220.
Moneys collected under this section shall be placed in the ((coastal
crab account created under RCW 77.70.320)) license buyback and resource
administration account.

Sec. 18 RCW 77.70.150 and 2001 c 253 s 58 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A sea urchin dive fishery license is required to take sea
urchins for commercial purposes. A sea urchin dive fishery license
authorizes the use of only one diver in the water at any time during
sea urchin harvest operations. If the same vessel has been designated
on two sea urchin dive fishery licenses, two divers may be in the
water. A natural person may not hold more than two sea urchin dive
fishery licenses.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the
director shall issue no new sea urchin dive fishery licenses. For
licenses issued for the year 2000 and thereafter, the director shall
renew existing licenses only to a natural person who held the license
at the end of the previous year. If a sea urchin dive fishery license
is not held by a natural person as of December 31, 1999, it is not
renewable. However, if the license is not held because of revocation
or suspension of licensing privileges, the director shall renew the
license in the name of a natural person at the end of the revocation or
suspension if the license holder applies for renewal of the license
before the end of the year in which the revocation or suspension ends.
(3) Where a licensee failed to obtain the license during the
previous year because of a license suspension or revocation by the
director or the court, the licensee may qualify for a license by
establishing that the person held such a license during the last year
in which the person was eligible.
(4) Surcharges as provided for in this section shall be collected
and deposited into the ((sea urchin dive fishery account hereby created
in the custody of the state treasurer. Only the director or the
director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The
sea urchin dive fishery account is subject to allotment procedures
under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
expenditures)) license buyback and resource administration account.
Expenditures from the account ((shall only)) may be used to retire sea
urchin licenses until the number of licenses is reduced to twenty-five,
and thereafter shall only be used for sea urchin management and
enforcement.
(a) A surcharge of one hundred dollars shall be charged with each
sea urchin dive fishery license renewal for licenses issued in 2000
through 2005.
(b) For licenses issued for the year 2000 and thereafter, a
surcharge shall be charged on the sea urchin dive fishery license for
designating an alternate operator. The surcharge shall be as follows:
Five hundred dollars for the first year or each of the first two
consecutive years after 1999 that any alternate operator is designated
and two thousand five hundred dollars each year thereafter that any
alternate operator is designated.
(5) Sea urchin dive fishery licenses are transferable. After
December 31, 1999, there is a surcharge to transfer a sea urchin dive
fishery license. The surcharge is five hundred dollars for the first
transfer of a license valid for calendar year 2000, and two thousand
five hundred dollars for any subsequent transfer, whether occurring in
the year 2000 or thereafter. Notwithstanding this subsection, a one-
time transfer exempt from surcharge applies for a transfer from the
natural person licensed on January 1, 2000, to that person's spouse or
child.
(6) If fewer than twenty-five natural persons are eligible for sea
urchin dive fishery licenses, the director may accept applications for
new licenses. The additional licenses may not cause more than twenty-five natural persons to be eligible for a sea urchin dive fishery
license. New licenses issued under this section shall be distributed
according to rules of the department that recover the value of such
licensed privilege.

Sec. 19 RCW 77.70.190 and 2001 c 253 s 59 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A sea cucumber dive fishery license is required to take sea
cucumbers for commercial purposes. A sea cucumber dive fishery license
authorizes the use of only one diver in the water at any time during
sea cucumber harvest operations. If the same vessel has been
designated on two sea cucumber dive fishery licenses, two divers may be
in the water. A natural person may not hold more than two sea cucumber
dive fishery licenses.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the
director shall issue no new sea cucumber dive fishery licenses. For
licenses issued for the year 2000 and thereafter, the director shall
renew existing licenses only to a natural person who held the license
at the end of the previous year. If a sea cucumber dive fishery
license is not held by a natural person as of December 31, 1999, it is
not renewable. However, if the license is not held because of
revocation or suspension of licensing privileges, the director shall
renew the license in the name of a natural person at the end of the
revocation or suspension if the license holder applies for renewal of
the license before the end of the year in which the revocation or
suspension ends.
(3) Where a licensee failed to obtain the license during either of
the previous two years because of a license suspension by the director
or the court, the licensee may qualify for a license by establishing
that the person held such a license during the last year in which the
person was eligible.
(4) Surcharges as provided for in this section shall be collected
and deposited into the ((sea cucumber dive fishery account hereby
created in the custody of the state treasurer. Only the director or
the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The sea cucumber dive fishery account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required
for expenditures)) license buyback and resource administration account.
Expenditures from the account ((shall only)) may be used to retire sea
cucumber licenses until the number of licenses is reduced to twenty-five, and thereafter shall only be used for sea cucumber management and
enforcement.
(a) A surcharge of one hundred dollars shall be charged with each
sea cucumber dive fishery license renewal for licenses issued in 2000
through 2005.
(b) For licenses issued for the year 2000 and thereafter, a
surcharge shall be charged on the sea cucumber dive fishery license for
designating an alternate operator. The surcharge shall be as follows:
Five hundred dollars for the first year or each of the first two
consecutive years after 1999 that any alternate operator is designated
and two thousand five hundred dollars each year thereafter that any
alternate operator is designated.
(5) Sea cucumber dive fishery licenses are transferable. After
December 31, 1999, there is a surcharge to transfer a sea cucumber dive
fishery license. The surcharge is five hundred dollars for the first
transfer of a license valid for calendar year 2000 and two thousand
five hundred dollars for any subsequent transfer whether occurring in
the year 2000 or thereafter. Notwithstanding this subsection, a one-time transfer exempt from surcharge applies for a transfer from the
natural person licensed on January 1, 2000, to that person's spouse or
child.
(6) If fewer than twenty-five persons are eligible for sea cucumber
dive fishery licenses, the director may accept applications for new
licenses. The additional licenses may not cause more than twenty-five
natural persons to be eligible for a sea cucumber dive fishery license.
New licenses issued under this section shall be distributed according
to rules of the department that recover the value of such licensed
privilege.

Sec. 20 RCW 77.70.300 and 2000 c 107 s 77 are each amended to
read as follows:
A person commercially fishing for Dungeness crab in offshore waters
outside of Washington state jurisdiction shall obtain a Dungeness crab
offshore delivery license from the director if the person does not
possess a valid Dungeness crab-coastal fishery license or a valid
Dungeness crab-coastal class B fishery license and the person wishes to
land Dungeness crab into a place or a port in the state. The annual
fee for a Dungeness crab offshore delivery license is two hundred fifty
dollars. The director may specify restrictions on landings of offshore
Dungeness crab in Washington state as authorized in RCW 77.70.290.
Fees from the offshore Dungeness crab delivery license shall be
placed in the ((coastal crab account created in RCW 77.70.320)) license
buyback and resource administration account.

Sec. 21 RCW 77.70.440 and 2001 c 234 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The Puget Sound crab pot buoy tag account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer.)) All revenues from fees from RCW
77.70.430 must be deposited into the license buyback and resource
administration account. Expenditures from this account may be used for
the production of crab pot buoy tags and the administration of a Puget
Sound crab pot buoy tag program. ((Only the director or the director's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW but no
appropriation is required for expenditures.))

Sec. 22 RCW 77.95.090 and 2000 c 107 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
((The dedicated regional fisheries enhancement group account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. Only the commission or
the commission's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required for expenditures.))
A portion of each recreational fishing license fee shall be used as
provided in RCW 77.32.440. A surcharge of one hundred dollars shall be
collected on each commercial salmon fishery license, each salmon
delivery license, and each salmon charter license sold in the state.
All receipts shall be placed in the ((regional fisheries enhancement
group)) license buyback and resource administration account and
((shall)) may be used ((exclusively)) for regional fisheries
enhancement group projects for the purposes of RCW 77.95.110. ((Funds
from the regional fisheries enhancement group account shall not serve
as replacement funding for department operated salmon projects that
exist on January 1, 1991.))
All revenue from the department's sale of salmon carcasses and eggs
that return to group facilities shall be deposited in the ((regional
fisheries enhancement group)) license buyback and resource
administration account for use by the regional fisheries enhancement
group that produced the surplus. The commission shall adopt rules to
implement this section pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 23 RCW 82.27.070 and 1999 c 126 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
All taxes collected by the department of revenue under this chapter
shall be deposited in the state general fund except for the excise tax
on anadromous game fish, which shall be deposited in the wildlife fund,
and, during the period January 1, 2000, to December 31, 2005, twenty-five forty-sixths of the revenues derived from the excise tax on sea
urchins collected under RCW 82.27.020 shall be deposited into the ((sea
urchin dive fishery account created in RCW 75.30.210)) license buyback
and resource administration account, and twenty-five forty-sixths of
the revenues derived from the excise tax on sea cucumbers collected
under RCW 82.27.020 shall be deposited into the ((sea cucumber dive
fishery account created in RCW 75.30.250)) license buyback and resource
administration account.

Sec. 24 RCW 82.36.330 and 1998 c 176 s 39 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon the approval of the director of the claim for refund, the
state treasurer shall draw a warrant upon the state treasury for the
amount of the claim in favor of the person making such claim and the
warrant shall be paid from the excise tax collected on motor vehicle
fuel: PROVIDED, That the state treasurer shall deduct from each marine
use refund claim an amount equivalent to one cent per gallon and shall
deposit the same in the ((coastal protection fund created by RCW
90.48.390)) license buyback and resource administration account.
Applications for refunds of excise tax shall be filed in the office of
the director not later than the close of the last business day of a
period thirteen months from the date of purchase of such motor fuel,
and if not filed within this period the right to refund shall be
forever barred, except that such limitation shall not apply to claims
for loss or destruction of motor vehicle fuel as provided by the
provisions of RCW 82.36.370. The department shall pay interest of one
percent on any refund payable under this chapter that is issued more
than thirty state business days after the receipt of a claim properly
filed and completed in accordance with this section. After the end of
the thirty business-day period, additional interest shall accrue at the
rate of one percent on the amount payable for each thirty calendar-day
period, until the refund is issued. Any person or the member of any
firm or the officer or agent of any corporation who makes any false
statement in any claim required for the refund of excise tax, as
provided in this chapter, or who collects or causes to be repaid to him
or to any other person any such refund without being entitled to the
same under the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a gross
misdemeanor.

Sec. 25 RCW 77.95.090 and 2000 c 107 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
The dedicated regional fisheries enhancement group account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. Only the commission or
the commission's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required for expenditures.
A portion of each recreational fishing license fee shall be used as
provided in RCW 77.32.440. A surcharge of one hundred dollars shall be
collected on each commercial salmon fishery license, each salmon
delivery license, and each salmon charter license sold in the state.
All receipts shall be placed in the ((regional fisheries enhancement
group account and shall be used exclusively for regional fisheries
enhancement group projects for the purposes of RCW 77.95.110. Funds
from the regional fisheries enhancement group account shall not serve
as replacement funding for department operated salmon projects that
exist on January 1, 1991)) salmon recovery account.
All revenue from the department's sale of salmon carcasses and eggs
that return to group facilities shall be deposited in the ((regional
fisheries enhancement group account for use by the regional fisheries
enhancement group that produced the surplus)) salmon recovery account.
The commission shall adopt rules to implement this section pursuant to
chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 26 RCW 70.95E.080 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 75 are each amended
to read as follows:
((The hazardous waste assistance account is hereby created in the
state treasury.)) The following moneys shall be deposited into the
((hazardous waste assistance)) state toxics control account:
(1) Those revenues which are raised by the fees imposed under RCW
70.95E.020 and 70.95E.030;
(2) Penalties and surcharges collected under chapter 70.95C RCW and
this chapter; and
(3) Any other moneys appropriated or transferred to the account by
the legislature. ((Moneys in the hazardous waste assistance account
may be spent only for the purposes of this chapter following
legislative appropriation.))

Sec. 27 RCW 70.95E.090 and 1995 c 207 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department may use funds in the ((hazardous waste assistance))
state toxics control account to provide technical assistance and
compliance education assistance to hazardous substance users and waste
generators, to provide grants to local governments, and for
administration of this chapter.
Technical assistance may include the activities authorized under
chapter 70.95C RCW and RCW 70.105.170 to encourage hazardous waste
reduction and hazardous use reduction and the assistance provided for
by RCW 70.105.100(2).
Compliance education may include the activities authorized under
RCW 70.105.100(2) to train local agency officials and to inform
hazardous substance users and hazardous waste generators and owners and
operators of hazardous waste management facilities of the requirements
of chapter 70.105 RCW and related federal laws and regulations. To the
extent practicable, the department shall contract with private
businesses to provide compliance education.
Grants to local governments shall be used for small quantity
generator technical assistance and compliance education components of
their moderate risk waste plans as required by RCW 70.105.220.

Sec. 28 RCW 70.105D.070 and 2001 c 27 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state toxics control account and the local toxics control
account are hereby created in the state treasury.
(2) The following moneys shall be deposited into the state toxics
control account: (a) Those revenues which are raised by the tax
imposed under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion
of the rate equal to thirty-three one-hundredths of one percent; (b)
the costs of remedial actions recovered under this chapter or chapter
70.105A RCW; (c) penalties collected or recovered under this chapter;
((and)) (d) one hundred percent of the revenues raised or collected
under RCW 70.95E.080; (e) eighty percent of all taxes imposed in RCW
82.19.010 and fines and bail forfeitures collected or received under
chapter 70.93 RCW; and (f) any other money appropriated or transferred
to the account by the legislature. Moneys in the account may be used
only to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including but not
limited to the following activities:
(i) The state's responsibility for hazardous waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(ii) The state's responsibility for solid waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.95 RCW;
(iii) The hazardous waste cleanup program required under this
chapter;
(iv) State matching funds required under the federal cleanup law;
(v) Financial assistance for local programs in accordance with
chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(vi) State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling,
or disposal of hazardous wastes from households, small businesses, and
agriculture;
(vii) Hazardous materials emergency response training;
(viii) Water and environmental health protection and monitoring
programs;
(ix) Programs authorized under chapter 70.146 RCW;
(x) A public participation program, including regional citizen
advisory committees;
(xi) Public funding to assist potentially liable persons to pay for
the costs of remedial action in compliance with cleanup standards under
RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) but only when the amount and terms of such
funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW
70.105D.040(4) and when the director has found that the funding will
achieve both (A) a substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup
than would otherwise occur, and (B) the prevention or mitigation of
unfair economic hardship; ((and))
(xii) Development and demonstration of alternative management
technologies designed to carry out the top two hazardous waste
management priorities of RCW 70.105.150;
(xiii) Litter collection programs, central coordination function
for litter control efforts statewide, the biennial litter survey under
RCW 70.93.200(8), and for statewide public awareness programs under RCW
70.93.200(7); and
(xiv) Waste reduction and recycling efforts.
(3) The following moneys shall be deposited into the local toxics
control account: Those revenues which are raised by the tax imposed
under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion of the
rate equal to thirty-seven one-hundredths of one percent; and twenty
percent of the total funds raised under subsection (2)(e) of this
section.
(a) Moneys deposited in the local toxics control account shall be
used by the department for grants or loans to local governments for the
following purposes ((in descending order of priority)): (i) Remedial
actions; (ii) hazardous waste plans and programs under chapter 70.105
RCW; (iii) solid waste plans and programs under chapters 70.95, 70.95C,
70.95I, and 70.105 RCW; (iv) funds for a program to assist in the
assessment and cleanup of sites of methamphetamine production, but not
to be used for the initial containment of such sites, consistent with
the responsibilities and intent of RCW 69.50.511; ((and)) (v) waste
reduction, litter control, and recycling; and (vi) cleanup and disposal
of hazardous substances from abandoned or derelict vessels that pose a
threat to human health or the environment. For purposes of this
subsection (3)(a)(((v))) (vi), "abandoned or derelict vessels" means
vessels that have little or no value and either have no identified
owner or have an identified owner lacking financial resources to clean
up and dispose of the vessel. Funds for plans and programs shall be
allocated consistent with the priorities and matching requirements
established in chapters 70.105, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.95 RCW.
((During the 1999-2001 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account may also
be used for the following activities: Conducting a study of whether
dioxins occur in fertilizers, soil amendments, and soils; reviewing
applications for registration of fertilizers; and conducting a study of
plant uptake of metals.))
(b) Funds may also be appropriated to the department of health to
implement programs to reduce testing requirements under the federal
safe drinking water act for public water systems. The department of
health shall reimburse the account from fees assessed under RCW
70.119A.115 by June 30, 1995.
(4) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through
43.79.282, moneys in the state and local toxics control accounts may be
spent only after appropriation by statute.
(5) One percent of the moneys deposited into the state and local
toxics control accounts from the tax collected under RCW 82.21.030
shall be allocated only for public participation grants to persons who
may be adversely affected by a release or threatened release of a
hazardous substance and to not-for-profit public interest
organizations. The primary purpose of these grants is to facilitate
the participation by persons and organizations in the investigation and
remedying of releases or threatened releases of hazardous substances
and to implement the state's solid and hazardous waste management
priorities. ((However, during the 1999-2001 fiscal biennium, funding
may not be granted to entities engaged in lobbying activities, and
applicants may not be awarded grants if their cumulative grant awards
under this section exceed two hundred thousand dollars.)) No grant may
exceed sixty thousand dollars. Grants may be renewed annually. Moneys
appropriated for public participation from either account which are not
expended at the close of any biennium shall revert to the state toxics
control account.
(6) No moneys deposited into either the state or local toxics
control account may be used for solid waste incinerator feasibility
studies, construction, maintenance, or operation.
(7) The department shall adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and
performance.

Sec. 29 RCW 82.19.040 and 2001 c 118 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To the extent applicable, all of the definitions of chapter
82.04 RCW and all of the provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW apply to the
tax imposed in this chapter.
(2) Eighty percent of the taxes collected under this chapter shall
be deposited in the ((waste reduction, recycling, and litter control
account under RCW 70.93.180)) state toxics control account and twenty
percent of the taxes collected under this chapter shall be deposited
into the local toxics control account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 43.21K.170 (Environmental excellence account) and 1997 c
381 s 32;
(2) RCW 77.44.050 (Warm water game fish account -- Created -- Use of
moneys) and 1999 c 235 s 1 & 1996 c 222 s 5;
(3) RCW 77.85.170 (Salmon recovery account) and 1999 sp.s. c 13 s
16; and
(4) RCW 77.95.130 (Regional fisheries enhancement salmonid recovery
account -- Created) and 1997 c 389 s 3.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 77.70.320 (Coastal crab account -- Created -- Revenues--Expenditures) and 2000 c 107 s 79, 1997 c 418 s 4, & 1994 c 260 s 6;
and
(2) RCW 77.70.330 (Coastal crab account expenditures -- Management of
coastal crab resource) and 1994 c 260 s 8.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 RCW 70.93.180 (Waste reduction, recycling,
and litter control account -- Distribution) and 1998 c 257 s 5, 1992 c
175 s 8, 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 40, 1985 c 57 s 68, 1983 c 277 s 3, & 1971
ex.s. c 307 s 18 are each repealed.

--- END ---