BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.0621 and 2002 c 352 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) License tab fees shall be thirty dollars per year for all
vehicles.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license tab fees" are
defined as the general fees paid annually for licensing motor vehicles
and trailers as defined in RCW 46.04.620 and 46.04.623. Trailers
licensed under RCW 46.16.068 or 46.16.085 or as provided for in section
2 of this act and campers licensed under RCW 46.16.505 are not required
to pay license tab fees under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In lieu of the fees provided in RCW 46.16.0621, trailers of
less than one thousand five hundred pounds gross weight and used for
noncommercial, personal use on the public highways, may be licensed
upon the payment of a license fee according to the following weight
schedule:

Under 200 pounds no fee

200 - 499 pounds $5.00

500 - 999 pounds $10.00

1000 - 1499 pounds $20.00

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect September 1, 2003.

--- END ---