BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Since 1984, institutions of higher education and the higher
education coordinating agencies in Washington have maintained a policy
and agreement on statewide transfer of credit;
(b) Each year, thousands of students successfully transfer between
community and technical colleges and four-year institutions of higher
education by earning an associate degree under the statewide direct
transfer agreement;
(c) However, nearly one-third of transfer students transfer before
completing an associate degree, which leaves the applicability of their
courses to general education requirements subject to the unique
policies of each four-year institution of higher education;
(d) The general direct transfer agreement associate degree may not
adequately prepare students for entrance into majors with extensive
lower-division prerequisites; and
(e) As institutions try to accommodate an increasing number of
students, there will be increased demand for efficiency in transfer so
that students avoid taking unnecessary courses or being required to
enroll in courses they have already taken at another institution.
(2) Therefore, the legislature intends to make improvements to the
statewide transfer of credit policy and agreement through the following
initiatives:
(a) Improved ease of transfer of general education courses between
institutions; and
(b) Development of transfer degrees for specific academic majors.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.80.280 and 1998 c 245 s 23 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board shall, in cooperation with the state institutions of
higher education and the state board for community and technical
colleges, establish and maintain a statewide transfer of credit policy
and agreement. The policy and agreement shall, where feasible, include
course and program descriptions consistent with statewide
interinstitutional guidelines. The institutions of higher education
shall provide support and staff resources as necessary to assist in
developing and maintaining this policy and agreement. The statewide
transfer of credit policy and agreement shall be effective beginning
with the 1985-86 academic year. Changes to the policy as a result of
section 4 of this act shall be effective beginning with the 2004-05
academic year.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.80.290 and 1983 c 304 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The statewide transfer of credit policy and agreement shall be
designed to facilitate the transfer of students and the evaluation of
transcripts, to better serve persons seeking information about courses
and programs, to aid in academic planning, and to improve the review
and evaluation of academic programs in the state institutions of higher
education. The statewide transfer of credit policy and agreement shall
not require nor encourage the standardization of course content and
shall not prescribe course content or the credit value assigned by any
institution to the course.
(2) The statewide transfer of credit policy and agreement shall
create flexible opportunities to satisfy lower division general
education requirements at public four-year institutions of higher
education for students who elect to transfer without completing an
associate degree, as provided in section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28B.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The higher education coordinating board, the state board for
community and technical colleges, and the council of presidents, in
partnership, shall convene a work group to recommend changes to the
statewide transfer of credit policy and agreement as provided in this
section. The work group shall include representatives from each of the
public four-year institutions of higher education and a broad sample of
community and technical colleges.
(2) The work group shall identify a general education transfer
curriculum, completion of which will satisfy the lower division general
education requirements at all public four-year institutions of higher
education in the state.
(3) A student who successfully completes the general education
transfer curriculum shall be deemed to have met the lower division
general education requirements at any public four-year institution of
higher education, regardless of whether the student completes an
associate degree before transfer. Students may complete courses within
the general education transfer curriculum at one or more community or
technical colleges or one or more four-year institutions of higher
education.
(4) Completion of the general education transfer curriculum does
not guarantee a student admission into an institution of higher
education or admission into a major, minor, or professional program at
an institution of higher education.
(5) The work group shall not specify individual courses within the
transfer curriculum but shall describe as clearly and succinctly as
possible the characteristics of the courses and the core competencies
to be addressed by the general education curriculum. The intercollege
relations commission shall collect and maintain the lists of courses
offered by each community and technical college and public four-year
institution of higher education that fall within the general education
transfer curriculum.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28B.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The higher education coordinating board, the state board for
community and technical colleges, and the council of presidents, in
partnership, shall convene a work group to develop transfer associate
degrees that will satisfy lower division requirements at public four-year institutions of higher education for specific academic majors.
(2) A transfer associate degree developed under this section shall
meet all lower division course requirements at any public four-year
institution of higher education for the academic major for which the
degree was developed. Such a transfer associate degree shall also
enable a student to complete the lower-division general education
requirements that a nontransferring student would typically complete in
the freshman and sophomore years for that academic major.
(3) Completion of a transfer associate degree developed under this
section does not guarantee a student admission into an institution of
higher education or admission into a major, minor, or professional
program at an institution of higher education that has competitive
admission standards for the program based on grade point average or
other performance criteria.
(4) During the 2003-04 academic year, the work group shall develop
transfer degrees for business administration, elementary education, and
secondary education with math or science endorsements. Each year
thereafter, the work group shall identify and develop additional
transfer degrees. The work group shall give priority to majors in high
demand by transfer students and majors where the general direct
transfer agreement associate degree does not adequately prepare
students to enter the major automatically upon transfer.
(5) The intercollege relations commission shall collect and
maintain lists of courses offered by each community and technical
college and public four-year institution of higher education that fall
within each transfer associate degree.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new
section is added to chapter 28B.80 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning December 1, 2003, the board, the state board for
community and technical colleges, and the council of presidents shall
submit a progress report on the initiatives directed by sections 4 and
5 of this act to the higher education committees of the house of
representatives and the senate. The first progress report shall
include measurable benchmark indicators to monitor the effectiveness of
the initiatives in improving transfer and baseline data for those
indicators before the implementation of the initiatives. Subsequent
reports shall be submitted by December 1st of each odd-numbered year
and shall monitor progress on the indicators, describe development of
additional transfer associate degrees, and provide other data on
improvements in transfer efficiency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
Prior to registration, each community or technical college shall
notify students regarding which of the institution's courses fall
within the general education transfer curriculum under section 4 of
this act or within one or more transfer associate degrees under section
5 of this act.

--- END ---