BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
provide improved means of review by which to evaluate the budget
requests of state agencies. The legislature establishes the zero-base
and modified zero-base budget review process to help the legislature
establish priorities in the expenditure of public resources for state
programs and services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Review" means a modified zero-base budget review or a zero-based budget review, as appropriate.
(2) "Committees" means the appropriations committee of the house of
representatives and the ways and means committee of the senate and the
committees' respective staffs.
(3) "Modified zero-base budget review" means a written document
prepared by the staff to the committees that contains an analysis of
the budget and the programmatic and fiscal basis of the agency on which
the review is conducted. A modified zero-base budget review may
consider the agency's past and current incremental funding.
(4) "Zero-base budget review" means a written document prepared by
the committees that contains an analysis of the budget and the
programmatic and fiscal basis of the agency on which the review is
conducted. A zero-base budget review shall undertake this analysis
without regard to the agency's past and current incremental funding.
(5) "Program" means a group of agency services designed to
accomplish specific public goals and result in specific public
benefits.
(6) "Level of service" means the relationship between the resources
budgeted and the actual service activity delivered by the authorized
service provider or agency. This relationship is measured in terms
such as, but not limited to, response time, system capacity,
application or permit processing time, per staff workload, and
statutory service requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) In the omnibus operating budget bill or
in other legislation, the legislature shall identify agencies on which
a zero-base budget review or a modified zero-base budget review shall
be conducted during each fiscal year of the biennium. When specifying
agencies on which the review will be conducted, the legislature shall
seek to complement and avoid duplication of the activities or the
proposed activities of the joint legislative audit and review committee
under chapter 44.28 RCW.
(2) The committees shall jointly conduct the reviews of state
agencies and programs as specified by the legislature under subsection
(1) of this section.
(3) The reviews shall be provided to the committees either by
September 1st following the fiscal year in which the review takes
place, or as specified in the omnibus operating budget bill or in other
legislation.
(4) The house of representatives and the senate may contract with
public and private independent professional and technical experts as
necessary to complete the review.
(5) Each agency receiving appropriations in the omnibus operating
budget bill shall be reviewed at least once during the six-year period
beginning on July 1, 2003, and at least once every six years
thereafter.
(6) When conducting the review, the committees shall consult with
the joint legislative audit and review committee. The review is
intended to complement, and not to duplicate, performance audits and
performance reviews conducted by the joint legislative audit and review
committee under chapter 44.28 RCW.
(7) To facilitate the review, the director of financial management
shall cooperate with the committees to establish the method and format
for the reporting of agency information. The director of financial
management and all agencies shall comply in a timely manner with
requests by the committees for information related to the review.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A modified zero-base budget review shall
include, but is not limited to, the following:
(1) A statement of the statutory basis and the history of each
program within the agency that is being reviewed, including the extent
to which the program or expenditures are required by state, federal, or
local law;
(2) A description, with supporting cost and full-time equivalent
staff data, of the activities performed in each program, the specific
services provided, and the populations served by those services;
(3) An analysis of the major costs and benefits of operating each
program within the designated agency including subprograms within the
programs where applicable, and the rationale for specific expenditure
and staffing levels;
(4) An analysis estimating each program's administrative and other
overhead costs;
(5) An analysis of levels of service provided; and
(6) Where applicable, an analysis estimating the amount of funds or
benefits that actually reach the intended recipients.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A zero-base budget review shall include, but
is not limited to, each of the components of the modified zero-base
budget review in section 4 of this act in addition to the following:
(1) An analysis of the quantified objectives of each program within
the agency;
(2) An analysis of the activities that are intended to accomplish
these objectives;
(3) Indicators of quantified measures of effectiveness and
efficiency of achievement of these objectives;
(4) The level of funding and full-time equivalent staff required to
accomplish each activity, without regard to past incremental levels of
funding; and
(5) If the legislation requiring the review specifies alternate
levels of funding for the agency, an analysis of the agency budget at
the different level of funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 44 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---