BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Employer" means the state of Washington, counties, cities,
towns, or any other political subdivision, whose employees are members
of a retirement system under RCW 41.50.030 (1) (a) through (d) and (4).
(2) "Early retirement" means the authorization under this chapter
of temporary retirement eligibility for the retirement systems under
RCW 41.50.030 (1) (a) through (d) and (4).
(3) "Eligible position" means a position that conforms to the
requirements for membership in a retirement system under RCW 41.50.030
(1) (a) through (d) and (4).
(4) "Normal retirement" means that retirement, based on service or
service and age, of a member of a retirement system when the full
retirement allowance is provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 An employer may temporarily utilize a
retirement incentive program as provided in section 3(1) of this act if
it has encountered or will be encountering one or more of the following
emergent and compelling conditions:
(1) A significant reduction in force due to either (a) budgetary or
other fiscal adjustments or (b) significant personnel restructuring;
(2) The closure of one or more of its facilities; and
(3) The privatization of one or more of its agencies or services it
provides.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) An employer may offer, adhering to all
laws or regulations of the state or federal government:
(a) Retirement, with a reduction in the retirement allowance of
three percent per year for each year of difference between the
employee's age and the full retirement age for the employee's plan, to
those targeted employees who are within five years of normal
retirement;
(b) Retirement, with full actuarial reduction of the retirement
allowance, to other targeted employees who are not within five years of
normal retirement; and
(c) Other incentives the agency or political subdivision declares
appropriate, including incentives to those already eligible to retire
on normal retirement.
(2) The employer providing early retirement as a part of a
retirement incentive program under subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this
section is required to pay the full actuarial present value of any
increase in the cost to the respective retirement system or systems
resulting from persons taking the early retirement. This payment may
be made during a five-year period beginning on the date of retirement.
Interest shall be charged on payments made by the employer after the
date of the employees' retirement at a rate determined by the director.
(3) An employee who accepts an employer's offer to retire under
this section shall have their retirement allowance suspended
immediately upon reemployment with that employer, and the retired
employee's retirement allowance shall remain suspended until the
retired employee remains absent from employment with that employer for
one full calendar month.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 An employee who accepts an employer's offer
to retire under section 3 of this act who works more than eight hundred
sixty-seven hours of postretirement employment with any employer
participating in any of the Washington state retirement systems shall
have their monthly retirement allowance suspended until the retiree
remains absent from employment with an employer for one full calendar
month.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Upon notification by a political
subdivision, the director of retirement systems shall, within fifteen
calendar days of receipt, inform the certified or requesting employer
of the procedures and reporting necessary to carry out any retirement
incentive program.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.32.480 and 1997 c 254 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any member who separates from service after having completed
thirty years of creditable service may retire upon the approval by the
department of an application for retirement filed on the prescribed
form. Upon retirement the member shall receive a retirement allowance
consisting of an annuity which shall be the actuarial equivalent of his
or her accumulated contributions at his or her age of retirement and a
pension as provided in RCW 41.32.497. Effective July 1, 1967, anyone
then receiving a retirement allowance or a survivor retirement
allowance under this chapter, based on thirty-five years of creditable
service, and who has established more than thirty-five years of service
credit with the retirement system, shall thereafter receive a
retirement allowance based on the total years of service credit
established.
(2) Any member who has attained age sixty years, but who has
completed less than thirty years of creditable service, upon separation
from service, may retire upon the approval by the department of an
application for retirement filed on the prescribed form. Upon
retirement the member shall receive a retirement allowance consisting
of an annuity which shall be the actuarial equivalent of his or her
accumulated contributions at his or her age of retirement and a pension
as provided in RCW 41.32.497.
(3) Any member who has attained age fifty-five years and who has
completed not less than twenty-five years of creditable service, upon
separation from service, may retire upon the approval by the department
of an application for retirement filed on the prescribed form. Upon
retirement the member shall receive a retirement allowance which shall
be the actuarial equivalent of his or her accumulated contributions at
his or her age of retirement and a pension as provided in RCW
41.32.497. An individual who has retired pursuant to this subsection,
on or after July 1, 1969, shall not suffer an actuarial reduction in
his or her retirement allowance, except as the allowance may be
actuarially reduced pursuant to the options contained in RCW 41.32.530.
The chapter 193, Laws of 1974 ex. sess. amendment to this section shall
be retroactive to July 1, 1969.
(4) Subsections (1) through (3) of this section may be temporarily
superseded by the provisions of a certified retirement incentive
program initiated under section 3 of this act.

Sec. 7 RCW 41.32.765 and 2000 c 247 s 902 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member with at least five service
credit years of service who has attained at least age sixty-five shall
be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed
according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.760.
(2) EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least twenty
service credit years of service who has attained at least age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance
computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.760, except that a
member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement
allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number
of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.
(3) ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at
least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall
be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed
according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.760, except that a member
retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement
allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference
in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of
age sixty-five.
(4) Subsections (1) through (3) of this section may be temporarily
superseded by the provisions of a certified retirement incentive
program initiated under section 3 of this act.

Sec. 8 RCW 41.32.875 and 2000 c 247 s 903 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member who is at least age sixty-five
and who has:
(a) Completed ten service credit years; or
(b) Completed five service credit years, including twelve service
credit months after attaining age fifty-four; or
(c) Completed five service credit years by July 1, 1996, under plan
2 and who transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.32.817;
shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance
computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.840.
(2) EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has attained at least age
fifty-five and has completed at least ten years of service shall be
eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed
according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.840, except that a member
retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement
allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number
of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.
(3) ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at
least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall
be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed
according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.840, except that a member
retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement
allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference
in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of
age sixty-five.
(4) Subsections (1) through (3) of this section may be temporarily
superseded by the provisions of a certified retirement incentive
program initiated under section 3 of this act.

Sec. 9 RCW 41.35.420 and 2000 c 247 s 905 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member with at least five service
credit years who has attained at least age sixty-five shall be eligible
to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to
the provisions of RCW 41.35.400.
(2) EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least twenty
service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible
to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to
the provisions of RCW 41.35.400, except that a member retiring pursuant
to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance actuarially
reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at
retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.
(3) ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at
least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall
be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed
according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.400, except that a member
retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement
allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference
in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of
age sixty-five.
(4) Subsections (1) through (3) of this section may be temporarily
superseded by the provisions of a certified retirement incentive
program initiated under section 3 of this act.

Sec. 10 RCW 41.35.680 and 2000 c 247 s 906 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member who is at least age sixty-five
and who has:
(a) Completed ten service credit years; or
(b) Completed five service credit years, including twelve service
credit months after attaining age fifty-four; or
(c) Completed five service credit years by September 1, 2000, under
the public employees' retirement system plan 2 and who transferred to
plan 3 under RCW 41.35.510;
shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance
computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.620.
(2) EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has attained at least age
fifty-five and has completed at least ten years of service shall be
eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed
according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.620, except that a member
retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement
allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number
of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.
(3) ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at
least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall
be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed
according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.620, except that a member
retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement
allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference
in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of
age sixty-five.
(4) Subsections (1) through (3) of this section may be temporarily
superseded by the provisions of a certified retirement incentive
program initiated under section 3 of this act.

Sec. 11 RCW 41.40.180 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 52 s 21 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any member with five years of creditable service who has
attained age sixty and any original member who has attained age sixty
may retire on written application to the director, setting forth at
what time the member desires to be retired: PROVIDED, That in the
national interest, during time of war engaged in by the United States,
the director may extend beyond age sixty, subject to the provisions of
subsection (2) of this section, the age at which any member may be
eligible to retire.
(2) Any member who has completed thirty years of service may retire
on written application to the director setting forth at what time the
member desires to be retired, subject to war measures.
(3) Any member who has completed twenty-five years of service and
attained age fifty-five may retire on written application to the
director setting forth at what time the member desires to be retired,
subject to war measures.
(4) Any individual who is eligible to retire pursuant to
subsections (1) through (3) of this section shall be allowed to retire
while on any authorized leave of absence not in excess of one hundred
and twenty days.
(5) Subsections (1) through (3) of this section may be temporarily
superseded by the provisions of a certified retirement incentive
program initiated under section 3 of this act.

Sec. 12 RCW 41.40.630 and 2000 c 247 s 901 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member with at least five service
credit years who has attained at least age sixty-five shall be eligible
to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to
the provisions of RCW 41.40.620.
(2) EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least twenty
service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible
to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to
the provisions of RCW 41.40.620, except that a member retiring pursuant
to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance actuarially
reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at
retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.
(3) ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at
least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall
be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed
according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.620, except that a member
retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement
allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference
in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of
age sixty-five.
(4) Subsections (1) through (3) of this section may be temporarily
superseded by the provisions of a certified retirement incentive
program initiated under section 3 of this act.

Sec. 13 RCW 41.40.820 and 2000 c 247 s 309 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member who is at least age sixty-five
and who has:
(a) Completed ten service credit years; or
(b) Completed five service credit years, including twelve service
credit months after attaining age fifty-four; or
(c) Completed five service credit years by the transfer payment
date specified in RCW 41.40.795, under the public employees' retirement
system plan 2 and who transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.40.795;
shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance
computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.790.
(2) EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has attained at least age
fifty-five and has completed at least ten years of service shall be
eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed
according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.790, except that a member
retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement
allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number
of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.
(3) ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at
least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall
be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed
according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.790, except that a member
retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement
allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference
in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of
age sixty-five.
(4) Subsections (1) through (3) of this section may be temporarily
superseded by the provisions of a certified retirement incentive
program initiated under section 3 of this act.

Sec. 14 RCW 43.43.250 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 52 s 26 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any member who has attained the age of sixty years shall be
retired on the first day of the calendar month next succeeding that in
which said member shall have attained the age of sixty: PROVIDED, That
the requirement to retire at age sixty shall not apply to a member
serving as chief of the Washington state patrol.
(2) Any member who has completed twenty-five years of credited
service or has attained the age of fifty-five may apply to retire as
provided in RCW 43.43.260, by completing and submitting an application
form to the department, setting forth at what time the member desires
to be retired.
(3) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section may be temporarily
superseded by the provisions of a certified retirement incentive
program initiated under section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 41 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 This act expires June 30, 2004, except for
section 4 of this act, which expires June 30, 2008.

--- END ---