BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that:
(1) An estimated one hundred twenty-eight million Americans suffer
from chronic, degenerative, and acute diseases, including diabetes,
Alzheimer's disease, cancer, Huntington's disease, Parkinson's disease,
heart disease, and spinal cord injury. The crippling economic and
psychological burdens of such diseases result in billions of dollars
every year in costs of treatment and lost productivity as well as
extreme human loss and emotional suffering.
(2) Stem cell research offers immense promise for developing new
medical therapies for these debilitating diseases and a critical means
to explore fundamental questions of biology. Stem cell research could
lead to unprecedented treatments and potential cures for diabetes,
Alzheimer's disease, cancer, Huntington's disease, Parkinson's disease,
heart disease, spinal cord injury, and other diseases.
(3) Washington state is home to several large medical research
institutions and an expanding biomedical research industry. These
organizations are committed to improving the lives of Americans
suffering from chronic, degenerative, and acute diseases. Encouraging
stem cell research is essential to realizing the promise of stem cell
research.
(4) Stem cell research, including the use of embryonic stem cells
for medical research, raises significant ethical concerns that must be
balanced with medical considerations.
(5) While stem cell research holds enormous potential for treating
or even curing some diseases, the cloning of human beings is morally
and ethically unacceptable. Furthermore, the cloning of human beings
poses grave health risks to any child who may be produced in this
manner. Any attempt to clone a human being is in direct conflict with
the policies of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 It is the policy of Washington state that
research involving the derivation and use of human embryonic stem
cells, human embryonic germ cells, and human adult stem cells from any
source, including somatic cell nuclear transplantation, is permitted
upon full consideration of the ethical and medical implications of this
research.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Cloning of a human being" means asexual reproduction by
implanting or attempting to implant the product of nuclear
transplantation into a uterus or substitute for a uterus with the
purpose of producing a human being.
(2) "Nuclear transplantation" means transferring the nucleus of a
human somatic cell into an oocyte from which the nucleus has been or
will be removed or inactivated.
(3) "Human somatic cell" means a diploid cell that is obtained or
derived from a living or deceased human at any stage of development.
(4) "Oocyte" means the unfertilized human ovum.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A physician, surgeon, or other health
care provider delivering fertility treatment shall provide his or her
patient with timely, relevant, and appropriate information to allow the
individual to make an informed and voluntary choice regarding the
disposition of any human embryos remaining following the fertility
treatment. The information must include the option of storing unused
embryos, donating unused embryos to another individual, discarding
unused embryos, or donating unused embryos for research.
(2) A patient who chooses to donate unused embryos for research
after a consultation under subsection (1) of this section shall provide
written consent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) A person may donate human embryonic
tissue or human cadaveric fetal tissue for research purposes.
(2) A person may not knowingly, for valuable consideration,
purchase or sell human embryonic tissue or human cadaveric fetal tissue
for research purposes.
(3) Valuable consideration does not include reasonable payment for
the removal, processing, disposal, preservation, quality control,
storage, transportation, or implantation of human embryonic tissue or
human cadaveric tissue.
(4) A person who violates this section is guilty of a felony and
upon conviction is subject to a fine not to exceed fifty thousand
dollars or imprisonment not to exceed five years, or both.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) No person may knowingly engage or assist
in the cloning or attempted cloning of a human being.
(2) The attorney general may bring an action to enjoin any person
from violating subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section is
subject to a civil penalty not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars
for each violation. Civil penalties authorized by this subsection may
be imposed in any civil action brought by the attorney general.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict areas of
biomedical, agricultural, and scientific research not specifically
prohibited by this section, including somatic cell nuclear transfer or
other cloning technologies to clone molecules, DNA, cells, and tissues.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---