BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A city may not impose a gross receipts tax on intellectual
property creating activities.
(2) A city may impose a gross receipts tax measured by gross
receipts from royalties only on taxpayers domiciled in the city. For
the purposes of this section, "royalties" does not include gross
receipts from casual or isolated sales as defined in RCW 82.04.040,
grants, capital contributions, donations, or endowments.
(3) This section does not prohibit a city from imposing a gross
receipts tax measured by the value of products manufactured in the city
merely because intellectual property creating activities are involved
in the design or manufacturing of the products. An intellectual
property creating activity shall not constitute an activity defined
within the meaning of the term "to manufacture" under chapter 82.04
RCW.
(4) This section does not prohibit a city from imposing a gross
receipts tax measured by the gross proceeds of sales made in the city
merely because intellectual property creating activities are involved
in creation of the articles sold.
(5) This section does not prohibit a city from imposing a gross
receipts tax measured by the gross income received for services
rendered in the city merely because intellectual property creating
activities are some part of services rendered.
(6) A tax in effect on January 1, 2002, is not subject to this
section until January 1, 2004.
(7) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section.
(a) "Gross receipts tax" means a tax measured by gross proceeds of
sales, gross income of the business, or value proceeding or accruing.
(b) "City" includes cities, code cities, and towns.
(c) "Domicile" means the principal place from which the trade or
business of the taxpayer is directed and managed. A taxpayer has only
one domicile.
(d) "Intellectual property creating activity" means research,
development, authorship, creation, or general or specific inventive
activity without regard to whether the intellectual property creating
activity actually results in the creation of patents, trademarks, trade
secrets, subject matter subject to copyright, or other intellectual
property.
(e) "Manufacture," "gross proceeds of sales," "gross income of the
business," "value proceeding or accruing," and "royalties" have the
same meanings as under chapter 82.04 RCW.
(f) "Value of products" means the value of products as determined
under RCW 82.04.450.

--- END ---