BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Local transit authority bus shelters within the right of way of
the state highway system may display and maintain commercial
advertisements subject to applicable federal regulations, if any.
Pursuant to RCW 47.12.120, the department may lease state right of way
air space to local transit authorities for this purpose, unless there
are significant safety concerns regarding the placement of certain
advertisements.
(2) Advertisements posted on a local transit authority's bus
shelter may not exceed twenty-four square feet on each side of the
panel. Panels may not be placed on the roof of the shelter or on the
forward side of the shelter facing oncoming traffic.

Sec. 2 RCW
47.12.120 and 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 50 are each amended
to read as follows:
The department ((is authorized, subject to the provisions and
requirements of zoning ordinances of political subdivisions of
government, to)) may rent or lease any lands, improvements, or air
space above or below any lands((, including those used or to be used
for both limited access and conventional highways which)) that are held
for highway purposes but are not presently needed((,)). The rental or
lease:
(1) Must be upon such terms and conditions as the department may
determine;
(2) Is subject to the provisions and requirements of zoning
ordinances of political subdivisions of government;
(3) Includes lands used or to be used for both limited access and
conventional highways that otherwise meet the requirements of this
section; and
(4) In the case of bus shelters provided by a local transit
authority that include commercial advertising, may charge the transit
authority only for commercial space.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.36.030 and 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 61 are each amended
to read as follows:
The secretary of transportation shall have the power and it shall
be its duty to adopt and designate a uniform state standard for the
manufacture, display, erection, and location of all signs, signals,
signboards, guideposts, and other traffic devices erected or to be
erected upon the state highways of the state of Washington for the
purpose of furnishing information to persons traveling upon such state
highways regarding traffic regulations, directions, distances, points
of danger, and conditions requiring caution, and for the purpose of
imposing restrictions upon persons operating vehicles thereon. Such
signs shall conform as nearly as practicable to the manual of
specifications for the manufacture, display, and erection of uniform
traffic control devices for streets and highways and all amendments,
corrections, and additions thereto. The department of transportation
shall prepare plans and specifications of the uniform state standard of
traffic devices so adopted and designated, showing the materials,
colors, and designs thereof, and shall upon the issuance of any such
plans and specifications or revisions thereof and upon request, furnish
to the boards of county commissioners and the governing body of any
incorporated city or town, a copy thereof. Signs, signals, signboards,
guideposts, and other traffic devices erected on county roads shall
conform in all respects to the specifications of color, design, and
location approved by the secretary. Traffic devices hereafter erected
within incorporated cities and towns shall conform to such uniform
state standard of traffic devices so far as is practicable. The
uniform system must allow local transit authority bus shelters located
within the right of way of the state highway system to display and
maintain commercial advertisements subject to applicable federal
regulations, if any.

--- END ---