BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.20A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall designate a person within each of the
department's administrative regions to serve as a liaison for
community-based and faith-based social services organizations. The
liaison shall be available to such organizations to:
(a) Provide information to community-based and faith-based social
services organizations that relates to opportunities for the
organizations to cooperate with the department in providing community
services throughout the state;
(b) Identify areas of need that are not currently being met in the
state in which community-based and faith-based social services
organizations may provide needed services;
(c) Coordinate efforts to promote involvement of community-based
and faith-based social services organizations to provide community
services throughout the state.
(2) The secretary shall include provisions in its contracts
indicating that community-based and faith-based social services
organizations that receive funds from the department must not:
(a) Engage in discrimination that denies service to a potential
client on the basis of age, gender, race, sexual orientation, national
origin, creed, religion, or presence of a disability; or
(b) Engage in activities that promote conversion to a particular
faith, institution, or cause, unless participation in those activities
is voluntary.
(3) The secretary shall include provisions in its contracts
indicating that community-based and faith-based social services
organizations that receive funds from the department must:
(a) Define clear, measurable outcomes;
(b) Demonstrate their anticipated cost-effectiveness;
(c) Demonstrate broad community involvement, support, and
partnerships; and
(d) Conduct an evaluation of their program outcomes.
(4) The department must achieve the purposes of this section
through existing resources.

--- END ---