BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that improving our air
quality is an important goal, and that a major factor affecting our air
quality is emissions from older internal combustion engines. New
technologies either currently in use or due to come to market in the
near future promise to drastically reduce vehicle emissions. The
legislature finds that an appropriate goal would be for fifty percent
of the motor vehicles sold to be hybrid and fuel cell vehicles by the
year 2013. In order to encourage the citizens of Washington to pursue
this goal through market incentives, the legislature shall reduce sales
tax on these vehicles, and dedicate the remaining portion of the state
sales tax to provide for other transportation alternatives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Fuel cell motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle powered by an
electrochemical engine that converts the chemical energy of a fuel,
such as hydrogen, and an oxidant, such as oxygen, directly into
electricity.
(2) "Hybrid motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle that uses
propulsion units powered by both electricity and gasoline.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.08.020 and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1)(a) There is levied and there shall be collected a tax on each
retail sale in this state.
(b) The tax is equal to three and two-tenths percent of the selling
price for sales of hybrid motor vehicles and fuel cell motor vehicles.
Revenue collected under this subsection (1)(b) must be deposited in the
multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.
(c) The tax is equal to six and five-tenths percent of the selling
price for other sales.
(2) There is levied and there shall be collected an additional tax
on each retail car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is
licensed in this state, equal to five and nine-tenths percent of the
selling price. The revenue collected under this subsection shall be
deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW
47.66.070.
(3) The taxes imposed under this chapter shall apply to successive
retail sales of the same property.
(4) The rates provided in this section apply to taxes imposed under
chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

--- END ---