BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of the tax
any charitable contribution, as defined in section 170(c) of the
internal revenue code, paid by the taxpayer during the reporting
period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2004.

--- END ---