BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT. (1) The
legislature finds that habitat mitigation banks are an important tool
for providing compensatory mitigation for unavoidable impacts to fish
and wildlife habitat conservation areas. The legislature further finds
that the benefits of habitat mitigation banks include:
(a) Maintenance of the ecological functioning of a habitat
conservation area by consolidating compensatory mitigation into a
single large parcel rather than in separate, isolated individual
parcels;
(b) Increased potential for the establishment and long-term
management of successful mitigation by bringing together financial
resources, planning, and scientific expertise not practicable for many
project-specific mitigation proposals;
(c) Increased certainty over the success of mitigation and
reduction of temporal losses of fish and wildlife habitat areas since
habitat mitigation banks are typically implemented and functioning in
advance of project impacts;
(d) Potential enhanced protection and preservation of the state's
most valuable fish and wildlife habitat;
(e) A reduction in permit processing times and increased
opportunity for more cost-effective compensatory mitigation for
development projects; and
(f) The ability to provide compensatory mitigation in an efficient,
predictable, and economically and environmentally responsible manner.
Therefore, the legislature declares that it is the policy of the
state to authorize habitat mitigation banking.
(2) The purpose of this chapter is to support the establishment and
operation of habitat mitigation banks by:
(a) Authorizing state agencies and local governments, as well as
private entities, to achieve the goals of this chapter;
(b) Providing a predictable, efficient regulatory framework,
including timely review of habitat mitigation bank proposals and
approval of habitat mitigation bank credits for projects; and
(c) Establishing a preference for the use of habitat mitigation
bank credits for transportation projects of statewide significance over
individual, isolated, on-site mitigation.
The legislature intends that, in the development and adoption of
rules for habitat mitigation banks, the department establish and use a
collaborative process involving interested public agencies and private
entities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 APPLICABILITY. (1) This chapter applies to
the establishment, operation, and maintenance of public and private
fish, wildlife, or fish and wildlife habitat mitigation banks,
including the review and certification of mitigation banks and the
approval of the use of credits from habitat mitigation banks for
mitigation of proposed impacts of public and private projects,
including but not limited to public transportation projects.
(2) This chapter does not create any new authority for regulating
fish, wildlife, or fish and wildlife habitat conservation areas or
habitat mitigation banks beyond what is specifically provided for in
this chapter. No authority is granted to the department under this
chapter to adopt rules or guidance that apply to fish, wildlife, or
fish and wildlife habitat conservation projects other than habitat
mitigation banks under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Bank sponsor" means any public or private entity responsible
for establishing and, in most circumstances, operating a bank.
(2) "Banking instrument" means the documentation of agency and bank
sponsor concurrence on the objectives and administration of the bank
that describes in detail the physical and legal characteristics of the
bank, including the service area and how the bank will be established
and operated.
(3) "Compensatory mitigation" means the preservation, restoration,
enhancement, or creation of fish, wildlife, or fish and wildlife
habitat areas for the purpose of compensating for adverse impacts to
habitat areas resulting from a proposed development project.
(4) "Creation" means the establishment of fish, wildlife, or fish
and wildlife habitat area functions and values in an area, either on or
off the project site, where none previously existed.
(5) "Credit" means a unit of trade representing the increase in the
ecological value of the site, as measured by acreage, functions, or
values, or by some other assessment method.
(6) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(7) "Enhancement" means actions taken within an existing fish,
wildlife, or fish and wildlife habitat area to increase or augment one
or more functions or values of the area. "Enhancement" may also
include actions taken to improve the functions provided by a buffer or
upland area.
(8) "Habitat" means the environmental conditions surrounding the
location where a particular species of fish or wildlife lives,
including air, water, soil, mineral elements, moisture, temperature,
and topography.
(9) "Habitat mitigation bank" or "bank" means a site where fish,
wildlife, or fish and wildlife habitat is preserved, restored,
enhanced, or created for the purpose of providing compensatory
mitigation in advance of authorized impacts to similar habitat areas.
(10) "Impact" means the effect or consequence of a proposed action,
as identified by the state agency or local government issuing the
project permit, in particular upon fish, wildlife, or fish and wildlife
habitat conservation areas and specific to an element of the habitat
for a particular species.
(11) "Performance standards" means measurable benchmarks for a
specific project objective, in particular to allow evaluation of the
characteristics associated with certified habitat mitigation banks.
(12) "Practicable" means available and capable of being done after
taking into consideration cost, existing technology, and logistics in
light of overall project purposes.
(13) "Preservation" means the protection of ecologically important
fish, wildlife, or fish and wildlife habitat area through the
implementation of appropriate legal and physical mechanisms.
"Preservation" may include protection of the functions provided by a
buffer or upland area to ensure the protection or enhancement of the
habitat area.
(14) "Restoration" means actions taken to intentionally reestablish
fish, wildlife, or fish and wildlife habitat areas at a site where
functional and valuable habitat previously existed but where functional
and valuable habitat no longer exists.
(15) "Service area" means the designated geographic area in which
a bank can reasonably be expected to provide appropriate compensatory
mitigation.
(16) "Transportation project of statewide significance" means a
project or combination of projects that cross multiple city or county
jurisdictional boundaries or connects major state destinations in
support of the state's economy and are so designated by the department
of transportation and approved by the transportation committees of the
senate and house of representatives. The transportation committees of
the senate and house of representatives may also designate such
projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RULES. Subject to the requirements of this
chapter, the department, through a collaborative process involving
interested public agencies and private entities, shall adopt rules for:
(1) Certification, operation, and monitoring of fish, wildlife, or
fish and wildlife habitat mitigation banks. The rules must include
procedures to assure that:
(a) Priority is given to banks providing for the restoration of
degraded or former habitat areas;
(b) Banks involving the creation and enhancement of fish, wildlife,
or fish and wildlife habitat are certified only where there are
adequate assurances of success and that the bank will result in an
overall environmental benefit; and
(c) Banks involving the preservation of fish, wildlife, or fish and
wildlife habitat are certified only when the preservation is in
conjunction with the restoration, enhancement, or creation of a fish,
wildlife, or fish and wildlife habitat, or in other exceptional
circumstances as determined by the department consistent with this
chapter;
(2) Determination, release, and use of credits from banks, provided
that:
(a) Procedures regarding credits must authorize the use and sale of
credits to offset adverse impacts and the phased release of credits as
different levels of the performance standards are met;
(b) Linear projects, including but not limited to transportation
projects of statewide significance, transmission or distribution lines,
pipelines, and railways, may use bank credits for compensatory
mitigation of all adverse impacts of projects even though all of the
project's impacts are not located within the bank's service area if (i)
at least one impact from the project is located within the bank's
service area, and (ii) appropriate compensation is provided for impacts
lying outside the bank's service area; and
(c) Use of habitat mitigation banks for transportation projects of
statewide significance are preferred over individual, isolated, on-site
mitigation;
(3) Public involvement in the certification of banks, using
existing statutory authority;
(4) Coordination of governmental agencies;
(5) Establishment of criteria for determining service areas for
each bank;
(6) Performance standards; and
(7) Long-term management, financial assurances, and remediation for
certified banks.
Before adopting rules under this chapter, the department shall
submit the proposed rules to the appropriate standing committees of the
legislature. By January 30, 2004, the department shall submit a report
to the appropriate standing committees of the legislature on its
progress in developing rules under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 CERTIFICATION OF BANKS. (1) The department
may certify only those banks that meet the requirements of this
chapter. Certification shall be accomplished through a banking
instrument. The local jurisdiction in which the bank is located shall
be signatory to the banking instrument.
(2) State agencies and local governments may approve use of credits
from a bank for any compensatory mitigation required under a permit
issued or approved by that state agency or local government for the
proposed impacts of a specific public or private project. For public
transportation projects of statewide significance, use of credits from
a bank may be approved for any mitigation of impacts of a proposed
project even though all of the project's impacts are not located within
the bank's service area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 USE OF CREDITS. If the permitting agency
has identified an impact of a proposed project on a habitat
conservation area for which compensatory mitigation is required, the
department and the permitting agency may approve use of credits from a
bank that provides appropriate compensatory mitigation for the project
impacts. Credits from a bank may be approved if:
(1) The credits represent the restoration, enhancement, or creation
of habitat of like kind to the habitat areas on which the proposed
project will cause impacts; or
(2) Use of credits from a bank is environmentally preferable to on-site compensation.
For transportation projects of statewide significance permit
applications that require mitigation for impacts on a habitat
conservation area, the department and the permitting agency shall
authorize use of credits from a certified bank for the applicant public
agency that will provide appropriate compensatory mitigation for the
project impacts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 INTERPRETATION OF CHAPTER AND RULES. This
chapter and rules adopted under this chapter shall to the extent
possible be interpreted to be consistent with applicable federal
regulation and guidance on the use of habitat mitigation banking.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this act
are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 90 RCW.

--- END ---