BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.225.170 and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.210 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any child who is of school age and otherwise eligible residing
within the boundaries of any military, naval, lighthouse, or other
United States reservation, national park, or national forest or
residing upon rented or leased undeeded lands within any Indian
reservation within the state of Washington, shall be admitted to the
public school, or schools, of any contiguous district without payment
of tuition: PROVIDED, That the United States authorities in charge of
such reservation or park shall cooperate fully with state, county, and
school district authorities in the enforcement of the laws of this
state relating to the compulsory attendance of children of school age,
and all laws relating to and regulating school attendance.
(2) Any child who is of school age and otherwise eligible, residing
in a home that is located in Idaho but that has a Washington address
for the purposes of the United States postal service, shall be
admitted, without payment of tuition, to the nearest Washington school
district and shall be considered a resident student for state
apportionment and all other purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1(2) of this act expires July 1,
2006.

--- END ---