BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purpose of this section, "drug and alcohol free
housing" requires a rental agreement and means a dwelling in which:
(a) Each of the dwelling units on the premises is occupied or held
for occupancy by at least one tenant who is a recovering alcoholic or
drug addict and is participating in a program of recovery;
(b) The landlord is a nonprofit corporation incorporated under
Title 24 RCW, a corporation for profit incorporated under Title 23B
RCW, or a housing authority created under chapter 35.82 RCW;
(c) The landlord provides:
(i) A drug and alcohol free environment, covering all tenants,
employees, staff, agents of the landlord, and guests;
(ii) An employee who monitors the tenants for compliance with the
requirements of (d) of this subsection;
(iii) Individual and group support for recovery; and
(iv) Access to a specified program of recovery; and
(d) The rental agreement is in writing and includes the following
provisions:
(i) The tenant may not use, possess, or share alcohol, illegal
drugs, controlled substances, or prescription drugs without a medical
prescription, either on or off the premises;
(ii) The tenant may not allow the tenant's guests to use, possess,
or share alcohol, illegal drugs, controlled substances, or prescription
drugs without a medical prescription, on the premises;
(iii) The tenant must participate in a program of recovery, which
specific program is described in the rental agreement;
(iv) On at least a quarterly basis the tenant must provide written
verification from the tenant's program of recovery that the tenant is
participating in the program of recovery and the tenant has not used
alcohol or illegal drugs;
(v) The landlord has the right to require the tenant to take a
urine analysis test regarding drug or alcohol usage, at the landlord's
discretion and expense; and
(vi) The landlord has the right to terminate the tenant's tenancy
by delivering a three-day notice to terminate with one day to comply,
if a tenant living in drug and alcohol free housing uses, possesses, or
shares alcohol, illegal drugs, controlled substances, or prescription
drugs without a medical prescription.
(2) For the purpose of this section, "program of recovery" means a
verifiable program of counseling and rehabilitation treatment services,
including a written plan, to assist recovering alcoholics or drug
addicts to recover from their addiction to alcohol or illegal drugs
while living in drug and alcohol free housing. A "program of recovery"
includes Alcoholics Anonymous, Narcotics Anonymous, and similar
programs.
(3) If a tenant living for less than two years in drug and alcohol
free housing uses, possesses, or shares alcohol, illegal drugs,
controlled substances, or prescription drugs without a medical
prescription, the landlord may deliver a written notice to the tenant
terminating the tenancy for cause as provided in this subsection. The
notice must specify the acts constituting the drug or alcohol violation
and must state that the rental agreement terminates in not less than
three days after delivery of the notice, at a specified date and time.
The notice must also state that the tenant can cure the drug or alcohol
violation by a change in conduct or otherwise within one day after
delivery of the notice. If the tenant cures the violation within the
one-day period, the rental agreement does not terminate. If the tenant
does not cure the violation within the one-day period, the rental
agreement terminates as provided in the notice. If substantially the
same act that constituted a prior drug or alcohol violation of which
notice was given reoccurs within six months, the landlord may terminate
the rental agreement upon at least three days' written notice
specifying the violation and the date and time of termination of the
rental agreement. The tenant does not have a right to cure this
subsequent violation.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section,
housing that is occupied on other than a transient basis by persons who
are required to abstain from possession or use of alcohol or drugs as
a condition of occupancy and who pay for the use of the housing on a
periodic basis, without regard to whether the payment is characterized
as rent, program fees, or other fees, costs, or charges, are covered by
this chapter.

--- END ---