BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that recreational uses
of the state's rivers and streams is an important and growing activity
in the state. It provides an enjoyable experience that can be shared
by people of all ages. The legislature also finds that there are
dangers inherent to recreational users of the state's rivers and
streams, and that some dangers can be controlled or reduced. The
dangerous accumulation of wood debris is one threat that should be
managed more aggressively in order to reduce the threats to human life.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.55.100 and 2002 c 368 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In the event that any person or government agency desires to
construct any form of hydraulic project or perform other work that will
use, divert, obstruct, or change the natural flow or bed of any of the
salt or fresh waters of the state, such person or government agency
shall, before commencing construction or work thereon and to ensure the
proper protection of fish life, secure the approval of the department
as to the adequacy of the means proposed for the protection of fish
life. This approval shall not be unreasonably withheld or unreasonably
conditioned.
(2)(a) The department shall grant or deny approval of a standard
permit within forty-five calendar days of the receipt of a complete
application and notice of compliance with any applicable requirements
of the state environmental policy act, made in the manner prescribed in
this section. The permit must contain provisions allowing for minor
modifications to the plans and specifications without requiring
reissuance of the permit.
(b) The applicant may document receipt of application by filing in
person or by registered mail. A complete application for approval
shall contain general plans for the overall project, complete plans and
specifications of the proposed construction or work within the mean
higher high water line in salt water or within the ordinary high water
line in fresh water, and complete plans and specifications for the
proper protection of fish life.
(c) The forty-five day requirement shall be suspended if:
(i) After ten working days of receipt of the application, the
applicant remains unavailable or unable to arrange for a timely field
evaluation of the proposed project;
(ii) The site is physically inaccessible for inspection; or
(iii) The applicant requests delay. Immediately upon determination
that the forty-five day period is suspended, the department shall
notify the applicant in writing of the reasons for the delay.
(d) For purposes of this section, "standard permit" means a written
permit issued by the department when the conditions under subsections
(3) and (5)(b) of this section are not met.
(3)(a) The department may issue an expedited written permit in
those instances where normal permit processing would result in
significant hardship for the applicant or unacceptable damage to the
environment. In cases of imminent danger, the department shall issue
an expedited written permit, upon request, for work to repair existing
structures, move obstructions, restore banks, protect property, or
protect fish resources. Expedited permit requests require a complete
written application as provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section
and shall be issued within fifteen calendar days of the receipt of a
complete written application. Approval of an expedited permit is valid
for up to sixty days from the date of issuance.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "imminent danger" means a
threat by weather, water flow, or other natural conditions that is
likely to occur within sixty days of a request for a permit
application.
(c) The department may not require the provisions of the state
environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, to be met as a condition
of issuing a permit under this subsection.
(d) The department or the county legislative authority may
determine if an imminent danger exists. The county legislative
authority shall notify the department, in writing, if it determines
that an imminent danger exists.
(4) Approval of a standard permit is valid for a period of up to
five years from date of issuance. The permittee must demonstrate
substantial progress on construction of that portion of the project
relating to the approval within two years of the date of issuance. If
the department denies approval, the department shall provide the
applicant, in writing, a statement of the specific reasons why and how
the proposed project would adversely affect fish life. Protection of
fish life shall be the only ground upon which approval may be denied or
conditioned. Chapter 34.05 RCW applies to any denial of project
approval, conditional approval, or requirements for project
modification upon which approval may be contingent.
(5)(a) In case of an emergency arising from weather or stream flow
conditions, the deposition of wood debris that poses a threat to
recreational users of a waterbody, or other natural conditions, the
department, through its authorized representatives, shall issue
immediately, upon request, oral approval for removing any obstructions,
repairing existing structures, restoring stream banks, or to protect
property threatened by the stream or a change in the stream flow
without the necessity of obtaining a written approval prior to
commencing work. Conditions of an oral approval to protect fish life
shall be established by the department and reduced to writing within
thirty days and complied with as provided for in this section. Oral
approval shall be granted immediately, upon request, for a stream
crossing during an emergency situation.
(b) For purposes of this section and RCW 77.55.110, "emergency"
means an immediate threat to life, the public, property, or of
environmental degradation.
(c) The department or the county legislative authority may declare
and continue an emergency when one or more of the criteria under (b) of
this subsection are met. The county legislative authority shall
immediately notify the department if it declares an emergency under
this subsection.
(6) The department shall, at the request of a county, develop five-year maintenance approval agreements, consistent with comprehensive
flood control management plans adopted under the authority of RCW
86.12.200, or other watershed plan approved by a county legislative
authority, to allow for work on public and private property for bank
stabilization, bridge repair, removal of sand bars and debris, channel
maintenance, and other flood damage repair and reduction activity under
agreed-upon conditions and times without obtaining permits for specific
projects.
(7) This section shall not apply to the construction of any form of
hydraulic project or other work which diverts water for agricultural
irrigation or stock watering purposes authorized under or recognized as
being valid by the state's water codes, or when such hydraulic project
or other work is associated with streambank stabilization to protect
farm and agricultural land as defined in RCW 84.34.020. These
irrigation or stock watering diversion and streambank stabilization
projects shall be governed by RCW 77.55.110.
A landscape management plan approved by the department and the
department of natural resources under RCW 76.09.350(2), shall serve as
a hydraulic project approval for the life of the plan if fish are
selected as one of the public resources for coverage under such a plan.
(8) For the purposes of this section and RCW 77.55.110, "bed" means
the land below the ordinary high water lines of state waters. This
definition does not include irrigation ditches, canals, storm water
run-off devices, or other artificial watercourses except where they
exist in a natural watercourse that has been altered by man.
(9) The phrase "to construct any form of hydraulic project or
perform other work" does not include the act of driving across an
established ford. Driving across streams or on wetted stream beds at
areas other than established fords requires approval. Work within the
ordinary high water line of state waters to construct or repair a ford
or crossing requires approval.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 79.90 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall authorize property owners to remove stream
depositions of logs, uprooted tree snags, and stumps that abut on
shorelands if the removal will:
(1) Reduce an intrusion on the navigational channel;
(2) Correct an adverse redirection of a river course; or
(3) Remove a serious threat to recreational users of a waterbody.

--- END ---