BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.10.020 and 2001 c 328 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Alternative public works contracting procedure" means the
design-build and the general contractor/construction manager
contracting procedures authorized in RCW 39.10.051 and 39.10.061,
respectively.
(2) "Public body" means the state department of general
administration; the University of Washington; Washington State
University; every city with a population greater than seventy thousand
and any public authority chartered by such city under RCW 35.21.730
through 35.21.755 and specifically authorized as provided in RCW
39.10.120(4); every county with a population greater than four hundred
fifty thousand; every port district with total revenues greater than
fifteen million dollars per year; every public utility district with
revenues from energy sales greater than twenty-three million dollars
per year; ((and)) those school districts proposing projects that are
considered and approved by the school district project review board
under RCW 39.10.115; and the department of transportation state ferry
system.
(3) "Public works project" means any work for a public body within
the definition of the term public work in RCW 39.04.010.

--- END ---