BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 8.25.120 and 1969 ex.s. c 236 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) When making an initial offer to purchase land, real estate,
premises, or other property or property rights, an agency's offer may
be accompanied by a written appraisal or a written explanation of the
basis and method upon which the agency relied in establishing the
amount of just compensation offered to a property owner. The property
owner may provide an appraisal or a written explanation of the basis
and method for the property owner's opinion of value to the agency.
(2) Appraisals or written explanations of the basis and method by
which a party's offers were made, as provided under subsection (1) of
this section, are provided solely for settlement purposes and are not
admissible as evidence for any purpose after the commencement of a
condemnation action, except that a party may offer its own appraisal
information in any proceeding.
(3) After the commencement of a condemnation action, upon motion of
either the condemnor or condemnee, the court may order, upon such terms
and conditions as are fair and equitable, the production and exchange
of the written conclusions of all the appraisers of the parties as to
just compensation owed to the condemnee, as prepared for the purpose of
the condemnation action, and the comparable sales, if any, used by such
appraisers. The court shall enter such order only after assurance that
there will be mutual, reciprocal, and contemporaneous disclosures of
similar information between the parties.

--- END ---