BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 8.26.035 and 1988 c 90 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Whenever a program or project to be undertaken by a displacing
agency will result in the displacement of any person, the displacing
agency shall provide for the payment to the displaced person of:
(a) Actual reasonable expenses in moving himself or herself, or his
or her family, business, farm operation, or other personal property;
(b) Actual direct losses of tangible personal property as a result
of moving or discontinuing a business or farm operation, but not to
exceed an amount equal to the reasonable expenses that would have been
required to relocate the property, in accordance with criteria
established by the lead agency;
(c) Actual reasonable expenses in searching for a replacement
business or farm; and
(d) Actual reasonable expenses necessary to reestablish a displaced
farm, nonprofit organization, or small business at its new site, in
accordance with criteria established by the lead agency((, but not to
exceed ten thousand dollars)) that is consistent with federal rules and
regulations.
(2) A displaced person eligible for payments under subsection (1)
of this section who is displaced from a dwelling and who elects to
accept the payments authorized by this subsection in lieu of the
payments authorized by subsection (1) of this section may receive an
expense and dislocation allowance determined according to a schedule
established by the lead agency.
(3) A displaced person eligible for payments under subsection (1)
of this section who is displaced from the person's place of business or
farm operation and who is eligible under criteria established by the
lead agency may elect to accept the payment authorized by this
subsection in lieu of the payment authorized by subsection (1) of this
section. The payment shall consist of a fixed payment in an amount to
be determined according to criteria established by the lead agency,
except that the payment shall be not less than one thousand dollars nor
more than twenty thousand dollars. A person whose sole business at the
displacement dwelling is the rental of that property to others does not
qualify for a payment under this subsection.

--- END ---