BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.52.010 and 1999 c 149 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be a "board of industrial insurance appeals,"
hereinafter called the "board," consisting of three members appointed
by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, as
hereinafter provided. One shall be a representative of the public and
a lawyer, appointed from a mutually agreed to list of not less than
three active or judicial members of the Washington state bar
association, submitted to the governor by the two organizations defined
below, and such member shall be the chairperson of said board. The
second member shall be a representative of the majority of workers
engaged in employment under this title and selected from a list of not
less than three names submitted to the governor by an organization,
statewide in scope, which through its affiliates embraces a cross
section and a majority of the organized labor of the state. The third
member shall be a representative of employers under this title, and
appointed from a list of at least three names submitted to the governor
by a recognized statewide organization of employers, representing a
majority of employers. The initial terms of office of the members of
the board shall be for six, four, and two years respectively.
Thereafter all terms shall be for a period of six years. Each member
of the board shall be eligible for reappointment and shall hold office
until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. In the event of
a vacancy the governor is authorized to appoint a successor to fill the
unexpired term of his or her predecessor. All appointments to the
board shall be made in conformity with the foregoing plan. In the
event a board member becomes incapacitated in excess of thirty days
either due to his or her illness or that of an immediate family member
as determined by a request for family leave or as certified by the
affected member's treating physician, the governor shall appoint an
acting member to serve pro tem. Such an appointment shall be made in
conformity with the foregoing plan, except that the list of candidates
shall be submitted to the governor not more than fifteen days after the
affected organizations are notified of the incapacity and the governor
shall make the appointment within fifteen days after the list is
submitted. The temporary member shall serve until such time as the
affected member is able to reassume his or her duties by returning from
requested family leave or as determined by the treating physician or
until the affected member's term expires, whichever occurs first.
Whenever the workload of the board and its orderly and expeditious
disposition shall necessitate, the governor may appoint two additional
pro-tem members in addition to the regular members. Such appointments
shall be for a definite period of time, and shall be made from lists
submitted respectively by labor and industry as in the case of regular
members. One pro-tem member shall be a representative of labor and one
shall be a representative of industry. Members shall devote their
entire time to the duties of the board and shall receive for their
services a salary as fixed by the governor in accordance with the
provisions of RCW 43.03.040 which shall be in addition to travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing
or hereafter amended. Headquarters for the board shall be located in
Olympia. The board shall adopt a seal which shall be judicially
recognized.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.52.104 and 1985 c 314 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
After all evidence has been presented at hearings conducted by an
industrial appeals judge, who shall be an active or judicial member of
the Washington state bar association, the industrial appeals judge
shall enter a proposed or recommended decision and order which shall be
in writing and shall contain findings and conclusions as to each
contested issue of fact and law, as well as the order based thereon.
The industrial appeals judge shall file the signed original of the
proposed decision and order with the board, and copies thereof shall be
mailed by the board to each party to the appeal and to each party's
attorney or representative of record. Within twenty days, or such
further time as the board may allow on written application of a party,
filed within said twenty days from the date of communication of the
proposed decision and order to the parties or their attorneys or
representatives of record, any party may file with the board a written
petition for review of the same. Filing of a petition for review is
perfected by mailing or personally delivering the petition to the
board's offices in Olympia. Such petition for review shall set forth
in detail the grounds therefor and the party or parties filing the same
shall be deemed to have waived all objections or irregularities not
specifically set forth therein.
In the event no petition for review is filed as provided herein by
any party, the proposed decision and order of the industrial appeals
judge shall be adopted by the board and become the decision and order
of the board, and no appeal may be taken therefrom to the courts. If
an order adopting the proposed decision and order is not formally
signed by the board on the day following the date the petition for
review of the proposed decision and order is due, said proposed
decision and order shall be deemed adopted by the board and become the
decision and order of the board, and no appeal may be taken therefrom
to the courts.

--- END ---