BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.15.380 and 1993 sp.s. c 18 s 10 are each amended
to read as follows:
Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards
of the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen
State College may exempt the following students from the payment of all
or a portion of undergraduate tuition fees and services and activities
fees:
(1) All veterans as defined in RCW 41.04.005: PROVIDED, That such
persons are no longer entitled to federal vocational or educational
benefits conferred by virtue of their military service: AND PROVIDED
FURTHER, That if any such veterans have not resided in this state for
one year prior to registration, the board may exempt the student from
paying up to fifty percent of the nonresident tuition fees
differential. Such exemptions may be provided only to those persons
otherwise covered who were enrolled in universities on or before
October 1, 1977.
(2) The surviving spouse and children of any law enforcement
officer or fire fighter who lost his or her life or became totally
disabled in the line of duty while employed by any public law
enforcement agency or full time or volunteer fire department in this
state: PROVIDED, That ((such persons)) children may receive the
exemption only if they begin their course of study at a state-supported
college or university within ten years of their graduation from high
school.

--- END ---