BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.230.010 and 1990 c 33 s 237 are each amended to
read as follows:
School district boards of directors shall identify and offer
courses with content that meet or exceed:
(1) The basic education skills identified in RCW 28A.150.210;
(2) The graduation requirements under RCW 28A.230.090; ((and))
(3) The courses required to meet the minimum college entrance
requirements under RCW 28A.230.130; and
(4) The course options for career development under RCW
28A.230.130.
Such courses may be applied or theoretical, academic, or
vocational.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.230.130 and 1991 c 116 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All school districts with public high schools ((of the state))
shall provide ((a program)), directly or in cooperation with a
community or technical college, a skills center, an apprenticeship
committee, or another school district, the opportunity for students to
take the following courses of study:
(a) A course of study for students whose educational plans include
application for entrance to a baccalaureate-granting institution after
being granted a high school diploma. The program shall help these
students to meet at least the minimum entrance requirements under RCW
28B.10.050;
(b) A course of study for students whose educational plans include
the pursuit of a professional or technical certificate or degree that
requires less than four years of postsecondary education; and
(c) A course of study for students who are planning to defer
further educational plans and enter the world of work upon graduation
from high school.
(2) The courses of study provided under subsection (1)(b) and (c)
of this section shall:
(a) Help students demonstrate the application of essential academic
learning requirements to the world of work, occupation-specific skills,
knowledge of more than one career within their chosen pathway, and
employability and leadership skills; and/or
(b) Help students demonstrate the knowledge and skill needed to
prepare for industry certification upon completion of the program,
and/or have the opportunity to articulate to postsecondary education
and training programs related to their secondary program.
(((2))) (3) The state board of education, upon request from local
school districts, may grant ((temporary exemptions)) waivers from the
requirements to provide the program described in subsection (1) of this
section for reasons relating to school district size and the
availability of staff authorized to teach subjects which must be
provided.

--- END ---