BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the use of
anatomical gifts, including the donation of organ or tissue, for the
purpose of transplantation is of great interest to the citizens of
Washington state and may save or prolong the life or improve the health
of extremely ill and dying persons.
The legislature further finds that more than eighty thousand people
are currently waiting for life-saving organ transplants on the national
transplant waiting list. More than one thousand two hundred of these
people are listed at Washington state transplant centers. Seventeen
people die each day as a result of the shortage of donated organs.
The creation of a statewide organ and tissue donor registry is
crucial to facilitate timely and successful organ and tissue
procurement. The legislature further finds that continuing education
as to the existence and maintenance of a statewide organ and tissue
donor registry is in the best interest of the people of the state of
Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 68.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of licensing shall electronically transfer to
the organ procurement organization designated by the United States
department of health and human services to serve Washington state all
information that appears on the front of a driver's license or
identicard including the name, gender, date of birth, and most recent
address of any person who obtains a driver's license or identicard who
volunteers to donate organs or tissue upon death. All subsequent
electronic transfers of donor information shall be at no charge to the
federally designated organ procurement organization.
(2) Information obtained by the federally designated organ
procurement organization shall be used for the purpose of establishing
a statewide organ and tissue donor registry accessible to in-state
recognized cadaveric organ and cadaveric tissue agencies for the
recovery or placement of organs and tissue and to procurement agencies
in another state when a Washington state resident is a donor of an
anatomical gift and is not located in this state at the time of death
or immediately before the death of the donor.
(3) No organ or tissue donation organization may obtain information
from the organ and tissue donor registry for the purposes of fund
raising. Organ and tissue donor registry information may not be
further disseminated unless authorized in this section or by federal
law. Dissemination of organ and tissue donor registry information may
be made by the organ procurement organization to a recognized in-state
procurement agency for other tissue recovery, or an out-of-state
federally designated organ procurement organization.
(4) The federally designated organ procurement organization may
acquire donor information from sources other than the department of
licensing.
(5) All reasonable costs associated with the creation and
maintenance of the organ and tissue donor registry shall be paid by
Washington state organ procurement organizations.
(6) Moneys from the organ and tissue donation awareness account,
created in section 6 of this act, shall be transferred to the
department of licensing for the reasonable costs associated with the
initial installation and setup for electronic transfer of the donor
information and for other costs as required by section 7 of this act.
(7) For the purposes of subsections (5) and (6) of this section,
reasonable costs include: (a) Programming and software installation
and upgrades; (b) employee training that is specific to the organ and
tissue donor registry; (c) literature that is specific to the organ and
tissue donor registry; and (d) hardware upgrades or other issues
important to the organ and tissue donor registry that have been
mutually agreed upon in advance by the department and the organ
procurement organization.
(8) An individual does not need to participate in the organ and
tissue donor registry to be a donor of organs or tissue. The registry
is to facilitate organ and tissue donations and not inhibit persons
from being donors upon death.

Sec. 3 RCW 68.50.540 and 1995 c 132 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An individual who is at least eighteen years of age, or an
individual who is at least sixteen years of age as provided in
subsection (12) of this section, may (a) make an anatomical gift for
any of the purposes stated in RCW 68.50.570(1), (b) limit an anatomical
gift to one or more of those purposes, or (c) refuse to make an
anatomical gift.
(2) An anatomical gift may be made by a document of gift signed by
the donor. If the donor cannot sign, the document of gift must be
signed by another individual and by two witnesses, all of whom have
signed at the direction and in the presence of the donor and of each
other and state that it has been so signed.
(3) If a document of gift is attached to or imprinted on a donor's
motor vehicle operator's license, the document of gift must comply with
subsection (2) of this section. Revocation, suspension, expiration, or
cancellation of the license does not invalidate the anatomical gift.
(4) The donee or other person authorized to accept the anatomical
gift may employ or authorize a physician, surgeon, technician, or
enucleator to carry out the appropriate procedures.
(5) An anatomical gift by will takes effect upon death of the
testator, whether or not the will is probated. If, after death, the
will is declared invalid for testamentary purposes, the validity of the
anatomical gift is unaffected.
(6)(a) A donor may amend or revoke an anatomical gift, not made by
will, by:
(((a))) (i) A signed statement;
(((b))) (ii) An oral statement made in the presence of two
individuals;
(((c))) (iii) Any form of communication during a terminal illness
or injury; or
(((d))) (iv) The delivery of a signed statement to a specified
donee to whom a document of gift had been delivered.
(b) A donor shall notify the organ procurement organization
designated by the United States department of health and human services
to serve Washington state of the destruction, cancellation, or
mutilation of the document of gift for the purpose of removing the
person's name from the organ and tissue donor registry created in
section 2 of this act.
(7) The donor of an anatomical gift made by will may amend or
revoke the gift in the manner provided for amendment or revocation of
wills, or as provided in subsection (6) of this section.
(8) An anatomical gift that is not revoked by the donor before
death is irrevocable and does not require the consent or concurrence of
a person after the donor's death.
(9) An individual may refuse to make an anatomical gift of the
individual's body or part by (a) a writing signed in the same manner as
a document of gift, (b) a statement attached to or imprinted on a
donor's motor vehicle operator's license, or (c) another writing used
to identify the individual as refusing to make an anatomical gift.
During a terminal illness or injury, the refusal may be an oral
statement or other form of communication.
(10) In the absence of contrary indications by the donor, an
anatomical gift of a part is neither a refusal to give other parts nor
a limitation on an anatomical gift under RCW 68.50.550.
(11) In the absence of contrary indications by the donor, a
revocation or amendment of an anatomical gift is not a refusal to make
another anatomical gift. If the donor intends a revocation to be a
refusal to make an anatomical gift, the donor shall make the refusal
pursuant to subsection (9) of this section.
(12) An individual who is under the age of eighteen, but is at
least sixteen years of age, may make an anatomical gift as provided by
subsection (2) of this section, if the document of gift is also signed
by either parent or a guardian of the donor. A document of gift signed
by a donor under the age of eighteen that is not signed by either
parent or a guardian shall not be considered valid until the person
reaches the age of eighteen, but may be considered as evidence that the
donor has not refused permission to make an anatomical gift under the
provisions of RCW 68.50.550.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall electronically transfer the information of all
persons who upon application for a driver's license or identicard
volunteer to donate organs or tissue to the registry created in section
2 of this act, and any subsequent changes to the applicant's donor
status when the applicant renews a driver's license or identicard or
applies for a new driver's license or identicard.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 46.12 RCW
to read as follows:
An applicant for a new or renewed registration for a vehicle
required to be registered under this chapter or chapter 46.16 RCW may
make a donation of one dollar or more to the organ and tissue donation
awareness account to promote the donation of organs and tissues under
the provisions of the uniform anatomical gift act, RCW 68.50.520
through 68.50.630. The department shall collect the donations and
credit the donations to the organ and tissue donation awareness
account, created in section 6 of this act. At least quarterly, the
department shall transmit donations made to the organ and tissue
donation awareness account to the foundation established for organ and
tissue donor awareness purposes by the organ procurement organization
designated by the United States department of health and human services
to serve Washington state. The donation of one or more dollars is
voluntary and may be refused by the applicant. The department shall
make available informational booklets or other informational sources on
the importance of organ and tissue donations to applicants.
The department shall inquire of each applicant at the time the
completed application is presented whether the applicant is interested
in making a donation of one dollar or more and shall also specifically
inform the applicant of the option for organ and tissue donations as
required by RCW 46.20.113. The department shall also provide written
information to each applicant volunteering to become an organ and
tissue donor. The written information shall disclose that the
applicant's name shall be transmitted to the organ and tissue donor
registry created in section 2 of this act, and that the applicant shall
notify the federally designated organ procurement organization of any
changes to the applicant's donor status.
All reasonable costs associated with the creation and maintenance
of the donation program created under this section must be paid by
Washington state organ procurement organizations. For the purposes of
this section, reasonable costs include: (1) Programming and software
installation and upgrades; (2) employee training that is specific to
the donation program created under this section; (3) literature that is
specific to the donation program created under this section; and (4)
hardware upgrades or other issues important to the donation program
created under this section that have been mutually agreed upon in
advance by the department and the organ procurement organization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 68.50 RCW
to read as follows:
The organ and tissue donation awareness account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from donations made under
section 5 of this act, and other contributions and appropriations
specifically made for the purposes of organ and tissue donor awareness,
shall be deposited into the account. Money from the account may be
used only for organ and tissue donor awareness programs and for those
costs set out in section 2 (5) and (6) of this act. The account is not
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW and an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 68.50 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of licensing shall submit a request to the
legislature covering the reasonable costs associated with the ongoing
maintenance of the organ and tissue donor registry and the donation
program established in section 5 of this act. The legislature shall
appropriate an amount it deems reasonable from the organ and tissue
donation awareness account, created in section 6 of this act, to the
department of licensing for these purposes. For the purposes of this
section, reasonable costs include: (1) Programming and software
installation and upgrades; (2) employee training that is specific to
the organ and tissue donor registry or the donation program created in
section 5 of this act; (3) literature that is specific to the organ and
tissue donor registry or the donation program created in section 5 of
this act; and (4) hardware upgrades or other issues important to the
organ and tissue donor registry or the donation program created in
section 5 of this act that have been mutually agreed upon in advance by
the department of licensing and the organ procurement organization.
At least quarterly, the department of licensing shall transmit the
remaining funds from the organ and tissue donation awareness account to
the foundation established for organ and tissue donor awareness
purposes by the organ procurement organization designated by the United
States department of health and human services to serve Washington
state for the costs associated with educating the public about the
organ and tissue donor registry and related organ and tissue donation
education programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Section 5 of this act takes effect January
1, 2004.

--- END ---