BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds it is constrained by
the budget deficit and the lack of revenue, as are the long-term care
providers that Washington state contracts with to provide services to
state clients. Although the state has been unable to keep up with the
cost of inflation in long-term care, the state has continued to
increase the amount and the cost of compliance with rules. While most
rules are well-meaning and intended to assure quality of care, the
state cannot assure quality of care through rule alone. Additionally
as the cost of complying with rules increases and the state payment for
long-term care does not keep pace with these increasing costs, the
private-pay residents ultimately pay more than their share.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.20.090 and 1985 c 213 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt, amend, and promulgate such rules,
regulations, and standards with respect to all boarding homes and
operators thereof to be licensed hereunder as may be designed to
further the accomplishment of the purposes of this chapter in promoting
safe and adequate care of individuals in boarding homes and the
sanitary, hygienic and safe conditions of the boarding home in the
interest of public health, safety, and welfare.
(2) Beginning the effective date of this act, the department shall
not adopt any new or additional rules that increase the cost of
compliance for boarding homes unless the department repeals rules of
equal or greater compliance costs.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.51.070 and 1979 ex.s. c 211 s 64 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The department, after consultation with the nursing home
advisory council and the board of health, shall adopt, amend, and
promulgate such rules, regulations, and standards with respect to all
nursing homes to be licensed hereunder as may be designed to further
the accomplishment of the purposes of this chapter in promoting safe
and adequate medical and nursing care of individuals in nursing homes
and the sanitary, hygienic and safe conditions of the nursing home in
the interest of public health, safety, and welfare.
(2) Beginning the effective date of this act, the department shall
not adopt any new or additional rules that increase the cost of
compliance for nursing homes unless the department repeals rules of
equal or greater compliance costs. The department may adopt rules to
comply with mandates of the federal government affecting nursing homes,
but the department may not exceed the mandate of the federal
legislation or rule.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.128.040 and 1995 c 260 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt rules and standards with respect to
adult family homes and the operators thereof to be licensed under this
chapter to carry out the purposes and requirements of this chapter.
The rules and standards relating to applicants and operators shall
address the differences between individual providers and providers that
are partnerships, corporations, associations, or companies. The rules
and standards shall also recognize and be appropriate to the different
needs and capacities of the various populations served by adult family
homes such as but not limited to the developmentally disabled and the
elderly. In developing rules and standards the department shall
recognize the residential family-like nature of adult family homes and
not develop rules and standards which by their complexity serve as an
overly restrictive barrier to the development of the adult family homes
in the state. Procedures and forms established by the department shall
be developed so they are easy to understand and comply with. Paper
work requirements shall be minimal. Easy to understand materials shall
be developed for applicants and providers explaining licensure
requirements and procedures.
(2) In developing the rules and standards, the department shall
consult with all divisions and administrations within the department
serving the various populations living in adult family homes, including
the division of developmental disabilities and the aging and adult
services administration. Involvement by the divisions and
administration shall be for the purposes of assisting the department to
develop rules and standards appropriate to the different needs and
capacities of the various populations served by adult family homes.
During the initial stages of development of proposed rules, the
department shall provide notice of development of the rules to
organizations representing adult family homes and their residents, and
other groups that the department finds appropriate. The notice shall
state the subject of the rules under consideration and solicit written
recommendations regarding their form and content.
(3) Except where provided otherwise, chapter 34.05 RCW shall govern
all department rule-making and adjudicative activities under this
chapter.
(4) Beginning the effective date of this act, the department shall
not adopt any new or additional rules that increase the cost of
compliance for adult family homes unless the department repeals rules
of equal or greater compliance costs.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.08.090 and 1969 ex.s. c 173 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department is hereby authorized to make rules and
regulations not inconsistent with the provisions of this title to the
end that this title shall be administered uniformly throughout the
state, and that the spirit and purpose of this title may be complied
with. The department shall have the power to compel compliance with
the rules and regulations established by it. Such rules and
regulations shall be filed in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act, as it is now or hereafter amended, and copies shall be
available for public inspection in the office of the department and in
each county office.
(2) Beginning the effective date of this act, the department shall
not adopt any new or additional rules that increase the cost of
compliance for adult day health or adult day care programs unless the
department repeals rules of equal or greater compliance costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---