BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.85.020 and 1994 c 249 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply through this chapter.
(1) "Small business" means any business entity, including a sole
proprietorship, corporation, partnership, or other legal entity, that
is owned and operated independently from all other businesses, ((that
has the purpose of making a profit,)) and that has fifty or fewer
employees.
(2) "Small business economic impact statement" means a statement
meeting the requirements of RCW 19.85.040 prepared by a state agency
pursuant to RCW 19.85.030.
(3) "Industry" means all of the businesses in this state in any one
four-digit standard industrial classification as published by the
United States department of commerce. However, if the use of a four-
digit standard industrial classification would result in the release of
data that would violate state confidentiality laws, "industry" means
all businesses in a three-digit standard industrial classification.

--- END ---