BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.33.010 and 1981 c 96 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state or any municipality or any political subdivision
thereof, may sell, transfer, exchange, lease or otherwise dispose of
any property, real or personal, or property rights, including but not
limited to the title to real property, to the state or any municipality
or any political subdivision thereof, or the federal government, on
such terms and conditions as may be mutually agreed upon by the proper
authorities of the state and/or the subdivisions concerned. In
addition, the state, or any municipality or any political subdivision
thereof, may sell, transfer, exchange, lease, or otherwise dispose of
personal property, except weapons, to a foreign entity.
(2) This section shall be deemed to provide an alternative method
for the doing of the things authorized herein, and shall not be
construed as imposing any additional condition upon the exercise of any
other powers vested in the state, municipalities or political
subdivisions.
(3) No intergovernmental transfer, lease, or other disposition of
property made pursuant to any other provision of law prior to May 23,
1972, shall be construed to be invalid solely because the parties
thereto did not comply with the procedures of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---