BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.08.150 and 1989 c 175 s 122 are each amended to
read as follows:
The action, order, or decision of the board as to any denial of an
application for the reissuance of a permit or license or as to any
revocation, suspension, or modification of any permit or license shall
be an adjudicative proceeding and subject to the applicable provisions
of chapter 34.05 RCW.
(1) An opportunity for a hearing may be provided an applicant for
the reissuance of a permit or license prior to the disposition of the
application, and if no such opportunity for a prior hearing is provided
then an opportunity for a hearing to reconsider the application must be
provided the applicant.
(2) An opportunity for a hearing must be provided a permittee or
licensee prior to a revocation or modification of any permit or license
and, except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, prior to the
suspension of any permit or license.
(3) No hearing shall be required until demanded by the applicant,
permittee, or licensee.
(4) The board may summarily suspend a license or permit for a
period of up to ((thirty)) one hundred eighty days without a prior
hearing if it finds that public health, safety, or welfare imperatively
require emergency action, and incorporates a finding to that effect in
its order; and proceedings for revocation or other action must be
promptly instituted and determined.

--- END ---