BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Subject to this section, in addition to
members eligible to retire under RCW 41.40.180, any member of the
public employees' retirement system plan 1 who meets the following
criteria may retire after providing written notification to the
member's employer and submitting the required application to the
director on a form provided by the department:
(1) The member is employed by an employer on March 1, 2003.
(2)(a) A member eligible under subsection (1) of this section must
file an application between June 15, 2003, and August 31, 2003, with an
effective date of retirement on or before September 30, 2003.
(b) In addition to any other years of creditable service, for every
five years of actual service the member may be granted credit for one
additional year of service. Under no circumstances may more than
thirty years of service credit be established.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act is added to chapter
41.40 RCW, but because of its temporary nature, shall not be codified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Subject to this section, in addition to
members eligible to retire under RCW 41.40.630, any member of the
public employees' retirement system plan 2 who meets the following
criteria may retire after providing written notification to the
member's employer and submitting the required application to the
director on a form provided by the department:
(1) The member is employed by an employer on March 1, 2003.
(2)(a) A member eligible under subsection (1) of this section must
file an application between June 15, 2003, and August 31, 2003, with an
effective date of retirement on or before September 30, 2003.
(b) In addition to any other years of creditable service, for every
five years of actual service the member may be granted credit for one
additional year of service. Under no circumstances may more than
thirty years of service credit be established.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 3 of this act is added to chapter
41.40 RCW, but because of its temporary nature, shall not be codified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 In order to ensure that the state derives
the expected benefits from the early retirement provisions of this act,
no state agency may hire persons who retire from service under the
provisions of this act as temporary or project employees, as defined by
the Washington personnel resources board for employees covered under
chapter 41.06 RCW. Exceptions to this section may be granted by
written approval from the director of financial management if the
director finds that the temporary or project employment of a retiree is
necessary to protect the public safety, protect against the loss of
federal certification or loss of critical federal funds, or carry out
functions so essential to the agency that even temporary suspension or
delay of services would have a significant negative impact on the
public. This section expires June 30, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 5 of this act is added to chapter
43.01 RCW, but because of its temporary nature, shall not be codified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 In order to ensure that the state derives
the expected benefits from the early retirement provisions of this act,
no state agency may engage through personal service contracts persons
who retire from service under the provisions of this act. Exceptions
to this section may be granted by written approval from the director of
the office of financial management if the director finds that the
proposed contract is necessary to protect the public safety, protect
against the loss of federal certification or loss of critical federal
funds, or carry out functions so essential to the agency that even
temporary suspension or delay of services would have a significant
negative impact on the public. At the end of each three-month period
in which exceptions are approved, the director shall forward a copy of
any approvals, together with justification for the exceptions, to the
fiscal committees of the legislature. Each forwarded approval shall
include the name of the proposed contractor, the agency and division or
department requesting the contract, duration and cost of the proposed
contract, and specific functions and duties to be carried out under the
contract. This section expires June 30, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Section 7 of this act is added to chapter
39.29 RCW, but because of its temporary nature, shall not be codified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---