BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that violations of the
hydraulic code may range from relatively minor infractions to serious
offenses. Many of the more serious offenses result in destruction of
fish life and habitat because work is being conducted in an improper
way, or at the incorrect time of the year. The legislature recognizes
that, given the wide range in violations, the department of fish and
wildlife needs a range of enforcement authorities. Minor offenses need
to be dealt with as infractions with accompanying small fines, while
serious offenses need to be prosecuted as gross misdemeanors. The
legislature also recognizes that, when violations lead to destruction
of fish life and habitat, such actions must be expeditiously
terminated, and that the violator must remediate the nonconforming
site. The legislature finds, however, that current law does not
adequately provide the department the range of regulatory tools needed
to achieve these goals. While there are appropriate provisions under
RCW 77.15.300 for gross misdemeanors there are no provisions for
issuing orders to stop work and to remediate at nonconforming sites.
Furthermore, the legislature finds that the current law to levy civil
penalties, found at RCW 77.55.140, has proven to be cumbersome and
ineffectual in dealing with minor offenses. Therefore, the legislature
seeks to provide the department with an increased range of enforcement
authorities by directing that minor offenses be efficiently dealt with
as civil infractions, and that orders may be issued to promptly stop
work and provide for remediation at sites where violations of the
hydraulic code are leading to the destruction of fish life and habitat.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If any person or government agency fails to follow the
requirements of obtaining hydraulic project approval under this chapter
or fails to carry out any of the requirements or conditions of a
hydraulic project approval issued under this chapter, the department
may issue an order to that person or government agency. The order may
require the person or government agency to stop work on any or all of
the activities subject to the hydraulic project approval, to correct or
to restore the nonconforming site, or to both stop work and to correct
or to restore the nonconforming site. Within twenty days of service of
such an order or as provided by rule of the department extending such
time, the person may file a written petition with the department
appealing the order, and this petition shall be treated as an
application for an adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW. In
the event of an appeal, a person or government agency may seek interim
relief from an order under this section as provided in chapter 34.05
RCW.
(2) The department may adopt rules to designate that certain
violations of the terms or conditions of hydraulic project approval are
an infraction to be punished as provided by RCW 77.15.160. Any
punishment under chapter 77.15 RCW shall be supplemental to the remedy
provided by subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.15.300 and 2000 c 107 s 239 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawfully undertaking hydraulic project
activities if the person:
(a) Constructs any form of hydraulic project or performs other work
on a hydraulic project and((:
(a))) fails to have a hydraulic project approval required under
chapter 77.55 RCW for such construction or work; ((or))
(b) Violates any requirements or conditions of the hydraulic
project approval for such construction or work;
(c) Violates any stop work or correction order issued under section
2 of this act; or
(d) Violates any rule governing hydraulic project activities
addressed in a pamphlet that serves as a hydraulic project approval.
(2) Unlawfully undertaking hydraulic project activities is a gross
misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RCW 77.55.140 (Hydraulic projects--Civil
penalty) and 2000 c 107 s 19, 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 35, 1988 c 36 s 35, &
1986 c 173 s 6 are each repealed.

--- END ---