BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 2.56 RCW
to read as follows:
The office of the administrator for the courts is encouraged to
conduct performance audits of courts under the authority of the supreme
court, in conformity with criteria and methods developed by the board
for judicial administration that have been approved by the supreme
court. In developing criteria and methods for conducting performance
audits, the board for judicial administration is encouraged to consider
quality improvement programs, audits, and scoring. The judicial branch
is encouraged to submit the results of these efforts to the chief
justice of the supreme court or his or her designee, and with any other
applicable boards or committees established under the authority of the
supreme court to oversee government accountability.

--- END ---