BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.175 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state economic development commission is
established to oversee the economic development strategies and policies
of the department of community, trade, and economic development.
(2) The Washington state economic development commission shall
consist of at least eleven and no more than fifteen members appointed
by the governor, subject to confirmation of the senate.
(a) In making the appointments, the governor shall consult with
organizations that have an interest in economic development, including,
but not limited to, associations, labor organizations, minority
business
associations, tribes, and the chairs of the legislative
committees with jurisdiction over economic development.
(b) No member may serve more than one year without senate
confirmation.
(c) The governor shall select the chair.
(d) The members serve at the pleasure of the governor for six-year
terms. Of the initial members, three must be appointed for two-year
terms, three must be appointed for four-year terms, and the remainder
must be appointed for six-year terms. Thereafter, members must be
appointed for six-year terms.
(e) The members shall represent eastern Washington, central
Washington, southwest Washington, the peninsula, central Puget Sound,
and northern Puget Sound and reflect the state's various business
sectors.
(f) The members shall represent the broad geographic and ethnic
diversity of the state, embody the importance of businesswomen, and
reflect the state's various business and labor sectors. Members of the
commission shall serve statewide interests while preserving their
diverse perspectives, and shall be recognized leaders in their fields
with demonstrated experience in disciplines related to economic
development.
(g) At least seven members must be selected from private businesses
within Washington state, with at least two of those members
representing small businesses.
(h) The members must include two senators and two representatives
from the legislature. The president of the senate shall appoint the
senate members of the commission, and the speaker of the house of
representatives shall appoint the house of representatives members of
the commission. There should be representation from each of the two
largest political parties in the senate and the house of
representatives. Vacancies will be filled from the same political
party and the same house as the member whose seat was vacated. The
appointment process for the vacancy will be accomplished in the same
manner as the initial appointment.
(3) The Washington state economic development commission shall
perform the following duties:
(a) Review and periodically update the state's economic development
strategy and performance measures, and perform an annual evaluation of
the strategy;
(b) Provide policy direction to the department of community, trade,
and economic development;
(c) Identify policies and programs to assist Washington's small
businesses;
(d) Assist the department of community, trade, and economic
development with the procurement and deployment of private funds for
business development, recruitment, and promotion; and
(e) Provide planning and strategic and programmatic direction to
the department of community, trade, and economic development, with
specific emphasis on the following:
(i) Development of strategies that promote business retention,
expansion, and creation within the state;
(ii) Development of strategies that promote the growth and success
of Washington's small businesses;
(iii) Development of marketing strategies for the global
marketplace that promote products and services of the state; and
(iv) Development of strategies to enhance relationships and
cooperation between local governments, economic development councils,
state agencies, and the legislature.
(4) Staffing for the Washington state economic development
commission shall be provided by the department of community, trade, and
economic development or other state agencies as appropriate, and within
existing resources and operations.
(5) Creation of the Washington state economic development
commission shall not be construed to modify any authority or budgetary
responsibility of the governor or the department of community, trade,
and economic development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 43.175.010 (Governor's small business improvement council -- Established -- Membership -- Travel expenses -- Staff support and
administrative assistance) and 1987 c 348 s 6, 1985 c 466 s 62, & 1984
c 282 s 7;
(2) RCW 43.175.020 (Duties) and 1998 c 245 s 53, 1987 c 348 s 7,
1985
c 466 s 63, & 1984 c 282 s 8; and
(3) RCW 43.175.901 (Severability -- 1984 c 282) and 1984 c 282 s 17.

--- END ---