BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.36.020 and 1996 c 54 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall work closely with landowners and tenants
suffering game damage problems to control damage without killing the
animals when practical, to increase the harvest of damage-causing
animals in hunting seasons, and to kill the animals when no other
practical means of damage control is feasible.
If the department receives recurring complaints regarding property
being damaged as described in this section or RCW 77.36.030 from the
owner or tenant of real property, or receives such complaints from
several such owners or tenants in a locale, the commission shall
((consider conducting)) conduct a special hunt or special hunts to
reduce the potential for such damage. The commission shall authorize
either one or two antlerless permits per hunter for special hunts held
in damage areas where qualified department staff, or their designee,
have confirmed six incidents of crop damage by deer or elk.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.12.150 and 1987 c 506 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) By emergency rule only, and in accordance with criteria
established by the commission, the director may close or shorten a
season for game animals, game birds, or game fish, and after a season
has been closed or shortened, may reopen it and reestablish bag limits
on game animals, game birds, or game fish during that season. The
director shall advise the commission of the adoption of emergency
rules. A copy of an emergency rule, certified as a true copy by the
director or by a person authorized in writing by the director to make
the certification, is admissible in court as prima facie evidence of
the adoption and validity of the rule.
(2)(a) If the director finds that game animals have increased in
numbers in an area of the state so that they are damaging public or
private property or over-utilizing their habitat, the commission may
establish a special hunting season and designate the time, area, and
manner of taking and the number and sex of the animals that may be
killed or possessed by a licensed hunter. ((The director shall
determine by random selection the identity of hunters who may hunt
within the area and shall determine the conditions and requirements of
the selection process.)) The director shall include notice of the
special season in the rules establishing open seasons.
(b) When the department receives six complaints concerning damage
to commercial agricultural and horticultural crop production by
wildlife from the owner or tenant of real property, or from several
owners or tenants in a locale, the commission shall conduct a special
hunt or special hunts to reduce the potential for the damage, and shall
authorize either one or two permits per hunter. Each complaint must be
confirmed by qualified department staff, or their designee.
(c) The director shall determine by random selection the identity
of hunters who may hunt within the area of the special hunt and shall
determine the conditions and requirements of the selection process.
Within this process, the department must maintain a list of all persons
holding valid wildlife hunting licenses, arranged by county of
residence, who may hunt deer or elk that are causing damage to crops.
The department must update the list annually and utilize the list when
contacting persons to assist in controlling game damage to crops. The
department must make all reasonable efforts to contact individuals
residing within the county where the hunting of deer or elk will occur
before contacting a person who is not a resident of that county. The
department must randomize the names of people on the list in order to
provide a fair distribution of the hunting opportunities. Hunters who
participate in hunts under this section must report any kills to the
department. The department must include a summary of the wildlife
harvested in these hunts in the annual game management reports it makes
available to the public.

--- END ---