BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 64.44.010 and 1999 c 292 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The words and phrases defined in this section shall have the
following meanings when used in this chapter unless the context clearly
indicates otherwise.
(1) "Authorized contractor" means a person who decontaminates,
demolishes, or disposes of contaminated property as required by this
chapter who is certified by the department as provided for in RCW
64.44.060.
(2) "Contaminated" or "contamination" means polluted by hazardous
chemicals so that the property is unfit for human habitation or use due
to immediate or long-term hazards. Property that at one time was
contaminated but has been satisfactorily decontaminated according to
procedures established by the state board of health is not
"contaminated."
(3) "Hazardous chemicals" means the following substances used in
the manufacture of illegal drugs: (a) Hazardous substances as defined
in RCW 70.105D.020, and (b) precursor substances as defined in RCW
69.43.010 which the state board of health, in consultation with the
state board of pharmacy, has determined present an immediate or long-term health hazard to humans.
(4) "Officer" means a local health officer authorized under
chapters 70.05, 70.08, and 70.46 RCW.
(5) "Property" means any property, site, structure, or part of a
structure which is involved in the unauthorized manufacture or storage
of hazardous chemicals. This includes but is not limited to single-family residences, units of multiplexes, condominiums, apartment
buildings, storage units, boats, motor vehicles including recreational
vehicles and motor homes, trailers, manufactured housing, or any shop,
booth, or garden.

Sec. 2 RCW 64.44.050 and 1999 c 292 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
An owner of contaminated property who desires to have the property
decontaminated shall use the services of an authorized contractor
unless otherwise authorized by the local health officer. The
contractor shall prepare and submit a written work plan for
decontamination to the local health officer. The local health officer
may charge a reasonable fee for review of the work plan. If the work
plan is approved and the decontamination is completed and the property
is retested according to the plan and properly documented, then the
health officer shall allow reuse of the property. A release for reuse
document shall be recorded in the real property records indicating the
property has been decontaminated in accordance with rules of the state
department of health. The seller or lessor of any decontaminated
property that is not real property shall give a copy of the release for
reuse document to the purchaser or lessee of the property. If a seller
or lessor fails to disclose the fact that a property was formerly
contaminated, the purchaser or lessee has the right of rescission and
may recover under chapter 19.86 RCW.

--- END ---