BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.82.090 and 1995 c 291 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, financial
obligations imposed in a judgment shall bear interest from the date of
the judgment until payment, at the rate applicable to civil judgments.
All nonrestitution interest retained by the court shall be split
twenty-five percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the public
safety and education account as provided in RCW 43.08.250, twenty-five
percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial information
system account as provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to the
county current expense fund, and twenty-five percent to the county
current expense fund to fund local courts.
(2) With respect to financial obligations imposed for offenses
committed on or after July 1, 2003, interest shall not accrue during
any period of time the offender is in total confinement in a
correctional or state correctional institution as defined in RCW
9.94.049, an out-of-state correctional institution, or a federal
correctional institution. For purposes of this section, total
confinement shall not include any period of total confinement that is
due to a violation of community custody, community placement, or
community supervision.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---