BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may charge a fee for processing and issuing
decisions on hydraulic project approvals applications. The fee must be
based on the scale and complexity of the project. By July 31, 2004,
the commission, in collaboration with interested and affected parties,
must adopt rules that set forth the fee criteria and amount for these
various categories of approvals. The criteria and amounts must be
based on a workload analysis conducted by the department as part of the
rule development process. The fee criteria may include the capital
cost of the project.
(2) Habitat enhancement projects conducted pursuant to RCW
77.55.290 are exempted from fees.
(3) Revenue generated by these fees must be dedicated to fund
hydraulic project approvals processing and issuing decisions conducted
by the department.
(4) A fee established under this section is exempt from the fee
restriction provisions found under RCW 43.135.055.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.12.170 and 2001 c 253 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is established in the state treasury the state wildlife
fund which consists of moneys received from:
(a) Rentals or concessions of the department;
(b) The sale of real or personal property held for department
purposes;
(c) The sale of licenses, permits, tags, and stamps required by
chapter 77.32 RCW and RCW 77.65.490, except annual resident adult
saltwater and all shellfish licenses, which shall be deposited into the
state general fund;
(d) Fees for informational materials published by the department;
(e) Fees for personalized vehicle license plates as provided in
chapter 46.16 RCW;
(f) Articles or wildlife sold by the director under this title;
(g) Compensation for damage to department property or wildlife
losses or contributions, gifts, or grants received under RCW 77.12.320
or 77.32.380;
(h) Excise tax on anadromous game fish collected under chapter
82.27 RCW;
(i) The sale of personal property seized by the department for
fish, shellfish, or wildlife violations; ((and))
(j) The department's share of revenues from auctions and raffles
authorized by the commission; and
(k) Fees for processing and issuing decisions for hydraulic project
approvals conducted under chapter 77.55 RCW.
(2) State and county officers receiving any moneys listed in
subsection (1) of this section shall deposit them in the state treasury
to be credited to the state wildlife fund.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.135.055 and 2001 c 314 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No fee may increase in any fiscal year by a percentage in
excess of the fiscal growth factor for that fiscal year without prior
legislative approval.
(2) This section does not apply to an assessment made by an
agricultural commodity commission or board created by state statute or
created under a marketing agreement or order under chapter 15.65 or
15.66 RCW, or to the forest products commission, if the assessment is
approved by referendum in accordance with the provisions of the
statutes creating the commission or board or chapter 15.65 or 15.66 RCW
for approving such assessments.
(3) This section does not apply to fees charged by the department
of fish and wildlife to process hydraulic project approvals
applications under section 1 of this act.

--- END ---