BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.55.050 and 1989 c 287 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to any otherwise applicable statutory dollar rate
limitations, regular property taxes may be levied by or for a taxing
district in an amount exceeding the limitations provided for in this
chapter if such levy is authorized by a proposition approved by a
majority of the voters of the taxing district voting on the proposition
at a general election held within the district or at a special election
within the taxing district called by the district for the purpose of
submitting such proposition to the voters. Any election held pursuant
to this section shall be held not more than twelve months prior to the
date on which the proposed levy is to be made, except as provided in
subsection (3)(b) of this section. The ballot of the proposition shall
state the dollar rate proposed and shall clearly state any conditions
which are applicable under subsection (3) of this section.
(2) After a levy authorized pursuant to this section is made, the
dollar amount of such levy shall be used for the purpose of computing
the limitations for subsequent levies provided for in this chapter,
except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section.
(3) A proposition placed before the voters under this section may:
(a) Limit the period for which the increased levy is to be made;
(b) Authorize annual increases in levies for multiple consecutive
years, up to six consecutive years, during which period each year's
authorized maximum legal levy shall be used as the base upon which an
increased levy limit for the succeeding year is computed, but the
ballot proposition must state the dollar rate proposed only for the
first year of the consecutive years and must state the limit factor, or
a specified index to be used for determining a limit factor, such as
the consumer price index, which need not be the same for all years, by
which the regular tax levy for the district may be increased in each of
the subsequent consecutive years;
(c) Limit the purpose for which the increased levy is to be made,
but if the limited purpose includes making redemption payments on
bonds, the period for which the increased levies are made shall not
exceed nine years;
(((c)))(d) Set the levy at a rate less than the maximum rate
allowed for the district;
(e) Provide that the maximum allowable dollar amount of the final
annual levy of the period specified in the measure shall be used to
compute the limitations provided for in this chapter on levy increases
occurring after the expiration of the period; or
(((d)))(f) Include any combination of the conditions in this
subsection.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in an approved ballot measure
under this section, after the expiration of a limited period or the
satisfaction of a limited purpose, whichever comes first, subsequent
levies shall be computed as if:
(a) The limited proposition under subsection (3) of this section
had not been approved; and
(b) The taxing district had made levies at the maximum rates which
would otherwise have been allowed under this chapter during the years
levies were made under the limited proposition.

--- END ---