BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.155.010 and 1996 c 168 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that there ((exists in the state of
Washington over four billion dollars worth of critical projects for the
planning, acquisition, construction, repair, replacement,
rehabilitation, or improvement of streets and roads, bridges, water
systems, and storm and sanitary sewage systems. The December, 1983
Washington state public works report prepared by the planning and
community affairs agency documented that local governments expect to be
capable of financing over two billion dollars worth of the costs of
those critical projects but will not be able to fund nearly half of the
documented needs.
The legislature further finds that Washington's local governments
have unmet financial needs for solid waste disposal, including
recycling, and encourages the board to make an equitable geographic
distribution of the funds)) is a need to change the list of public
works projects eligible for funding.
The populations of correction and detention facilities operated by
local governments have grown rapidly, while the revenues available to
build and maintain these facilities have declined. As a consequence,
many facilities are overcrowded or need repairs. Local governments are
also struggling to fund the operation of these facilities.
Providing local governments with a source of low-interest financing
for construction of correction and detention facilities will enable
them to use available funds for the operation of these facilities
rather than for interest payments.
It is the policy of the state of Washington to encourage self-reliance by local governments in meeting their public works needs and
to assist in the financing of critical public works projects by making
loans, financing guarantees, and technical assistance available to
local governments for these projects.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.155.020 and 2001 c 131 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section shall apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Adult or juvenile correction or detention facilities" means
the same as "jail" as defined by RCW 70.48.020.
(2) "Board" means the public works board created in RCW 43.155.030.
(((2))) (3) "Capital facility plan" means a capital facility plan
required by the growth management act under chapter 36.70A RCW or, for
local governments not fully planning under the growth management act,
a plan required by the public works board.
(((3))) (4) "Department" means the department of community, trade,
and economic development.
(((4))) (5) "Financing guarantees" means the pledge of money in the
public works assistance account, or money to be received by the public
works assistance account, to the repayment of all or a portion of the
principal of or interest on obligations issued by local governments to
finance public works projects.
(((5))) (6) "Local governments" means cities, towns, counties,
special purpose districts, and any other municipal corporations or
quasi-municipal corporations in the state excluding school districts
and port districts.
(((6))) (7) "Public works project" means a project of a local
government for the planning, acquisition, construction, repair,
reconstruction, replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of streets
and roads, bridges, ((water systems, or storm and sanitary sewage
systems and solid waste facilities, including recycling facilities))
domestic water systems, sanitary sewer systems, storm water systems,
solid waste/recycling systems, and adult or juvenile correction and
detention facilities. A planning project may include the compilation
of biological, hydrological, or other data on a county, drainage basin,
or region necessary to develop a base of information for a capital
facility plan. A planning project may include the compilation of
biological, hydrological, or other data on a county, drainage basin, or
region necessary to develop a base of information for a capital
facility plan.
(((7))) (8) "Solid waste or recycling project" means remedial
actions necessary to bring abandoned or closed landfills into
compliance with regulatory requirements and the repair, restoration,
and replacement of existing solid waste transfer, recycling facilities,
and landfill projects limited to the opening of landfill cells that are
in existing and permitted landfills.
(((8))) (9) "Technical assistance" means training and other
services provided to local governments to: (a) Help such local
governments plan, apply, and qualify for loans and financing guarantees
from the board, and (b) help local governments improve their ability to
plan for, finance, acquire, construct, repair, replace, rehabilitate,
and maintain public facilities.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.155.050 and 2001 c 131 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The public works assistance account is hereby established in the
state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance
account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature
or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance
account shall be used to make loans and to give financial guarantees to
local governments for public works projects. Moneys in the account may
also be appropriated to provide for state match requirements under
federal law for projects and activities conducted and financed by the
board under the drinking water assistance account. Not more than
fifteen percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the
public works board from this account may be expended or obligated for
preconstruction loans, emergency loans, or loans for capital facility
planning under this chapter((; of this amount,)). Not more than ten
percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation may be expended
for emergency loans under this chapter and not more than one percent of
the biennial capital budget appropriation may be expended for capital
facility planning loans under this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.155.068 and 2001 c 131 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board may make low-interest or interest-free loans to local
governments for preconstruction activities on public works projects
((before the legislature approves the construction phase of the
project)). Preconstruction activities include design, engineering,
bid-document preparation, environmental studies, right of way
acquisition, and other preliminary phases of public works projects as
determined by the board. ((The purpose of the loans authorized in this
section is to accelerate the completion of public works projects by
allowing preconstruction activities to be performed before the approval
of the construction phase of the project by the legislature.))
(2) Projects receiving loans for preconstruction activities under
this section must be evaluated using the priority process and factors
in RCW 43.155.070(((2))) (4). The receipt of a loan for
preconstruction activities does not ensure the receipt of a
construction loan for the project under this chapter. ((Construction
loans for projects receiving a loan for preconstruction activities
under this section are subject to legislative approval under RCW
43.155.070 (4) and (5).)) The board shall adopt a single application
process for local governments seeking both a loan for preconstruction
activities under this section and a construction loan for the project.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.155.070 and 2001 c 131 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To qualify for loans or pledges under this chapter the board
must determine that a local government meets all of the following
conditions:
(a) The city or county must be imposing a tax under chapter 82.46
RCW at a rate of at least one-quarter of one percent;
(b) The local government must have developed a capital facility
plan; and
(c) The local government must be using all local revenue sources
which are reasonably available for funding public works, taking into
consideration local employment and economic factors.
(2) Except where necessary to address a public health need or
substantial environmental degradation, a county, city, or town planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 must have adopted a comprehensive plan, including
a capital facilities plan element, and development regulations ((as
required by RCW 36.70A.040)) in conformance with the requirements of
chapter 36.70A RCW. This subsection does not require any county, city,
or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 to adopt a comprehensive plan or
development regulations before requesting or receiving a loan or loan
guarantee under this chapter if such request is made before the
expiration of the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040. A county,
city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 which has not adopted a
comprehensive plan and development regulations within the time periods
specified in RCW 36.70A.040 is not prohibited from receiving a loan or
loan guarantee under this chapter if the comprehensive plan and
development regulations are adopted as required by RCW 36.70A.040
before submitting a request for a loan or loan guarantee.
(3) In considering awarding loans for public facilities to special
districts requesting funding for a proposed facility located in a
county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040, the board shall
consider whether the county, city, or town planning under RCW
36.70A.040 in whose planning jurisdiction the proposed facility is
located has adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations
((as required by RCW 36.70A.040)) in conformance with the requirements
of chapter 36.70A RCW.
(4) The board shall develop a priority process for public works
projects as provided in this section. The intent of the priority
process is to maximize the value of public works projects accomplished
with assistance under this chapter. The board shall attempt to assure
a geographical balance in assigning priorities to projects. The board
((shall consider at least the following factors in assigning a priority
to a project)) is empowered to select projects based on the greatest
need, and on proof of local management efforts, and to establish
selection criteria, which may include:
(a) Whether the local government receiving assistance has
experienced severe fiscal distress resulting from natural disaster or
emergency public works needs;
(b) Whether the project is critical in nature and would affect the
health and safety of a great number of citizens;
(c) The cost of the project compared to the size of the local
government and amount of loan money available;
(d) The number of communities served by or funding the project;
(e) Whether the project is located in an area of high unemployment,
compared to the average state unemployment;
(f) Whether the project is the acquisition, expansion, improvement,
or renovation by a local government of a public water system that is in
violation of health and safety standards, including the cost of
extending existing service to such a system;
(g) The relative benefit of the project to the community,
considering the present level of economic activity in the community and
the existing local capacity to increase local economic activity in
communities that have low economic growth; ((and))
(h) Whether the project is included in the local comprehensive plan
or capital facilities plan; and
(i) Other criteria that the board considers advisable.
(5) Existing debt or financial obligations of local governments
shall not be refinanced under this chapter. Each local government
applicant shall provide documentation of attempts to secure additional
local or other sources of funding for each public works project for
which financial assistance is sought under this chapter.
(6) Before ((November)) February 1 of each year, the board shall
develop and submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate
and house of representatives a ((description)) report of the loans made
under ((RCW 43.155.065, 43.155.068, and subsection (9) of this section
during the preceding fiscal year and a prioritized list of projects
which are recommended for funding by the legislature, including one
copy to the staff of each of the committees. The list)) this chapter
and RCW 70.119A.170 during the previous year. The report shall
include, but not be limited to, a description of each project and
recommended financing, the terms and conditions of the loan or
financial guarantee, the local government jurisdiction, and the
unemployment rate((, demonstration of the jurisdiction's critical need
for the project and documentation of local funds being used to finance
the public works project. The list shall also include measures of
fiscal capacity for each jurisdiction recommended for financial
assistance, compared to authorized limits and state averages, including
local government sales taxes; real estate excise taxes; property taxes;
and charges for or taxes on sewerage, water, garbage, and other
utilities)) in that jurisdiction.
(7) The board shall not sign ((contracts or otherwise financially
obligate funds from the public works assistance account before the
legislature has appropriated funds for a specific list of public works
projects. The legislature may remove projects from the list
recommended by the board. The legislature shall not change the order
of the priorities recommended for funding by the board.
(8) Subsection (7) of this section does not apply to loans made
under RCW 43.155.065, 43.155.068, and subsection (9) of this section.
(9) Loans made for the purpose of capital facilities plans shall be
exempted from subsection (7) of this section)) loan agreements until
all standards of this chapter have been met.
(((10))) (8) To qualify for loans or pledges for solid waste or
recycling facilities under this chapter, a city or county must
demonstrate that the solid waste or recycling facility is consistent
with and necessary to implement the comprehensive solid waste
management plan adopted by the city or county under chapter 70.95 RCW.

--- END ---