BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.67.370 and 1998 c 61 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Cities, towns, or counties may not require existing mobile home
parks to replace existing, functional septic systems with a sewer
system within the community unless the local board of health determines
that the septic system is failing.
(2) Cities, towns, counties, local improvement districts, utility
local improvement districts, municipal corporations, political
subdivisions, or any other persons, firms, or corporations are
prohibited from requiring existing mobile home parks to pay a sewer
availability charge, standby charge, or any other similar types of
charges associated with a utility, including any penalties for
nonpayment of these charges, until the mobile home park connects to
that
utility. This act is remedial in nature and applies
retroactively.

--- END ---