BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.21A.690 and 2000 c 251 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may enter into a written cost-reimbursement
agreement with a permit applicant ((for a complex project)) to recover
from the applicant the reasonable costs incurred by the department in
carrying out the requirements of this chapter, as well as the
requirements of other relevant laws, as they relate to permit
coordination, environmental review, application review, technical
studies, and permit processing. The cost-reimbursement agreement shall
identify the specific tasks, costs, and schedule for work to be
conducted under the agreement. ((For purposes of this section, a
complex project is a project for which an environmental impact
statement is required under chapter 43.21C RCW.))
(2) The written cost-reimbursement agreement shall be negotiated
with the permit applicant. Under the provisions of a cost-
reimbursement agreement, funds from the applicant shall be used by the
department to contract with an independent consultant to carry out the
work covered by the cost-reimbursement agreement. The department may
also use funds provided under a cost-reimbursement agreement to assign
current staff to review the work of the consultant, to provide
necessary technical assistance when an independent consultant with
comparable technical skills is unavailable, and to recover reasonable
and necessary direct and indirect costs that arise from processing the
permit. The department shall, in developing the agreement, ensure that
final decisions that involve policy matters are made by the agency and
not by the consultant. The department shall make an estimate of the
number of permanent staff hours to process the permits, and shall
contract with consultants to replace the time and functions committed
by these permanent staff to the project. The billing process shall
provide for accurate time and cost accounting and may include a billing
cycle that provides for progress payments. Use of cost-reimbursement
agreements shall not reduce the current level of staff available to
work on permits not covered by cost-reimbursement agreements. The
department may not use any funds under a cost-reimbursement agreement
to replace or supplant existing funding. The restrictions of chapter
42.52 RCW apply to any cost-reimbursement agreement, and to any person
hired as a result of a cost-reimbursement agreement.
(3) The department may not enter into any new cost-reimbursement
agreements on or after July 1, ((2005)) 2007. The department may
continue to administer any cost-reimbursement agreement ((which)) that
was entered into before July 1, ((2005)) 2007, until the project is
completed.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.30.420 and 2000 c 251 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may enter into a written cost-reimbursement
agreement with a permit or lease applicant ((for a complex project)) to
recover from the applicant the reasonable costs incurred by the
department in carrying out the requirements of this chapter, as well as
the requirements of other relevant laws, as they relate to permit
coordination, environmental review, application review, technical
studies, and permit or lease processing. The cost-reimbursement
agreement shall identify the specific tasks, costs, and schedule for
work to be conducted under the agreement. ((For purposes of this
section, a complex project is a project for which an environmental
impact statement is required under chapter 43.21C RCW.)) An applicant
for a lease issued under chapter 79.90 RCW may not enter into a cost-reimbursement agreement under this section for projects conducted under
the lease.
(2) The written cost-reimbursement agreement shall be negotiated
with the permit or lease applicant. Under the provisions of a cost-reimbursement agreement, funds from the applicant shall be used by the
department to contract with an independent consultant to carry out the
work covered by the cost-reimbursement agreement. The department may
also use funds provided under a cost-reimbursement agreement to assign
current staff to review the work of the consultant, to provide
necessary technical assistance when an independent consultant with
comparable technical skills is unavailable, and to recover reasonable
and necessary direct and indirect costs that arise from processing the
permit or lease. The department shall, in developing the agreement,
ensure that final decisions that involve policy matters are made by the
agency and not by the consultant. The department shall make an
estimate of the number of permanent staff hours to process the permits
or leases, and shall contract with consultants to replace the time and
functions committed by these permanent staff to the project. The
billing process shall provide for accurate time and cost accounting and
may include a billing cycle that provides for progress payments. Use
of cost-reimbursement agreements shall not reduce the current level of
staff available to work on permits or leases not covered by cost-reimbursement agreements. The department may not use any funds under
a cost-reimbursement agreement to replace or supplant existing funding.
The restrictions of chapter 42.52 RCW apply to any cost-reimbursement
agreement, and to any person hired as a result of a cost-reimbursement
agreement.
(3) The department may not enter into any new cost-reimbursement
agreements on or after July 1, ((2005)) 2007. The department may
continue to administer any cost-reimbursement agreement ((which)) that
was entered into before July 1, ((2005)) 2007, until the project is
completed.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.70.630 and 2000 c 251 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may enter into a written cost-reimbursement
agreement with a permit applicant ((for a complex project)) to recover
from the applicant the reasonable costs incurred by the department in
carrying out the requirements of this chapter, as well as the
requirements of other relevant laws, as they relate to permit
coordination, environmental review, application review, technical
studies, and permit processing.
The cost-reimbursement agreement shall identify the specific tasks,
costs, and schedule for work to be conducted under the agreement.
((For purposes of this section, a complex project is a project for
which an environmental impact statement is required under chapter
43.21C RCW.))
(2) The written cost-reimbursement agreement shall be negotiated
with the permit applicant. Under the provisions of a cost-reimbursement agreement, funds from the applicant shall be used by the
department to contract with an independent consultant to carry out the
work covered by the cost-reimbursement agreement. The department may
also use funds provided under a cost-reimbursement agreement to assign
current staff to review the work of the consultant, to provide
necessary technical assistance when an independent consultant with
comparable technical skills is unavailable, and to recover reasonable
and necessary direct and indirect costs that arise from processing the
permit. The department shall, in developing the agreement, ensure that
final decisions that involve policy matters are made by the agency and
not by the consultant. The department shall make an estimate of the
number of permanent staff hours to process the permits, and shall
contract with consultants to replace the time and functions committed
by these permanent staff to the project. The billing process shall
provide for accurate time and cost accounting and may include a billing
cycle that provides for progress payments. Use of cost-reimbursement
agreements shall not reduce the current level of staff available to
work on permits not covered by cost-reimbursement agreements. The
department may not use any funds under a cost-reimbursement agreement
to replace or supplant existing funding. The restrictions of chapter
42.52 RCW apply to any cost-reimbursement agreement, and to any person
hired as a result of a cost-reimbursement agreement.
(3) The department may not enter into any new cost-reimbursement
agreements on or after July 1, ((2005)) 2007. The department may
continue to administer any cost-reimbursement agreement ((which)) that
was entered into before July 1, ((2005)) 2007, until the project is
completed.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.300.080 and 2000 c 251 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may enter into a written cost-reimbursement
agreement with a permit applicant ((for a complex project)) to recover
from the applicant the reasonable costs incurred by the department in
carrying out the requirements of this chapter, as well as the
requirements of other relevant laws, as they relate to permit
coordination, environmental review, application review, technical
studies, and permit processing. The cost-reimbursement agreement shall
identify the specific tasks, costs, and schedule for work to be
conducted under the agreement. ((For purposes of this section, a
complex project is a project for which an environmental impact
statement is required under chapter 43.21C RCW.))
(2) The written cost-reimbursement agreement shall be negotiated
with the permit applicant. Under the provisions of a cost-reimbursement agreement, funds from the applicant shall be used by the
department to contract with an independent consultant to carry out the
work covered by the cost-reimbursement agreement. The department may
also use funds provided under a cost-reimbursement agreement to assign
current staff to review the work of the consultant, to provide
necessary technical assistance when an independent consultant with
comparable technical skills is unavailable, and to recover reasonable
and necessary direct and indirect costs that arise from processing the
permit. The department shall, in developing the agreement, ensure that
final decisions that involve policy matters are made by the agency and
not by the consultant. The department shall make an estimate of the
number of permanent staff hours to process the permits, and shall
contract with consultants to replace the time and functions committed
by these permanent staff to the project. The billing process shall
provide for accurate time and cost accounting and may include a billing
cycle that provides for progress payments. Use of cost-reimbursement
agreements shall not reduce the current level of staff available to
work on permits not covered by cost-reimbursement agreements. The
department may not use any funds under a cost-reimbursement agreement
to replace or supplant existing funding. The restrictions of chapter
42.52 RCW apply to any cost-reimbursement agreement, and to any person
hired as a result of a cost-reimbursement agreement.
(3) The department may not enter into any new cost-reimbursement
agreements on or after July 1, ((2005)) 2007. The department may
continue to administer any cost-reimbursement agreement ((which)) that
was entered into before July 1, ((2005)) 2007, until the project is
completed.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.94.085 and 2000 c 251 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An authority may enter into a written cost-reimbursement
agreement with a permit applicant ((for a complex project)) to recover
from the applicant the reasonable costs incurred by the authority in
carrying out the requirements of this chapter, as well as the
requirements of other relevant laws, as they relate to permit
coordination, environmental review, application review, technical
studies, and permit processing. The cost-reimbursement agreement shall
identify the specific tasks, costs, and schedule for work to be
conducted under the agreement. ((For purposes of this section, a
complex project is a project for which an environmental impact
statement is required under chapter 43.21C RCW.))
(2) The written cost-reimbursement agreement shall be negotiated
with the permit applicant. Under the provisions of a cost-reimbursement agreement, funds from the applicant shall be used by the
air pollution control authority to contract with an independent
consultant to carry out the work covered by the cost-reimbursement
agreement. The air pollution control authority may also use funds
provided under a cost-reimbursement agreement to assign current staff
to review the work of the consultant, to provide necessary technical
assistance when an independent consultant with comparable technical
skills is unavailable, and to recover reasonable and necessary direct
and indirect costs that arise from processing the permit. The air
pollution control authority shall, in developing the agreement, ensure
that final decisions that involve policy matters are made by the agency
and not by the consultant. The air pollution control authority shall
make an estimate of the number of permanent staff hours to process the
permits, and shall contract with consultants to replace the time and
functions committed by these permanent staff to the project. The
billing process shall provide for accurate time and cost accounting and
may include a billing cycle that provides for progress payments. Use
of cost-reimbursement agreements shall not reduce the current level of
staff available to work on permits not covered by cost-reimbursement
agreements. The air pollution control authority may not use any funds
under a cost-reimbursement agreement to replace or supplant existing
funding. The provisions of chapter 42.52 RCW apply to any cost-reimbursement agreement, and to any person hired as a result of a cost-reimbursement agreement. Members of the air pollution control
authority's board of directors shall be considered as state officers,
and employees of the air pollution control authority shall be
considered as state employees, for the sole purpose of applying the
restrictions of chapter 42.52 RCW to this section.
(3) An air pollution control authority may not enter into any new
cost-reimbursement agreements on or after July 1, ((2005)) 2007. The
((department [authority])) authority may continue to administer any
cost-reimbursement agreement ((which)) that was entered into before
July 1, ((2005)) 2007, until the project is completed.

Sec. 6 RCW 90.03.265 and 2000 c 251 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any applicant for a new withdrawal or a change, transfer, or
amendment of a water right pending before the department, may initiate
a cost-reimbursement agreement with the department to provide expedited
review of the application. A cost-reimbursement agreement may only be
initiated under this section if the applicant agrees to pay for, or as
part of a cooperative effort agrees to pay for, the cost of processing
his or her application and all other applications from the same source
of supply which must be acted upon before the applicant's request
because they were filed prior to the date of when the applicant filed.
The department shall use the process established under RCW 43.21A.690
for entering into cost-reimbursement agreements((, except that it is
not necessary for an environmental impact statement to be filed as a
prerequisite for entering into a cost-reimbursement agreement under
this section)).

Sec. 7 RCW 43.42.070 and 2002 c 153 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The office may coordinate negotiation and implementation of a
written agreement among the project applicant, the office, and
participating permit agencies to recover from the project applicant the
reasonable costs incurred by the office in carrying out the provisions
of RCW 43.42.050(2) and 43.42.060(2) and by participating permit
agencies in carrying out permit processing tasks specified in the
agreement.
(2) The office may coordinate negotiation and implementation of a
written agreement among the project applicant, the office, and
participating permit agencies to recover from the project applicant the
reasonable costs incurred by outside independent consultants selected
by the office and participating permit agencies to perform permit
processing tasks.
(3) Outside independent consultants may only bill for the costs of
performing those permit processing tasks that are specified in a cost-
reimbursement agreement under this section. The billing process shall
provide for accurate time and cost accounting and may include a billing
cycle that provides for progress payments.
(4) The office shall adopt a policy to coordinate cost-
reimbursement agreements with outside independent consultants. Cost-
reimbursement agreements coordinated by the office under this section
must be based on competitive bids that are awarded for each agreement
from a prequalified consultant roster.
(5) Independent consultants hired under a cost-reimbursement
agreement((,)) shall report directly to the permit agency. The office
shall assure that final decisions are made by the permit agency and not
by the consultant.
(6) The office shall develop procedures for determining,
collecting, and distributing cost reimbursement for carrying out the
provisions of this chapter.
(7) For a cost-reimbursement agreement, the office and
participating permit agencies shall negotiate a work plan and schedule
for reimbursement. Prior to distributing scheduled reimbursement to
the agencies, the office shall verify that the agencies have met the
obligations contained in their work plan.
(8) Prior to commencing negotiations with the project applicant for
a cost-reimbursement agreement, the office shall request work load
analyses from each participating permitting agency. These analyses
shall be available to the public. The work load of a participating
permit agency may only be modified with the concurrence of the agency
and if there is both good cause to do so and no significant impact on
environmental review.
(9) The office shall develop guidance to ensure that, in developing
cost-reimbursement agreements, conflicts of interest are eliminated.
(10) For project permit processes that it coordinates, the office
shall coordinate the negotiation of all cost-reimbursement agreements
executed under RCW 43.21A.690, 43.30.420, 43.70.630, 43.300.080, and
70.94.085. The office and the permit agencies shall be signatories to
the agreements. Each permit agency shall manage performance of its
portion of the agreement.
(11) If a permit agency or the project applicant foresees, at any
time, that it will be unable to meet its obligations under the cost-
reimbursement agreement, it shall notify the office and state the
reasons. The office shall notify the participating permit agencies and
the project applicant and, upon agreement of all parties, adjust the
schedule, or, if necessary, coordinate revision of the work plan.

--- END ---