BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.400
RCW to read as follows:
If a school district hires a retiree as defined in RCW 41.32.010,
41.34.020, 41.35.010, or 41.40.010 for any postretirement employment
under RCW 41.32.570 in two consecutive school years, the district may
not hire the retiree for any further postretirement employment unless
the superintendent of public instruction determines that other
qualified persons are not currently available in the local labor market
area to fill the position. Before making this determination, the
superintendent of public instruction must review at least the resumes
and any other related materials submitted by all applicants for the
position. Notwithstanding the review required by the superintendent of
public instruction, the resumes and other related materials are
confidential and are not open to public inspection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act applies to school
years that begin after August 1, 2003.

--- END ---