BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 50.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The term "wages" shall not include the remuneration paid by one or
more employers to a retiree for employment under this title during the
retiree's base year. For the purposes of this section:
(1) "Employer" means the same as in RCW 41.32.010, 41.34.020,
41.35.010, and 41.40.010; and
(2) "Retiree" means the same as in RCW 41.32.010, 41.34.020,
41.35.010, and 41.40.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act
must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal
unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act applies to weeks that
begin after June 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---