BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.28.010 and 2001 c 231 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever any accident occurs to any worker ((it shall be the
duty of such)), the worker or someone ((in)) on his or her behalf ((to
forthwith)) must report ((such)) the accident to his or her employer,
superintendent, or supervisor in charge of the work((, and of)) within
the lesser of thirty days after the date of the accident or five days
after the date the worker received medical treatment.
(2) When an employer receives notice of an accident as required
under subsection (1) of this section, the employer ((to)) must at once:
(a) Report such accident and the injury resulting therefrom to the
department pursuant to RCW 51.28.025 where the worker has received
treatment from a physician, has been hospitalized, disabled from work,
or has died as the apparent result of such accident and injury; and (b)
provide written acknowledgment of such notice to the worker or his or
her beneficiaries or dependents.
(((2))) (3) Upon receipt of ((such)) the notice of accident
required under RCW 51.28.025, the department shall immediately forward
to the worker or his or her beneficiaries or dependents notification,
in nontechnical language, of their rights under this title. The notice
must specify the worker's right to receive health services from a
physician of the worker's choice under RCW 51.36.010, including
chiropractic services under RCW 51.36.015, and must list the types of
providers authorized to provide these services.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.28.050 and 1984 c 159 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section and in RCW
51.28.055, no application shall be valid or claim thereunder
enforceable unless filed within one year after the day upon which the
injury occurred or the rights of dependents or beneficiaries accrued((,
except as provided in RCW 51.28.055)).
(2) Except as provided in RCW 51.28.055, beginning with claims for
injuries occurring on or after the effective date of this section, an
application for a claim is not valid nor the claim thereunder
enforceable unless the accident from which the claim arose has been
reported as required under RCW 51.28.010(1) and the application is
filed within one year after the day upon which the injury occurred or
the rights of dependents or beneficiaries accrued.

--- END ---