BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that millions of
dollars are spent each year to discourage the youth of this state from
using tobacco products. The legislature also finds that tobacco use
causes Washington state citizens to pay billions of dollars in health
care costs. However, the legislature finds that there are policies at
the public institutions of higher education that enable students to use
tobacco products in publicly owned residence halls.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.160.040 and 1985 c 236 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A smoking area may be designated in a public place by the owner
or, in the case of a leased or rented space, by the lessee or other
person in charge except in:
(a) Elevators; buses, except for private hire; streetcars; taxis,
except those clearly and visibly designated by the owner to permit
smoking; public areas of retail stores and lobbies of financial
institutions; office reception areas and waiting rooms of any building
owned or leased by the state of Washington or by any city, county, or
other municipality in the state of Washington; museums; public meetings
or hearings; classrooms ((and)), lecture halls, and residence halls of
schools, colleges, and universities; and the seating areas and aisle
ways which are contiguous to seating areas of concert halls, theaters,
auditoriums, exhibition halls, and indoor sports arenas; and
(b) Hallways of health care facilities, with the exception of
nursing homes, and lobbies of concert halls, theaters, auditoriums,
exhibition halls, and indoor sports arenas, if the area is not
physically separated. Owners or other persons in charge are not
required to incur any expense to make structural or other physical
modifications in providing these areas.
Except as provided in other provisions of this chapter, no public
place, other than a bar, tavern, bowling alley, tobacco shop, or
restaurant, may be designated as a smoking area in its entirety. If a
bar, tobacco shop, or restaurant is designated as a smoking area in its
entirety, this designation shall be posted conspicuously on all
entrances normally used by the public.
(2) Where smoking areas are designated, existing physical barriers
and ventilation systems shall be used to minimize the toxic effect of
smoke in adjacent nonsmoking areas.
(3) Managers of restaurants who choose to provide smoking areas
shall designate an adequate amount of seating to meet the demands of
restaurant patrons who wish to smoke. Owners of restaurants are not
required to incur any expense to make structural or other physical
modifications in providing these areas. Restaurant patrons shall be
informed that separate smoking and nonsmoking sections are available.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a facility or
area may be designated in its entirety as a nonsmoking area by the
owner or other person in charge.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The higher education coordinating board
shall adopt a rule defining "residence hall" for the purposes of this
act.

--- END ---