BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.155 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A subaccount is created in the public works assistance account
to receive money to fund the following projects: (a) Water storage
projects; and (b) water systems facilities.
(2) The projects listed in subsection (1) of this section must
comply with the competitive bid requirements of RCW 43.155.060.
(3) The subaccount created in subsection (1) of this section shall
receive amounts appropriated to it for purposes of distributing these
moneys as grants for water storage projects and water systems
facilities projects as provided in the appropriation and this section.
This subaccount shall be administered by the board and shall be
separate from the other programs managed by the board under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the
immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---