BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.44.050 and 1987 c 109 s 108 are each amended to
read as follows:
After June 6, 1945, no withdrawal of public ground waters of the
state shall be begun, nor shall any well or other works for such
withdrawal be constructed, unless an application to appropriate such
waters has been made to the department and a permit has been granted by
it as herein provided: EXCEPT, HOWEVER, That any withdrawal of public
ground waters for stock-watering purposes, or for the watering of a
lawn or of a noncommercial garden not exceeding one-half acre in area,
((or)) is and shall be exempt from the provisions of this section, but,
to the extent that it is regularly used beneficially, shall be entitled
to a right equal to that established by a permit issued under the
provisions of this chapter. Further, any withdrawal of public ground
water for single or group domestic uses in an amount not exceeding five
thousand gallons a day, or for an industrial purpose in an amount not
exceeding five thousand gallons a day, is and shall be exempt from the
provisions of this section, but, to the extent that it is regularly
used beneficially, shall be entitled to a right equal to that
established by a permit issued under the provisions of this chapter:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the department from time to time may require
the person or agency making any such small withdrawal to furnish
information as to the means for and the quantity of that withdrawal:
PROVIDED, FURTHER, That at the option of the party making withdrawals
of ground waters of the state not exceeding five thousand gallons per
day, applications under this section or declarations under RCW
90.44.090 may be filed and permits and certificates obtained in the
same manner and under the same requirements as is in this chapter
provided in the case of withdrawals in excess of five thousand gallons
a day.

--- END ---