BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.21B.110 and 2001 c 220 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The hearings board shall only have jurisdiction to hear and
decide appeals from the following decisions of the department, the
director, local conservation districts, and the air pollution control
boards or authorities as established pursuant to chapter 70.94 RCW, or
local health departments:
(a) Civil penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431,
70.105.080, 70.107.050, 88.46.090, 90.03.600, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, and
90.56.330.
(b) Orders issued pursuant to RCW 18.104.043, 18.104.060,
43.27A.190, 70.94.211, 70.94.332, 70.105.095, 86.16.020, 88.46.070,
((90.14.130,)) 90.48.120, and 90.56.330.
(c) Except as provided in RCW 90.03.210(2), the issuance,
modification, or termination of any permit, certificate, or license by
the department or any air authority in the exercise of its
jurisdiction, including the issuance or termination of a waste disposal
permit, the denial of an application for a waste disposal permit, the
modification of the conditions or the terms of a waste disposal permit,
or a decision to approve or deny an application for a solid waste
permit exemption under RCW 70.95.300.
(d) Decisions of local health departments regarding the grant or
denial of solid waste permits pursuant to chapter 70.95 RCW.
(e) Decisions of local health departments regarding the issuance
and enforcement of permits to use or dispose of biosolids under RCW
70.95J.080.
(f) Decisions of the department regarding waste-derived fertilizer
or micronutrient fertilizer under RCW 15.54.820, and decisions of the
department regarding waste-derived soil amendments under RCW 70.95.205.
(g) Decisions of local conservation districts related to the denial
of approval or denial of certification of a dairy nutrient management
plan; conditions contained in a plan; application of any dairy nutrient
management practices, standards, methods, and technologies to a
particular dairy farm; and failure to adhere to the plan review and
approval timelines in RCW 90.64.026.
(h) Any other decision by the department or an air authority which
pursuant to law must be decided as an adjudicative proceeding under
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) The following hearings shall not be conducted by the hearings
board:
(a) Hearings required by law to be conducted by the shorelines
hearings board pursuant to chapter 90.58 RCW.
(b) Hearings conducted by the department pursuant to RCW 70.94.332,
70.94.390, 70.94.395, 70.94.400, 70.94.405, 70.94.410, and 90.44.180.
(c) Proceedings conducted by the department, or the department's
designee, under RCW 90.03.160 through 90.03.210 or 90.44.220.
(d) Hearings conducted by the department to adopt, modify, or
repeal rules.
(3) Review of rules and regulations adopted by the hearings board
shall be subject to review in accordance with the provisions of the
Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.14.010 and 1967 c 233 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The future growth and development of the state is dependent upon
effective management and efficient use of the state's water resources.
The purpose of this chapter is to provide adequate records for
efficient administration of the state's waters((, and to cause a return
to the state of any water rights which are no longer exercised by
putting said waters to beneficial use)).

Sec. 3 RCW 90.38.040 and 2001 c 237 s 29 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All trust water rights acquired by the department shall be
placed in the Yakima river basin trust water rights program to be
managed by the department. The department shall issue a water right
certificate in the name of the state of Washington for each trust water
right it acquires.
(2) Trust water rights shall retain the same priority date as the
water right from which they originated. Trust water rights may be
modified as to purpose or place of use or point of diversion, including
modification from a diversionary use to a nondiversionary instream use.
(3) Trust water rights may be held by the department for instream
flows, irrigation use, or other beneficial use. Trust water rights may
be acquired on a temporary or permanent basis. To the extent
practicable and subject to legislative appropriation, trust water
rights acquired in an area with an approved watershed plan developed
under chapter 90.82 RCW shall be consistent with that plan if the plan
calls for such acquisition.
(4) A schedule of the amount of net water saved as a result of
water conservation projects carried out in accordance with this
chapter, shall be developed annually to reflect the predicted
hydrologic and water supply conditions, as well as anticipated water
demands, for the upcoming irrigation season. This schedule shall serve
as the basis for the distribution and management of trust water rights
each year.
(5)(a) No exercise of a trust water right may be authorized unless
the department first determines that no existing water rights, junior
or senior in priority, will be impaired as to their exercise or injured
in any manner whatever by such authorization.
(b) Before any trust water right is exercised, the department shall
publish notice thereof in a newspaper of general circulation published
in the county or counties in which the storage, diversion, and use are
to be made, and in such other newspapers as the department determines
are necessary, once a week for two consecutive weeks. At the same time
the department may also send notice thereof containing pertinent
information to the director of fish and wildlife.
(c) Subsections (4) and (5)(b) of this section do not apply to a
trust water right resulting from a donation for instream flows
described in RCW 90.38.020(1)(b) or from the lease of a water right
under RCW 90.38.020(6) if the period of the lease does not exceed five
years. However, the department shall provide the notice described in
(b) of this subsection the first time the trust water right resulting
from the donation is exercised.
(6) RCW 90.03.380 ((and 90.14.140 through 90.14.910)) shall have no
applicability to trust water rights held by the department under this
chapter or exercised under this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 90.42.040 and 2002 c 329 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All trust water rights acquired by the state shall be placed in
the state trust water rights program to be managed by the department.
Trust water rights acquired by the state shall be held or authorized
for use by the department for instream flows, irrigation, municipal, or
other beneficial uses consistent with applicable regional plans for
pilot planning areas, or to resolve critical water supply problems. To
the extent practicable and subject to legislative appropriation, trust
water rights acquired in an area with an approved watershed plan
developed under chapter 90.82 RCW shall be consistent with that plan if
the plan calls for such acquisition.
(2) The department shall issue a water right certificate in the
name of the state of Washington for each permanent trust water right
conveyed to the state indicating the reach or reaches of the stream,
the quantity, and the use or uses to which it may be applied. A
superseding certificate shall be issued that specifies the amount of
water the water right holder would continue to be entitled to as a
result of the water conservation project. The superseding certificate
shall retain the same priority date as the original right. For
nonpermanent conveyances, the department shall issue certificates or
such other instruments as are necessary to reflect the changes in
purpose or place of use or point of diversion or withdrawal.
(3) A trust water right retains the same priority date as the water
right from which it originated, but as between them the trust right
shall be deemed to be inferior in priority unless otherwise specified
by an agreement between the state and the party holding the original
right.
(4) Exercise of a trust water right may be authorized only if the
department first determines that neither water rights existing at the
time the trust water right is established, nor the public interest will
be impaired. If impairment becomes apparent during the time a trust
water right is being exercised, the department shall cease or modify
the use of the trust water right to eliminate the impairment.
(5) Before any trust water right is created or modified, the
department shall, at a minimum, require that a notice be published in
a newspaper of general circulation published in the county or counties
in which the storage, diversion, and use are to be made, and in other
newspapers as the department determines is necessary, once a week for
two consecutive weeks. At the same time the department shall send a
notice containing pertinent information to all appropriate state
agencies, potentially affected local governments and federally
recognized tribal governments, and other interested parties.
(6) ((RCW 90.14.140 through 90.14.230 have no applicability to
trust water rights held by the department under this chapter or
exercised under this section.
(7))) RCW 90.03.380 has no applicability to trust water rights
acquired by the state through the funding of water conservation
projects.
(((8))) (7) Subsections (4) and (5) of this section do not apply to
a trust water right resulting from a donation for instream flows
described in RCW 90.42.080(1)(b) or to a trust water right leased under
RCW 90.42.080(8) if the period of the lease does not exceed five years.
However, the department shall provide the notice described in
subsection (5) of this section the first time the trust water right
resulting from the donation is exercised.
(((9))) (8) Where a portion of an existing water right that is
acquired or donated to the trust water rights program will assist in
achieving established instream flows, the department shall process the
change or amendment of the existing right without conducting a review
of the extent and validity of the portion of the water right that will
remain with the water right holder.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 90.14.130 (Reversion of rights to state due to nonuse--Notice by order -- Relinquishment determinations -- Appeal) and 1987 c 109
s 13 & 1967 c 233 s 13;
(2) RCW 90.14.140 ("Sufficient cause" for nonuse defined -- Rights
exempted) and 2001 c 240 s 1, 2001 c 237 s 27, 2001 c 69 s 5, 1998 c
258 s 1, 1987 c 125 s 1, & 1967 c 233 s 14;
(3) RCW 90.14.150 (Rights arising from permit to withdraw public
waters not affected -- Extensions) and 1987 c 109 s 100 & 1967 c 233 s
15;
(4) RCW 90.14.160 (Relinquishment of right for abandonment or
failure to beneficially use without sufficient cause -- Prior rights
acquired through appropriation, custom or general adjudication) and
1981 c 291 s 1, 1979 ex.s. c 216 s 5, & 1967 c 233 s 16;
(5) RCW 90.14.170 (Relinquishment of right for abandonment or
failure to beneficially use without sufficient cause -- Rights acquired
due to ownership of land abutting stream, lake, or watercourse) and
1967 c 233 s 17;
(6) RCW 90.14.180 (Relinquishment of right for abandonment or
failure to beneficially use without sufficient cause -- Future rights
acquired through appropriation) and 1987 c 109 s 101 & 1967 c 233 s 18;
(7) RCW 90.14.190 (Water resources decisions -- Appeals -- Attorneys'
fees) and 1987 c 109 s 14 & 1967 c 233 s 19;
(8) RCW 90.14.200 (Implementation and enforcement of chapter--Proceedings under RCW 90.14.130 deemed adjudicative -- Application of RCW
sections to specific proceedings) and 1989 c 175 s 180, 1979 ex.s. c
216 s 6, & 1967 c 233 s 20;
(9) RCW 90.14.210 (Chapter applies to all rights to withdraw ground
waters) and 1967 c 233 s 21; and
(10) RCW 90.14.215 (Chapter not applicable to trust water rights
under chapter 90.38 or 90.42 RCW) and 1991 c 347 s 14.

--- END ---