BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that in many
cases the value of real property directly depends upon the amount of
water that is available for use on that property. The legislature also
recognizes that water rights are a type of property right in which many
different parties may assert an interest. Current statutes require
many property rights actions in which different parties assert
interests, such as actions for partition or eminent domain, to be filed
in superior court. The legislature further finds that informal
procedures such as mediation and fact-finding have been employed
successfully in other areas of the law, and may produce positive
results in certain types of water disputes. The legislature therefore
finds that property owners should have a choice to select informal or
formal hearings before the pollution control hearings board, and that
relinquishment proceedings should be appealed to the court of appeals.

Sec. 2 RCW 34.05.514 and 2001 c 220 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) ((and (3))) through (4)
of this section, proceedings for review under this chapter shall be
instituted by paying the fee required under RCW 36.18.020 and filing a
petition in the superior court, at the petitioner's option, for (a)
Thurston county, (b) the county of the petitioner's residence or
principal place of business, or (c) in any county where the property
owned by the petitioner and affected by the contested decision is
located.
(2) For proceedings involving institutions of higher education, the
petition shall be filed either in the county in which the principal
office of the institution involved is located or in the county of a
branch campus if the action involves such branch.
(3) For proceedings conducted by the pollution control hearings
board pursuant to chapter 43.21B RCW or as otherwise provided in RCW
90.03.210(2) involving decisions of the department of ecology on
applications for changes or transfers of water rights that are the
subject of a general adjudication of water rights that is being
litigated actively under chapter 90.03 or 90.44 RCW, the petition must
be filed with the superior court conducting the adjudication, to be
consolidated by the court with the general adjudication. A party to
the adjudication shall be a party to the appeal under this chapter only
if the party files or is served with a petition for review to the
extent required by this chapter.
(4) For proceedings involving the relinquishment of a water right,
the petition shall be filed in the court of appeals where the land is
located upon which the water was used. Appeals of informal hearings of
the pollution control hearings board shall be filed in the court of
appeals designated in section 13 of this act.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.21B.110 and 2001 c 220 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The hearings board shall only have jurisdiction to hear and
decide appeals from the following decisions of the department, the
director, local conservation districts, and the air pollution control
boards or authorities as established pursuant to chapter 70.94 RCW, or
local health departments:
(a) Civil penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431,
70.105.080, 70.107.050, 88.46.090, 90.03.600, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, and
90.56.330.
(b) Orders issued pursuant to RCW 18.104.043, 18.104.060,
43.27A.190, 70.94.211, 70.94.332, 70.105.095, 86.16.020, 88.46.070,
90.14.130, 90.48.120, and 90.56.330.
(c) Except as provided in RCW 90.03.210(2), the issuance,
modification, or termination of any permit, certificate, or license by
the department or any air authority in the exercise of its
jurisdiction, including the issuance or termination of a waste disposal
permit, the denial of an application for a waste disposal permit, the
modification of the conditions or the terms of a waste disposal permit,
or a decision to approve or deny an application for a solid waste
permit exemption under RCW 70.95.300.
(d) Decisions of local health departments regarding the grant or
denial of solid waste permits pursuant to chapter 70.95 RCW.
(e) Decisions of local health departments regarding the issuance
and enforcement of permits to use or dispose of biosolids under RCW
70.95J.080.
(f) Decisions of the department regarding waste-derived fertilizer
or micronutrient fertilizer under RCW 15.54.820, and decisions of the
department regarding waste-derived soil amendments under RCW 70.95.205.
(g) Decisions of local conservation districts related to the denial
of approval or denial of certification of a dairy nutrient management
plan; conditions contained in a plan; application of any dairy nutrient
management practices, standards, methods, and technologies to a
particular dairy farm; and failure to adhere to the plan review and
approval timelines in RCW 90.64.026.
(h) Any other decision by the department or an air authority which
pursuant to law must be decided as an adjudicative proceeding under
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) The jurisdiction of the pollution control hearings board is
further limited as follows:
(a) The hearings board has no jurisdiction whatsoever to review
orders pertaining to the relinquishment of a water right under RCW
90.14.130, or to review proceedings regarding general adjudications of
water rights conducted pursuant to chapter 90.03 or 90.44 RCW.
(b) The following hearings shall not be conducted by the hearings
board:
(((a))) (i) Hearings required by law to be conducted by the
shorelines hearings board pursuant to chapter 90.58 RCW.
(((b))) (ii) Hearings conducted by the department pursuant to RCW
70.94.332, 70.94.390, 70.94.395, 70.94.400, 70.94.405, 70.94.410, and
90.44.180.
(((c) Proceedings conducted by the department, or the department's
designee, under RCW 90.03.160 through 90.03.210 or 90.44.220.
(d))) (iii) Hearings conducted by the department to adopt, modify,
or repeal rules.
(3) Review of rules and regulations adopted by the hearings board
shall be subject to review in accordance with the provisions of the
Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.21B.130 and 1990 c 65 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, shall apply to
the appeal of rules and regulations adopted by the board to the same
extent as it applied to the review of rules and regulations adopted by
the directors and/or boards or commissions of the various departments
whose powers, duties and functions were transferred by section 6,
chapter 62, Laws of 1970 ex. sess. to the department. Except with
regard to orders pertaining to the relinquishment of a water right
under RCW 90.14.130, all other decisions and orders of the director and
all decisions of air pollution control boards or authorities
established pursuant to chapter 70.94 RCW shall be subject to review by
the hearings board as provided in this chapter.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.21B.240 and 1989 c 175 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department and air authorities shall not have authority to hold
adjudicative proceedings pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act,
chapter 34.05 RCW. ((Such)) All other hearings, except for appeals of
orders pertaining to the relinquishment of a water right under RCW
90.14.130, shall be held by the pollution control hearings board.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.21B.310 and 2001 c 220 s 4 and 2001 c 36 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 90.03.210(2) and subsection (2) of
this section, any order issued by the department or local air authority
pursuant to RCW 70.94.211, 70.94.332, 70.105.095, 43.27A.190,
86.16.020, 88.46.070, or 90.48.120(2) or any provision enacted after
July 26, 1987, or any permit, certificate, or license issued by the
department may be appealed to the pollution control hearings board if
the appeal is filed with the board and served on the department or
authority within thirty days after receipt of the order. Except as
provided under chapter 70.105D RCW and RCW 90.03.210(2), ((this is))
these are the exclusive means of appeal of such an order((.)):
(((2))) (a) The department or the authority in its discretion may
stay the effectiveness of an order during the pendency of such an
appeal.
(((3))) (b) At any time during the pendency of an appeal of such an
order to the board, the appellant may apply pursuant to RCW 43.21B.320
to the hearings board for a stay of the order or for the removal
thereof.
(((4))) (c) Any appeal before the hearings board must contain the
following in accordance with the rules of the hearings board:
(((a))) (i) The appellant's name and address;
(((b))) (ii) The date and docket number of the order, permit, or
license appealed;
(((c))) (iii) A description of the substance of the order, permit,
or license that is the subject of the appeal;
(((d))) (iv) A clear, separate, and concise statement of every
error alleged to have been committed;
(((e))) (v) A clear and concise statement of facts upon which the
requester relies to sustain his or her statements of error; and
(((f))) (vi) A statement setting forth the relief sought.
(((5))) (d) Upon failure to comply with any final order of the
department, the attorney general, on request of the department, may
bring an action in the superior court of the county where the violation
occurred or the potential violation is about to occur to obtain such
relief as necessary, including injunctive relief, to ((insure)) ensure
compliance with the order. The air authorities may bring similar
actions to enforce their orders.
(((6))) (e) An appealable decision or order shall be identified as
such and shall contain a conspicuous notice to the recipient that it
may be appealed only by filing an appeal with the hearings board and
serving it on the department within thirty days of receipt.
(2) Appeals of orders pertaining to the relinquishment of a water
right shall be filed in the court of appeals as provided by RCW
90.14.130.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.27A.190 and 1987 c 109 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
Notwithstanding and in addition to any other powers granted to the
department of ecology, whenever it appears to the department that a
person is violating or is about to violate any of the provisions of the
following:
(1) Chapter 90.03 RCW; or
(2) Chapter 90.44 RCW; or
(3) Chapter 86.16 RCW; or
(4) Chapter 43.37 RCW; or
(5) Chapter 43.27A RCW; or
(6) Any other law relating to water resources administered by the
department; or
(7) A rule or regulation adopted, or a directive or order issued by
the department relating to subsections (1) through (6) of this section;
the department may cause a written regulatory order to be served upon
((said)) the person either personally, or by registered or certified
mail delivered to addressee only with return receipt requested and
acknowledged by him or her. The order shall specify the provision of
the statute, rule, regulation, directive, or order alleged to be or
about to be violated, and the facts upon which the conclusion of
violating or potential violation is based, and shall order the act
constituting the violation or the potential violation to cease and
desist or, in appropriate cases, shall order necessary corrective
action to be taken with regard to such acts within a specific and
reasonable time. The regulation of a headgate or controlling works as
provided in RCW 90.03.070, by a watermaster, stream patrolman, or other
person so authorized by the department shall constitute a regulatory
order within the meaning of this section. A regulatory order issued
hereunder shall become effective immediately upon receipt by the person
to whom the order is directed, except for regulations under RCW
90.03.070 which shall become effective when a written notice is
attached as provided therein. Any person aggrieved by such order may
appeal the order pursuant to RCW 43.21B.310, except that appeals of
orders pertaining to the relinquishment of a water right shall be filed
in the court of appeals pursuant to RCW 90.14.130.

Sec. 8 RCW 90.14.130 and 1987 c 109 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
When it appears to the department of ecology that a person entitled
to the use of water has not beneficially used his or her water right or
some portion thereof, and it appears that ((said)) the person's right
has or may have reverted to the state because of such nonuse, as
provided by RCW 90.14.160, 90.14.170, or 90.14.180, the department of
ecology shall notify such person by order((: PROVIDED, That)).
However, where a company, association, district, or the United States
has filed a blanket claim under the provisions of RCW 90.14.060 for the
total benefits of those served by it, the notice shall be served on
such company, association, district or the United States and not upon
any of its individual water users who may not have used the water or
some portion thereof which they were entitled to use. The order shall
contain: (1) A description of the water right, including the
approximate location of the point of diversion, the general description
of the lands or places where such waters were used, the water source,
the amount involved, the purpose of use, and the apparent authority
upon which the right is based; (2) a statement that unless sufficient
cause be shown on appeal the water right will be declared relinquished;
and (3) a statement that such order may be appealed to ((the pollution
control hearings board)) superior court. Any person aggrieved by such
an order may appeal it to ((the pollution control hearings board
pursuant to RCW 43.21B.310)) the court of appeals in the county where
the land is located upon which the water was used. Any such appeal to
the court of appeals shall be de novo. The order shall be served by
registered or certified mail to the last known address of the person
and be posted at the point of division or withdrawal. The order by
itself shall not alter the recipient's right to use water, if any.

Sec. 9 RCW 90.14.190 and 1987 c 109 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person feeling aggrieved by any decision of the department of
ecology may have the same reviewed pursuant to RCW 43.21B.310.
However, any order pertaining to the relinquishment of a water right
shall be filed in the court of appeals pursuant to RCW 90.14.130. In
any such review, the findings of fact as set forth in the report of the
department of ecology shall be prima facie evidence of the fact of any
waiver or relinquishment of a water right or portion thereof. If the
hearings board affirms the decision of the department, a party seeks
review in superior court of that hearings board decision pursuant to
chapter 34.05 RCW, and the court determines that the party was injured
by an arbitrary, capricious, or erroneous order of the department, the
court may award reasonable attorneys' fees.

Sec. 10 RCW 90.14.200 and 1989 c 175 s 180 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All matters relating to the implementation and enforcement of
this chapter by the department of ecology shall be carried out in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure Act,
except where the provisions of this chapter expressly conflict with
chapter 34.05 RCW. Proceedings held pursuant to RCW 90.14.130 are
((adjudicative proceedings within the meaning of chapter 34.05 RCW.
Final decisions of the department of ecology in these proceedings))
appealable to the court of appeals as provided in that section. Other
final decisions of the department of ecology under this chapter are
subject to review by the pollution control hearings board in accordance
with chapter 43.21B RCW.
(2) RCW 90.14.130 provides nonexclusive procedures for determining
a relinquishment of water rights under RCW 90.14.160, 90.14.170, and
90.14.180. RCW 90.14.160, 90.14.170, and 90.14.180 may be applied in,
among other proceedings, general adjudication proceedings initiated
under RCW 90.03.110 or 90.44.220: PROVIDED, That nothing herein shall
apply to litigation involving determinations of the department of
ecology under RCW 90.03.290 relating to the impairment of existing
rights.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 43.21B
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A person who is aggrieved or adversely affected by a water
quantity decision may appeal the decision to the pollution control
hearings board pursuant to RCW 43.21B.310. Any party to such an appeal
may elect an informal hearing by the board pursuant to this section.
If any party requests an informal hearing, then an informal hearing
must be granted. Informal hearings consist of mediation and fact-finding if a settlement agreement cannot be reached. The hearings
board must adopt rules governing the election, practice, and procedures
of informal hearings consistent with this section and section 12 of
this act.
(2) For purposes of this section, a "water quantity decision"
includes the following:
(a) A decision to grant or deny a permit or certificate for a right
to the beneficial use of water or to amend, change, or transfer such a
right; and
(b) A decision to enforce the conditions of a permit for, or right
to, the beneficial use of water or to require any person to discontinue
the use of water.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 43.21B
RCW to read as follows:
(1) When one of the parties elects an informal hearing pursuant to
section 11 of this act, one of the board members or an administrative
law judge from the environmental hearings office must be assigned as
the mediator for the appeal. The mediation shall be conducted in the
general area where the project under review is located, but may be
conducted by telephone at the discretion of the mediator.
(2) The parties involved in the informal hearing must provide the
mediator and the other parties in advance with a clear concise
statement of the disputed issues and the parties' position in relation
to the issues and supporting documentation. The mediator must meet
with the parties either jointly or separately, and shall take such
steps as the mediator deems appropriate to resolve their differences
and reach a settlement agreement. If a settlement agreement is
reached, the mediator must prepare and submit to the hearings board a
written order of dismissal to which the settlement agreement is
attached. The hearings board must enter the order and dismiss the case
unless the hearings board finds that the settlement agreement is
contrary to law.
If the hearings board finds that the settlement agreement is
contrary to law, it shall notify the parties and refer the dispute back
to mediation. The parties may elect for further mediation or for fact-finding with recommendations in accordance with subsection (3) of this
section.
(3) If the mediator is unable to achieve a settlement agreement
between the parties within thirty days after being appointed, the
mediator must issue a statement that a mutually acceptable settlement
agreement has not been reached. After the issuance of the statement,
either party may request the hearings board to submit the dispute to
fact-finding with recommendations. Notice of the request for fact-finding must be sent to the other parties. The time for mediation may
be extended by mutual agreement between the parties.
(4) Within five days of the receipt of the request for fact-finding, the hearings board must assign one of the board members or an
administrative appeals judge from the environmental hearings office to
serve as fact-finder. The person who served as the mediator to the
dispute may serve as the fact-finder with the consent of both parties.
(5) Within five days of being appointed, the fact-finder must
establish a date, time, and place for the fact-finding hearing. The
date of the hearing must be set within thirty days of the appointment
of the fact-finder. The hearing must be conducted in the general area
where the project under review is located. At least seven days before
the date of the hearing, each party must submit to the fact-finder and
to the other parties written proposals on all of the issues it intends
to submit to fact-finding. The fact-finder has the power to issue
subpoenas requiring the attendance and production of witnesses and the
production of evidence. The order of presentation at the hearing shall
be as agreed by the parties or as determined by the fact-finder. Each
documentary exhibit must be filed with the fact-finder and copies must
be provided to the other parties. The fact-finder must declare the
hearing closed after the parties have completed presenting their
testimony within agreed time limits.
(6) The fact-finder must, within thirty days following the
conclusion of the hearing, make written findings of fact and written
recommendations to the parties as to how the dispute should be
resolved. The fact-finder may not apply any presumption as part of the
findings of fact or recommendations that presumes that an action will
not impair the rights of a senior water right holder. A copy of the
findings and recommendations must also be filed with the hearings
board. The findings of fact and recommendations of the fact-finder are
advisory only, and are not subject to review by the hearings board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 43.21B
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Within thirty days after the fact-finder has issued the
findings of fact and recommendations pursuant to section 12 of this
act, either party may request a formal hearing from the hearings board
or appeal the water quantity decision directly to the court of appeals.
All parties must agree to a formal hearing before a formal hearing is
granted.
(2) If one of the parties elects to file an action in the court of
appeals following an informal hearing, it must be filed where the land
is located upon which the water is or would be used.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 43.21B
RCW to read as follows:
In all appeals involving a decision or an order of the hearings
board after an informal hearing of a water quantity decision by the
department, as defined in section 12 of this act, the appeal to the
court of appeals shall be de novo. However, no issue may be raised in
the court of appeals that was not raised and discussed as part of the
fact-finding hearing. The court of appeals may substitute its own
judgment for that of the fact-finder. The petition shall be filed in
the court of appeals specified in section 13 of this act. Such an
appeal may be perfected by filing with the clerk of the court of
appeals a notice of appeal, and by serving a copy thereof by mail, or
personally on the director. Appellate review of a decision of the
court of appeals may be sought as in other civil cases. No bond may be
required on appeals to the court of appeals or on review by the supreme
court unless specifically required by the judge of the court of
appeals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---