BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature declares and reaffirms that
a core principle embodied in chapter 90.82 RCW is that state agencies
must work cooperatively with local citizens in a process of planning
for future uses of water by giving local citizens and the governments
closest to them the utmost opportunity in determining the future
allocation and management of water in the WRIA or WRIAs being planned.
The legislature further finds that this process of local planning
must have all the tools necessary to accomplish this task and that it
is essential for the legislature to provide a clear statutory process
for implementation so that the locally developed plan will be the
adopted and implemented plan to the greatest extent possible.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 90.82 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For rule making required by a state agency that becomes
obligated under the provisions of RCW 90.82.130, the state agency must
consult with and give deference to the majority opinion of the planning
unit, except for matters that are determined to be in opposition to
state or federal law. The state agency must provide a written
explanation of why the suggestion or suggestions are in opposition to
state or federal law.
(2) A rule adopted under RCW 90.82.130 must use a negotiated rule-making process conducted among water right holders and other affected
residents in the WRIA or WRIAs being planned, and must include the
members of the original planning unit, to the greatest extent
practicable.
(3) Immediately prior to final adoption of a plan by the
appropriate county legislative authority or authorities, the state
agency responsible for rule making must present a draft proposed rule
for each major portion of a proposed plan that creates an obligation
for that state agency to the appropriate county legislative authority
or authorities for approval or disapproval. Agreement between the
state agency and county legislative authority or authorities on the
draft rule language must be reached in order for planning to continue.
A majority vote by the county legislative authority or authorities must
be achieved for a plan to be considered adopted. If the county
legislative authority or authorities object to any portion of the draft
rules, the proposal must be redrafted by the state agency and then
resubmitted to the county legislative authority or authorities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 90.82 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Once a plan is adopted under the provisions of RCW 90.82.130,
the department may only modify the plan or obligations imposed by the
plan through a negotiated rule-making process conducted among water
right holders and other affected residents in a watershed or group of
watersheds, and must include the members of the original planning unit,
to the greatest extent practicable.
(2) If any of the initiating governments determines that the
department has modified the plan or obligations imposed by the plan
without undergoing the process required in subsection (1) of this
section, the initiating government must notify the department of such
a finding within thirty days. Upon receipt of such a notice, the
department must initiate the rule-making process required under
subsection (1) of this section and no rules relating to the watershed
or watersheds may take effect except through the negotiated rule-making
process.

--- END ---