BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.03.015 and 1987 c 109 s 65 are each amended to read
as follows:
((As used in this chapter:)) The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology;
(2) "Director" means the director of ecology; ((and))
(3) "Municipal water supplier" means:
(a) A purveyor, as defined in RCW 70.116.030, that: (i) Owns or
operates a public water system that is entitled or obligated to serve
existing and additional customers and uses within one or more approved
water service areas to the extent such customers and uses are allowed
under an applicable land use plan; and (ii) has an approved water
system plan under chapter 43.20 or 70.116 RCW; or
(b) An irrigation district organized under chapter 87.03 RCW.
(4) "Municipal water supply purposes" means any beneficial use for
which water is or is anticipated to be provided by a municipal water
supplier, and includes water held to meet future demands or to meet
state requirements for back-up supplies such as provisions in the
wellhead protection program; and
(5) "Person" means any firm, association, water users' association,
corporation, irrigation district, or municipal corporation, as well as
an individual.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.03.386 and 1991 c 350 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Within service areas established pursuant to chapters 43.20 and
70.116 RCW, the department of ecology and the department of health
shall coordinate approval procedures to ensure compliance and
consistency with the approved water system plan.
(2) For a public water system, the maximum number of service
connections, or maximum population to be served, or size or location of
the place of use, as described or specified on a water right
application, permit, certificate, or claim or as described or specified
in related supporting documents may not be an attribute limiting
exercise of the water right if an annual quantity limit can be
determined from the permit, certificate, or claim. However, if a water
system plan is required to be approved for the public water system
under chapter 43.20 RCW or as part of a coordinated water system plan
under chapter 70.116 RCW, the number of service connections or
population served under the water right may be further expanded only
during such time as the public water system is in compliance with the
requirements of its approved water system plan.
(3) The place of use of water rights held by a municipal water
supplier for a public water system is the service area described in the
system's water system plan approved under chapter 43.20 RCW or approved
as part of a coordinated water system plan under chapter 70.116 RCW, as
either plan may be amended from time to time. The purpose of use of
water rights held by a municipal water supplier for a public water
system is municipal water supply purposes. The department must modify
water right records as necessary as individual records come up for
review.

--- END ---