BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is a
critical need to establish a single purpose agency to administer
Washington's water resource laws and that the agency be directly
accountable to the voters of the state of Washington.
The legislature declares that the findings of the governor's
Washington competitiveness council released December 11, 2001, are
accurate and that a water commission is necessary for the effective
management of the water resources of the state. The legislature
further declares that there is a growing necessity to provide for the
increasing need of the state and its citizens for water for industrial,
agricultural, residential, social, economic, recreational,
environmental, and other needs and to plan, coordinate, restore, and
regulate the utilization of our water resources in a manner that
ensures that the public interest is protected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commission" means the Washington water commission.
(2) "Commissioner" means a member of the Washington water
commission.
(3) "Chair" means the chair of the commission.
(4) "Department" means the Washington state department of ecology.
(5) "Public interest" means all uses of the water resources of the
state and its impact on the state of Washington and its citizens,
including the use of water for domestic, industrial, commercial,
agricultural, irrigation, hydroelectric power production, mining,
thermal power production, recreation, and the preservation of
environmental values and all other uses compatible with the enjoyment
of the public waters of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 There is created a department of state
government to be known as the Washington water commission.
The commission has the following powers, duties, and functions with
regard to water resources:
(1) The supervision of the public waters within the state and their
appropriation, diversion, and use, and of the various officers and
employees of the state connected therewith;
(2) The supervision of construction and inspection of all water
works for the purpose of reasonably securing safety to life and
property;
(3) Determinations as to the discharge of streams and springs and
other sources of water supply, and the capacities of lakes and of
reservoirs whose waters are being or may be utilized for beneficial
purposes;
(4) Providing assistance to applicants for a water right in
obtaining or developing an adequate and appropriate supply of water
consistent with the land use permitted for the area in which the water
is to be used and the population forecast for the area under RCW
43.62.035;
(5) Maintaining records as may be necessary for the recording of
the financial transactions and statistical data thereof;
(6) Making written reports of the office's work to the governor and
the legislature with recommendations for legislation as the commission
deems advisable;
(7) Exercising all the powers and duties prescribed by law with
respect to flood control;
(8) The adoption of rules for the administration of Washington
water resource laws;
(9) Supervision over Washington water resource laws for the purpose
of ensuring that the administration of the laws and the use and
conservation of water resources benefits the public interest; and
(10) Performing other duties as may be prescribed by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The commission consists of seven members who
are registered voters. Three commissioners must be residents of the
portion of the state lying east of the summit of the Cascade mountains
and be elected at large from that portion of the state. Three
commissioners must be residents of the portion of the state lying west
of the summit of the Cascade mountains and be elected at large from
that portion of the state. The governor must appoint a seventh
commissioner with the advice of the Washington state senate. Elected
commissioners serve four-year terms. The initial terms must be
staggered so that a total of three commissioners are elected at each
general election held in even-numbered years. The commissioner
appointed by the governor serves at the pleasure of the governor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) All powers, duties, and functions of the
department of ecology pertaining to those powers and duties set out in
section 3 of this act are transferred to the commission. All
references to the director or the department of ecology in the Revised
Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the commission when
referring to the functions transferred in this section.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the department of
ecology pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall be delivered to the custody of the commission. All cabinets,
furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible
property employed by the department of ecology in carrying out the
powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be made available to
the commission. All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection
with the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be assigned to
the commission.
(b) Any appropriations made to the department of ecology for
carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on
the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to the
commission.
(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any
personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment,
or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers
and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the
director of financial management shall make a determination as to the
proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the department of ecology engaged in
performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred are
transferred to the jurisdiction of the commission. All employees
classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are
assigned to the commission to perform their usual duties upon the same
terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action
that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and
rules governing state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the department of
ecology pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall be continued and acted upon by the commission. All existing
contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be
performed by the commission.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the department of ecology shall not affect the validity of any act
performed before the effective date of this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the personnel
resources board as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 90 RCW.

--- END ---