BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This chapter may be known and cited as the
diversification of electricity supply and demand management act.

Sec. 2 RCW 80.60.005 and 1998 c 318 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that it is in the public interest to:
(1) Encourage private investment in renewable energy resources;
(2) Stimulate the economic growth of this state; ((and))
(3) Enhance the continued diversification of the energy resources
used in this state; and
(4) Promote conservation and efficiency in electricity usage.

Sec. 3 RCW 80.60.010 and 2000 c 158 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.
(1) "Alternative energy resources" means the electricity produced
from generation facilities fueled by: (a) Wind; (b) solar energy; (c)
geothermal energy; (d) landfill gas; (e) wave or tidal action; (f) gas
produced during the treatment of wastewater; (g) qualified hydropower;
or (h) biomass energy based on solid organic fuels from wood, forest,
or field residues, or dedicated energy crops that do not include wood
pieces that have been treated with chemical preservatives such as
creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic.
(2) "Commission" means the utilities and transportation commission.
(((2))) (3) "Conservation and efficiency resources" means measures
that yield a decrease of energy consumption while providing the same
level of energy service.
(4) "Customer-generator" means a user of a net metering system.
(((3))) (5) "Department" means the department of community, trade,
and economic development.
(6) "Electrical company" means a company owned by investors that
meets the definition of RCW 80.04.010.
(((4))) (7) "Electric cooperative" means a cooperative or
association organized under chapter 23.86 or 24.06 RCW.
(((5))) (8) "Electric utility" means any electrical company, public
utility district, irrigation district, port district, electric
cooperative, or municipal electric utility that is engaged in the
business of distributing electricity to retail electric customers in
the state.
(((6))) (9) "Irrigation district" means an irrigation district
under chapter 87.03 RCW.
(((7))) (10) "Municipal electric utility" means a city or town that
owns or operates an electric utility authorized by chapter 35.92 RCW.
(((8))) (11) "Net metering" means measuring the difference between
the electricity supplied by an electric utility and the electricity
generated by a customer-generator that is fed back to the electric
utility over the applicable billing period.
(((9))) (12) "Net metering system" means a fuel cell or a facility
for the production of electrical energy that:
(a) Uses as its fuel either solar, wind, or hydropower;
(b) Has a generating capacity of not more than twenty-five
kilowatts;
(c) Is located on the customer-generator's premises;
(d) Operates in parallel with the electric utility's transmission
and distribution facilities; and
(e) Is intended primarily to offset part or all of the customer-generator's requirements for electricity.
(((10))) (13) "Port district" means a port district within which an
industrial development district has been established as authorized by
Title 53 RCW.
(((11))) (14) "Public utility district" means a district authorized
by chapter 54.04 RCW.
(15) "Qualified diversity resources" means (a) conservation and
efficiency resources contracted for after March 1, 2003; or (b)
alternative energy resources that are either:
(i) Alternative energy resources initiating operations after March
1, 2003, that are physically metered and that are verified in
Washington; or
(ii) Existing alternative energy resources located in Washington
and fully owned or contracted by a Washington utility.
(16) "Qualified hydropower" means the additional energy produced by
(a) existing hydropower facilities that have been modernized or
upgraded after June 1, 2000, to increase capacity or efficiency; or (b)
new hydropower facilities that operate with a head of twenty meters or
less.
(17) "Small electric utility" means any consumer-owned utility with
twenty-five thousand or fewer electric meters in service, or that has
an average of seven or fewer customers per mile of distribution line.
"Electric meters in service" means those meters that record in at least
nine months in any calendar year not less than two hundred fifty
kilowatt hours per month.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) By January 1, 2009, and each year
thereafter through December 31, 2013, each electric utility shall
ensure that at least five percent of its resources used to serve its
Washington retail customers are qualified diversity resources. Of the
five percent, not less than one and one-quarter percent must be
alternative energy resources and not less than one and one-quarter
percent must be conservation and efficiency resources.
(2) By January 1, 2014, and each year thereafter, each electric
utility shall ensure that at least ten percent of its resources used to
serve its Washington retail customers are qualified diversity
resources. Of the ten percent, not less than two and one-half percent
must be alternative energy resources and not less than two and one-half
percent must be conservation and efficiency resources.
(3) An electric utility that as of March 1, 2003, owns or has under
contract sufficient resources to meet one hundred percent of its annual
energy needs to serve its customers is exempt from the alternative
energy resources obligations of this section until such time as those
resources are no longer sufficient to serve at least ninety-five
percent of its annual energy needs, or January 1, 2011, whichever is
earlier.
(4) If in any year the lowest cost alternative energy resource
available to a utility exceeds one hundred ten percent of the capital
and energy cost from a new generation facility that is not an
alternative energy resource, the utility is relieved of its alternative
resource obligations under this section.
(5) A small utility may meet its obligation under this section by
investing at least two times the amount of its conservation and
renewables discount pursuant to the Bonneville power administration's
conservation and renewables discount program for the contract period
beginning October 1, 2003.
(6) A utility is relieved of its obligation under this section with
regard to alternative energy resources for that portion of its customer
load that is met with power purchased from the Bonneville power
administration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) By January 1, 2009, and each year
thereafter through December 31, 2013, each natural gas distribution
utility that provides gas services within two or more counties shall
ensure that at least two and one-half percent of its resources used to
serve its Washington retail customers are conservation and efficiency
resources.
(2) By January 1, 2014, and each year thereafter, each natural gas
distribution utility that provides gas services within two or more
counties shall ensure that at least five percent of its resources used
to serve its Washington retail customers are conservation and
efficiency resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) By March 1, 2005, and by each March 1st
thereafter, each electric utility, except electrical companies, shall
report at an open public meeting its activities undertaken to achieve
the requirements of section 4 of this act. A written copy or
transcript of the report must also be submitted to the department
within twenty days of the public meeting.
(2) Beginning March 1, 2005, and by each March 1st thereafter, each
electrical company and gas company shall report to the commission its
activities undertaken to achieve the requirements of sections 4 and 5
of this act.
(3) By July 1, 2005, and each July 1st thereafter, the department
and the commission must jointly report to the legislature and the
governor whether and how the standards in sections 4 and 5 of this act
have been met for the previous calendar year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.21F RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt rules governing the reporting
requirements in section 6(1) of this act.
(2) The department shall adopt rules establishing criteria for
determining whether resources qualify as alternative energy resources
or conservation and efficiency resources as defined in RCW 80.60.010.
To the extent practicable, these criteria shall be consistent with any
pertinent recommendations of the regional technical forum of the
Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning council
created under P.L. 96-501, 16 U.S.C. Sec. 839. The department may
establish procedures by which an electric utility, except an electric
company, that makes expenditures for eligible conservation and
efficiency resources in an amount equivalent to two percent of its
previous calendar year's gross revenues from the bundled sale of
electricity to Washington retail customers is deemed to have dedicated
one-half of one percent of its resources toward the conservation and
efficiency requirements of section 4 of this act. The rules shall
include criteria for qualifying expenditures for weatherization of
low-income households as conservation and efficiency resources. The
department shall also consider energy savings realized from smart
meters and other energy management systems in establishing criteria
under this section.
(3) By July 1, 2005, the department shall establish criteria by
which utilities may meet the provisions of sections 4 and 5 of this act
through a qualified diversity resource credit trading program. For
purposes of this section, "qualified diversity resource credit trading
program" means a clearinghouse or other system through which a utility
may secure, for trade or other consideration, verifiable evidence that
a second party has developed a qualified diversity resource equivalent
in part or in full to the utility's obligation under this section and
that the second party agrees to transfer such evidence exclusively to
the credit of the utility. The department shall report to the
legislature regarding the establishment of any credit trading program
under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 80.28 RCW
to read as follows:
The commission shall adopt rules to implement sections 4 through 6
of this act with respect to electrical companies and gas companies.
The rules may include criteria to establish equivalence between an
electric company's expenditure levels for conservation and efficiency
resources and the performance standard percentages set out in sections
4 and 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Each electric utility, as defined in RCW
80.60.010, shall undertake and complete by January 1, 2005, a
feasibility study to determine effective methods for reducing by at
least three percent use of electricity during daily peak periods of
electricity demand. Each utility shall report the results of its study
under section 6 of this act. The study shall consider the feasibility
and effectiveness of such factors as: Providing consumers information
on the cost of electricity at different times of day or season; "smart
meters" technology or other energy management systems that enable
consumers and utilities to improve management of electricity supply and
cost; and rate structures that create an incentive for demand reduction
dispatched by utilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 and 4 through 6 of this act are
each added to chapter 80.60 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---