BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes that:
(a) Early learning and child care are an essential part of the
daily lives of Washington families;
(b) The state is involved in many early learning and child care
programs and services that are administered through at least three
state agencies;
(c) A more cohesive and integrated early learning and child care
system would result in greater efficiencies for the state and greater
accessibility for the families that the programs are intended to serve;
and
(d) An effective system of governance would provide leadership,
voice, and vision for early learning and child care in state
government.
(2) The legislature finds that the early years of a child's life
are critical to the child's healthy brain development and that the
quality of caregiving during the early years can significantly impact
the child's intellectual and emotional growth and social adjustment.
(3) It is therefore the purpose of this chapter to initiate the
development of a seamless statewide system of programs and services.
This system is not intended to impose any learning goals or program
standards on families not associated with or partaking of the programs
and services identified in this act, but rather is meant to provide
support to families in preparing for and maintaining children's success
in school.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The governor and the superintendent of
public instruction shall coordinate the administration of early
learning and child care programs and services in the state.
(1) For the purposes of this chapter, "early learning and child
care programs and services" are limited to the following functions and
entities:
(a) State training and registry system investments;
(b) State head start collaboration project;
(c) Title 1B - Even Start Family Literacy Program;
(d) Child and adult care food program;
(e) IDEA part B special education for children three to five years
of age;
(f) IDEA part C early intervention for children birth through two
years of age;
(g) Title 1, part C migrant education preschool program;
(h) Licensing of child care centers and homes;
(i) Child care health inspections;
(j) All programs financed and contracted through the child care
development fund;
(k) All child care and early learning activities authorized under
chapter 74.13 RCW;
(l) All state child care subsidy programs; and
(m) Early childhood education and assistance program.
(2) In administering the early learning and child care programs and
services in the state, it is the intent of the legislature that the
governor and the superintendent of public instruction coordinate and
collaborate with all federally funded early learning and child care
programs and services operating in the state, such as head start, 21st
century community learning centers, early learning and child care
programs funded under the no child left behind act, and before/after
school programs for children under thirteen years of age.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) There is established an early learning
and child care task force within the office of the superintendent of
public instruction to oversee the coordination of early learning and
child care programs and services in the state. The task force shall be
under the joint authority of the governor and the superintendent of
public instruction. The focus of the task force shall be the
identification of the most efficient system for the administration and
fiscal management of early learning and child care programs and
services in the state, including the consolidation of functions and
entities of the programs listed in section 1, as appropriate. In
conducting its work, the task force shall seek involvement from
families, schools, community, and stakeholder groups involved with
early learning and child care programs and services throughout the
state.
(2) It is intended that the membership of the task force include,
but not be limited to, the following: (a) Individuals with expertise
in the design and delivery of early learning and child care services in
a school setting; (b) individuals with expertise in the design and
delivery of early learning and child care services in both a nonprofit
and for-profit licensed center and family home child care settings; (c)
individuals who design and deliver early learning and child care
programs and services, including representatives of higher education
and state governmental agencies; and (d) individuals who are parents of
children under thirteen years of age.
For the purposes of this subsection, "parent" includes a legal
guardian or other person standing in loco parentis, such as a
grandparent or stepparent with whom the child lives, or a person who is
legally responsible for the welfare of the child.
(3) The task force shall consist of seventeen members as follows:
(a) Five members recommended by the child care coordinating
committee, jointly appointed by the governor and the superintendent of
public instruction;
(b) Four members appointed by the governor;
(c) Four members appointed by the superintendent of public
instruction; and
(d) Four members of the legislature, one from each political caucus
of the house of representatives to be appointed by the speaker of the
house of representatives and one from each political caucus of the
senate to be appointed by the president of the senate, each of whom
shall serve as ex officio, nonvoting members of the task force.
(4) The governor and the superintendent of public instruction shall
each appoint a cochair of the task force from among its membership.
Vacancies in the membership of the task force shall be filled in the
same manner as the original appointments.
(5) Nongovernmental members of the task force shall be reimbursed
for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
Legislative members of the task force shall serve without additional
compensation but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance
with RCW 44.04.120 while attending sessions of the task force or on
official business authorized by the task force.
(6) Initial appointments to the task force shall be made no later
than thirty days after the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The governor and the superintendent of
public instruction, in consultation with the early learning and child
care task force, shall carry out the following tasks:
(a) Creation of consistent aligned early learning goals for
children younger than school age that address the multiple
developmental aspects of young children, including cognitive,
linguistic, social, emotional, and physical domains that are aligned
with K-12 standards;
(b) Creation of consistent alignment among different program
standards for early learning programs and services;
(c) Design of an integrated system of staffing and professional
development for early learning and child care programs and services;
(d) Identification of comprehensive, family-focused services to be
provided by early learning and child care programs for children and
families who need more intensive support;
(e) Design of a plan to address barriers to the provision of early
learning and child care services, such as issues relating to facilities
and transportation; and
(f) Develop recommendations to improve collaboration and
integration between the early learning and child care system and the K-12 and higher education system.
(2) The governor and the superintendent of public instruction, in
consultation with the early learning and child care task force, shall
develop a plan for implementation of the duties provided in subsection
(1) of this section, and shall report that plan to the legislature by
January 1, 2004.
(3) By September 1, 2004, the governor and the superintendent of
public instruction shall report to the legislature on the
implementation of the consistent aligned early learning goals in
subsection (1)(a) of this section. In carrying out the development of
these goals, the governor and the superintendent of public instruction
shall consult broadly with individuals and representatives of
individuals described in section 3(2) of this act, and assure the
involvement of the broad constituencies representing child care, early
learning, and educational interests in the state.
(4) By September 1, 2005, the governor and the superintendent of
public instruction shall report to the legislature on the
implementation of the duties provided in subsection (1)(b) through (e)
of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The early learning and child care task
force shall develop a plan for coordination of the functions and
entities listed in section 2 of this act, and shall include planning
for consolidation of functions and entities, as appropriate. The early
learning and child care task force shall present the plan to the
governor and the superintendent of public instruction by December 15,
2003.
(2) By January 1, 2004, the governor and the superintendent of
public instruction shall report to the legislature the plan for
coordination of the functions and entities provided in subsection (1)
of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 By January 2005, to the extent possible
within available funds, the governor and the superintendent of public
instruction shall implement the plan for coordination pursuant to
section 4(2) of this act. The governor and the superintendent of
public instruction shall report to the legislature on the
implementation of the plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The early learning and child care task force
shall expire October 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 74 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2003, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---