BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.42.005 and 2002 c 153 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the health and safety of its
citizens, natural resources, and the environment are vital interests of
the state that must be protected to preserve the state's quality of
life. The legislature also finds that the state's economic well-being
is a vital interest that depends upon the development of fair,
coordinated ((environmental permitting)) regulatory processes that
ensure that the state not only protects public health and safety and
natural resources but also encourages appropriate activities that
stimulate growth and development. The legislature further finds that
Washington's ((environmental protection)) regulatory programs have
established strict standards to ((reduce pollution and)) protect public
health and safety and the environment.
(2) The legislature also finds that, as the number of environmental
and land use laws have grown in Washington, so have the number of
permits required of business and government. The increasing number of
individual permits and permit agencies has generated the potential for
conflict, overlap, and duplication among various state, local, and
federal permits. Lack of coordination in the processing of project
applications may cause costly delays and frustration to applicants.
(3) The legislature further finds that not all project applicants
require the same type of assistance. Applicants with small projects
may merely need information about local and state permits and
assistance in applying for those permits, while intermediate-sized
projects may require a facilitated permit process, and large complex
projects may need extensive coordination among local, state, and
federal agencies and tribal governments.
(4) The legislature further finds that persons doing business in
Washington state should have access to clear and appropriate
information regarding state regulations, permit requirements, and
agency rule-making processes.
(5) The legislature, therefore, finds that a range of assistance
and coordination options should be available to project applicants from
a state office independent of any local, state, or federal permit
agency. The legislature finds that citizens, businesses, and project
applicants should be provided with:
(a) A reliable and consolidated source of information concerning
federal, state, and local environmental and land use laws and
procedures that may apply to any given project;
(b) Facilitated interagency forums for discussion of significant
issues related to the multiple permitting processes if needed for some
project applicants; and
(c) Active coordination of all applicable regulatory and land use
permitting procedures if needed for some project applicants.
(((5))) (6) The legislature declares that the purpose of this
chapter is to transfer the existing permit assistance center in the
department of ecology to a new office of permit assistance in the
office of financial management to:
(a) Assure that citizens, businesses, and project applicants will
continue to be provided with vital information regarding environmental
and land use laws and with assistance in complying with environmental
and land use laws to promote understanding of these laws and to protect
public health and safety and the environment;
(b) Ensure that facilitation of project permit decisions by permit
agencies promotes both process efficiency and environmental protection;
(c) Allow for coordination of permit processing for large projects
upon project applicants' request and at project applicants' expense to
promote efficiency, ensure certainty, and avoid conflicts among permit
agencies; and
(d) Provide these services through an office independent of any
permit agency to ensure that any potential or perceived conflicts of
interest related to providing these services or making permit decisions
can be avoided.
(((6))) (7) The legislature also declares that the purpose of this
chapter is to provide citizens of the state with access to information
regarding state regulations, permit requirements, and agency rule-making processes in Washington state.
(8) The legislature intends that establishing an office of
((permit)) regulatory assistance will provide these services without
abrogating or limiting the authority of any permit agency to make
decisions on permits that it issues or any rule-making agency to make
decisions on regulations. The legislature therefore declares that the
office of ((permit)) regulatory assistance shall have authority to
provide these services but shall not have any authority to make
decisions on permits.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.42.010 and 2002 c 153 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The office of ((permit)) regulatory assistance is created in
the office of financial management and shall be administered by the
office of the governor to assist citizens, businesses, and project
applicants.
(2) The office shall:
(a) Maintain and furnish information as provided in RCW 43.42.040;
(b) Furnish facilitation as provided in RCW 43.42.050;
(c) Furnish coordination as provided in RCW 43.42.060;
(d) Coordinate cost reimbursement as provided in RCW 43.42.070;
(e) Work with state agencies and local governments to continue to
develop a range of permit assistance options for project applicants;
(f) Review initiatives developed by the transportation permit
efficiency and accountability committee established in chapter 47.06C
RCW and determine if any would be beneficial if implemented for other
types of projects;
(g) Work to develop informal processes for dispute resolution
between agencies and permit applicants;
(h) Conduct customer surveys to evaluate its effectiveness; and
(i) Provide the following biennial reports to the governor and the
appropriate committees of the legislature:
(i) A performance report, based on the customer surveys required in
(h) of this subsection;
(ii) A report on any statutory or regulatory conflicts identified
by the office in the course of its duties that arise from differing
legal authorities and roles of agencies and how these were resolved.
The report may include recommendations to the legislature and to
agencies; and
(iii) A report regarding use of outside independent consultants
under RCW 43.42.070, including the nature and amount of work performed
and implementation of requirements relating to costs.
(3) A director of the office shall be hired no later than June 1,
2003.
(4) The office shall give priority to furnishing assistance to
small projects when expending general fund moneys allocated to it.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.42.030 and 2002 c 153 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Office" means the office of ((permit)) regulatory assistance
in the office of financial management established in RCW 43.42.010.
(2) "Permit" means any permit, certificate, use authorization, or
other form of governmental approval required in order to construct or
operate a project in the state of Washington.
(3) "Permit agency" means any state or local agency authorized by
law to issue permits.
(4) "Project" means any activity, the conduct of which requires a
permit or permits from one or more permit agencies.
(5) "Project applicant" means a citizen, business, or any entity
seeking a permit or permits in the state of Washington.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.42.040 and 2002 c 153 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The office shall assist citizens, businesses, and project
applicants by maintaining and furnishing information, including, but
not limited to:
(((1))) (a) To the extent possible, compiling and periodically
updating one or more handbooks containing lists and explanations of
permit laws, including all relevant local, state, federal, and tribal
laws. In providing this information, the office shall seek the
cooperation of relevant local, state, and federal agencies and tribal
governments;
(((2))) (b) Establishing and providing notice of a point of contact
for obtaining information;
(((3))) (c) Working closely and cooperatively with the business
license center in providing efficient and nonduplicative service;
(((4))) (d) Collecting and making available information regarding
federal, state, local, and tribal government programs that rely on
private professional expertise to assist agencies in project permit
review; and
(((5))) (e) Developing a call center and a web site.
(2) The office shall coordinate among state agencies to develop an
office web site that is linked through the office of the governor's web
site and that contains information regarding regulatory requirements
for businesses and citizens in Washington state. At a minimum, the web
site shall provide information or links to information on:
(a) Federal, state, and local rule-making processes and permit
requirements applicable to Washington businesses and citizens;
(b) Federal, state, and local licenses, permits, and approvals
necessary to start and operate a business or develop real property in
Washington;
(c) State and local building codes;
(d) Federal, state, and local economic development programs that
may be available to businesses in Washington; and
(e) State and local agencies regulating or providing assistance to
citizens and businesses operating a business or developing real
property in Washington.
(3) This section does not create an independent cause of action,
affect any existing cause of action, or create any new cause of action
regarding the application of regulatory or permit requirements.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.131.401 and 2002 c 153 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
The office of ((permit)) regulatory assistance established in RCW
43.42.010 and its powers and duties shall be terminated June 30, 2007,
as provided in RCW 43.131.402.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.131.402 and 2002 c 153 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective June 30, 2008:
(1) RCW 43.42.005 and section 1 of this act & 2002 c 153 s 1;
(2) RCW 43.42.010 and section 2 of this act & 2002 c 153 s 2;
(3) RCW 43.42.020 and 2002 c 153 s 3;
(4) RCW 43.42.030 and section 3 of this act & 2002 c 153 s 4;
(5) RCW 43.42.040 and section 4 of this act & 2002 c 153 s 5;
(6) RCW 43.42.050 and 2002 c 153 s 6;
(7) RCW 43.42.060 and 2002 c 153 s 7;
(8) RCW 43.42.070 and 2002 c 153 s 8;
(9) ((Section 9 of this act;
(10))) RCW 43.42.905 and 2002 c 153 s 10;
(((11))) (10) RCW 43.42.900 and 2002 c 153 s 11; and
(((12))) (11) RCW 43.42.901 and 2002 c 153 s 12.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 2 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---