BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby levied and there shall be collected from every
person in this state a use tax for the privilege of consuming
electrical energy within this state.
(2) The tax shall be levied and collected in an amount equal to the
value of electrical energy multiplied by the rate in effect under RCW
82.16.020 for the public utility tax on a light and power business as
defined in RCW 82.16.010. For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Value of electrical energy" means the consideration paid,
given, or contracted to be paid or given by the purchaser of the
electrical energy to the seller of the electrical energy, but does not
include any amounts that are paid for distributing and transmitting
electrical energy subject to tax under this section if those amounts
are subject to tax under chapter 82.16 RCW.
(b) "Wheeling" means distributing and transmitting electrical
energy.
(3) The tax levied under this section does not apply to the
consumption of electrical energy generated for the person's own use.
For the purposes of this subsection:
(a) Electrical energy is considered as generated by a person for
that person's own use if the person owns or leases the generating
facility, or a portion of the facility, that supplies electrical energy
to the person, or has other financial arrangements with the owner of
the facility that are comparable to an ownership or lease interest.
(b) "Person" includes the person, affiliated parties to the person,
and the person's tenants.
(4) The tax levied under this section does not apply to the
consumption of electrical energy and capacity if the user is:
(a) A direct service industrial customer as defined in RCW
82.16.0495; or
(b) A company that had the ability, as of the effective date of
this act, to import into the state, over interstate transmission
facilities owned by the company, electrical energy purchased out of
state.
(5) The tax levied in this section does not apply to the
consumption of electrical energy purchased from a seller who has paid
a tax under RCW 82.16.020 with respect to electrical energy for which
exemption is sought under this subsection.
(6) There shall be a credit against the tax levied in this section
in an amount equal to the tax paid by:
(a) The seller or buyer of the electrical energy subject to a gross
receipts tax similar to that imposed under RCW 82.16.020 by any other
state or political subdivision of any other state or any foreign
country or political subdivision of any foreign country with respect to
the electrical energy for which a credit is sought under this
subsection; or
(b) The person consuming the electrical energy upon which a use tax
similar to the tax imposed under this section was paid to another state
with respect to the electrical energy for which a credit is sought
under this subsection.
(7)(a) A light and power business wheeling electrical energy to a
person subject to the tax under this section shall make a quarterly
report to the department. The report must contain the kilowatt hours
of electrical energy delivered and other information as the department
may require.
(b) The obligation of a light and power business to make a
quarterly report under this section does not apply to the light and
power business if the seller of the electrical energy subject to the
tax under this section is licensed or registered to do business in the
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The governing body of a city or town, while not required by
legislative mandate to do so, may, by resolution or ordinance for the
purposes authorized by this section, fix and impose on every person a
use tax for the privilege of consuming electrical energy within the
city.
(2) The tax shall be levied and collected in an amount equal to the
value of electrical energy multiplied by the rate in effect for the tax
on electrical energy businesses under RCW 35.21.870 in the city in
which the electrical energy is consumed. For the purposes of this
section:
(a) "Value of electrical energy" means the consideration paid,
given, or contracted to be paid or given by the purchaser of the
electrical energy to the seller of the electrical energy, but does not
include any amounts that are paid for distributing and transmitting
electrical energy subject to tax under this section if those amounts
are subject to tax under chapter 35.21 RCW.
(b) "Wheeling" means distributing and transmitting electrical
energy.
(3) The tax levied under this section does not apply to the
consumption of electrical energy generated for that person's own use.
For the purposes of this subsection:
(a) Electrical energy is considered as generated by a person for
that person's own use if the person owns or leases the generating
facility, or a portion of the facility that supplies electrical energy
to the person, or has other financial arrangements with the owner of
the facility that are comparable to an ownership or lease interest.
(b) "Person" includes the person, affiliated parties to the person,
and the person's tenants.
(4) The tax levied under this section does not apply to the
consumption of electrical energy and capacity if the user is:
(a) A direct service industrial customer as defined in RCW
82.16.0495; or
(b) A company that had the ability, as of the effective date of
this act, to import into the state, over interstate transmission
facilities owned by the company, electrical energy purchased out of
state.
(5) The tax levied in this section does not apply to the
consumption of electrical energy purchased from a seller who has paid
a tax under RCW 35.21.870 with respect to electrical energy for which
exemption is sought under this subsection.
(6) The tax levied in this section does not apply to the
consumption of electrical energy purchased from a seller who has paid
a tax under RCW 35.21.870 with respect to electrical energy for which
exemption is sought under this subsection.
(7) There shall be a credit against the tax levied in this section
in an amount equal to the tax paid by:
(a) The seller or buyer of the electrical energy subject to a gross
receipts tax similar to that authorized under RCW 35.21.870 and imposed
by any other state or political subdivision of any other state with
respect to the electrical energy for which a credit is sought under
this subsection; or
(b) The person consuming the electrical energy upon which a use tax
similar to the tax imposed under this section was paid to another state
with respect to the electrical energy for which a credit is sought
under this subsection.
(8) The tax imposed in this section shall be paid by the person
consuming the electrical energy. The administration and collection of
the tax imposed under this section shall be as provided under RCW
82.14.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect August 1, 2003.

--- END ---