BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17.510 and 1995 c 397 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All written political advertising, whether relating to
candidates or ballot propositions, shall include the sponsor's name and
address. All radio and television political advertising, whether
relating to candidates or ballot propositions, shall include the
sponsor's name. All automated telephonic political advertising,
whether relating to candidates or ballot propositions, shall include
the sponsor's name and phone number at the beginning of the phone
message. The use of an assumed name shall be unlawful. The party with
which a candidate files shall be clearly identified in political
advertising for partisan office.
(2) In addition to the materials required by subsection (1) of this
section, all political advertising undertaken as an independent
expenditure by a person or entity other than a party organization must
include the following statement on the communication "NOTICE TO VOTERS
(Required by law): This advertisement is not authorized or approved by
any candidate. It is paid for by (name, address, city, state)." If
the advertisement undertaken as an independent expenditure is
undertaken by a nonindividual other than a party organization, then the
following notation must also be included: "Top Five Contributors,"
followed by a listing of the names of the five persons or entities
making the largest contributions reportable under this chapter during
the twelve-month period before the date of the advertisement.
(3) The statements and listings of contributors required by
subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall:
(a) Appear on the first page or fold of the written communication
in at least ten-point type, or in type at least ten percent of the
largest size type used in a written communication directed at more than
one voter, such as a billboard or poster, whichever is larger;
(b) Not be subject to the half-tone or screening process;
(c) Be set apart from any other printed matter; and
(d) Be clearly spoken on any broadcast advertisement.
(4) Political yard signs are exempt from the requirement of
subsections (1) and (2) of this section that the name and address of
the sponsor of political advertising be listed on the advertising. In
addition, the public disclosure commission shall, by rule, exempt from
the identification requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this
section forms of political advertising such as campaign buttons,
balloons, pens, pencils, sky-writing, inscriptions, and other forms of
advertising where identification is impractical.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "yard sign" means any outdoor
sign with dimensions no greater than eight feet by four feet.

--- END ---