BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that it is important
in these dire economic times to maximize federal food assistance
funding to low-income individuals.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.08.025 and 1997 c 58 s 101 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Public assistance may be awarded to any applicant:
(a) Who is in need and otherwise meets the eligibility requirements
of department assistance programs; and
(b) Who has not made a voluntary assignment of property or cash for
the purpose of qualifying for an assistance grant; and
(c) Who is not an inmate of a public institution except as a
patient in a medical institution or except as an inmate in a public
institution who could qualify for federal aid assistance: PROVIDED,
That the assistance paid by the department to recipients in nursing
homes, or receiving nursing home care, may cover the cost of clothing
and incidentals and general maintenance exclusive of medical care and
health services. The department may pay a grant to cover the cost of
clothing and personal incidentals in public or private medical
institutions and institutions for tuberculosis. The department shall
allow recipients in nursing homes to retain, in addition to the grant
to cover the cost of clothing and incidentals, wages received for work
as a part of a training or rehabilitative program designed to prepare
the recipient for less restrictive placement to the extent permitted
under Title XIX of the federal social security act.
(2) Any person otherwise qualified for temporary assistance for
needy families under this title who has resided in the state of
Washington for fewer than twelve consecutive months immediately
preceding application for assistance is limited to the benefit level in
the state in which the person resided immediately before Washington,
using the eligibility rules and other definitions established under
this chapter, that was obtainable on the date of application in
Washington state, if the benefit level of the prior state is lower than
the level provided to similarly situated applicants in Washington
state. The benefit level under this subsection shall be in effect for
the first twelve months a recipient is on temporary assistance for
needy families in Washington state.
(3) Any person otherwise qualified for temporary assistance for
needy families who is assessed through the state alcohol and substance
abuse program as drug or alcohol-dependent and requiring treatment to
become employable shall be required by the department to participate in
a drug or alcohol treatment program as a condition of benefit receipt.
(4) In order to be eligible for temporary assistance for needy
families ((and food stamp program benefits)), any applicant with a
felony conviction after August 21, 1996, involving drug use or
possession, must: (a) Have been assessed as chemically dependent by a
chemical dependency program approved under chapter 70.96A RCW and be
participating in or have completed a coordinated rehabilitation plan
consisting of chemical dependency treatment and vocational services;
and (b) have not been convicted of a felony involving drug use or
possession in the three years prior to the most current conviction.
(5) Pursuant to 21 U.S.C. 862a(d)(1), the department shall exempt
individuals from the eligibility restrictions of 21 U.S.C. 862a(a)(2)
to ensure eligibility for federal food assistance.

--- END ---