BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 3.34.010 and 2002 c 138 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The number of district judges to be elected in each county shall
be: Adams, two; Asotin, one; Benton, three; Chelan, two; Clallam, two;
Clark, ((five)) six; Columbia, one; Cowlitz, two; Douglas, one; Ferry,
one; Franklin, one; Garfield, one; Grant, two; Grays Harbor, two;
Island, one; Jefferson, one; King, twenty-six; Kitsap, three; Kittitas,
two; Klickitat, two; Lewis, two; Lincoln, one; Mason, one; Okanogan,
two; Pacific, two; Pend Oreille, one; Pierce, eleven; San Juan, one;
Skagit, two; Skamania, one; Snohomish, eight; Spokane, ten; Stevens,
one; Thurston, two; Wahkiakum, one; Walla Walla, two; Whatcom, two;
Whitman, one; Yakima, four. This number may be increased only as
provided in RCW 3.34.020.

--- END ---