BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.95A.120 and 2002 c 248 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
The city transportation authority may be dissolved by a vote of the
people residing within the boundaries of the authority if the authority
is faced with significant financial problems. However, the authority
may covenant with holders of its bonds that it may not be dissolved and
shall continue to exist solely for the purpose of continuing to levy
and collect any taxes or assessments levied by it and pledged to the
repayment of debt and to take other actions, including the appointment
of a trustee, as necessary to allow it to repay any remaining debt. No
such debt may be incurred by the authority on a project until thirty
days after a final environmental impact statement on that project has
been issued as required by chapter 43.21C RCW. Any referendum petition
to dissolve the city transportation authority must be filed with the
city
council and contain provisions for dissolution of the authority.
Within seven days, the city prosecutor must review the validity of the
petition and submit its report to the petitioner and city council. If
the petitioner's claims are deemed valid by the city prosecutor, within
ten days of the petitioner's filing, the city council will confer with
the petitioner concerning the form and style of the petition, issue an
identification number for the petition, and write a ballot title for
the measure. The ballot title must be posed as a question and an
affirmative vote on the measure results in authority retention and a
negative vote on the measure results in the authority's dissolution.
The petitioner will be notified of the identification number and ballot
title within this ten-day period.
After this notification, the petitioner has ninety days in which to
secure on petition forms, the signatures of not less than fifteen
percent of the registered voters in the authority area and to file the
signed petitions with the filing officer. Each petition form must
contain the ballot title and the full text of the measure to be
referred. The filing officer will verify the sufficiency of the
signatures on the petitions. If sufficient valid signatures are
properly submitted, the filing officer shall submit the initiative to
the authority area voters at a general or special election held on one
of the dates provided in RCW 29.13.010 as determined by the city
council, which election will not take place later than one hundred
twenty days after the signed petition has been filed with the filing
officer.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.95A.130 and 2002 c 248 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
The special excise tax imposed under RCW 35.95A.080(1) will be
collected at the same time and in the same manner as ((relicensing tab
fees under RCW 46.16.0621)) under chapter 46.16 RCW and RCW 35.95A.090.
The tax will not be imposed on vehicles previously registered in
another state or nation when they are initially registered in this
state. Every year on January 1st, April 1st, July 1st, and October 1st
the department of licensing shall remit special excise taxes collected
on behalf of an authority, back to the authority, at no cost to the
authority. Valuation of motor vehicles for purposes of the special
excise tax imposed under RCW 35.95A.080(1) must be consistent with
chapter 82.44 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35.95A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is a violation of this chapter for any resident of the
authority area to register a motor vehicle owned by the resident
outside the authority area where the registration is for the purpose of
evading the collection of the special excise tax levied by the
authority for the privilege of using a motor vehicle under RCW
35.95A.080(1). When a violation of this chapter occurs, the resident
of the authority area is subject to a civil penalty equal to three
times the amount of the evaded special excise tax. For purposes of
this subsection, each and every time a registration is made with the
intent to evade the special excise tax constitutes a separate and
distinct violation.
(2) A city transportation authority is authorized to impose civil
penalties in accordance with this chapter and the procedural
requirements providing for notice, hearing, and review contained in
chapter 34.05 RCW. An authority shall adopt a formal policy to
implement the required procedures.
(3) The penalty provided for in this section must be imposed by
written notice to the person against whom the civil penalty is assessed
and must describe the violation. The imposed penalty is due twenty-eight days after the mailing of the written notice unless an
application for an adjudicative hearing is filed as provided for in
chapter 34.05 RCW and an authority's implementing policy.
(4) In addition to other remedies provided by law, a city
transportation authority may seek enforcement of a final order imposing
the civil penalty by filing a petition for civil enforcement in
accordance with RCW 34.05.578.
(5) Civil penalties collected must be placed into the general fund
of a city transportation authority and used for any lawful purpose of
the authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 35.95A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An authority implementing a transportation plan under this
chapter must be reviewed on a continuing basis by an independent
oversight panel until construction on any segment approved by voters in
2002 is complete. The panel is responsible for independent review,
analysis, and comment on activities of the authority. These activities
must include, but are not limited to administrative and contracting
practices and review of project cost estimates, costs, risks, and
schedules. To assist the panel in conducting its activities and
analysis, the authority shall provide the panel all authority materials
regarding financial risk analysis, materials associated with the
interlocal agreement between the city and the authority, and any other
materials related to the design, construction, operation, and financing
of the public monorail transportation facility.
(2) The panel shall provide reports of its activities and findings
at least quarterly during the first four years of its existence and
then at least twice annually in subsequent years. The reports must be
provided to the members of the board of the authority, the governor,
the mayor and members of the legislative authority of the city in which
it is located, and to the legislature.
(3) The panel consists of a minimum of eight members and a maximum
of twelve. Initially, the panel consists of eight members with an
equal number appointed by the governor and the mayor of the city in
which the authority is created. Panel members shall serve at the
pleasure of the appointing authority, and the panel shall elect a
chair. The panel may be expanded upon agreement of both the governor
and the mayor.
(4) The authority shall provide resources to support the panel and
shall cooperate in the activities in which the panel is involved.
(5) Each member of the panel is eligible to be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 and to
receive compensation as provided in RCW 43.03.250.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---