BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
In cooperation with the Washington state patrol and the department,
the sponsor of the law enforcement memorial license plate shall create
and design, and the department shall issue, a special license plate
displaying a symbol of law enforcement that may be used in lieu of
regular or personalized license plates for motor vehicles required to
display two motor vehicle license plates, excluding vehicles registered
under chapter 46.87 RCW, upon terms and conditions established by the
department. These special plates will honor Washington law enforcement
officers who gave their lives in the line of duty.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Law enforcement memorial license plates" means license plates
issued under section 1 of this act that display a symbol honoring law
enforcement officers who were killed in the line of duty.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.16.313 and 1997 c 291 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may establish a fee of no more than forty
dollars for each type of special license plates issued under RCW
46.16.301(1) (a), (b), or (c), as existing before amendment by section
5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, in an amount calculated to offset the
cost of production of the special license plates and the administration
of this program. ((Until December 31, 1997, the fee shall not exceed
thirty-five dollars, but effective with vehicle registrations due or to
become due on January 1, 1998, the department may adjust the fee to no
more than forty dollars.)) This fee is in addition to all other fees
required to register and license the vehicle for which the plates have
been requested. All such additional special license plate fees
collected by the department shall be deposited in the state treasury
and credited to the motor vehicle fund.
(2) ((Until December 31, 1997, in addition to all fees and taxes
required to be paid upon application, registration, and renewal
registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a collegiate license
plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct
an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this
subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by it.
The remaining proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the
funds to the appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in
RCW 28B.10.890.
(3) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 1998,)) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be
paid upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder
of a collegiate license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the
funds to the appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in
RCW 28B.10.890.
(((4) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on
January 1, 1999,)) (3) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be
paid upon renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a
collegiate license plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The
department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee
collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to
the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed
report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the appropriate
collegiate license plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.
(((5))) (4) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a
special baseball stadium license plate shall pay an initial fee of
forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be distributed to
a county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments
on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium, as
defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.
(((6) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on
January 1, 1999,)) (5) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be
paid upon renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a
special baseball stadium license plate shall pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be distributed to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and
interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball
stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.
(6) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 2004, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a
law enforcement memorial license plate shall pay an initial fee of
forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds must be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a
proper identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit
the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until the department
determines that the state has been reimbursed for the cost of
implementing the law enforcement memorial license plate. Upon the
department's determination, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds to
the law enforcement memorial account established under section 4 of
this act.
(7) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January
1, 2005, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a law
enforcement memorial license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee
of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
two dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds must be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a
proper identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit
the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until the department
determines that the state has been reimbursed for the cost of
implementing the law enforcement memorial license plate. Upon the
department's determination, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds to
the law enforcement memorial account established under section 4 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The law enforcement memorial account is created in the custody
of the state treasurer. Upon the department's determination that the
state had been reimbursed for the cost of implementing the law
enforcement memorial license plate, all receipts, except as provided in
RCW 46.16.313 (6) and (7), from law enforcement memorial license plates
must be deposited into the account. Only the director of general
administration or the director's designee may authorize expenditures
from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures.
(2) Funds in the account must be disbursed subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The director of general administration or the director's
designee must disburse the funds for the purpose of constructing a law
enforcement memorial on the grounds of the capitol campus. Upon the
completion of the memorial, the director of general administration or
the director's designee must disburse the funds for the purpose of
providing maintenance for the memorial. At the end of each fiscal year
any remaining funds in the account must be disbursed for the purpose of
contracting with a qualified nonprofit organization to provide grants
to the families of officers killed in the line of duty. The grants
must be distributed on the basis of financial need.
(b) For purposes of this section, a "qualified nonprofit
organization" means a not-for-profit corporation incorporated and
operating exclusively in Washington that has received a determination
of tax-exempt status under section 501(c)(3) of the Federal Internal
Revenue Code. The organization must have been established for the
express purpose of honoring law enforcement officers who have given
their lives in service to their communities.
(c) Beginning January 31, 2005, the qualified nonprofit
organization selected by the department under (a) of this subsection
shall prepare and submit to the department an annual independent audit,
an annual financial statement, and an annual report detailing the
nonprofit organization's expenditure of the funds from the account
created in subsection (1) of this section.
(d) Disbursement of these funds from the account to the nonprofit
organization is contingent upon the organization meeting all reporting
and review requirements as specified under (c) of this subsection.
(e) No portion of any funds disbursed under this section may be
used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:
(i) Attempting to influence: (A) The passage or defeat of any
legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by a county,
city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of Washington,
or by Congress; or (B) the adoption or rejection of any rule, standard,
rate, or other legislative enactment of any state agency;
(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or
(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel,
lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.16.316 and 1997 c 291 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 46.16.305:
(1) When a person who has been issued a special license plate or
plates under section 1 of this act or RCW 46.16.301 as it existed
before amendment by section 5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, sells,
trades, or otherwise transfers or releases ownership of the vehicle
upon which the special license plate or plates have been displayed, he
or she shall immediately report the transfer of such plate or plates to
an acquired vehicle or vehicle eligible for such plates pursuant to
departmental rule, or he or she shall surrender such plates to the
department immediately if such surrender is required by departmental
rule. If a person applies for a transfer of the plate or plates to
another eligible vehicle, a transfer fee of five dollars shall be
charged in addition to all other applicable fees. Such transfer fees
shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund. Failure to surrender the
plates when required is a traffic infraction.
(2) If the special license plate or plates issued by the department
become lost, defaced, damaged, or destroyed, application for a
replacement special license plate or plates shall be made and fees paid
as provided by law for the replacement of regular license plates.

--- END ---