BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29.36.290 and 2001 c 241 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The county auditor shall send each absentee voter a ballot, a
security envelope in which to seal the ballot after voting, a larger
envelope in which to return the security envelope, and instructions on
how to mark the ballot and how to return it to the county auditor. The
larger return envelope must contain a declaration by the absentee voter
reciting his or her qualifications and stating that he or she has not
voted in any other jurisdiction at this election, together with a
summary of the penalties for any violation of any of the provisions of
this chapter. The return envelope must provide space for the voter to
indicate the date on which the ballot was voted and for the voter to
sign the oath. A summary of the applicable penalty provisions of this
chapter must be printed on the return envelope immediately adjacent to
the space for the voter's signature. The signature of the voter on the
return envelope must affirm and attest to the statements regarding the
qualifications of that voter and to the validity of the ballot. For
out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and service voters, the signed
declaration on the return envelope constitutes the equivalent of a
voter registration for the election or primary for which the ballot has
been issued. The voter must be instructed to either return the ballot
to the county auditor by whom it was issued or attach sufficient first
class postage, if applicable, and mail the ballot in time for delivery
to the appropriate county auditor no later than the day of the election
or primary for which the ballot was issued.
If the county auditor chooses to forward absentee ballots, he or
she must include with the ballot a clear explanation of the
qualifications necessary to vote in that election and must also advise
a voter with questions about his or her eligibility to contact the
county auditor. This explanation may be provided on the ballot
envelope, on an enclosed insert, or printed directly on the ballot
itself. If the information is not included, the envelope must clearly
indicate that the ballot is not to be forwarded and that return postage
is guaranteed.

Sec. 2 RCW 29.36.310 and 2001 c 241 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If mailed, a ballot must be delivered to the office of the
county auditor not later than the date of the primary or election.
Otherwise, the ballot must be deposited at the office of the county
auditor or the designated place of deposit not later than 8:00 p.m. on
the date of the primary or election.
(2) The opening and subsequent processing of return envelopes for
any primary or election may begin on or after the tenth day before the
primary or election. The tabulation of absentee ballots must not
commence until after 8:00 p.m. on the day of the primary or election.
(((2))) (3) After opening the return envelopes, the county
canvassing board shall place all of the ballots in secure storage until
after 8:00 p.m. of the day of the primary or election. Absentee
ballots that are to be tabulated on an electronic vote tallying system
may be taken from the inner envelopes and all the normal procedural
steps may be performed to prepare these ballots for tabulation.
(((3))) (4) Before opening a returned absentee ballot, the
canvassing board, or its designated representatives, shall examine the
postmark, statement, and signature on the return envelope that contains
the security envelope and absentee ballot. They shall verify that the
voter's signature on the return envelope is the same as the signature
of that voter in the registration files of the county. ((For
registered voters casting absentee ballots, the date on the return
envelope to which the voter has attested determines the validity, as to
the time of voting for that absentee ballot if the postmark is missing
or is illegible. For out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and service
voters, the date on the return envelope to which the voter has attested
determines the validity as to the time of voting for that absentee
ballot.)) For any absentee ballot, a variation between the signature
of the voter on the return envelope and the signature of that voter in
the registration files due to the substitution of initials or the use
of common nicknames is permitted so long as the surname and handwriting
are clearly the same.

Sec. 3 RCW 29.38.050 and 2001 c 241 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
The voter shall return the ballot to the county auditor in the
return identification envelope. If mailed, a ballot must be
((postmarked)) delivered to the office of the county auditor not later
than the date of the primary or election. Otherwise, the ballot must
be deposited at the office of the county auditor or the designated
place of deposit not later than 8:00 p.m. on the date of the primary or
election.

Sec. 4 RCW 29.62.020 and 1999 c 259 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At least every third day after a special election, primary, or
general election and before certification of the election results,
except Sundays and legal holidays, the county auditor shall convene the
county canvassing board or their designees to process absentee ballots
and canvass the votes cast at that special election, primary, or
general election, if the county auditor is in possession of more than
twenty-five ballots that have yet to be canvassed. The county auditor
may use his or her discretion in determining when to convene the
canvassing board or their designees during the final four days before
the certification of election results in order to protect the secrecy
of any ballot.
Each absentee ballot previously not canvassed that was received by
the county auditor two days or more before the convening of the
canvassing board or their designees and that either was received by the
county auditor before the closing of the polls on the day of the
special election, primary, or general election for which it was issued,
or that ((bears a date of mailing)) was mailed and delivered to the
county auditor on or before the date of the special election, primary,
or general election for which it was issued, must be processed at that
time. The tabulation of votes that results from that day's canvass
must be made available to the general public immediately upon
completion of the canvass.
(2) On the tenth day after a special election or a primary and on
the fifteenth day after a general election, the canvassing board shall
complete the canvass and certify the results. Each absentee ballot
that was returned before the closing of the polls on the date of the
primary or election for which it was issued, and each absentee ballot
((with a date of mailing)) that was mailed and delivered to the county
auditor on or before the date of the primary or election for which it
was issued ((and received on or before the date on which the primary or
election is certified)), shall be included in the canvass report.
(3) At the request of any caucus of the state legislature, the
county auditor shall transmit copies of all unofficial returns of state
and legislative primaries or elections prepared by or for the county
canvassing board to either the secretary of the senate or the chief
clerk of the house.

--- END ---