BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.20B.030 and 1997 c 130 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided by law, there will be no
collection of overpayments and other debts due the department after the
expiration of six years from the date of notice of such overpayment or
other debt unless the department has commenced recovery action in a
court of law or unless an administrative remedy authorized by statute
is in place. However, any amount due in a case thus extended shall
cease to be a debt due the department at the expiration of ten years
from the date of the notice of the overpayment or other debt unless a
court-ordered remedy would be in effect for a longer period.
(2)(((a))) The department, at any time, may accept offers of
compromise of disputed claims or may grant partial or total write-off
of any debt due the department if it is no longer cost-effective to
pursue. The department shall adopt rules establishing the
considerations to be made in the granting or denial of a partial or
total write-off of debts.
(((b) Beginning December 1, 1997, the department shall report by
December 1 each year to the commerce and labor committees of the senate
and house of representatives, the senate ways and means committee, and
the house appropriations committee, or successor committees, the
following information:
(i) The cumulative amount of debt due the department;
(ii) The cumulative amount of debt that has been written off by the
department as no longer cost-effective to pursue;
(iii) The amount of debt due the department that has accrued in
each of the previous five fiscal years; and
(iv) The amount of debt that has been written off in each of the
previous five fiscal years as no longer cost-effective to pursue.))

Sec. 2 RCW 74.13.036 and 1996 c 133 s 37 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services shall oversee
implementation of chapter 13.34 RCW and chapter 13.32A RCW. The
oversight shall be comprised of working with affected parts of the
criminal justice and child care systems as well as with local
government, legislative, and executive authorities to effectively carry
out these chapters. The department shall work with all such entities
to ensure that chapters 13.32A and 13.34 RCW are implemented in a
uniform manner throughout the state.
(2) The department shall develop a plan and procedures, in
cooperation with the statewide advisory committee, to insure the full
implementation of the provisions of chapter 13.32A RCW. Such plan and
procedures shall include but are not limited to:
(a) Procedures defining and delineating the role of the department
and juvenile court with regard to the execution of the child in need of
services placement process;
(b) Procedures for designating department staff responsible for
family reconciliation services;
(c) Procedures assuring enforcement of contempt proceedings in
accordance with RCW 13.32A.170 and 13.32A.250; and
(d) Procedures for the continued education of all individuals in
the criminal juvenile justice and child care systems who are affected
by chapter 13.32A RCW, as well as members of the legislative and
executive branches of government.
There shall be uniform application of the procedures developed by
the department and juvenile court personnel, to the extent practicable.
Local and regional differences shall be taken into consideration in the
development of procedures required under this subsection.
(3) In addition to its other oversight duties, the department
shall:
(a) Identify and evaluate resource needs in each region of the
state;
(b) Disseminate information collected as part of the oversight
process to affected groups and the general public;
(c) Educate affected entities within the juvenile justice and child
care systems, local government, and the legislative branch regarding
the implementation of chapters 13.32A and 13.34 RCW;
(d) Review complaints concerning the services, policies, and
procedures of those entities charged with implementing chapters 13.32A
and 13.34 RCW; and
(e) Report any violations and misunderstandings regarding the
implementation of chapters 13.32A and 13.34 RCW.
(4) ((The secretary shall submit a quarterly report to the
appropriate local government entities.
(5))) The department shall provide an annual report to the
legislature not later than December 1((, indicating)) of each year only
when it has declined to accept custody of a child from a law
enforcement agency or it has received a report of a child being
released without placement. The report shall indicate the number of
times it has declined to accept custody of a child from a law
enforcement agency under chapter 13.32A RCW and the number of times it
has received a report of a child being released without placement under
RCW 13.32A.060(1)(c). The report shall include the dates, places, and
reasons the department declined to accept custody and the dates and
places children are released without placement.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.14C.070 and 1995 c 311 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of social and health services, or the secretary's
regional designee, may transfer funds appropriated for foster care
services to purchase preservation services and other preventive
services for children at imminent risk of out-of-home placement or who
face a substantial likelihood of out-of-home placement. This transfer
may be made in those regions that lower foster care expenditures
through efficient use of preservation services and permanency planning
efforts. The transfer shall be equivalent to the amount of reduced
foster care expenditures and shall be made in accordance with the
provisions of this chapter and with the approval of the office of
financial management. The ((secretary)) department shall present an
annual report to the legislature regarding any transfers under this
section only if transfers occur. The ((secretary)) department shall
include caseload, expenditure, cost avoidance, identified improvements
to the out-of-home care system, and outcome data related to the
transfer in the report. The ((secretary)) department shall also
include in the report information regarding:
(1) The percent of cases where a child is placed in out-of-home
care after the provision of intensive family preservation services or
family preservation services;
(2) The average length of time before ((such)) the child is placed
out-of-home;
(3) The average length of time ((such)) the child is placed out-of-home; and
(4) The number of families that refused the offer of either family
preservation services or intensive family preservation services.

Sec. 4 RCW 26.44.030 and 1999 c 267 s 20 and 1999 c 176 s 30 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) When any practitioner, county coroner or medical examiner,
law enforcement officer, professional school personnel, registered or
licensed nurse, social service counselor, psychologist, pharmacist,
licensed or certified child care providers or their employees, employee
of the department, juvenile probation officer, placement and liaison
specialist, responsible living skills program staff, HOPE center staff,
or state family and children's ombudsman or any volunteer in the
ombudsman's office has reasonable cause to believe that a child has
suffered abuse or neglect, he or she shall report such incident, or
cause a report to be made, to the proper law enforcement agency or to
the department as provided in RCW 26.44.040.
(b) The reporting requirement also applies to department of
corrections personnel who, in the course of their employment, observe
offenders or the children with whom the offenders are in contact. If,
as a result of observations or information received in the course of
his or her employment, any department of corrections personnel has
reasonable cause to believe that a child has suffered abuse or neglect,
he or she shall report the incident, or cause a report to be made, to
the proper law enforcement agency or to the department as provided in
RCW 26.44.040.
(c) The reporting requirement shall also apply to any adult who has
reasonable cause to believe that a child who resides with them, has
suffered severe abuse, and is able or capable of making a report. For
the purposes of this subsection, "severe abuse" means any of the
following: Any single act of abuse that causes physical trauma of
sufficient severity that, if left untreated, could cause death; any
single act of sexual abuse that causes significant bleeding, deep
bruising, or significant external or internal swelling; or more than
one act of physical abuse, each of which causes bleeding, deep
bruising, significant external or internal swelling, bone fracture, or
unconsciousness.
(d) The report must be made at the first opportunity, but in no
case longer than forty-eight hours after there is reasonable cause to
believe that the child has suffered abuse or neglect. The report must
include the identity of the accused if known.
(2) The reporting requirement of subsection (1) of this section
does not apply to the discovery of abuse or neglect that occurred
during childhood if it is discovered after the child has become an
adult. However, if there is reasonable cause to believe other children
are or may be at risk of abuse or neglect by the accused, the reporting
requirement of subsection (1) of this section does apply.
(3) Any other person who has reasonable cause to believe that a
child has suffered abuse or neglect may report such incident to the
proper law enforcement agency or to the department of social and health
services as provided in RCW 26.44.040.
(4) The department, upon receiving a report of an incident of
alleged abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child
who has died or has had physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him
or her other than by accidental means or who has been subjected to
alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident to the proper law
enforcement agency. In emergency cases, where the child's welfare is
endangered, the department shall notify the proper law enforcement
agency within twenty-four hours after a report is received by the
department. In all other cases, the department shall notify the law
enforcement agency within seventy-two hours after a report is received
by the department. If the department makes an oral report, a written
report must also be made to the proper law enforcement agency within
five days thereafter.
(5) Any law enforcement agency receiving a report of an incident of
alleged abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child
who has died or has had physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him
or her other than by accidental means, or who has been subjected to
alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident in writing as provided
in RCW 26.44.040 to the proper county prosecutor or city attorney for
appropriate action whenever the law enforcement agency's investigation
reveals that a crime may have been committed. The law enforcement
agency shall also notify the department of all reports received and the
law enforcement agency's disposition of them. In emergency cases,
where the child's welfare is endangered, the law enforcement agency
shall notify the department within twenty-four hours. In all other
cases, the law enforcement agency shall notify the department within
seventy-two hours after a report is received by the law enforcement
agency.
(6) Any county prosecutor or city attorney receiving a report under
subsection (5) of this section shall notify the victim, any persons the
victim requests, and the local office of the department, of the
decision to charge or decline to charge a crime, within five days of
making the decision.
(7) The department may conduct ongoing case planning and
consultation with those persons or agencies required to report under
this section, with consultants designated by the department, and with
designated representatives of Washington Indian tribes if the client
information exchanged is pertinent to cases currently receiving child
protective services. Upon request, the department shall conduct such
planning and consultation with those persons required to report under
this section if the department determines it is in the best interests
of the child. Information considered privileged by statute and not
directly related to reports required by this section must not be
divulged without a valid written waiver of the privilege.
(8) Any case referred to the department by a physician licensed
under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW on the basis of an expert medical
opinion that child abuse, neglect, or sexual assault has occurred and
that the child's safety will be seriously endangered if returned home,
the department shall file a dependency petition unless a second
licensed physician of the parents' choice believes that such expert
medical opinion is incorrect. If the parents fail to designate a
second physician, the department may make the selection. If a
physician finds that a child has suffered abuse or neglect but that
such abuse or neglect does not constitute imminent danger to the
child's health or safety, and the department agrees with the
physician's assessment, the child may be left in the parents' home
while the department proceeds with reasonable efforts to remedy
parenting deficiencies.
(9) Persons or agencies exchanging information under subsection (7)
of this section shall not further disseminate or release the
information except as authorized by state or federal statute.
Violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor.
(10) Upon receiving reports of alleged abuse or neglect, the
department or law enforcement agency may interview children. The
interviews may be conducted on school premises, at day-care facilities,
at the child's home, or at other suitable locations outside of the
presence of parents. Parental notification of the interview must occur
at the earliest possible point in the investigation that will not
jeopardize the safety or protection of the child or the course of the
investigation. Prior to commencing the interview the department or law
enforcement agency shall determine whether the child wishes a third
party to be present for the interview and, if so, shall make reasonable
efforts to accommodate the child's wishes. Unless the child objects,
the department or law enforcement agency shall make reasonable efforts
to include a third party in any interview so long as the presence of
the third party will not jeopardize the course of the investigation.
(11) Upon receiving a report of alleged child abuse and neglect,
the department or investigating law enforcement agency shall have
access to all relevant records of the child in the possession of
mandated reporters and their employees.
(12) The department shall maintain investigation records and
conduct timely and periodic reviews of all cases constituting abuse and
neglect. The department shall maintain a log of screened-out
nonabusive cases.
(13) The department shall use a risk assessment process when
investigating alleged child abuse and neglect referrals. The
department shall present the risk factors at all hearings in which the
placement of a dependent child is an issue. Substance abuse must be a
risk factor. The department shall, within funds appropriated for this
purpose, offer enhanced community-based services to persons who are
determined not to require further state intervention.
((The department shall provide annual reports to the legislature on
the effectiveness of the risk assessment process.))
(14) Upon receipt of a report of alleged abuse or neglect the law
enforcement agency may arrange to interview the person making the
report and any collateral sources to determine if any malice is
involved in the reporting.
(15) The department shall make reasonable efforts to learn the
name, address, and telephone number of each person making a report of
abuse or neglect under this section. The department shall provide
assurances of appropriate confidentiality of the identification of
persons reporting under this section. If the department is unable to
learn the information required under this subsection, the department
shall only investigate cases in which: (a) The department believes
there is a serious threat of substantial harm to the child; (b) the
report indicates conduct involving a criminal offense that has, or is
about to occur, in which the child is the victim; or (c) the department
has, after investigation, a report of abuse or neglect that has been
founded with regard to a member of the household within three years of
receipt of the referral.

Sec. 5 RCW 13.40.030 and 1996 c 232 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary shall submit guidelines pertaining to the nature
of the security to be imposed on youth placed in his or her custody
based on the age, offense(s), and criminal history of the juvenile
offender. Such guidelines shall be submitted to the legislature for
its review no later than November 1st of each year. ((At the same time
the secretary shall submit a report on security at juvenile facilities
during the preceding year. The report shall include the number of
escapes from each juvenile facility, the most serious offense for which
each escapee had been confined, the number and nature of offenses found
to have been committed by juveniles while on escape status, the number
of authorized leaves granted, the number of failures to comply with
leave requirements, the number and nature of offenses committed while
on leave, and the number and nature of offenses committed by juveniles
while in the community on minimum security status; to the extent this
information is available to the secretary.)) The department shall
include security status definitions in the security guidelines it
submits to the legislature pursuant to this section.
(2) The permissible ranges of confinement resulting from a finding
of manifest injustice under RCW 13.40.0357 are subject to the following
limitations:
(a) Where the maximum term in the range is ninety days or less, the
minimum term in the range may be no less than fifty percent of the
maximum term in the range;
(b) Where the maximum term in the range is greater than ninety days
but not greater than one year, the minimum term in the range may be no
less than seventy-five percent of the maximum term in the range; and
(c) Where the maximum term in the range is more than one year, the
minimum term in the range may be no less than eighty percent of the
maximum term in the range.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.96A.420 and 2001 c 242 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department, in consultation with opiate substitution
treatment service providers and counties and cities, shall establish
statewide treatment standards for certified opiate substitution
treatment programs. The department shall enforce these treatment
standards. The treatment standards shall include, but not be limited
to, reasonable provisions for all appropriate and necessary medical
procedures, counseling requirements, urinalysis, and other suitable
tests as needed to ensure compliance with this chapter.
(2) The department, in consultation with opiate substitution
treatment programs and counties, shall establish statewide operating
standards for certified opiate substitution treatment programs. The
department shall enforce these operating standards. The operating
standards shall include, but not be limited to, reasonable provisions
necessary to enable the department and counties to monitor certified
and licensed opiate substitution treatment programs for compliance with
this chapter and the treatment standards authorized by this chapter and
to minimize the impact of the opiate substitution treatment programs
upon the business and residential neighborhoods in which the program is
located.
(3) The department shall establish criteria for evaluating the
compliance of opiate substitution treatment programs with the goals and
standards established under this chapter. As a condition of
certification, opiate substitution programs shall submit an annual
report to the department and county legislative authority, including
data as specified by the department necessary for outcome analysis.
The department shall analyze and evaluate the data submitted by each
treatment program and take corrective action where necessary to ensure
compliance with the goals and standards enumerated under this chapter.
(((4) Before January 1st of each year, the secretary shall submit
a report to the legislature and governor. The report shall include the
number of persons enrolled in each treatment program during the period
covered by the report, the number of persons who leave each treatment
program voluntarily and involuntarily, and an outcome analysis of each
treatment program. For purposes of this subsection, "outcome analysis"
shall include but not be limited to: The number of people who, as a
result of participation in the program, are able to abstain from
opiates; reduction in use of opiates; reduction in criminal conduct;
achievement of economic independence; and reduction in utilization of
health care. The report shall include information on an annual and
cumulative basis beginning on July 22, 2001.))

Sec. 7 RCW 70.96A.520 and 1997 c 338 s 28 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall prioritize expenditures for treatment provided
under RCW 13.40.165. The department shall provide funds for inpatient
and outpatient treatment providers that are the most successful, using
the standards developed by the University of Washington under section
27, chapter 338, Laws of 1997. The department may consider variations
between the nature of the programs provided and clients served but must
provide funds first for those programs that demonstrate the greatest
success in treatment within categories of treatment and the nature of
the persons receiving treatment.
((The department shall, not later than January 1st of each year,
provide a report to the governor and the legislature on the success
rates of programs funded under this section.))

Sec. 8 RCW 74.13.017 and 2001 c 265 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall undertake the process of accreditation with
the goal of completion by July 2006. ((The department, in conjunction
with a national independent accreditation entity, shall report to the
appropriate legislative committees its progress towards complete
accreditation on an annual basis, starting December 2001.))

Sec. 9 RCW 74.14A.050 and 2001 c 255 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary shall:
(1)(a) Consult with relevant qualified professionals to develop a
set of minimum guidelines to be used for identifying all children who
are in a state-assisted support system, whether at-home or out-of-home,
who are likely to need long-term care or assistance, because they face
physical, emotional, medical, mental, or other long-term challenges;
(b) The guidelines must, at a minimum, consider the following
criteria for identifying children in need of long-term care or
assistance:
(i) Placement within the foster care system for two years or more;
(ii) Multiple foster care placements;
(iii) Repeated unsuccessful efforts to be placed with a permanent
adoptive family;
(iv) Chronic behavioral or educational problems;
(v) Repetitive criminal acts or offenses;
(vi) Failure to comply with court-ordered disciplinary actions and
other imposed guidelines of behavior, including drug and alcohol
rehabilitation; and
(vii) Chronic physical, emotional, medical, mental, or other
similar conditions necessitating long-term care or assistance;
(2) Develop programs that are necessary for the long-term care of
children and youth that are identified for the purposes of this
section. Programs must: (a) Effectively address the educational,
physical, emotional, mental, and medical needs of children and youth;
and (b) incorporate an array of family support options, to individual
needs and choices of the child and family. The programs must be ready
for implementation by January 1, 1995;
(3) Conduct an evaluation of all children currently within the
foster care agency caseload to identify those children who meet the
criteria set forth in this section. All children entering the foster
care system must be evaluated for identification of long-term needs
within thirty days of placement;
(4) As a result of the passage of chapter 232, Laws of 2000, the
department is conducting a pilot project to do a comparative analysis
of a variety of assessment instruments to determine the most effective
tools and methods for evaluation of children. The pilot project may
extend through August 31, 2001. The department shall report to the
appropriate committees in the senate and house of representatives by
September 30, 2001, on the results of the pilot project. The
department shall select an assessment instrument that can be
implemented within available resources. The department shall complete
statewide implementation by December 31, 2001. The department shall
report to the appropriate committees in the senate and house of
representatives on how the use of the selected assessment instrument
has affected department policies, by no later than December 31, 2002,
December 31, 2004, and December 31, 2006;
(5) Use the assessment tool developed pursuant to subsection (4) of
this section in making out-of-home placement decisions for children;
(6) ((By region, report to the legislature on the following using
aggregate data every six months beginning December 31, 2000:
(a) The number of children evaluated during the first thirty days
of placement as required in subsection (3) of this section;
(b) The tool or tools used to evaluate children, including the
content of the tool and the method by which the tool was validated;
(c) The findings from the evaluation regarding the children's
needs;
(d) How the department used the results of the evaluation to
provide services to the foster child to meet his or her needs; and
(e) Whether and how the evaluation results assisted the department
in providing appropriate services to the child, matching the child with
an appropriate care provider early on in the child's placement and
achieving the child's permanency plan in a timely fashion;
(7))) Each region of the department shall make the appropriate
number of referrals to the foster care assessment program to ensure
that the services offered by the program are used to the extent funded
pursuant to the department's contract with the program. The department
shall report to the legislature by November 30, 2000, on the number of
referrals, by region, to the foster care assessment program. If the
regions are not referring an adequate number of cases to the program,
the department shall include in its report an explanation of what
action it is or has taken to ensure that the referrals are adequate;
(((8))) (7) The department shall report to the legislature by
December 15, 2000, on how it will use the foster care assessment
program model to assess children as they enter out-of-home care;
(((9))) (8) The department is to accomplish the tasks listed in
subsections (4) through (((8))) (7) of this section within existing
resources;
(((10))) (9) Study and develop a comprehensive plan for the
evaluation and identification of all children and youth in need of
long-term care or assistance, including, but not limited to, the
mentally ill, developmentally disabled, medically fragile, seriously
emotionally or behaviorally disabled, and physically impaired;
(((11))) (10) Study and develop a plan for the children and youth
in need of long-term care or assistance to ensure the coordination of
services between the department's divisions and between other state
agencies who are involved with the child or youth;
(((12))) (11) Study and develop guidelines for transitional
services, between long-term care programs, based on the person's age or
mental, physical, emotional, or medical condition; and
(((13))) (12) Study and develop a statutory proposal for the
emancipation of minors.

Sec. 10 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES--CHILDREN AND FAMILY
SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,789,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . $239,013,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $372,408,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Public Safety and Education Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $987,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,702,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $844,299,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,237,000 of the fiscal year 2002 general fund--state
appropriation, $2,288,000 of the fiscal year 2003 general fund--state
appropriation, and $1,590,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the category of services titled
"intensive family preservation services."
(2) $685,000 of the general fund--state fiscal year 2002
appropriation and $701,000 of the general fund--state fiscal year 2003
appropriation are provided to contract for the operation of one
pediatric interim care facility. The facility shall provide
residential care for up to thirteen children through two years of age.
Seventy-five percent of the children served by the facility must be in
need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers.
The facility shall also provide on-site training to biological,
adoptive, or foster parents. The facility shall provide at least three
months of consultation and support to parents accepting placement of
children from the facility. The facility may recruit new and current
foster and adoptive parents for infants served by the facility. The
department shall not require case management as a condition of the
contract.
(3) $524,000 of the general fund--state fiscal year 2002
appropriation and $536,000 of the general fund--state fiscal year 2003
appropriation are provided for up to three nonfacility-based programs
for the training, consultation, support, and recruitment of biological,
foster, and adoptive parents of children through age three in need of
special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers, except
that each program may serve up to three medically fragile nonsubstance-abuse-affected children. In selecting nonfacility-based programs,
preference shall be given to programs whose federal or private funding
sources have expired or that have successfully performed under the
existing pediatric interim care program.
(4) $1,260,000 of the fiscal year 2002 general fund--state
appropriation, $1,248,000 of the fiscal year 2003 general fund--state
appropriation, and $4,196,000 of the violence reduction and drug
enforcement account appropriation are provided solely for the family
policy council and community public health and safety networks. The
funding level for the family policy council and community public health
and safety networks represents a 25 percent reduction below the funding
level for the 1999-2001 biennium. Funding levels shall be reduced 25
percent for both the family policy council and network grants.
Reductions to network grants shall be allocated so as to maintain
current funding levels, to the greatest extent possible, for projects
with the strongest evidence of positive outcomes and for networks with
substantial compliance with contracts for network grants.
(5) $2,215,000 of the fiscal year 2002 general fund--state
appropriation, $4,394,000 of the fiscal year 2003 general fund--state
appropriation, and $5,604,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for reducing the average caseload
level per case-carrying social worker. Average caseload reductions are
intended to increase the amount of time social workers spend in direct
contact with the children, families, and foster parents involved with
their open cases. The department shall use some of the funds provided
in several local offices to increase staff that support case-carrying
social workers in ways that will allow social workers to increase
direct contact time with children, families, and foster parents. To
achieve the goal of reaching an average caseload ratio of 1:24 by the
end of fiscal year 2003, the department shall develop a plan for
redeploying 30 FTEs to case-carrying social worker and support
positions from other areas in the children and family services budget.
The FTE redeployment plan shall be submitted to the fiscal committees
of the legislature by December 1, 2001.
(6) $1,000,000 of the fiscal year 2002 general fund--state
appropriation and $1,000,000 of the fiscal year 2003 general fund--state appropriation are provided solely for increasing foster parent
respite care services that improve the retention of foster parents and
increase the stability of foster placements. ((The department shall
report quarterly to the appropriate committees of the legislature
progress against appropriate baseline measures for foster parent
retention and stability of foster placements.))
(7) $1,050,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely for increasing kinship care placements for children who
otherwise would likely be placed in foster care. These funds shall be
used for extraordinary costs incurred by relatives at the time of
placement, or for extraordinary costs incurred by relatives after
placement if such costs would likely cause a disruption in the kinship
care placement. $50,000 of the funds provided shall be contracted to
the Washington institute for public policy to conduct a study of
kinship care placements. The study shall examine the prevalence and
needs of families who are raising related children and shall compare
services and policies of Washington state with other states that have
a higher rate of kinship care placements in lieu of foster care
placements. The study shall identify possible changes in services and
policies that are likely to increase appropriate kinship care
placements.
(8) $3,386,000 of the fiscal year 2002 general fund--state
appropriation, $7,671,000 of the fiscal year 2003 general fund--state
appropriation, and $20,819,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for increases in the cost per case
for foster care and adoption support. $16,000,000 of the general
fund--federal amount shall remain unalloted until the office of
financial management approves a plan submitted by the department to
achieve a higher rate of federal earnings in the foster care program.
That plan shall also be submitted to the fiscal committees of the
legislature and shall indicate projected federal revenue compared to
actual fiscal year 2001 levels. Within the amounts provided for foster
care, the department shall increase the basic rate for foster care to
an average of $420 per month on July 1, 2001, and to an average of $440
per month on July 1, 2002. The department shall use the remaining
funds provided in this subsection to pay for increases in the cost per
case for foster care and adoption support. The department shall seek
to control rate increases and reimbursement decisions for foster care
and adoption support cases such that the cost per case for family
foster care, group care, receiving homes, and adoption support does not
exceed the amount assumed in the projected caseload expenditures plus
the amounts provided in this subsection.
(9) $1,767,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, $2,461,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003, and $1,485,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for rate and capacity increases for
child placing agencies. Child placing agencies shall increase their
capacity by 15 percent in fiscal year 2002 and 30 percent in fiscal
year 2003.
(10) The department shall provide secure crisis residential
facilities across the state in a manner that: (a) Retains geographic
provision of these services; and (b) retains beds in high use areas.
(11) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for a foster parent retention
program. This program is directed at foster parents caring for
children who act out sexually, as described in House Bill No. 1525
(foster parent retention program).

Sec. 11 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES--DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $231,693,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . $242,347,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $396,151,000
Health Services Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $741,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $870,932,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The health services account appropriation and $753,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for health care
benefits for home care workers with family incomes below 200 percent of
the federal poverty level who are employed through state contracts for
twenty hours per week or more. Premium payments for individual
provider home care workers shall be made only to the subsidized basic
health plan. Home care agencies may obtain coverage either through the
basic health plan or through an alternative plan with substantially
equivalent benefits.
(b) $902,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, $3,372,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003, and $4,056,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for community services for residents
of residential habilitation centers (RHCs) who are able to be
adequately cared for in community settings and who choose to live in
those community settings. The department shall ensure that the average
cost per day for all program services other than start-up costs shall
not exceed $280. If the number and timing of residents choosing to
move into community settings is not sufficient to achieve the RHC
cottage consolidation plan assumed in the appropriations in subsection
(2) of this section, the department shall transfer sufficient
appropriations from this subsection to subsection (2) of this section
to cover the added costs incurred in the RHCs. The department shall
report to the appropriate committees of the legislature, within 45 days
following each fiscal year quarter, the number of residents moving into
community settings and the actual expenditures for all community
services to support those residents.
(c) $1,440,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, $3,041,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003, and $4,311,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for expanded community services for
persons with developmental disabilities who also have community
protection issues or are diverted or discharged from state psychiatric
hospitals. The department shall ensure that the average cost per day
for all program services other than start-up costs shall not exceed
$275. The department shall report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature, within 45 days following each fiscal year quarter, the
number of persons served with these additional community services,
where they were residing, what kinds of services they were receiving
prior to placement, and the actual expenditures for all community
services to support these clients.
(d) $1,005,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, $2,262,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003, and $2,588,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for increasing case/resource
management resources to improve oversight and quality of care for
persons enrolled in the medicaid home and community services waiver for
persons with developmental disabilities. The department shall not
increase total enrollment in home and community based waivers for
persons with developmental disabilities except for increases assumed in
additional funding provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section.
((Prior to submitting to the health care financing authority any
additional home and community based waiver request for persons with
developmental disabilities, the department shall submit a summary of
the waiver request to the appropriate committees of the legislature.
The summary shall include eligibility criteria, program description,
enrollment projections and limits, and budget and cost effectiveness
projections that distinguish the requested waiver from other existing
or proposed waivers.))
(e) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for employment, or other day
activities and training programs, for young adults with developmental
disabilities who complete their high school curriculum in 2001 or 2002.
These services are intended to assist with the transition to work and
more independent living. Funding shall be used to the greatest extent
possible for vocational rehabilitation services matched with federal
funding. In recent years, the state general fund appropriation for
employment and day programs has been underspent. These surpluses,
built into the carry forward level budget, shall be redeployed for high
school transition services.
(f) $369,000 of the fiscal year 2002 general fund--state
appropriation and $369,000 of the fiscal year 2003 general fund--state
appropriation are provided solely for continuation of the autism pilot
project started in 1999.
(g) $4,049,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002, $1,734,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003, and $5,369,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to increase compensation by an
average of fifty cents per hour for low-wage workers providing state-funded services to persons with developmental disabilities. These
funds, along with funding provided for vendor rate increases, are
sufficient to raise wages an average of fifty cents and cover the
employer share of unemployment and social security taxes on the amount
of the wage increase. In consultation with the statewide associations
representing such agencies, the department shall establish a mechanism
for testing the extent to which funds have been used for this purpose,
and report the results to the fiscal committees of the legislature by
February 1, 2002.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,977,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,303,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $145,641,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,230,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $297,151,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Pursuant to RCW 71A.12.160, if residential
habilitation center capacity is not being used for permanent residents,
the department may make residential habilitation center vacancies
available for respite care and any other services needed to care for
clients who are not currently being served in a residential
habilitation center and whose needs require staffing levels similar to
current residential habilitation center residents. Providing respite
care shall not impede the department's ability to consolidate cottages
as assumed in the appropriations in this subsection.

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,601,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,623,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,413,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,637,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $50,000 of the fiscal year 2002 general
fund--state appropriation and $50,000 of the fiscal year 2003 general
fund--state appropriation are provided solely for increasing the
contract amount for the southeast Washington deaf and hard of hearing
services center due to increased workload.

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,995,000

Sec. 12 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES--ECONOMIC SERVICES
PROGRAM
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $436,440,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2003) . . . . . . . . . . . . $424,870,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,356,351,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,788,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,249,449,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $282,081,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2002, $278,277,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2003, $1,254,197,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation, and $29,352,000 of the general fund--local appropriation
are provided solely for the WorkFirst program and child support
operations. WorkFirst expenditures include TANF grants, diversion
services, subsidized child care, employment and training, other
WorkFirst related services, allocated field services operating costs,
and allocated economic services program administrative costs. Within
the amounts provided in this subsection, the department shall:
(a) Continue to implement WorkFirst program improvements that are
designed to achieve progress against outcome measures specified in RCW
74.08A.410. Valid outcome measures of job retention and wage
progression shall be developed ((and reported quarterly to appropriate
fiscal and policy committees of the legislature for families who leave
assistance, measured after 12 months, 24 months, and 36 months)). An
increased attention to job retention and wage progression is necessary
to emphasize the legislature's goal that the WorkFirst program succeed
in helping recipients gain long-term economic independence and not
cycle on and off public assistance. ((The wage progression measure
shall report the median percentage increase in quarterly earnings and
hourly wage after 12 months, 24 months, and 36 months. The wage
progression report shall also report the percent with earnings above
one hundred percent and two hundred percent of the federal poverty
level. The report shall compare former WorkFirst participants with
similar workers who did not participate in WorkFirst. The department
shall also report the percentage of families who have returned to
temporary assistance for needy families after 12 months, 24 months, and
36 months.))
(b) Develop informational materials that educate families about the
difference between cash assistance and work support benefits. These
materials must explain, among other facts, that the benefits are
designed to support their employment, that there are no time limits on
the receipt of work support benefits, and that immigration or residency
status will not be affected by the receipt of benefits. These
materials shall be posted in all community service offices and
distributed to families. Materials must be available in multiple
languages. When a family leaves the temporary assistance for needy
families program, receives cash diversion assistance, or withdraws a
temporary assistance for needy families application, the department of
social and health services shall educate them about the difference
between cash assistance and work support benefits and offer them the
opportunity to begin or to continue receiving work support benefits, so
long as they are eligible. The department shall provide this
information through in-person interviews, over the telephone, and/or
through the mail. Work support benefits include food stamps, medicaid
for all family members, medicaid or state children's health insurance
program for children, and child care assistance. ((The department
shall report annually to the legislature the number of families who
have had exit interviews, been reached successfully by phone, and been
sent mail. The report shall also include the percentage of families
who elect to continue each of the benefits and the percentage found
ineligible by each substantive reason code. A substantive reason code
shall not be "other." The report shall identify barriers to informing
families about work support benefits and describe existing and future
actions to overcome such barriers.))
(c) From the amounts provided in this subsection, provide $50,000
from the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2002 and
$50,000 from the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2003
to the Washington institute for public policy for continuation of the
WorkFirst evaluation database.
(d) Submit a report by December 1, 2001, to the fiscal committees
of the legislature containing a spending plan for the WorkFirst
program. The plan shall identify how spending levels in the 2001-2003
biennium will be adjusted by June 30, 2003, to be sustainable within
available federal grant levels and the carryforward level of state
funds.
(2) $48,341,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $48,341,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for cash assistance and other
services to recipients in the general assistance--unemployable program.
Within these amounts, the department may expend funds for services that
assist recipients to reduce their dependence on public assistance,
provided that expenditures for these services and cash assistance do
not exceed the funds provided.
(3) $5,632,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $5,632,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for the food assistance program
for legal immigrants. The level of benefits shall be equivalent to the
benefits provided by the federal food stamp program.
(4) $48,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 is provided solely to implement chapter 111, Laws of 2001
(veterans/Philippines).
(5) The department shall apply the provisions of RCW 74.04.005(10)
to simplify resource eligibility policy, make such policy consistent
with other federal public assistance programs, and achieve the
budgetary savings assumed in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 71.24.820 (Mental health system review -- Implementation of
status reports) and 2001 c 334 s 3; and
(2) RCW 71.24.830 (Mental health system review -- Content of status
reports) and 2001 c 334 s 4.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 74.09.310 (Chemical dependency treatment -- Provision of
birth control services, information, and counseling -- Report) and 1998
c 314 s 34;
(2) RCW 74.09.320 (Chemical dependency treatment -- Provision of
birth control services, information, and counseling -- Report) and 1998
c 314 s 35;
(3) RCW 13.40.430 (Disparity in disposition of juvenile offenders -- Data collection -- Annual report) and 1993 c 373 s 2; and
(4) RCW 72.23.450 (Annual report to the legislature) and 2000 c 22
s 8.

--- END ---