BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.46.050 and 1983 c 167 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each local government authorized to issue bonds is authorized to
establish lines of credit with any qualified public depository to be
drawn upon in exchange for its bonds or other obligations, to delegate
to its ((fiscal officer)) treasurer authority to determine the amount
of credit extended, and to pay interest and other finance or service
charges. The interest rates on such bonds or other obligations may be
a fixed rate or rates set periodically or a variable rate or rates
determined by agreement of the parties.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.56.120 and 1991 c 245 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
After personal property has been assessed, it shall be unlawful for
any person to remove the ((same)) personal property subject to priority
tax liens created pursuant to RCW 84.60.010 and 84.60.020 from the
county in which the property was assessed and from the state until
taxes and interest are paid, or until notice has been given to the
county treasurer describing the property to be removed and in case of
public or private sales of personal property, a list of the property
desired to be sold shall be sent to the treasurer, ((and no property
shall be sold at such sale until the tax has been paid,)) the tax
((to)) will be computed upon the consolidated tax levy for the previous
year. Any taxes owed shall become an automatic lien upon the proceeds
of any auction and shall be remitted to the county treasurer before
final distribution to any person, as defined in this section. If
proceeds are distributed in violation of this section, the seller or
agent of the seller shall assume all liability for taxes, interest, and
penalties owed to the county treasurer. Any person violating the
provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. For the
purposes of this section, "person" includes a property owner,
mortgagor, creditor, or agent.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.56.340 and 1997 c 393 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person desiring to pay taxes upon any part or parts of real
property heretofore or hereafter assessed as one parcel, or tract, or
upon such person's undivided fractional interest in such a property,
may do so by applying to the county assessor, who must carefully
investigate and ascertain the relative or proportionate value said part
or part interest bears to the whole tract assessed, on which basis the
assessment must be divided, and the assessor shall forthwith certify
such proportionate value to the county treasurer: PROVIDED, That
excepting when property is being acquired for public use, or where a
person or financial institution desires to pay the taxes and any
penalties and interest on a mobile home upon which they have a lien by
mortgage or otherwise, no segregation of property for tax purposes
shall be made under this section unless all current year and delinquent
taxes and assessments on the entire tract have been paid in full. The
county treasurer, upon receipt of certification, shall duly accept
payment and issue receipt on the apportionment certified by the county
assessor. In cases where protest is filed to said division appeal
shall be made to the county legislative authority at its next regular
session for final division, and the county treasurer shall accept and
receipt for said taxes as determined and ordered by the county
legislative authority. Any person desiring to pay on an undivided
interest in any real property may do so by paying to the county
treasurer a sum equal to such proportion of the entire taxes charged on
the entire tract as interest paid on bears to the whole.

Sec. 4 RCW 84.64.060 and 2002 c 168 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person owning ((an)) a recorded interest in lands or lots upon
which judgment is prayed, as provided in this chapter, may in person or
by agent pay the taxes, interest and costs due thereon to the county
treasurer of the county in which the same are situated, at any time
before the day of the sale; and for the amount so paid he or she shall
have a lien on the property liable for taxes, interest and costs for
which judgment is prayed; and the person or authority who shall collect
or receive the same shall give a receipt for such payment, or issue to
such person a certificate showing such payment. If paying by agent,
the agent shall provide notarized documentation of the agency
relationship.

Sec. 5 RCW 84.64.080 and 1999 c 153 s 72 and 1999 c 18 s 8 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The court shall examine each application for judgment foreclosing
tax lien, and if defense (specifying in writing the particular cause of
objection) be offered by any person interested in any of the lands or
lots to the entry of judgment against the same, the court shall hear
and determine the matter in a summary manner, without other pleadings,
and shall pronounce judgment as the right of the case may be; or the
court may, in its discretion, continue such individual cases, wherein
defense is offered, to such time as may be necessary, in order to
secure substantial justice to the contestants therein; but in all other
cases the court shall proceed to determine the matter in a summary
manner as above specified. In all judicial proceedings of any kind for
the collection of taxes, and interest and costs thereon, all amendments
which by law can be made in any personal action pending in such court
shall be allowed, and no assessments of property or charge for any of
the taxes shall be considered illegal on account of any irregularity in
the tax list or assessment rolls or on account of the assessment rolls
or tax list not having been made, completed or returned within the time
required by law, or on account of the property having been charged or
listed in the assessment or tax lists without name, or in any other
name than that of the owner, and no error or informality in the
proceedings of any of the officers connected with the assessment,
levying or collection of the taxes, shall vitiate or in any manner
affect the tax or the assessment thereof, and any irregularities or
informality in the assessment rolls or tax lists or in any of the
proceedings connected with the assessment or levy of such taxes or any
omission or defective act of any officer or officers connected with the
assessment or levying of such taxes, may be, in the discretion of the
court, corrected, supplied and made to conform to the law by the court.
The court shall give judgment for such taxes, interest and costs as
shall appear to be due upon the several lots or tracts described in the
notice of application for judgment or complaint, and such judgment
shall be a several judgment against each tract or lot or part of a
tract or lot for each kind of tax included therein, including all
interest and costs, and the court shall order and direct the clerk to
make and enter an order for the sale of such real property against
which judgment is made, or vacate and set aside the certificate of
delinquency or make such other order or judgment as in the law or
equity may be just. The order shall be signed by the judge of the
superior court, shall be delivered to the county treasurer, and shall
be full and sufficient authority for him or her to proceed to sell the
property for the sum as set forth in the order and to take such further
steps in the matter as are provided by law. The county treasurer shall
immediately after receiving the order and judgment of the court proceed
to sell the property as provided in this chapter to the highest and
best bidder for cash. The acceptable minimum bid shall be the total
amount of taxes, interest, and costs. All sales shall be made at a
location in the county on a date and time (except Saturdays, Sundays,
or legal holidays) as the county treasurer may direct, and shall
continue from day to day (Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays
excepted) during the same hours until all lots or tracts are sold,
after first giving notice of the time, and place where such sale is to
take place for ten days successively by posting notice thereof in three
public places in the county, one of which shall be in the office of the
treasurer. The notice shall be substantially in the following form:

TAX JUDGMENT SALE

Public notice is hereby given that pursuant to real property tax
judgment of the superior court of the county of . . . . . . in the
state of Washington, and an order of sale duly issued by the court,
entered the . . . . day of . . . . . ., . . . ., in proceedings for
foreclosure of tax liens upon real property, as per provisions of law,
I shall on the . . . . day of . . . . . ., . . . ., at . . . . o'clock
a.m., at . . . . . . in the city of . . . . . ., and county of
. . . . . ., state of Washington, sell the real property to the highest
and best bidder for cash, to satisfy the full amount of taxes, interest
and costs adjudged to be due.
In witness whereof, I have hereunto affixed my hand and seal this
. . . . day of . . . . . ., . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . .
Treasurer of . . . . . . . . . . . .
county.

No county officer or employee shall directly or indirectly be a
purchaser of such property at such sale.
If any buildings or improvements are upon an area encompassing more
than one tract or lot, the same must be advertised and sold as a single
unit.
If the highest amount bid for any such separate unit tract or lot
is in excess of the minimum bid due upon the whole property included in
the certificate of delinquency, the excess shall be refunded following
payment of all water-sewer district liens, on application therefor, to
the record owner of the property. The record owner of the property is
the person who held title on the date of issuance of the certificate of
delinquency. Assignments of interests, deeds, or other documents
executed or recorded after filing the certificate of delinquency shall
not affect the payment of excess funds to the record owner. In the
event no claim for the excess is received by the county treasurer
within three years after the date of the sale he or she shall at
expiration of the three year period deposit such excess in the current
expense fund of the county. The county treasurer shall execute to the
purchaser of any piece or parcel of land a tax deed. The deed so made
by the county treasurer, under the official seal of his or her office,
shall be recorded in the same manner as other conveyances of real
property, and shall vest in the grantee, his or her heirs and assigns
the title to the property therein described, without further
acknowledgment or evidence of such conveyance, and shall be
substantially in the following form:

State of Washington |
|
>
|
|

ss.

County of . . . . . . . . . . . .

This indenture, made this . . . . day of . . . . . ., . . . . . .,
between . . . . . ., as treasurer of . . . . . . county, state of
Washington, party of the first part, and . . . . . ., party of the
second part:
Witnesseth, that, whereas, at a public sale of real property held
on the . . . . day of . . . . . ., . . . ., pursuant to a real property
tax judgment entered in the superior court in the county of . . . . . .
on the . . . . day of . . . . . ., . . . ., in proceedings to foreclose
tax liens upon real property and an order of sale duly issued by the
court, . . . . . . duly purchased in compliance with the laws of the
state of Washington, the following described real property, to wit:
(Here place description of real property conveyed) and that the
. . . . . . has complied with the laws of the state of Washington
necessary to entitle (him, or her or them) to a deed for the real
property.
Now, therefore, know ye, that, I . . . . . ., county treasurer of
the county of . . . . . ., state of Washington, in consideration of the
premises and by virtue of the statutes of the state of Washington, in
such cases provided, do hereby grant and convey unto . . . . . ., his
or her heirs and assigns, forever, the real property hereinbefore
described.
Given under my hand and seal of office this . . . . day of
. . . . . ., A.D. . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . .
County Treasurer.

Sec. 6 RCW 84.69.050
and 1988 c 222 s 31 are each amended to read
as follows:
The part of the refund representing amounts paid to the state,
including interest as provided in RCW 84.69.100, shall be paid from the
county general fund and the department of revenue shall, upon the next
succeeding settlement with the county, certify this amount refunded to
the county: PROVIDED, That when a refund of tax funds pursuant to
state levies is required, the department of revenue shall authorize
adjustment procedures whereby counties may deduct from property tax
remittances to the state the amount required to cover the state's
portion of the refunds.

Sec. 7 RCW 84.69.070 and 1991 c 245 s 38 are each amended to read
as follows:
Refunds ordered with respect to taxing districts, including
interest as provided in RCW 84.69.100, shall be paid by checks drawn by
the county treasurer upon such available funds, if any, as the taxing
districts may have on deposit in the county treasury, or in the event
such funds are insufficient, then out of funds subsequently accruing to
such taxing district and on deposit in the county treasury. When such
refunds are made as a result of taxes paid under levies or statutes
adjudicated to be illegal or unconstitutional all administrative costs
including interest paid on the refunds incurred by the county treasurer
in making such refunds shall be a charge against the funds of such
districts and/or the state on a pro rata basis until the county current
expense fund is fully reimbursed for the administrative expenses
incurred in making such refund: PROVIDED, That whenever orders for
refunds of ad valorem taxes promulgated by the county treasurer or
county legislative authority and unpaid checks shall expire and become
void as provided in RCW 84.69.110, then any moneys remaining in a
refund account established by the county treasurer for any taxing
district may be transferred by the county treasurer from such refund
account to the county current expense fund to reimburse the county for
the administrative expense incurred in making refunds as prescribed
herein. Any excess then remaining in the taxing district refund
account may then be transferred by the county treasurer to the current
expense fund of the taxing district for which the tax was originally
levied and collected.

Sec. 8 RCW 36.29.190 and 1997 c 393 s 19
are each amended to read
as follows:
County treasurers are authorized to accept credit cards, charge
cards, debit cards, smart cards, stored value cards, federal wire, and
automatic clearinghouse system transactions, or other electronic
communication, for any payment of any kind including, but not limited
to, taxes, fines, interest, penalties, special assessments, fees,
rates, charges, or moneys due counties. A payer desiring to pay by a
credit card, charge card, debit card, smart card, stored value card,
federal wire, automatic clearinghouse system, or other electronic
communication shall bear the cost of processing the transaction in an
amount determined by the treasurer, unless the county legislative
authority or the legislative authority of a district where the county
treasurer serves as ex officio treasurer finds that it is in the best
interests of the county or district to not charge transaction
processing costs for all payment transactions made for a specific
category of nontax payments ((due)) received by the county treasurer,
including, but not limited to, fines, interest not associated with
taxes, penalties not associated with taxes, special assessments, fees,
rates, and charges. The treasurer's cost determination shall be based
upon costs incurred by the treasurer and may not, in any event, exceed
the additional direct costs incurred by the county to accept the
specific form of payment utilized by the payer.

--- END ---