BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.22.070 and 1963 c 4 s 36.22.070 are each amended to
read as follows:
((He)) (1) The auditor shall also retain all original bills and
indorse thereon claimant's name, nature of claim, the action had, and
if a warrant was issued, date and number the voucher or claim the same
as the warrant.
(2) The auditor may retain all claims, bills, and associated
records referenced in subsection (1) of this section in an electronic
format sufficient for the conduct of official business.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "claims" shall exclude claims
filed against the county in accordance with the provisions of chapter
4.96 RCW.

--- END ---