BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature wishes to recognize: The
value of poetry and the contribution Washington poets make to the
culture of our state; that poetry is a literary form respected and
growing throughout all segments of Washington's population; that
awareness and appreciation of poetry encourages increased literacy and
advanced communication skills; and that Washington state has produced
many excellent and nationally recognized poets.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state arts commission shall establish and
administer the poet laureate program. The poet laureate shall engage
in activities to promote and encourage poetry within the state,
including but not limited to a minimum of twenty readings, workshops,
lectures, and/or presentations for Washington educational institutions
and communities in geographically diverse areas over a two-year term.
(2) Selection of a poet laureate shall be made by a committee
appointed and coordinated by the commission. The committee may include
representatives of the Washington state library, the education
community, the Washington commission for the humanities, publishing,
and the community of Washington poets.
(3) The commission and the committee shall establish criteria to be
used for the selection of a poet laureate. In addition to other
criteria established, the poet laureate must be a published poet, a
resident of Washington state, active in the poetry community, and
willing and able to promote poetry in the state of Washington
throughout the two-year term.
(4) The poet laureate shall receive compensation at a professional
level for professional services and travel expenses. The commission
shall determine the compensation. Travel expenses shall be provided in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) The poet laureate may not serve more than two consecutive two-year terms.
(6) The commission may fund the poet laureate program through
gifts, grants, or endowments from public or private sources that are
made from time to time, in trust or otherwise.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.46 RCW
to read as follows:
The poet laureate account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All receipts collected for the poet laureate program must
be deposited into the account and expenditures from the account may be
used only for the purposes of this act. Only the executive director of
the commission or the executive director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2002 c 322 s 5, 2002 c 204 s 7, and
2002 c 61 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
Washington state combined fund drive account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund,
the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the game farm alternative
account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile
accountability incentive account, the poet laureate account, the rural
rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the
youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the
sulfur dioxide abatement account, and the children's trust fund.
However, the earnings to be distributed shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

--- END ---