BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is an
urgent need for vigorous enforcement of child support obligations. The
legislature further finds that the duty of child support to provide for
the needs of dependent children, including their necessary food,
clothing, shelter, education, and health care, should not be avoided
because of where an obligor resides. A person owing a duty of child
support who chooses to engage in behaviors that result in the person
becoming incarcerated should not be able to avoid child support
obligations.

Sec. 2 RCW 72.09.111 and 2002 c 126 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary shall deduct from the gross wages or gratuities
of each inmate working in correctional industries work programs, taxes
and legal financial obligations. The secretary shall also deduct child
support payments from the gratuities of each inmate working in class II
through class IV correctional industries work programs. The secretary
shall develop a formula for the distribution of offender wages and
gratuities.
(a) The formula shall include the following minimum deductions from
class I gross wages and from all others earning at least minimum wage:
(i) Five percent to the public safety and education account for the
purpose of crime victims' compensation;
(ii) Ten percent to a department personal inmate savings account;
(iii) Twenty percent to the department to contribute to the cost of
incarceration; and
(iv) Twenty percent for payment of legal financial obligations for
all inmates who have legal financial obligations owing in any
Washington state superior court.
(b) The formula shall include the following minimum deductions from
class II gross gratuities:
(i) Five percent to the public safety and education account for the
purpose of crime victims' compensation;
(ii) Ten percent to a department personal inmate savings account;
(iii) Fifteen percent to the department to contribute to the cost
of incarceration; ((and))
(iv) Twenty percent for payment of legal financial obligations for
all inmates who have legal financial obligations owing in any
Washington state superior court; and
(v) Fifteen percent for any child support owed under a support
order.
(c) ((The formula shall include the following minimum deduction
from class IV gross gratuities: Five percent to the department to
contribute to the cost of incarceration.
(d))) The formula shall include the following minimum deductions
from class III gratuities:
(i) Five percent for the purpose of crime victims' compensation;
and
(ii) Fifteen percent for any child support owed under a support
order.
(d) The formula shall include the following minimum deduction from
class IV gross gratuities:
(i) Five percent to the department to contribute to the cost of
incarceration; and
(ii) Fifteen percent for any child support owed under a support
order.
Any person sentenced to life imprisonment without possibility of
release or parole under chapter 10.95 RCW or sentenced to death shall
be exempt from the requirement under (a)(ii) or (b)(ii) of this
subsection.
The department personal inmate savings account, together with any
accrued interest, shall only be available to an inmate at the time of
his or her release from confinement, unless the secretary determines
that an emergency exists for the inmate, at which time the funds can be
made available to the inmate in an amount determined by the secretary.
The management of classes I, II, and IV correctional industries may
establish an incentive payment for offender workers based on
productivity criteria. This incentive shall be paid separately from
the hourly wage/gratuity rate and shall not be subject to the specified
deduction for cost of incarceration.
In the event that the offender worker's wages or gratuity is
subject to garnishment for support enforcement, the crime victims'
compensation, savings, and cost of incarceration deductions shall be
calculated on the net wages after taxes, legal financial obligations,
and garnishment.
(2) The department shall explore other methods of recovering a
portion of the cost of the inmate's incarceration and for encouraging
participation in work programs, including development of incentive
programs that offer inmates benefits and amenities paid for only from
wages earned while working in a correctional industries work program.
(3) The department shall develop the necessary administrative
structure to recover inmates' wages and keep records of the amount
inmates pay for the costs of incarceration and amenities. All funds
deducted from inmate wages under subsection (1) of this section for the
purpose of contributions to the cost of incarceration shall be
deposited in a dedicated fund with the department and shall be used
only for the purpose of enhancing and maintaining correctional
industries work programs.
(4) The expansion of inmate employment in class I and class II
correctional industries shall be implemented according to the following
schedule:
(a) Not later than June 30, 1995, the secretary shall achieve a net
increase of at least two hundred in the number of inmates employed in
class I or class II correctional industries work programs above the
number so employed on June 30, 1994;
(b) Not later than June 30, 1996, the secretary shall achieve a net
increase of at least four hundred in the number of inmates employed in
class I or class II correctional industries work programs above the
number so employed on June 30, 1994;
(c) Not later than June 30, 1997, the secretary shall achieve a net
increase of at least six hundred in the number of inmates employed in
class I or class II correctional industries work programs above the
number so employed on June 30, 1994;
(d) Not later than June 30, 1998, the secretary shall achieve a net
increase of at least nine hundred in the number of inmates employed in
class I or class II correctional industries work programs above the
number so employed on June 30, 1994;
(e) Not later than June 30, 1999, the secretary shall achieve a net
increase of at least one thousand two hundred in the number of inmates
employed in class I or class II correctional industries work programs
above the number so employed on June 30, 1994;
(f) Not later than June 30, 2000, the secretary shall achieve a net
increase of at least one thousand five hundred in the number of inmates
employed in class I or class II correctional industries work programs
above the number so employed on June 30, 1994.
(5) It shall be in the discretion of the secretary to apportion the
inmates between class I and class II depending on available contracts
and resources.
(6) Nothing in this section shall limit the authority of the
department of social and health services division of child support from
taking collection action against an inmate's moneys, assets, or
property pursuant to chapter 26.23, 74.20, or 74.20A RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 72.09.480 and 1999 c 325 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this section apply to this section.
(a) "Cost of incarceration" means the cost of providing an inmate
with shelter, food, clothing, transportation, supervision, and other
services and supplies as may be necessary for the maintenance and
support of the inmate while in the custody of the department, based on
the average per inmate costs established by the department and the
office of financial management.
(b) "Minimum term of confinement" means the minimum amount of time
an inmate will be confined in the custody of the department,
considering the sentence imposed and adjusted for the total potential
earned early release time available to the inmate.
(c) "Program" means any series of courses or classes necessary to
achieve a proficiency standard, certificate, or postsecondary degree.
(2) When an inmate, except as provided in subsection (((6))) (7) of
this section, receives any funds in addition to his or her wages or
gratuities, except settlements or awards resulting from legal action,
the additional funds shall be subject to the following deductions ((in
RCW 72.09.111(1)(a))) and the priorities established in chapter 72.11
RCW:
(a) Five percent to the public safety and education account for the
purpose of crime victims' compensation;
(b) Ten percent to a department personal inmate savings account;
(c) Twenty percent to the department to contribute to the cost of
incarceration;
(d) Twenty percent for payment of legal financial obligations for
all inmates who have legal financial obligations owing in any
Washington state superior court; and
(e) Fifteen percent for any child support owed under a support
order.
(3) When an inmate, except as provided in subsection (7) of this
section, receives any funds from a settlement or award resulting from
a legal action, the additional funds shall be subject to the deductions
in RCW 72.09.111(1)(a) and the priorities established in chapter 72.11
RCW.
(((3))) (4) The amount deducted from an inmate's funds under
subsection (2) of this section shall not exceed the department's total
cost of incarceration for the inmate incurred during the inmate's
minimum or actual term of confinement, whichever is longer.
(((4))) (5) The deductions required under subsection (2) of this
section shall not apply to funds received by the department on behalf
of an offender for payment of one fee-based education or vocational
program that is associated with an inmate's work program or a placement
decision made by the department under RCW 72.09.460 to prepare an
inmate for work upon release.
An inmate may, prior to the completion of the fee-based education
or vocational program authorized under this subsection, apply to a
person designated by the secretary for permission to make a change in
his or her program. The secretary, or his or her designee, may approve
the application based solely on the following criteria: (a) The inmate
has been transferred to another institution by the department for
reasons unrelated to education or a change to a higher security
classification and the offender's current program is unavailable in the
offender's new placement; (b) the inmate entered an academic program as
an undeclared major and wishes to declare a major. No inmate may apply
for more than one change to his or her major and receive the exemption
from deductions specified in this subsection; (c) the educational or
vocational institution is terminating the inmate's current program; or
(d) the offender's training or education has demonstrated that the
current program is not the appropriate program to assist the offender
to achieve a placement decision made by the department under RCW
72.09.460 to prepare the inmate for work upon release.
(((5))) (6) The deductions required under subsection (2) of this
section shall not apply to any money received by the department, on
behalf of an inmate, from family or other outside sources for the
payment of postage expenses. Money received under this subsection may
only be used for the payment of postage expenses and may not be
transferred to any other account or purpose. Money that remains unused
in the inmate's postage fund at the time of release shall be subject to
the deductions outlined in subsection (2) of this section.
(((6))) (7) When an inmate sentenced to life imprisonment without
possibility of release or parole, or to death under chapter 10.95 RCW,
receives any funds in addition to his or her gratuities, except
settlements or awards resulting from legal action, the additional funds
shall be subject to: Deductions of five percent to the public safety
and education account for the purpose of crime victims' compensation
((and)), twenty percent to the department to contribute to the cost of
incarceration, and fifteen percent to child support payments.
(((7))) (8) When an inmate sentenced to life imprisonment without
possibility of release or parole, or to death under chapter 10.95 RCW,
receives any funds from a settlement or award resulting from a legal
action in addition to his or her gratuities, the additional funds shall
be subject to: Deductions of five percent to the public safety and
education account for the purpose of crime victims' compensation and
twenty percent to the department to contribute to the cost of
incarceration.
(9) The interest earned on an inmate savings account created as a
result of the plan in section 4, chapter 325, Laws of 1999 shall be
exempt from the mandatory deductions under this section and RCW
72.09.111.
(10) Nothing in this section shall limit the authority of the
department of social and health services division of child support from
taking collection action against an inmate's moneys, assets, or
property pursuant to chapter 26.23, 74.20, or 74.20A RCW including, but
not limited to, the collection of moneys received by the inmate from
settlements or awards resulting from legal action.

--- END ---