BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 12.40.105 and 1998 c 52 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
If the losing party fails to pay the judgment within thirty days or
within the period otherwise ordered by the court, the judgment shall be
increased by: (1) An amount sufficient to cover costs of certification
of the judgment under RCW 12.40.110; ((and)) (2) the amount specified
in RCW 36.18.012(2); and (3) any other costs incurred by the prevailing
party to enforce the judgment, including but not limited to reasonable
attorneys' fees, without regard to the jurisdictional limits on the
small claims department.

--- END ---