BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.50.070 and 2000 c 119 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Where an application under this section alleges that
irreparable injury could result from domestic violence if an order is
not issued immediately without prior notice to the respondent, the
court may grant an ex parte temporary order for protection, pending a
full hearing, and grant relief as the court deems proper, including an
order:
(a) Restraining any party from committing acts of domestic
violence;
(b) Restraining any party from going onto the grounds of or
entering the dwelling that the parties share, from the residence,
workplace, or school of the other, or from the day care or school of a
child until further order of the court;
(c) Prohibiting any party from knowingly coming within, or
knowingly remaining within, a specified distance from a specified
location;
(d) Restraining any party from interfering with the other's custody
of the minor children or from removing the children from the
jurisdiction of the court;
(e) Restraining any party from having any contact with the victim
of domestic violence or the victim's children or members of the
victim's household; and
(f) Considering the provisions of RCW 9.41.800.
(2) Irreparable injury under this section includes but is not
limited to situations in which the respondent has recently threatened
petitioner with bodily injury or has engaged in acts of domestic
violence against the petitioner.
(3) The court shall hold an ex parte hearing in person or by
telephone on the day the petition is filed or on the following judicial
day.
(4) An ex parte temporary order for protection shall be effective
for a fixed period not to exceed fourteen days or twenty-four days if
the court has permitted service by publication under RCW 26.50.085 or
by mail under RCW 26.50.123. The ex parte order may be reissued. A
full hearing, as provided in this chapter, shall be set for not later
than fourteen days from the issuance of the temporary order or not
later than twenty-four days if service by publication or by mail is
permitted. Except as provided in RCW 26.50.050, 26.50.085, and
26.50.123, the respondent shall be personally served with a copy of the
ex parte order along with a copy of the petition and notice of the date
set for the hearing. The ex parte order and notice of hearing must
include at a minimum the date and time of the hearing set by the court
to determine if the temporary order should be made effective for not
more than one year, and notice that if the respondent fails to appear
or otherwise not respond, an order for protection will be issued
against the respondent under this chapter, for not more than one year
from the date of the hearing. The notice must also include a brief
statement of the provisions of the ex parte order and notify the
respondent that a copy of the ex parte order and notice of hearing has
been filed with the clerk of the court.
(5) Any order issued under this section shall contain the date and
time of issuance and the expiration date and shall be entered into a
statewide judicial information system by the clerk of the court within
one judicial day after issuance.
(6) If the court declines to issue an ex parte temporary order for
protection the court shall state the particular reasons for the court's
denial. The court's denial of a motion for an ex parte order of
protection shall be filed with the court.

--- END ---