BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.56 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to the classes of employees listed in RCW 41.56.030(7),
the provisions of RCW 41.56.430 through 41.56.470, 41.56.480, and
41.56.490 are also applicable to the operating and maintenance
employees of an operating agency as defined in RCW 43.52.250 who are
employed at a commercial nuclear power plant that the agency is
operating under a site certificate issued before the effective date of
this act under chapter 80.50 RCW.

--- END ---