BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.28.311 and 2000 c 238 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby created an electrical board, consisting of
((fourteen)) fifteen members to be appointed by the governor with the
advice of the director of labor and industries as herein provided. It
shall be the purpose and function of the board to advise the director
on all matters pertaining to the enforcement of this chapter including,
but not limited to standards of electrical and telecommunications
installation, minimum inspection procedures, and the adoption of rules
pertaining to the electrical inspection division: PROVIDED, HOWEVER,
That no rules shall be amended or repealed until the electrical board
has first had an opportunity to consider any proposed amendments or
repeals and had an opportunity to make recommendations to the director
relative thereto. The members of the electrical board shall be
selected and appointed as follows: One member shall be an employee or
officer of a corporation or public agency generating or distributing
electric power; one member must be an employee or officer of a
facilities-based telecommunications service provider regulated by the
Washington state utilities and transportation commission; three members
shall be licensed electrical contractors: PROVIDED, That one of these
members may be a representative of a trade association in the
electrical industry; one member shall be a licensed telecommunications
contractor; one member shall be an employee, or officer, or
representative of a corporation or firm engaged in the business of
manufacturing or distributing electrical and telecommunications
materials, equipment, or devices; one member shall be a person with
knowledge of the electrical industry, not related to the electrical
industry, to represent the public; three members shall be certified
electricians; one member shall be a telecommunications worker; one
member shall be a licensed professional electrical engineer qualified
to do business in the state of Washington and designated as a
registered communications distribution designer; one member shall be an
outside line worker; and one nonvoting member must be a building
official from an incorporated city or town with an electrical
inspection program established under RCW 19.28.141. The regular term
of each member shall be four years: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, The original
board shall be appointed on June 9, 1988, for the following terms: The
first term of the member representing a corporation or public agency
generating or distributing electric power shall serve four years; two
members representing licensed electrical contractors shall serve three
years; the member representing a manufacturer or distributor of
electrical equipment or devices shall serve three years; the member
representing the public and one member representing licensed electrical
contractors shall serve two years; the three members selected as
certified electricians shall serve for terms of one, two, and three
years, respectively; the member selected as the licensed professional
electrical engineer shall serve for one year. In appointing the
original board, the governor shall give due consideration to the value
of continuity in membership from predecessor boards. Thereafter, the
governor shall appoint or reappoint board members for terms of four
years and to fill vacancies created by the completion of the terms of
the original members. When new positions are created, the governor may
appoint the initial members to the new positions to staggered terms of
one to three years. The governor shall also fill vacancies caused by
death, resignation, or otherwise for the unexpired term of such members
by appointing their successors from the same business classification.
The same procedure shall be followed in making such subsequent
appointments as is provided for the original appointments. The board,
at this first meeting shall elect one of its members to serve as
chairman. Any person acting as the chief electrical inspector shall
serve as secretary of the board during his or her tenure as chief state
inspector. Meetings of the board shall be held at least quarterly in
accordance with a schedule established by the board. Each member of
the board shall receive compensation in accordance with RCW 43.03.240
and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060 which shall be paid out of the electrical
license fund, upon vouchers approved by the director of labor and
industries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The governor shall appoint the member
representing outside line workers within ninety days after the
effective date of this act.

--- END ---