BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.3101 and 1998 c 213 s 2, 1998 c 209 s 2, and
1998 c 207 s 8 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Pursuant to RCW 46.20.308, the department shall suspend, revoke, or
deny the arrested person's license, permit, or privilege to drive as
follows:
(1) In the case of a person who has refused a test or tests:
(a) For a first refusal within seven years, where there has not
been a previous incident within seven years that resulted in
administrative action under this section, revocation or denial for one
year;
(b) For a second or subsequent refusal within seven years, or for
a first refusal where there has been one or more previous incidents
within seven years that have resulted in administrative action under
this section, revocation or denial for two years or until the person
reaches age twenty-one, whichever is longer. A revocation imposed
under this subsection (1)(b) shall run consecutively to the period of
any suspension, revocation, or denial imposed pursuant to a criminal
conviction arising out of the same incident.
(2) In the case of an incident where a person has submitted to or
been administered a test or tests indicating that the alcohol
concentration of the person's breath or blood was 0.08 or more:
(a) For a first incident within seven years, where there has not
been a previous incident within seven years that resulted in
administrative action under this section, suspension for ninety days;
(b) For a second or subsequent incident within seven years,
revocation or denial for two years.
(3) In the case of an incident where a person under age twenty-one
has submitted to or been administered a test or tests indicating that
the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood was in
violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.503, or 46.61.504:
(a) For a first incident within seven years, suspension or denial
for ninety days;
(b) For a second or subsequent incident within seven years,
revocation or denial for one year or until the person reaches age
twenty-one, whichever is longer.
(4) The person whose license or privilege has been suspended,
revoked, or denied may apply to the department for issuance of a
restricted driver's license under RCW 46.20.391 upon furnishing to the
department proof that an approved ignition interlock or other approved
biological or technical device has been installed on his or her
vehicle. The person shall maintain the approved device on his or her
vehicle and operate only that vehicle that is equipped with an approved
device throughout the term of the suspension, revocation, or denial.
A restricted license granted under this chapter extends through the
period of any suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under a
criminal conviction arising out of the same incident.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.380 and 1985 ex.s. c 1 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
No person may file an application for ((an occupational)) a
restricted driver's license as provided in RCW 46.20.391 unless he or
she first pays to the director or other person authorized to accept
applications and fees for driver's licenses a fee of twenty-five
dollars. The applicant shall receive upon payment an official receipt
for the payment of such fee. All such fees shall be forwarded to the
director who shall transmit such fees to the state treasurer in the
same manner as other driver's license fees.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.20.391 and 1999 c 274 s 4 and 1999 c 272 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person licensed under this chapter who is convicted of an
offense relating to motor vehicles for which suspension or revocation
of the driver's license is mandatory, other than vehicular homicide or
vehicular assault, or who has had his or her license suspended under
RCW 46.20.3101 (2)(a) or (3)(a), may submit to the department an
application for ((an occupational)) a restricted driver's license. The
department, upon receipt of the prescribed fee and upon determining
that the petitioner is ((engaged in an occupation or trade that makes
it essential that the petitioner operate a motor vehicle)) eligible to
receive the license under subsection (3) of this section, may issue
((an occupational)) a restricted driver's license and may set definite
restrictions as provided in RCW 46.20.394. No person may petition for,
and the department shall not issue, ((an occupational)) a restricted
driver's license that is effective during the first thirty days of any
suspension ((or revocation)) imposed ((either)) for a violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or under RCW 46.20.3101 (2)(a) or (3)(a), or for
both a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and under RCW 46.20.3101
(2)(a) or (3)(a) where the action arises from the same incident unless
the petitioner furnishes proof to the department that he or she has
installed an approved ignition interlock or other approved biological
or technical device in his or her vehicle. The person shall maintain
the device in his or her vehicle and operate only that vehicle that is
equipped with an approved device throughout the term of the suspension,
revocation, or denial.
A person aggrieved by the decision of the department on the
application for ((an occupational)) a restricted driver's license may
request a hearing as provided by rule of the department.
(2)(a) A person licensed under this chapter whose driver's license
is suspended administratively due to failure to appear or pay a traffic
ticket under RCW 46.20.289; a violation of the financial responsibility
laws under chapter 46.29 RCW; or for multiple violations within a
specified period of time under RCW 46.20.291, may apply to the
department for an occupational driver's license if the applicant
demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that one of the
following additional conditions are met:
(i) The applicant is in an apprenticeship program or an on-the-job
training program for which a driver's license is required;
(ii) The applicant presents evidence that he or she has applied for
a position in an apprenticeship or on-the-job training program and the
program has certified that a driver's license is required to begin the
program, provided that a license granted under this provision shall be
in effect no longer than fourteen days;
(iii) The applicant is in a program that assists persons who are
enrolled in a WorkFirst program pursuant to chapter 74.08A RCW to
become gainfully employed and the program requires a driver's license;
or
(iv) The applicant is undergoing substance abuse treatment or is
participating in meetings of a twelve-step group such as alcoholics
anonymous.
(b) If the suspension is for failure to respond, pay, or comply
with a notice of traffic infraction or conviction, the applicant must
enter into a payment plan with the court.
(c) An occupational driver's license issued to an applicant
described in (a) of this subsection shall be valid for the period of
the suspension or revocation but not more than two years.
(d) Upon receipt of evidence that a holder of an occupational
driver's license granted under this subsection is no longer enrolled in
an apprenticeship or on-the-job training program, the director shall
give written notice by first class mail to the driver that the
occupational driver's license shall be canceled. The effective date of
cancellation shall be fifteen days from the date of mailing the notice.
If at any time before the cancellation goes into effect the driver
submits evidence of continued enrollment in the program, the
cancellation shall be stayed. If the cancellation becomes effective,
the driver may obtain, at no additional charge, a new occupational
driver's license upon submittal of evidence of enrollment in another
program that meets the criteria set forth in this subsection.
(e) The department shall not issue an occupational driver's license
under (a)(iv) of this subsection if the applicant is able to receive
transit services sufficient to allow for the applicant's participation
in the programs referenced under (a)(iv) of this subsection.
(3) An applicant for ((an occupational)) a restricted driver's
license is eligible to receive such license only if:
(a) Within one year immediately preceding the date of the offense
that gave rise to the present conviction, the applicant has not
committed any other offense relating to motor vehicles for which
suspension or revocation of a driver's license is mandatory; and
(b) Within seven years immediately preceding the date of the
offense that gave rise to the present conviction or incident, the
applicant has not committed ((any of the following offenses: (i)
Driving or being in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor; (ii))) (i) vehicular
homicide under RCW 46.61.520; or (((iii))) (ii) vehicular assault under
RCW 46.61.522; and
(c) The applicant meets at least one of the following qualifying
circumstances: (i) Is engaged in an occupation or trade that makes it
essential that he or she operate a motor vehicle, except as allowed
under subsection (2)(a) of this section; (ii) is undergoing continuing
health care or providing continuing health care to another who is
dependent upon the applicant; (iii) is enrolled in an educational
institution and pursuing a course of study leading to a diploma,
degree, or other certification of successful educational completion;
(iv) is undergoing substance abuse treatment; (v) is fulfilling court-ordered community service responsibilities; (vi) is in an
apprenticeship or on-the-job training, or WorkFirst program; or (vii)
presents evidence that he or she has applied for a position in an
apprenticeship or on-the-job training program for which a driver's
license is required to begin the program, but a license granted under
this provision may be in effect for no longer than fourteen days; and
(d) The applicant files satisfactory proof of financial
responsibility under chapter 46.29 RCW.
(4) The director shall cancel an occupational or restricted
driver's license upon receipt of notice that the holder thereof has
been convicted of operating a motor vehicle in violation of its
restrictions, or of a separate offense that under chapter 46.20 RCW
would warrant suspension or revocation of a regular driver's license.
The cancellation is effective as of the date of the conviction, and
continues with the same force and effect as any suspension or
revocation under this title.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.20.394 and 1999 c 272 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
In issuing ((an occupational)) a restricted driver's license under
RCW 46.20.391, the department shall describe the type of ((occupation
permitted)) qualifying circumstances and shall set forth in detail the
specific hours of the day during which the person may drive to and from
his ((place of work)) or her home, which may not exceed twelve hours in
any one day; the days of the week during which the license may be used;
and the general routes over which the person may travel. In issuing an
occupational driver's license under RCW 46.20.391(2)(a)(iv), the
department shall set forth in detail the specific hours during which
the person may drive to and from substance abuse treatment or meetings
of a twelve-step group such as alcoholics anonymous, the days of the
week during which the license may be used, and the general routes over
which the person may travel. These restrictions shall be prepared in
written form by the department, which document shall be carried in the
vehicle at all times and presented to a law enforcement officer under
the same terms as the occupational or restricted driver's license. Any
violation of the restrictions constitutes a violation of RCW 46.20.342
and subjects the person to all procedures and penalties therefor.

--- END ---