BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.58.107 and 1997 c 223 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of health shall charge a fee of ((thirteen)) fifteen
dollars for certified copies of records and for copies or information
provided for research, statistical, or administrative purposes, and
eight dollars for a search of the files or records when no copy is
made. The department shall prescribe by regulation fees to be paid for
preparing sealed files and for opening sealed files.
No fee may be demanded or required for furnishing certified copies
of a birth, death, fetal death, marriage, divorce, annulment, or legal
separation record for use in connection with a claim for compensation
or pension pending before the veterans administration.
The department shall keep a true and correct account of all fees
received and turn the fees over to the state treasurer on a weekly
basis.
Local registrars shall charge the same fees as the state as
hereinabove provided and as prescribed by department regulation((,
except that local registrars shall charge thirteen dollars for the
first copy of a death certificate and eight dollars for each additional
copy of the same death certificate when the additional copies are
ordered at the same time as the first copy)). All such fees collected,
except for five dollars of each fee collected for the issuance of ((a
certified copy)) birth certificates and first copies of death
certificates and twelve dollars of each fee collected for additional
copies of the same death certificate ordered at the same time as the
first copy, shall be paid to the jurisdictional health department.
All local registrars in cities and counties shall keep a true and
correct account of all fees received under this section for the
issuance of certified copies and shall turn five dollars of the fees
collected for birth certificates and first copies of death certificates
and twelve dollars of the fee collected for additional copies of death
certificates over to the state treasurer on or before the first day of
January, April, July, and October.
Five dollars of each fee imposed for the issuance of certified
copies, except for copies suitable for display issued under RCW
70.58.085, at both the state and local levels shall be held by the
state treasurer in the death investigations' account established by RCW
43.79.445. Seven dollars of each fifteen-dollar fee collected for
additional copies of death certificates issued by local registrars must
be paid to the department of health for the purpose of developing and
maintaining the state vital records systems, including a web-based
electronic death registration system.

--- END ---