BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 7.48.250 and 1987 c 202 s 136 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whoever is ((convicted)) found to have committed the infraction of
erecting, causing, or contriving a public or common nuisance as
described in this chapter, or at common law, when the same has not been
modified or repealed by statute, where no other punishment therefor is
specially provided, shall be punished by a ((fine)) monetary penalty
not exceeding one thousand dollars((,)) and the court, with or without
such ((fine)) monetary penalty, may order such nuisance to be abated,
and issue a warrant as hereinafter provided: PROVIDED, That orders and
warrants of abatement shall not be issued by district judges.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.20.340 and 1995 c 51 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A violation of any of the rules of the board adopted to
implement RCW 66.20.300 through 66.20.350 is ((a misdemeanor)) an
infraction, punishable by a ((fine)) monetary penalty of not more than
two hundred fifty dollars for a first offense.
(2) A subsequent offense is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of
not more than five hundred dollars, or imprisonment for not more than
ninety days, or both the fine and imprisonment.

Sec. 3 RCW 88.02.110 and 1993 c 244 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a violation of
this chapter and the rules adopted by the department pursuant to these
statutes is ((a misdemeanor)) an infraction punishable only by a
((fine)) monetary penalty not to exceed one hundred dollars per vessel
for the first violation. Subsequent violations in the same year are
subject to the following ((fines)) monetary penalties:
(a) For the second violation, a ((fine)) monetary penalty of two
hundred dollars per vessel;
(b) For the third and successive violations, a ((fine)) monetary
penalty of four hundred dollars per vessel.
(2) After subtraction of court costs and administrative collection
fees, moneys collected under this section shall be credited to the
current expense fund of the ((arresting)) jurisdiction issuing the
notice of infraction.
(3) All law enforcement officers shall have the authority to
enforce this chapter, and the rules adopted by the department pursuant
to these statutes within their respective jurisdictions: PROVIDED,
That a city, town, or county may contract with a fire protection
district for such enforcement and fire protection districts are
authorized to engage in such activities.

--- END ---