BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.87A.010 and 2000 c 201 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
To aid general economic development and neighborhood
revitalization, and to facilitate the cooperation of merchants,
businesses, and residential property owners which assists trade,
economic viability, and liveability, the legislature hereby authorizes
all counties and all incorporated cities and towns, including
unclassified cities and towns operating under special charters:
(1) To establish, after a petition submitted by the operators
responsible for sixty percent of the assessments by businesses and
multifamily residential or mixed-use projects within the area, parking
and business improvement areas((, hereafter referred to as area or
areas,)) for the following purposes:
(a) The acquisition, construction or maintenance of parking
facilities for the benefit of the area;
(b) Decoration of any public place in the area;
(c) Sponsorship or promotion of public events which are to take
place on or in public places in the area;
(d) Furnishing of music in any public place in the area;
(e) Providing professional management, planning, and promotion for
the area, including the management and promotion of retail trade and
tourism activities in the area; ((or))
(f) Providing maintenance and security for common, public areas.
(2) To levy special assessments on all businesses and multifamily
residential or mixed-use projects within the area and specially
benefited by a parking and business improvement area to pay in whole or
in part the damages or costs incurred therein as provided in this
chapter.
(3) To levy an additional special assessment on the sale of or
charge made for the furnishing of lodging that is subject to tax under
chapter 82.08 RCW for the purpose of funding convention and tourism
promotion. This additional special assessment amount shall be a fixed
amount not to exceed two dollars on the sale of or charge made for the
furnishing of lodging.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.87A.020 and 1993 c 429 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Area" means a parking and business improvement area.
(2) "Business" means all types of business, including professions.
(((2))) (3) "Convention and tourism promotion" means (a) activities
and expenditures designed to increase tourism, including but not
limited to advertising, publicizing, or otherwise distributing
information for the purpose of attracting and welcoming tourists;
developing strategies to expand tourism; operating tourism promotion
agencies; and funding marketing of special events and festivals
designed to attract tourists; and (b) the activities under (a) of this
subsection are located in a county with a population greater than four
hundred thousand, but less than one million.
(4) "Legislative authority" means the legislative authority of any
city or town, including unclassified cities or towns operating under
special charters, or the legislative authority of any county.
(((3))) (5) "Multifamily residential or mixed-use project" means
any building or buildings containing four or more residential units or
a combination of residential and commercial units, whether title to the
entire property is held in single or undivided ownership or title to
individual units is held by owners who also, directly or indirectly
through an association, own real property in common with the other unit
owners.
(((4))) (6) "Residential operator" means the owner or operator of
a multifamily residential or mixed-use project if title is held in
single or undivided ownership, or, if title is held in a form of common
interest ownership, the association of unit owners, condominium
association, homeowners' association, property owners' association, or
residential cooperative corporation.

Sec. 3 RCW 35.87A.030 and 1993 c 429 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purpose of establishing a parking and business improvement
area, an initiation petition may be presented to the legislative
authority having jurisdiction of the area in which the proposed parking
and business improvement area is to be located ((or the legislative
authority may by resolution initiate a parking and business improvement
area)). The initiation petition ((or resolution)) shall contain the
following:
(1) A description of the boundaries of the proposed area;
(2) The proposed uses and projects to which the proposed special
assessment revenues shall be put and the total estimated cost thereof;
(3) The estimated rate of levy of special assessment under RCW
35.87A.010(2) with a proposed breakdown by class of business and
multifamily residential or mixed-use project if such classification is
to be used((. The initiating petition shall also contain));
(4) The estimated levy rate of special assessments under RCW
35.87A.010(3) with a proposed graduated assessment rate based on
location and the revenue that lodging businesses will receive from the
convention and tourism promotion; and
(5) The signatures of the persons who operate businesses and
residential operators in the proposed area which would pay fifty
percent of the proposed special assessments.
This section shall not be construed as prohibiting the legislative
authority from initiating the formation of an area by adopting a
resolution of intention to do so pursuant to RCW 35.87A.040.

Sec. 4 RCW 35.87A.040 and 1971 ex.s. c 45 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislative authority shall, after receiving a valid initiation
petition ((or after passage of an initiation resolution, shall)), or
may, upon its own motion, adopt a resolution of intention to establish
an area. The resolution shall state:
(1) The time and place of a hearing to be held by the legislative
authority to consider establishment of an area and ((shall restate all
the information contained in the initiation petition or initiation
resolution regarding boundaries, projects and uses, and estimated rates
of assessment)) the rate or rates of levy of special assessments within
the proposed area;
(2) A description of boundaries of the proposed area;
(3) The proposed uses and projects to which the proposed special
assessment revenues shall be dedicated and the total estimated cost;
and
(4) The estimated rate or rates of levy of special assessment with
a proposed breakdown by class of business and multifamily residential
or mixed-use project if such classification is to be used.

Sec. 5 RCW 35.87A.050 and 1993 c 429 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notice of a hearing held under the provisions of this chapter shall
be given by:
(1) One publication of the resolution of intention in a newspaper
of general circulation in the city; and
(2) Mailing a complete copy of the resolution of intention to each
business and multifamily residential or mixed-use project or lodging
businesses in the proposed, or established, area. Publication and
mailing shall be completed at least ten days prior to the time of the
hearing.

Sec. 6 RCW 35.87A.080 and 1993 c 429 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of the special assessments to be imposed
((pursuant to this chapter)) under RCW 35.87A.010(2), the legislative
authority may make a reasonable classification of businesses and
multifamily residential or mixed-use projects, giving consideration to
various factors such as business and occupation taxes imposed, square
footage of the business, number of employees, gross sales, or any other
reasonable factor relating to the benefit received, including the
degree of benefit received from parking. Whenever it is proposed that
a parking and business improvement area provide more than one of the
purposes listed in RCW 35.87A.010, special assessments may be imposed
in a manner that measures benefit from each of the separate purposes,
or any combination of the separate purposes.
(2) For the purposes of the additional special assessment under RCW
35.87A.010(3), the assessment amount charged for the furnishing of
lodging by businesses shall reflect the location and the revenue that
the lodging business will receive from the convention and tourism
promotion.
(3) Special assessments shall be imposed and collected annually, or
on another basis specified in the ordinance establishing the parking
and business improvement area.

Sec. 7 RCW 35.87A.090 and 1993 c 429 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The special assessments need not be imposed on different
classes of business and multifamily residential or mixed-use projects,
as determined pursuant to RCW 35.87A.080(1), on the same basis or the
same rate. The special assessments imposed for the purpose of the
acquisition, construction or maintenance of parking facilities for the
benefit of the area shall be imposed on the basis of benefit determined
by the legislative authority after giving consideration to the total
cost to be recovered from the businesses and multifamily residential or
mixed-use projects upon which the special assessment is to be imposed,
the total area within the boundaries of the parking and business
improvement area, the assessed value of the land and improvements
within the area, the total business volume generated within the area
and within each business, and such other factors as the legislative
authority may find and determine to be a reasonable measure of such
benefit.
(2) The special assessments on lodging businesses under RCW
35.87A.010(3) must reflect the location and the revenue that the
lodging business will derive from the convention and tourism promotion,
as well as factors such as increased business volume or other factors
the legislative authority determines to be a reasonable measure of the
benefit received.

Sec. 8 RCW 35.87A.110 and 1971 ex.s. c 45 s 11 are each amended
to read as follows:
Subject to the provisions of this chapter, the legislative
authority of each city or town or county shall have sole discretion as
to how the revenue derived from the special assessments is to be used
((within the scope of the purposes)); however, the legislative
authority may appoint existing advisory boards or commissions to make
recommendations as to its use, or the legislative authority may create
a new advisory board or commission for the purpose.
The legislative authority may contract with a chamber of commerce
or other similar business association operating primarily within the
boundaries of the legislative authority to administer the operation of
a parking and business improvement area, including any funds derived
pursuant thereto: PROVIDED, That such administration must comply with
all applicable provisions of law including this chapter, with all
county, city, or town resolutions and ordinances, and with all
regulations lawfully imposed by the state auditor or other state
agencies.

Sec. 9 RCW 35.87A.130 and 1971 ex.s. c 45 s 13 are each amended
to read as follows:
Collections of assessments imposed pursuant to this chapter shall
be made at the same time and in the same manner as otherwise prescribed
by Title 35 RCW or in such other manner as the legislative authority
shall determine. The special assessment under RCW 35.87A.010(3) shall
be collected at the same time and in a similar manner as sales and use
taxes are collected under chapter 82.14 RCW. The department of revenue
shall administer the collection of this special assessment at no cost
to the city, town, or county.

Sec. 10 RCW 35.87A.140 and 1993 c 429 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
Changes may be made in the rate or additional rate of special
assessment as specified in the ordinance establishing the area, by
ordinance adopted after a hearing before the legislative authority.
The legislative authority shall adopt a resolution of intention to
change the rate or additional rate of special assessment at least
fifteen days prior to the hearing required by this section. This
resolution shall specify the proposed change and shall give the time
and place of the hearing. Proceedings to change the rate or impose an
additional rate of special assessments shall terminate if protest is
made by businesses or multifamily residential or mixed-use projects or
lodging businesses in the proposed area which would pay a majority of
the proposed increase or additional special assessments.

Sec. 11 RCW 35.87A.180 and 1971 ex.s. c 45 s 18 are each amended
to read as follows:
The legislative authority may disestablish an area by ordinance
after a hearing before the legislative authority. The legislative
authority shall adopt a resolution of intention to disestablish the
area at least fifteen days prior to the hearing required by this
section. The resolution shall give the time and place of the hearing.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, no area shall be disestablished prior to
the time the businesses have received special benefits for which
special assessments have been collected pursuant to RCW 35.87A.130.

--- END ---