BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Association" means a not-for-profit joint underwriting
association established under this chapter.
(2) "Contractor" has the same meaning as in RCW 18.27.010(1).
(3) "Liability insurance" means any casualty insurance policy that
provides coverage to businesses, entities, or service providers for
legal liability that results from negligent acts or omissions related
to their operations.
(4) "Voluntary market" includes authorized insurers and surplus
lines insurers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Subject to section 3 of this act, the
commissioner must create a Washington association to provide liability
insurance for contractors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The commissioner must provide notice,
hold a hearing, and issue findings under chapter 48.04 RCW before
forming an association.
(2) The commissioner may not form an association unless the
commissioner finds that:
(a) A market assistance plan formed under RCW 48.22.050 cannot
adequately serve the needs of businesses or entities described in
section 2 of this act; and
(b)(i) The voluntary market does not have the financial capacity to
provide adequate liability insurance to the businesses or entities
described in section 2 of this act;
(ii) Insurance essential for the businesses or entities described
in section 2 of this act to continue business operations is not
available in the voluntary market; or
(iii) There are so few insurers actively selling liability
insurance to the businesses or entities described in section 2 of this
act that a competitive market does not exist.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) If an association is formed, a person,
business, or entity is eligible to apply for insurance coverage from an
association only if:
(a) Their business or occupation is within the scope and purpose
for which the association was formed;
(b) The applicant is a resident of the state of Washington or its
operations are located in the state of Washington; and
(c) The applicant has been unable to buy adequate liability
insurance after contacting, through an agent or broker, a majority of
the voluntary insurance market.
(2)(a) An association may decline to insure any person or entity
that presents an extraordinary risk because of the nature of their
operations, past claims experience, or inadequate risk management
program.
(b) The association must have a formal appeal process for
applicants who are declined coverage through the association. Criteria
for the association's appeal process are subject to approval by the
commissioner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) An association is comprised of:
(a) Insurers that have a certificate of authority to write general
casualty insurance in this state; and
(b) Risk retention groups that are chartered and licensed to write
liability insurance in this state.
(2) Every general casualty insurer and risk retention group must be
a member of the association as a condition of its authority to continue
to transact business in this state.
(3) The commissioner may exclude an insurer or risk retention group
if participation in an association may threaten the solvency of that
insurer or risk retention group.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) An association must be funded by
premiums paid by businesses and entities insured by the association.
(a) All premiums must be deposited into a fund under the management
of the board.
(b) Premiums must be used to pay claims, administrative costs, and
other expenses of the association.
(2)(a) An association must file rates and a rating plan with the
commissioner.
(b) The rates and rating plan used by the association are subject
to approval by the commissioner.
(c) When determining whether to approve the association's rates and
rating plan, the commissioner must determine that the rates and rating
plan result in premium rates that are not excessive, inadequate, or
unfairly discriminatory. A rate is reasonable and not excessive,
inadequate, or unfairly discriminatory if it is an actuarially sound
estimate of the expected value of all future costs associated with an
individual risk transfer.
(3) In developing the rates and rating plan, the association must
give due consideration to:
(a) Past and prospective loss experience in Washington state for
experience periods acceptable to the commissioner. If data from
Washington state are not available or are not statistically credible,
the association may use loss experience from those states which are
likely to produce loss experience similar to that in Washington state;
(b) Past and prospective operating expenses;
(c) Past and prospective investment income;
(d) Whether an experience rating plan is appropriate for a class or
type of risk to be insured by the association; and
(e) All other relevant factors within and outside Washington state.
(4) If more than one class or type of liability insurance is
offered in a single association:
(a) Expenses and loss experience must be separated for each class
or type of insurance; and
(b) Premium rates charged for each class or type of insurance must
not be excessive, inadequate, or unfairly discriminatory.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 An association must establish a risk
management program for businesses or entities insured by the
association. The risk management program must include:
(1) Standards for systematic investigation and reporting of claims
and incidents; and
(2) A loss control and prevention program. This program must
include procedures that:
(a) Analyze claim frequency, severity, and causes of loss;
(b) Identify situations that may produce large losses;
(c) Develop measures to control losses;
(d) Monitor the effectiveness of the loss control and prevention
measures that are implemented; and
(e) Educate insured businesses or entities on methods to reduce and
prevent losses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) An association has the general corporate
powers and authority granted under the laws of the state of Washington.
(2) An association is a legal entity separate and distinct from its
members.
(3) Liability or a cause of action may not arise against the
following for any acts or omissions made in good faith while performing
their duties under this chapter:
(a) An association or any participating insurer;
(b) The commissioner or any of the commissioner's staff;
(c) The commissioner's authorized representatives; or
(d) Any other person or organization.
(4) The state is not liable to pay any debts or obligations of the
association.
(5) A person may not assert any claim against the state, its
agencies, or any of its employees for any act or omission of an
association.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The commissioner must appoint a
governing board to administer an association.
(a) The board must include one person selected by each of the two
largest caucuses in the senate and house of representatives to act as
nonvoting ex officio members.
(b) The board is subject to supervision by the commissioner.
(c) The association may reimburse board members who attend
meetings.
(i) Board members may be reimbursed for actual and necessary
expenses.
(ii) Legislators must be reimbursed under RCW 44.04.120.
(2) The commissioner may select one or more insurers to manage the
operations of an association. Every managing insurer must be admitted
to transact the business of insurance in the state of Washington and
have demonstrated expertise in the type of liability insurance coverage
that the association manages.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) The board, working cooperatively with
the commissioner, must adopt a plan of operation. The plan of
operation must include:
(a) Specifications for policy provisions and coverage limits;
(b) A process to assess members for operation of an association;
and
(c) All other procedures needed to implement and administer the
operations of the association.
(2) The plan of operation is subject to approval by the
commissioner before it takes effect.
(3) The board, in consultation with the commissioner, may amend the
plan of operation as needed. All amendments are subject to approval by
the commissioner before they take effect.
(4) The commissioner may adopt rules to implement this section if
the board does not adopt a plan of operation within forty-five days
after the board members have been appointed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) An association may assess all general
casualty insurers and risk retention groups to pay past and future
financial obligations. Assessments must be based on market share,
which is determined as follows:
(a) For general casualty insurers, an assessment is based on
written general casualty premiums for the most recent calendar year;
and
(b) For risk retention groups, an assessment is based on written
liability premiums for the most recent calendar year.
(2) If an association decides it must make an assessment, an
assessed insurer or risk retention group must pay the association
within thirty business days after it receives notice of the assessment.
If an insurer or risk retention group does not pay an assessment within
thirty business days after it receives notice of the assessment:
(a) The assessment accrues interest at the maximum legal rate until
it is paid in full. The interest is paid to the association;
(b) The commissioner may suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew an
insurer's certificate of authority; and
(c) The commissioner may fine the insurer or risk retention group
up to ten thousand dollars.
(3) The commissioner may order the association not to assess a
particular insurer or risk retention group if the assessment may
threaten the solvency of that insurer or risk retention group. Data
used by the commissioner to make this determination are subject to
confidential review by the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) An association must file a statement
annually with the commissioner that contains information about the
association's transactions, financial condition, and operations during
the preceding year. The commissioner may establish rules for the form
and content of this statement. The statement must:
(a) Be in the form and according to instructions adopted by the
national association of insurance commissioners for property and
casualty insurers; and
(b) Include all of the information stipulated by the commissioner.
(2) The association must maintain its records according to the
accounting practices and procedures manual adopted by the national
association of insurance commissioners.
(3) The association must provide the commissioner with free access
to all the books, records, files, papers, and documents that relate to
the operation of the association. The commissioner may summon,
qualify, and examine as witnesses all persons having knowledge of the
association's operations.
(4) The commissioner may enter and examine the operation and
experience of an association at any time.
(5) The commissioner must examine the transactions, financial
condition, and operations of an association at least once every three
years. Each examination must be conducted in the manner prescribed for
domestic insurance companies in chapter 48.03 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) If the commissioner forms an
association, the commissioner must report to the legislature annually
about the:
(a) Financial condition of the association;
(b) Condition of the voluntary market for the class or type of
insurance available through the association; and
(c) Need to continue the operations of the association.
(2) By resolution, the legislature may determine, after the
commissioner's report, that:
(a) The class or type of liability insurance may no longer be
offered by the association; or
(b) The association must be dissolved.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1) An association may operate for a period
of three years. At the end of the three-year period, the association
must be dissolved unless the commissioner provides notice, holds a
hearing, and issues findings under chapter 48.04 RCW to reauthorize the
operations of the association. The commissioner must use the criteria
in section 3 of this act to reauthorize an association.
(2) If the commissioner reauthorizes an association after the first
three years, the commissioner must act annually thereafter to
reauthorize the association, following the process in subsection (1) of
this section.
(3) If, at any time, the commissioner provides notice, holds a
hearing, and issues findings under chapter 48.04 RCW and finds that
adequate liability insurance is available in the voluntary market for
the class or type of insurance provided by the association, the
commissioner must order the association to end all underwriting
operations and supervise the dissolution of the association, including
settlement of all financial and legal obligations and distribution of
any remaining assets.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 (1) If, under section 13 or 14 of this act,
an association is dissolved, all policies must be denied renewal.
(2) If a surplus of funds exists when an association is dissolved,
the surplus funds must be disbursed to participating insurers.
Disbursements must be based on market share, which is determined as
follows:
(a) For general casualty insurers, a disbursement is based on
written general casualty premiums for the most recent calendar year;
and
(b) For risk retention groups, a disbursement is based on written
liability premiums for the most recent calendar year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 An association is not a member of the
Washington insurance guaranty association created under chapter 48.32
RCW. The Washington insurance guaranty association, this state, and
any political subdivisions of this state are not responsible for losses
sustained by an association.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 An association is exempt from payment of
all fees and all taxes levied by this state or any of its subdivisions,
except taxes levied on real or personal property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 The commissioner may adopt all rules needed
to ensure the efficient, equitable operation of the association.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 Sections 1 through 20 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 48 RCW.

--- END ---