BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.56.040 and 1957 c 259 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The chief justice shall consider all recommendations of the
administrator for the assignment of judges, and, in ((his)) the
discretion of the chief justice, direct any judge whose calendar, in
the judgment of the chief justice, will permit, to hold court in any
county or district where need therefor exists, to the end that the
courts of this state shall function with maximum efficiency, and that
the work of other courts shall be equitably distributed. It shall be
the duty of every judge to obey such direction of the chief justice
unless excused by ((him)) the chief justice for sufficient cause. ((No
salary warrant shall be issued pursuant to RCW 2.08.100 until the judge
who is to receive the same shall have made an affidavit, in the manner
provided by law, that he has fully complied with the provisions of RCW
2.56.040 and 2.56.050. Said affidavit may be made a part of the
affidavit required by RCW 2.08.100.))

--- END ---