BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that home-based
instruction is no more compatible with the immediate proximity of
secure community transition facilities than a public or private school.
Consequently, the legislature declares that homes in which children
receive home-based instruction deserve protection as risk potential
activities or facilities.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.09.020 and 2002 c 68 s 4 and 2002 c 58 s 2 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(2) "Health care facility" means any hospital, hospice care center,
licensed or certified health care facility, health maintenance
organization regulated under chapter 48.46 RCW, federally qualified
health maintenance organization, federally approved renal dialysis
center or facility, or federally approved blood bank.
(3) "Health care practitioner" means an individual or firm licensed
or certified to engage actively in a regulated health profession.
(4) "Health care services" means those services provided by health
professionals licensed pursuant to RCW 18.120.020(4).
(5) "Health profession" means those licensed or regulated
professions set forth in RCW 18.120.020(4).
(6) "Less restrictive alternative" means court-ordered treatment in
a setting less restrictive than total confinement which satisfies the
conditions set forth in RCW 71.09.092.
(7) "Likely to engage in predatory acts of sexual violence if not
confined in a secure facility" means that the person more probably than
not will engage in such acts if released unconditionally from detention
on the sexually violent predator petition. Such likelihood must be
evidenced by a recent overt act if the person is not totally confined
at the time the petition is filed under RCW 71.09.030.
(8) "Mental abnormality" means a congenital or acquired condition
affecting the emotional or volitional capacity which predisposes the
person to the commission of criminal sexual acts in a degree
constituting such person a menace to the health and safety of others.
(9) "Predatory" means acts directed towards: (a) Strangers; (b)
individuals with whom a relationship has been established or promoted
for the primary purpose of victimization; or (c) persons of casual
acquaintance with whom no substantial personal relationship exists.
(10) "Recent overt act" means any act or threat that has either
caused harm of a sexually violent nature or creates a reasonable
apprehension of such harm in the mind of an objective person who knows
of the history and mental condition of the person engaging in the act.
(11) "Risk potential activity" or "risk potential facility" means
an activity or facility that provides a higher incidence of risk to the
public from persons conditionally released from the special commitment
center. Risk potential activities and facilities include: Public and
private schools, school bus stops, licensed day care and licensed
preschool facilities, home-based instruction, public parks, publicly
dedicated trails, sports fields, playgrounds, recreational and
community centers, churches, synagogues, temples, mosques, public
libraries, and others identified by the department following the
hearings on a potential site required in RCW 71.09.315. For purposes
of this chapter, "school bus stops" does not include bus stops
established primarily for public transit and "home-based instruction"
means a home in which one or more children are receiving home-based
instruction under RCW 28A.225.010 at the time the site is listed for
consideration.
(12) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services
or the secretary's designee.
(13) "Secure facility" means a residential facility for persons
civilly confined under the provisions of this chapter that includes
security measures sufficient to protect the community. Such facilities
include total confinement facilities, secure community transition
facilities, and any residence used as a court-ordered placement under
RCW 71.09.096.
(14) "Secure community transition facility" means a residential
facility for persons civilly committed and conditionally released to a
less restrictive alternative under this chapter. A secure community
transition facility has supervision and security, and either provides
or ensures the provision of sex offender treatment services. Secure
community transition facilities include but are not limited to the
facilities established pursuant to RCW 71.09.250 and any
community-based facilities established under this chapter and operated
by the secretary or under contract with the secretary.
(15) "Sexually violent offense" means an act committed on, before,
or after July 1, 1990, that is: (a) An act defined in Title 9A RCW as
rape in the first degree, rape in the second degree by forcible
compulsion, rape of a child in the first or second degree, statutory
rape in the first or second degree, indecent liberties by forcible
compulsion, indecent liberties against a child under age fourteen,
incest against a child under age fourteen, or child molestation in the
first or second degree; (b) a felony offense in effect at any time
prior to July 1, 1990, that is comparable to a sexually violent offense
as defined in (a) of this subsection, or any federal or out-of-state
conviction for a felony offense that under the laws of this state would
be a sexually violent offense as defined in this subsection; (c) an act
of murder in the first or second degree, assault in the first or second
degree, assault of a child in the first or second degree, kidnapping in
the first or second degree, burglary in the first degree, residential
burglary, or unlawful imprisonment, which act, either at the time of
sentencing for the offense or subsequently during civil commitment
proceedings pursuant to this chapter, has been determined beyond a
reasonable doubt to have been sexually motivated, as that term is
defined in RCW 9.94A.030; or (d) an act as described in chapter 9A.28
RCW, that is an attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy
to commit one of the felonies designated in (a), (b), or (c) of this
subsection.
(16) "Sexually violent predator" means any person who has been
convicted of or charged with a crime of sexual violence and who suffers
from a mental abnormality or personality disorder which makes the
person likely to engage in predatory acts of sexual violence if not
confined in a secure facility.
(17) "Total confinement facility" means a facility that provides
supervision and sex offender treatment services in a total confinement
setting. Total confinement facilities include the special commitment
center and any similar facility designated as a secure facility by the
secretary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 71.09 RCW
to read as follows:
When the department seeks to site a secure community transition
facility, the department shall request the locations of known home-based instruction from the superintendent of public instruction or the
school district in which a potential site for a secure community
transition facility is located.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---