BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department, employer, employer representative, and other
persons have a duty to injured workers of good faith and fair dealing
relating to all aspects of this title. This duty is violated if:
(a)(i) The department, employer, or employer representative denies
or delays payment of benefits, including medical benefits, without a
reasonable basis; and
(ii) The department, employer, or employer representative knew, or
should have known, there was not a reasonable basis for denying or
delaying payment of benefits. A reasonable basis is an objective
standard based on the information available at the time.
(b) An employer, employer representative, or any person:
(i) Induces or coerces a worker not to report an industrial
accident or file an application for benefits;
(ii) Induces or coerces a worker to treat an industrial accident as
an off-the-job injury;
(iii) Persuades a worker to accept less than the compensation due
under this title;
(iv) Induces or coerces a worker who is entitled to temporary total
disability under this title to return to work in contravention of RCW
51.32.090(4); or
(v) Fails to comply with the rules of the department regarding
reports or other requirements necessary for adjudicating claims under
this title.
(2) The department may adopt by rule additional applications of the
duty of good faith and fair dealing. In adopting a rule under this
subsection, the department shall consider, among other factors,
recognized and approved claim processing practices within the insurance
industry, the department's own experience, and the industrial insurance
and insurance laws and rules of the state.
(3) The department shall investigate each alleged violation of this
section upon the filing of a written complaint or on its own motion.
Violations shall be determined in the sole discretion of the director
or designee. An order conforming with RCW 51.52.050 determining
whether a violation has occurred shall be issued within thirty days of
a request for an investigation.
(4) If the department, employer, employer representative, or other
person violates any provision of this section, the violator shall pay
a civil penalty of one thousand dollars for each offense upon order of
the director. The penalty shall accrue for the benefit of:
(a) The affected worker if the violation pertains to a specific
claim; or
(b) To the department to be used specifically for worker safety
programs if the penalty is based on a history or pattern of violations.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.48.080 and 1985 c 347 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in section 1(1)(b)(v) of this act, every person,
firm or corporation who violates or fails to obey, observe or comply
with any rule of the department ((promulgated)) adopted under
((authority of)) this title, shall be subject to a penalty of not ((to
exceed)) more than five hundred dollars.

Sec. 3 RCW 51.28.050 and 1984 c 159 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
No application shall be valid or claim thereunder enforceable
unless filed within one year after the day upon which the injury
occurred or the rights of dependents or beneficiaries accrued, except
as provided in RCW 51.28.055. An application is exempt from the
limitation imposed by this section if the failure to file the
application or take action to enforce a claim thereunder resulted from
an act prohibited by section 1 of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 51.28.055 and 1984 c 159 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Claims for occupational disease or infection to be valid and
compensable must be filed within two years following the date the
worker had written notice from a physician: (1) Of the existence of
his or her occupational disease, and (2) that a claim for disability
benefits may be filed. The notice shall also contain a statement that
the worker has two years from the date of the notice to file a claim.
The physician shall file the notice with the department. The
department shall send a copy to the worker and to the self-insurer if
the worker's employer is self-insured. However, a claim is valid if it
is filed within two years from the date of death of the worker
suffering from an occupational disease. An application is exempt from
the limitation imposed by this section if the failure to file the
application or take action to enforce a claim thereunder resulted from
an act prohibited by section 1 of this act.

--- END ---