BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.22 RCW
to read as follows:
After the effective date of this act, a new automobile liability
insurance policy or policy renewal may not be issued unless the policy
includes coverage for the actual cost of tow truck services required by
an automobile accident.

--- END ---