BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.32.050 and 1997 c 157 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If upon examination of any returns or from other information
obtained by the department it appears that a tax or penalty has been
paid less than that properly due, the department shall assess against
the taxpayer such additional amount found to be due and shall add
thereto interest on the tax only. The department shall notify the
taxpayer by mail of the additional amount and the additional amount
shall become due and shall be paid within thirty days from the date of
the notice, or within such further time as the department may provide.
(a) For tax liabilities arising before January 1, 1992, interest
shall be computed at the rate of nine percent per annum from the last
day of the year in which the deficiency is incurred until the earlier
of December 31, 1998, or the date of payment. After December 31, 1998,
the rate of interest shall be variable and computed as provided in
subsection (2) of this section. The rate so computed shall be adjusted
on the first day of January of each year for use in computing interest
for that calendar year.
(b) For tax liabilities arising after December 31, 1991, the rate
of interest shall be variable and computed as provided in subsection
(2) of this section from the last day of the year in which the
deficiency is incurred until the date of payment. The rate so computed
shall be adjusted on the first day of January of each year for use in
computing interest for that calendar year.
(c) Interest imposed after December 31, 1998, shall be computed
from the last day of the month following each calendar year included in
a notice, and the last day of the month following the final month
included in a notice if not the end of a calendar year, until the due
date of the notice. If payment in full is not made by the due date of
the notice, additional interest shall be computed until the date of
payment. The rate of interest shall be variable and computed as
provided in subsection (2) of this section. The rate so computed shall
be adjusted on the first day of January of each year for use in
computing interest for that calendar year.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the rate of interest to be
charged to the taxpayer shall be an average of the federal short-term
rate as defined in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 1274(d) plus two percentage points.
The rate set for each new year shall be computed by taking an
arithmetical average to the nearest percentage point of the federal
short-term rate, compounded annually((, for the months of January,
April, July, and October of the immediately preceding calendar year as
published by the United States secretary of the treasury)). That
average shall be calculated using the rates from four months: January,
April, and July of the calendar year immediately preceding the new
year, and October of the previous preceding year.
(3) No assessment or correction of an assessment for additional
taxes, penalties, or interest due may be made by the department more
than four years after the close of the tax year, except (a) against a
taxpayer who has not registered as required by this chapter, (b) upon
a showing of fraud or of misrepresentation of a material fact by the
taxpayer, or (c) where a taxpayer has executed a written waiver of such
limitation. The execution of a written waiver shall also extend the
period for making a refund or credit as provided in RCW 82.32.060(2).
(4) For the purposes of this section, "return" means any document
a person is required by the state of Washington to file to satisfy or
establish a tax or fee obligation that is administered or collected by
the department of revenue and that has a statutorily defined due date.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.32.060 and 1999 c 358 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If, upon receipt of an application by a taxpayer for a refund
or for an audit of the taxpayer's records, or upon an examination of
the returns or records of any taxpayer, it is determined by the
department that within the statutory period for assessment of taxes,
penalties, or interest prescribed by RCW 82.32.050 any amount of tax,
penalty, or interest has been paid in excess of that properly due, the
excess amount paid within, or attributable to, such period shall be
credited to the taxpayer's account or shall be refunded to the
taxpayer, at the taxpayer's option. Except as provided in
subsection((s)) (2) ((and (3))) of this section, no refund or credit
shall be made for taxes, penalties, or interest paid more than four
years prior to the beginning of the calendar year in which the refund
application is made or examination of records is completed.
(2) The execution of a written waiver under RCW 82.32.050 or
82.32.100 shall extend the time for making a refund or credit of any
taxes paid during, or attributable to, the years covered by the waiver
if, prior to the expiration of the waiver period, an application for
refund of such taxes is made by the taxpayer or the department
discovers a refund or credit is due.
(3) ((Notwithstanding the foregoing limitations there shall be
refunded or credited to taxpayers engaged in the performance of United
States government contracts or subcontracts the amount of any tax paid,
measured by that portion of the amounts received from the United
States, which the taxpayer is required by contract or applicable
federal statute to refund or credit to the United States, if claim for
such refund is filed by the taxpayer with the department within one
year of the date that the amount of the refund or credit due to the
United States is finally determined and filed within four years of the
date on which the tax was paid: PROVIDED, That no interest shall be
allowed on such refund.
(4))) Any such refunds shall be made by means of vouchers approved
by the department and by the issuance of state warrants drawn upon and
payable from such funds as the legislature may provide. However,
taxpayers who are required to pay taxes by electronic funds transfer
under RCW 82.32.080 shall have any refunds paid by electronic funds
transfer.
(((5))) (4) Any judgment for which a recovery is granted by any
court of competent jurisdiction, not appealed from, for tax, penalties,
and interest which were paid by the taxpayer, and costs, in a suit by
any taxpayer shall be paid in the same manner, as provided in
subsection (((4))) (3) of this section, upon the filing with the
department of a certified copy of the order or judgment of the court.
(a) Interest at the rate of three percent per annum shall be
allowed by the department and by any court on the amount of any refund,
credit, or other recovery allowed to a taxpayer for taxes, penalties,
or interest paid by the taxpayer before January 1, 1992. This rate of
interest shall apply for all interest allowed through December 31,
1998. Interest allowed after December 31, 1998, shall be computed at
the rate as computed under RCW 82.32.050(2). The rate so computed
shall be adjusted on the first day of January of each year for use in
computing interest for that calendar year.
(b) For refunds or credits of amounts paid or other recovery
allowed to a taxpayer after December 31, 1991, the rate of interest
shall be the rate as computed for assessments under RCW 82.32.050(2)
less one percent. This rate of interest shall apply for all interest
allowed through December 31, 1998. Interest allowed after December 31,
1998, shall be computed at the rate as computed under RCW 82.32.050(2).
The rate so computed shall be adjusted on the first day of January of
each year for use in computing interest for that calendar year.
(5) Interest allowed on a credit notice or refund issued after
December 31, 2003, shall be computed as follows:
(a) If all overpayments for each calendar year and all reporting
periods ending with the final month included in a notice or refund were
made on or before the due date of the final return for each calendar
year or the final reporting period included in the notice or refund:
(i) Interest shall be computed from January 31st following each
calendar year included in a notice or refund; or
(ii) Interest shall be computed from the last day of the month
following the final month included in a notice or refund.
(b) If the taxpayer has not made all overpayments for each calendar
year and all reporting periods ending with the final month included in
a notice or refund on or before the dates specified by RCW 82.32.045
for the final return for each calendar year or the final month included
in the notice or refund, interest shall be computed from the last day
of the month following the date on which payment in full of the
liabilities was made for each calendar year included in a notice or
refund, and the last day of the month following the date on which
payment in full of the liabilities was made if the final month included
in a notice or refund is not the end of a calendar year.
(c) Interest included in a credit notice shall accrue up to the
date the taxpayer could reasonably be expected to use the credit
notice, as defined by the department's rules. If a credit notice is
converted to a refund, interest shall be recomputed to the date the
refund is issued, but not to exceed the amount of interest that would
have been allowed with the credit notice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 2 of this act takes effect January
1, 2004.

--- END ---