BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.22.140 and 1995 c 301 s 61 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each county auditor or ((chief)) financial officer designated in a
charter county shall be ex officio deputy of the state auditor for the
purpose of accounting and reporting on municipal corporations and in
such capacity shall be under the direction of the state auditor, but he
or she shall receive no additional salary or compensation by virtue
thereof and shall perform no duties as such, except in connection with
county business.

--- END ---