BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.400.200 and 2002 c 353 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every school district board of directors shall fix, alter,
allow, and order paid salaries and compensation for all district
employees in conformance with this section.
(2)(a) Salaries for certificated instructional staff shall not be
less than the salary provided in the appropriations act in the
statewide salary allocation schedule for an employee with a
baccalaureate degree and zero years of service; and
(b) Salaries for certificated instructional staff with a masters
degree shall not be less than the salary provided in the appropriations
act in the statewide salary allocation schedule for an employee with a
masters degree and zero years of service;
(3)(a) The actual average salary paid to certificated instructional
staff shall not exceed the district's average certificated
instructional staff salary used for the state basic education
allocations for that school year as determined pursuant to RCW
28A.150.410.
(b)(i) Fringe benefit contributions for certificated instructional
staff shall be included as salary under (a) of this subsection only to
the extent that the district's actual average benefit contribution
exceeds the amount of the insurance benefits allocation provided per
certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating
appropriations act in effect at the time the compensation is payable.
For purposes of this section, fringe benefits shall not include payment
for unused leave for illness or injury under RCW 28A.400.210((;)) or
employer contributions for old age survivors insurance, workers'
compensation, unemployment compensation, and retirement benefits under
the Washington state retirement system((; or employer contributions for
health benefits in excess of the insurance benefits allocation provided
per certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating
appropriations act in effect at the time the compensation is payable.
A school district may not use state funds to provide employer
contributions for such excess health benefits)).
(ii)(A) Except under (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection, districts that
grant insurance benefits to certificated instructional staff at or in
excess of the per unit insurance benefit in the 2001-03 supplemental
appropriations act may not increase the per unit insurance benefit
granted to certificated instructional staff beyond the increase in
future state appropriated health benefit per unit allocations.
(B) The terms of any contract in force on the effective date of
this act that provide insurance benefits in excess of the limits under
(b)(ii)(A) of this subsection continue in effect until the contract
expiration date as it exists on the effective date of this act.
(c) Salary and benefits for certificated instructional staff in
programs other than basic education shall be consistent with the salary
and benefits paid to certificated instructional staff in the basic
education program.
(4) Salaries and benefits for certificated instructional staff may
exceed the limitations in subsection (3) of this section only by
separate contract for additional time, additional responsibilities, or
incentives. Supplemental contracts shall not cause the state to incur
any present or future funding obligation. Supplemental contracts shall
be subject to the collective bargaining provisions of chapter 41.59 RCW
and the provisions of RCW 28A.405.240, shall not exceed one year, and
if not renewed shall not constitute adverse change in accordance with
RCW 28A.405.300 through 28A.405.380. No district may enter into a
supplemental contract under this subsection for the provision of
services which are a part of the basic education program required by
Article IX, section 3 of the state Constitution.
(5) Employee benefit plans offered by any district shall comply
with RCW 28A.400.350 and 28A.400.275 and 28A.400.280.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.400.410 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 6 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Subject to RCW 28A.400.200(3)(b)(ii) and in a manner prescribed
by the state health care authority, school districts and educational
service districts shall remit from their state allocation for insurance
benefits to the health care authority for deposit in the public
employees' and retirees' insurance account established in RCW 41.05.120
the amount specified for remittance in the omnibus appropriations act.
(2) The remittance requirements specified in this section shall not
apply to employees of a school district or educational service district
who receive insurance benefits through contracts with the health care
authority.

--- END ---