BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that current economic
conditions impose severe hardships on many commercial vehicle drivers.
The legislature finds that commercial drivers who may not currently be
working may not be able to afford the expense of a required physical in
order to maintain their commercial driver's license. The legislature
finds that Washington's commercial driver's license statutes should be
harmonized with federal requirements, which require proof of a physical
capacity to drive a commercial vehicle, along with a valid commercial
driver's license, but do not link the two requirements. The
legislature finds that allowing commercial drivers to delay getting a
physical until they are actually driving a commercial vehicle will
prevent the imposition of unnecessary expense and hardship on
Washington's commercial vehicle drivers.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.25.070 and 1991 c 73 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The application for a commercial driver's license or commercial
driver's instruction permit must include the following:
(a) The full name and current mailing and residential address of
the person;
(b) A physical description of the person, including sex, height,
weight, and eye color;
(c) Date of birth;
(d) The applicant's Social Security number;
(e) The person's signature;
(f) Certifications including those required by 49 C.F.R. part
383.71(a);
(g) ((Proof of certification of physical examination or waiver, as
required by 49 C.F.R. 391.41 through 391.49;
(h))) Any other information required by the department; and
(((i))) (h) A consent to release driving record information to
parties identified in chapter 46.52 RCW and this chapter.
(2) When a licensee changes his or her name, mailing address, or
residence address, the person shall notify the department as provided
in RCW 46.20.205.
(3) No person who has been a resident of this state for thirty days
may drive a commercial motor vehicle under the authority of a
commercial driver's license issued by another jurisdiction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.25 RCW
to read as follows:
A person may not drive a commercial motor vehicle unless he or she
is physically qualified to do so and, except as provided in 49 C.F.R.
Sec. 391.67, has on his or her person the original, or a photographic
copy, of a medical examiner's certificate that he or she is physically
qualified to drive a commercial motor vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 46.25 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is a traffic infraction for a licensee under this chapter to
drive a commercial vehicle without having on his or her person the
original, or a photographic copy, of a medical examiner's certificate
that he or she is physically qualified to drive a commercial motor
vehicle.
(2) A person who violates this section is subject to a penalty of
two hundred fifty dollars. If the person appears in person before the
court or submits by mail written proof that he or she had, at the time
the infraction took place, the medical examiner's certificate, the
court shall reduce the penalty to fifty dollars.

--- END ---