BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that the
responsibilities, training, and ongoing physical requirements of public
employees' retirement system plan 2 members working in public safety-related jobs beyond the age of fifty-five may put themselves,
coworkers, and the public at risk. Therefore, the legislature intends
to provide an alternative retirement option by reducing the financial
disincentive to retiring before age sixty-five.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.40.630 and 2000 c 247 s 901 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member with at least five service
credit years who has attained at least age sixty-five shall be eligible
to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to
the provisions of RCW 41.40.620.
(2) EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least twenty
service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible
to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to
the provisions of RCW 41.40.620, except that a member retiring pursuant
to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance actuarially
reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at
retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.
(3) ((ALTERNATE)) ALTERNATIVE EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has
completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age
fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement
allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.620, except
that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the
retirement allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the
difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the
attainment of age sixty-five.
(4) ALTERNATIVE EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at
least twenty service credit years in public safety-related jobs and has
attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a
retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW
41.40.620, except that a member retiring under this subsection shall
have the retirement allowance reduced by three percent per year to
reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement
and the attainment of age sixty-five.

--- END ---