BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.40 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An employee who was a member of the public employees'
retirement system plan 2 or plan 3 on or before January 1, 2003, and on
the effective date of this act is employed by the liquor control board
as a law enforcement officer as defined in RCW 41.26.030, shall become
a member of the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement
system plan 2. All officers will be dual members as provided in
chapter 41.54 RCW, and public employees' retirement system service
credit may not be transferred to the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system plan 2.
(2) An employee who was a member of the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 on or before January 1, 2003, and on or after
the effective date of this act is employed by the liquor control board
as a law enforcement officer as defined in RCW 41.26.030, shall remain
a member of the public employees' retirement system plan 1.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.26.030 and 2002 c 128 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly
required by the context:
(1) "Retirement system" means the "Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system" provided herein.
(2)(a) "Employer" for plan 1 members, means the legislative
authority of any city, town, county, or district or the elected
officials of any municipal corporation that employs any law enforcement
officer and/or fire fighter, any authorized association of such
municipalities, and, except for the purposes of RCW 41.26.150, any
labor guild, association, or organization, which represents the fire
fighters or law enforcement officers of at least seven cities of over
20,000 population and the membership of each local lodge or division of
which is composed of at least sixty percent law enforcement officers or
fire fighters as defined in this chapter.
(b) "Employer" for plan 2 members, means the following entities to
the extent that the entity employs any law enforcement officer and/or
fire fighter:
(i) The legislative authority of any city, town, county, or
district;
(ii) The elected officials of any municipal corporation;
(iii) The governing body of any other general authority law
enforcement agency; or
(iv) A four-year institution of higher education having a fully
operational fire department as of January 1, 1996.
(3) "Law enforcement officer" beginning January 1, 1994, means any
person who is commissioned and employed by an employer on a full time,
fully compensated basis to enforce the criminal laws of the state of
Washington generally, with the following qualifications:
(a) No person who is serving in a position that is basically
clerical or secretarial in nature, and who is not commissioned shall be
considered a law enforcement officer;
(b) Only those deputy sheriffs, including those serving under a
different title pursuant to county charter, who have successfully
completed a civil service examination for deputy sheriff or the
equivalent position, where a different title is used, and those persons
serving in unclassified positions authorized by RCW 41.14.070 except a
private secretary will be considered law enforcement officers;
(c) Only such full time commissioned law enforcement personnel as
have been appointed to offices, positions, or ranks in the police
department which have been specifically created or otherwise expressly
provided for and designated by city charter provision or by ordinance
enacted by the legislative body of the city shall be considered city
police officers;
(d) The term "law enforcement officer" also includes the executive
secretary of a labor guild, association or organization (which is an
employer under RCW 41.26.030(2)) if that individual has five years
previous membership in the retirement system established in chapter
41.20 RCW. The provisions of this subsection (3)(d) shall not apply to
plan 2 members; and
(e) The term "law enforcement officer" also includes a person
employed on or after January 1, 1993, as a public safety officer or
director of public safety, so long as the job duties substantially
involve only either police or fire duties, or both, and no other duties
in a city or town with a population of less than ten thousand. The
provisions of this subsection (3)(e) shall not apply to any public
safety officer or director of public safety who is receiving a
retirement allowance under this chapter as of May 12, 1993.
(4) "Fire fighter" means:
(a) Any person who is serving on a full time, fully compensated
basis as a member of a fire department of an employer and who is
serving in a position which requires passing a civil service
examination for fire fighter, and who is actively employed as such;
(b) Anyone who is actively employed as a full time fire fighter
where the fire department does not have a civil service examination;
(c) Supervisory fire fighter personnel;
(d) Any full time executive secretary of an association of fire
protection districts authorized under RCW 52.12.031. The provisions of
this subsection (4)(d) shall not apply to plan 2 members;
(e) The executive secretary of a labor guild, association or
organization (which is an employer under RCW 41.26.030(2) as now or
hereafter amended), if such individual has five years previous
membership in a retirement system established in chapter 41.16 or 41.18
RCW. The provisions of this subsection (4)(e) shall not apply to plan
2 members;
(f) Any person who is serving on a full time, fully compensated
basis for an employer, as a fire dispatcher, in a department in which,
on March 1, 1970, a dispatcher was required to have passed a civil
service examination for fire fighter; and
(g) Any person who on March 1, 1970, was employed on a full time,
fully compensated basis by an employer, and who on May 21, 1971, was
making retirement contributions under the provisions of chapter 41.16
or 41.18 RCW.
(5) "Department" means the department of retirement systems created
in chapter 41.50 RCW.
(6) "Surviving spouse" means the surviving widow or widower of a
member. "Surviving spouse" shall not include the divorced spouse of a
member except as provided in RCW 41.26.162.
(7)(a) "Child" or "children" means an unmarried person who is under
the age of eighteen or mentally or physically handicapped as determined
by the department, except a handicapped person in the full time care of
a state institution, who is:
(i) A natural born child;
(ii) A stepchild where that relationship was in existence prior to
the date benefits are payable under this chapter;
(iii) A posthumous child;
(iv) A child legally adopted or made a legal ward of a member prior
to the date benefits are payable under this chapter; or
(v) An illegitimate child legitimized prior to the date any
benefits are payable under this chapter.
(b) A person shall also be deemed to be a child up to and including
the age of twenty years and eleven months while attending any high
school, college, or vocational or other educational institution
accredited, licensed, or approved by the state, in which it is located,
including the summer vacation months and all other normal and regular
vacation periods at the particular educational institution after which
the child returns to school.
(8) "Member" means any fire fighter, law enforcement officer, or
other person as would apply under subsections (3) or (4) of this
section whose membership is transferred to the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system on or after
March 1, 1970, and every law enforcement officer and fire fighter who
is employed in that capacity on or after such date.
(9) "Retirement fund" means the "Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system fund" as provided for
herein.
(10) "Employee" means any law enforcement officer or fire fighter
as defined in subsections (3) and (4) of this section.
(11)(a) "Beneficiary" for plan 1 members, means any person in
receipt of a retirement allowance, disability allowance, death benefit,
or any other benefit described herein.
(b) "Beneficiary" for plan 2 members, means any person in receipt
of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter
resulting from service rendered to an employer by another person.
(12)(a) "Final average salary" for plan 1 members, means (i) for a
member holding the same position or rank for a minimum of twelve months
preceding the date of retirement, the basic salary attached to such
same position or rank at time of retirement; (ii) for any other member,
including a civil service member who has not served a minimum of twelve
months in the same position or rank preceding the date of retirement,
the average of the greatest basic salaries payable to such member
during any consecutive twenty-four month period within such member's
last ten years of service for which service credit is allowed, computed
by dividing the total basic salaries payable to such member during the
selected twenty-four month period by twenty-four; (iii) in the case of
disability of any member, the basic salary payable to such member at
the time of disability retirement; (iv) in the case of a member who
hereafter vests pursuant to RCW 41.26.090, the basic salary payable to
such member at the time of vesting.
(b) "Final average salary" for plan 2 members, means the monthly
average of the member's basic salary for the highest consecutive sixty
service credit months of service prior to such member's retirement,
termination, or death. Periods constituting authorized unpaid leaves
of absence may not be used in the calculation of final average salary.
(13)(a) "Basic salary" for plan 1 members, means the basic monthly
rate of salary or wages, including longevity pay but not including
overtime earnings or special salary or wages, upon which pension or
retirement benefits will be computed and upon which employer
contributions and salary deductions will be based.
(b) "Basic salary" for plan 2 members, means salaries or wages
earned by a member during a payroll period for personal services,
including overtime payments, and shall include wages and salaries
deferred under provisions established pursuant to sections 403(b),
414(h), and 457 of the United States Internal Revenue Code, but shall
exclude lump sum payments for deferred annual sick leave, unused
accumulated vacation, unused accumulated annual leave, or any form of
severance pay. In any year in which a member serves in the legislature
the member shall have the option of having such member's basic salary
be the greater of:
(i) The basic salary the member would have received had such member
not served in the legislature; or
(ii) Such member's actual basic salary received for nonlegislative
public employment and legislative service combined. Any additional
contributions to the retirement system required because basic salary
under (b)(i) of this subsection is greater than basic salary under
(b)(ii) of this subsection shall be paid by the member for both member
and employer contributions.
(14)(a) "Service" for plan 1 members, means all periods of
employment for an employer as a fire fighter or law enforcement
officer, for which compensation is paid, together with periods of
suspension not exceeding thirty days in duration. For the purposes of
this chapter service shall also include service in the armed forces of
the United States as provided in RCW 41.26.190. Credit shall be
allowed for all service credit months of service rendered by a member
from and after the member's initial commencement of employment as a
fire fighter or law enforcement officer, during which the member worked
for seventy or more hours, or was on disability leave or disability
retirement. Only service credit months of service shall be counted in
the computation of any retirement allowance or other benefit provided
for in this chapter.
(i) For members retiring after May 21, 1971 who were employed under
the coverage of a prior pension act before March 1, 1970, "service"
shall also include (A) such military service not exceeding five years
as was creditable to the member as of March 1, 1970, under the member's
particular prior pension act, and (B) such other periods of service as
were then creditable to a particular member under the provisions of RCW
41.18.165, 41.20.160 or 41.20.170. However, in no event shall credit
be allowed for any service rendered prior to March 1, 1970, where the
member at the time of rendition of such service was employed in a
position covered by a prior pension act, unless such service, at the
time credit is claimed therefor, is also creditable under the
provisions of such prior act.
(ii) A member who is employed by two employers at the same time
shall only be credited with service to one such employer for any month
during which the member rendered such dual service.
(b) "Service" for plan 2 members, means periods of employment by a
member for one or more employers for which basic salary is earned for
ninety or more hours per calendar month which shall constitute a
service credit month. Periods of employment by a member for one or
more employers for which basic salary is earned for at least seventy
hours but less than ninety hours per calendar month shall constitute
one-half service credit month. Periods of employment by a member for
one or more employers for which basic salary is earned for less than
seventy hours shall constitute a one-quarter service credit month.
Members of the retirement system who are elected or appointed to a
state elective position may elect to continue to be members of this
retirement system.
Service credit years of service shall be determined by dividing the
total number of service credit months of service by twelve. Any
fraction of a service credit year of service as so determined shall be
taken into account in the computation of such retirement allowance or
benefits.
If a member receives basic salary from two or more employers during
any calendar month, the individual shall receive one service credit
month's service credit during any calendar month in which multiple
service for ninety or more hours is rendered; or one-half service
credit month's service credit during any calendar month in which
multiple service for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours
is rendered; or one-quarter service credit month during any calendar
month in which multiple service for less than seventy hours is
rendered.
(15) "Accumulated contributions" means the employee's contributions
made by a member, including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2),
plus accrued interest credited thereon.
(16) "Actuarial reserve" means a method of financing a pension or
retirement plan wherein reserves are accumulated as the liabilities for
benefit payments are incurred in order that sufficient funds will be
available on the date of retirement of each member to pay the member's
future benefits during the period of retirement.
(17) "Actuarial valuation" means a mathematical determination of
the financial condition of a retirement plan. It includes the
computation of the present monetary value of benefits payable to
present members, and the present monetary value of future employer and
employee contributions, giving effect to mortality among active and
retired members and also to the rates of disability, retirement,
withdrawal from service, salary and interest earned on investments.
(18) "Disability board" for plan 1 members means either the county
disability board or the city disability board established in RCW
41.26.110.
(19) "Disability leave" means the period of six months or any
portion thereof during which a member is on leave at an allowance equal
to the member's full salary prior to the commencement of disability
retirement. The definition contained in this subsection shall apply
only to plan 1 members.
(20) "Disability retirement" for plan 1 members, means the period
following termination of a member's disability leave, during which the
member is in receipt of a disability retirement allowance.
(21) "Position" means the employment held at any particular time,
which may or may not be the same as civil service rank.
(22) "Medical services" for plan 1 members, shall include the
following as minimum services to be provided. Reasonable charges for
these services shall be paid in accordance with RCW 41.26.150.
(a) Hospital expenses: These are the charges made by a hospital,
in its own behalf, for
(i) Board and room not to exceed semiprivate room rate unless
private room is required by the attending physician due to the
condition of the patient.
(ii) Necessary hospital services, other than board and room,
furnished by the hospital.
(b) Other medical expenses: The following charges are considered
"other medical expenses", provided that they have not been considered
as "hospital expenses".
(i) The fees of the following:
(A) A physician or surgeon licensed under the provisions of chapter
18.71 RCW;
(B) An osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under the
provisions of chapter 18.57 RCW;
(C) A chiropractor licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.25
RCW.
(ii) The charges of a registered graduate nurse other than a nurse
who ordinarily resides in the member's home, or is a member of the
family of either the member or the member's spouse.
(iii) The charges for the following medical services and supplies:
(A) Drugs and medicines upon a physician's prescription;
(B) Diagnostic x-ray and laboratory examinations;
(C) X-ray, radium, and radioactive isotopes therapy;
(D) Anesthesia and oxygen;
(E) Rental of iron lung and other durable medical and surgical
equipment;
(F) Artificial limbs and eyes, and casts, splints, and trusses;
(G) Professional ambulance service when used to transport the
member to or from a hospital when injured by an accident or stricken by
a disease;
(H) Dental charges incurred by a member who sustains an accidental
injury to his or her teeth and who commences treatment by a legally
licensed dentist within ninety days after the accident;
(I) Nursing home confinement or hospital extended care facility;
(J) Physical therapy by a registered physical therapist;
(K) Blood transfusions, including the cost of blood and blood
plasma not replaced by voluntary donors;
(L) An optometrist licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.53
RCW.
(23) "Regular interest" means such rate as the director may
determine.
(24) "Retiree" for persons who establish membership in the
retirement system on or after October 1, 1977, means any member in
receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this
chapter resulting from service rendered to an employer by such member.
(25) "Director" means the director of the department.
(26) "State actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed
pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).
(27) "State elective position" means any position held by any
person elected or appointed to statewide office or elected or appointed
as a member of the legislature.
(28) "Plan 1" means the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system, plan 1 providing the benefits and funding
provisions covering persons who first became members of the system
prior to October 1, 1977.
(29) "Plan 2" means the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system, plan 2 providing the benefits and funding
provisions covering persons who first became members of the system on
and after October 1, 1977.
(30) "Service credit year" means an accumulation of months of
service credit which is equal to one when divided by twelve.
(31) "Service credit month" means a full service credit month or an
accumulation of partial service credit months that are equal to one.
(32) "General authority law enforcement agency" means any agency,
department, or division of a municipal corporation, political
subdivision, or other unit of local government of this state, and any
agency, department, or division of state government, having as its
primary function the detection and apprehension of persons committing
infractions or violating the traffic or criminal laws in general, but
not including the Washington state patrol or the department of fish and
wildlife. Such an agency, department, or division is distinguished
from a limited authority law enforcement agency having as one of its
functions the apprehension or detection of persons committing
infractions or violating the traffic or criminal laws relating to
limited subject areas, including but not limited to, the state
departments of natural resources and social and health services, the
state gambling commission, the state lottery commission, the state
parks and recreation commission, the state utilities and transportation
commission, ((the state liquor control board,)) and the state
department of corrections.

--- END ---