BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 81.100.020 and 1990 c 43 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Transit agency" means a city that operates a transit system,
a public transportation benefit area, a county transportation
authority, or a metropolitan municipal corporation.
(2) The "high occupancy vehicle system" includes high occupancy
vehicle lanes, related high occupancy vehicle facilities, and high
occupancy vehicle programs.
(3) "High occupancy vehicle lanes" mean lanes reserved for public
transportation vehicles only or public transportation vehicles and
private vehicles carrying no fewer than a specified number of
passengers under RCW 46.61.165 and for law enforcement vehicles. For
the purposes of this subsection, "law enforcement vehicle" means an
official marked or unmarked vehicle, equipped with emergency lights and
siren, issued by a state, local, or county law enforcement agency and
operated by on-duty state patrol, local, or county law enforcement
personnel.
(4) "Related facilities" means park and ride lots, park and pool
lots, ramps, bypasses, turnouts, signal preemption, and other
improvements designed to maximize use of the high occupancy vehicle
system.
(5) "High occupancy vehicle program" means advertising the high
occupancy vehicle system, promoting carpool, vanpool, and transit use,
providing vanpool vehicles, and enforcement of driving restrictions
governing high occupancy vehicle lanes.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.61.165 and 1999 c 206 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state department of transportation and the local
authorities are authorized to reserve all or any portion of any highway
under their respective jurisdictions, including any designated lane or
ramp, for the exclusive or preferential use of public transportation
vehicles or private motor vehicles carrying no fewer than a specified
number of passengers when such limitation will increase the efficient
utilization of the highway or will aid in the conservation of energy
resources. Regulations authorizing such exclusive or preferential use
of a highway facility may be declared to be effective at all times or
at specified times of day or on specified days. At no time may the
regulations apply to law enforcement vehicles. Violation of a
restriction of highway usage prescribed by the appropriate authority
under this section is a traffic infraction.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "law enforcement vehicle"
means an official marked or unmarked vehicle, equipped with emergency
lights and siren, issued by a state, local, or county law enforcement
agency and operated by on-duty state patrol, local, or county law
enforcement personnel.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.52.025 and 1974 ex.s. c 133 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Highway authorities of the state, counties, and incorporated
cities and towns, in addition to the specific powers granted in this
chapter, shall also have, and may exercise, relative to limited access
facilities, any and all additional authority, now or hereafter vested
in them relative to highways or streets within their respective
jurisdictions, and may regulate, restrict, or prohibit the use of such
limited access facilities by various classes of vehicles or traffic.
Such highway authorities may reserve any limited access facility or
portions thereof, including designated lanes or ramps for the exclusive
or preferential use of public transportation vehicles, privately owned
buses, or private motor vehicles carrying not less than a specified
number of passengers when such limitation will increase the efficient
utilization of the highway facility or will aid in the conservation of
energy resources. Regulations authorizing such exclusive or
preferential use of a highway facility may be declared to be effective
at all time or at specified times of day or on specified days. At no
time may the regulations apply to law enforcement vehicles.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "law enforcement vehicle"
means an official marked or unmarked vehicle, equipped with emergency
lights and siren, issued by a state, local, or county law enforcement
agency and operated by on-duty state patrol, local, or county law
enforcement personnel.

--- END ---