BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 10.98 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that each of the state's justice agencies
and the courts have developed independent information systems to
address independent management and planning needs, that the state's
justice information system is fragmented, and that access to complete,
accurate, and timely justice information is difficult and inefficient.
(2) The legislature declares that the purpose of this act is to
develop and maintain, in a cost-effective manner, a statewide network
of criminal justice information that enables sharing and integrated
delivery of justice information maintained in the state's independent
information systems and that will:
(a) Maximize standardization of data and communications technology
among law enforcement agencies, jails, prosecuting attorneys, the
courts, corrections, and licensing;
(b) Reduce redundant data collection and input efforts;
(c) Reduce or eliminate paper-based information exchanges;
(d) Improve work flow within the criminal justice system;
(e) Provide complete, accurate, and timely information to criminal
justice agencies and courts in a single computer session; and
(f) Maintain security and privacy rights respecting criminal
justice information.
(3) Statewide coordination of criminal justice information will
improve:
(a) The safety of the public and the safety of law enforcement
officers and other public servants, by making more complete, accurate,
and timely information concerning offenders available to all criminal
justice agencies and courts;
(b) Decision making, by increasing the availability of statistical
measures for review, evaluation, and promulgation of public policy; and
(c) Access to complete, accurate, and timely information by the
public, to the extent permitted pursuant to chapters 10.97 and 42.17
RCW.
(4) The legislature encourages state and local criminal justice
agencies and courts to collaborate in the development of justice
information systems, as criminal justice agencies and courts collect
the most complete, accurate, and timely information regarding
offenders.
(5) The legislature finds that the implementation, operation, and
continuing enhancement of a statewide justice information network that
enables sharing and integrated delivery of information maintained in
the state's independent information systems is critical to the
complete, accurate, and timely performance of criminal background
checks and to the effective communications between and among law
enforcement, the courts, executive agencies, and political subdivisions
of the state. The legislature further finds and declares that it is in
the best interests of the citizens of the state and for the enhancement
of public safety that the Washington integrated justice information
board be created as soon as possible.
(6) The legislature finds that the intent, purpose, and goals of
this act will be implemented most effectively by a board having the
power, authority, and responsibility to develop, maintain, and enhance
a statewide justice information network that enables sharing and
integrated delivery of justice information maintained in the state's
independent information systems.

Sec. 2 RCW 10.98.160 and 1999 c 143 s 53 are each amended to read
as follows:
In the development and modification of the procedures, definitions,
and reporting capabilities of the section, the department, the office
of financial management, and the responsible agencies and persons shall
consider the needs of other criminal justice agencies such as the
administrator for the courts, local law enforcement agencies,
((jailers)) local jails, the sentencing guidelines commission, the
indeterminate sentence review board, the clemency board, prosecuting
attorneys, and affected state agencies such as the office of financial
management and legislative committees dealing with criminal justice
issues. ((An executive committee appointed by the heads of the
department, the Washington state patrol, and the office of financial
management)) The Washington integrated justice information board shall
review and provide recommendations to state justice agencies and the
courts for development and modification of the ((section, the
department, and the office of financial management's felony criminal
information systems)) statewide justice information network.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 10.98 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There is created the Washington integrated justice information
board. The board shall be composed of the following members:
(a) A representative appointed by the governor;
(b) The attorney general;
(c) The chief of the state patrol;
(d) The secretary of the department of corrections;
(e) The director of the department of licensing;
(f) The administrator for the courts;
(g) The director of the office of financial management;
(h) The director of the department of information services;
(i) The secretary of the juvenile rehabilitation administration;
(j) A sheriff appointed by the Washington association of sheriffs
and police chiefs;
(k) A police chief appointed by the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs;
(l) A county legislative authority member appointed by the
Washington state association of counties;
(m) An elected county clerk appointed by the Washington association
of county clerks;
(n) A representative appointed by the Washington association of
city and county information systems;
(o) Two representatives appointed by the judicial information
system committee;
(p) A representative appointed by the association of Washington
cities;
(q) An elected prosecutor appointed by the Washington association
of prosecuting attorneys; and
(r) The speaker of the house of representatives and the president
of the senate may each appoint two members to the board, one from each
of the two largest caucuses in each house.
These members shall constitute the membership of the board with
full voting rights and shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing
authority. Each member may, in writing, appoint a designee to serve in
the member's absence. Any member of the board shall immediately cease
to be a member if he or she ceases to hold the particular office or
employment that was the basis of the appointment. Vacancies shall be
filled in the same manner that the original appointments were made to
the board.
(2) The board may appoint additional justice information
stakeholders as nonvoting members to the board.
(3) In making the appointments, the appointing authorities shall
endeavor to assure that there is committed board membership having
expertise relating to state and local criminal justice business
practices and to information sharing and integration technology.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 10.98 RCW
to read as follows:
The board shall elect a chair and vice-chair from among its voting
members. Nine voting members of the board shall constitute a quorum.
Meetings may be called by the chair or upon the written request of
three members of the board. Meeting participation may be by means of
conference call or any other communication equipment that allows all
persons participating in the meeting to speak and hear all
participants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 10.98 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board shall have the following powers and duties related to
integration of justice information:
(a) Meet at such times and places as may be designated by the chair
or by three voting members of the board;
(b) Adopt its own bylaws, and such other rules governing the board
and the conduct of its meetings as the board may deem reasonable or
convenient;
(c) Coordinate and facilitate the governance, implementation,
operation, maintenance, and enhancement of sharing and integrated
delivery of complete, accurate, and timely justice information;
(d) Increase the use of automated electronic data transfer among
state justice agencies, local justice agencies, and courts;
(e) Establish and implement uniform data standards and protocols
for data transfer and sharing, interface applications, and connectivity
standards;
(f) Provide state agency and court justice information to criminal
justice agencies and courts through connections and applications that
enable single session access from multiple platforms;
(g) Pursue, develop, and coordinate grants and other funding
opportunities for state and local justice information projects that
will expand or enhance the sharing and integrated delivery of statewide
justice information;
(h) Assess state and local agencies' projects and plans for sharing
and delivery of integrated justice information, as may be requested by
the agencies, the director of the office of financial management, the
supreme court, or the legislature;
(i) Assist the office of financial management with budgetary and
policy review of state agency plans affecting the justice information
network;
(j) Recommend to the governor, the supreme court, and the
legislature those legislative changes and appropriations needed to
implement, maintain, and enhance a statewide justice information
network and to assure the availability of complete, accurate, and
timely justice information;
(k) Encourage coordination, consistency, and compatibility among
courts, state agency, and local agency justice information systems and
projects; and
(l) Adopt strategic and tactical planning goals and objectives that
implement, maintain, and enhance sharing and integrated delivery of
justice information for the state.
(2)(a) Nothing in this section supersedes the authority of the
information services board under chapter 43.105 RCW.
(b) Nothing in this section supersedes the authority of courts,
state agencies, and local agencies to control and maintain access to
information within their independent systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 10.98 RCW
to read as follows:
The board shall file a report with the governor, the supreme court,
and the chairs and ranking minority members of the senate and house
committees with jurisdiction over criminal justice funding and policy
by September 1, 2004, and not less than every two years thereafter.
The report shall include specific goals for improving criminal justice
information systems integration, a timeline and identifiable benchmarks
for achieving those goals, and recommendations concerning legislative
changes and appropriations needed to implement, operate, and enhance a
statewide justice information network to assure the availability of
complete, accurate, and timely justice information.

--- END ---