BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 72.72.020 and 1983 c 279 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Political subdivisions" means counties, cities, and towns.
(2) "Institution" means any state institution for the confinement
of adult offenders committed pursuant to chapters 10.64, 10.77, and
71.06 RCW or juvenile offenders committed pursuant to chapter 13.40
RCW, or any state hospital pursuant to RCW 70.124.020.

Sec. 2 RCW 72.72.030 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created, in the state treasury, an
institutional impact account. The secretary of social and health
services may reimburse political subdivisions for criminal justice
costs incurred directly as a result of crimes committed by offenders
residing in an institution as defined herein under the jurisdiction of
the secretary of social and health services. Such reimbursement shall
be made to the extent funds are available from the institutional impact
account. Reimbursements shall be limited to law enforcement,
prosecutorial, judicial, and jail facilities costs which are documented
to be strictly related to the criminal activities of the offender.
(2) The secretary of corrections may reimburse political
subdivisions for criminal justice costs incurred directly as a result
of crimes committed by offenders residing in an institution as defined
herein under the jurisdiction of the secretary of corrections. Such
reimbursement shall be made to the extent funds are available from the
institutional impact account. Reimbursements shall be limited to law
enforcement, prosecutorial, judicial, and jail facilities costs which
are documented to be strictly related to the criminal activities of the
offender.
(3) The secretary of social and health services shall reimburse any
city or town in which there is located a state hospital for the costs
of providing any law enforcement, prosecutorial, judicial, and judicial
facilities for criminal activities related to the state hospital.
Reimbursement shall be based in part on the costs for providing daily
twenty-four-hour law enforcement coverage for the hospital. This cost
shall be determined by the prevailing cost for law enforcement services
for the local jurisdiction as well as by local standards for providing
daily twenty-four-hour law enforcement coverage in other parts of the
city or town.

--- END ---