BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that numerous changes
to the sentencing reform act, chapter 9.94A RCW, as reported by the
sentencing guidelines commission, have resulted in increases in the
length of local jail and state prison sentences and in the number of
local jail and state prison inmates. The intent of the sentencing
reform act, particularly provisions regarding protection of the public,
reduction of the risk of reoffense, and making frugal use of state and
local government resources, would best be served, in many instances, by
local and state corrections authorities sharing resources and
jurisdiction over regional correctional facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Not later than December 31, 2003, the
sentencing guidelines commission shall present to the legislature a
plan for establishing pilot regional correctional facilities.
(2) The plan for establishing pilot regional correctional
facilities must include, but is not limited to, the following:
(a) A plan for increasing the space availability in local and
county jails for pretrial detainees;
(b) An efficient and effective plan for joint use of total
confinement beds by local and state government;
(c) A description of proposed shared and/or revised jurisdiction
and operational responsibility, including the possibility of
establishing a regional corrections authority;
(d) A summary of proposed changes to the criminal code reflecting
revised housing jurisdiction;
(e) A description of the inmate population eligible for placement
in pilot regional correctional facilities;
(f) A review of treatment services and programs intended to meet
the needs of special populations including drug and substance abuse,
mental health, and special medical needs;
(g) An estimate of potential benefits to local and county jail
operators and to the state, which could be realized by implementation
of pilot programs;
(h) A proposed method for identifying pilot regional correctional
facility sites;
(i) A methodology for ensuring that pilot regional correctional
facilities will not be sited in any county that has three or more state
or federal correctional institutions or facilities used for the
confinement of convicted felons, including prisons, work ethic camps,
and work release facilities;
(j) A methodology for evaluating the costs benefit of operation of
pilot facilities; and
(k) Recommendations for shared funding of the construction and
operation cost of the facilities from state and local resources.

--- END ---