BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.12.170 and 2001 c 253 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is established in the state treasury the state wildlife
fund which consists of moneys received from:
(a) Rentals or concessions of the department;
(b) The sale of real or personal property held for department
purposes;
(c) The sale of licenses, permits, tags, and stamps required by
chapter 77.32 RCW and RCW 77.65.490((, except annual resident adult
saltwater and all shellfish licenses, which shall be deposited into the
state general fund));
(d) Fees for informational materials published by the department;
(e) Fees for personalized vehicle license plates as provided in
chapter 46.16 RCW;
(f) Articles or wildlife sold by the director under this title;
(g) Compensation for damage to department property or wildlife
losses or contributions, gifts, or grants received under RCW 77.12.320
or 77.32.380;
(h) Excise tax on anadromous game fish collected under chapter
82.27 RCW;
(i) The sale of personal property seized by the department for
fish, shellfish, or wildlife violations; and
(j) The department's share of revenues from auctions and raffles
authorized by the commission.
(2) State and county officers receiving any moneys listed in
subsection (1) of this section shall deposit them in the state treasury
to be credited to the state wildlife fund.

--- END ---