BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 71.34 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The evaluation and treatment facility is required to promptly
provide written and verbal notice of all statutorily available
treatment options contained in this chapter to every parent or guardian
of a minor child when the parent or guardian seeks to have his or her
minor child treated at an evaluation and treatment facility.
(2) The notice must contain the following information:
(a) All current statutorily available treatment options including
but not limited to those provided in this chapter; and
(b) The procedures to be followed to utilize the treatment options
described in this chapter.
(3) The department shall produce, and make available, the written
notification that must include, at a minimum, the information contained
in subsection (2) of this section.

--- END ---