BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) It is the legislature's intent to encourage high schools and
high school students to maximize available learning opportunities that
reduce the overall time and taxpayer support for a student to complete
a postsecondary degree.
(2) A school district shall receive an allocation under subsection
(3) of this section for each student who: (a) Graduates with a high
school diploma from the district; and (b) at the time of graduation,
has accumulated postsecondary credits through participation in running
start, advanced placement, tech-prep, skills centers, college in the
high school, international baccalaureate, or any other program that
provides high school students with the opportunity to earn college
credit.
(3) Subject to legislative appropriation, the superintendent of
public instruction shall allocate to school districts, for each student
who meets the criteria in subsection (2) of this section, an amount
equal to the statewide annual average allocation for a full-time
equivalent high school student under RCW 28A.150.260, excluding small
high school enhancements. The allocation rate shall be the equivalent
of one school year of funding for every two academic years of
postsecondary course credits accumulated by the student. For students
who accumulate fewer than two academic years of course credits, the
superintendent shall allocate a pro rata share of the full allocation.
The superintendent shall make the allocation in the school year
following the student's graduation from high school based on the prior
school year's statewide annual average allocation amount.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules under
chapter 34.05 RCW to implement this section.

--- END ---