BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.075 and 2000 c 115 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An intermediate license authorizes the holder to drive a motor
vehicle under the conditions specified in this section. An applicant
for an intermediate license must be at least sixteen years of age and:
(a) Have possessed a valid instruction permit for a period of not
less than six months;
(b) Have passed a driver licensing examination administered by the
department;
(c) Have passed a course of driver's education in accordance with
the standards established in RCW 46.20.100;
(d) Present certification by his or her parent, guardian, or
employer to the department stating (i) that the applicant has had at
least fifty hours of driving experience, ten of which were at night,
during which the driver was supervised by a person at least twenty-one
years of age who has had a valid driver's license for at least three
years, and (ii) that the applicant has not been issued a notice of
traffic infraction or cited for a traffic violation that is pending at
the time of the application for the intermediate license;
(e) Not have been convicted of or found to have committed a traffic
violation within the last six months before the application for the
intermediate license; and
(f) Not have been adjudicated for an offense involving the use of
alcohol or drugs during the period the applicant held an instruction
permit.
(2) For the first six months after the issuance of an intermediate
license or until the holder reaches eighteen years of age, whichever
occurs first, the holder of the license may not operate a motor vehicle
that is carrying any passengers under the age of twenty who are not
members of the holder's immediate family as defined in RCW 42.17.020.
No person under the age of twenty who is not a member of the holder's
immediate family may ride in a motor vehicle that is being operated by
the holder of an intermediate license during this period.
(3) For the remaining six-month period of the intermediate license,
the holder may not operate a motor vehicle that is carrying more than
three passengers who are under the age of twenty who are not members of
the holder's immediate family.
(((3))) (4) The holder of an intermediate license may not operate
a motor vehicle between the hours of 1 a.m. and 5 a.m. except when the
holder is accompanied by a parent, guardian, or a licensed driver who
is at least twenty-five years of age.
(((4))) (5) It is a traffic infraction for the holder of an
intermediate license to operate a motor vehicle in violation of the
restrictions imposed under this section.
(((5))) (6) Enforcement of this section by law enforcement officers
may be accomplished only as a secondary action when a driver of a motor
vehicle has been detained for a suspected violation of this title or an
equivalent local ordinance or some other offense.
(((6))) (7) An intermediate licensee may drive at any hour without
restrictions on the number of passengers in the vehicle if necessary
for agricultural purposes.
(((7))) (8) An intermediate licensee may drive at any hour without
restrictions on the number of passengers in the vehicle if, for the
twelve-month period following the issuance of the intermediate license,
he or she:
(a) Has not been involved in an automobile accident; and
(b) Has not been convicted or found to have committed a traffic
offense described in chapter 46.61 RCW or violated restrictions placed
on an intermediate licensee under this section.

--- END ---