BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.37 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All vehicle sound system components, including any supplemental
speaker systems or components, must be securely attached to the vehicle
regardless of where the components are located, so that the components
cannot become dislodged or loose during operation of the vehicle.
(2) Enforcement of this section by law enforcement officers may be
accomplished only as a secondary action when a driver of a vehicle has
been detained for a suspected violation of this title or an equivalent
local ordinance or some other offense.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act shall be known as the Courtney
Amisson Act.

--- END ---