BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.075 and 2000 c 115 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An intermediate license authorizes the holder to drive a motor
vehicle under the conditions specified in this section. An applicant
for an intermediate license must be at least sixteen years of age and:
(a) Have possessed a valid instruction permit for a period of not
less than six months;
(b) Have passed a driver licensing examination administered by the
department;
(c) Have passed a course of driver's education in accordance with
the standards established in RCW 46.20.100;
(d) Present certification by his or her parent, guardian, or
employer to the department stating (i) that the applicant has had at
least fifty hours of driving experience, ten of which were at night,
during which the driver was supervised by a person at least twenty-one
years of age who has had a valid driver's license for at least three
years, and (ii) that the applicant has not been issued a notice of
traffic infraction or cited for a traffic violation that is pending at
the time of the application for the intermediate license;
(e) Not have been convicted of or found to have committed a traffic
violation within the last six months before the application for the
intermediate license; and
(f) Not have been adjudicated for an offense involving the use of
alcohol or drugs during the period the applicant held an instruction
permit.
(2) For the first six months after the issuance of an intermediate
license or until the holder reaches eighteen years of age, whichever
occurs first, the holder of the license may not operate a motor vehicle
that is carrying any passengers under the age of twenty who are not
members of the holder's immediate family as defined in RCW 42.17.020
unless the driver is being supervised by a licensed driver with at
least five years of driving experience who is sitting in the front,
right passenger seating position at the time the license holder is
carrying passengers who are under the age of twenty and are not members
of the holder's immediate family. For the remaining period of the
intermediate license, the holder may not operate a motor vehicle that
is carrying more than three passengers who are under the age of twenty
who are not members of the holder's immediate family.
(3) The holder of an intermediate license may not operate a motor
vehicle between the hours of 1 a.m. and 5 a.m. except when the holder
is accompanied by a parent, guardian, or a licensed driver who is at
least twenty-five years of age.
(4) It is a traffic infraction for the holder of an intermediate
license to operate a motor vehicle in violation of the restrictions
imposed under this section.
(5) Enforcement of this section by law enforcement officers may be
accomplished only as a secondary action when a driver of a motor
vehicle has been detained for a suspected violation of this title or an
equivalent local ordinance or some other offense.
(6) An intermediate licensee may drive at any hour without
restrictions on the number of passengers in the vehicle if necessary
for agricultural purposes.
(7) An intermediate licensee may drive at any hour without
restrictions on the number of passengers in the vehicle if, for the
twelve-month period following the issuance of the intermediate license,
he or she:
(a) Has not been involved in an automobile accident; and
(b) Has not been convicted or found to have committed a traffic
offense described in chapter 46.61 RCW or violated restrictions placed
on an intermediate licensee under this section.

--- END ---