BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 3.50.020 and 2000 c 111 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The municipal court shall have exclusive original jurisdiction over
traffic infractions arising under city ordinances and exclusive
original criminal jurisdiction of all violations of city ordinances
duly adopted by the city ((in which the municipal court is located))
and shall have original jurisdiction of all other actions brought to
enforce or recover license penalties or forfeitures declared or given
by such ordinances or by state statutes. Any municipality may operate
a municipal court under this chapter with one or more other
municipalities, pursuant to an interlocal agreement under chapter 39.34
RCW. Municipal courts operating under any such interlocal agreements
shall have exclusive original criminal and other jurisdiction as set
forth in this section. The municipal court shall also have the
jurisdiction as conferred by statute. The municipal court is empowered
to forfeit cash bail or bail bonds and issue execution thereon; and in
general to hear and determine all causes, civil or criminal, including
traffic infractions, arising under such ordinances and to pronounce
judgment in accordance therewith. A municipal court participating in
the program established by the office of the administrator for the
courts pursuant to RCW 2.56.160 shall have jurisdiction to take
recognizance, approve bail, and arraign defendants held within its
jurisdiction on warrants issued by any court of limited jurisdiction
participating in the program.

Sec. 2 RCW 3.50.805 and 1984 c 258 s 203 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A municipality operating a municipal court under this chapter
shall not terminate that court unless the municipality has reached an
agreement with the appropriate county or another municipality under
chapter 39.34 RCW under which the county or municipality is to be paid
a reasonable amount for costs associated with prosecution,
adjudication, and sentencing in ((criminal)) all cases filed in
district or municipal court as a result of the termination. The
agreement shall provide for periodic review and renewal of the terms of
the agreement. If the municipality and the county or municipality are
unable to agree on the terms for renewal of the agreement, they shall
be deemed to have entered into an agreement to submit the issue to
arbitration under chapter 7.04 RCW. Pending conclusion of the
arbitration proceeding, the terms of the agreement shall remain in
effect. The municipality and the county or municipality have the same
rights and are subject to the same duties as other parties who have
agreed to submit to arbitration under chapter 7.04 RCW. A municipality
that has entered into agreements with other municipalities that have
terminated their municipal courts may not thereafter terminate its
court unless each municipality has reached an agreement with the
appropriate county in accordance with this section.
(2) A municipality operating a municipal court under this chapter
may not repeal in its entirety that portion of its municipal code
defining crimes while retaining the court's authority to hear and
determine traffic infractions under chapter 46.63 RCW unless the
municipality has reached an agreement with the county under chapter
39.34 RCW under which the county is to be paid a reasonable amount for
costs associated with prosecution, adjudication, and sentencing in
criminal cases filed in district court as a result of the repeal. The
agreement shall provide for periodic review and renewal of the terms of
the agreement. If the municipality and the county are unable to agree
on the terms for renewal of the agreement, they shall be deemed to have
entered into an agreement to submit the issue to arbitration under
chapter 7.04 RCW. Pending conclusion of the arbitration proceeding,
the terms of the agreement shall remain in effect. The municipality
and the county have the same rights and are subject to the same duties
as other parties who have agreed to submit to arbitration under chapter
7.04 RCW.
(3) A municipality operating a municipal court under this chapter
may not repeal a provision of its municipal code which defines a crime
equivalent to an offense listed in RCW 46.63.020 unless the
municipality has reached an agreement with the county under chapter
39.34 RCW under which the county is to be paid a reasonable amount for
costs associated with prosecution, adjudication, and sentencing in
criminal cases filed in district court as a result of the repeal. The
agreement shall provide for periodic review and renewal of the terms of
the agreement. If the municipality and the county are unable to agree
on the terms for renewal of the agreement, they shall be deemed to have
entered into an agreement to submit the issue to arbitration under
chapter 7.04 RCW. Pending conclusion of the arbitration proceeding,
the terms of the agreement shall remain in effect. The municipality
and the county have the same rights and are subject to the same duties
as other parties who have agreed to submit to arbitration under chapter
7.04 RCW.

--- END ---