BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.94.470 and 1991 c 199 s 502 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish, by rule under chapter 34.05
RCW, (((a))) a statewide opacity level of twenty percent for
residential solid fuel burning devices for ((the purpose of))
enforcement on a complaint basis and (((b) a statewide opacity of ten
percent)) for ((purposes of)) public education.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter which may
allow an authority to adopt a more stringent opacity level, no
authority shall adopt or enforce an opacity level for solid fuel
burning devices other than established in this section.
(3) Actions of the department and local air pollution control
authorities under this section shall preempt actions of other state
agencies and local governments for the purposes of controlling air
pollution from solid fuel burning devices, except where authorized by
chapter 199, Laws of 1991.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.94.473 and 1998 c 342 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person in a residence or commercial establishment which has
an adequate source of heat without burning wood shall((:
(a))) not burn wood in any solid fuel burning device whenever the
department has determined under RCW 70.94.715 that any air pollution
episode exists in that geographic area((;
(b) Not burn wood in any solid fuel burning device except those
which are either Oregon department of environmental quality phase II or
United States environmental protection agency certified or certified by
the department under RCW 70.94.457(1) or a pellet stove either
certified or issued an exemption by the United States environmental
protection agency in accordance with Title 40, Part 60 of the code of
federal regulations, in the geographical area and for the period of
time that a first stage of)) or an impaired air quality has been
determined, by the department or any authority, for that geographic
area, for the period of time that the event lasts. ((A first stage
of))
(2)(a) An impaired air quality event is reached when: (i) Before
March 31, 2004, particulates ten microns and smaller in diameter are at
an ambient level of sixty micrograms per cubic meter measured on a
twenty-four hour average; (ii) after March 31, 2004, particulates two
and one-half microns and smaller in diameter are at an ambient level
that exceeds the level set by the department pursuant to subsection (3)
of this section; or when (iii) carbon monoxide is at an ambient level
of eight parts of contaminant per million parts of air by volume
measured on an eight-hour average((; and
(c) Not burn wood in any solid fuel burning device in a
geographical area and for the period of time that a second stage of
impaired air quality has been determined by the department or any
authority, for that area. A second stage of impaired air quality is
reached when particulates ten microns and smaller in diameter are at an
ambient level of one hundred five micrograms per cubic meter measured
on a twenty-four hour average)).
(((2))) (b) The department must adopt in rule the ambient level of
particulates two and one-half microns and smaller in diameter that must
be measured in order to reach an impaired air quality event after March
31, 2004. If possible, the rules adopted under this section should
conform to standards adopted by the federal government for ambient
particulate matter. The department may amend any rules adopted under
this section should federal standards change or the department find
that a lower particulate concentration is appropriate for the
protection of human health.
(3) Actions of the department and local air pollution control
authorities under this section shall preempt actions of other state
agencies and local governments for the purposes of controlling air
pollution from solid fuel burning devices, except where authorized by
chapter 199, Laws of 1991.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.94.483 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 ss 64, 65 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The wood stove education and enforcement account is hereby
created in the state treasury. Money placed in the account shall
include all money received under subsection (2) of this section and any
other money appropriated by the legislature. Money in the account
shall be spent for the purposes of the wood stove education program
established under RCW 70.94.480, for a wood stove buy-back program
pursuant to section 4 of this act, and for enforcement of the wood
stove program, and shall be subject to legislative appropriation.
(2) The department of ecology, with the advice of the advisory
committee, shall set a flat fee of ((thirty)) forty dollars, on the
retail sale, as defined in RCW 82.04.050, of each solid fuel burning
device after January 1, 1992. The fee shall be imposed upon the
consumer and shall not be subject to the retail sales tax provisions of
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW. The fee ((may)) shall be adjusted
annually above ((thirty)) forty dollars to account for inflation as
determined by the state office of the economic and revenue forecast
council. The fee shall be collected by the department of revenue in
conjunction with the retail sales tax under chapter 82.08 RCW. If the
seller fails to collect the fee herein imposed or fails to remit the
fee to the department of revenue in the manner prescribed in chapter
82.08 RCW, the seller shall be personally liable to the state for the
amount of the fee. The collection provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW
shall apply. The department of revenue shall deposit fees collected
under this section in the wood stove education and enforcement account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.94 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may institute a wood stove buy-back program
designed to exchange wood stoves for credit towards the purchase of a
new natural gas or propane stove.
(2) The department may either directly administer the stove buy-back program, or provide funds for stove buy-back programs that are
administered by local air agencies.
(3) The department should work with the private sector in
establishing a credit system for the purchase of new natural gas or
propane stoves.

--- END ---