BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.48.010 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 207 are each
amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Individually identifiable" means that a record contains
information which reveals or can likely be associated with the identity
of the person or persons to whom the record pertains.
(2) "Legally authorized representative" means a person legally
authorized to give consent for the disclosure of personal records on
behalf of a minor or a legally incompetent adult.
(3) "Personal record" means any information obtained or maintained
by a state agency which refers to a person and which is declared exempt
from public disclosure, confidential, or privileged under state or
federal law.
(4) "Research" means a ((planned and systematic sociological,
psychological, epidemiological, biomedical, or other scientific
investigation carried out by a state agency, by a scientific research
professional associated with a bona fide scientific research
organization, or by a graduate student currently enrolled in an
advanced academic degree curriculum, with an objective to contribute to
scientific knowledge, the solution of social and health problems, or
the evaluation of public benefit and service programs. This definition
excludes methods of record analysis and data collection that are
subjective, do not permit replication, and are not designed to yield
reliable and valid results)) systematic investigation, including
research development, testing, and evaluation, designed to develop or
contribute to generalizable knowledge. Activities that meet this
definition are research whether or not they are conducted or supported
under a program that is considered research for other purposes. For
example, some demonstration and service programs may include research
activities. This definition excludes methods of record analysis and
data collection that are subjective, do not permit replication, and are
not designed to yield reliable and valid results.
(5) "Research in the jurisdiction of a state agency" means: (a)
Research conducted by an employee or a contractor of a state agency;
(b) research sponsored by a state agency; or (c) research that involves
access to or disclosure of identifiable personal records obtained or
maintained by a state agency.
(6) "Research record" means an item or grouping of information
obtained for the purpose of research from or about a person or
extracted for the purpose of research from a personal record.
(((6))) (7) "State agency" means: (a) The department of social and
health services; (b) the department of corrections; (c) an institution
of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016; ((or)) (d) the
department of health; or (e) the department of labor and industries.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.48.020 and 1985 c 334 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A state agency may authorize or provide access to or provide
copies of an individually identifiable personal record for research
purposes if informed written consent for the disclosure has been given
to the appropriate department secretary, or the president of the
institution, as applicable, or his or her designee, by the person to
whom the record pertains or, in the case of minors and legally
incompetent adults, the person's legally authorized representative.
(2) A state agency may authorize or provide access to or provide
copies of an individually identifiable personal record for research
purposes without the informed consent of the person to whom the record
pertains or the person's legally authorized representative, only if:
(a) The state agency adopts research review and approval rules
including, but not limited to, the requirement that the appropriate
department secretary, or the president of the institution, as
applicable, ((appoint a standing human research)) designate a
registered institutional review board competent to review research
proposals as to ethical and scientific soundness; and the review board
determines that the disclosure request has scientific merit and is of
importance in terms of the agency's program concerns, that the research
purposes cannot be reasonably accomplished without disclosure of the
information in individually identifiable form and without waiver of the
informed consent of the person to whom the record pertains or the
person's legally authorized representative, that disclosure risks have
been minimized, and that remaining risks are outweighed by anticipated
health, safety, or scientific benefits; and
(b) The disclosure does not violate federal law or regulations; and
(c) The state agency negotiates with the research professional
receiving the records or record information a written and legally
binding confidentiality agreement prior to disclosure. The agreement
shall:
(i) Establish specific safeguards to assure the continued
confidentiality and security of individually identifiable records or
record information;
(ii) Ensure that the research professional will report or publish
research findings and conclusions in a manner that does not permit
identification of the person whose record was used for the research.
Final research reports or publications shall not include photographs or
other visual representations contained in personal records;
(iii) Establish that the research professional will destroy the
individual identifiers associated with the records or record
information as soon as the purposes of the research project have been
accomplished and notify the agency to this effect in writing;
(iv) Prohibit any subsequent disclosure of the records or record
information in individually identifiable form except as provided in RCW
42.48.040; and
(v) Provide for the signature of the research professional, of any
of the research professional's team members who require access to the
information in identified form, and of the agency official authorized
to approve disclosure of identifiable records or record information for
research purposes.

Sec. 3 RCW 42.48.040 and 1985 c 334 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
No research professional who conducts research in the jurisdiction
of a state agency and who has established an individually identifiable
research record from personal record information pursuant to RCW
42.48.020(2), or who has established a research record from data or
information voluntarily provided by ((an agency client or employee)) a
research subject under ((a)) an oral or written confidentiality
assurance for the explicit purpose of research, may disclose such a
record in individually identifiable form unless:
(1) The person to whom the research record pertains or the person's
legally authorized representative has given prior informed written
consent for the disclosure; or
(2) The research professional reasonably believes that disclosure
will prevent or minimize injury to a person and the disclosure is
limited to information necessary to protect the person who has been or
may be injured, and the research professional reports the disclosure
only to the person involved or the person's guardian, the person's
physician, and the agency; or
(3)(a) The research record is disclosed in individually
identifiable form for the purposes of auditing or evaluating a research
program; and
(b) The audit or evaluation is authorized or required by federal or
state law or regulation or is based upon an explicit provision in a
research contract, grant, or other written research agreement; and
(c) No subsequent disclosure of the research record in individually
identifiable form will be made by the auditor or evaluator except as
provided in this section; or
(4) The research record is furnished in compliance with a search
warrant or court order: PROVIDED, That:
(a) The court issues the search warrant or judicial subpoena
concerning the research record solely for the purpose of facilitating
inquiry into an alleged violation of law by the research professional
using the record for a research purpose or by the agency; and
(b) Any research record obtained pursuant to (a) of this subsection
and any information directly or indirectly derived from the research
record shall remain confidential to the extent possible and shall not
be used as evidence in an administrative, judicial, or legislative
proceeding except against the research professional using the record
for a research purpose or against the state agency.

--- END ---