BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 80.36.005 and 2002 c 104 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 80.36.410
through 80.36.475, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Community agency" means local community agencies that
administer community service voice mail programs.
(2) "Community service voice mail" means a computerized voice mail
system that provides low-income recipients with: (a) An individually
assigned telephone number; (b) the ability to record a personal
greeting; and (c) a private security code to retrieve messages.
(3) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(4) "Service year" means the period between July 1st and June 30th.
(5) "Community action agency" means local community action agencies
or local community service agencies designated by the department of
community, trade, and economic development under chapter 43.63A RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 80.36.410 and 2002 c 104 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that universal telephone service is an
important policy goal of the state. The legislature further finds
that: (((1))) (a) Recent changes in the telecommunications industry,
such as federal access charges, raise concerns about the ability of
low-income persons to continue to afford access to local exchange
telephone service; and (((2))) (b) many low-income persons making the
transition to independence from receiving supportive services through
community agencies do not qualify for economic assistance from the
department.
(2) Therefore, the legislature finds that: (a) It is in the public
interest to take steps to mitigate the effects of these changes on low-income persons; and (b) advances in telecommunications technologies,
such as community service voice mail provide new and economically
efficient ways to secure many of the benefits of universal service to
low-income persons who are not customers of local exchange telephone
service.

Sec. 3 RCW 80.36.420 and 1990 c 170 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Washington telephone assistance program shall be available to
participants of ((department)) programs set forth in RCW 80.36.470.
Assistance shall consist of the following components:
(1) A discount on service connection fees of fifty percent or more
as set forth in RCW 80.36.460.
(2) A waiver of deposit requirements on local exchange service, as
set forth in RCW 80.36.460.
(3) A discounted flat rate service for local exchange service,
which shall be subject to the following conditions:
(a) The commission shall establish a single telephone assistance
rate for all local exchange companies operating in the state of
Washington. The telephone assistance rate shall include any federal
end user ((access)) charges and any other charges necessary to obtain
local exchange service.
(b) The commission shall, in establishing the telephone assistance
rate, consider all charges for local exchange service, including
federal end user ((access)) charges, mileage charges, extended area
service, and any other charges necessary to obtain local exchange
service.
(c) The telephone assistance rate shall only be available to
eligible customers subscribing to the lowest ((available)) priced local
exchange flat rate service, where the lowest priced local exchange flat
rate service, including any federal end user ((access)) charges and any
other charges necessary to obtain local exchange service, is greater
than the telephone assistance rate. ((Low-income senior citizens sixty
years of age and older and other low-income persons identified by the
department as medically needy shall, where single-party service is
available, be provided with single-party service as the lowest
available local exchange flat rate service.))
(d) The cost of providing the service shall be paid, to the maximum
extent possible, by a waiver of all or part of ((the)) federal end user
((access)) charges and, to the extent necessary, from the telephone
assistance fund created by RCW 80.36.430.
(4) A discount on a community service voice mailbox that provides
recipients with (a) an individually assigned telephone number; (b) the
ability to record a personal greeting; and (c) a secure private
security code to retrieve messages.

Sec. 4 RCW 80.36.430 and 1990 c 170 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington telephone assistance program shall be funded by
a telephone assistance excise tax on all switched access lines and by
funds from any federal government or other programs for this purpose.
Switched access lines are defined in RCW 82.14B.020. The telephone
assistance excise tax shall be applied equally to all residential and
business access lines not to exceed fourteen cents per month. The
telephone assistance excise tax shall be separately identified on each
ratepayer's bill as the "Washington telephone assistance program." All
money collected from the telephone assistance excise tax shall be
transferred to a telephone assistance fund administered by the
department.
(2) Local exchange companies shall bill the fund for their expenses
incurred in offering the telephone assistance program, including
administrative and program expenses. The department shall disburse the
money to the local exchange companies. The department is exempted from
having to conclude a contract with local exchange companies in order to
effect this reimbursement. The department shall recover its
administrative costs from the fund. The department may specify by rule
the range and extent of administrative and program expenses that will
be reimbursed to local exchange companies.
(3) The department shall enter into an agreement with the
department of community, trade, and economic development for an amount
not to exceed eight percent of the prior fiscal year's total revenue
for the administrative and program expenses of providing community
service voice mail services. The community service voice mail service
may include toll-free lines in community action agencies through which
recipients can access their community service voice mailboxes at no
charge.

Sec. 5 RCW 80.36.440 and 1990 c 170 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission and the department may adopt any rules necessary
to implement RCW 80.36.410 through 80.36.470.
(2) Rules necessary for the implementation of community service
voice mail services shall be made by the commission and the department
in consultation with the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

Sec. 6 RCW 80.36.450 and 1993 c 249 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Washington telephone assistance program shall ((be limited))
limit reimbursement to one residential switched access line per
eligible household, or one discounted community service voice mailbox
per eligible person.

Sec. 7 RCW 80.36.460 and 1990 c 170 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Local exchange companies shall ((file tariffs with the commission
which)) waive deposits on local exchange service for eligible
subscribers and ((which establish)) provide a fifty percent discount on
the company's customary charge for commencing telecommunications
service ((connection fees)) for eligible subscribers. Part or all of
the remaining fifty percent of service connection fees may be paid by
funds from federal government or other programs for this purpose. The
commission or other appropriate agency shall make timely application
for any available federal funds. The remaining portion of the
connection fee to be paid by the subscriber shall be expressly payable
by installment fees spread over a period of months. A subscriber may,
however, choose to pay the connection fee in a lump sum. Costs
associated with the waiver and discount shall be accounted for
separately and recovered from the telephone assistance fund.
((Eligible subscribers shall be allowed one waiver of a deposit and one
discount on service connection fees per year.))

Sec. 8 RCW 80.36.470 and 2002 c 104 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Adult recipients of department-administered programs for the
financially needy which provide continuing financial or medical
assistance, food stamps, or supportive services to persons in their own
homes are eligible for participation in the telephone assistance
program. The department shall notify the participants of their
eligibility.
(2) Participants in community service voice mail programs are
eligible for participation in ((the telephone assistance program))
services available under RCW 80.36.420 (1), (2), and (3) after
completing use of community service voice mail services. Eligibility
shall be for a period including the remainder of the current service
year and the following service year. Community agencies shall notify
the department of participants eligible under this subsection.

Sec. 9 RCW 80.36.475 and 1990 c 170 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall report to the ((energy and utilities))
appropriate committees of the house of representatives and the senate
by December 1 of each year on the status of the Washington telephone
assistance program. The report shall include the number of
participants by qualifying social service programs receiving benefits
from the telephone assistance program and the type of benefits
participants receive. The report shall also include a description of
the geographical distribution of participants, the program's annual
revenue and expenditures, and any recommendations for legislative
action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 1998 c 159 s 1, 1993 c 249 s 3, 1990 c 170
s 8, & 1987 c 229 s 12 (uncodified) are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 2002 c 104 s 4 (uncodified) is repealed.

--- END ---