BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 15.13.310 and 2002 c 215 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An annual assessment shall be levied on the gross sale price of
the wholesale market value for all horticultural plants of the genera
Chaenomeles, Cydonia, Crataegus, Malus, Prunus, Pyrus, Sorbus, and
Vitis produced in Washington, and sold within the state or shipped from
the state by any licensed nursery dealer during any license period.
This annual assessment is based on the first sale price of such nursery
stock except for rootstocks which are replanted and/or grafted or
budded and planted for growing-on in the nursery. The director shall
by rule determine the rate of an assessment needed to carry out the
grapevine and fruit tree certification and nursery improvement programs
set forth in RCW 15.13.470 and chapter 15.14 RCW.
The wholesale market price may be determined by the wholesale
catalogue price of the seller of the horticultural plants assessed
under this section or of the shipper moving such nursery stock out of
the state. If the seller or shipper does not have a catalogue, then
the wholesale market price may be based on the actual selling price or
an average wholesale market price. The director in determining the
average wholesale market price may use catalogues of various businesses
licensed under the provisions of this chapter or any other reasonable
method.
(2) The assessment is due and payable on the first day of July of
each year.
(3) The gross sale period shall be from July 1 to June 30 of the
previous year.
(4) The department may audit the records of licensees during normal
business hours to determine that the appropriate assessment has been
paid.
(5) The annual assessment for horticultural plants of the genera
Chaenomeles, Cydonia, Craetagus, Malus, Prunus, Pyrus, and Sorbus
established under this section may be increased in excess of the fiscal
growth factor as provided in RCW 43.135.055 for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2004. This subsection is null and void if any of the moneys
from any source that have been deposited in the agricultural local fund
are transferred to the general fund or authorized to be transferred to
the general fund by legislation enacted after January 1, 2003, and
before July 1, 2003.

--- END ---