BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout sections 1 through 4 of this act unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department of community,
trade, and economic development.
(3) "Eligible person" means a person who meets the requirements set
forth in section 3 of this act.
(4) "Income requirement" means an income level, set by the
department in rule, that is below the median family income of the
state.
(5) "Manufactured home purchase loan" means a loan for the purchase
of a manufactured home, manufactured home lot, or manufactured home and
lot that is guaranteed under the manufactured home purchase assistance
program.
(6) "Lender" means banks, trust companies, savings and loan
associations, credit unions, nonprofit housing organizations, or other
financial institutions that provide manufactured home purchase loans.
(7) "Manufactured home" means a single-family dwelling built in
accordance with the department of housing and urban development
manufactured home construction and safety standards act, which is a
national, preemptive building code.
(8) "Manufactured home standards" means the manufactured home
construction and safety standards as promulgated by the United States
department of housing and urban development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The manufactured home purchase assistance
program is created in the department to assist eligible persons in
obtaining manufactured home purchase loans.
(1) Lenders providing financing to an eligible person for a home
purchase loan will be insured by the manufactured home purchase
assistance program against default by the eligible person under the
terms provided in sections 1 through 4 of this act.
(2) Before a lender makes a manufactured home purchase loan the
lender must, pursuant to contract, establish the terms of the loan
guarantee with the department before it will be insured under the
assistance program. The manufactured home purchase loan must provide
a fixed interest rate loan based upon the best prevailing market rate
in the area at the time the loan is made.
(3) If an eligible person defaults, the lender may apply to the
department for reimbursement for the defaulted amount in accordance
with the terms of the contract between the department and lender.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 To qualify for a manufactured home purchase
loan a person must:
(1) Make a down payment of five percent of the value of the
manufactured home, manufactured home lot, or manufactured home and lot;
(2) Demonstrate that they have current adequate income to make the
payments on the loan and meet their other expenses, including a salary
that is at least two and one-half times the value of the expected
monthly payment on the home purchase loan;
(3) Not have declared bankruptcy under the federal bankruptcy code
at any time within the past ten years;
(4) Provide documentation or other proof, as required by the
department, that the person has been continuously employed for the
three years prior to the loan guarantee request;
(5) Have a suitable site on which to place the manufactured home.
The home may be placed on a rental site in a manufactured home park, or
on an individual home site owned or leased by the borrowers. The site
must meet the established local standards for site suitability and have
adequate water supply and sewage disposal facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The department may, pursuant to a
contract, agree to provide funds to a lender in the event an eligible
person has defaulted on a home purchase loan. The department shall not
guarantee additional loans if the available money to fund the program
does not equal or exceed the amount it would cost to repay lenders if
fifty percent of all current applicants defaulted on their home
purchase loans.
(2) The manufactured home purchase assistance account is created in
the custody of the state treasurer. The account shall contain all
money allocated by the state to the account and any other money
otherwise transferred into the account. Expenditures from the account
must be used only to fund the manufactured home purchase assistance
program as specified under this section and sections 1 through 3 of
this act. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act are each
added to chapter 43.31 RCW.

--- END ---