BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that: There is an
unmet need for services for persons with developmental disabilities
that is exacerbated by the current fiscal crisis; funding shortfalls in
the 2003-2005 biennium and beyond may adversely impact the ability of
the state to fund programs for growing numbers of unserved persons with
developmental disabilities; statistics generated by the department of
social and health services' division of developmental disabilities have
demonstrated a growing caseload with no increased funding to keep up
with this growth; and the funding shortfall includes funding for
individuals with developmental disabilities to receive employment or
day programs that are essential to the continued efforts to provide a
full spectrum of community care consistent with the growing unmet need.
The December 4, 2002, capital study of the division of developmental
disabilities residential habilitation centers by the joint legislative
audit and review committee identifies options to dispose of surplus
property at Lakeland Village, Rainier School, and Yakima Valley School.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 71A.20 RCW
to read as follows:
After the effective date of this section, the net proceeds of the
sale or sales of any building, facility, or tract of land not held in
trust at any of the residential habilitation centers identified in this
chapter must be designated to supplement funding or restore reductions
in employment and day services and other needs identified by the
department to provide specifically for the needs of the developmental
disabilities community.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---